Authors
Scott Renshaw
Number of Reviews
911

Title
Review for Higher Learning (1995)
Starring:  Omar Epps, Kristy Swanson, Michael Rapaport, Ice Cube,
           Laurence Fishburne, Tyra Banks, Jennifer Connelly.
Screenplay/Director:  John Singleton.
     When I learned that John (BOYZ N THE HOOD) Singleton was making
a film about issues of race and gender on college campuses, I was
intrigued and optimistic.  Though POETIC JUSTICE was a misfire, BOYZ
showed that Singleton could tell a story, and after nearly ten years
around Stanford, one of the nation's hotbeds of multicultural
experimentation, I knew that there were many stories to tell.
HIGHER LEARNING shows that Singleton recognized that fact as well;
unfortunately, he tried to tell them all in one movie.  It's an
ambitious but unfocused effort which is admirable for its balanced
perspective but leaves critical characters as mere representations
of the stereotypes it seems to be challenging.
     HIGHER LEARNING follows three freshmen at fictional Columbus
University.  Malik (Omar Epps) is an African-American track star who
is challenged by the incendiary anti-establishment views of
sixth-year senior Fudge (Ice Cube) and by the more moderate opinions
of his political science professor (Laurence Fishburne); Kristen
(Kristy Swanson) is a Southern California blonde who is drawn to a
lesbian upperclassman (Jennifer Connelly) after an acquaintance
rape; Remy (Michale Rapaport) is a white male from Idaho whose
desire to fit in somewhere leads him to a group of white supremists.
The truce between these students and their respective factions is an
uneasy one at best, but it explodes into violence when a conflict
between Malik and Remy goes over the edge, drawing the entire campus
into it.
     For fully half of its running time, HIGHER LEARNING appears to
be headed in the right direction.  Unlike contemporaries Oliver
Stone and Spike Lee, Singleton does know how to present challenging
and controversial subject matter without shouting at the top of his
lungs in every frame.  In a Stone film, the hero's two mentors would
be manifestations of Good and Evil; Singleton, on the other hand,
makes both Fudge and Professor Phipps smart and sensible characters,
leaving the audience to draw its own conclusions.  It doesn't hurt
that both roles are played by magnetic screen presences.  Ice Cube
has true star potential, a powerful personality and a fine actor,
and he keeps Fudge from being simply a spouter of dogma.  Laurence
Fishburne's Phipps doesn't really need a West Indian accent, but he
shows a genuine concern for Malik, and also keeps his speeches from
sounding didactic.  Malik's storyline is the most carefully plotted,
and Omar Epps' fine performance as the young man weighing two views
of being black in America makes it the most interesting to watch.
     But Singleton fails to give his other two principles the same
kind of depth.  Kristy Swanson shines in early scenes which show her
trying to fit in with other girls and learning to express her own
point of view in Phipps' class.  Then, as Kristen's sexual
experimentation becomes the focus, Singleton pulls back, and never
tries to get inside her head after a love scene in which she is
alternately with Jennifer Connelly's Taryn and Malik's gentle
roommate (Jason Wiles); both relationships are sadly
under-developed.  Michael Rapaport's Remy has almost identical
problems, beginning as a lost soul and ending up a crazed skinhead.
His story could have been an opportunity to examine why real,
intelligent young people feel so threatened in a multi-cultural
society, but he's pushed so far to the fringe that he becomes a
cartoon.
     The problems with those two characters are representative of
what is most wrong with HIGHER LEARNING, particularly in its second
half.  While Singleton seems to want us to "unlearn" stereotypical
perceptions (as his none-too-subtle coda informs us), it is exactly
stereotypes that he traffics in.  The feminist character is an
earnest lesbian, the frat guy is a rapist, the campus security
guards are posturing racists, every African-American male is angry
and the one Sensitive White Male is a long-haired bohemian type.
Once the "sieg heil" shouting Hitler youth take center stage, it
becomes clear that Singleton has eschewed examining the complexities
of the way young people learn to interact at a university in
exchange for an operatic, hiss-at-the-bad-guys kind of drama.
HIGHER LEARNING is awash in good intentions, but too often it's
terribly simplistic, taking a story which should have been about the
shaping of minds and reducing it to a matter of who's got the guns.

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
REQUIEM FOR A DREAM
(Artisan)
Starring:  Ellen Burstyn, Jared Leto, Jennifer Connelly, Marlon Wayans,
Christopher McDonald.
Screenplay:  Hubert Selby, Jr. and Darren Aronofsky, based on the novel by
Selby.
Producers:  Eric Watson and Palmer West.
Director:  Darren Aronofsky.
MPAA Rating:  NC-17 (drug use, sexual situations, nudity, profanity,
adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If it was director Darren Aronofsky's goal to use REQUIEM FOR A DREAM
as a variation on A CLOCKWORK ORANGE's Ludivico treatment ... well,
mission accomplished. His adaptation of Huber Selby, Jr.'s novel is a
dazzling multi-media assault, a tale of degradation and shattered lives
that will make you feel as though you need a brain enema to cleanse your
memory of its most disturbing images. Aronofsky's singularly inventive
visual style, combined with one of the year's most chillingly evocative
scores by Clint Mansell and the Kronos Quartet, dares you not to look
away, lest you miss something potentially extraordinary. REQUIEM FOR A
DREAM is arresting, compelling and frequently flat-out horrifying.
     So why isn't it one of the best films of the year, if not _the_ best
film? Because for all of Aronofsky's stylistic prowess, and all the film's
visceral power, this narrative falls into an all-too-common trap: It
spells out too much of the subtext, and doesn't trust the viewer to get
the point without a good-old fashioned bludgeoning. The story focuses on
four characters in search of an exit in Brooklyn. Sara Goldfarb (Ellen
Burstyn) is a widow who spends her days eating chocolates and watching
info-mercials in her Coney Island apartment. Her only son Harry (Jared
Leto) is a heroin addict who keeps pawning Sara's television to fix
himself, his girlfriend Marion (Jennifer Connelly) and best pal Tyrone
(Marlon Wayans). Harry and company have a plan to become independent by
going into the dealing business themselves, a plan they think will make
all their dreams come true. Sara, meanwhile, may have a chance to fulfill
her own dream of being a contestant on a TV game show, but first she'll
have to lose a lot of weight to get into her favorite red dress -- even if
that means taking a few habit-forming diet pills.
     During the portion of REQUIEM FOR A DREAM when these characters still
have hope that their dreams may come true, it's a dynamic film experience.
Aronofsky eschews the typical fetishistic shots of injections,
substituting rapid-fire montages to represent the characters' respective
fixes. He gets inside the highs and lows, sometimes with sound (a
depressant turning words from the television into a gradually slowing
record), sometimes with images (a fish-eye lens distorting Sara into a
startling grotesquerie). There are brilliant moments both when the film is
at its most kinetic (Sara's speed-fuelled cleaning jags) and at its most
serene (Harry and Marion sharing a tender split-screen moment in which
their physical connection is disturbingly disjointed). As he demonstrated
in 1998's PI, Aronofsky is one of the few true visionaries making American
movies.
     There's style to spare in REQUIEM FOR A DREAM, but there's not as
much substance as there should be, and what substance there is becomes too
blatant in its presentation. Early in the film, an intriguing theme
develops as we see Sara indulge in her sweets and self-help TV: Even as
she frets over Harry's addiction, it's clear she seeks some mood-altering
quick fixes of her own. But Aronofsky spells it out when he has Harry
note, "What's mom's fix? Television!" Similarly, a subtle moment in which
Sara is given a preferred seat among the women outside her building --
just because she may be on television in the near future -- is underlined
by Sara's comment on her royal treatment. Every time REQUIEM FOR A DREAM
is on the verge of being about more than its characters' inevitable spiral
into agony, it quickly offers the Cliff's Notes version and moves you
along to the next moment of personal hell.
     And eventually, all those moments of personal hell become wearying.
As splendidly acted as REQUIEM FOR A DREAM is -- and every one of the four
principals is very good, particularly Burstyn -- it's ultimately a film
that pays far more attention to the things drugs does to these people than
what it takes away from them. It becomes such a relentless parade of
dignity-destroying acts and physical disintegration that the broadly
sketched characterizations vanish in the wake of their misery. It
conditions you to feel repulsed by what drugs do to these people without
allowing you to feel for them as people. This is spectacularly staged and
marvelously performed "Just Say No" melodrama -- REEFER MADNESS for the
art house set. It's impossible not to get REQUIEM FOR A DREAM's message,
and nearly impossible not to applaud the messenger. But after 102 minutes,
it feels like you've been strapped into a chair while the message imbeds
itself into your pried-open eyeballs.

Title
Review for Losing Isaiah (1995)
Starring:  Jessica Lange, Halle Berry, David Strathairn,
           Marc John Jefferies, Samuel L. Jackson.
Screenplay:  Naomi Foner.
Director:  Stephen Gyllenhaal.
     It is one of film criticism's most ubiquitous put-downs--one
I frequently use myself--to compare a theatrical feature to a
TV-movie.  Such a description is intended to describe both subject
matter (usually topical or sensationalistic) and manner of
presentation (usually didactic or sentimental).  LOSING ISAIAH has
garnered more TV-movie comparisons than I can count, but the
comparison isn't entirely appropriate.  True, the subject of birth
mother/adoptive mother custody conflict is a television staple;
there were probably three such films on the small screen in the last
month.  But TV-movies generally feature one-dimensional characters
and a specific agenda.  LOSING ISAIAH features one-dimensional
characters and a steadfast refusal to adopt a point of view.
     LOSING ISAIAH opens in 1992 in Chicago's housing projects,
where Khaila Richards (Halle Berry), a young black crack addict,
leaves her infant son Isaiah in a box by a garbage dumpster.  He is
found and brought to a hospital, where social worker Margaret Lewin
(Jessica Lange) becomes attached to the child and decides to bring
him home.  Three years later, Margaret and her husband Charles
(David Strathairn) have finalized the adoption, and Khaila is
struggling to make ends meet after a stint in a rehab program.  Then
she discovers that Isaiah is not dead, as she had believed.
Enlisting the aid of an activist attorney (Samuel L. Jackson),
Khaila decides to attempt to regain custody, prompting a court
examination of race, culture and the best environment in which to
raise a black child.
     The subject of inter-racial adoption is a challenging and
complex one, and no one would expect the makers of LOSING ISAIAH to
deliver the final word on the matter.  It isn't the absence of a
patently obvious opinion from writer Naomi Foner and director
Stephen Gyllenhaal which is the problem, but that there is only a
cursory examination of any of the complexities involved.  The
inevitable court battle features the predictable array of speeches
and finger-pointing, but none of these academic arguments are of
much use to the audience.  We need to see more of Isaiah (the
adorable Marc John Jefferies) interacting with the Lewins, perhaps
even being interviewed so his point-of-view could be understood.
There is an attempt to deal with Isaiah's state of mind in some very
effective late scenes which show him responding to a new
environment, but those scenes are too little, too late.
     Similarly, the characters of Margaret Lewin and Khaila Richards
are not characters so much as they are representatives of the two
perspectives.  Jessica Lange is a dynamic actress, and she pours
tremendous emotion into Margaret; there simply isn't much to her
character, particularly a sense of why this particular child, out of
all those she has seen over fifteen years as a social worker, won
her heart.  Some token marital difficulties are meant to fill in the
blanks, but they don't do the job.  The fact is, LOSING ISAIAH is
far less about the Lewins' life with Isaiah than it is about Khaila,
whose redemption is the heart of the story.  Halle Berry is
impressive in the early scenes as Khaila the addict, but in the
film's later stages she becomes the 12-step version of the "hooker
with the heart of gold," too squeaky clean to be real.  It seems to
be the film's idea of balanced presentation not to give both mothers
a character outside of their fierce conviction that the other one is
wrong.
     Stephen Gyllenhaal's direction is usually best when no one is
speaking.  Two scenes are particular standouts:  one in which Khaila
first sees the 3-year-old Isaiah and follows him to a park, and
later when Margaret and Khaila's black attorney (the under-used
Samuel L. Jackson) share an uncomfortable cigarette break.  Those
scenes, and those from Isaiah's perspective, suggest that if LOSING
ISAIAH had been more intimate with its characters all the way
through, the story could have worked.  As it stands, a controversial
subject becomes a minor plot device connecting the stories of two
rather bland characters.  LOSING ISAIAH's contrived ending is
somehow appropriate for this wishy-washy effort.

Title
Review for Cronos (1993)
Starring:  Federico Luppi, Ron Perlman, Claudio Brook, Tamara Shanath, 
Margarita Isabel.
Screenplay/Director:  Guillermo del Toro.
     Horror films with any semblance of wit or style are so rare
that I'm tempted to be even warmer in my embrace of CRONOS than my 
head tells me to be.  This Mexican import puts a unique spin on its 
tale of a search for eternal life, features some extremely arresting 
imagery and has a nicely twisted sense of humor.  Yet as much as I 
admired the artistry of CRONOS, I couldn't help but notice a gaping 
hole at the center, namely a central character who steadfastly refused 
to engender any sympathy.  A viewer willing to overlook its lack of 
heart will be rewarded by a project full of a new director's 
excitement at being allowed to realize his vision.
     CRONOS opens with a narration describing the efforts of a 14th
century alchemist to find the secret to eternal life.  In our own 
time, that secret has fallen into the hands of antique dealer Jesus 
Gris (Federico Luppi), in the form of a mysterious golden egg called 
the cronos device.  After unwittingly activating it, a change begins 
to come over Jesus which worries his granddaughter Aurora (Tamara 
Shanath).  And his transformation is not the only dilemma facing 
Jesus.  Dying industrialist Dieter de la Guardia (Claudio Brook) also 
knows of the existence of the cronos device, and wants to use its 
power to save himself.  He sends his brutish American nephew Angel 
(Ron Perlman), who covets an inheritance from his uncle, to obtain the 
device--a quest which proves exceedingly difficult.
     Thanks to the half-dozen or so credits which precede the title,
CRONOS reportedly boasts the second highest budget in Mexican film 
history (behind only LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE), and Guillermo del Toro 
leaves it all on the screen.  True, the make-up effects seem cheesy by 
modern standards, but elsewhere CRONOS sports a high polish.  The art 
direction team of Brigitte Broch and Maria Figueroa have created some 
dynamic sets, most notably Dieter's antiseptic living quarters, filled 
with dangling statues and jars containing Dieter's excised tumors.  
Also noteworthy is the cronos device itself, and del Toro's creative 
use of it, including showing its elaborate inner workings.  Director 
of photography Guillermo Navarro shoots the film with an emphasis on 
big spaces, and the result is a deliciously spooky atmosphere.
     For all its visual flair, CRONOS may be most satisfying on the
level of del Toro's off-beat sense of humor.  There is a glorious 
perversity to a scene in which Jesus finds himself inexplicably 
compelled to perform a unique clean-up job after a gentleman with a 
nosebleed in a public restroom, and to the image of Aurora clearing 
out her toybox to serve a purpose for which it probably was never 
intended.  There is also a quirky performance by Daniel Jimenez Cacho 
as a mortician who takes inordinate pride in his craft, and Ron 
Perlman (of TV's "Beauty and the Beast") as the slightly dim-witted 
goon obsessed with getting a nose job.  Guillermo del Toro manages to 
put a lot of bite into his script, in more ways than one.
     There is that one big problem, though:  Jesus Gris is
completely bland.  Del Toro doesn't connect Jesus' fate with his 
character in any noticeable way; in fact, it might be a stretch to say 
that Jesus has a character.  With his ultra-symbolic name, you would 
assume that there might be some attempt to go deeper into the 
psychology of his "resurrection."  But there is no sense of who he was 
before his experience with the cronos device, and more early 
characterization would have been extremely useful.  I also had 
problems with Aurora, whose placid response to bizarre events is 
stylized but ultimately tedious.  Of course, style is ultimately 
CRONOS' strongest asset, and it's very strong at that.
     Guillermo del Toro has said that he only wants to make horror
films.  With a bit of seasoning as a writer, these projects could 
prove well worth anticipating for the thinking fright fan.

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
OFFICE SPACE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Ron Livingston, Jennifer Aniston, David Herman, Ajay Naidu,
Stephen Root, Gary Cole, Diedrich Bader.
Screenplay:  Mike Judge, based on his "Milton" animated shorts.
Producers:  Michael Rotenberg and Daniel Rappaport.
Director:  Mike Judge.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual content)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the small television-sized doses which are his forte, Mike Judge
is one of our savviest social satirists.  Freed of the "Beavis and
Butt-head"-inspired hand-wringing by many conservative critics, Judge has
been able to show in "King of the Hill" what his supporters have known all
along:  that Judge observes behavioral quirks as well as anyone, whether
his subjects are media-fried teenagers or middle-aged suburbanites.  In
OFFICE SPACE, his first live-action feature, Judge turns his attention to
corporate culture, a world of cubicles, coffee and numbing sameness ripe
for skewering.
     It's not a new target for Judge.  In fact, the animated shorts he
created about a put-upon office worker named Milton (played in the film by
"NewsRadio's" Stephen Root) even pre-date "Beavis & Butt-head."  Here he
expands the concept to focus on a computer programmer named Peter Gibbons
(Ron Livingston) at a software company called Initech.  Peter loathes
everything about his job -- the grinding commute, the chirping customer
service operator in the next cubicle, the mountains of pointless reports,
the passive-aggressive pestering by his boss Bill Lumbergh (Gary Cole).
That all changes after a visit to a hypnotherapist leaves Peter with a new
perspective, and a blissful disregard for preserving his position.  While
"consultants" preparing for layoffs have most Initech employees scrambling
to justify their existence, Peter's id-run-wild "straight-shooting" has
him in line for a promotion.
     The first 45 minutes of OFFICE SPACE exploit the concept to its
fullest, resulting in some wonderfully surreal, wonderfully funny moments.
The opening traffic jam sequence alone is a sly riot, including a futile
exercise in "fastest lane" selection and a geeky white programmer who
blasts gansta rap on his car stereo but locks his door when an actual
black person walks near him.  Gary Cole, who so brilliantly nailed the
Mike Brady cadence in the BRADY BUNCH films, is equally slick with the
self-help tones of an inept middle-manager ("If you could just remember to
do that from now on, that would be great").  For a while, it looks like
Judge is going to head into inspired territory, lining up the newly
revitalized Peter for a supervisory position which could turn Initech
upside-down.
     Then, in a depressing turn of events, Judge appears to run out of
ideas for the premise he spent the first half of the film setting up.
Instead of continuing his cannon shots at bureaucratic tyranny, he 
launches into a lame caper in which Peter and his about-to-be-downsized
co-workers Samir (Ajay Naidu) and Michael Bolton (David Herman) -- no
relation to the singer -- try to rip off Initech by introducting a
computer virus into the accounting program.  As even the characters in the
film note, the premise is a rip-off from SUPERMAN III, and Judge doesn't
do anything interesting with it to justify recycling it.  OFFICE SPACE
grows tiresome in its last half hour, flipping back and forth between the
conspirators' anxiety over getting caught and a limp romance between Peter
and a sweet waitress (Jennifer Aniston).  After a decent televison
episode's worth of keen-edged satire, Judge lets his script dribble into
bland conventionality.
    It wouldn't be fair to suggest that Judge is only comfortable with
characters as cartoons -- Hank Hill is more endearingly human than most
sit-com creations put together -- but that seems to be the case in OFFICE
SPACE.  The robotic Lumbergh and the muttering Milton create the strongest
impression in the film; not coincidentally, they're the most extremely
absurdist creations.  When Judge tries to turn OFFICE SPACE into Peter's
quest for professional meaning and personal fulfillment, it just doesn't
work. He's much more effective pointing out the surreal yet all-too-real
details of industrial park anthropology, but there's not quite enough
material here to make it a thoroughgoing delight.  Mike Judge has taken
his gift for creating hilarous short films and overstayed his welcome.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
(Universal)
Starring:  Pierce Brosnan, Linda Hamilton, Charles Hallahan.
Screenplay:  Leslie Bohem.
Producers:  Gale Anne Hurd, Joseph M. Singer.
Director:  Roger Donaldson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, intense situations)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I have been anticipating the arrival of DANTE'S PEAK, the first of
1997's two volcano films, with a combination of dread and...well, still
more dread.  The return of the disaster film has been about as welcome a
pop culture phenomenon as 70s nostalgia, both of them reincarnating
uncalculated vapidity as calculated vapidity.  It only takes one TWISTER
to turn you off the genre; throw in INDEPENDENCE DAY and DAYLIGHT and any
critic could be excused for walking into DANTE'S PEAK with an attitude.
But if I have to sit through more disaster films, I only hope they can be
as thrilling as DANTE'S PEAK.  Though just as plot- and character-impaired
as its genre cousins, DANTE'S PEAK delivers a solid hour of relentless
tension and excitement.
     Our story begins in Colombia, where U.S. Geological Survey volcano
expert Harry Dalton (Pierce Brosnan) suffers a tragic loss during a
volcanic eruption.  Four years later, Harry is sent to the picturesque
town of Dante's Peak, Washington to investigate possible activity in the
town's long-dormant namesake volcano.  Harry believes he sees enough
evidence of a threat to suggest an evacuation plan to mayor Rachel Wando
(Linda Hamilton), but Harry's boss Paul Dreyfus (Charles Hallahan) is
unwilling to cause unwarranted alarm.  The evidence continues to build,
however, and when Dante's Peak finally blows the town erupts into chaos.
With little time to evacuate, Harry must help Rachel and her family escape
a force of nature with plenty of tricks up its crater.
     DANTE'S PEAK is a strange kind of success, because it includes many
of the noteworthy flaws of TWISTER, and then some.  We get the same
obligatory romantic pair thrown into danger with a minimalist back-story
tagged on, along with a team of quirky scientists to provide comic relief.
Brosnan is ruddy and somber for most of the film's running time, Hamilton
is frazzled and likeable, and both of them trudge dutifully through fifty
minutes of exposition as though any unnecessary acting might tire them out
before the big finish.  Leslie Bohem (the scripter of record on DAYLIGHT,
apparently a specialist in films which end with traumatized people wrapped
in heavy blankets) also adds a dose of JAWS, but doesn't give us the
pleasure of an actual villain.  Charles Hallahan provides the political
voice who ends up causing more damage, and there is a teasing sub-plot
about a potentially skittish business developer.  Neither one offers
enough conflict, however, forcing the audience to sit and wait out the
plodding first half for the big show.
     And what a show it turns out to be.  The surprising thing about the
post-eruption second half of DANTE'S PEAK isn't necessarily that it is
effective, but that the reason for its effectiveness doesn't exist
entirely on a hard drive somewhere.  There are certainly a few impressive
visual effects sequences, including a cloud packing the concussive force
of a small nuclear weapon, but director Roger Donaldson gets just as much
mileage out of the time-honored technique of jiggling the camera to
represent an earthquake.  No, DANTE'S PEAK is an effective thriller
because the characters repeatedly find themselves in new and apparently
impossible situations, and the direction gives those sequences an
edge-of-the-seat tension.  From a dizzying truck ride through town
destined for the Universal Studios Tour, to the crossing of a
flood-threatened bridge, to a mine shaft which threatens to turn Brosnan
into a sardine, DANTE'S PEAK provides the kind of relentless, well-crafted
action which is what movie-goers should be talking about when they talk
about certain films being like roller-coasters.
     The biggest surprise of all may be that the man behind that action is
Donaldson, who has served up cinematic backwash like SPECIES, THE GETAWAY
and COCKTAIL.  Nothing in any of those duds suggested the skill to create
the best scene in DANTE'S PEAK, where Harry, Rachel and Rachel's family
attempt to cross a lake which has been turned by volcanic gases into
sulfuric acid.  As the lake begins bubbling through the bottom of their
metal motorboat, the occupants begin a quavering round of "Row Row Row
Your Boat."  It is an eerie moment, and Donaldson manages to get you
itching for the fate of the characters even though they haven't been given
any personalities.  More impressive still, he does it without assaulting
your senses.  In many ways, DANTE'S PEAK is a very conventional disaster
thriller, even duplicating the Heroic Canine Leap to Safety which
INDEPENDENCE DAY turned into a moment in camp history.  There is, however,
something rare in a film which can generate the kind of tension DANTE'S
PEAK generates.  Maybe it is possible to present a disaster without being
one.

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS (1999)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn, John Cleese, Mark McKinney.
Screenplay:  Marc Lawrence, based on the original screenplay by Neil
Simon.
Producers:  Robert Evans, Robert W. Cort, David Madden and Teri Schwartz.
Director:  Sam Weisman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations, drug use)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS is the sort of film I generally greet with a
generous helping of pooh-poohing.  It's a remake (of a Neil Simon-penned
1970 original which I have never seen), it's a vehicle to re-unite two
stars of a previous film (Steve Martin and Goldie Hawn, from 1992's
HOUSESITTER), and it's a broad farce cloaked in shallow sentimentality.
THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS often feels like it's working awfully hard to extract
its guffaws, yet it still manages to extract its fair share.  The comic
energy of the three lead performers -- including the incomparable John
Cleese -- makes this silly trifle something moderately satisfying.
     Martin and Hawn star as Henry and Nancy Clark, a Columbus, Ohio
couple facing a very empty nest.  With their youngest son finally moved
away, the Clarks are left alone to wonder whether there's any spark left
in their lives together.  A spark-igniter emerges unexpectedly when Henry
-- laid off from his advertising job but afraid to tell Nancy -- heads to
New York for a job interview with Nancy as a last-minute companion.  One
re-routed plane, mugging and eviction from a hotel by an officious manager
(Cleese) later, the Clarks find themselves hungry, homeless and stranded
in the Big Apple, sharing their grandest adventure ever.
     It shouldn't be a surprise that THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS feels derivative,
and not just because it's a remake.  Nearly every element in the film is
designed to have the comfort of the familiar, from the pairing of the two
stars, to Martin's fuming in a PLANES, TRAINS & AUTOMOBILES scenario, to
Hawn's earnest ditziness, to Cleese's resurrection of Basil Fawlty and
Python-esque cross-dressing.  While the script by Marc Lawrence (writer of
FORCES OF NATURE, who appears unusually fond of thwarted travel plans as
an aphrodisiac) pauses occasionally so Henry and Nancy can muse about the
nature of their marriage, it's mostly concerned with set-ups for slapstick
situations and tirades.
     At times, those situations and tirades feel forced; you can
practically see Hawn and Martin screaming to the audience for whoops and
applause when they go on their respective rants against someone who gets
their goat.  At plenty of others, the actors give the old-fashioned farce
a kick it rarely gets on screen.  Martin and Hawn share one classic
hide-in-the-bedroom scene with Kids in the Hall vet Mark McKinney (as a
businessman Nancy attempts to seduce for food), and their chemistry even
makes the personal moments feel somewhat genuine.  Even more wonderful is
Cleese, a comic treasure too rarely seen.  He may be able to do smiling
misanthropes like his character here in his sleep, but he still sends a
charge through THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS every moment he's on screen.  Cleese's
scenes are reason alone for comedy fans to spend an hour and a half with
this film.
     I do wish THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS had shown more restraint with its
characters, subjecting them to a bit more frustration and a bit less
abject humiliation.  It's not a subtle film by any stretch of the
imagination, but there was enough humor to be found in the performers that
we didn't need to see Martin taking a hallucinogenic trip with his pants
around his ankles.  You may find a lot of THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS familiar and
foolish; you may also find yourself laughing at it in spite of yourself.
There's something to be said for the way talented professionals can take
predictable material and wring something fresh and funny from it.

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
THE VIRGIN SUICIDES
(Paramount Classics)
Starring:  Kirsten Dunst, James Woods, Kathleen Turner, Josh Hartnett,
Hanna Hall, A. J. Cook, Chelse Swain, Leslie Hayman.
Screenplay:  Sofia Coppola, based on the novel by Jeffrey Eugenides.
Producers:  Francis Ford Coppola, Julie Costanzo, Dan Halsted and Chris
Hanley.
Director:  Sofia Coppola.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     All right, admit it: The credits "Written and directed by Sofia
Coppola" don't exactly set the heart racing in anticipation of artistic
triumph. Your defining image of Sofia Coppola probably involves her
single-handedly making THE GODFATHER PART III painful to watch. Or maybe
you go back farther, to her script credit on the lifeless "Life With Zoe" 
segment of NEW YORK STORIES.  If so, then consider this (perhaps faint) 
praise for THE VIRGIN SUICIDES: Sofia shows more visual flair in her
directorial debut than Papa Francis has managed to show in the last 20
years or so.
      If only she had managed a bit more story sense. Based on Jeffrey
Eugenides' novel, THE VIRGIN SUICIDES is the story of the five Lisbon
sisters -- Bonnie (Chelsea Swain), Lux (Kirsten Dunst), Mary (A. J. Cook),
Therese (Leslie Hayman) and Cecilia (Hanna R. Hall) -- children of
strictly religious parents (Kathleen Turner and James Woods) in mid-1970s
Michigan. The girls inspire fascination in their male peers, but the
fascination grows even more intense when the youngest girl, 13-year-old
Cecilia, throws herself from a second floor window onto an iron fence
spike. The family retreats even more after the incident, but that doesn't
stop the flirtatious Lux from trying to find some semblance of a normal
adolescence -- including deceiving her parents.
     Stylistically, Coppola does plenty to keep the film interesting. 
There are few gimmicks she's unwilling to employ: slow-motion, split
screens, odd angles. She also crafts one extremely effective sequence at a
homecoming dance that captures every nuance of adolescent romantic
fumbling. Her approach shows Coppola understands that THE VIRGIN SUICIDES
is not a simple narrative, but a flashback remembrance of pubescent
fantasy. The girls are representations of idealized visions by the story's
collective male narrator (given voice by Giovanni Ribisi), not
fully-realized characters -- and that's fine. THE VIRGIN SUICIDES is
effective at creating a coming-of-age dreamscape where the tranquility of
suburbia collides with the inherent turbulence of youth.
     Sounds good on paper, doesn't it? It's true that Coppola gives THE
VIRGIN SUICIDES just the right atmosphere, but she never manages to latch
onto anything that would give the story focus or momentum. Her biggest
mistake is making arbitrary use of the novel's structure as a remembrance
told from a distance of many years, much of it through imperfectly 
recalled interviews with key players. In one scene she shows an adult Trip
Fontaine (Michael Par) describing his fling as a teenager (Josh Hartnett) 
with Lux. It's a great scene -- effectively demonstrating the lasting
effect the Lisbon girls had on those around them -- but it also serves to
show how much better the film would have been with more moments like it. 
The tale's young male observers also disappear for long stretches,
allowing the film to drift into trite suburban family drama. On the page,
THE VIRGIN SUICIDES was hypnotic and mysterious; on the screen, it's a
collection of eye-catching individual moments that too rarely coalesce
into something more profound.
     In a cinematic climate where films about adolescents usually bear
little resemblance to reality, it's refreshing to find a film-maker
interested in capturing the tangled emotions of that time. Sofia Coppola
is working from a fundamentally strong source, and she has put together a
cast and crew that make THE VIRGIN SUICIDES worth watching (and worth
listening to, with its sublimely kitschy soundtrack of period tunes by
ELO, Styx and Heart). When it latches on to those moments of wonder at the
emerging adulthood of the opposite sex -- one boy's wide-eyed discovery of
feminine hygiene products in the Lisbon bathroom, for instance -- it's
dead on target. Unfortunately, there's also too much of the mundane in
Coppola's adaptation. If she develops as much instinct for storytelling as
she does for directing, Sofia Coppola could be a film-maker to watch
for. And there's a prospect I'll bet you never expected.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
ARMAGEDDON
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Steve
Buscemi, Will Patton, Peter Storemare, Keith David.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Hensleigh and J. J. Abrams.
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd and Michael Bay.
Director:  Michael Bay.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  150 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You gotta give bonus points to the Touchstone Pictures publicity
department for uncommon candor on the subject of big-budget film
screenwriting.  Press materials for ARMAGEDDON proudly trumpet the fact
that the producers "assembled a cadre of talented writers" to polish up
Jonathan Hensleigh's script, including Tony Gilroy, Paul Attanasio, Scott
Rosenbert and Robert Towne.  Even cast members Steve Buscemi, Peter
Stormare and Owen Wilson were acknowledged for their ad-lib contributions.
After creating an additional writing credit to accommodate two more names
("Adaptation" on top of "Story" and "Screenplay," as if you could figure
out the difference), Jerry Bruckheimer and Touchstone appear to have
publicly embraced the concept of pot-luck screenwriting:  the notion that
if a dozen different guys all bring something to the table, you end up
with a cinematic meal.
     Or in the case of ARMAGEDDON, one massive snack.  The subject, of
course, is this summer's favorite -- a huge celestial body on a collision
course with our Big Blue Marble, this one an asteroid the size of Texas.
Faced with a "Global Killer" certain to wipe out life as we know it, NASA
chief Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) initiates a plan involving landing a
shuttle on the asteroid and planting a nuclear warhead 800 feet below its
surface.  To that end he recruits deep-core oil driller Harry Stamper
(Bruce Willis) for the job of making the big hole for the big bomb.
Naturally, Harry needs his misfit crew along with him, including hot-shot
A. J. (Ben Affleck), who coincidentally is in love with Harry's daughter
Grace (Liv Tyler), much to Harry's paternal consternation.
     It's enough to generate flashbacks from DEEP IMPACT, where the feeble
attempts to generate sweeping emotion more often generated sleeping
emotion.  ARMAGEDDON, to its credit, at least gets its priorities
straight.  Make no mistake, this is a special effects-driven action film,
chock-a-block with ahhh-inspiring scenes -- exploding space shuttles,
meteor showers toppling the Empire State Building, the gargoyles on the
Notre Dame Cathedral watching as Paris is reduced to baguette crumbs.
Director Michael Bay predictably resorts to tension-builders like close
shaves with countdown clocks, but at least he knows enough to keep the
focus on the drill team's mission once they're in space.  For its final 75
minutes, ARMAGEDDON is virtually nothing but explosions, crashes and
narrow escapes...and that's a good thing.
     It's the _first_ 75 minutes which truly test your gag reflex, as the
aforementioned cadre of writers tries vainly to create the illusion of
character development.  Stock interpersonal conflicts share time with
tender moments as all involved make their peace before heading off to save
humanity; I'm not sure whether I was more moved by the gruff
reconciliation between Grace and Harry, or A. J. wooing Grace using Animal
Crackers for foreplay (don't ask).  It's all a load of nonsense, made even
less interesting by Bay's foolish decision to keep chopping back and forth
between the playful introduction of our roughneck protagonists and a
solemn war room session at NASA.  There's nothing cohesive or compelling
about ARMAGEDDON as narrative; strangely enough, it feels like the result
of a dozen different writers contributing individual scenes or lines of
dialogue.
     I'm not going to suggest that ARMAGEDDON isn't a pretty effective
diversion.  If there's one thing a dozen writers can do, it's produce a
bunch of solid laughs and craft a few exciting action sequences.  It's fun
watching the unhinged performances of Buscemi (as the crew's horny
geologist) and his FARGO partner Stormare (as a loopy Cosmonaut), and it's
fun grinning at creaky devices like military men being turned into
villains for choosing the fate of all humanity over our intrepid heroes.
There's just not much more you can expect from a film where they seem more
interested in throwing in a GODZILLA gag than in letting one writer create
an actual story.  For all the uneven visceral enjoyment that it's worth,
TOUCHSTONE PICTURES proudly presents ARMAGEDDON:  a blockbuster a la
carte.

Title
Review for Frosh: Nine Months in a Freshman Dorm (1994)
Filmed and directed by Dan Geller and Dayna Goldfine.
     In the summer of 1990, eighty incoming Stanford University
freshman received a letter informing them of a unique opportunity.
Documentary filmmakers Dan Geller and Dayna Goldfine were planning to
record their all-freshman dorm for the year, and anyone who would feel
uncomfortable with that arrangement was invited to switch to a
different dorm.  None so chose.  The next nine months of their lives
were saved for posterity as FROSH, an attempt to document a year when
pupate human beings become adults.  Unfortunately, it's not
particularly successful.  FROSH captures moments, but due to its overly
large canvas it doesn't capture enough growth.
     FROSH focuses its attention on nine of the eighty 1990-91
residents of Stanford's Trancos House.  Shayne, a white Catholic woman,
struggles to reconcile her religion with her budding feminism.  Cheng,
a first generation Chinese-American, quips about Stanford's liberal
bias while coping with academic difficulties.  Brandi, a middle-class
African-American who admits early on that she's "never really had black
friends," becomes friends with Monique, an African-American with a
very different background.  There's also Nick, an activist who's openly
bisexual; Debbie, a woman from a conservative religious background;
Gerardo, suspected by his dormmates of being gay; Scott, a perceptive
and sharp-witted African-American; and Sam, a conservative white male
who often finds himself at the center of controversy.
     I should preface my comments by stating that I spent three years,
in various capacities, living in freshman dorms at Stanford.  I wasn't
expecting to see anything I'd never seen before; what I was expecting
was a film that highlighted real growing experiences, and allowed
viewers to watch the first tentative steps of kids into adulthood.  A
few such moments in FROSH work extremely well, particularly Shayne's
emotional discussion with a few friends about why she's considering
leaving the Catholic Church.  Another scene highlights Monique
describing her troubled home life, prompting one young man to ask in
amazement, "You mean your mom and dad were never married?"  But there
aren't enough of these moments.  FROSH seems more interested in being a
kind of rapidly edited video yearbook, and like most yearbooks it's
only going to be really significant to those who lived the moments.
     Part of the problem with FROSH is that even the nine-student focus
is too large.  FROSH will uncover an issue in one of their lives, but
doesn't take the time to show us the resolution.  We never learn, for
example, if at the end of the year Shayne is still a Church-going
Catholic; we never learn how Cheng recovers from his disappointing
first-quarter grades.  When it's all said and done, FROSH comes off as
an interesting anthropological footnote, but not a particularly deep or
insightful look at why the freshman year at a residential university is
so significant.
     My primary bone of contention is that in its attempt to keep its
brow relatively high, FROSH almost completely ignores two of the most
challenging issues of the freshman year: romantic relationships and
substance use.  There is one look at a blind date, but little more.  No
one in FROSH forms an in-dorm couple; no one is shown locked out by an
"occupied" roommate; no one is shown breaking up with a high school
sweetheart.  These events are as formative as any late night
discussion, but FROSH adopts a hands-off attitude.  Similarly, while we
witness a dorm party and a few subsequent hangovers, we see no one
dealing with the pressures to drink, no one getting stoned for the
first time.  Perhaps out of fear of scaring off their subjects, Geller
and Goldfine have excised most material parents wouldn't want to know.
     FROSH does a nice job of capturing freshman in all their bombast
and naivete.  In one scene, a professor tells Debbie as she attempts to
describe a term paper topic, "You're babbling"; in another, one
dormmate asks Shayne, "If there was no, like, racism or sexism, what
would you talk about?"  Where it comes up short is as an examination of
how much an individual can change in these nine pivotal months.  Trust
me ... I was there.

Title
Review for Fire Down Below (1997)
FIRE DOWN BELOW
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Steven Seagal, Marg Helgenberger, Harry Dean Stanton, Stephen
Lang, Brad Hunt, Kris Kristofferson.
Screenplay:  Jeb Stuart and Philip Morton.
Producers:  Julius R. Nasso and Steven Seagal.
Director:  Felix Enriquez Alcala.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In an uncertain world, there's something strangely reassuring about
the films of Steven Seagal.  The economy may rise and fall, but Seagal
will always dispatch all adversaries with the same vaguely bored smirk and
without a hair in his ponytail drifting out of place.  You can't depend on
political institutions, but you can depend on the fact that Seagal will
put together a wardrobe where nary a pastel nor a T-shirt will be found.
All else changes, but Seagal stays the same -- the same facial expression,
the same tone of voice for every emotion, the same humorless
self-importance.  He is stasis personified.
     There's not much new to say about FIRE DOWN BELOW, because there's
not much new to see.  Seagal plays a tough guy who dresses in black (for
what it's worth, his name is Jack Taggart).  His cause is righteous (a
nasty industrialist is dumping toxic waste in a rural Kentucky coal mine,
and Seagal is the E.P.A.'s resident Aikido master).  Bad guys get in the
way (almost invariably four or five at a time).  Bones end up broken
(almost invariably four or five at a time).
     And none of those bones ever belong to Seagal's character.  A Seagal
fight sequence is uniquely monotonous not just because the hero always
wins -- action heroes usually win -- but because no one ever lays a finger
on him.  I doubt Seagal will ever make a truly thrilling action thriller
(and yes, that includes UNDER SIEGE) because his ego could never permit
any doubt as to the outcome; his action scenes are like Harlem
Globetrotters games without the showmanship.  When he appears in one scene
in FIRE DOWN BELOW with a wee cut over his left eyebrow after outracing a
homicidal trucker, you wonder how much convincing it took before Seagal
allowed himself to bleed.
     It's that ego of his which makes so many Seagal films so wonderfully,
terribly predictable.  When he stops FIRE DOWN BELOW dead in its tracks to
give a mini-version of his ON DEADLY GROUND speech on environmental
responsibility, you know it's because he genuinely believes someone cares
what he thinks on the subject.  When he stops it yet again to show off
his down-home guitar stylings, you know it's because he just can't help
himself.  When he works with directors like Bruce Malmuth, Geoff Murphy,
John Gray and now Felix Enriquez Alcala -- a virtual Who's Who of "Who's
He?" -- you know it's because he's not about to take orders.  And when he
tries to work up some sensitive romantic chemistry with Marg Helgenberger,
you want to laugh out loud at the idea that he could love anyone as much
as he loves himself.
     Sure, you can always count on a few token surprises, most of them
completely ridiculous.  There's a needless and unpleasant subplot about
incestuous siblings -- nothing like dismantling Appalachian stereotypes --
and a few colorful bursts of conveniently fluorescent toxic goop.  There's
even Kris Kristofferson as the slimy head heavy, sharing a couple of
scenes and a squinting contest for the ages with our leading man.  Mostly,
however, there's more of the same fight-chase-explosion narrative
structure and automoton emoting which makes the latest Steven Seagal film
a natural sequel to the last Steven Seagal film.  There's nothing remotely
entertaining about FIRE DOWN BELOW, but there's something steadying about
Seagal's artistic intransigence.  He won't go deserting us to do Hamlet on
Broadway, or take a pay cut to work on an independent film.  In turbulent
times, you can almost take comfort in the knowledge that one man's name is
as good as a plot description.

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
     The sum total of my direct familiarity with Howard Stern, including
the 110 minutes of PRIVATE PARTS, now stands at about 114 minutes.
Before seeing the film I had not read his book, had never heard his radio
program, and seen him only in passing as a guest on T.V. talk shows or on
his own E! Entertainment Television program.  I knew Stern only
indirectly, as a much-reviled icon of all things excessive and an object
of adoration for devoted fan base, but I did not know enough about him to
have a real opinion.  I suspect that mine was the best possible point of
entry for PRIVATE PARTS, because I was expecting neither to hate it nor to
revel in vulgarity.  Without the burden of preconceptions, I was free to
laugh myself silly at a completely unexpected delight.  It's hard to say
who may be more surprised at PRIVATE PARTS -- Stern's fans or his
detractors -- because it is funny in almost every possible way:  at times
goofy and low key, at times undeniably outrageous.
     Based on Stern's best-selling 1993 autobiography, PRIVATE PARTS stars
Stern as himself in the story of his own life.  Beginning with Stern's
childhood in New York, the film traces his interest in radio from an
early age to his study of communication at Boston University.  There Stern
meets Alison (Mary McCormack), the woman of his dreams who becomes his
wife and devoted supporter.  That support is necessary through tough early
deejay jobs in upstate New York, Hartford and Detroit, where Stern
develops a conventional on-air persona.  It isn't until he gets a plum job
in Washington D.C. that Stern invents his more shocking style, and
becomes an instant ratings sensation.  That success wins him a spot at New
York's WNBC, but the management, including program director Kenny Rushton
(Paul Giamatti), is determined to rein in the often-offensive Howard.
     The savvy edge of PRIVATE PARTS really should not have been a
surprise considering Betty Thomas was in the director's chair.  Thomas
previously did sharp work with THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE and HBO's talk show
wars docu-comedy THE LATE SHIFT, proving herself adept with the worlds of
media and pop culture, and she manages to put a surprising amount of
energy into scenes of people sitting around talking into microphones.
Some of those scenes are simply brilliant, including the attempt by a
flustered Kenny (a wonderfully slimy performance by Paul Giamatti) to stop
Stern's broadcast of an off-color parody of "Match Game."  Thomas' most
impressive achievement, however, may be taking a group of radio
personalities -- including Stern's cohorts Robin Quivers and Fred Norris
-- and putting them in situations where they could be comfortable.  Norris
in particular has some hilarious moments, notably in a sequence in a
B-movie actress's hotel room where he steals every scene hardly saying a
word.
     Then there is Stern himself, who proves, if nothing else, that he is
an extraordinarily canny manipulator of his own image.  For those who
think of him as an evil lecher, PRIVATE PARTS offers a portrait of Stern
as a devoted family man whose reverence for his wife borders on idolatry;
for those who think of him as the self-aggrandizing, self-proclaimed "King
of All Media," PRIVATE PARTS offers the humbling vision of Howard the
adolescent geek, strolling through the '70s with a Mike Brady perm and a
cheesy moustache.  Most notably, PRIVATE PARTS offers those who consider
Stern's routines mean-spirited the chance to watch him as he performs,
grinning at his own naughtiness like a gangly Benny Hill.  It may not be a
tremendous challenge to make an acting debut playing yourself, but Stern
makes the character he plays something you might never expect:  charming.
     Is the Howard Stern of PRIVATE PARTS the _real_ Howard Stern?
Probably not.  There's certainly a contradiction between Stern's
announcement to Alison prior to the emergence of the now-recognizable
Stern persona that he's going to "be myself," and the disingenuous
suggestion that he's just playing a character on the air; the truth
probably exists somewhere in the middle.  It does grow a bit tiresome
hearing Howard bemoan how misunderstood he is, and the film slows down
considerably whenever he feels obliged once again to show us his sensitive
side.  PRIVATE PARTS is much funnier when Stern laughs at himself, or when
he does the things that make other people laugh at him.  Still, it's no
easy trick to please Stern's fans while placating his enemies, and PRIVATE
PARTS serves up raunchiness and bad taste in a slick and snappy package.
No matter how much of Howard Stern you've seen, this is a Howard Stern you
haven't seen.

Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE
(Disney)
Starring:  Brendan Fraser, Leslie Mann, Thomas Haden Church, Holland
Taylor, Greg Cruttwell, Abraham Benrubi, voice of John Cleese.
Screenplay:  Dana Olsen and Audrey Wells, based on the characters created
by Jay Ward.
Producers:  David Hoberman, Jordan Kerner and Jon Avnet.
Director:  Sam Weisman.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, scatalogical humor)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE suffers from a fundamental, insurmountable split
personality:  it wants both to be a big, dumb comedy for 8-year-olds and
to make fun of the fact that it is a big, dumb comedy for 8-year-olds.
The former is fairly easy, particularly for Disney, whose recent
contributions like JUNGLE2JUNGLE and D(whatever integer the MIGHTY DUCKS
series is up to lately) make you wonder why they don't just spin off a
live-action banner called Big Dumb Comedies for 8-Year-Olds Pictures.  The
latter, however, requires subtlety...finesse..a keen sense of how far is
just far enough.
     Now that you have lifted yourself off the floor from convulsions of
laughter, I'll confirm your suspicions that GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE does not
represent the Platonic form of subtlety, finesse, or a keen sense of how
far is just far enough.  The adventures of inept jungle king George
(Brendan Fraser), including his romance with dizzy heiress Ursula Stanhope
(Leslie Mann) and his rescue of his friend Ape the talking ape (voice of
John Cleese) from poachers Max (Greg Cruttwell) and Thor (Abraham
Benrubi), are the stuff of which most youth-oriented films in the 90s are
made.  There are some moderately diverting special effects, including a
tree-trunk-fetching elephant named Shep (computer-generated courtesy Dream
Quest Images).  There are pratfalls and comic brawls a-plenty.  And there
are at least 475 separate gags involving either a) flatulence, b)
excrement, c) urine or d) injuries or the threat of injury to the male
gonads.
     All of which works just fine on its own level, except that
screenwriters Dana Olsen and Audrey Wells then feel obliged to get
meta-conscious on us.  Most films of this stripe would be perfectly
comfortable simply serving up a scene where a nasty character like
Ursula's erstwhile fiance Lyle Van de Groot (Thomas Haden Church) falls
face first into a steaming elephant pile.  This one has a native guide
observe:  "Villain falls into pile of poop...a classic element of physical
comedy!"  It's tough to take a film seriously as a wry commentary on its
own excesses, especially when those excesses are the main reason the
majority of the audience is watching.
     GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE's attempts at something resembling
sophistication and wit, half-hearted though they may be, are clearly an
attempt to capture the spirit of the animated namesake created by Jay Ward
(of "Rocky and Bullwinkle" fame).  They also demonstrate a radical
misunderstanding of what was amusing about Ward's efforts.  Like "Rocky
and Bullwinkle," "George of the Jungle" was smart satire rich with
exaggerated word-play.  It also featured a lunk-headed hero played
completely straight, a far jungle cry from the sensitive noble savage
served up by Brendan Fraser.  Fraser is appealing in a goofy-naive way,
but he's a classic Disney-fication:  they've taken a mockery of heroes and
turned him into a hero.  There's nothing to connect this GEORGE OF THE
JUNGLE to Jay Ward's "George of the Jungle" except the theme song, which
is probably the one thing most people will remember about the animated
series.  Those who remember more may be hoping for more than this
predictable kiddie matinee posing as savvy family entertainment.

Title
Review for Last Seduction, The (1994) (TV)
Starring:  Linda Fiorentino, Peter Berg, Bill Pullman, J. T. Walsh.
Screenplay:  Steve Barancik.
Director:  John Dahl.
     John Dahl has to be considered one of the most unlikely success
stories of recent years.  Last year, his made-for-cable film RED ROCK
WEST found a second life in a few art houses around the country, and
became something of a cult hit.  THE LAST SEDUCTION also made its first
appearance on cable earlier this year, but from the looks of things,
Dahl will be able to make a few films directly for the big screen if he
so chooses.  Film noir has been a hot genre lately, and few directors
with more established reputations are making them better than John
Dahl.  THE LAST SEDUCTION is a wonderfully nasty piece of work, sparked
by Linda Fiorentino's bad-to-the-bone lead performance.
     Fiorentino plays Bridget Gregory, a New York City telemarketing
manager with ambition and attitude.  After her husband Clay (Bill
Pullman), a shady doctor, scores $100,000 selling pharmaceutical
cocaine to pay off a loan shark, Bridget takes the money and runs.  She
ends up in Beston, an upstate town too small for her big plans, but
she's forced to stay put to avoid being found by Clay.  In Beston
Bridget hooks up with Mike Swale (Peter Berg), an earnest young fellow
who falls hard for her.  With Mike in the palm of her hand, and Clay
and his detectives hot on her trail, Bridget sets in motion a
convoluted plan manipulating everyone and everything in her way.
     The critical error many recent film noir attempts have made (the
abysmal COLOR OF NIGHT comes most quickly to mind) is that they operate
on the premise that all you need are minimalist lighting and a few plot
twists to maintain audience interest.  Characters become props holding
up a plot, rather than the elements that drive the plot.  Dahl and
screenwriter Steve Barancik do not make that error.  Everything
revolves around the interactions between Bridget, Clay and Mike, and
all three are well-constructed characters.  Bill Pullman, who has been
making a career out of playing the spurned nice guy (SLEEPLESS IN
SEATTLE, MALICE) takes on the role of spurned not-so-nice-guy Clay and
attacks it with gusto.  His seething disgust at having underestimated
Bridget once becomes a fierce determination to get back at her, but he
is completely unprepared for the lengths to which she'll go.  Peter
Berg is excellent as the big-hearted small-town boy who longs to break
free to the big time, and latches on to his love for Bridget as his
best chance to motivate himself after a disastrous first attempt to
leave Beston.  In order for THE LAST SEDUCTION to work to the fullest,
Berg has to convince us that there's a reason besides simple naivete
that he stays with Bridget, and he makes Mike's need genuine.
     However, everyone else is just renting screen time from Linda
Fiorentino; she owns the show.  Her Bridget is a creature of pure ego
and ambition, and as such there is always the chance that she might
seem beyone accepting as a real person.  Occasionally, that seems to be
the case.  Because Barancik deliberately avoids providing us with any
easy motivation for Bridget's actions (a troubled childhood, for
example), her calculation becomes a bit difficult to swallow in one
gulp.  But Fiorentino is so alive in this part that she makes Bridget
real, and her glee is infectuous.  She is at her best when using
stereotypical assumptions about women to her advantage, such as a scene
where she brings cookies out to the detective who is keeping an eye on
her so that she can plant nails under his tires, or one where she
convinces Mike that she loves him by plainting a note showing his name
in a little heart for him to find.  Bridget's most valuable asset is
that nobody quite believes that she can be as amoral as she seems, and
consequently she is able to catch everyone at their most vulnerable.
     THE LAST SEDUCTION's plot does have the requisite twists, turns
and surprises, but none of them are particularly jaw-dropping.  Dahl
and Barancik are more concerned with tone and character, and deliver in
both categories.  But if there is one aspect of the story which is
truly impressive, it is what *doesn't* happen.  The formulaic qualities
of so many movies have conditioned us to expect a comeuppance for
characters like Bridget at a specific plot point; however, at crucial
moments when it seems that she's made a critical mistake, she's still
one step ahead.  Clockwork plots like THE LAST SEDUCTION can sometimes
seem too contrived for their own good, and some viewere might find it
simply too cold.  Many others will find Fiorentino and THE LAST
SEDUCTION the perfect antidote to the recent glut of stylish but
vacuous blockbusters.

Title
Review for Money Talks (1997)
     As a public service, I'm going to provide a simple conversion formula
to help potential viewers decide whether or not they should see MONEY
TALKS:
     1) Begin with a base of zero on a 1-10 scale.
     2) If you found Chris Tucker a riotous comedic presence in films like
FRIDAY and THE FIFTH ELEMENT, add 10 points.
     3) If Tucker's every moment on screen during THE FIFTH ELEMENT made
you want to tear out your own central nervous system with a shrimp fork,
subtract 250,000 points.
     Those individuals blissfully unfamiliar with the Chris Tucker oeuvre
may be confused at this point.  I envy such sweet naivete.  Tucker may be
the most actively annoying screen presence since...well, "ever" comes to
mind.  Blessed with a shudder-inducing nasal whine of a voice, Tucker
dares the audience to tolerate him by playing characters who simply refuse
to shut up.  In MONEY TALKS, he plays a motor-mouthed ticket scalper named
Franklin Hatchett who gets busted after investigative reporter James
Russell (Charlie Sheen) does an expose'.  Franklin then ends up in a
prison transport with a French smuggler (Gerard Ismael), whose operatives
kill both cops and cons in the course of rescuing him.  Naturally,
Franklin is suspected of being part of the escape plan.  Naturally, he
seeks out James, though there is no good reason for him to do so when his
friends include a major arms dealer.  Naturally, James is about to marry
into a wealthy family, giving Franklin plenty of opportunities to shake up
the upper crust.
     And naturally, almost everyone Franklin deals with is a complete
idiot.  Franklin spends most of MONEY TALKS taking shots at all the
corrupt, vennal, brutal and/or criminally stupid white people he
encounters.  That includes and goes double for Charlie Sheen, whose sole
purpose in the film is to stay near Tucker so there is always someone
close at hand for him to insult.  Considering the number of times Franklin
comments on James' posterior -- its narrowness, its whiteness, or its need
to be kicked -- you'd think he might have a little crush on the fellow.
Of course, just to make sure we know that's not the case, there is a scene
in which Franklin rebuffs an aggressively affectionate gay man with whom
he shares a jail cell. In an "urban comedy," you'd better make sure the
audience knows you find "queers" even more obnoxious than white people.
     The amazing thing about MONEY TALKS is that Tucker _still_ manages to
play the stupidest and most obnoxious character in the film.  There is
nothing remotely sympathetic or likeable about Franklin, unless it is that
he actually seems to care about his pregnant girlfriend (whom he
sweet-talks with a good-natured threat to kick _her_ ass).  Apparently
Tucker's fans find his routine hysterical; the crowd roared its
appreciation at every profanity-packed sentence (Tucker uses over 200
choice epithets during the 93 minutes of MONEY TALKS).  They also seemed
thrilled every time something blew up, or every time someone got shot.
Perhaps that is why watching MONEY TALKS was such a doubly depressing
experience.  Not only did I have to stomach Tucker's grating presence in
the kind of wretched buddy comedy which makes other wretched buddy
comedies look inspired, but I shared it with an audience which found high
entertainment in the equivalent of RAMBO starring Jerry Lewis with
Tourette's syndrome.
     Make that triply depressing:  if MONEY TALKS is a success, I could be
sitting through another Chris Tucker project real soon.  When you refer
back to the conversion formula above, please amend item #3 to read
"subtract 500,000 points."  Anyone have a shrimp fork handy?

Title
Review for Philadelphia (1993)
Starring: Tom Hanks, Denzel Washington, Jason Robards, Mary
Steenburgen, Antonio Banderas.
Screenplay: Ron Nyswaner.
Director: Jonathan Demme.
     Maybe I've just been lucky, but after living in Northern
California for almost ten years I no longer think of "tolerance" as
merely a buzzword; it's part of the fabric of life.  Consequently, I
couldn't help but feel slightly patronized by the sense of outrage
which provides the backbone of Jonathan Demme's PHILADELPHIA.  The
message was important, but to me, it wasn't news.  When that message is
stripped away to permit examination of the filmmaking, I find as many
examples of what I consider bad decisions as I find good decisions, and
too many characters who come off as walking allegories.
     PHILADELPHIA is the story of Andrew Beckett (Tom Hanks), a
successful attorney in a large Philadelphia law firm.  He also happens
to be gay and HIV-positive, facts unknown to anyone in the law firm
when he is handed an extremely important case.  Soon, however, the
appearance of Karposi's sarcoma lesions on Andrew's face make it clear
that he has developed AIDS.  When crucial documents in the important
case appear to have been misplaced, Andrew is fired, ostensibly for
incompetence.  Andrew believes differently, and takes his case to Joe
Miller (Denzel Washington), an ambulance-chasing personal injury lawyer
with a profound streak of homophobia.  Joe decides to set aside his
personal feelings to represent Andrew and attempt to prove that he was
fired simply for being gay and a person with AIDS.
     PHILADELPHIA opens strongly with an effective montage of city
scenes, underscored by the wonderful new Bruce Springsteen song "The
Streets of Philadelphia."  We see Andrew as a typical workaholic
attorney, already living with HIV as part of his life.  It is to
screenwriter Ron Nyswaner's credit that it doesn't offer the stock
scene of a doctor delivering the somber news; HIV from the outset is
simply one element in Andrew's life, but not the defining element.  Joe
Miller is equally well-established, both at work and at home, as an
Everyman who recognizes somewhere the social similarities between being
a black man and being a person with AIDS.  PHILADELPHIA sets the stage
effectively, making the way this case will affect the two men the focal
point of the story.
     The problems begin once PHILADELPHIA hits the courtroom.  As a
courtroom drama, PHILADELPHIA is fairly pedestrian stuff, lacking real
dramatic punch and giving in to preachy speeches.  Demme makes the
extremely questionable decision of framing much of one lengthy trial
sequence from Andrew's perspective as he grows weaker.  There are
distracting camera angles and sound echoes which make it difficult to
concentrate on what anyone involved is actually saying.  Andrew's
condition became the total focus at a time when it simply wasn't
appropriate in the narrative.  Outside the courtroom things aren't much
better.  The relationship between Andrew and his partner Miguel
(Antonio Banderas) is practically an afterthought, and it struck me
that their one shared kiss is hidden from the camera by Hanks' head,
and that neither one ever says "I love you."  PHILADELPHIA's most
talked-about scene involves Andrew responding to an aria, a scene which
seems calculated to be one of those tour-de- force moments that wins
Oscars.  I found it way over the top.
     Hanks' performance has been touted as an Oscar front-runner, and
while he makes some bold choices, I don't feel it's the best work he's
done, or even the best work he's done this year.  With the exception of
the aforementioned aria scene, the character of Andrew stagnates, and
becomes more of a representative gay man with AIDS than a real person.
The same is true of Jason Robards as the senior partner in Andrew's
firm; he's too cut-and-dried, right down to citing the Bible on the
witness stand.  By far the best work, and the most dynamic character,
is Denzel Washington's Joe Miller.  Once again Washington fills the
screen with energy, and isn't afraid to show Miller's warts, making him
a very real typical American.
     As with THE WEDDING BANQUET, I went into PHILADELPHIA wanting to
like it and glad that it had been made.  But once again I felt the
message deserved a better messenger, one that treats homosexuality as
matter-of-factly as the recent TALES OF THE CITY miniseries on PBS.
PHILADELPHIA is a good idea, just not a particularly good film.

Title
Review for Ref, The (1994)
Starring:  Denis Leary, Judy Davis, Kevin Spacey.
Screenplay:  Richard LaGravenese and Marie Weiss.
Director:  Ted Demme.
     Good scripts are so rare in Hollywood that it should be a felony
when one gets wasted.  Sometimes it's dreadful miscasting; sometimes
it's a director without an ounce of vision.  The dilemma in which I
find myself in such cases is how to temper my response to the things
the film failed to do with acknowledgment of its strengths.  Last
year's TRUE ROMANCE was one of those films, and THE REF is another.
There are a lot of laughs in THE REF, more than most recent comedies
have provided, yet I found it consistently and infuriatingly falling
short of the comic plateau it might have achieved in more skilled
directorial hands.
     It's the night before Christmas in the affluent Connecticut suburb
of Old Baybrook when THE REF begins, but plenty of creatures are
stirring.  The town is abuzz over the first actual crime in memory, a
botched burglary committed by career criminal Gus (Denis Leary).  When
he escapes the scene and finds the whole state looking for him, Gus
kidnaps Caroline (Judy Davis) and Lloyd Chasseur (Kevin Spacey) so that
he can hide out in their house.  The problem for Gus:  the Chasseurs
are perhaps the most unhappily married couple since John and Lorena
Bobbitt.  While Gus waits for a chance to make his escape, the
incessantly bickering Chasseurs drive him to distraction, a situation
made even worse by the subsequent arrival of their delinquent son
(Robert J. Steinmiller, Jr.), a horde of relatives, two local police
and a drunken Santa in a pear tree.
     The script for THE REF, by Richard LaGravenese (THE FISHER KING)
and Marie Weiss, is full of comic and dramatic potential, only some of
which ever makes it to the screen.  On the surface, there is a scathing
comedy which plays like "Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?" meets "The
Ransom of Red Chief."  Comic Denis Leary gets the lead billing in his
first starring role, but it is the sparring of Spacey and Davis which
carries the film.  Their acid-filled tirades in the film's first half
hour are extremely funny, and the two characters are surprisingly
well-rounded.  With the arrival of the extended Chasseur family comes
the potential for even more outrageous comedy as the Christmas eve
dinner degenerates into a primal scream group therapy session.  But THE
REF never makes the leap to the outrageous.  Leary and his director Ted
Demme, who collaborated on a series of promo spots for MTV a couple of
years ago which popularized Leary's ranting, chain-smoking stand-up
persona, seem too concerned here with separating Leary from that
persona.  Consequently, he plays a number of scenes far too low-key,
and in fact fades into the background almost completely in the last
half hour.
     The disappearance of Leary also hurts the film's dramatic subtext,
as Leary's Gus recognizes in the Chasseurs the kind of dysfunctional
family which led to his own life, and responds in surprising ways.  A
number of early verbal confrontations are exceptionally well-written,
as all three of the principal characters make their case, and it is to
the credit of LaGravenese and Weiss that at various times all three
appear to be completely right and completely wrong.  Yet while the
title of THE REF apparently refers to Gus's action as intermediary
between Caroline and Lloyd, that dynamic disappears when the guests
arrive.  Insults fly, and Leary merely stands around looking
exasperated.
     There are too many funny things going on in THE REF for it to be a
complete failure.  I found the town's ill-prepared police force and its
disgusted chief to be a hilarious subplot, and their handling of a
piece of videotaped evidence is a winner.  Spacey and Davis exchange
some of the most caustic dialogue since THE WAR OF THE ROSES, a style I
always enjoy.  Unfortunately, Demme seems unwilling to let the throttle
out, and a comedy which had been racing along nicely stalls before it
hits the finish line.

Title
Review for Priest (1994)
Starring:  Linus Roache, Tom Wilkinson, Robert Carlyle, Cathy Tyson.
Screenplay:  Jimmy McGovern.
Director:  Antonia Bird.
     To tell you far more about myself than you ever really wanted
to know, I am what is known in the parlance as a lapsed Catholic.
Why would I make that information known?  It certainly wouldn't be
to promote the perception of objectivity in my evaluation of PRIEST;
one might believe that I was inclined to look favorably on a film so
roundly condemned by the Catholic Church sight unseen.  Such is not
the case.  I explain that I am a lapsed Catholic because the themes
in PRIEST are extremely familiar to me, and I believe that there is
a story in those themes which would make a fine film.  PRIEST could
have been a compelling character study which respected the
complexity of modern Catholicism, but instead it is, in its own way,
just as dogmatic as it accuses the Church of being.
     PRIEST stars Linus Roache as Father Greg Pilkington, a Catholic
priest newly assigned to a parish in working class Liverpool.  A
potential conflict arises when the very orthodox Father Greg learns
that another parish priest, Father Matthew (Tom Wilkinson), is not
only a free-thinking and free-speaking social liberal, but is also
cohabitating with their housekeeper Maria (Cathy Tyson).  However,
it soon becomes clear that Father Greg is living a double life of
his own, frequenting the city's gay nightclubs.  Father Greg
struggles to reconcile his homosexuality and his vocation, but an
even greater challenge to his faith comes when he is told in the
confessional by a young parishoner (Christine Tremarco) that she is
being sexually abused by her father--information a priest cannot
divulge.
     For much of the film, powerful acting and an intriguing
character keep PRIEST on the right track.  Roache, who resembles a
young Gabriel Byrne, is convincing as the devoted Catholic who
believes so strongly in the rules of his faith that he does nothing
to prevent the abuse he knows is taking place, and denies communion
to his lover Graham (an effectively subdued Robert Carlyle).  At the
same time, he finds himself unwilling or unable to deny his
sexuality, violating both the celibacy required of his order and the
Church's teachings on homosexuality.  It is the kind of selective
observation of Catholic dogma which is common among comtemporary
Catholics, and evidence of a skewed set of priorities.  Meanwhile,
Father Matthew has come to terms with what he believes are the
essentials of the faith, and lives a much happier life.  Director
Antonia Bird does a fine job of making iconography omnipresent;
crucifixes appear everywhere, most brilliantly in a shot where a
crucifix is placed between Father Greg and a reflection of himself,
a concise visual summation of the two parts of his personality
divided by the Church.
     Unfortunately, what begins as a measured examination of
religious hypocrisies turns into a kind of tirade.  Screenwriter
Jimmy McGovern apparently doesn't trust the audience to get his
point from the events in Father Greg's life, so he turns the last
half hour of the film into a series of sermons, philosophical
discussions and exchanges of scripture passages.  Not only does the
film become pedantic at this point, it simply becomes dull, and
crawls toward its emotional climax.  The flawed but human characters
whose conflicts seem real become little more than mouthpieces.
     Perhaps it is most difficult to digest the message of PRIEST
because it makes so little effort to treat the opposing point of
view with any respect.  The only priests in the film who are not
alcoholics or having sex are scowling, hateful and cadaverous; there
is not a single character who supports orthodoxy who is treated as
anything but an ogre.  Whether or not the Catholic Church is
deserving of criticism is not even the point.  This is an
examination of doctrinal morality as Oliver Stone might have done
it, too full of homilies and too lacking in an understanding that
issues are usually shades of grey.  There are probably Father Gregs
and Father Matthews in many parishes around the world, and that is
an issue deserving of attention.  By sensationalizing Father Greg's
story, however, the makers of PRIEST end up preaching almost
exclusively to the converted.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT
(Miramax)
Starring:  Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachael Leigh Cook, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe,
Matthew Lillard, Paul Walker, Kevin Pollak, Kieran Culkin.
Screenplay:  R. Lee Fleming Jr.
Producers:  Peter Abrams, Robert L. Levy and Richard N. Gladstein.
Director:  Robert Iscove.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  91 min.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Cinderella ain't what she used to be...and at the same time, she's
exactly what she's always been.  Like no other fairy tale set-up, it sets
a modern sensibility to itching -- how does one respond to the idea that a
woman must be physically transformed to be worthy of love?  This male
chauvinist Pygmalion has taken many forms over the years, from MY FAIR
LADY to PRETTY WOMAN, but SHE'S ALL THAT may have found the perfect
setting:  high school.  If there's anywhere you can sell the idea that
_everyone_ believes they must be physically transformed to be worthy of
love, this would be the place.
     So much for the sociological context -- SHE'S ALL THAT stinks like
last month's cheese left on a particularly sunny windowsill.  Freddie
Prinze Jr. stars as Zack Siler, senior class president, soccer star and
all-around golden boy at Southern California's Harrison High.  On the
first day back from spring break, Zack is dumped by long-time girlfriend
Taylor (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe) when she hooks up with a former "Real World"
cast member (Matthew Lillard).  The humiliated Zack claims he can turn any
girl in school into a prom queen, a boast that turns into a bet when
Zack's buddy Dean (Paul Walker) chooses gloomy art geek Laney Boggs
(Rachael Leigh Cook) as the subject of the experiment.  And thus the
eight-week countdown clock to personal growth and true love begins.
     I'm sure that all parties involved in SHE'S ALL THAT thought they
really were telling a Cinderella story, particularly director Robert
Iscove, who helmed the popular TV-movie version with Brandy a couple years
back.  This, of course, is one of those Cinderella stories where the poor
little girl is really a supermodel whose paint-spattered overalls hide a
slinky va-va-voom waiting to emerge.  Rachael Leigh Cook wears her
horn-rims like someone trying desperately not to appear beautiful despite
her porcelain features, somewhat dampening that willing suspension of
disbelief.  There's little if any chemistry between Prinze and Cook, no
development of what would make their mutual attraction grow...in short,
nothing that would appeal to a viewer not of the same age as the
protagonists.
     Essentially, however, SHE'S ALL THAT isn't remotely interested in
appealing to anyone outside that audience, because it's really a teen
fantasy.  For girls, it offers the prospect that, even if you're a social
pariah now, you too can turn into a popular beauty with the right haircut
and a sympathetic stud by your side; for boys, it suggests that anyone is
a hottie waiting to happen if you point her in the right direction.
There's even assurance for the academically brilliant (Zack faces the
dilemma of choosing between seven Ivy League schools) that your life is
complicated, too.  And in between, it derives belly laughs from people
eating pizza sprinkled with pubic hair.  It's humorless and derivative,
but it _understands_ you, fellow high school student.  Like John Hughes
crossed with Bill Clinton, SHE'S ALL THAT feels your adolescent pain.
     Thank heaven for Matthew Lillard, who invests his spin on "Real
World's" Puck with enough egotistical energy to rouse SHE'S ALL THAT from
its stupor periodically.  His scenes, including a manic look-at-me dance
at a party, are about the only aspect of the film not pasted together from
every other teen angst-comedy you've ever seen.  This one compounds its
tedium with a near-suffocating boredom, as Iscove can't even generate
energy to drive its familiar narrative forward.  SHE'S ALL THAT just
meanders sweetly towards its inevitable conclusion, telling its viewers
exactly what they want to hear:  that someday their prince will come, and
all it will take to get him is a sausage-casing red dress.

Title
Review for Thirty Two Short Films About Glenn Gould (1993)
     What I know about classical music, I could explain to you in
ten minutes.  I had never heard of Glenn Gould before I heard of this 
film.  It is possible that with greater background knowledge, I might 
have appreciated THIRTY-TWO FILMS ABOUT GLENN GOULD more... although I 
can't imagine how.  GLENN GOULD is a thoroughly remarkable film 
experience, as confident as it is ambitious, as masterfully realized as 
it is skillfully constructed.  It is difficult for me to conceive of a 
biography which more vividly conveys its subject, in all his complexity, 
and it is easy for me to state that it is the best film I have seen in 
1994.
     THIRTY-TWO SHORT FILMS ABOUT GLENN GOULD is exactly what its
title would suggest:  a series of vignettes examining in various ways the 
life and music of Glenn Gould, the acclaimed and enigmatic Canadian 
classical pianist who died in 1982 at the age of 50.  Gould caused a 
sensation with his unique interpretations of Bach, Schoenberg and others, 
and even more of a sensation when he retired from live performance at the 
age of 32.  Among the thirty-two films (the number taken from Bach's 
Goldberg Variations) are dramatizations of events from the life of Gould 
(Colm Feore), as well as interviews with friends, family and professional 
associates. There are also abstract interpretations of Gould's work as a 
performer and as a composer.
     While each of the thirty-two individually titled segments in
GLENN GOULD is self-contained, it is the manner in which they are 
connected which makes the film so compelling.  "Lake Simcoe," a fairly 
straightforward narrated look at Gould's childhood, leads into our first 
look at Gould the man in "Forty-five Seconds and a Chair."  We only just 
have time to register reaction to Gould before an acquaintance describes 
_his_ first meeting with Gould, and how he turned out to be quite a 
different person from what his appearance might suggest.  Later, Gould 
picks up snatches of conversation while dining in "Truck Stop," then uses 
that experience as an inspiration for his unique radio production "The 
Idea of North."  Despite the changes in perspective and varying film 
techniques, GLENN GOULD never seems fragmented; it maintains an 
unmistakable flow which is rarely anything but gripping.
     It helps that Francois Girard has chosen such a fascinating
subject, but it is Girard's brilliant direction which makes GOULD, the 
movie and the man, come alive.  Girard never tries to pin Gould down, the 
way a conventional biography might; rather, he uses his singular format 
to allow the complicated and multi-faceted Gould emerge slowly.  Although 
he gives up life performance to go into virtual seclusion, he so longs 
for contact that he spends hours each day talking to people on the 
telephone; in fact, the segment "Solitude" might in many ways be 
considered the centerpiece of the film.  Suffering throughout his life 
from high blood pressure and other chronic circulatory problems, Gould 
becomes a virtual slave to his medical conditions, highlighted in "Pills" 
and "Diary of One Day."  And while the dramatized sequences tend to 
present a man of almost other-worldly talent and insight, the inclusion 
of the interviews with real acquaintances of Gould's gives him a 
fundamental humanity.
     There is the occasional misstep.  A few of the sequences seem
repetitive, particularly "Practice" and "Passion According to Gould," 
both of which show Gould's rapture in response to his own music; and "The 
Tip," while amusing, seems somewhat out of place.  I was also less than 
enthralled by the lengthy animated segment "Gould Meets McLaren," and 
"Variation in C Minor," another FANTASIA-like visual representation of 
music.  When the music was separated from the man, I grew impatient.  
THIRTY-TWO SHORT FILMS ABOUT GLENN GOULD introduced me to a fragile, 
uniquely humanistic genius I wanted to know more about, and in a way I 
doubt I'll ever forget.

Title
Review for 8 Women (1999)
8-1/2 WOMEN
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  John Standing, Matthew Delamere, Polly Walker, Vivian Wu,
Shizuka Inoh, Barbara Sarafian, Toni Collette, Amanda Plummer, Kirina
Mano, Natacha Amal.
Screenplay:  Peter Greenaway.
Producers:  Kees Kasander.
Director:  Peter Greenaway.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In 8-1/2 WOMEN, Peter Greenaway makes a film, and several completely
nude men and women appear ... but I repeat myself. Greenaway's
sensibilities have never shied away from provocative issues or images,
specifically where the human body is concerned. His obsession with flesh
has played a prominent role in his most prominent films: THE COOK, THE
THIEF, HIS WIFE AND HER LOVER; THE PILLOW BOOK; and PROSPERO'S BOOKS, in
which even Sir John Gielgud dropped trou. Yes indeed, Peter Greenaway
loves putting naked people on the screen. In 8-1/2 WOMEN, lead actor John
Standing's genitalia get so much screen time, they probably should have
gotten third billing in the credits.
     The question with Greenaway has always been whether there is much to
his exercises in conspicuous kink besides the conspicuous kink itself. In
the case of 8-1/2 WOMEN, the answer is, "Sort of." The story concerns
Philip Emmenthal (Standing), a 55-year-old millionaire banker living in
Geneva, and his son Storey (Matthew Delamere). As the film opens, Philip's
wife has just passed away, leaving him despondent. Storey, however, is
convinced that the old man just needs to jump back in the saddle, and
tries to persuade him to seek female companionship. Ultimately, he comes
up with an even more intriguing idea: Turn their Swiss mansion into a
private harem made up of women who are indebted to them in some fashion.
Thus the rooms are filled with women like Griselda (Toni Collette), a
former nun; Simato (Shizuka Inoh), a compulsive gambler; Giaconda (Natacha
Amal), who loves to be pregnant; and Beryl (Amanda Plummer), whose tastes
run to livestock.
     By the time 8-1/2 WOMEN winds to its conclusion, it's hard to imagine
a sexual fetish or taboo that's been left unexplored or undiscussed. 
There's incest and bestiality, transgender role-playing and racial
role-playing, madonna/whores and servant girls. There's even the ghastly
sight of Amanda Plummer in neck brace and the kind of garish make-up
usually associated with the Emcee in CABARET. Don't mistake this, however,
for a film designed to arouse anything but curiosity. The episodes appear
and disappear as though the whole enterprise were simply a fashion show
for perversity, with scarcely a hint of eroticism to get in the way. As
flesh-baring free-for-alls go, this one is pretty flaccid stuff.
     In a way, however, that absence of sexual intensity is what the film
is all about. In a reflexive gag based on a reflexive film, Greenaway has
his two main characters comment on Fellini's 8-1/2, with Philip wondering
"how many film-makers ... make films simply to act out their sexual
fantasies," to which Storey replies, "All of them, I suppose." 8-1/2 WOMEN
becomes Greenaway's acting out of his realization that sexual fantasies
can't be brought to life, or they're no longer fantasies. Philip may have
had a sexually unadventurous life with his wife, but he discovers that
there are inevitable pitfalls to dealing with outrageous quests for
pleasure; only when he begins to fall for one of his women (Polly Walker) 
does he seem happy in his self-made sex palace. In his typically skewed
fashion, Greenaway has made an intentionally un-titillating cautionary
tale.
     If only Greenaway's films felt as much like stories of real people as
they felt like lessons. There's no question that Greenaway is a superb
film stylist; he crafts powerful compositions like the interchanging
medium- and close-range shot of the father and son conversing by the
indoor pool, ripples reflecting off the walls. His films too often lack
real emotional resonance, however, and 8-1/2 WOMEN is no exception. There
are isolated moments when Philip's grief seems more central to the story
than the director's aesthetics, and there's a surprisingly funny scene in
which one female servant discusses her failed "try-out" for the harem with
a co-worker. More often, 8-1/2 WOMEN is another case of Greenaway giving
his audience lots to look at, a bit less to think about and virtually
nothing to feel. He's a maker of intriguing but only fitfully satisfying 
films that happen to include lots of penises and breasts. He may be
cinema's foremost purveyor of art-core porn.

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
(Universal)
Starring:  Dennis Quaid, David Thewlis, Peter Postlethwaite, Dina Meyer,
Julie Christie, voice of Sean Connery.
Screenplay:  Charles Edward Pogue, from a story by Pogue and Patrick Read
Johnson.
Producer:  Rafaella DeLaurentiis.
Director:  Rob Cohen.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For my money, the best joke in DRAGONHEART is one which probably was
unintentional, and which works on a level entirely outside the world of
the film.  It is a scene in which a 10th century knight named Bowen
(Dennis Quaid), an avowed dragon-slayer, confronts Draco, a
computer-generated dragon voiced by Sean Connery.  A dozen years earlier,
Bowen watched as a dragon saved the life of his master, the young prince
Einon (Lee Oakes), then watched as Einon (played as an adult by David
Thewlis) became a ruthless tyrant.  Convinced that Einon's malice was the
result of an enchantment placed by the dragon, Bowen makes it his mission
to kill the offending beast, even if he must kill them all, and now faces
the last dragon still living.  The joke is that, once Draco speaks, Bowen
isn't instantly aware that this is the dragon he has been seeking for
those twelve years.  Even after that long, you'd think Sean Connery's
voice would be recognizable.
     Of course, that is exactly why Connery was chosen to give voice to
the wise, crafty, wrongly-accused Draco.  It is one of the most
distinctive voices in film, a rumbling burr which can be commanding,
whimsical, regal or intimate at any given time, and it allows DRAGONHEART
to pull off an unexpected trick:  you spend as much time listening to the
dragon as you do watching it.  Draco is a marvelous creation by Industrial
Light and Magic, fluid and expressive, with a thoroughly unique look and
style of movement, and it would have been easy enough to let it be a
flashy showpiece.  With Connery speaking through Draco's mouth, he
actually becomes a character.
     For a big-budget summer fantasy, DRAGONHEART is really a film of
smaller charms like the winning characterization of Draco, like the goofy
monk/would-be troubador (Peter Postlethwaite) who takes it upon himself
to chronicle Bowen's exploits, like David Thewlis' snarling, reptilian
villain.  But there is something ever so slightly askew in director Rob
Cohen's pacing which prevents DRAGONHEART from taking off into a level of
pure enjoyability.  None of the relationships (Bowen and Draco, Bowen and
Einon, Bowen and a feisty damsel played by Dina Meyer) ever really click,
the battle scenes are serviceable but perfunctory, and there are moments
of Dark Ages-meets-New Age mysticism which are played with an almost
cloying straightness (particularly the dewy-eyes-heavenward finale which I
have seen in enough Spielberg and Spielberg-clone films to last me a
lifetime).
     On one level, DRAGONHEART is a rather silly and simplistic fairy
tale, with a good knight, an evil king, a damsel in distress, swords and
sorcery.  Yet there is an interesting twist to Charles Edward Pogue's
script, a redemption story involving Bowen's motivations for his
dragon-dispensing activities.  Though originally driven by his feelings of
betrayal, that the dragon has violated a chivalric oath, Bowen has since
become little more than a mercenary-for-hire, and he doesn't even realize
that his attitude of righteous wrath has become a hypocrisy.  That makes
Bowen a complicated hero for an action-fantasy; that also makes Dennis
Quaid all wrong.  Quaid's sly grin has carried him far, but the reason it
hasn't carried him farther is that he's never convincing when he is
supposed to be in a bad mood -- the wrinkled-nosed grimace which passes
for Quaid's "angry face" always look like the put-on anger of someone who
is just about to burst into laughter.  As a result, the rounded character
of Pogue's script is flattened on the screen, and ends up seeming
considerably less vibrant than his animated co-star.
     For all its flaws, I was surprised how far DRAGONHEART went on the
strength of that one character.  TOY STORY proved that an audience could
cheer for a character generated on a hard-drive, and Draco is such a
character.  His plight in DRAGONHEART is probably the only one which
really connects, and it connects because he has both dignity and -- dare I
say it -- humanity.  Without Sean Connery lending an air of nobility,
DRAGONHEART is yet another good-looking but empty summer spectacle; with
Connery, it is a bit more fun, a bit more involving, and a bit more
familiar.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
LOST IN SPACE (1998)
(New Line)
Starring:  Gary Oldman, William Hurt, Matt LeBlanc, Mimi Rogers, Heather
Graham, Lacey Chabert, Jack Johnson.
Screenplay:  Akiva Goldsman.
Producers:  Akiva Goldsman, Stephen Hopkins and Mark W. Koch.
Director:  Stephen Hopkins.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
    Boy it seems like summer in the American movie business is starting
earlier all the time, doesn't it?  Time was you had to wait at least until
Memorial Day for the first sighting of a big-budget blockbuster.  Then
TWISTER crept into mid-May a couple of years ago, followed by THE FIFTH
ELEMENT's early May bow last year.  Now here comes LOST IN SPACE, pulling
out the big guns in April.  Yep, summer is coming earlier all the time.
And so is the holiday movie season for that matter.  Correct me if I'm
wrong, but isn't the new STAR TREK movie not due until November?
     I understand that in principle LOST IN SPACE is based on another
1960s science-fiction series entirely, the one with Robby the Robot and a
family named Robinson marooned in outer space.  In the big screen version,
set sixty years in the future, the Robinsons -- John (William Hurt),
Maureen (Mimi Rogers), Judy (Heather Graham), Penny (Lacey Chabert) and
Will (Jack Johnson) -- and their ace pilot Maj. Don West (Matt LeBlanc)
end up light years from home when the evil Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman)
sabotages their mission to colonize a distant planet.  The premise is
something straight out of the current TV "Trek" incarnation "Voyager," but
that's not the only place that Akiva Goldsman's script borders on "Trek"
parody.  "Anomalies" and "space-time rifts" appear with some regularity;
problems become something to be solved with a stream of techno-babble.
Even the extra-terrestrial sets have the vaguely cheesy Early Styrofoam
look of the original series.  By the time Dr. Smith grumbles in one scene
"I'm a doctor, not a space explorer," you may begin scanning the edges of
the frame for Paramount lawyers scurrying onto the set with 
cease-and-desist orders.
     Then again, "Star Trek" never got itself bogged down in the sort of
hand-wringing which passes for character development in LOST IN SPACE.
The television series turned the Swiss Family Robinson into the Space
Family Robinson; here, they're more like the Dysfunctional Family
Robinson.  When their spacecraft isn't being sucked into the sun or
attacked by relentless alien arachnids, the Robinson children pout over
the lack of attention paid to them by their work-obsessed father, while Ma
Robinson wonders "why we're trying to save the planet when we can't save
our own family."  Survival, it seems, becomes a secondary concern to using
the occasion for a big, forced group therapy session.  Combine the family
squabbles, the obligatory cameo by a member of the series cast (June
Lockhart as Will's principal), a villainous Global Sedition movement which
disappears after the first twenty minutes, pointless flirtations between
LeBlanc and Graham and an even-more-pointless friendly alien
monkey/chameleon/action figure-in-training character, and you've got one
heck of a loud and busy story from Goldsman (BATMAN & ROBIN), the Crown
Prince of Loud and Busy Stories.
     And one bitchin'-cool loud and busy story, at that.  LOST IN SPACE
may be silly and overwrought, but it sure looks great.  Creepy creatures,
spaceship dogfights, morphing, nifty costumes, well-crafted action
sequences -- I can't remember the last time I spent so much time impressed
by a film's bag of visual tricks.  There's even a modicum of decent acting
to season the spectacle, particularly from Oldman as the nasty villain and
LeBlanc as the thick-but-decent military man.  There may not be much to
recommend LOST IN SPACE as quality film-making beyond its technical
prowess, but that's probably more than enough to satisfy summer movie fans
until summer actually arrives.  Or to satisfy the "Star Trek" fans until
Thanksgiving actually arrives.

Title
Review for Beautician and the Beast, The (1997)
     Like most television performers venturing into feature films, Fran
Drescher chose a first starring vehicle which would be comfortable in its
familiarity.  THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST finds Drescher, TV's "The 
Nanny," playing...well, a nanny.  Not much of a stretch, it would seem,
until you take into account the fact that Drescher isn't just playing a
nanny in this case -- she's stepping into the shoes of the quintessential
representation of screen nanny-dom, Julie Andrews.  You see, THE
BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST may be part variation on "Beauty and the Beast"
and part variation on the old "fish-out-of-water" comedy, but at its core
it is something else.  THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST is really THE SOUND OF
MUSIC remade, with a nasal New Yawka instead of a novitiate.
     That may not sound terribly appealing, and indeed the extent to which
you will enjoy THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST may depend on how much of
Drescher you can take in one sitting.  She plays Joy Miller, a New York
beautician teaching night school and living with her parents (Michael
Lerner and Phyllis Newman) while she waits for the perfect job and the
perfect man to come along.  She has a chance for both when she ends up on
the front page of the New York Post for saving several lab animals from a
classroom fire, and that headline brings her to the attention of Boris
Pochenko (Timothy Dalton), the despotic "president" of the tiny Eastern
European nation of Slovetzia.  Pochenko wants his children to be prepared
for the New World Order, and believes they need a Western teacher for that
to happen.  Unfortunately, Pochenko believes Joy is an actual
schoolteacher, a misconception Joy is in no hurry to dispel along with the 
$40,000 a year she is receiving.
     THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST is a slight, meandering little film
which is hard to get a handle on.  Todd Graff's script goes most of the
expected places, creating conflict between the controlling Boris and the
uncontrollable Joy and providing stock characters like a good advisor (Ian
McNeice) to take Joy's side and a bad advisor (Patrick Malahide) to make
the soon-to-be-reformed Boris look better by comparison.  He also tosses
in obscure references (how many audience members are going to remember
NORMA RAE?) and scatters his multiple sub-plots all over the pace to be
picked up whenever time permits.  The plot drifts from Joy's street-wise
counsel to each of Boris's children to preparations for the arrival of
potential foreign investors, never really lingering anywhere long enough
for the events to be of anything but casual interest.  Director Ken Kwapis
doesn't develop any kind of comic rhythm in BEAUTICIAN, allowing many of
the thin gags to stand alone.  He and Graff know how the film is supposed
to begin and how it is supposed to end; it is the vast middle which
provides the problem as they search for some kind of structure in which to
place their characters.
     I suppose one alternative to creating a structure is swiping one,
hence the extended riff on THE SOUND OF MUSIC.  The similarities could
almost be represented by one of those tables with the two films as the
headings.  In THE SOUND OF MUSIC, Maria leaves the Mother Superior in
search of something wonderful; in BEAUTICIAN, Joy leaves her superior
mother.  In THE SOUND OF MUSIC, Maria goes to work for a domineering
military man and takes responsibility for his brood of children; ditto in
BEAUTICIAN.  In THE SOUND OF MUSIC, eldest daughter Liesl has a
surreptitious romance with a young man whose politics clash with those of
her father; eldest daughter Katrina (Lisa Jakub) has the same problem in
BEAUTICIAN.  By the time Boris and Joy realize their love for one another
while dancing at a grand party (sound familiar?), I would not have been
surprised to hear Timothy Dalton break into a chorus of "Edelweiss"
     At least THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST ends where THE SOUND OF MUSIC
should have ended, with the kiss before all the political upheaval.  The
romance in the film is actually fairly appealing, thanks largely to the
entertaining work of Timothy Dalton.  He has a gruff, goofy charm as the
Stalin-esque dictator who grows warm and cuddly, giving spark to Boris'
sudden desire to become a populist even if it doesn't make much sense.  He
also shares a nice chemistry with Drescher whenever she tones down the
attitude for a quieter moment, but quiet is a relative consideration where
Drescher is concerned.  It may seem a bit unfair to knock her for that
grating squeal which can reach dog-whistle pitch when she raises her
voice; after all, it isn't as though she chose it.  There is also no
question that it can be distracting, even if it is her calling card and
gives her an edge many female comics could use more of.  If you can get
past the Drescher Drone, you might be able to ride along on the
feather-light romantic comedy of THE BEAUTICIAN AND THE BEAST.  When the
sound of the leading lady is hardly the sound of music, however, that kind
of enjoyment may not be as simple as do-re-mi.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
TWILIGHT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Paul Newman, Susan Sarandon, Gene Hackman, Stockard Channing,
James Garner, Giancarlo Esposito, Reese Witherspoon, Liev Schreiber.
Screenplay:  Robert Benton and Richard Russo.
Producers:  Arlene Donovan and Scott Rudin.
Director:  Robert Benton.
MPAA Rating:  R (brief nudity, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I suspect that there was a great deal of good feeling on the set of
TWILIGHT, the kind that comes when people believe they're about to make a
point.  After all, this would be a film where the title could be
interpreted two ways.  On the one hand, it would evoke the appropriately
moody atmosphere required in a tale of Hollywood murder, blackmail and
corruption, this one centered on a retired private eye named Harry Ross
(Paul Newman) and his complex friendship with two aging movie stars,
cancer-stricken Jack Ames (Gene Hackman) and his wife Catherine (Susan
Sarandon).  On the other hand, it would describe the cast of veteran
actors and the charactes they play, all trying to show they are just as
vital in the present as they were in the past.  It would be a sly, subtle
story brought to life by a group of sly, subtle performers.
     Perhaps too sly and subtle for its own good.  As a narrative,
TWILIGHT offers virtually nothing you haven't seen in a dozen other
mysteries set among Southern California's privileged set:  dirty cops,
friends who turn out to be enemies, enemies who turn out to be friends,
wads of cash exchanging hands, a little rough stuff, a little gratuitous
nudity.  This one happens to focus on the 20-year-old unsolved
disappearance of Catherine's first husband, though that focus is fuzzy at
best.  Sub-plots and supporting characters materialize with alarming
frequency, far too many to be fleshed out adequately in the lean 91
minutes provided by Robert Benton and Richard Russo's script.  TWILIGHT 
introduces enough ideas about decaying affluence and influence that it
always seems to be moving forward.  It just doesn't feel like it's headed
anywhere in particular.
     The only reason TWILIGHT doesn't feel like a thoroughly generic
time-waster -- and in fact offers a moderate level of satisfaction -- is
the pleasure which comes from watching great actors share the screen.
Newman wears the layers of disappointment in Harry's 
cop-turned-shamus-turned-drunk life like an old sweater, yet maintains a
core of idealistic morality.  His scenes with Hackman, Stockard Channing
(as an old flame and current police lieutenant) and James Garner (as
another ex-cop gone private sector) spill over with the easy chatter of
old friends, directed by Benton (KRAMER VS. KRAMER, NOBODY'S FOOL) in his
typical restrained style.
     In fact, the actors are so good that they might trick you into
thinking you're watching well-rounded characters.  It's only when Reese
Witherspoon, Liev Schreiber and Giancarlo Esposito stumble over their
underdeveloped parts that it becomes apparent how sketchy those characters
truly are.  TWILIGHT generally feels rushed together as an opportunity for
all these actors to appear in a movie together; for all the talking going
on, it's tough to get a handle on who these people really are.  There's a
fair amount of sharp, tart dialogue to go around.  Unfortunately, not
enough of it is used to bring the characters into focus.
     The best clue as to what TWILIGHT is really all about comes from a
minor sub-plot which finds several old friends of Harry's mistakenly
believing that a gunshot wound has left him -- ahem -- less a man.  Harry
laughs richly at the rumor when he learns of it, but the film may take
the idea a bit more seriously.  The principal male characters in TWILIGHT
all seem to be worrying about the degeneration of their lives into
physical ailments, inertia and self-pity; in a town where youth is
worshipped, they may be wondering whether or not they can still "perform."
It's intriguing to watch both the actors and the characters trying to
re-define themselves in the present and put their past behind them.  And
maybe that's even enough subtext to give TWILIGHT the edge it needs to
make up for its lack of actual text.  The story may be only half-finished,
but the stars sure aren't.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
(New Line)
Starring:  Mike Myers, Elizabeth Hurley, Michael York, Robert Wagner.
Screenplay:  Mike Myers.
Producers:  Suzanne Todd, Demi Moore, Jennifer Todd, Mike Myers.
Director:  Jay Roach.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  87 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Boy, did AUSTIN POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY take me back.
Not to 1967, when I was a mere babe in arms, but to those carefree,
halcyon days of 1990.  George Bush was still flying high in the approval
ratings, GHOST was making millions of Americans "believe," and Mike Myers
was a cast member of a still-popular "Saturday Night Live."  Myers
provided some moments of comic genius in those days, even as the show was
developing this habit of allowing sketches to exceed their welcome by 
several excruciating minutes.  I was reminded of both aspects of 1990-era
"SNL" as I watched AUSTIN POWERS:  Myers' appeal, and the inability to
recognize when enough is enough.  
     AUSTIN POWERS opens in 1967, where the title character (Mike Myers)
is a legendary fashion photographer, secret agent and ladies man, battling
arch-nemesis Dr. Evil (also played by Myers) alongside his partner Mrs.
Kensington (Mimi Rogers).  When Austin thwarts yet another of Dr. Evil's
plans, the criminal mastermind has himself cryogenically preserved and
launched into space to await another opportunity for evil.  Thirty years
later, Dr. Evil returns to earth, but the joke is on him:  Austin Powers
has _also_ had himself frozen, and is thawed out to take on his old foe.
Together with Mrs. Kensington's daughter Vanessa (Elizabeth Hurley),
Austin tries to stop Dr. Evil from blackmailing the nations of the world,
while also trying to adjust to a world with different sexual mores,
different fashions, and better oral hygiene.
     AUSTIN POWERS is a parody which could have run out of gas in seconds
if Myers had been interested only in late 60s anachronisms.  As it turns
out, there are relatively few gags based on the culture shock of the hero
and the villain.  For the most part, AUSTIN POWERS is a fairly
straightforward parody of James Bond-ian secret agent adventures, with gags
more amusing than their obviousness gives them any right to be.  Austin's
British Intelligence superior (Michael York), whose only purpose is to
explain the plot, is named Basil Exposition; the buxom femme fatale is
suggestively named Alotta...well, the last name completes the picture.
Myers energizes all these ideas with an odd-ball edge and the sheer
exuberance of his performance in both roles.  It's not possible to do
justice to Dr. Evil's self-revelations in a father/son encounter group, or
the "erotic" dance with which Austin subdues a horde of lethal female
robots.
     As long as AUSTIN POWERS feels vaguely original, and doesn't remind
you of "Saturday Night Live," it's actually very funny.  Unfortunately,
if you watched Myers-era "SNL" at all, it's going to look awfully
familiar.  The characterization of Dr. Evil is a cross between Myers'
Dieter character and Ed Sullivan; Austin is a grown-up version of his
naughty British schoolboy Simon.  He invokes his loud-mouthed thespian
from "Theater Stories" in one early scene, and in another does a nearly
word-for-word re-creation of a bit from a "Wayne's World" sketch.  He
seems so enamored of invoking memories of "SNL," in fact, that he invokes
nightmares of jokes which refuse to die.  On at least five separate
occasions, Myers and director Jay Roach seem to have no sense of how long
is too long to stick with an extended gag.  They usually feel something
like this:  funny for five seconds, not funny for ten seconds, funny for
five more seconds, not funny for eight and a half minutes.
     After so many begging-to-be-pulled-from-life-support sequences,
AUSTIN POWERS feels like one of the most padded 87 minute movies you'll
ever see.  It didn't need to be.  The early scenes set in 1967 are
hilarious, including a goofy opening credits sequence and the promise of
nice repartee between Myers and Mimi Rogers as the Emma Peel-like Mrs.
Kensington.  Every time "Laugh-In"-style musical blackout segments
appeared between scenes, I thought about how much funnier AUSTIN POWERS
might have been as a pure period piece.  It's the character of Austin
Powers and the familiar plot elements from early James Bond films which
are most appealing about AUSTIN POWERS; there was no particular need to
put those elements in the 1990s.  But that's what we've got:  a comedy
which jettisons a great premise for a merely adequate one.  Myers alone
may be reason enough to watch AUSTIN POWERS if you are a fan of his "SNL"
glory days.  There will be plenty of chances in the film to flash back to
those days...and if you remember them at all, you know what a mixed
blessing that could be.

Title
Review for Once Upon a Time... When We Were Colored (1996)
     It is one of the more cumbersome pieces of baggage which goes along
with being a film critic that, every once in a while, a film comes along
which you are _supposed_ to like on general principle.  Critics are
sometimes placed in the uncomfortable position of being expected to
champion small, ennobling films simply because, like cinematic castor oil,
they are good for us.  ONCE UPON A TIME...WHEN WE WERE COLORED is a film
which wears its earnestness proudly on its sleeve; it means well, and it
tries hard.  But a film has to have something more going for it than
principle, and ONCE UPON A TIME... is a well-acted but extremely
fragmented story which can't quite get its tone down straight.
     Based on the autobiographical writings of Clifton Taulbert, ONCE UPON
A TIME...WHEN WE WERE COLORED opens in Glen Allan, Mississippi in 1946,
with the birth of Cliff to an unmarried farm girl named Mary (Karen Malina
White).  When his mother eventually becomes a teacher in a nearby town,
Cliff is raised primarily by his great-grandfather Poppa (Al Freeman Jr.)
and great-grandmother Mama Pearl (Paula Kelly).  Under Poppa's care Cliff
gradually begins to understand the facts of life in the segregated South.
Mama Pearl's growing infirmity forces Cliff to live with yet another
caregiver, his aunt known as Ma Ponk (Phylicia Rashad).  Cliff observes as
prejudice affects several friends including an iceman named Cleve (Richard
Roundtree), and how the allure of the more integrated North draws away
many members of his family.
     ONCE UPON A TIME...WHEN WE WERE COLORED is not particularly
interested in detailing the day-to-day ugliness of life in the segregated
South; it is a film about a kind of community which no longer exists, and
as such it is occasionally quite touching.  It is difficult not to watch
scenes of 4th of July barbecues for which the whole town turns out, or to
notice how the people of Glen Allan look out for each other, without
feeling a sense of sadness that that unity had to disappear with the
passing years.  This is more of a love letter to a time when Southern
blacks realized that all they had was each other, and treated their
community with reverence and respect, than it is a remembrance of
cruelties past.
     The main problem with ONCE UPON A TIME is that it makes frequent side
trips to episodic stories which don't resonate, despite insistent
voice-over narration (provided by screenwriter Paul W. Cooper) that tries
to convince us that they should.  There is a sub-plot involving the return
of Ma Ponk's son Melvin (Leon) to visit from his new home in Detroit, and
his attempt to convince an old girlfriend to come with him.  The story
allows for a scene in a backwater juke joint which adds a bit of
atmosphere, but the relationship doesn't really matter, because there's a
history there we haven't had a chance to see.  The same is true of an
episode involving a traveling chorus girl (Iona Morris) who stays with
Cliff and Ma Ponk, and the result of Ma Ponk's visit to see the show, or
Cliff's relationship with a kindly white woman (Polly Bergen) who gets
library books for him to read.  There is an incompleteness to many of the
individual episodes, and a lack of emotion to scenes which seem designed
to provoke an emotional response.
     When ONCE UPON A TIME...WHEN WE WERE COLORED spends time with Cliff
and his family, there is a lot to recommend it.  Al Freeman Jr. gives a
subtle but commanding performance as the proud Poppa, who has the
unpleasant task of teaching his great-grandson why there are certain
restrooms he cannot use; a scene in which he reacts to Cliff proudly using
the correct, "colored" drinking fountain is a fine piece of non-verbal
acting.  Too often, however, the film drifts away from Cliff's
point-of-view, or injects an obligatory bit of racial violence almost
because it seems to be expected.  First-time feature director Tim Reid
maintains a steady pace and evokes the atmosphere of his setting
skillfully, but he doesn't find a narrative in the many stories he is
trying to put on the screen.  If its story and its characters had been as
consistent as its good intentions, it might have been a great film.

Title
Review for Dance with Me (1998)
    I know what you're probably thinking about DANCE WITH ME, because it's
the same thing I was thinking.  This would be nothing more than a bunch of
dance sequences strung together by something that could only be called a
plot if you were being particularly generous.  Even the film's trailer,
which featured about a dozen words in two minutes, contributed to the
impression that DANCE WITH ME wouldn't be about characters, but about
plastic wind-up dance toys masquerading as characters.  Yes, the film's
original title -- SHUT UP AND DANCE -- would certainly prove prescient.
     I'll tell you what I wasn't expecting:  one of the year's most
appealing, charismatic performances.  It comes courtesy of Chayanne, the
Puerto Rican musical sensation who stars here as Rafael Infante, a young
Cubano coming to Houston, Texas on a personal mission.  After landing a
job at the studio of dance teacher John Burnett (Kris Kristofferson),
Rafael becomes interested in one of the pros who frequents the studio,
Ruby Sinclair (Vanessa L. Williams).  Ruby is an enigma to Rafael, since
her fierce dedication to dancing doesn't seem to be connected to any real
joy.  As Rafael tries to re-introduce Ruby to the pure pleasure of dance,
a tentative romance, naturally blossoms between them.
     Simple stuff, to be sure -- perhaps even simplistic -- but DANCE WITH
ME sells its simplicity almost entirely on the strength of Chayanne's
appeal.  Though it's certainly helpful that he's has boyish good looks and
an inviting smile, his success can't be dismissed as purely hormonal.  He
has to anchor both of the film's big emotional hooks -- tentative attempts
to connect with the father he has never known, and the romance with
Williams -- in spite of a language barrier, which he does by acting with
his face and body language as well as any young performer of the last
several years.  Chayanne has that intangible something called presence,
something that gets you more involved in a simple story than the material
probably deserves.
     That presence is most forceful when he hits the dance floor in an
exhilarating sequence at a Latin dance club.  The sequence hinges on
Rafael conveying to Ruby the pure joy of dance, and that joy explodes from
his every movement.  As obviously choreographed as some of the
"spontaneous" moves in the club might be, it's still infectious to watch
when Rafael seems to be having so much fun.  He even manages to bring an
unforced charm to the Gene Kelly dance steps he breaks into in the middle
of a shower of lawn sprinklers.  Anyone who can invoke SINGIN' IN THE RAIN
without inspiring gasps at the sacrilege has to be doing something right.
     He does so many things right, in fact, that the second half of DANCE
WITH ME seems terribly wrong-headed when the focus abruptly shifts to
Ruby's attempts to re-ignite her career at a Las Vegas dance competition,
re-united with her former partner (Rick Valenzuela, playing a cartoonish
macho egomaniac).  First-time screenwriter Daryl Matthews (also the film's
choreographer) makes the mistake of making Ruby's conflict central at a
time in the narrative when there's already plenty of conflict to go
around.  Director Randa Haines, meanwhile, makes the mistake of spending
too much time showing us the competition itself.  If the point was to
prove how much more exciting club dancing is than regimented competitive
dancing, that point is made and made again for nearly half an hour,
including ridiculous comic relief from Joan Plowright as a spunky
geriatric.  The solid chemistry between Williams and Chayanne is lost, the
father-son relationship is buried and the dancing rapidly grows tiresome.
Predictable though the story may have been, at least is was energetic.
DANCE WITH ME decides to turn into a dance movie exactly when the dancing
is least interesting, and after the hero has made his impression.  His
charisma makes much of the film watchable, until it reaches the point 
where, much to your disappointment, they make him and everyone else just
shut up and dance.

Title
Review for Dear God (1996)
Director:  Garry Marshall.
Screenplay:  Warren Leight, Ed Kaplan.
Producer:  Steve Tisch.
Starring:  Greg Kinnear, Laurie Metcalf, Maria Pitillo, Tim Conway, Roscoe
Lee Browne, Hector Elizondo.
     Every movie-goer, whether he or she is conscious of it or not, has a
list of warning flags that a movie could be trouble.  Sometimes it is as
simple as an actor or genre to avoid; other times, it can be a more subtle
realization, like the risk of anything promoted with a soundtrack tie-in
or a rave from Jeff Craig of "Sixty Second Preview."  Critics inevitably
have longer lists by virtue of more extensive film experience, and I think
I have just added another item to mine:  beware of films with half a dozen
gratuitous cameo appearances.  The problem with that particular caveat is
that by the time you are in the theater and subjected to the guest star
deluge, it is too late.  DEAR GOD, a miserable excuse for a "feel-good"
comedy, is a film with no sense of direction whatsoever, causing a barrage
of cameos to feel all the more desperate.
     Greg Kinnear stars as Tom Turner, an inveterate gambler and con man
trying to pay off his debts with small-time scams.  When he is nabbed in
the act, he is given an ultimatum by the judge:  get an honest job or face
jail time.  Tom uses family connections to land a job in the Los Angeles
Post Office as holiday temporary help, assigned to the dead letter office 
where burnouts like Dooley (Tim Conway) and Rebecca (Laurie Metcalf)
collect undeliverable mail, including letters addressed to God.  When Tom
inadvertently answers one of those letters, his co-workers see an
opportunity to put spark back into their jobs by bringing some holiday
cheer to people asking God for help.  Tom, however, is unsure how to
handle the unfamiliar role of good Samaritan, even as publicity swarms
around the Post Office's "God Squad."
     DEAR GOD might have had a chance at being moderately amusing if it
had stuck to the formula of a lovable rascal who undergoes a conversion.
Kinnear's smirking wise-guy persona is perfectly suited to the role of
Tom, and he can also trot out a chastened charm which ingratiates himself
with the audience.  The problem is that the car wreck of a script churned
out by Warren Leight and Ed Kaplan includes so many minor characters and
superfluous side plots that DEAR GOD becomes thoroughly incoherent.  Tom
is given five sporadically interesting cohorts in the dead letter office
where two truly interesting ones would have been a significant
improvement, and even though both Laurie Metcalf and Tim Conway have nice
comic moments, they are playing essentially the same character.  Naturally
there is also a love interest (Maria Pitillo), a divorcee with a
distressingly precious young son (Seth Mumy); Tom also has a blind mother
(Rue McClanahan) to care for.  Things get so bloated that the sub-plot
involving Tom's loan shark (John Pinette) vanishes into thin air when he
is hit by a bus, as though even director Garry Marshall realized there was
no screen time to spare.
     For a film overflowing with diversions, DEAR GOD is far from
overflowing with laughs.  Since none of the business swirling around the
actual plot of DEAR GOD is remotely funny, Marshall spends most of the
film finding places to insert random celebrities.  Here we have a holiday
parade featuring Tony Danza, David Hasselhoff and (pulled out of
mothballs) "Happy Days'" Erin Moran; there we have Jack Klugman as a
suicidal old man.  Here we have Dr. Joyce Brothers appearing on
television; there we have O. J. Simpson prosecutor Christopher Darden as a
court broadcaster.  Even Marshall himself gets in on the act, appearing as
the Postmaster General.  The effect of these cameos is not simply to
distract you from what the film is about, but to convince you that they
_are_ what the film is about.  DEAR GOD may begin as a comedy, but it
rapidly turns into a bus tour of Hollywood where the only response it
inspires is pointing and giggling every time a familiar face appears.
     There are a few amusing bits in the courtroom finale which finds Tom
on trial for tampering with the mail, notably a goofy piece of acting by
Metcalf which at least will shake you out of your stupor.  When we are
expected to get emotionally roused, however, by the fact that every postal
worker in Southern California is rallying behind Tom (none of the people
helped by the "God Squad" appears to give a damn), you wonder if anyone
has any control over where DEAR GOD is going.  You might find yourself
wishing it would turn into the re-hash of MIRACLE ON 34th STREET it seems
headed for, so that at least it might make _cliched_ sense, only you
wouldn't be surprised to find Lance Ito turning up as the judge, or Buddy
Hackett as Kris Kringle.

Title
Review for Groove (2000)
GROOVE
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Lola Glaudini, Hamish Linklater, Denny Kirkwood, Mackenzie
Firgens, Steve Van Wormer, Vince Riverside, Rachel True.
Screenplay:  Greg Harrison.
Producers:  Greg Harrison and Danielle Renfrew.
Director:  Greg Harrison.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  86 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     That uniquely fin-de-siecle phenomenon known as the "rave" gets its
sociological moment in the sun in GROOVE, a film that will be more
effective as cultural curiosity a few years hence than it is as a story
today. Greg Harrison's episodic tale opens with a group of self-styled San
Francisco party masters, led by Ernie (Steve Van Wormer), selecting an
abandoned warehouse for the following night's party. Then the word goes
out to email and pagers, bringing together a collection of characters for
dancing into the wee hours. Colin (Denny Kirkwood) brings along his more
straight-laced brother David (Hamish Linklater), who expects he'll want to
leave early. Colin also brings along his girlfriend Harmony (Mackenzie
Firgens), to whom he intends to propose, while David hooks up with
recently transplanted New Yorker Leyla (Lola Glaudini). As the DJs spin
on, so do their stories and several others spin along for 86 minutes.
     That time is moderately well-spent as an introduction to the rave
sub-culture. Harrison drops in a few bits of memorable lingo ("buying a
vowel" for purchasing either acid or Ecstasy; "the nod" for the
party-goer's acknowledgement of the party-thrower's success; "baked,
not fried" for one fellow's expressed preference for marijuana over
hallucinogens) to set the scene without stranding newcomers in the 
minutia. There's a funny scene in which a relatively inexperienced DJ
(Bing Ching) shakes his head at the expertise of a pro, and another in
which the uptight David assumes Leyla is offering him drugs when she's
offering him earplugs. From the dance floor to the fruit-and-water-stocked
"chill room," GROOVE re-creates its unique world as effectively as you
could hope for.
     Harrison then proceeds to populate that world with one unmemorable,
uninvolving character after another. Most of the narrative is spent on
David and Leyla, whose budding relationship is supposed to be the core of
the film but feels like just another drug-fueled party scam. Worse still
is the contrived drama in the relationship between Colin and Harmony,
which takes a "hip," independent film sort of turn for the worse. There
are other sub-plots, including the inability of a gay couple to find the
party location, but they offer little to latch on to. The acting is
servicable at best, the characterizations not even that. GROOVE is
composed entirely of people doing the sort of thing one sees people do at
raves, played with all the energy and commitment of people playing types
-- you're the uncomfortable geek, you're the dealer, you're the party
princess, and so on.
     The issue isn't that GROOVE meanders along in its night-in-the-life
way without trying to be particularly profound. DAZED AND CONFUSED and
AMERICAN GRAFFITI were charming studies of its era's revellers, and no one
much cared if an epiphany was to be found. Both of those films, however,
had the benefit of a nostalgic distance, allowing both film-maker and
audience to recognize the silliness inherent in youthful celebration. Greg
Harrison is too serious about this milieu; he seems to be making the
suggestion that kids really have found party nirvana this time, not like
those goofy kids of the '60s, '70s and '80s. It's no wonder the characters
are irrelevant; Harrison just needed bodies to jump up and down to the
beat. His take on the rave scene, detailed though it may be, isn't DAZED
AND CONFUSED for the '90s. It's THANK GOD IT'S FRIDAY for the '90s.

Title
Review for Van, The (1996)
     In Stephen Frears' THE VAN, unemployed Dubliners Bimbo Reeves (Donal
O'Kelly) and his pal Larry (Colm Meany) refurbish a run-down
fish-and-chips van and take it on the road, moving from place to place in
search of a productive place to do a little business for a short time.
Appropriately enough, that's the way THE VAN wanders along as a narrative.
The previous installments in author Roddy Doyle's Barrytown Trilogy --
Alan Parker's 1991 THE COMMITMENTS and Frears' own 1994 adaptation of THE
SNAPPER -- each provided an anchoring element for Doyle's humorous
episodes and colorful characters.  Instead of THE COMMITMENTS' energetic
musical numbers or THE SNAPPER's sweet father-daughter relationship, THE
VAN offers under-developed nods to the embarrassment of unemployment and
nationalist pride in the Irish World Cup team.  After about forty-five
minutes, Doyle and Frears settle into a routine of self-contained
anecdotes suitable for Reader's Digest's "All in a Day's Work."  One or
two at a time, it's amusing to take in such "Honey, you won't believe the
day I had" tales.  Over the course of an hour and a half, the anecdotes
grow a bit wearying.
     THE VAN is certainly the least effective of the three cinematic
Barrytown tales, yet it is still manages to provide some high-spirited
entertainment.  Most of the credit goes to Meany and O'Kelly, a pair of
appealing protagonists who lend a flustered enthusiasm to most of their
scenes.  The humor comes as much from reaction as it does from situation
in THE VAN, with Meany able to sell small moments like his very logical
reaction to a customer who comes up 10 pence short for his burger (Meany
takes a 10-pence bite before handing over the food).  When THE VAN does
pay off with a big laugh, it makes you realize that it might have been
great fun to watch these same characters in a more consistent story.
Instead, we have a cinematic snack truck, offering a few tasty bites
rather than a truly satisfying meal.

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
WISHMASTER
(Live)
Starring:  Tammy Lauren, Andrew Divoff, Chris Lemmon, Robert Englund.
Screenplay:  Peter Atkins.
Producers:  Pierre David, Clark Peterson and Noel A. Zanitsch.
Director:  Robert Kurtzman.
MPAA Rating:  (graphic gore and violence, profanity)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I think it happened around 1973, with the release of THE EXORCIST,
though some might go back to NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD in 1968.  Prior to
that point, cinematic horror was generally restricted to innocuous
creature features and the occasional genuine thriller (PSYCHO, THE
HAUNTING) which was more in your head than in your face.  The phenomenal
success of THE EXORCIST changed all that, giving rise to the notion that
the way to shake up an audience was from the stomach out.  And so there
came TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE, and Brian DePalma's CARRIE, and John
Carpenter's HALLOWEEN, and a decade of slasher film wannabes too numerous
to count.  Special make-up effects became Hollywood's growth field of the
80s, turning experts like Dick Smith, Rick Baker, Rob Bottin and Tom
Savini into talent as hot as any star.  There was even one teen scream
film, HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO ME, which trumpeted in its ad campaign that it
contained some of "the most bizarre murders you will ever see."  The Cult
of the Gross-Out had been born, dedicated to the principle that if you
came up with new and innovative ways to hack the human body to ribbons,
they would come.
     WISHMASTER, a limp and generally tedious horror film about an ancient
Djinn (Andrew Divoff) accidentally released into modern-day America by a
jewelry appraiser (Tammy Lauren), would have no reason to exist if not to
show off a gaggle of grotesqueries:  skin flayed from flesh, a skeleton
tearing loose from its body, eviscerations by the cartload, cancerous
pustules erupting on a pharmacist's skin, all manner of creepy-crawlies
emerging from the orifices of human hosts, a face indented by an iron mace
like something out of a Warner Bros. cartoon, and a few garden-variety
shootings for street cred.  Director Robert Kurtzman -- a former
special-effects man handed a basic premise for a story (an ancient Djinn
loose in modern-day America), a budget and an R rating -- occasionally
stumbles across an innovative visual idea which doesn't involve exposing
anatomical features generally hidden from view.  More often, when in
doubt, he lets loose with the red Karo syrup.
     WISHMASTER also wouldn't exist without a few noteworthy antecedents
like "The Man in the Bottle" episode of the original "Twilight Zone" and
"The Monkey's Paw."  Screenwriter Peter Atkins seems convinced that his
notion of a malevolent genie is wildly original, and that the idea of that
genie providing literalist renderings of vague wishes is positively
ingenious.  In fact, the results of the wishes range from fairly
uninspired to purely plagiaristic (stop me if you've heard the one about
the guy who wishes for a million dollars, then has a family member with an
insurance policy die).  An original idea isn't necessary when you can take
an old one and spice it up with state-of-the-art viscera-spilling.
     Like far too many supernatural horror films, about half of
WISHMASTER's exposition seems devoted to explaining the detailed rules for
how the monster wreaks his havoc, how he can be destroyed, etc.  The good
news is that that exposition provides a few memorable moments for Jenny
O'Hara, sharp and sassy as the occult expert every monster movie needs.  
The bad news is that the whole business is pointless, a foolish stab at
internal logic in a genre where internal logic matters far less than what
kind of mayhem a Djinn can inflict when someone wishes for a "wild party."
Horror films can work when the people who make them display a sense for
the giddy catharsis of a good scare, but there's nothing scary about
WISHMASTER unless you count the half-dozen or so times the music cranks up
to a decibel level just this side of the Concorde.  It's just a humorless
display of special-effects prowess, the latest installment in the ongoing
game of "Can You Top This?" which all began when zombies noshed on human
femurs, or when Linda Blair first returned a can of pea soup whence it
came.

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
GONE IN SIXTY SECONDS
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Giovanni Ribisi, Angelina Jolie, Delroy Lindo, TJ
Cross, Chi McBride, Robert Duvall, Will Patton, William Lee Scott, Scott
Caan, James Duval, Timothy Olyphant, Christopher Eccleston, Vinnie Jones.
Screenplay:  Scott Rosenberg.
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer and Mike Stenson.
Director:  Dominic Sena.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In an ever-changing world, there's something understandably
comforting about the impressive sameness of Jerry Bruckheimer productions. 
Going back to his partnership with the late Don Simpson, Bruckheimer has
built an impressive 15-year resume of box office successes: BEVERLY HILLS
COP, TOP GUN, BAD BOYS, THE ROCK, CON AIR, ENEMY OF THE STATE, ARMAGEDDON. 
There's a formula to his films that has rarely let him down, a formula
that continues with nary a whiff of change in GONE IN SIXTY SECONDS. Since
this is a Bruckheimer film, you know you can count on ...
     1) A premise ready-made for action. Nicolas Cage stars as Randall
"Memphis" Raines, once the best "booster" in Southern California, now
retired. He's dragged back into his old trade when his younger brother Kip
(Giovanni Ribisi) screws up while attempting to follow in his footsteps,
leaving nasty crime boss Raymond Calitri (Christopher Eccleston) with an
attitude and a job still to be done. In order to save Kip's skin, Memphis
agrees to fulfill Kip's contract: stealing 50 high-end cars. 
Unfortunately, the delivery date is only three days away, leaving Memphis
with little time to put together his crew and scout out the job, all the
while trying to avoid an old law enforcement nemesis (Delroy Lindo) who's
breathing down his neck.
     2) A style that transcends individual directors. It doesn't matter
whether Bruckheimer's flavor of the month is Tony Scott, Michael Bay,
Simon West or SIXTY SECONDS' helmer Dominic Sena -- his films all seem to
look and sound exactly the same. Perhaps it's the fact that Bruckheimer is
attracted to directors whose background (like his) is in commercials and
music videos, making them likely to concur with his vision of glossy
packaging. Maybe he gets his people such great deals on orange lens
filters that it's impossible for those directors not to employ them for
every single shot. Whatever the reason, the quick-cuts, bombastic musical
scoring and burnished glow give Bruckheimer films that certain grandiose
flash that makes for action gold, even if nothing else makes much sense
because of 
     3) Over-stuffed scripts. In his recent efforts, Bruckheimer has shown
a distinct inability to strip down an action story to its essentials. GONE
IN SIXTY SECONDS is no exception, dragging the pacing down by cramming too
many characters into the narrative. That can result in absurd decisions
like creating a solid, vicious villain in Eccleston, then having his
character disappear for literally 80 minutes of the running time, or
similarly wasting the forceful presence of Vinnie Jones (as Memphis' mute,
muscular associate). It also results in conflicts constructed with a
faux-operatic sense of consequence. The family tension between Memphis and
Kip, the non-sparks between Memphis and his old flame/running partner Sway
(Angelina Jolie), even the history between Memphis and Lindo's determined
detective bog the film down with a ridiculous sense that the story should
be taken seriously, when it should be a quick and dirty piece of
crowd-pleasing nonsense. Those decisions are complicated, for better and
worse, by ...
     4) Provocative casting. Bruckheimer has shown himself to be a savvy
packager of talent in recent years, generally teaming up popular stars
with established "serious" actors for a sense of credibility: Tom Cruise
and Robert Duvall in DAYS OF THUNDER, Will Smith and Gene Hackman in ENEMY
OF THE STATE, Cage with Sean Connery in THE ROCK. Cage and Duvall are both
back for GONE IN SIXTY SECONDS, as is the characteristically diverse
Bruckheimer supporting cast. Somehow, it does make many of Bruckheimer's
films feel less awful than they should that there are fairly talented
actors involved (Cage's descent into genre nonchalance notwithstanding). 
It also seems even more pathetic when they are stuck with Scott Rosenberg
dialogue like "He's bad  he's real bad." Or, "How deep is he in?" "Deep." 
Or, "I'm not into the life any more." Of course, plenty of viewers will
still lap it all up because it all comes coated in ...
     5) Buckets full of testosterone. Eventually, Bruckheimer films do
move, albeit with a carefully constructed familiarity. The climactic car
chase in SIXTY SECONDS is a competent piece of film work, accentuated by
Sena's fetishistic cross-cutting to brakes and clutches, and a car jump as
aggressively improbable as anything since SPEED. It's simply obvious that
the whole film was constructed around that chase, making me wish the
film-makers could be more honest about their intentions instead of lobbing
a dozen pointless sub-plots at us. Those who have enjoyed most of
Bruckheimer's previous films aren't likely to look disdainfully at this
one, because it goes nowhere different. It's just another over-blown,
sporadically diverting celebration of guy stuff. The names have changed,
but the orange filters remain the same.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
L.A. CONFIDENTIAL
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, James Cromwell, David
Strathairn, Kim Basinger, Danny DeVito.
Screenplay:  Brian Helgeland and Curtis Hanson, based on the novel by
James Ellroy.
Producers:  Curtis Hanson, Arnon Milchan, Michael Nathanson.
Director:  Curtis Hanson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence, brief nudity)
Running Time:  140 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Early though it may be to make such a prediction, I'm going to do so:
no one will be more deserving of an Adapted Screenplay Oscar in 1997 than
Brian Helgeland and Curtis Hanson.  James Ellroy's 1990 novel "L.A.
Confidential" was 496 pages of sprawling, tangled plotting and a staccato
prose style in which entire chapters seemed to fly by without a single
verb rearing its active little head.  Even the author himself said he
didn't always know what was going on at any given time.  Hanson and
Helgeland took that narrative and tamed it into an intricate but
accessible crime drama.  They remained true to both the style and gritty
substance of the story while giving it the appeal of pop entertainment.
     Which is not to say that they have created an unqualified triumph.
L.A. CONFIDENTIAL is the kind of sturdy, satisfying studio vehicle which
turns up rarely enough that it's easy to mistake it for a minor
masterpiece.  It's well-crafted but never dazzling, consistently
interesting without being engrossing.  Helgeland and Hanson haven't
exactly taken an unfilmable novel and turned it into a classic.  They've
taken a novel which would have been a three hour art film and made a
140-minute mainstream multiplex success.
     Set in 1951-52, the bulk of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL focuses on Hollywood
police precinct filled with shady characters.  Det. Jack Vincennes (Kevin
Spacey) pays more attention to serving as technical advisor to a
"Dragnet"-style TV show and getting pay-offs from a tabloid reporter
(Danny DeVito) than he does to his job; Det. Bud White (Russell Crowe)
regularly beats uncooperative suspects into submission.  Into this world
steps Ed Exley (Guy Pearce), the son of a decorated cop who appears 
determined to do things by the book.  Unfortunately, the book doesn't
cover how to deal with complex cases like the mass slaying at the Nite Owl
diner, a case which turns out to have far broader implications than anyone
suspects.
     There's more than a whiff of CHINATOWN to L.A. CONFIDENTIAL -- it's
hard not to break into a chuckle when one character appears with a Jake
Gittes Memorial Nose Bandage -- but the story manages to stake out its
own unique territory in exposing the dark side of booming post-war Los
Angeles.  It does a particularly impressive job of hooking into the
relationship between high-profile crime and the media, skewering the
public's inexhaustible appetite for sordid tales about which they can feel
morally superior.  Curtis Hanson's direction manages to navigate a smart
path between the glossy image of Hollywood and the sleazy reality.  It's a
perfectly appropriate ambiguity that L.A. CONFIDENTIAL (photographed by
the talented Dante Spinotti) may be one of the best-looking films ever
made about ugly doings.
     It's also appropriate that the characters are similarly ambiguous,
complex people whose motivations are never as pure or as selfish as they
appear at first glance.  Another of the accomplishments in this fine
script is that those characters feel softer and more humanized than they
do in Ellroy's novel, easier to sympathize with.  Yet one of the problems
with L.A. CONFIDENTIAL is that while the characters are uniformly
well-acted and multi-dimensional, there's not enough time to get under the
skin of any one character.  We find ourselves surprised by some of the
decisions the characters make, but once we understand a single basic
motivation for each one there's not much left to learn about them.
Pearce, Crowe and Spacey do solid work with solid characters.  They're
never boring, and never fascinating.
     Hanson and Helgeland still do an impressive enough job that I
couldn't help wishing they had trusted their own skill with material a bit
more.  The plot twists of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL may be a lot to take in, but
not so much that they require the constant nudging the script and
direction provide.  Every character is identified in bold letters
(sometimes literally), every significant development is accompanied by a
flashback or wordy exposition to make sure we realize the significance,
and whole chunks of the film are summarized at various points like
chapter-ending Cliff's Notes.  It all gives a smart film the feeling that
it's not quite so smart after all, or that the audience isn't expected to 
be smart enough to figure it all out.  Perhaps when Mssrs. Helgeland and
Hanson are standing at the podium, trophies in hand, they'll realize what
they've accomplished.

Title
Review for Cabin Boy (1994)
Starring:  Chris Elliott, Ritch Brinkley, James Gammon, Brian
Doyle-Murray, Brion James, Melora Walters.
Screenplay/Director:  Adam Resnick.
     A couple of years ago, Chris Elliot and writer/director Adam
Resnick teamed up for a Fox television series called "Get a Life" which
lasted, oh, about three weeks.  I enjoyed its silly humor, but if the
microscopic ratings were any indication, the audience for Elliott's fey
goofball character was severely limited.  It's therefore hard to figure
why a studio would green-light a project like CABIN BOY, particularly
assuming anyone actually saw a script before shooting started.  CABIN
BOY is dumb even by the standards of a Chris Elliott project, depending
almost entirely on Elliott's dopey grin and taking far too long to get
to anything with any real wit.
     Elliott plays Nathanial Mayweather, an obnoxious and overly-
sheltered lad just out of prep school.  Looking for the ship which will
take him to his father's Hawaiian hotel, he instead mistakenly ends up
on board The Filthy Whore, a fishing boat with a considerably less
cultured crew:  Captain Greybar (Ritch Brinkley); Skunk (Brian
Doyle-Murray); Paps (James Gammon); and Big Teddy (Brion James).  The
salty fishermen are none-too-pleased with their prissy stowaway, but
they're even less pleased when he inadvertently causes the ship to end
up in Hell's Bucket.  There many dangers await, which Nathanial must
overcome to win the respect of his new comrades and the love of the
girl he pulls out of the ocean (Melora Walters) ... who, incidentally was
trying to set a world record for swimming across the ocean.
     CABIN BOY gets off to a bad start from which it never really
recovers.  This includes a prologue at the prep school which seems to
last about twice as long as the ten minutes it actually is.  Elliott
adopts a supremely annoying quasi-Brahmin accent that makes most of his
dialogue grating, and makes about twelve jokes too many based on
Nathanial's condescension toward common folk.  Then we get a bizarre
cameo by David Letterman, which is almost funny simply for its bald
refusal to disguise his regular TV personality.  In a film which runs
under eighty minutes, a tedious set-up is more than a hindrance ...
it's a pre-emptive first strike.
     Once CABIN BOY hits open water (or at least as open as it gets on
the sound stage), it's no longer actively annoying.  It's also not much
more funny.  Elliott's schtick always tends to the surreal, but as
weird as things get, they remain curiously uninteresting.  Among the
loopy perils of Hell's Bucket are a stop-motion living glacier, a giant
appliance salesman and a half-man/half-shark called Chocki (played by
Russ Tamblyn).  If any of that sounds funny on paper, well, it did to
me, too.  It's the execution that fails.  While the bargain basement
production values might be endearing to some, I found the visual gags
in CABIN BOY painfully unfunny.  Some of the verbal bits work, but in
their rarity I hesitate to spoil them.
     I think one of the main reasons CABIN BOY comes up short is that
it is so obviously a Chris Elliott vanity project.  The four fishermen
are virtually interchangeable characters; not one of them is given a
distinct comic personality out of which some humor could arise.  There
is a glimpse of what could have been in the character of the impossibly
dense first cabin boy, who has a few brief scenes worth a chuckle or
two, but he soon disappears.  Melora Walters as Trina is only asked to
react, which is fortunate because she has about as much presence as a
slight breeze.  Almost every punch line is Elliott's, and a little of
him can go a very long way.  His comic vision is certainly unique, and
viewers perfectly attuned to a mind that concocts a giant talking
cupcake that spits tobacco might have much more fun with CABIN BOY than
I had.  However, I suspect a larger percentage will find it slow going,
and exceedingly short on solid laughs.
     Like caviar, Chris Elliott is an acquired taste.  Also like
caviar, he should probably only be digested in very small portions.
CABIN BOY was just too much for me to swallow.

Title
Review for That Darn Cat (1997)
     Just so our points of reference are clear, the original THAT DARN CAT
was hardly a classic.  The folks at Disney have been using that word as
though they have a trademark on it, tossing it at everything it has ever
committed to celluloid and becoming their own worst enemies as these
"classics" are remade as gaudy nonsense like 101 DALMATIANS.  1965's THAT
DARN CAT, however, was simply a cute little caper featuring Disney's two
principal live-action studio players of the 1960s, Dean Jones and Hayley
Mills, and hardly a sacred treasure.  The second life of THAT DARN CAT
is very different from the first, but it's hard to say whether it is an
improvement.  It is a strange sort of family film: clever and amusing in
some surprising ways, but disappointing at delivering the goods to keep
the kids entertained.
     Christina Ricci stars as Patti Randall, a somewhat sullen teenager
growing disgusted with her sleepy Massachusetts town of Edgefield.  Her
best -- in fact, only -- friend is her cat D. C., a frisky feline with a
nose for trouble.  During one of his midnight wanderings, D. C. comes upon
the hideout where a kidnapped woman (Rebecca Koon) is being held.  The
woman is able to slip her wristwatch over D. C.'s neck with a message
scratched on the back, and when Patti discovers the watch she sees a
chance for a little adventure.  She takes the watch to the F.B.I., where
the task of following up is assigned to rookie agent Zeke Kelso (Doug E.
Doug).  Kelso and his team attempt to follow D. C. to find out where the
kidnapped woman might be, but keeping up with that darn cat is easier said
than done, particularly in a town not nearly as sleepy as Patti might
think.
     The script for THAT DARN CAT is attributed to "S. M. Alexander and L.
A. Karaszewski," better known to credits-watchers as Scott Alexander and
Larry Karaszewski, the team behind the oddball bio-pics ED WOOD and THE
PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT.  You can certainly see those bloodlines in the
eccentric characters who populate the film, and who give Edgefield its
edge.  A lonely old woman (Estelle Parsons) makes prank phone calls from
her room; two rival service station owners (John Ratzenberger and Mark
Christopher Lawrence) engage in guerrilla warfare against each other's
shops.  There are brothers Melvin and Marvin (Thomas F. Wilson and Brian
Haley), two over-zealous security guards, and homely butcher Lu (Megan
Cavanagh), who delivers her affections to Melvin in the form of tender
cuts of meat.  Even Dean Jones himself turns up as a flat-broke former
millionaire, with Dyan Cannon as his cosmetic surgery-obsessed wife.  And
we haven't even mentioned Doug E. Doug's twitchy turn as the F.B.I. agent,
whose facial tics grow a bit aggravating but is simply hilarious when he
goes into full prowl mode in his attempt to "think like a cat."
     That's quite a switch from the 1965 version, where the cat had
infinitely more personality than any human in the film.  I'm also not sure
that was a wise decision.  The cat in the new THAT DARN CAT actually plays
a fairly miniscule role in the proceedings, and while that leaves plenty
of goofy goings-on which might entertain adults, kids may be somewhat
disappointed by the film.  Director Bob Spiers (British television's
"Absolutely Fabulous" and "Fawlty Towers") maintains a fairly languid pace
for much of THAT DARN CAT's running time, focusing on quirky character
vignettes rather than funny feline frolicking.  In fact, there's no
particular reason for a cat to have anything to do with this plot; it
would have been just as easy for Patti to find the watch herself and
gradually discover the dark side of Edgefield.  Spiers does pull out some
strange and original physical comedy, like Agent Kelso's unexplained 
ability to do a gravity-defying backflip over a fence or his enthusiastic
dive into a garbage bin, but most of the humor comes from silly behavior
which might leave the little ones restless or unimpressed.
     Spiers suddenly seems to become aware of the relative absence of
broad, fast-paced slapstick in the final twenty minutes, which consist
almost entirely of an extended car chase between Patti and Kelso and the
kidnapers.  After 70 minutes with scarcely a bit of John Hughes-ian
bodily injury humor to be found, THAT DARN CAT turns into "The Dukes of
Hazard," with cars flying through the air, glass shattering and gas
stations exploding into a fireworks display.  Yet even during that chase,
Alexander and Karaszewski are able to toss in bizarre asides like the
mourner who watches a coffin spring open and exclaims, "That's not him!"
THAT DARN CAT makes some unfortunate choices -- particularly turning the
search for the kidnapers into a mystery which results in a predictable 
"Scooby-Doo" style unmasking -- but for a remake of a Disney film from an
era which thrived on formula, this DARN CAT is surprisingly unpredictable.
If this were not the kind of film where most of the audience _wants_
predictability, that quality alone would be enough to recommend it.  It
pains me not to recommend THAT DARN CAT, a film which would be a welcome
change of pace for any parent who has had to sit through hyperactive
kiddie fare like 101 DALMATIANS or SPACE JAM.  I only wish it had more
energy, more for the children, more of that darn cat.  It could have been
one of the rare live action Disney films to deserve the term "classic."

Title
Review for Don Quixote (1992)
     On and off for seventeen years, Orson Welles, worked on an
adaptation of Cervantes' DON QUIXOTE.  While he worked on other
projects, he would shoot pieces of DON QUIXOTE here and there, in the
hope that some day he would have the financing necessary to complete
the project.  However, the film was not complete when Welles died in
1985.  In 1992, a Spanish team undertook the project of turning the
existing footage into a completed film.  They have done Welles' memory
a tremendous disservice in the process.  DON QUIXOTE is a monumental
disappointment, with only glimpses of Welles' brilliance emerging from
an exercise in editing butchery.
     Welles' DON QUIXOTE opens with the familiar story of the Spanish
nobleman (Francisco Reiguera) who becomes fascinated with the tales of
chivalry he reads about in novels.  He decides that he is to become a
knight errant himself, and, accompanied by his squire Sancho Panza
(Akim Tamiroff), sets off to do great deeds in the name of his
idealized love Dulcinea.  Soon, however, Don Quixote comes into
conflict not only with sheep and windmills, but with the modern world.
Sancho runs with the bulls in Pamplona, discovers television, and even
finds himself being captured on film by the great director Orson
Welles.
     This collision of eras is the heart of Welles' vision for DON
QUIXOTE, and to the extent that it survives the film is thought-
provoking.  It becomes an instant validation of Quixote's belief that
through his exploits as a knight errant, he might achieve some measure
of immortality.  And we see that this is what has occurred; Welles
skillfully frames shots that include a billboard for "Don Quixote
Cerveza" and the Restaurante Don Qixote, emphasizing the character's
nature as an icon.  He is not an object of ridicule, but a dreamer to
be respected for being true to his vision.  As Welles places himself in
the narrative, we also see how he identifies with the knight, and
considers his own immortality through his filmmaking.
     Unfortunately, DON QUIXOTE takes nearly an hour to get to its
contemporary setting, and that hour occasionally borders on the
unwatchable.  It is not simply that the quality of the print is
sometimes horrible.  There is simply no rhythm to the story, and it
feels for all the world like pieces of film stuck together at random.
As striking as some of Welles' images are, editing director Jess Franco
simply had no idea what to do with them, and apparently even changed
some of the editing Welles *had* managed to complete before his death.
     Another huge problem with the film involves the dialogue dubbing.
Although two other actors portray Don Quixote and Sancho Panza, their
parts were filmed silent, with Welles himself to dub both voices.
However, only portions of Welles' dialogue were recorded, and where his
dialogue doesn't exist, two other actors were used to provide the
voices.  Not only is the shift between Welles' voice and that of two
other men jarring, but the two other actors do not even come close to
the spirit of the vocal performances Welles was providing.  Don Quixote
and Sancho Panza are not even the same characters from one scene to the
next, and at times the appalling modern voiceovers are simply
laughable.
     The version of DON QUIXOTE which screened at San Jose's Cinequest
Film Festival is not the same as the one which made its American
premiere at the Museum of Modern Art.  Oja Kodar, Welles' companion
during the last years of his life, and frequent Welles cinematographer
Gary Graber trimmed a 113-minute version to just under 90 minutes, and
it would be an easy knock at the film to say that any changes which
made it shorter still would be a further improvement.  But there's
really no way of knowing, and that's the real point.  Using guesswork
and very little talent, a bunch of well-intentioned film buffs tried to
piece together a lot of raw footage into something resembling the work
of one of the greatest filmmakers of all time.  They failed.

Title
Review for Michael Jordan to the Max (2000)
MICHAEL JORDAN TO THE MAX
(Giant Screen Sports/NBA Entertainment)
Featuring:  Michael Jordan; narrated by Laurence Fishburne.
Producers:  Don Kempf, Steve Kempf and James D. Stern.
Directors:  James D. Stern and Don Kempf.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated
Running Time:  45 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     An important note, first of all, about the context in which your
humble narrator viewed MICHAEL JORDAN TO THE MAX: The Super Screen theater
in my home turf of Salt Lake City is operated by local auto dealership
tycoon Larry H. Miller. Miller also happens to be the owner of the Utah
Jazz, and he had set up the local premiere of the film as a thank you for
employees of the Jazz organization and their families. Never mind that the
night of the screening would have been a playoff game for the Jazz had 
they not been eliminated earlier in the week; never mind that Michael
Jordan had chosen as his grand farewell to basketball beating those same
Jazz in the 1998 NBA finals with a spectacular final minute of Game 6.
These were basketball fans -- how could they not appreciate a tale of the
greatest basketball player yet to walk the earth?
     It is testimony to the astonishing appeal of Michael Jordan that even
those partisans who should despise him still can't help admiring him. He
is the sort of larger-than-life figure it seems was born for a big screen
documentary -- and in a very limited sense, that's true. MICHAEL JORDAN TO
THE MAX focuses on Jordan's final title run with the Chicago Bulls in
1998, making stops for highlights of that year's four playoff series.
Interspersed with those highlights, accompanied by commentary from
sportscasters and former coaches and teammates, are tales from throughout
Jordan's life: his failure to make his high school varsity team; his
national championship-winning shot as a freshman at the University of
North Carolina; his father's murder in 1993; and his 1994-95 retirement
from basketball to pursue his dream of playing professional baseball.
     Directors James D. Stern and Don Kempf open the film with a shot of
Jordan alone in a gym, soaring through the air for a dunk while the camera
sweeps around him in three dimensions, MATRIX-style. The tone is set for a
story of Jordan the myth, Jordan the super-hero, which is primarily what
MICHAEL JORDAN TO THE MAX delivers. The early moments of the film touch on
pieces that added to his mystique. There's the pounding theme of the Alan
Parsons Project's "Mammagamma" that made Chicago Bull player introductions
a spectacle unto itself. There's the statue outside Chicago's United
Center, a bronze of Jordan flying over a defender rendered as a shapeless
mass with a helplessly outstretched arm. And there's a montage of Jordan's
legacy of ridiculous, physics-defying shots. He's such an unearthly
presence in the film that I began to believe he could change history --
even though I knew Chicago had lost one of the playoff games featured, I
was still surprised that the last-second shot Jordan took to win the game
didn't actually go in.
     If all one was looking for from MICHAEL JORDAN TO THE MAX was a sense
of his legend writ two stories high, I suppose you could say it was an
unqualified success. But there's such an emphasis on Jordan's inhuman will
to win that his humanity isn't often in evidence. Sure, there are scenes
of Jordan fooling around with kids at a basketball camp, and an effective
sequence capturing the ever-present crush of fans that made his every
movement a running of the gauntlet. There's just not much sense of what
makes Jordan tick. Even when the player himself speaks, it's primarily in
the well-rehearsed platitudes of a professional athlete: "I never doubted
myself;" "You have to pursue your dream;" etc. It's a shock when we see
Jordan getting misty-eyed while discussing his relationship with his
father, because it's such an unusually unguarded moment. MICHAEL JORDAN TO
THE MAX is content primarily to keep the audience at an admiring
arm's-length distance.
     It may be unreasonable to expect a piercingly insightful documentary
in this particular format. IMAX presentations have carved out visions of
the awe-inspiring as their unique dominion, and Jordan certainly fits that
description. Yet the film-makers even miss an opportunity to take
advantage of the format during their game footage. Instead of taking
viewers into the center of real-time basketball games -- in effect,
allowing them to be on the court with the legend -- Kempf and Stern use
slow-motion for most of their game shots. They don't even bother to
maintain chronology within individual games (one disadvantage of the big
screen is that you can see the scoreboard in virtually every shot, making
it obvious when the film has jumped back a quarter or two just for the
sake of a cool image). MICHAEL JORDAN TO THE MAX is all about its star
power, the kind that even appeals to a theater full of Jazz fans who would
wish for a different kind of changed history. As a big-screen experience,
it's all about keeping a hero larger than life.

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
     Watch Radha Mitchell long enough, and I'll bet you'll start seeing a
young Mariel Hemingway.  Watch HIGH ART long enough, and I'll bet you'll
start seeing a heroin-chic spin on PERSONAL BEST.  The "lesbian awakening"
genre may hardly rival the mis-matched buddy comedy in sheer weight of
numbers, but the conventions are just as conventional in their own way:
wide-eyed naif, experienced older woman, tentative first steps, heartfelt
discusson over what the wide-eyed naif really wants, oppressive
earnestness.  Been there, done that, seen it all.
     There's one thing in HIGH ART, however, that I can virtually
guarantee you haven't seen before:  Ally Sheedy as a Serious Actress.
Sheedy plays Lucy Berliner, a one-time shining star in New York photo art
circles who burned out and disappeared for over a decade.  Now living with
her heroin-addicted lover Greta (Patricia Clarkson) and a cadre of
perpetually stoned hangers-on, Lucy is inadertently re-discovered by her
downstairs neighbor Syd (Radha Mitchell), who also happens to be a young
assistant editor for a classy photo journal.  Realizing she's on to a
career-making scoop, Syd begins working with Lucy on a new layout, only to
find her fascination growing more personal and less professional with each
passing day.
     Sheedy's performance alone is nearly enough to recommend HIGH ART,
and you can color me as stunned as anyone that you're reading those words.
Sheedy inhabits the character -- a woman who wants to return to her art
but doesn't know if her past will permit it -- with an intensity only
autobiographical subtext can provide sometimes.  The impish grin of the
teen star of WARGAMES and THE BREAKFAST CLUB now nestles in the lines of a
haggard, drawn, aged-beyond-her-years face; you can see the spark under
there somewhere, ready for an opportunity to burst out.  The performance
is never showy, but Sheedy manages to capture both the resigned
co-dependence in her relationship with Greta (played by Clarkson as a
mumbling black hole of self-pity) and the glimmer of hope she sees for a
new life.
     Sadly, the rest of Lisa Cholodenko's script -- an inexplicable
award-winner at Sundance -- strands Sheedy's performance in a sea of
cliches and muddled relationships.  It also makes Syd's sexual awakening
the center of the story, then fails to develop the character with anything
near the necessary depth.  Everything about HIGH ART tells us we should
understand Syd's ambition, her emptiness, her readiness to be part of
Lucy's wasteland milieu, but Cholodenko assumes too much and shows too
little.  Even worse off is Gabriel Mann as Syd's stick-figure boyfriend,
who exists entirely to give Syd someone to argue with.  Like too many
screenwriters, Cholodenko assumes that situation will carry the story,
leaving us with characters whose relationsihps feel like plot devices.
Though the seedy art-clique atmosphere adds a different dynamic, HIGH ART
is still a formulaic film with little dramatic urgency.  The urgency that
does emerge comes entirely from Ally Sheedy, whose own awakening provides
a far more fascinating story than the one Cholodenko wrote.

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
(Sony Pictures Classics)
Starring:  Chris Cooper, Elizabeth Pena, Joe Morton, Clifton James, Miriam
Colon, Ron Canada, Kris Kristofferson, Matthew McConaughey.
Screenplay:  John Sayles.
Director:  John Sayles.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     This is how far I trust John Sayles' skill as a writer:  in the few
hours after I saw LONE STAR, when I couldn't quite get the pieces to fit
together, I figured _I_ had to be missing something.  Perhaps more than
any other filmmaker's next project, I look forward to the next John Sayles
project like a Christmas gift.  While he is still growing as a director,
his scripts are so unapologetically and relentlessly literate -- and
literary -- that unwrapping them is its own kind of pleasure.  LONE STAR,
as much as any film of the last several years, is a novel on the screen,
and a marvelous one.  When I finally did put those pieces together, I
realized how justified my faith had been.
     LONE STAR takes place in the Texas border town of Frontera, where two
men make a discovery near a former Army firing range:  a human skeleton
which appears to be the remains of Charley Wade (Kris Kristofferson), the
corrupt sheriff who used to run Frontera with an iron hand and an open
pocket.  The discovery is of great interest to current sheriff Sam Deeds
(Chris Cooper), whose late father Buddy followed Charley as sheriff and
became a beloved figure.  But Sam's own feelings about Buddy are
ambivalent, and when he begins to believe that Buddy might have been the
man who killed Charley Wade, he becomes determined to find out the truth.
That quest has Sam crossing paths with several townspeople, including
Pilar Cruz (Elizabeth Pena), a high school teacher and Sam's old flame;
mayor Hollis Page (Clifton James), formerly one of Charley's deputies; and
bar owner Otis Payne (Ron Canada).  Each one holds part of the key to a
forty year old mystery.
     On its most basic level, LONE STAR is a superbly acted study of life
in a border town.  The cast is uniformly in tune with Sayles' naturalistic
style, particularly Chris Cooper in a subtle but powerful performance as
Sam; even Frances McDormand, as Sam's manic-depressive ex-wife, lends
humanity to an edgy role in her single scene.  The multi-ethnic cast
provides a solid foundation for an examination of a place where the
"melting pot" is anything but.  The white townspeople feel overrun by the
Mexican-Americans, the blacks only feel comfortable in Otis' roadhouse,
and even some Mexican-American's like Pilar's restauranteur mother
Mercedes (Miriam Colon)express disdain for recent illegal immigrants and
their failure to assimilate.  It is a place which, while less overtly
racist than it was during Charley Wade's reign in the 1950s, is still
characterized by an omnipresent sense of "us" and "them."
     That is one of two crucial sub-texts of LONE STAR, both of which are
intrinsic to its South Texas setting.  This is a story about borders of
all kinds, set in a town which is named after the Spanish word for
"border."  Fathers and sons are divided by old emotional wounds, lovers
are separated by race, and everyone seems to be separated from the truth
by pre-conceptions about what the truth should be.  And that is the other
thread running through LONE STAR:  the nature of history.  In an early
scene, parents of various ethnicities sit in Pilar's classroom arguing
over the way she is teaching the Battle of the Alamo, the white parents
attacking her for suggesting that there is another perspective from which
it could be viewed.  The idea that history is personal is troubling,
because it destabilizes the past, and when history has crossed over into
legend, there will be many who prefer solidity.  That is the truth Sam
discovers as his investigation challenges the memory of his legendary
father:  myth has a power which simple facts cannot hope to match.
     These rich themes were always evident as I watched LONE STAR, but I
was bothered by a seemingly tangential sub-plot involving Otis Payne's
estranged son Del (Joe Morton), returned to Frontera with his family after
many years to act as commanding officer at the local army base.  Then,
finally, I saw it as absolutely crucial.  Del, like Sam, harbors
resentment towards his father; unlike Sam, his father is still alive.
Sam's investigation can only bring him so close to Buddy, and it is
telling that Buddy (played by Matthew McConaughey) appears only briefly in
the flashbacks which Sayles weaves through LONE STAR.  Sam and Buddy
are separated by an uncrossable border -- the border of history -- while
Del finds himself with a chance to be re-united with his father.  At times
it seems that Sayles is suggesting that the only history that has a chance
of being re-interpreted is the history which has yet to be created.
     LONE STAR is a haunting film, which deals with unexpectedly delicate
subject matter with startling confidence.  The experience of watching the
film sticks with me because I didn't just sit through two hours of film; I
was reading people's lives.  That is the kind of filmmaker John Sayles is:
an author with a camera.

Title
Review for Clean Slate (1994)
Starring:  Dana Carvey, Valeria Golino, James Earl Jones, Michael Gambon,  
Kevin Pollak, Michael Murphy. 
Screenplay:  Robert King. 
Director:  Mick Jackson. 
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw. 
     When I stepped into the theater to see CLEAN SLATE, I had yet to see  
any evidence that Dana Carvey might actually be capable of acting.  In  
fact, he seemed incapable of anything but the broadest schtick.  His  
"Saturday Night Live" characters were usually caricatures, and the  
WAYNE'S WORLD films and the horrible OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS simply  
regurgitated those characters.  So it qualifies as one of the most  
unexpected surprises of the year that CLEAN SLATE turns out to be an  
absolutely delightful comedy.  As improbable as the concept might seem,  
director Mick Jackson (THE BODYGUARD) reins in Carvey's tendency towards  
excess and gives him a real character to work with, and the chance to  
generate big laughs. 
     Carvey plays M. L. Pogue, a small-time private eye with a big-time  
problem.  As the result of an explosion, Pogue suffers from a unique form  
of amnesia which causes him to wake up every morning with no memory of  
anything which has taken place before he fell asleep.  That proves a  
hindrance professionally, as he is supposed to testify against  
criminally-connected businessman Cornell (Michael Gambon), but can't  
remember his testimony.  It's also problematic personally, as he seems to  
be involved with at least two women, one of whom (Valeria Golino) is  
supposed to be dead.  With every passing day, Pogue's mystery continues-- 
and deepens--until he finds that he can't trust anyone. 
     CLEAN SLATE is so full of unpredictable pleasures that it's  
difficult to know where to begin.  The greatest is probably the  
performance of Carvey, in a role analagous in many ways to Bill Murray's  
in GROUNDHOG DAY.  Like Phil Connor, Pogue is trapped in a cycle of  
repetition and confusion, except that Pogue is the only one who *doesn't*  
know what's going on; like Murray, Carvey gets a chance to play some low- 
key scenes that prove he doesn't always have to be a class clown.  He  
gets to play several hysterical scenes based on Pogue's need to improvise  
every encounter with his friends (including James Earl Jones as a  
wheelchair-bound district attorney, Kevin Pollak as Pogue's jealous best  
friend, and Michael Murphy as his doctor), including a surprise birthday  
party and his eventual testimony against Cornell.  However, Carver is  
equally affecting in moments such as his reaction to discovering that he  
might be a father, and trying desperately to remember a woman he thinks  
he loves.  The nature of Pogue's condition inevitably limits his  
character development, but merely watching Carvey react to that situation  
is endlessly entertaining. 
     But there is virtually nothing about CLEAN SLATE which isn't quirky,  
off-handed and charming.  Screenwriter Robert King has filled this film  
with bits that come out of left field, like the sequence where Pogue and  
his mysterious client attempt to escape Cornell's henchmen with well- 
aimed rocks, or a couple of unexplained moments when Pogue demonstrates  
martial arts skills, or Pogue's dog, who suffers from a lack of depth  
perception.  Director Jackson complements the weirdness with visual  
throwaways like the neck brace James Earl Jones' character wears with a  
hole for his tie to come through, and the Band-Aid Carvey sports through  
out the film.  CLEAN SLATE is that rare comedy which simply never goes  
exactly where you expect it to go. 
     All this would be quite enough to recommend CLEAN SLATE, but it also  
provides a neatly-polotted little mystery.  Occasionally it feels as  
though King and Jackson are trying to throw in a bit too much (the  
character of Pogue's ex-wife is particularly unnecessary), which  
sidetracks the film's energy.  However, at the end of CLEAN SLATE I was  
left without a single plausibility problem. 
     In the 24 hours since I saw CLEAN SLATE, bits and pieces have popped  
into my head constantly, prompting spontaneous laughter, and it just  
keeps growing on me.  It wouldn't be surprising, given Carvey's track  
record and an advertising campaign which can't do it justice, to see  
CLEAN SLATE make a quick exit from theaters.  Then again, there might  
just be one more surprise coming. 

Title
Review for Misrables, Les (1998)
LES MISERABLES (1998)
(Columbia/Mandalay)
Starring:  Liam Neeson, Geoffrey Rush, Uma Thurman, Claire Danes, Hans
Matheson.
Screenplay:  Rafael Yglesias, based on the novel by Victor Hugo.
Producers:  Sarah Radcliffe and James Gorman.
Director:  Bille August.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  131 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I've been hearing people refer to the new film adaptation of LES
MISERABLES as "Lay Miz," which goes to show what the common frame of
reference is going to be.  That abbreviated moniker comes, of course, from
Alain Boublil and Claude-Michel Schonberg's immensely popular musical
adaptation, which has been selling out theaters around the world for over
a decade.  Millions of people already know the story of a convict named
Jean Valjean, whose twenty year struggle to build a new life after his
release from prison is thwarted repeatedly by a monomaniacal police
inspector named Javert.  They already know of the romance between
Valjean's adopted daughter Cosette and a rebel leader named Marius.  They
already know of a civil war in the Paris streets somewhere beyond the
barricades.  They know all this not so much because they are familiar with
Victor Hugo's novel, but because of that musical with its signature
waif-and-tricolor iconography.
     Bille August's straightforward rendering of LES MISERABLES makes you
realize exactly why the story works so well as grand opera.  The
screenplay by Rafael Yglesias (FEARLESS) efficiently streamlines the
narrative, following Valjean (Liam Neeson) from his conversion at the
hands of a kindly bishopto his life as a businessman and mayor to his
decade hiding out in a Paris convent, all the while hounded by the
relentless, unforgiving Javert (Geoffrey Rush).  Along the way he cares
for a destitute young woman named Fantine (Uma Thurman), and eventually
becomes the guardian of Fantine's daughter Cosette (Claire Danes).
     The film is certainly faithful to most basic events of the novel,
though it cuts certain characters entirely and chops other encounters down
to a bare minimum.  It's not textual fidelity which is lacking in LES
MISERABLES; it's emotional scope.  Virtually every scene feels muted, the
passions tamed to a state of dignified dissatisfaction.  What LES
MISERABLES really needed was for someone, anyone, to break into song.  The
stage production captured the sweeping melodrama of Hugo brilliantly --
the battles carried a tragic grandeur, the conflicts shook the foundations
of society, and the deaths were moments to jerk tears from the driest
eyes.  There is no substitute for the kind of dramatic economy music or a
well-constructed song can provide; three minutes of furtive conversation
between Cosette and Marius (Hans Matheson) can't create nearly the
convincing sense of love at first sight that three minutes of "In My Life"
does.  The film seems to have been crafted and edited strictly to make
sure certain necessary plot details were included, with little interest in
building momentum towards a cathartic release.
     From a certain standpoint -- one with no musical preconceptions in
the way -- LES MISERABLES is perfectly effective as period drama, and a
fine introduction to the classic story.  Technical credits are first rate,
with costumes by the gifted Gabriella Pesucci (THE AGE OF INNOCENCE) and
effective recreations of 19th century Paris.  The exceptional cast does
generally sharp work, particularly Rush in a more interesting and subtle
performance than his Oscar-winning showcase of tics and flourishes in
SHINE.  Often, however, it feels as though August is keeping them all on a
leash, eschewing musical theater in favor of "Masterpiece Theater."
There's no real power to the film, nothing which suggest the popular
response inspired by the musical.  I suspect that the only viewers who
will be genuinely satisfied with LES MISERABLES are those who don't come
in with radically different expectations in mind...expectations most
succinctly expressed by the two syllables "Lay Miz."

Title
Review for Gray's Anatomy (1996)
     The first five minutes of GRAY'S ANATOMY are as squirm-inducing as
any five minutes of film you'll see this year.  In a series of
black-and-white talking head interviews, people describe every possible
horror which could befall the human eye, including close calls with Super
Glue, aneurisms and inch-long shards of metal.  Though nothing is
graphically depicted, the descriptions are detailed enough to give a
surgeon chills.  It's a sensational set-up for an examination of the
fragility of vision; if you've never worried about going blind before, you
may be inspired to start.
     Spalding Gray had to worry about it, and for all I know it was very
traumatic.  That's certainly not the impression you get from GRAY'S
ANATOMY, however.  GRAY'S ANATOMY is a staged monologue about Gray's
experience dealing with a retinal disorder called a macular pucker,
particularly the various alternative treatments he explores in an attempt
to avoid surgery.  Gray is one of America's finest story-tellers, and some
of the stories about Native American sweat lodges and obsessive
nutritionists are quite entertaining.  But the story-telling is very
detached; Gray's milieu is the ironic observation, not the soul-baring
revelation.  It's true that plenty of frightening things seem ridiculous
with hindsight, but Gray shows us all the ridiculousness with little of
the fear.  The whole ordeal seems more like an amusing inconvenience than
an existential crisis.
     GRAY'S ANATOMY feels even more detached because of the way director
Steven Soderbergh has chosen to stage it.  This is the third of Gray's
monologues to receive a film treatment, but it is the first to be filmed
without a live audience.  The advantage of that choice is that Soderbergh
is free to create a surreal mood with arresting visuals.  The disadvantage
is that Gray seems adrift without an audience.  He becomes a story-teller
trying to be an actor, playing things too broadly in an attempt to
generate the energy he can't draw from audience reaction.  Like fellow
story-teller Garrison Keillor, Gray's strength is a straightforward
delivery which makes you laugh without _signaling_ you to laugh.  GRAY'S
ANATOMY is like "A Prairie Home Companion" turned into a performance art
piece.
     Soderbergh is a gifted director (SEX, LIES AND VIDEOTAPE; KING OF THE
HILL); Gray is a gifted monologist (SWIMMING TO CAMBODIA).  They're just
not a very good match for the creation of a film.  Soderbergh's direction
creates an intensity of mood which Gray's stoic demeanor can't sustain,
and Gray's ability to wow an audience while sitting in front of a
microphone is undercut by Soderbergh's visual theatrics.  The absurdity of
some of the stories in GRAY'S ANATOMY is bound to generate some laughs,
but while you're chuckling at the stories you may feel there's something
missing, something the opening five minutes promises but doesn't deliver.
In this case, the eyes just don't have it.

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
WILD THINGS (1998)
(Columbia)
Starring:  Matt Dillon, Kevin Bacon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Bill
Murray, Theresa Russell.
Screenplay:  Stephen Peters.
Producers:  Steven A. Jones and Rodney M. Liber.
Director:  John McNaughton.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, nudity, profanity, drug
use, violence)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If Hollywood is going to insist on making awful films, the least it
could do is make them as wonderfully, hilariously awful as WILD THINGS.
There is a kind of Zen preposterousness certain films achieve -- oh, let's
use SHOWGIRLS as an example -- which makes them too much fun to dismiss.
They become impromptu "Mystery Science Theater" experiences, where you
find yourself hooting and commenting throughout the ridiculous situations,
plaster-of-Paris acting and quotably appalling dialogue.
     I'm not entirely sure that WILD THINGS isn't a huge, self-aware joke,
attempting to combine the Joe Eszterhas oeuvre (SHOWGIRLS, BASIC INSTINCT,
JADE) and grade-Z exploitation films bursting with busty women in the
swamps.  The plot begins with a South Florida high school guidance
counselor named Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) who finds himself accused of
rape by two of his students:  pouty, flirtatious rich-girl cheerleader
Kelly (Denise Richards), and wrong-side-of-the-tracks, tattooed,
pot-smoking trouble-maker Susie (Neve Campbell).  For the next 100 minutes
or so it spins off into a dozen different twists and turns of
double-dealing, accompanied by the kind of non-stop sleaze which would
make Eszterhas proud.  Soap opera threats snarled through clenched teeth?
Yep.  Career-threatening performances?  You betcha.  Chicks in cat fights?
Check.  Chicks in wet T-shirts?  Check.  Chicks making out with each
other?  Double-check.  Gratuitous full-frontal shower shot of Detective
Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) which reveals -- ahem -- just precisely how
many degrees of Kevin Bacon there are?  Double-double-check.
     And yet, as undeniably wretched as virtually every moment of WILD
THINGS is, I can't imagine anyone walking out on it.  The same kind of
perverse I-only-read-it-for-the-articles voyeurism which finds otherwise
sensible people pausing when they flip past Jerry Springer could have you
shaking your head and giggling non-stop.  In fact, the pseudo-serious but
scandal-grubbing television coverage of Lombardo's trial in WILD THINGS
serves as an apt metaphor for what we should be expecting from the film.
There's no way to take WILD THINGS seriously as a movie, any more than
it's possible to take "Melrose Place" seriously as topical drama or "Hard
Copy" seriously as journalism.  It's a lowest-common-denominator side show
of all the stuff we mock with knee-jerk superiority, yet still manages to
do gangbuster ratings.
     It is only a tremendously entertaining supporting turn by Bill Murray
which makes it hard to forgive WILD THINGS all its trespasses.  As
Lombardo's ambulance-chasing attorney, Murray brings a genuine comic touch
to the proceedings, one which doesn't force you to stop laughing to figure
out whether the humor is intentional.  When Murray's loose, confident work
exists alongside the ham-fisted conniving of Kelly's nasty mother (Theresa
Russell) and a smug member of the town elite (Robert Wagner), any possible
sense of planned parody vanishes.  Even the film's extended closing
credits coda, which back-tracks to explain how all the plotting comes
together, feels like a huge miscalculation.  If it matters that much
whether or not the plot makes sense, then WILD THINGS really _is_ that
bad.
     Perhaps it's just the eternal optimist in me which makes me want to
believe there was a logic behind the perverse inanity -- or perhaps that's
inane perversity -- of WILD THINGS.  Or perhaps it's the need to find a
reason why I'd rather sit through a film as bad as WILD THINGS again
before I'd sit through a "better" film like TWILIGHT.  I can't even call
it a "guilty pleasure," because it's not the film I enjoyed.  I did,
however, immensely enjoy the act of _not_ enjoying it.  Start-to-finish
trash just doesn't get much trashier than this, unless a certain writer's
name is attached to the script.  Somewhere, very soon, Joe Eszterhas will
be watching WILD THINGS and kicking himself because he didn't write it
first.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
THE BUTCHER BOY
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Stephen Rea, Eamonn Owens, Fiona Shaw, Alan Boyle, Aisling
O'Sullivan.
Screenplay:  Neil Jordan and Patrick McCabe, based on the novel by McCabe.
Producers:  Redmond Morris and Stephen Woolley.
Director:  Neil Jordan.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Everything I needed to know about the themes of THE BUTCHER BOY, it
turns out, I learned from the opening titles sequence.  The film's credits
are superimposed over comic book panels featuring scenes of angry faces
and destruction, the last of which fades into the story of a troubled
Irish teenager named Francie Brady (newcomer Eamonn Owens) circa 1961 -
1962.  It soon becomes clear that Francie is nobody's idea of a perfect
little boy, stealing apples and terrorizing more timid boys as his whim
moves him.  It also becomes clear that he comes from a dysfunctional home,
his emotionally unstable mother (Aisling O'Sullivan) spending almost as
much time in institutions as his drunken father (Stephen Rea) spends in
pubs.
     But it's not just family strife which eventually turns Francie into a
monster.  Every possible external influence sends Francie retreating into
a fantasy world of fear, paranoia and violence, particularly the
pernicious influence of the media.  Radio broadcasts of Cold War rhetoric
from President Kennedy create a general feeling that nuclear war is
imminent; television programs depict The Lone Ranger firing his gun and
The Fugitive seeking the elusive one-armed man; the era's popular mutant
horror movies fill theater screens; and, of course, the comic books
splashed over the opening credits feed boys still more violent images.
Even a priest at a Catholic reform school (Milo O'Shea) is a potential
threat as a fetishist and pedophile.  Is it any wonder Francie comes to
fixate on a single woman (Fiona Shaw) as the cause of all his troubles?
It is an era of scape-goating and fear-mongering, with poor young Francie
simply a product of his environment.
     There is a perverse fascination to watching Francie grow
progressively more demented, but eventually it becomes clear that there's
not much more to THE BUTCHER BOY than that.  It's tough to work up much
sympathy for Francie when he's treated by co-writer and director Neil
Jordan like a lab rat in a grand sociological experiment -- how much hate
and violence can one boy absorb until he snaps?  It can't help that the
lead character is an unstable boy played by an inexperienced young actor.
Though Owens has a few very effective moments, including worrying over the
lost affections of his one and only friend (Alan Boyle), he spends most of
the film mugging, yelling and gesticulating wildly.  For a story on a
serious subject, it's not always easy to take THE BUTCHER BOY seriously.
     Then again, it's pretty clear that Jordan isn't interested in having
us take it seriously.  THE BUTCHER BOY is a truly odd black-humored
concoction which treats Francie's many traumas with more whimsy than
consternation.  Virtually every moment is given a comic spin of some sort:
the simple comment of a townswoman that "it'll be a bitter day for this
town if the world comes to an end;" Frankie's conversations with a
decidedly earthy Virgin Mary (Sinead O'Connor); even electro-shock
treatments in "The Garage" (Francie's term for mental hospital, because
that's where you go when you break down).  Jordan's approach is
consistently surprising, taking even a tired device like omnipresent
voice-over narration (also provided by Rea as the adult Francie) and
turning it into a bizarre duet between past and present.  With Elliot
Goldenthal providing a jaunty underscore to everything from youthful play
to the discovery of a murder scene, THE BUTCHER BOY remains strangely
amusing enough to keep you watching.
     That, unfortunately, is about as far as Jordan goes.  As a comedy,
it's a fairly original collection of sick chuckles.  As a drama, it offers
pat answers and too little insight, putting us through episodic paces
without offering more to learn about its main character than we learned
from the first 90 seconds or so:  keep your boys away from television and
comic books unless you want them going crazy on you.

Title
Review for I'm Not Rappaport (1996)
     Writers are smacked around so often and with such impunity in
Hollywood that it is perfectly understandable when a writer insists on
directing his or her own material.  It similarly makes sense, I suppose,
for a playwright to want to direct the film adaptation of his own
material, and Herb Gardner has been unusually protective of his plays.  In
1986, he directed his own adaptation of THE GOODBYE PEOPLE; in 1996, he
directed his own adaptation of I'M NOT RAPPAPORT.  Clearly Gardner is
attached to his creations.  In fact, he is far too attached.  Another
director might have identified I'M NOT RAPPAPORT as a meandering play with
one interesting idea, and given it the good tightening up it needed.
Gardner clings to every line and situation, turning out a sluggish and
repetitive meditation on aging.
     Walter Matthau stars as Nat, a senior citizen in New York City who
spends his days creating identities for himself and causing trouble for
those he believes guilty of exploiting people.  He is also troublesome to
Midge Carter (Ossie Davis), the old gentleman he pesters with his tall
tales every day on a Central Park bench.  The two become entangled when
Midge's failing eyesight threatens his job as an apartment building
superintendent, and Nat offers unsolicited assistance by posing as Midge's
attorney.  Nat's daughter Clara (Amy Irving) considers her father's
behavior grounds for having herself declared his guardian, but Nat refuses
to change his ways, even when an attempt to con a drug dealer (Craig T.
Nelson) places both Nat and Midge in danger.
     I'M NOT RAPPAPORT is about a man's attempt to retain his dignity in
spite of advancing years, and there are strong possibilities in the
character of Nat.  A committed Socialist and social agitator, Nat sees his
deceptions in defense of the elderly as a natural extension of his
life-long belief in the rights of the oppressed.  The film's best scene is
Nat's showdown with Danforth (Boyd Gaines), the representative from
Midge's apartment building, as Nat browbeats the insincere yuppie into a
realization that he is attempting to discard a human being who has
out-lived his usefulness.  Walter Matthau and Ossie Davis both give solid
performances, obviously appreciating their own opportunities in rare
leading roles, and there is an affecting sincerity to their comments about
giving respect where it is due.
     That scene between Nat, Midge and Danforth is noteworthy not just
because it is the best one in I'M NOT RAPPAPORT, but also because it says
everything Gardner has to say that is worth saying.  The film basically
consists of a series of conversations between characters, and virtually
every one finds Nat trying to put something over on someone to prove he is
still relevant or to save his skin.  In one such scene, Nat challenges a
young tough (Guillermo Diaz) who has been extorting protection money from
seniors; in another, Nat tries to persuade his daughter that he does not
need her supervision.  The relationships are not compelling enough by
themselves to carry those scenes, and the point that seniors are
under-estimated and mis-treated is made and made and made again.  As I'M
NOT RAPPAPORT wanders through the last of its 133 minutes, you may begin
to feel that you have been sitting in your seat as long as its main
characters have been alive.
     Gardner tries to make up for that repetitive structure by spicing up
the third act with the drug dealer sub-plot, and what a strange encounter
it is.  In an attempt to protect a young woman (Martha Plimpton) who owes
the dealer money, Nat plays the part of a stereotypical mob boss who warns
the "Cowboy" dealer to leave her alone.  What begins as broad comic relief
soon turns nasty as the Cowboy (played with scary effectiveness by Nelson)
proves smarter and more dangerous than Nat expected.  Yet even this scene
is a re-tread of the run-in with the young extortionist, as Nat pushes his
act too far with someone unwilling to play along.  Worse still, it leaves
us with the depressing notion that the elderly should be seen and not
heard.  Gardner didn't need to take us through over two hours of hoops
just so that we could end up right where we started.  Well-intentioned and
well-acted though it might be, I'M NOT RAPPAPORT is the product of a
writer too married to every word, and a director too sparing with the
knife.

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
VERY BAD THINGS
(Polygram)
Starring:  Christian Slater, Cameron Diaz, Jon Favreau, Daniel Stern,
Jeremy Piven, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Leland Orser.
Screenplay:  Peter Berg.
Producers:  Michael Schiffer, Diane Nabatoff and Cindy Cowan.
Director:  Peter Berg.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, nudity, sexual situations, drug use,
adult themes)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The film's title offers too easy and convenient a bon mot.  Expect
cadres of critics to be trotting out innumerable variations on "VERY BAD
THINGS _is_ one of them," though it's both a cheap analysis and an
inaccurate one.  VERY BAD THINGS isn't a very bad movie.  It's a very good
idea approached from entirely the wrong perspective.
     The idea involves that most cynically macho of American matrimonial
institutions, the bachelor party.  The groom-to-be is mild-mannered Los
Angeles cubicle-dweller Kyle Fisher (Jon Favreau); his fiancee is Laura
Garrety (Cameron Diaz), a woman only slightly obsessed with her nuptial
details.  The boys' night out is to be an overnight in Las Vegas
including Kyle's four best buddies:  mile-a-minute real estate hustler
Robert Boyd (Christian Slater); family man Adam Berkow (Daniel Stern);
Adam's edgy brother Michael (Jeremy Piven); and reticent mechanic Charles
Moore (Leland Orser).  Though the party begins with the expected drinking,
drugs and bare breasts, it ends with the unexpected problem of a dead
prostitute on the floor of their hotel room bathroom.  That sets off a
grotesque chain of events, as the friends' attempts to cover up one death
lead to one death after another.
     Beneath the macabre, over-the-top situations surrounding the deaths
in VERY BAD THINGS is a savage satire of stereotypical gender responses to
impending marriage.  Kyle watches in a passive daze as Laura orchestrates
the ceremony from overture to finale; Laura plows over Kyle's every
hesitation with a fiercely muttered "Do you love me?", focusing so 
completely on _getting_ married she seems oblivious to the idea of _being_
married.  The horrific events in Las Vegas become a steroid-injected
version of more mundane bachelor party naughtiness, with the bachelor 
turning the "very bad thing" into both a source of guilt and a potential
excuse for getting out of the marriage he fears.  To Laura, it's all just
one more logistical glitch to be overcome, with Diaz turning in a
frighteningly funny vision of a woman whose wedding _will not_ be spoiled
by anything.
     Diaz nails the proper tone so completely (particularly in the film's
final act) that you may suddenly realize what's been so wrong with the
rest of the film.  While Diaz plays Laura entirely for absurd laughs, the
male cast members range from one extreme to another.  Slater plays Boyd as
too sinister to be funny, Stern and Piven play the brothers Berkow as too
genuinely  tormented to be funny, and Favreau plays Kyle as too dull to be
funny.  For much of VERY BAD THINGS, the script by Peter Berg (better
known from his role on "Chicago Hope") is simply a plot in motion, pulling
the characters along with it.  At times there's not even exaggerated
humanity in the reactions of the characters, the kind that would have
given a more humorous spin to more scenes.  For a film that could have and
should have been a dark comedy, VERY BAD THINGS is too much like the
menacing morality play of SHALLOW GRAVE.
     That kind of tone is going to alienate a lot of viewers, particularly
as the situations grow increasingly extreme and gruesome.  Though VERY BAD
THINGS ends with a hilariously horrifying subversion of suburban domestic
bliss, it doesn't given you enough reason to stick around for it.  Comedy
can still work when it's caustic, but at some point a film-maker needs to
understand that he has to keep an audience laughing at material this dark
to keep them from walking away.  VERY BAD THINGS is a great opportunity
wasted, and that's the _real_ very bad thing.

Title
Review for Simple Wish, A (1997)
     I have a theory that, in an earlier stage of development, the premise
for A SIMPLE WISH went something like this:  Murray (Martin Short), who
aspires to being the first male fairy godmother, turns out to be
completely inept at the job, but an affirmative action mandate forces the
godmothers to admit him.  This would be before the real-world affirmative
action debate heated up, forcing controversy-shy Universal executives to
drop that angle entirely.
     The theory, I'll admit, is based on no evidence in the version of A
SIMPLE WISH which actually made it to the screen.  The alternative,
unfortunately, is that the story never made a shred of sense at _any_
point in its development.  It's the kind of exasperating kiddie fantasy
where stuff just happens, without any character, story or internal logic
to guide it.
     Of course, the stuff which does happen may be plenty to satisfy young
viewers.  In the course of his repeatedly bungled attempts to help young
Anabel Greening (Mara Wilson) turn her father (Robert Pastorelli) into a
Broadway star, Murray gets caught in an iron gate, causes a wind storm to
sweep a teacher down a school hallway, turns a redneck into a 50 foot tall
rabbi, turns a horse into a mouse and has the father's chief rival begin
vomiting up frogs at an inopportune moment during his audition.
Meanwhile, evil excommunicated godmother Claudia (Kathleen Turner), who
has an axe to grind and magic wands to steal, has fun with computer
graphics, rendering folks either two-dimensional or extremely pliable 
depending on the whim which seizes her.
     The special effects are, admittedly, temporarily distracting.  When
they stop, however, A SIMPLE WISH borders on the unbearable.  Martin
Short, who should be taken only in small doses even on his best days,
turns Murray into a flinching, snorting and generally annoying creation
without a glimmer of charm.  Mara Wilson, who was so appealing in last
year's delightful MATILDA, barely registers here at all, while Francis
Capra registers far too often as Wilson's big brother.  There is not a
single likeable character in the film, turning every scene into a long
wait for some kind of goofy visual effect to snap you out of your stupor.
     All of these problems make the gaping hole at the center of the film
all the more evident.  A SIMPLE WISH is based around a high-concept
premise -- a male fairy godmother, and an incompetent one at that -- yet
not once is there any attempt to explain why he wanted to be a fairy
godmother, how he managed to become one, or why no one is keeping an eye
on him.  In fact, A SIMPLE WISH is comprised of nothing but missed
opportunities and half-developed ideas.  What goes on at the fairy
godmothers' convention which takes place during the film?  Does it matter
that Murray is using a broken wand for much of the film?  Why not make
more use of the complicated rules of fairy godmother-hood, which
apparently are so abstruse that Murray has to carry around a cheat sheet?
And why does Claudia's assistant Boots (Amanda Plummer), who is supposed
to be a dog turned into a human, look instead like a refugee from "Cats"?
     Time and again, A SIMPLE WISH wanders from scene to scene as though
blissfully unconcerned about arriving at anything resembling a point.  
Then again, maybe someone got cold feet and stripped it of its point.
It's more charitable, I think, to imagine the darkly satirical film A
SIMPLE WISH might have been than to dwell on the muddled mess it turned
out to be.

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
(Columbia/Phoenix)
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Courtney Love, Edward Norton, Brett Harrelson,
Crispin Glover, Richard Paul, Donna Hanover, James Cromwell.
Screenplay:  Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski.
Producers:  Oliver Stone, Janet Yang, Michael Hausman.
Director:  Milos Forman.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT is such an intriguing and entertaining
film biography that it is almost a shame that it had to have a "message."
Milos Forman's study of "Hustler" magazine publisher Larry Flynt is an
examination of the challenge of accepting potentially offensive material
as protected speech under the Constitution, and as such it is not in the
same class as solemnly liberal films which congratulate themselves for
championing radical notions like "racism is a bad thing."  Still, there is
a slickness to the way Flynt's legal battles are portrayed which makes it
too easy to choose sides.  When the film focuses on Flynt as a character
and on his relationships, THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT soars.  When Flynt
becomes an icon, it slips.
     The film opens in 1952 -- with young Larry and his brother Jimmy
selling moonshine in Kentucky -- then flashes forward twenty years to find
Larry (Woody Harrelson) and Jimmy (Woody's real-life brother Brett
Harrelson) selling a different vice.  Their Ohio-based Hustler strip bar
is only barely staying afloat, however, and Larry starts up a glossy
newsletter to help promote the club.  The newsletter unexpectedly takes on
a life of its own, and "Hustler" is born, much to the consternation of
conservative civic leaders.  In 1977, Flynt is arrested for selling
pornography, and takes on young civil rights attorney Alan Isaacman
(Edward Norton) for his defense.  Though he ultimately wins his first
case, there always seems to be another one close behind, as Flynt becomes
a favored target for anti-pornography legal action.  His legal troubles
are only part of his life's challenges, though, as a would-be assassin's
bullet paralyzes him and his troubled wife Althea (Courtney Love)
struggles with her own demons.
     Screenwriters Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski also wrote the
script for Tim Burton's ED WOOD, and FLYNT demonstrates once again that
they have a marvelous sense for crafting structure out of eccentricity.
Flynt is rendered variously as a libertine capitalist selling what America
is buying, as a half-hearted Christian convert and as a bitter,
unpredictable paraplegic, yet every facet of his character becomes part of
a fascinating whole in Woody Harrelson's performance.  It is a dynamic
piece of acting:  sly and blisteringly funny one moment, quiet and
emotional the next.  He is brought most fully to life in both respects
through his interactions with the cast's other two stand-outs, Edward
Norton and Courtney Love.  It has taken Norton only a year to become one
of the most impressive young actors in film, and he is top-notch as the
attorney and unlikely friend who tries to rein in Flynt.  Love, meanwhile,
simply gives a clinic in creating a complex character.  She is dazzling
even as Althea dissolves in a losing battle with AIDS, and she appears not
at all concerned over whether or not the audience likes her.  Few actors
can muster that kind of fearlessness.
     THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT is frequently hilarious as it explores the
characters' relationships and challenging in its reluctance to offer
embraceable heroes.  When it hits the courtrooms, the lines become more
clearly drawn, to the film's detriment.  The self-aggrandizing
pornographer is too easy to side with when opposed by a villainous judge,
or such obvious symbols of hypocrisy as savings and loan magnate/
soon-to-be felon Charles Keating (James Cromwell); Jerry Falwell (Richard
Paul), whose libel suit becomes the basis for Flynt's Supreme Court
challenge, is rendered similarly as a scowling buffoon.  Giving Flynt's
enemies a face which is easy to laugh at diffuses the point of the film
when it is no longer "the people" who are versus Flynt, but simply some
nasty stuffed shirts.  Flynt's speech is deserving of protection not
because he is better than his accusers, but because it shouldn't matter
who is better; when Flynt tells reporters that a victory for him would be
important because he is "the worst," it is fairly obvious that Alexander,
Karaszewski and Forman don't agree.
     All the legal wranglings come to a thrilling conclusion, however, in
what may be the best courtroom scene I have ever seen.  As Isaacson argues
Flynt's case before the Supreme Court, the courtroom becomes an
opportunity not for sermons, but for the exchange of ideas.  At that
moment, the issues at the heart of THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT matter
profoundly, with Norton's passionate defense shattering the earlier
dichotomies of right vs. wrong.  It made me more disappointed in an
earlier scene in which Flynt gives a sincere speech to civil libertarians
which is presented without a hint of irony.  Larry Flynt, manic
smut-peddler, makes for a much more compelling protagonist than Larry
Flynt, First Amendment hero.

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
(Universal)
Starring:  Sylvester Stallone, Amy Brenneman, Viggo Mortensen, Stan Shaw.
Screenplay:  Leslie Bohem.
Producers:  John Davis, Joseph M. Singer, David T. Friendly.
Director:  Rob Cohen.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence).
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is one of the more trustworthy rules of popular culture that
everything old must eventually become new again, and 1996 at the movies
sure has looked a lot like the mid-70s.  TWISTER and INDEPENDENCE DAY were
less like contemporary action films than the were heirs to the disaster
epics of twenty years ago, with plucky bands of one-dimensional characters
trying to withstand barrages of special effects.  With two volcano films
and James Cameron's TITANIC on the horizon, it is beginning to feel like
Irwin Allen has taken over Hollywood again, and that thought doesn't
inspire much nostalgia.  DAYLIGHT is a POSEIDON ADVENTURE clone with a few
effectively tense moments, but it is so plodding and mechanical that it
is rarely entertaining.
     Sylvester Stallone stars as Kit Latura, a one-time Emergency Medical
Services worker now working as a chauffeur after a tragic accident cost
him his job.  His training will come in handy, however, when a massive
explosion involving toxic chemicals seals off an underwater commuter
tunnel between Manhattan and New Jersey.  With only twelve survivors
trapped in the tunnel -- including struggling playwright Madelyne Thompson
(Amy Brenneman), athletic gear tycoon Roy Nord (Viggo Mortensen) and
transit cop George Tyrell (Stan Shaw) -- Kit attempts a risky entry
through a route from which he will not be able to return.  That leaves him
in danger as well, though the greatest danger isn't entirely clear.  While
rising waters and a collapsing structure place the clock against them, the
group also finds progress threatened by internal dissent, as well as by a
dangerous procedure undertaken by officials on the outside which could
cost everyone their lives.
     DAYLIGHT begins with a couple of red-herring criminal activities
which end up causing the firestorm in the tunnel, but it is indicative of
the shortcomings of the script that the bad guys then become cinders
rather than sticking around to make any more sparks fly.  The survivors
are a predictably motley assortment, with the aforementioned individuals
joined by a few petty criminals, a dysfunctional family and an elderly
couple, and there are several squabbles as they try to decide what to do
and who should lead them.  There simply isn't enough to any of the
characters to give the conflict energy; everything we know about each of
them comes from a series of postage-stamp sized establishing scenes, and
that's not nearly enough.  With the vague bureaucratic malevolence
aboveground and the muted mutineering below ground as the only antagonism
in most of DAYLIGHT, the absence of a real villain becomes a distinct
drawback, and results in a plot which grinds from impossible situation to
yet-more-impossible situation.
     That is not to say that there is no drama in DAYLIGHT, though little
of it comes from the silly dialogue or thin characterizations.
Surprisingly, it also doesn't come from the special effects by Industrial
Light and Magic, which often have a strangely low-budget quality.  The
real drama comes from watching the dirty baker's dozen of our protagonists
realize that their only chance at survival lies in cooperation, and from
the difficult moral decisions of a crisis situation.  Repeatedly,
characters are forced to decide who can be saved, or whether someone is
worth saving, and director Rob Cohen (DRAGONHEART) somehow makes those
moments matter even though individual characters don't. When the entire
group joins together to free one of them trapped under a car, the heroism
of necessity gives DAYLIGHT a boost of substance.
     That alone might be more than you would expect from a Sylvester
Stallone action film, although Sly himself merely seems to be going
through the motions.  Screenwriter Leslie Bohem has handed him a character
which even seems to be a barely re-worked version of his tragedy-scarred,
redemption-hungry role in CLIFFHANGER, and he wanders grimly through most
of the film without showing us any hint of a personality.  He also has to
carry DAYLIGHT on his broad shoulders, because this is one disaster film
which doesn't blow its budget on putting an all-star cast in harm's way;
Amy Brenneman and Viggo Mortensen are no Faye Dunaway and Fred Astaire.
However, DAYLIGHT does try to follow up on one bit of disaster film trivia
-- both THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE and THE TOWERING INFERNO won Best Original
Song Academy Awards -- by serving up a sappy romantic ballad called
"Whenever There Is Love."  The female half of the duet?  Donna Summer.
Yes indeed, folks, it sure does feel like the mid-70s all over again.

Title
Review for Prefontaine (1997)
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Jared Leto, R. Lee Ermey, Ed O'Neil, Amy Locane.
Screenplay:  Steve James and Eugene Corr.
Producers:  Irby Smith, Mark Lutz, John Doonan, Peter Gilbert.
Director:  Steve James.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As the opening scenes of PREFONTAINE unfold, you could be excused for
worrying about its prospects as a drama.  Those scenes include a lot of
documentary-style footage of track races, as well as "talking head" shots
of the actors playing Steve Prefontaine's friends and family, complete
with captions identifying the characters.  Is Steve James, director of the
acclaimed 1994 documentary HOOP DREAMS, simply planning to tick off the
significant events of Prefontaine's life, accompanied by predictably
glowing commentary?  Is he going to be able to tell us a story?  Well,
anyone concerned about James' ability as a story-teller didn't see HOOP
DREAMS.  Though he may have a few things to learn about directing actors
and writing dialogue, James crafts PREFONTAINE into a compelling character
study which takes surprising turns for a sports film.
     Jared Leto stars as Steve "Pre" Prefontaine, a distance-running
prodigy from the small Oregon town of Coos Bay.  Courted out of high
school in 1969 by dozens of colleges, Pre opts to stay close to home and
attend the University of Oregon, where nationally renowned coach Bill
Bowerman (R. Lee Ermey) leads the track team.  Pre's intense desire to win
makes him an instant success, transcending the sport to become a celebrity
who brings attention to the previously under-appreciated 5,000 meter
event.  With success comes high expectations, however, and Pre heads to
the 1972 Munich Olympics favored to take home a gold medal.  Then tragedy
strikes in Munich, changing the complexion of the Games and setting up a
showdown with Swedish sensation Lasse Viren (Tracy Hollister) which will
change Pre's life forever.
     One of the things which makes PREFONTAINE more satisfying than the
average underdog-makes-good bio-pic is that the style gives it a unique
rhythm.  James has cinematographer Peter Gilbert employ a hand-held camera
for many sequences, creating a kind of urgent energy which matches
Prefontaine's personality.  The script does an efficient job of
establishing how his lack of success as an under-sized youth baseball and
football player drove him to find a place where his refusal to surrender
would be enough, as well as the arrogant sense of personal invincibility
which often made him reckless.  Jared Leto (heartthrob Jordan Catalano
from "My So-Called Life") gives a naturalistic performance encouraged by
the documentary style, but his intensity isn't always as convincing as
it could be.  He has the golden boy charisma down pat, without all the
ferocity.
     He is convincing enough, however, to make the arc of his character
intriguing.  The pivot point of PREFONTAINE is Pre's Olympic final, which
is delayed by the terrorist attack on the Israeli athletes in the Olympic
village; as Pre's doubts begin to grow, the race becomes a frightening
first opportunity to fail.  Then PREFONTAINE makes the unexpected choice
not to be about whether or not Pre wins his race, but about how he
responds to a disappointing result.  James' use of documentary clips from
the Olympics does slow the film down somewhat, but it also establishes the
1972 Olympics as a kind of turning point in the perception of "amateur"
athletics.  As Pre becomes an unlikely advocate for the rights of amateur
athletes, and for reforms in the governing process, his character shifts
from a youth obsessed with the idea that only winning can earn him respect
to a man who learns to find success in different ways.  Most sports movies
are about the main character(s) winning, and a few are about  the main
character(s) just doing their best.  I can't think of many other sports
movies which were about a character who learns to define himself apart
from his sport.
     There are plenty of places Steve James betrays his inexperience with
fiction film-making, notably with some flat characters like Pre's
girlfriend Nancy (Amy Locane) and the tough-but-caring coach played with
enthusiasm by R. Lee Ermey, as well as a pace which makes PREFONTAINE feel
long at only 105 minutes.  Yet there are two scenes in which James shows
the kind of handle he has on his material.  The first is the Olympic 5,000
meter race, directed with a pulse-quickening energy; you know someone is
doing an exceptional job of film-making if you know the result of the race
and you are still sitting on the edge of your seat.  The second is more
subtle, but perhaps more important to the impact of Prefontaine's story.
After showing us a number of early scenes in which the cocky Pre races his
MG around treacherous curves, James gives us a late scene in which Pre,
filled with satisfaction after organizing a successful challenge match
with the Swedish national team, drives home from a party.  There is an
almost subliminal cut-away to his speedometer, showing him driving a
cautious 35 miles per hour when he collides with another car.  Prefontaine
died in the crash at the age of 24, and the success of PREFONTAINE as a
film comes from the fact that we appreciate this tragedy not as the loss
of a fine athlete, but as the loss of someone who was becoming a fine
human being.  A subtle distinction, perhaps, but one which separates
mediocre directors from good ones.  Steve James knows his film-making,
whether the subject is fact or fiction.

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
AMERICAN PSYCHO
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Chloe Sevigny, Reese Witherspoon,
Jared Leto.
Screenplay:  Mary Harron and Guinevere Turner, based on the novel by Bret
Easton Ellis.
Producers:  Edward R. Pressman, Chris Hanley and Christian Halsey Solomon.
Director:  Mary Harron.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations, nudity, profanity, adult
themes)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I've never read the Bret Easton Ellis novel on which AMERICAN PSYCHO
is based, so I don't know whether its reputation as literary garbage is
warranted. Word on the street has it that Ellis' notion of satire
generally involved shopping lists of designer brand names, ad infinitum,
ad nauseam; the word further informed that his descriptions of destroying
a human body left little to the imagination. That could easily make for a
very tedious, dehumanizing read, so I can understand why potential viewers
might be skeptical about a film version of this much-reviled book. After
all, what could possibly be entertaining about watching a sociopath spend
an hour and a half obsessing over colognes and suits between capital
crimes?
     Maybe Ellis didn't "get it" when it came to offering an icy-cold
attack on the go-go ethos. Mary Harron, however, does. Harron's telling of
the tale mixes 1980s nostalgia with pitch-black humor, anchored by
Christian Bale's riveting performance. Bale stars as Patrick Bateman, a
New York mergers and acquisitions vice-president who lives for all the
best things in life: reservations at the finest restaurants, a taxing
physical regimen, clothing by only the most deified designers. He also
finds himself unable to control his impulse to murder on a regular basis,
whether the victim may be a homeless man, a prostitute or an envied 
co-worker. When Det. Donald Kimball (Willem Dafoe) begins poking around,
Patrick begins to fear that he could be caught. Then again, he could have
a greater fearthat he _won't_ be caught.
     The heartless, soulless heart and soul of AMERICAN PSYCHO is Bale's
brilliant performance as Bateman. The role was once said to be Leonardo
DiCaprio's for the taking, but he opted instead for THE BEACH. Bad for 
Leo; good for us. Bale plays Bateman with an exaggeration that's sure to
be misconstrued as hamming it up. Bateman isn't just play-acting at
belonging in the professional social circle in which he runs (his
nepotistically-influenced job seems to consist mostly of reading
pornography, watching "Jeopardy" and doing crossword puzzles); he's
play-acting at being a human being. Bale's work is also brutally funny,
most notably in scenes where he engages in rambling deconstructions of
some of the decade's most banal music (Huey Lewis' "Hip to Be Square;" 
Genesis' "In Too Deep"). If this performance doesn't prove to be one of
the year's best, we're in for a very good year indeed.
     There is, of course, also the matter of the much-talked-about sex and
violence, which cost the version screened at the Sundance Film Festival a
few seconds of excised gyrating. Naturally the content will make AMERICAN
PSYCHO a film for very specific tastes, but viewers should be clear that
this isn't primarily a thriller we're talking about. Yes, there are
suspense elements, and there are a few grisly deaths (most taking place
out of the frame), and there are some moments of moderately explicit 
naughtiness. All of those elements should also be viewed in context. How
anyone could view Bateman's narcissistic orgy as pornographic (or even
eroitic) is beyond me; how the film could be perceived as a commercial for
unbridled appetites and surrender to the id is baffling.
     There's no point pretending AMERICAN PSYCHO has anything radically
new, profound or insightful to say about its era. Satirical critiques of
yuppie materialism have already become somewhat trite a decade later, and
it's clear from minute one that the film is about turning the figurative
ability to get away with murder into the literal equivalent. That doesn't
make many of AMERICAN PSYCHO's finer moments any less effective, from the
shallow one-liners ("I'm not really hungry, but I want to have a 
reservation somewhere") to the hysterical scene in which characters define
their pecking order by the quality of their business cards. The third act
does begin to drag, and the hallucinatory closing scenes are bound to
leave some viewers scratching their heads. But AMERICAN PSYCHO gets
creepier, funnier and more insinuating the longer I think about it. Source
material be damned: Even if Ellis' AMERICAN PSYCHO is junk, it provided
the framework for something savagely entertaining.

Title
Review for Hsi yen (1993)
Starring:  Winston Chao, Mitchell Lichtenstein, May Lin, Sihung Lung
           and Ah-Leh Gua.
Screenwriters:  Ang Lee, Neil Peng and James Schamus.
Director:  Ang Lee.
     While watching THE WEDDING BANQUET (currently in limited release),
I found myself thinking that it would have a very good short.  This
Taiwanese-American comedy about generational and cultural conflict has
fifty minutes of genuine energy stretched into an hour and fifty minute
film.  There are moments of real charm and insight, but ultimately the
sluggish pace doesn't hold them together.
     Wei-Tung (Winston Chao) and Simon (Mitchell Lichtenstein) are a
gay couple living together in Manhattan.  Taiwanese immigrant Wei-Tung
is constantly being badgered by his parents, still in Taiwan, to get
married and produce a grandchild.  Wei-Tung responds by listing
"impossibly high specifications" for his ideal woman, but when Ma Gao
finds a woman who fits the bill, Simon proposes a plan.  Wei-Tung will
marry Wei-Wei (May Lin), a tenant in a building owned by Wei-Tung and
an immigrant without a green card.  Ma and Pa Gao get a wedding,
Wei-Wei gets a green card, and Wei-Tung gets a welcome tax write-off.
However, Ma and Pa (Ah-Leh Gua and Sihung Lung) insist on coming to
America for the wedding.  Shamed by the simple civil ceremony preferred
by their son, Wei-Tung's parents accept an offer by a family friend to
throw a lavish wedding banquet for friends and well-wishers.  The
banquet then leads to ... complications.
     There are several thematic threads in THE WEDDING BANQUET, all
with interesting possibilities.  There is the intriguing romantic
triangle of Simon, Wei-Tung and Wei-Wei (who confesses a weakness for
attractive gay men); there is the issue of values conflict between
non-Americans and their Americanized offspring.  Foremost, there is the
issue of living up to parental expectations which have nothing to do
with who you are as a person.  This latter area receives the most
attention, but like the others it is given somewhat short shrift.
Director and co-scripter Ang Lee seems to want his film to be about too
many different things, without giving sufficient attention to any of
them.  Consequently, the pacing is fitful, and THE WEDDING BANQUET
wanders.
     There are, as I've noted, some very clever set pieces.  In one
scene, Simon and Wei-Tung prepare for the parents' arrival by racing
around their apartment removing all evidence of their gay lifestyle.
The civil ceremony, with Wei-Wei malapropping her vows in broken
English, is also a hoot.  The centerpiece, however, is the lavish
banquet.  It's a whimsical sequence, as Wei-Tung tries to carry off his
charade in front of hundreds of friends, including some raucous college
buddies.  These individual moments almost add up, but they don't
quite.
     Much of the responsibility for this lack of engagement falls on
the shoulders of the two male leads.  Chao, a first time actor, never
invests Wei-Tung with any real depth.  He seems capable of only one
expression:  eyes downcast, jaw clenched in dismay.  While his
situation is certainly a difficult one, at times he seems such a drudge
we wonder why Simon loves him, let alone why Wei-Wei might want to
"convert" him.  Lichtenstein too is far too wooden, making Simon's
genuine frustration over having to hide himself come off as simple
petulance.  He also has a scene with Lung as Wei-Tung's father which
could have been truly touching were he capable of showing any emotion
with his face.  Fortunately, there are good performances to somewhat
balance theirs, most notably Lung, who does some wonderful physical
acting, and May Lin, who sparkles as Wei-Wei.  Unfortunately, her
character is sadly underwritten, as are most of the roles.  The lulls
in the pace would have been acceptable had strong characters been
present to pull me along, but I was simply never caught up enough in
their lives.
     It's difficult not to recommend THE WEDDING BANQUET, since it's
heart seems so firmly in the right place.  It has its moments, and the
themes of familial conflict may strike a chord with many viewers.
However, I just never found myself caring quite enough, and I found
myself looking at my watch too frequently.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
     I've gotta admit, I have a real hard time taking Adam Sandler
seriously as a romantic leading man.  And apparently I'm not alone in that
respect -- Sandler himself seems to be having a real hard time taking
himself seriously as a romantic leading man throughout THE WEDDING SINGER.
Sandler stars as Robby Hart, a one-time aspiring rock-and-roller now
making a meager living playing wedding receptions and bar mitzvahs circa
1985.  After being left at the altar by a fiancee (Angela Featherstone)
who can't deal with his low-rent "career," Robby begins losing the will to
sing "You Spin Me Round (Like a Record)," substituting "Love Stinks."
That's before he begins spending time with Julia Sullivan (Drew
Barrymore), a sweet waitress engaged to a pastel shirt-wearing, vaguely
unshaven Don Johnson wannabe named Glenn (Matthew Glave).
     It's surprising and refreshing to watch a performer like Sandler try
to stretch himself after a string of roles which required him either to
scream, destroy things or scream while destroying things.  It's also a bit
goofy.  When Sandler's big-haired fiancee explains why she doesn't love
him any more, the close-up of Sandler's twitchy face suggests someone
trying hard not to burst out laughing; when he explains to Julia how he
dreams of being a songwriter, his expression suggests someone trying hard
not to burst out laughing.  I was surprised not to find an out-take reel
over the closing credits of THE WEDDING SINGER, since it looked like
dozens of takes must have ended with Sandler in the middle of a massive
giggle fit.
    It's a good thing that the pleasant but improbable romance doesn't
have to carry THE WEDDING SINGER.  The real star of the show is the
mid-80s milieu -- a soundtrack full of the era's one-hit wonders pop
tunes, thread-perfect costuming by Mona May (CLUELESS), knowing references
to the eventual breakup of Van Halen and several famous couples.  In fact,
THE WEDDING SINGER is one of the more consistently chuckle-filled comedies
of the last several months.  Though never out-and-out hilarious or
inspired, Tim Herlihy's script (with uncredited assist from Carrie Fisher,
among others) gets solid mileage out of its kitschy atmosphere, lively
cameos by Steve Buscemi, Jon Lovitz and Billy Idol (as himself), and one
priceless moment involving a string quartet's solemn rendition of
Journey's "Don't Stop Believin'."  Even Drew Barrymore acquits herself
admirably in the uncommon role of the "nice girl."
     Still, there's something ever-so-slightly askew about Adam Sandler
trying to get away with the hushed tones and puppy-dog eyes of a
sensitive, relationship kinda guy.  He may be an actor some day, but he's
not there yet; he's still primarily a happy-go-lucky anarchist with a
talent for silly voices and even sillier songs.  Robby's performance
scenes are certainly where Sandler seems most comfortable, particularly as
he tears into a diatribe against his ex or a lyrically amusing ode to
growing old with Julia.  When he steps off the stage and into his best
faux John Cusack, it just looks like it's all he can do to keep a straight
face.  THE WEDDING SINGER turns out to be an entertaining way to spend 90
minutes laughing at the past.  In a different way, it may be just as funny
watching Sandler spend 90 minutes laughing at an alternative future.

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
     I suppose one could find some sociological significance to the glut
of recent films about inattentive parents and neglected children, if one
were inclined to give a cliche a more grandiose label.  From Whoopi 
Goldberg in BOGUS to Arnold Schwarzenegger in JINGLE ALL THE WAY, from Tim
Allen in THE SANTA CLAUSE to Tim Allen in JUNGLE2JUNGLE, the reformed
workaholic has become the most popular protagonist in formula comedies,
going through a series of wacky adventures before giving a big hug to a
sad-eyed son or daughter.  Jim Carrey is the latest star to step into this
vehicle, and he certainly has enough pure manic energy to give is some
spark, but he has to work awfully hard to do it.  LIAR LIAR is a pure
show-off showcase for Carrey, and by sheer force of will he makes it
funny, despite a ridiculously limp script which has only one place to go.
     Carrey plays Fletcher Reede, a divorced attorney who has mastered the
art of the excuse, the prevarication, the flat-out lie.  Many of them come
at the expense of his young son Max (Justin Cooper), who is repeatedly
disappointed by his dad's no-shows and broken promises.  At his fifth
birthday party, with Fletcher again absent, Max makes a very special
birthday wish:  for just one day, he wishes that his dad were unable to
tell a lie.  Amazingly, Max's wish comes true, and the chronically
insincere Fletcher suddenly finds himself unable to be anything but
brutally honest.  This proves to be a professional obstacle, as Fletcher
is expected to find a less-than-ethical means of extracting a gold-digging
divorcee (Jennifer Tilly) from her pre-nuptial agreement.  It is also a
personal obstacle, as Fletcher's loose tongue gets him into trouble just
when he is trying to prevent his ex-wife Audrey (Maura Tierney) from
moving Max across the country.
     I have this theory that the script for LIAR LIAR, credited to Paul
Guay and Stephen Mazur, consisted largely of parenthetical gaps which read
something like "Jim does some weird physical stuff here" or "Jim makes a
goofy face."  There is a staggering lack of creativity in LIAR LIAR given
the possibilities of the premise.  Carrey is trapped in one situation --
the courtroom -- for far too long, and that situation begins to look like
an extended homage to Steve Martin's work in ALL OF ME, but without 
Martin's ability to maintain his dignity.  The dialogue consists largely
of one fairly obvious put-downs after another, most of which are salvaged
by Carrey's priceless reaction takes and his futile attempts to control
his honesty.  It seems fairly evident that without Carrey, LIAR LIAR would
have been an utter catastrophe.
     With him, it manages some genuine comic high notes.  A scene in which
Fletcher's jilted superior (Amanda Donohoe) forces him to tell the
partners what he really thinks of them turns into a wild orgy of insults;
later, Fletcher tries to get out of his court appearance by beating
himself insensible in a bathroom.  Carrey is cranked up to 11 from start
to finish in LIAR LIAR, and those who find him a bit much to take aren't
likely to have their opinions changed by this film.  Carrey seems to
realize that the entire film is riding on his shoulders, and he plays it
that way, as though the other people in the film were scenery to be
swallowed or knocked out of the way.  For all practical purposes they are,
particularly in the aforementioned partners' meeting, where a dozen people
sit around a table for the express purpose of being skewered; Carrey often
seems to be performing for the rest of the cast as well as for the
audience.  Only Cary Elwes, in a subtle turn as Audrey's painfully earnest
boyfriend, lends any support at all.
     As long as Carrey remains in overdrive, LIAR LIAR provides fairly
consistent moderate laughs -- as well as a few big ones -- but the entire
enterprise feels compromised by the tired paternal redemption motif.  It
almost spoils the fun of watching Carrey do his best impression of a human
pinball, knowing that eventually he's going to have to break down in a
tearful proclamation of devotion to his son.  It's too bad that, with
Carrey on board and a fanciful concept at the ready, LIAR LIAR can't work
up an inspired story to match Carrey's inspired performance.  In fact, it
can barely work up enough material to fill 90 minutes, resorting to
end-credit out-takes to pad the running time.  One of those out-takes 
shows co-star Swoosie Kurtz breaking up Carrey with an improvised snort of
"Over-actor!"  She may be right, but thank heaven someone involved in LIAR
LIAR was working as hard as all these single-minded screen parents we've
been seeing lately.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
(Universal)
Starring:  Jeff Goldblum, Julianne Moore, Pete Postlethwaite, Arliss
Howard, Vanessa Lee Chester, Vince Vaughn.
Screenplay:  David Koepp, based on the novel by Michael Crichton.
Producers:  Gerald R. Molen and Colin Wilson.
Director:  Steven Spielberg.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Four years ago, a friend of mine explained very succinctly the reason
he was looking forward to Steven Spielberg's JURASSIC PARK:  "Big
mechanical lizards."  Sure, the lizards in question were not entirely
mechanical, but I got the point.  He wanted to see dinosaurs live and
breathe on the big screen, as did millions of other movie-goers around the
world.  Four years and over a billion dollars in worldwide grosses later,
everyone has seen dinosaurs live and breathe on the big screen, which begs
one major question when considering a sequel:  now what?
     As it turns out, the "now what" is more:  more different kinds of
dinosaurs, more scenes of the dinosaurs attacking, more people around to
suffer creatively agonizing deaths.  It also turns out to be, more or
less, more of the same.  THE LOST WORLD offers all the shallow
characterization and pointless plotting of JURASSIC PARK without the sense
of discovery.  Only in the hands of Steven Spielberg could that recipe add
up to something moderately diverting instead of a compete disaster.
     THE LOST WORLD is based on (so loosely as to re-define "based on" as
"with the same title as") Michael Crichton's sequel novel, which
introduced us to a second island where dinosaurs were being genetically
engineered.  Unlike Jurassic Park's Isla Nublar, however, Isla Sorna has
been allowed to develop as a complete ecosystem, with dinosaurs roaming
free of fences or human interference.  Unfortunately, InGen Technologies
is in some financial trouble, inspiring new boss Peter Ludlow (Arliss
Howard) to consider exploiting a major corporate resource.  Enter John
Hammond (Richard Attenborough), now convinced of the error of his ways and
determined to prevent further jurassicatastrophies.  He recruits a team of
researchers to collect evidence for leaving the dinosaurs alone, a team
headed by a reluctant Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum).  Once on the island,
Malcolm and his crew discover that Ludlow has brought his own team, and
that they are on a mission guaranteed to create more death and
destruction.
     In many ways, THE LOST WORLD is actually an improvement over JURASSIC
PARK, if for no other reason than that it is more honest.  Spielberg takes
exactly two minutes to show us the first dinosaur in THE LOST WORLD,
clearly aware that there's no point in creating build-up any longer.  He
also takes a note from a clever line in David Koepp's script given to
Malcolm:  "Yeah, ooh ahh...that's always how it starts.  Then later comes
the running and screaming."  JURASSIC PARK was almost obliged to provide 
the wide-eyed wonder of the completely new; THE LOST WORLD, appropriately,
delivers a much higher ratio of "running and screaming" to "ooh ahh."  It
also doesn't have Laura Dern as a dumber-than-Triceratops-dung
paleobotanist, giggling like a schoolgirl over Malcolm's description of
chaos theory, or Ariana Richards shrieking about Unix systems.
     What THE LOST WORLD _does_ have is a generous helping of scenes and
characters which are awfully familiar.  Pete Postlethwaite plays this
year's version of the Great White Hunter while Arliss Howard plays this
year's version of the Corporate Scum; the gallimimus stampede of JP
becomes LOST WORLD'S parasauralophus stampede.  Though Ariana Richards and
Joseph Mazzello appear only in cameos back on the mainland, there is still
a youngster to be terrorized (Malcolm's daughter Kelly, played by Vanessa
Lee Chester). Even the sequence of attacks feels derivative:  T. rex
attacks a vehicle and tries to push it over a cliff, T. rex chases people,
people trek toward a distant goal, velociraptors take their turn.
JURASSIC PARK was more enjoyable than it should have been because we had
never seen this stuff before.  LOST WORLD is the same stuff, just in
greater quantities.
     Those greater quantities are probably going to satisfy movie-goers
who like their action fast and furious, with minimal interruption for
silly little things like character development.  No one will argue that
that THE LOST WORLD is much more than a string of set pieces; there is
also little question that a few of those set pieces are directed with that
indescribable Spielberg something.  The first T. rex attack is brilliant,
placing Julianne Moore hundreds of feet above the crashing surf, separated
from certain death by nothing more than a pane of glass gradually
dissolving into spiderweb cracks.  When Spielberg is "on," the results can
be dizzying, and he's "on" just often enough to give THE LOST WORLD a
few satisfying sparks.  The rest of the time, he's on auto-pilot.  Like
us, he's been there and done that.
     I believe I have seen JURASSIC PARK four times since its initial
release, and I have enjoyed it less each time.  If I had seen THE LOST
WORLD for the first time in 1993 -- if the order of the two films had been
reversed -- I suspect I would have found it positively thrilling.  In
1997, it's just like watching JURASSIC PARK for the fifth time, when it's
hard to get worked up over a film which has little going for it besides
big mechanical lizards.

Title
Review for Fools Rush In (1997)
     Somewhere along the line, the makers of romantic comedies stopped
caring about whether their lead characters had any business being
together.  Perhaps in response to the complex ritual late-20th-century
courtship has become, audiences began to embrace film romances which had
as much to do with sorcery as chemistry -- SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL -- and film-makers have been only too happy to
provide more of the same.  The fairy tale, a perfectly enjoyable
expression of our dreams, is no longer simply a supplement to realistic
love in the movies; it practically has replaced it entirely.  FOOLS RUSH
IN is the next logical step in the transformation of screen romance into a
celebration of fate.  Where SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE asked you to root for a
couple who didn't meet until the final scene, FOOLS RUSH IN asks you to
root for a couple after you have spent over 100 minutes observing in grim
detail that they have absolutely nothing in common.
     Matthew Perry stars as Alex Whitman, a field representative for a
chain of nightclubs based in New York City.  Alex is supervising the
construction of a new location in Las Vegas when he meets Isabel Fuentes
(Salma Hayek), an aspiring photographer with a deep belief in destiny, in
a local bar.  The two share a one-night stand, but Isabel ducks out the
next morning before Alex wakes up.  Their destiny seems to be never to
meet again, until Isabel shows up three months later at Alex's door with a
startling revelation:  she is pregnant, and Alex is the father.  Though
Isabel is willing to keep and raise the baby on her own, Alex becomes
convinced that they should get married immediately.  That is what they do
at a Vegas chapel, but the honeymoon is extremely short-lived.  As the
newlyweds actually get to know each other, they find a host of obstacles
in the way, perhaps more than their instant family can withstand.
     Perhaps more than the audience can withstand, as well.  FOOLS RUSH IN
scripter Katherine Reback doesn't provide one really interesting conflict
between Alex and Isabel -- she provides a dozen moderately diverting
conflicts, with characters who are on screen barely long enough for you to
remember their names.  The couple quarrels over whether they will live in
New York or Las Vegas; they disagree over a religion for the baby.
Isabel's police officer ex-boyfriend (Carlos Gomez) scowls at Alex and
helps get him drunk on tequila; Alex's sort-of-ex-girlfriend (Suzanne
Snyder) meddles by calling Alex's parents.  Both sets of parents fret over
the hasty marriage; Alex frets over juggling career and family.  There is
so much quarreling and scowling and meddling and fretting going on from so
many different directions that you might find yourself wondering if you
have forgotten how perfect they are supposed to be for each other.
     Don't worry, you haven't forgotten.  All evidence suggests that the
only thing right in the relationship between Alex and Isabel is really
great sex, and I am not discounting the value of really great sex when I
say that it's not nearly enough.  FOOLS RUSH IN belongs to that class of
romantic comedies which demands that you accept the central pairing as
celestially foretold, and curse you for a fuddy-duddy with no sense of
romance if you object, as John Cleese once did in a classic "Cheers"
episode, that the only thing opposites attract is divorce.  The essential
change in Alex's character turns out to be that he "gets religion"
regarding fate, seeing signs everywhere reminding him of Isabel after the
two separate.  The happy ending doesn't seem to recognize that these
people need some serious counseling; apparently the Psychic Friends
Network will suffice.
     What makes FOOLS RUSH IN all the more frustrating is that there are
plenty of moments when it is tremendously entertaining.  You don't need to
be a fan of "Friends" to appreciate Perry, who can fire darts of sarcasm
and do reaction takes with the best of them.  He can be both funny and
warm, as he is in an appealing sequence at a Fuentes family gathering, and
it is easy to feel sympathetic towards Alex despite his near-sighted
careerism.  Salma Hayek is also quite good, conveying conflicted emotions
and frustration, and there is certainly heat between Perry and Hayek
(although, let's face it, Hayek could generate heat in a room full of
asbestos).  But FOOLS RUSH IN needs more than heat.  It needs a heart, a
sense of connection which comes from friendship as much as fantasy.  In a
film which throws so many problems and situations at the screen that
nothing sticks together, it is ironic that the only thing which does stick
together -- Alex and Isabel -- probably shouldn't.

Title
Review for Speechless (1994)
Starring:  Michael Keaton, Geena Davis, Christopher Reeve.
Screenplay:  Robert King.
Director:  Ron Underwood.
     All right, all right, we get the point:  despite all similarities
to the best-selling story, SPEECHLESS is *not* based on the romance
between 1992 Presidential campaign rivals James Carville and Mary
Matalin.  In fact, the script was in development well before 1992.
Still, the comparisons are inevitable, until one realizes a critical
difference.  No, it's not that the SPEECHLESS twosome are speech
writers, not campaign managers; it's that Carville and Matalin's story
is actually interesting.  SPEECHLESS is a limp, poorly structured
would-be romantic comedy.
     SPEECHLESS is set during a New Mexico senatorial campaign, where
Kevin Vallick (Michael Keaton) and Julia Mann (Geena Davis) meet and
get romantic one night when neither one can sleep.  What neither one
realizes is that they are on opposite sides of the campaign:  Kevin is
a sit-com writer brought in to punch up the Republican candidate's
speeches, while Julia is the chief speech writer for the Democratic
candidate.  At first each one believes that the other has an ulterior
motive for the relationship, but eventually they let down their guard
and become closer.  But there are plent of obstacles in the way,
including Julia's stud-reporter fiance (Christopher Reeve) and a series
of stunts which continue to prove that all's fair in love and
politics.
     The standard formula for a movie like SPEECHLESS would have the
two principles starting out as antagonists and realizing only at the
end that they're crazy about each other.  Screenwriter Robert King
completely subverts expectations by throwing Kevin and Julia into each
other's arms in the first fifteen minutes, then developing the
antagonism.  It's a noble attempt to shake things up, but unfortunately
it just doesn't work.  Part of the fun of watching sparring in a
romantic comedy comes from recognizing the chemistry even before the
characters do, but in SPEECHLESS they already know they're attracted to
each other, and we're left with waiting for the campaign to end so
they'll admit that they love each other already.  There is such a
herky-jerky feel to the constant bickering and making up that even
King's sharp dialogue can't prevent SPEECHLESS from becoming repetitive
after about half an hour.
     Inconsistency is also the defining characteristic of the
performances of Geena Davis and Michael Keaton, and with those
performances most of their scenes together.  The problems begin with
their initial courtship, which does virtually nothing to establish
Julia's character and merely establishes that Kevin is a wise-ass.
Davis is radiantly beautiful, and Keaton is generally entertaining, but
these characters are so plastic that nothing that happens to them seems
to matter one bit.  In a couple of scenes, like a quiet moment sitting
at a fountain, they actually achieve some measure of connection.  For
the most part, however, they're just actors spouting lines.  You keep
waiting for a little spark, and it never happens.
     Perhaps most disappointing is that King and director Ron Underwood
completely waste their premise by removing all the punch from
SPEECHLESS's politics.  The setting seems perfect for a high- energy
battle of the sexes with partisanship thrown into the mix, but that's
never the tone that Underwood is going for.  He wants a warm, fuzzy
romance compatible with Marc Shaiman's flute-and-wind musical score,
and the campaign which should have defined the conflict between Kevin
and Julia fades into the background.  It might as well have been a
story about rival grocers, and every single character is about as
uninspired as he or she could possibly be.
     I was about the only reviewer in the civilized world who seemed to
enjoy Robert King's previous screenplay, the Dana Carvey flop CLEAN
SLATE, so I had some hopes for SPEECHLESS.  But while there is wit in
the words, this is a script which was probably much better on paper.
On screen, it's still paper thin.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION
(Paramount)
Starring:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham.
Screenplay:  Michael Piller.
Producer:  Rick Berman.
Director:  Jonathan Frakes.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     By now, every "Star Trek" fan deserving of the name is familiar with
the "odd-even" rule for the feature films.  The second, fourth, sixth and
eighth films in the series have been the most entertaining; the first,
third, fifth and seventh, not so much.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION, the
latest biannual return of the "Next Generation" cast, marks the ninth
big-screen journey into the Trek universe, inspiring a combination of
trepidation and hope.  Could this finally be the adventure which would
break the odd-number jinx?
     Well, not exactly.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is an average story,
competently told, energized primarily by the chance to mingle once again
with the characters from the "Next Generation" television series.  The
premise finds the Enterprise called to assist when Data (Brent Spiner),
participating in a mission on another planet, apparently malfunctions.
Once in the system, Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and company discover
the voluntarily agrarian Ba'ku society about to be removed from the planet
by an alliance between a Federation admiral (Anthony Zerbe) and a race
called the Son'a, led by Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham).  It seems that
radiation on the Ba'ku planet possesses a "fountain of youth" quality
which makes it incredibly valuable, particularly to the genetically
deteriorating Son'a.  Picard is outraged by the plan to forcefully
relocate the Ba'ku, however, and leads his crew to help defend the planet
against the Son'a's sinister plans.
     STAR TREK: INSURRECTION, like most of the films in the series, is
clearly designed to appeal to the Trek faithful first, and to a broader
audience second.  That's one of the qualities which makes INSURRECTION
feel as fragmented as it does.  Every cast member gets to bow to the crowd 
in a showcase sub-plot -- Data bonds with a Ba'ku boy over the mysteries
of childhood; Worf (Michael Dorn) re-experiences Klingon puberty as a
side-effect of the planet's radiation; Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also
directed) gets frisky with Troi (Marina Sirtis) and shaves off his beard;
LaForge (LeVar Burton) has his natural eyesight regenerated and weeps at
the sight of a sunset.  During the run of the series, each cast member
could get a couple of episodes per season to anchor the main story line.
Over the course of a 100 minute film, trying to give seven characters
enough to do to keep them happy leads to plenty of punch lines but not
enough focus.
     It's particularly unfortunate that all the business for the other
crew members draws attention away from Patrick Stewart.  Here he gets a
romantic relationship with a Ba'ku woman (Donna Murphy), as well as a
chance to lecture on the historical tragedies of "ethnic cleansing."
Stewart has the presence to make virtually anything he does feel
commanding, but there's always a sense that he should have _more_ to do.
Just as he was always the best thing about the "Next Generation" series,
he's the bext thing about the "Next Generation" films, whether playing the
fool in a ceremonial headdress or radiating moral courage.  Stewart as
Picard is almost always going to be a good enough reason to watch a Trek
film, while watching him step back for the good of the ensemble will
always be a bit disappointing.
     There are other good reasons to see this particular film, including
some sharply-staged action sequences (Frakes showed a similar facility in
1996's FIRST CONTACT) and plenty of belly laughs.  There are also other 
reasons to be disappointed, including a wasted villain in F. Murray
Abraham and a resolution which you may miss if you blink.  Altogether it
feels a bit small for the big screen, more like a solid episode of the
series  (complete with obvious allegory) than a film.  Perhaps there
aren't that many great ideas for Trek features to go around, and maybe
that's why the heirs to Gene Roddenberry's vision manage to come up with a
really good one only once every four years.  If they decided not to make a
movie every two years, and waited until that really good idea was ready,
they could eliminate that "odd-even" problem once and for all.

Title
Review for Casablanca (1942)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Humphrey Bogart, Ingrid Bergman, Paul Henreid, Claude Rains,
Conrad Veidt, Sidney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre, Dooley Wilson.
Screenplay:  Julius J. Epstein & Philip G. Epstein and Howard Koch, with
additional material.
Director:  Michael Curtiz.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, Nazis)
Running Time:  111 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I suppose it was inevitable given the confluence of trends.  The
surprising success of THE ENGLISH PATIENT, culminating in its sweep of the
1997 Academy Awards, proved that there is an audience for sweeping period
romance with a political dimension; the phenomenal success of the STAR
WARS re-release demonstrated that there was an audience for re-worked
versions of classic films.  Warner Bros. claimed that this "definitive"
version of the legendary 1942 film CASABLANCA has been in the works for a
while to coincide with its 55th anniversary, but the timing seems a bit
too convenient.  Whatever the reasons and however the suits at Warners
might be trying to spin it, this re-release probably strikes fear into the
hearts of movie lovers everywhere, yet it need not do so.  Under the
supervision of the Warner Bros. marketing department, CASABLANCA has been
updated with intriguing results, and may find a new, younger audience it
never had before.
     The story, of course, finds American expatriate Rick Blaine (Humphrey
Bogart) operating a nightclub in Casablanca during the Second World War
with friend and piano player Sam (Dooley Wilson).  Rick is content to let
the swirling political events go on without his interference, but that is
before, out of all the gin joints in the world, Ilsa Lund (Ingrid Bergman)
walks into his.  Ilsa is an old flame, the one that got away, now married
to resistance leader Victor Laszlo (Paul Henreid) after leaving Rick at a
train station in Paris.  Laszlo is wanted by Nazi authorities, and the
letters of transit obtained by Rick are just the ticket to get Laszlo out
of the country.  Rick must choose between honor, love and
self-preservation as the much-desired letters of transit become the most
wanted items in Casablanca.
     The familiar story of CASABLANCA is quite enough to warrant another
trip to the big screen, but the elements added in this new version make it
perhaps even more compelling.  Max Steiner's glorious score has been
digitally re-mastered, providing a lush background for the film.  New
sequences include an additional exchange between Rick and rival club owner
Ferrari (Sidney Greenstreet) which did not make it into the original
version due to technical limitations.  Greestreet has been
computer-generated for this sequence, and the character provides an
amusing reaction shot when Rick steps on his tail while moving around him.
Dooley Wilson's famous rendering of "As Time Goes By" has also been jazzed
up, given a more up-tempo arrangement and the addition of more background
dancers.  Most impressive is the final scene at the airport, where
Laszlo's plane takes off and soon explodes with a spectacular corona
effect.
     A dozen well-known screenwriters have also contributed to this effort
by providing additional dialogue and sub-plots which flesh out the story
and characters.  Joe Eszterhas gives Ilsa a new dimension by making her a
predatory bisexual, fascinated by the innocent young girl whom Rick saves
from the clutches of Renault (Claude Rains).  Quentin Tarantino adds a few
choice expletives to Rick's conversations with Renault and Ferrari,
including an exchange regarding the racial politics of contemporary radio
programs, while Carrie Fisher (who also makes a cameo appearance in a
bronze bikini) gives Ilsa a few barbed comebacks to Rick's hard-edged
reactions.  The least effective additions may be those provided by Woody
Allen, who makes Rick considerably less decisive when he consults a
therapist before deciding what to do with the letters of transit.
     Undoubtedly there will be film purists who consider the mere idea of
such supplementary material to be a travesty, but there is a danger to
such knee-jerk, reactionary opposition to the opportunities modern
technology can provide.  Perhaps the nay-sayers would have denied us the
chance to see Fred Astaire tap-dancing with a vacuum cleaner, or Marilyn
Monroe hawking Chanel No. 5.  This is not your father's CASABLANCA; indeed
it is something more.  Sacrifice is for suckers in the 1990s, and this
version acknowledges that reality when Ilsa slips out through the cargo
hold after planting the bomb which sends Laszlo to the only place where
resistance genuinely is futile.  CASABLANCA: SPECIAL EDITION will only be
available in major markets to begin with, which is a true shame.  Perhaps
intense support in cities will allow others the chance to see the problems
of two people amounting to a hill of beans, and a pile of money.

Title
Review for Air Bud (1997)
    In an early scene from AIR BUD, young Josh Framm (Kevin Zegers), a
fatherless and friendless boy in an idyllic suburban neighborhood, rolls a
ball into some bushes and is startled when something rolls the ball back
to him.  Josh leaves a trail of sweet treats to lure his mysterious
companion into the open, whereupon emerges...a squat little
extraterrestrial with a telescoping neck.
     Well, actually, it's a sweet-tempered dog, recently escaped from his
nasty owner, an inept clown named Norm Snively (Michael Jeter).  Even
though the owner doesn't care enough about the dog to name him, he still
shows up to claim his property once he realizes the boy has his dog.  The
boy refuses to give up his new friend, however, because he has come to
love...the little beagle named Shiloh.
     Well, actually, it's a golden retriever named Buddy.  From the
trailers and promotions for AIR BUD, you might be expecting a rambunctious
sports comedy about a bad-team-made-good in the recent Disney tradition,
with a hoops-playing pooch leading a basketball team to victory -- sort of
THE MIGHTY DOGS.  With a few token exceptions, it's nothing of the kind.
Screenwriters Paul Tamasy and Aaron Mendelsohn want AIR BUD to be a
touching story of a lonely boy and his dog, something warm but slow-paced,
something decidedly _not_ THE MIGHTY DOGS.
     Given the formulaic drivel Disney usually passes off as live action
entertainment, that noble goal alone should have made AIR BUD worth
supporting.  Unfortunately, two cosmically bad decisions gummed up the
works.  The first of these you can chalk up to Tamasy and Mendelsohn, who
make the mistake of attempting to evoke the most beloved lonely boy and
his dog story of recent years (Steven Spielberg's E. T.) while 
incidentally evoking the best lonely boy and his dog story of this year
(the recent video debut SHILOH).  Young Kevin Zegers is a decent enough
actor, but he's fighting against some tough precedents when he tries to
make his friendship with Buddy uniquely compelling, as well as fighting
against Charles Martin Smith's languid direction.
     The second mistake is purely the fault of Disney's marketing
department, which will be luring unsuspecting kids and their parents to
what they believe is going to be a slapstick comedy.  Buddy's impressive
basketball tricks might make a nice five-minute visit with Letterman or
Leno, but they're not the stuff a feature film is made of.  With the
exception of one minor chase scene and the big basketball game finale
(which features the ridiculous fiction -- and anyone who has ever been to
a middle school basketball game will realize this -- of a middle school
basketball game with a score in the 80s and a team which runs a pivot game
reminiscent of Medowlark Lemon-era Globetrotters), AIR BUD is achingly
slow. Twice as many children in the screening audience were roaming the
aisles as were enraptured by the less-than-antic antics of Josh and Buddy.
     It's tough to knock a family film which dares to avoid bodily
function humor, but AIR BUD simply has no focus or direction, a fact made
abundantly clear when the ridiculous basketball game finale gives way to
an even more ridiculous courtroom finale.  The custody battle for Buddy is
even more of a chore to sit through than the rest of the film, and it does
families the service of explaining to children that our legal system is
based on dotty old judges with delusions of Solomonic wisdom.  AIR BUD is
really deserving of praise for only one reason:  it's not what it's being
sold as.  Three cheers for the curative powers of false advertising.

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
HAPPY, TEXAS
(Miramax)
Starring:  Jeremy Northam, Steve Zahn, William H. Macy, Ally Walker,
Illeana Douglas, M. C. Gainey.
Screenplay:  Ed Stone, Phil Reeves and Mark Illsley.
Producers:  Mark Illsley, Rick Montgomery and Ed Stone.
Director:  Mark Illsley.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is entirely likely that few viewers will think of HAPPY, TEXAS as
an instantly dated comedy.  They'll laugh along with the broad humor,
letting the premise take them along on all its wacky misunderstandings and
complications.  They'll roar like the audience member in front of me at
the incongruous situations.  And while there are plenty of things that are
worth a chuckle in HAPPY, TEXAS, there is this one glaring issue that made
it impossible for me to surrender completely to its zaniness.  You see, in
HAPPY, TEXAS, homosexuality itself is the punch line.  It's a superbly
cast feature-length episode of "Three's Company."
     The story begins on a Texas chain gang, where con artist Harry
Sawyer (Jeremy Northam), car thief Wayne Wayne Wayne Jr. (Steve Zahn) and
murderer Bob Maslow (M. C. Gainey) are on their way back to solitary after
a scuffle.  A close call with an armadillo sends the transport van into a
ditch, freeing the three prisoners, with Maslow freeing himself more
completely while leaving Harry and Wayne chained together.  After stealing
an R.V., the two escaped cons find themselves in the small town of Happy,
which has been expecting the two men in this particular R.V.  The two men
are Steven and David, profesional beauty pageant organizers hired to
prepare local grade-school girls for the Little Miss Fresh-Squeezed
competition.  Oh, and Steven and David also happen to be gay lovers.
     Naturally, Harry and Wayne's role-playing leads to confusion and
awkward moments.  Some of those moments are indeed very funny,
particularly Wayne's spastic first attempts at choreography and his
brusque manner with the children; others are ridiculously trite, like the
number of occasions in which Harry and Wayne are caught in what appears to
others to be a tender moment.  HAPPY, TEXAS tries to create some character
relationships, notably a pseudo-romance between Harry and local bank
president Jo ("Profiler's" Ally Walker), but there's not much to any of
the interactions that feels genuine.  When the film builds towards a
will-they-or-won't-they involving Harry and Jo, the more appropriate
question given the slapdash efforts at building Harry's character arc, is
why-should-we-care.
     The reason nothing has any resonance, or even much humanity to the
belly laughs, is that HAPPY, TEXAS seems entirely content to be a sit-com.
When the town's laconic sheriff Chappy (William H. Macy) reveals his own
affections for Harry, the scene could have been played simply for the
comic awkwardness of the moment.  Instead, you can feel the audience
responding giddily to the mere idea of one man touching another, to the
sight of a gay bar, to Chappy and Harry slow dancing.  The wonderfully
talented Macy invests Chappy with far more warmth and dignity than the
character deserves, but there's something disconcerting about the whole
enterprise.  While it may seem surrealistically forward-thinking to have
an entire small Texas town respond with tolerant indifference to the idea
of two gay men working with their children, the device actually serves the
opposite purpose.  I was left watching a fish-out-of-water comedy in which
the land animals weren't in on the jokes at the fishes' expense.
     HAPPY, TEXAS winds up even clumsier when Maslow returns, setting up a
car-chase-and-shootout showdown.  At least by that point the film has
surrendered to its lowbrow sensibilities, making for a raucous comedy
with little subtlety.  The talent in the cast keeps sparking HAPPY, TEXAS
to comic high notes -- Macy, as already noted, is utterly charming; Zahn
is a delightfully high-strung and bug-eyed -- yet those notes rarely blend
into a happy tune.  I can't imagine the film played that way on the page
with this many gifted actors interested, but HAPPY, TEXAS offers the same
situations John Ritter turned into laugh-track gold 20 years ago.  How
little has changed in the gay '90s.

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Jon Voight, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Bruce McGill, Esther
Rolle, Loren Dean, Elise Neal, Michael Rooker, Cahterine Kellner.
Screenplay:  Gregory Poirier.
Producer:  Jon Peters.
Director:  John Singleton.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  139 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In October 1994, a South Carolina woman named Susan Smith claimed
that she was assaulted by a black man who then stole her car with her two
young sons inside.  Eventually, Smith herself confessed to, and was found
guilty of, murdering her own children, but for a while people were on the
lookout for a non-existent black assailant.  This not-so-anecdotal aside
is offered for anyone who might think of ROSEWOOD simply as a sad footnote
in American history.  Even if that were the case, John Singleton's
ROSEWOOD would still be a powerful drama, but it is something more.  It is
a chilling study of the culture of racism which challenges us to consider
whether we still live in a country where, as one character in ROSEWOOD
describes it, "nigger is just another word for guilty."
     ROSEWOOD begins on December 31, 1922 in a rural Florida county,
focusing on two neighboring communities:  the all-white town of Sumner,
and the nearly all-black town of Rosewood.  As the year prepares to turn,
unusual events occur in both towns.  In Rosewood, a stranger named Mann
(Ving Rhames) rides into town and considers settling down there; in
Sumner, a white woman named Fannie Taylor (Catherine Kellner) is beaten by
her white lover, but accuses an unknown black man of the crime.  Though
the sheriff of Sumner (Michael Rooker) urges restraint, it doesn't take
long for the citizens to band together in a lynch mob to search for an
escaped convict rumored to be in the area.  Soon ROSEWOOD erupts in flames
and chaos, with every inhabitant a suspected collaborator and every home a
suspected hiding place.  Only two people have a chance to lead some of the
residents of Rosewood to safety:  Mann, and white shopkeeper John Wright
(Jon Voight).
     After two films in which John Singleton let his urge to lecture
interfere in the storytelling (POETIC JUSTICE and HIGHER LEARNING), he has
returned to the masterful composition and dramatic power of BOYZ N THE
HOOD.  In ROSEWOOD, we have the opportunity to get to know the inhabitants
of both Sumner and Rosewood as individuals, compounding the tragedy even
as it makes the triumphs more affecting.  Even the towns themselves
develop distinct personalities:  while Rosewood is a thriving town where
the residents take pride in the fact that they own almost all the land,
Sumner is a town of less picturesque wooden homes where the white
residents actually envy their black counterparts in Rosewood.  The 
situation recalls similar reactions against successful minorities in more
contemporary times, and focuses the double-edged "logic" of racism:  an
unsuccessful minority is shiftless, while a successful minority is uppity,
or taking what "rightfully" belongs to whites.
     The great success of ROSEWOOD is that it turns its story into broader
commentary on how racism functions without sacrificing that story.  Many
of the individual images in ROSEWOOD are riveting, portraying
unromanticized violence and pastoral beauty with equal effectiveness
thanks to the impressive cinematography of Johnny E. Jensen.  The
performances are also uniformly strong, led by Don Cheadle as strong,
defiant Sylvester Carrier and Jon Voight (in his best role in a decade) as
the reluctant hero Wright.  Then, beyond the events of the principal
narrative, you begin to notice that ROSEWOOD is presenting one of the most
complex examinations of racism ever committed to film.  Characters are not
presented in black-and-white in their views of black and white.  There is
a continuum of culpability, from Wright's opportunistic treatment of his
black neighbors to the sheriff's crimes of omission to the matter-of-fact
brutality of Duke (Bruce McGill), a Sumner resident determined to teach
his son "how the world is."  It is one of the film's most chilling moments
when the mob acknowledges with a chuckle that no one really believes a
black man assaulted the notably promiscuous Fannie.  For them, a lynch mob
isn't even about some perverted notion of justice.  It's just how the
world is.
     The only stumbles in ROSEWOOD occur when screenwriter Gregory Poirier
bows to convention.  A romance between Mann and a young schoolteacher
(Elise Neal) adds little to the story but a reason for a climactic
embrace; a few scenes near the end, including a big resolution within
Wright's family, seem designed simply to garner audience applause.  A two
hours and twenty minutes, ROSEWOOD does start to drag once the lengthy
pursuit of the survivors through the swamps begins, but you continue to
care because Singleton has taken the time to make those lives matter.
It's worth sticking through to the ending because in ROSEWOOD, the ending
is actually a sort of beginning.  Though we only need to look at headlines
to understand that ROSEWOOD sometimes is about the way the world still is,
it is also about the way the world could be.

Title
Review for First Kid (1996)
     I suppose one cannot dismiss "Star Search" as an utter vacuum in the
history of entertainment if it gave us Sinbad.  You may or may not recall
that The Comedian Formerly Known as David Adkins got his big break by
winning the comedy competition of the now-defunct talent contest a decade
or so ago, and that's almost enough to make up for giving us Carrot Top.
It's hard to explain my inordinate fondness for Sinbad, except to note
that I also loved Bill Cosby's stand-up, and I think of Sinbad as Cosby's
natural successor in the same way Eddie Murphy can be considered Richard
Pryor's.  Sinbad works clean _and_ funny, and he strikes me as an
incredibly decent person besides.  I have always believed that some day he
would justify my faith by making a great film comedy.  But FIRST KID is
not it.
     Sinbad plays Sam Simms, a Secret Service agent with a penchant for
loud ties and unconventional behavior which keeps him in low profile
assignments like working security at a mall where the President's
13-year-old son Luke (Brock Pierce) goes shopping for school clothes.
Little does Simms know that he is about to get up closer and more personal
with Luke:  when Luke's bodyguard (Timothy Busfield) is fired, it's Simms
who is handed the job.  That means escorting him to school, keeping track
of his pet snake and generally putting up with Luke's bad attitude.  It is
only when Simms realizes the reason for that attitude -- Luke feels
ignored and isolated -- that he decides to help Luke become a normal,
all-American teen-ager.
     FIRST KID is far from the first film about antagonists turned
inevitably like the seasons into friends; in fact, it's not even the first
film in which the antagonists are a Secret Service agent and a
Presidential family member (that would be 1994's GUARDING TESS).  And it's
not just a formula film, it's a formula film aimed at kids, which means
that clever banter is never used to establish the antagonism where a
pratfall, a bare backside or plenty of messy food can be used in its
place.  FIRST KID even manages to combine cop movie cliches (the grouchy
superior officer, played by Art LaFleur) with coming-of-age movie cliches
(the first girlfriend, played by Erin Williby).  Mind you, the film seemed
to be perfectly hilarious to the kids in the audience, although I can't
for the life of me understand why a film aimed at 12-year-olds included a
cameo by Sonny Bono.
     Still, as grossly predictable as FIRST KID is, I still found myself
smiling a lot at Sinbad.  I think he is the perfect star for a children's
film, because there is something wonderfully warm and open about his
screen persona.  Despite standing 6'5", Sinbad is more of an over-sized
teddy bear than an intimidating physical presence, and every time he
grins, it seems completely genuine.  He has precious little to work with
in FIRST KID -- a bland mentor (Robert Guillaume), an even blander
President (James Naughton) -- but the sheer force of his good nature keeps
you hoping something will come along and be deserving.  Unfortunately, he
is stuck playing with Brock Pierce, who is pleasant enough as the timid,
self-conscious Luke but doesn't have the spark to convince us he could be
obnoxious enough to irritate anyone.  When Luke gets in a fight with a
school bully ("Home Improvement's" Zachery Ty Bryan), it should be a sort
of comeuppance; instead, it's just plain sad.
     I might not have had a real problem with FIRST KID if screenwriter
Tim Kelleher and director David Mickey Evans had done what it appeared
they were initially intending to do, which is to tell a simple, harmless,
goofy buddy story with lots of physical comedy for kids.  However, they
make a big mistake by turning the conclusion into a suspense drama
involving an attempted kidnapping of Luke (extra credit points in
Cinematic Obviousness 101 if you can guess the kidnapper just from my
review).  They seem to feel that it is necessary to show Simms as a good
agent as well as a good guy, and that is fine, but the gunplay which
ensues is a bit too serious, making the last fifteen minutes somewhat
inappropriate for young children.  Far better to give Sinbad the
opportunity to take over the film, since he was clearly the best thing
they had going for them.  FIRST KID is not an unpleasant film, it's just a
blatantly unnecessary one.  Sinbad needs to search for some better
material to hang his star on.  Ed McMahon would not approve.

Title
Review for Love Affair (1994)
Starring:  Warren Beatty, Annette Bening, Garry Shandling, Katharine
Hepburn, Pierce Brosnan, Kate Capshaw.
Screenplay:  Warren Beatty and Robert Towne.
Director:  Glenn Gordon Caron.
     Making an old-fashioned romance isn't as easy as it might look.
While films from this year like IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU and ONLY YOU
attempted to re-create the magic of bygone love stories, they succeeded
primarily in creating cloying pseudo-parodies of what those classic
stories were all about:  that perfect someone appearing at the most
improbable--and inconvenient--time.  LOVE AFFAIR does it right.
Warren Beatty and Annette Bening have taken this third telling of a
tear-jerking classic and made it a warm, sentimental and beautifully
filmed experience, limited in its effectiveness only by Beatty's
somewhat wooden lead performance.
     Beatty stars as Mike Gambril, a former NFL quarterback and
inveterate womanizer who is engaged to a popular talk show host (Kate
Capshaw) as more of a business deal than a love match.  On a flight to
Australia, Mike meets Terry McKay (Bening), a struggling would-be
singer herself engaged to a wealthy businessman (Pierce Brosnan).  When
their plane is forced to make an emergency landing, Mike and Terry end
up together for three days on a ship bound for Tahiti and the flight
which will take them home.  In those three days they fall in love, and
vow to meet again in three months if their lives are free of their
previous entanglements.  However, fate intervenes on the appointed day,
and the course of true love does not run smooth.
     If there is one unquestionable triumph to LOVE AFFAIR, it is the
atmosphere.  Director Glenn Gordon Caron (creator of TV's
"Moonlighting") sets up the kind of shots one might expect from a film
fifty years older:  Bening descending a staircase into frame; Beatty
appearing entirely in shadow during their airport fairwell; a slow,
patient scene late in the film in Bening's apartment.  There is a
lyricism to his direction, without the force qualities of other recent
romances.  Cinematographer Conrad L. Hall shoots in deep oranges and
with lots of filters, and photographs Bening in the loving style which
used to be reserved for Grace Kelly or Ingrid Bergman.  Ennio
Morricone's sweet, simple score also contributes to a mood which
inspires you to hold your date's hand a bit more tightly.
     This is not to say that LOVE AFFAIR gets by on style points
alone.  Beatty has rounded up a truckload of talent to bring the script
(co-written by Beatty and Robert Towne) to life.  At the top of the
list is Bening, Beatty's real life better half, who shines as Terry.
Few actresses in film can manage the kind of mature, intelligent appeal
she brings to her roles, which makes it a shame that her appearances
have been so infrequent of late.  Here she is both savvy and
vulnerable, more than a match for Beatty's aging playboy but still
harboring basic insecurities.  It's not a flashy role--LOVE AFFAIR is
not a flashy movie--but it's a fine performance.  Garry Shandling is
a delight as Kip, Mike Gambril's agent, toning down his usual neurotic
persona and giving a witty reading, and Harold Ramis has a funny cameo
as an acerbic accountant.  But the film is stolen by Katharine Hepburn,
making her first big screen appearance in 13 years as Mike's Aunt
Ginny.  Her scene with Bening, in which she lays the groundwork for
Mike and Terry's relationship, is wonderful, and proves that Hepburn
can still act the heck out of a part (as well as that she is familiar
with a certain four-letter word).
     It's one of LOVE AFFAIR's most significant failings that that same
scene does more to explain Beatty's character than Beatty himself
manages to do.  He sort of wanders through this part at times, never
letting us know what Terry sees in him beyond his come-ons.  This could
have proved to be a fatal flaw, but there is just enough inherent
romance in the situation that their pairing doesn't seem completely
implausible.  LOVE AFFAIR also lags significantly once the two lovers
are separated, with nearly non-existent roles by Capshaw, Brosnan and
Chloe Webb attempting to bridge the gap.  But the cathartic final scene
is effective enough to make up for the melancholy tone of the final
half hour.
     Sentimentality is frequently a tough sell.  LOVE AFFAIR may be
schmaltz, but it is artfully executed and well-acted schmaltz.  And it
renews my faith that somewhere, someone knows how to make a real love
story.

Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
BLUES BROTHERS 2000
(Universal)
Starring:  Dan Aykroyd, John Goodman, Joe Morton, J. Evan Bonifant.
Screenplay:  Dan Aykroyd and John Landis.
Producers:  Dan Aykroyd, John Landis and Leslie Belzberg.
Director:  John Landis.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, adult themes).
Running Time:  123 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For 18 years, THE BLUES BROTHERS has occupied a unique position as
perhaps the only action-musical in film history.  The adventures of Jake
(John Belushi) and Elwood Blues (Dan Aykroyd) on their "mission from God"
somehow managed to mix production numbers and car chases into a ridiculous
cocktail of over-the-top absurdity and musical showmanship.  Much of the
film's unlikely success was attributed to the chemistry between Belushi
and Aykroyd, but the primary responsibility of the two stars was to
maintain a stoic demeanor behind their dark glasses.  No, I think THE
BLUES BROTHERS worked because it really _was_ like a mission for those
involved.  Belushi, Aykroyd and director John Landis became proselytizers
for soul, prepared to do absolutely anything to bring their musical
message to the people.  If that meant juxtaposing the Godfather of Soul
and vehicular chaos, so be it.  It was an insane film powered by the
fervor of true believers.
     If BLUES BROTHERS 2000 leaves a viewer feeling less than satisfied,
it's not necessarily due to the absence of the late Belushi, though John
Goodman does frequently seem unsure exactly what to do with himself.  The
main problem is the absence of a similar focus on the music, replaced by a
more cynical attempt to re-create the past.  The story is an over-plotted
collection of gimmicks, sending Elwood back into the world after nearly
two decades in prison to discover that brother Jake and surrogate father
Curtis (Cab Calloway in the original film) have both passed on.  In a
quest to re-connect with some sort of family, Elwood a) seeks out Curtis's
illegitimate son Cabel (Joe Morton), an Illinois State Police commander;
b) brings a meek bartender named Mack McTeer (Goodman) along to help
re-unite the Blues Brothers Band; and c) hooks up with troubled orphan
Buster (J. Evan Bonifant), who serves the essential purpose of looking
cute in a miniature black suit, hat and shades.
     I'm not suggesting that THE BLUES BROTHERS was anybody's idea of a
streamlined narrative.  It had cops in pursuit, cartoonish hate-mongers, a
gun-wielding psycho, switch-wielding nun Sister Mary Stigmata (Kathleen
Freeman), Aretha Franklin singing, James Brown preaching, and carnage
galore.  BLUES BROTHERS 2000, on the other hand, has...well, every one of
those things, _plus_ items a-c above.  The pointed effort to recreate
every situation from the original -- recruiting the band members from new
vocations, playing a gig for a crowd expecting a different musical style,
etc. -- draws attention to the structure in a way which makes it feel
muddled rather than original, tired, rather than inspired.  Even Aykroyd's
performance draws unnecessary attention to itself, fooling with the notion
that Elwood is a three-dimensional character in need of growth.  Those who
remember him speaking about two dozen words in THE BLUES BROTHERS may be
startled to find that prison life has turned him into a loquacious sort
given to deconstructing the malevolence of Russian gangstersss or the
iconography of the Brothers' distinctive look.  They may also be quite
disappointed at how the loss of his deadpan reactions takes the edge off
the absurdist comedy.
     For all its flaws, however, there's almost enough energy in the
musical numbers alone to make BLUES BROTHERS 2000 worth watching.  In
addition to return players Franklin and Brown, the performers include Sam
Moore, Wilson Pickett and Eddie Floyd (sharing vocals with teen bluesman
Jonny Lang on "634-5789"), and an all-star blues jam for the finale in
which spotting the familiar faces is half the fun, and drooling over the
epic collection of talent is the other half.  Between the high-spirited
production numbers and one spectacular hundred-police-car pile-up -- a
hilarious non-stop parade of soaring, crashing metal -- there is enough
fun to satisfy most viewers, particularly if the familiarity is exactly
what they're looking for.  It's too bad that the much of the film feels
rushed, flattened and processed, like a knock-off sequel cranked out in 18
months instead of 18 years, to be sold with a marketing-friendly
abbreviation like BB2K.  Even with all the retail destruction and
collapsing buildings in THE BLUES BROTHERS, it used to be about the
_music_, man.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
     Wes Anderson has the kind of comic sensibility that keeps you
watching just so you can see where he goes next.  His debut feature BOTTLE
ROCKET married bone-dry wit to good-natured character study in a tale of
would-be thieves whose inbred suburban politesse limits the effectiveness
of their crime spree.  Though the humor was often absurd, Anderson and his
co-writer Owen Wilson never sacrificed character for the sake of an easy
joke.  You got the feeling that they had a genuine affection for their
creations, that they respected the grandiose lengths to which they took
their dreams even as they chuckled at the results.
     It's that same sensibility that makes RUSHMORE such a quirky delight
-- it's a uniquely oddball comedy that's still about people.  One of those
people is Max Fischer (Jason Schwartzman), a 15-year-old student at the
prestigious Rushmore Academy whose several dozen extracurricular
activities don't quite make up for his complete disinterest in academics.
His latest extracurricular interest is Rosemary Cross (Olivia Williams), a
first-grade teacher at Rushmore with whom Max is instantly smitten.  In
an attempt to win her affections, Max enlists the aid of his friend Herman
Blume (Bill Murray), a millionaire industrialist, to build an aquarium at
the school in Miss Cross's honor.  Unfortunately, Max soon finds Blume
turned from ally to competitor for the fair lady's heart, beginning a
strange war between the two.
     It would have been easy enough for Anderson to turn RUSHMORE into an
ever-escalating, bigger-must-be-funnier battle of pranks.  Instead, he
spends plenty of time getting us inside the messed-up heads of his two
central characters.  In a telling first scene, we see Max daydreaming
about solving a brain-cracking geometry problem and receiving a grand
ovation from his classmates.  Like a typical teen, Max is concerned with
how others see him; unlike a typical teen, his concern manifests itself 
in an obsession with grand gestures, with being perceived as important.
He lives and breathes for Rushmore because it gives him an impressive
stage to found dozens of clubs, produce his overwrought plays and forget
that he's the son of a barber.  As splendidly portrayed by first-time
actor Schwartzman, Max's egomaniacal infatuations -- first with the school
and then with Miss Cross -- come off as the sweetly immature behavior of a
kid trying way too hard to appear mature.
     There's plenty immature about Herman Blume as well, imbued with an
aura of pure defeat by Bill Murray.  Unhappy with his wife and sadistic
teenage twins, Blume longs for the simpler troubles of youth.  His
betrayal of Max to begin his own romance with Miss Cross could have made
him a villain; instead, his behavior indicates a man returning to
typically childish inconsiderate acts like stealing his best friend's
girlfriend.  Though the destructive salvos exchanged by Max and Blume are
wonderfully funny, they're also ridiculous because of the players 
involved:  a kid working desperately to be an adult, and an adult working
desperately to be a kid.
     With a foundation in those two marvelous characters, RUSHMORE is free
to let its comedy swoop from the sublime (Max appearing in the darkened
back seat of Blume's car like a double-crossed mafioso, cigarette glowing
ominously) to the ridiculous (Max's stage re-creation of Vietnam).
Anderson shows an equal facility for off-kilter compositions and deadpan
dialogue (Max to Vietnam veteran Blume:  "So...were you in the sh*t?"),
combining for one of the smartest comedies you'll see.  Anderson and
Wilson do bite off perhaps a few too many plot threads -- the friendship
between Max and his young Rushmore "chapel buddy" (Mason Gamble) doesn't
really go anywhere -- but there are so many deft comic touches that the
less interesting elements are somehow diluted.  At its core, the narrative
of RUSHMORE is quite conventional stuff about people who learn Important
Lessons about what they want from life.  Those lessons are given such a
singular presentation that you may only realize after you've stopped
laughing that these people, for all their foolishness, are all the more
appealing because they're real.

Title
Review for Ponette (1996)
     When people learn in social settings that I am a film critic, two
inevitable questions arise.  The first -- "So what's good?" -- is always a
pleasure to answer; in fact, telling people what's good is the purest
pleasure in this job.  Unfortunately, many of my recommendations are
unfamiliar to casual movie-goers, which begs the second, more aggravating
question:  "So what's it about?"  It seems simple enough, a harmless
request for a thumbnail sketch of the plot, but it also asks one to strip
a film down to the single sentence you might find in a "TV Guide" summary.
     If someone asked me what PONETTE was about, I'd grit my teeth and say
that the plot set-up concerns a 4-year-old French girl (Victoire Thivisol)
coping with her mother's tragic death in a car accident.  I would then
refuse to let the individual walk away until I explained that PONETTE
isn't really "about" a grieving little girl, that it's not the maudlin
drama full of teary-eyed waifs that such a hopelessly under-descriptive
synopsis might portend.  At turns genuinely touching and delightfully
amusing, PONETTE is really about that point in childhood where every
question has a hundred different answers.
     Little Ponette's question seems to her to be a very straightforward
one -- she simply wants to know how she can talk to her mother again.  The
problem is that every single person she encounters approaches that
question in a different way.  Ponette's Aunt Claire (Claire Nebout) tells
her about Jesus' resurrection and subsequent appearance to the disciples
waiting for him, leading Ponette to the logical conclusion that her mother
could also return from the dead if someone were waiting for her.  Her
young cousins Matiaz and Delphine (Matiaz Bureau Caton and Delphine 
Schiltz) suggest the use of a magic word; a young classmate named Ada
(Leopoldine Serre), a self-proclaimed "child of God," offers to put 
Ponette through several trials so that she too can speak to God and ask
for an intercession; Ponette's father (Xavier Beauvois) discourages all
thoughts of religion and tries to make her cope with the real world.
Overwhelmed by a dizzying range of possibilities, Ponette does what any
reasonable 4-year-old would do:  she tries all of them, then finds her
grief deepening when nothing seems to work.
     The truth writer/director Jacques Doillon mines is that, between the
well-intentioned happy talk and half-truths of adults and the ill-informed
"facts" of peers, it's a wonder that children learn anything about life's
complicated questions.  In one hilarious scene, Delphine explains to
Matiaz the difference between Catholics and Jews (including the
little-knows fact that Arabs are actually Catholics, because they too are
"not Jews"), while another scene captures two girls struggling to
understand what it means when a person is "single."  Childhood at this age
may never have been portrayed with more grace, humor or startling realism,
from the spectacular performances of the young actors (none better than
the mesmerizing Thivisol) to Doillon's plucked-from-preschool script.
     Doillon's insights are so honest for so long that his conclusion,
involving a supernatural visitation, comes as a real disappointment.  It's
too obvious and too pedantic a resolution to a film which is built around
the absence of easy answers.  The beauty of PONETTE comes from watching a
child who is just coming to understand the basic truths of the world
struggle with the ambiguities of life, death and God.  There are no
simple questions in PONETTE, no even a question so apparently simple as,
"So what's it about?"

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
BEST IN SHOW
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Christopher Guest, Eugene Levy, Catherine O'Hara, Parker Posey,
Michael Hitchcock, Michael McKean, John Michael Higgins, Jennifer
Coolidge, Jane Lynch, Fred Willard.
Screenplay:  Christopher Guest and Eugene Levy.
Producer:  Karen Murphy.
Director:  Christopher Guest.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, adult humor)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You have to believe that Christopher Guest is a smart enough guy to
realize he's setting himself up for some tough comparisons. The legendary
mock documentary THIS IS SPINAL TAP, co-starring and co-written by Guest,
is making a return appearance to theaters to remind viewers that it was
the funniest comedy of the 1980s; Guest also co-wrote and directed WAITING
FOR GUFFMAN, another very funny mock documentary. It's a format that's
been good for Guest, and you can't blame him for returning to the well,
especially when venturing outside it to direct has resulted in garbage
like the Chris Farley/Matthew Perry debacle ALMOST HEROES. But you have to
wonder when his luck will run out. How many mock documentaries can one
director fit on the head of a pin?
     BEST IN SHOW is a very entertaining film comedy on a pure laugh
meter, but it's missing something SPINAL TAP and GUFFMAN both had to
spare: a real perspective on its subject, and genuine affection for its
characters. The setting is the world of dog shows, specifically the
prestigious Mayflower Kennel Club Dog Show in Philadelphia. The
"documentary" follows several participants through their travels to and
preparation for the show. Gerry (Eugene Levy) and Cookie Fleck (Catherine
O'Hara) drive up from Florida with their Norwich terrier Winky; 
high-strung yuppie couple Hamilton (Michael Hitchcock) and Meg Swan 
(Parker Posey) bring their equally high-strung Weimeraner Beatrice; North
Carolina fishing supply store owner Harlan Pepper (Guest) comes with his
young bloodhound Hubert. And there's two-time defending champion Rhapsody
in White, a standard poodle owned by trophy wife Sheri Ann Cabot (Jennifer
Coolidge) and handled by veteran trainer Christy Cummings (Jane Lynch).
     As has been the case in Guest's other mockumentaries, BEST IN SHOW
starts with some broadly comic characters to get the gags rolling. Gerry
does plenty of slow burns while man after man relates his sexual history
with Cookie. The braces-wearing Swans freak out over every bump in their
lives. There is also a gay couple (Michael McKean and John Michael 
Higgins) who raise Shih tzus, the latter of whom swishes about and
dispenses double-entendre about pepperoni. Lots of the dialogue -- much of
it obviously improvised -- is hilarious, especially when it involves
absurdities like Harlan's interest in ventriloquism or Gerry's (literal) 
two left feet. If you just sit back and listen, the laughs will keep
coming.
     The laughs should have been richer, however, and there's a reason
they're not. In SPINAL TAP and GUFFMAN, the broad characters were only the
starting point for people that eventually became much more human and
sympathetic as we come to understand their world. Guest never seems nearly
as interested in the complexities of his characters or their world in BEST
IN SHOW. There's no sense for why people become so obsessed with putting
their pets through the show-dog grind, no real affection for their quirks
or insecurities. In fact, he plays downright nasty with Sheri Ann and the
Swans in particular, making them fairly grotesque caricatures. There's a
sense that Guest has picked a milieu where he knew there would be a lot of
weird people, and decided simply to wring the laughs out of their
weirdness.
     There are plenty of laughs to be wrung out of that weirdness,
fortunately, and even more to be wrung from the show itself. BEST IN SHOW
gets a tremendous boost once Fred Willard shows up as the Mayflower show's
loud-mouthed announcer Buck Laughlin, whose inane questions for his
flustered British co-host provide nearly non-stop laughs. Laughlin is also
one of the few characters whose ridiculousness is accompanied by a wink; 
he's a guy doing a job he's utterly unqualified for, embarrassing himself
while trying to make the best of it. Willard is brilliant, and the rest of
BEST IN SHOW is still pretty funny. It's simply funny in a slightly more
mean-spirited way, making it harder to embrace unreservedly. Guest has
scored again, but this time there's a less welcome sort of "mock" in his
mock documentary.

Title
Review for Floundering (1994)
Starring:  James LeGros, Nelson Lyon.
Screenwriter/Director:  Peter McCarthy.
     John Boyz (James LeGros) is FLOUNDERING.  In the days immediately
following the Rodney King verdict riots, Los Angeles resident John is
unemployed, plagued by insomnia and filled with an overwhelming sense
of despair.  And that's the good news.  In the course of one day, John
finds his meager savings confiscated by the IRS, his unemployment
benefits cut off, his girlfriend in bed with another man and his strung
out brother in need of a $3000 detox program.  Teetering on the edge of
sanity, John finds himself on a comic odyssey dominated by the spectre
of class revolution and the visage of fascistic Police Chief Merryl
Fence (Nelson Lyon).
     This is the first directorial effort by Peter McCarthy, producer
of such films as REPO MAN and TAPEHEADS, and those credits should tell
you all you need to know about the style and tone of FLOUNDERING.  It's
a hilariously surreal examination of urban paranoia and hopelessness,
filled with oddball characters, goofy stream-of-consciousness narrative
and instantly quotable lines.  FLOUNDERING is told through a voiceover
narration by John, but it's not so much about John as it is about the
chaotic world around him.  John is only the tour guide, but his
observations are wonderfully off-the-wall:
     On the destruction in South Central L.A.:  "Maybe we should leave
it as a reminder ... then [Peter] Ueberroth will turn it into a riot
theme park."
     On romance:  "True love is the ultimate fiction ... if you ever
walk into a room and find yourself instantly attracted to someone, get
out of that room as fast as you can."
     On a sign in a bakery that reads, "Please don't feed the homeless
beggars:"  "Who the h*** should you feed?"
     McCarthy's script is rich with such moments.  Unfortunately, it's
also rich with heavy-handed left-wing moralizing which could easily
turn off those with differing points of view.  Characters representing
"The System," like Chief Fence and John's teacher- turned-corporate
bigwig friend Doug, are essentially cardboard cutouts used to mouth
opposing dogma.  It's therefore very fortunate that so many of the
other minor roles are so funny.  Many of them are played by "name"
actors in cameos, like John Cusack as a philosophical party-goer, Steve
Buscemi as a friend of John's angry about child slavery rings, and
Ethan Hawke as John's paranoid brother.
     In the middle of it all is James LeGros as John, who adopts an
appropriately blank Young Everyman quality.  He's a guy with a good
heart who finds himself overwhelmed by the apparent injustices in his
world and his feelings of powerlessness to do anything about it.  The
snapshots taken by his mental camera provide a bitingly satirical
collage of urban life, but surprisingly McCarthy doesn't opt for utter
cynicism.  Instead, he manages to balance black-humored sarcasm and
social commentary with an ultimately optimistic message of personal
responsibility.  For those who enjoy their comedy with an edge and
don't mind the occasional preaching, there's a real winner to be found
in FLOUNDERING.
     Besides, how can you not love a film that ends with two
guitarists, one black and one white, singing a marvelously off-key
duet of "(What's So Funny 'Bout) Peace, Love and Understanding?"

Title
Review for 4 Little Girls (1997)
     The best documentaries manage to uncover truths deeper than their
most obvious subjects; the best documentarians recognize that they can use
the film medium to tell stories as compelling as anything fictional.  4
LITTLE GIRLS, a powerful tale of tragic loss turned into positive action,
is more than the sort of "talking head" video textbook most people
envision when they think of conventional documentaries.  It is the work of
a film-maker who knows how to provoke viewers while he educates them, who
has experience examining the challenging subject of race in America.  That
gentleman's name is Spike Lee.
     Lee begins at the ending in 4 LITTLE GIRLS, opening with an elegiac
remembrance of four victims of a racially motivated church bombing in
Birmingham, Alabama in 1963:  11-year-old Denise McNair, 14-year-old
Carole Robertson, 14-year-old Cynthia Wesley and 14-year-old Addie Mae
Collins.  Through photographs and interviews with family and friends, we
come to know the four girls not merely as symbols, but as individuals,
remembered fondly as vibrant lives cut short.  The prologue, accompanied
by the mournful Joan Baez ballad "Birmingham Sunday," concludes with
potent images -- the smiling young faces of the four girls superimposed
over their gravestones.
     From there, Lee launches into a history in brief of the civil rights
movement in Birmingham, one which never feels like a typical documentary.
The knowledge of the tragedy to come lends context and consequenct to the
battles of the civil rights activists; it is a battle which we know will
have its casualties.  And the knowledge of those casualties adds even more
resonance to an unforgettable moment in which former Alabama governor
George Wallace, reduced by strokes to an incomprehensibility requiring
sub-titles, desperately attempts to convince Lee that he is a changed man
by showing off his black "best friend."  4 LITTLE GIRLS creates a vivid
portrait of Alabama in the 1960s, rich with detailed characterizations
which make it feel like Lee always has his eye towards creating a
narrative.
     For all the historical detail, Lee never loses sight of the
centerpiece of the film.  The recollections of the bombing itself are
shattering, none more so than Denise McNair's mother recounting the subtle
condescension she faces when she attempts to see her daughter's body.
It's unfortunate that Lee follows those scenes with the indictment and
trial of "Dynamite Bob" Chambliss for the killings, by far the weakest
sequence in the film.  It may have provided a necessary closure to show
the criminal eventually brought to justice, but 4 LITTLE GIRLS is much
more powerful detailing how this tragedy became a catalyst for change in
the public perception of Southern racism was affected around the world.
Lee also offers frightening comparisons to the recent spate of black
church burnings in the South, highlighting his ability to make the film
many things at once -- a memorial, a history lesson, an opportunity for
healing, a warning to stay vigilant.  4 LITTLE GIRLS is a gripping
experience, an epic testament to triumph over hatred which never forgets
the very personal loss of four families who still miss their four little
girls.

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
     Since time immemorial -- Memorial Day 1996, to be precise -- one
question has plagued movie-goers the world over:  what might MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE have looked like if someone had shown the faintest interest in
telling a coherent story?  As answer, I give you RONIN, an international
espionage thriller fueled by as much brain power as adrenaline.  The
comparison to MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is almost too easy, especially given the
presence of Jean Reno in both casts, but it's a telling comparison
nonetheless.  RONIN shows how much more effective a film can be when set
pieces are connected by ideas.
     The film opens in Paris, where a man known only as Sam (Robert
DeNiro) joins a multi-national band of mercenaries employed by Irish
nationalist Deirdre (Natascha McElhone).  Vincent (Jean Reno) is the
team's French location expert; Gregor (Stellan Skarsgaard) oversees
electronic surveillance; Spence (Sean Bean) is the weapons specialist;
Larry (Skipp Sudduth) serves as their driver.  Their mission is obtaining
a certain silver case by any means necessary, the contents unknown to the
operatives but obviously much in demand.  As the operation begins,
alliances quickly shift with the prevailing winds, no lofty ideal more
important than the exigencies of the moment.
     That notion both drives the film and provides its title.  As
explained in too-literal (especially given a later, more subtle
explanation) on-screen titles, "ronin" is a term for masterless samurai in
feudal Japan, forced to survive as bandits or swords-for-hire without the
honor of serving a worthy lord.  Sam, Vincent and company, all of whom
once served as government agents or soldiers, are now down-sized Cold
Warriors without a patriotic purpose.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE flirted with
the same concept, but it was to turn characters into vengeance-driven
super-villains.  They function in RONIN as free agents, loyal only to
themselves, suspicious and treacherous because everyone around them could
be more suspicious or more treacherous.  The characters are sketched in
only the most basic terms, in keeping with their private natures, yet they
are given presence by actors like DeNiro and Reno bringing mournful weight
to their performances.  Though few words are spoken in the script by J. D.
Zeik and Richard Weisz (a.k.a. David Mamet), the very lack of human
interaction between the characters speaks volumes.
     For a fairly introspective film, RONIN is also a fairly exciting one.
Director John Frankenheimer goes to the car chase well perhaps once too
often, but those he uses are tense and well-constructed.  The action level
is as high in RONIN as it has been in any summer blockbuster of the last
few years, and it's _better_ action, more white-knuckle gripping than
whoop-it-up flashy.  For some viewers, that may be reason enough to spend
two hours at the movies, but it's all the more impressive because the
action serves the story.  Every subsequent violent encounter raises the
stakes in this chaotic world, while it's always clear that the combatants
neither know nor care what they're fighting for.
     RONIN certainly has its share of jagged edges, notably the
aforementioned opening titles and a distracting romantic sub-plot between
DeNiro and McElhone.  Some may find the characters too remote and
under-developed, and consequently find it difficult to invest emotionally
in the story.  I found the chilly isolation of the characters exactly what
Ineeded to become emotionally invested; the emptiness of their lives and
actions _is_ the hook.  This isn't earth-shaking profundity we're talking
about, merely the building blocks of effective drama -- the visceral
coupled with the intellectual, actions with consequences.  Consequences
were never really an issue in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, which makes it that
much easier to appreciate what RONIN has to offer.  It's no longer a James
Bond landscape of world domination.  For once, evil in an espionage
thriller isn't what people do, but why they do it.

Title
Review for Short Cuts (1993)
Starring:  Andie MacDowell, Bruce Davison, Lily Tomlin, Tom Waits,
           Anne Archer, Fred Ward, Tim Robbins, Madeleine Stowe,
           Julianne Moore, Matthew Modine.
Screenplay:  Robert Altman and Frank Barhydt.
Director:  Robert Altman.
     Point #1:  Raymond Carver purists might be extremely disappointed
in what Robert Altman has done to some of the best short stories
written in the English language.  The interlocking story structure of
SHORT CUTS does not serve those stories well, and the small pathos of
Carver's Pacific Northwest isn't the same in Altman's Los Angeles.
     Point #2:  SHORT CUTS stands independently as a splendid film
achievement, a brutally funny collection of fragments from broken lives
crafted by a director with renewed vitality.  Only an abiding cynicism
and the uneven appeal of the nine main stories mar this dynamic, poetic
work.
     SHORT CUTS follows 22 characters through four days in contemporary
Los Angeles.  Howard and Ann Finnigan (Bruce Davison, Andie MacDowell)
are an upscale couple whose young son is hit by a car driven by Doreen
Piggot (Lily Tomlin).  Doreen is a waitress with a drunken husband (Tom
Waits) and a disaffected daughter, Honey (Lili Taylor).  Honey is
married to Hollywood make-up artist Bill (Robert Downey Jr.), and best
friends with Jerry and Lois (Chris Penn, Jennifer Jason Leigh).  Howard
and Ann's son is cared for by Dr. Ralph Wyman (Matthew Modine), who is
married to aspiring artist Marion (Julianne Moore).  Marion's sister
Sherri (Madeleine Stowe) is married to philandering cop Gene (Tim
Robbins), who's having an affair with Betty (Frances McDormand), much
to the dismay of Betty's estranged husband Stormy (Peter Gallagher).
Also in the milieu are the Finnigans' next door neighbors, a night club
singer (Annie Ross) and her cellist daughter (Lori Singer), and Claire
and Stuart Kane (Anne Archer, Fred Ward), a clown and her unemployed
husband.
     SHORT CUTS is about those moments when individuals are at their
most basic, naked and vulnerable.  Indeed, nakedness and scatology play
a key role in the film, perhaps more than some viewers might find
palatable.  Characters in SHORT CUTS pop zits, break wind, urinate into
streams, talk bluntly about sexuality and wander around in various
states of undress, but none of these elements ever seem gratuitous.
These are the hidden moments when men and women reveal themselves, full
of insecurity, guilt and fear, and SHORT CUTS captures them with a
stunning grace.  In one of the film's most memorable moments, Julianne
Moore stands before husband Matthew Modine making a painful confession,
with evidence that she is a natural redhead in full view.  In another
scene, Bruce Davison squirms while his father (marvelously played by
Jack Lemmon) describes the tryst that led to his estrangement from his
family thirty years before.  This is a film loaded with individual
moments that slam home with the intensity of reality recognized, and
frequently inspire nervous laughter.
     In my estimation, however, Altman erred in the decision to
interlock his stories.  While the structure serves a purpose in
emphasizing a great tapestry of lives, the impact of Carver's
individual stories is largely lost.  "Neighbors," in which a couple
begins living vicariously through the apartment they are taking care
of, is reduce to a couple of white trash folk messing up a nice place;
"Collectors" becomes a single scene with a door-to-door vacuum cleaner
salesman.  It's true that I'm criticizing the film SHORT CUTS is not
rather than the film it is, but it just seems a shame that such rich
source material is given such a cursory treatment.  Altman never seems
to identify with his own characters the way Carver did, and as a result
it seems he's laughing at them and not with them.
     Opinions will vary as to which stories worked best.  I cast my lot
for the most faithful of the adaptations, "So Much Water So Close to
Home," in which Fred Ward, Buck Henry and Huey Lewis discover a dead
body while on a fishing trip.  "A Small Good Thing" also scores big
point from the fine performances of Andie MacDowell as the nervous
mother, Jack Lemmon in the previously noted turn as Bruce Davison's
father, and Lyle Lovett in a quirky appearance as a baker with a mean
streak.  The two big losers are "Neighbors" and the one story created
wholly by Altman, the relationship between a boozy singer and her
daughter which tries to fit in but always seems obviously out of
place.  The valleys, however, are few, and the peaks are massive.  At
over three hours, SHORT CUTS is anything but boring.  It's a sharp,
clever, perceptive look at life in the big city that goes for the
jugular rather than the heartstrings.  These SHORT CUTS are somewhat
cold cuts, but they're mighty tasty.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
BEING JOHN MALKOVICH
(USA Films)
Starring:  John Cusack, Cameron Diaz, Catherine Keener, Orson Bean, John
Malkovich, Mary Kay Place.
Screenplay:  Charlie Kaufman.
Producers:  Michael Stipe, Sandy Stern, Steve Golin and Vincent Landay.
Director:  Spike Jonze.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Leave aside for a moment -- and you won't hear this out of me very
often -- such mundane questions as what BEING JOHN MALKOVICH is "about," 
or what it "means." It is a rare occurrence when a film so completely
engulfs me in its singularity that I know I'll miss something if I try to
figure it out while watching, but that's exactly what happened with BEING
JOHN MALKOVICH. It's no coincidence that the ad campaign featured music
from BRAZIL; like Terry Gilliam's stunning 1985 film, it's a vision that
begins "somewhere in the 20th century," then takes a left turn into
somewhere inspired and unexpected. For nearly two hours, you can revel in
the pleasure of letting its surreal, subversive humor roll over you in
waves. For hours afterward, you can peel away its layers of significance
and realize how truly extraordinary it is.
     Attempting to distill screenwriter Charlie Kaufman's story into a few
short sentences can't possibly do it justice. Its protagonist is Craig
Schwartz (John Cusack), a struggling street puppeteer at a crossroads. 
Encouraged by his wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz, coiffed a la early
Roseannadanna) to find a day job until "the puppeteering thing" takes off,
Craig goes to work as a filing clerk for LesterCorp on the 7-1/2th floor
of Manhattan's Mertin-Flemmer Building. Soon Craig discovers two
fascinating things. The first is Maxine Lund (Catherine Keener), a worker
in the Mertin-Flemmer Building with whom Craig instantly becomes
obsessed. The second is a tiny door hidden behind a filing cabinet, a door
that allows anyone who enters to experience 15 minutes through the eyes of
actor John Malkovich (John Malkovich).
     There are so many improbably wonderful moments in BEING JOHN
MALKOVICH that it would be criminal to deprive potential viewers of the
joy of discover. Suffice it to say that Kaufman and director Spike Jonze
(the video and commercial wunderkind making his feature film debut) find a
new and hilarious place to go every time you think they can't possibly
find anywhere more whacked-out than where they've just been. A minor
supporting character like Floris (Mary Kay Place), "executive liaison" to
the company's eccentric boss Dr. Lester (Orson Bean), can steal a scene
with her stone-faced insistence that everyone else around her has a speech
impediment; even the unresolved childhood issues of a chimpanzee can
become a twisted vignette. Every performance is a comedic gem, none more
so than a turn by Malkovich that re-defines "self-deprecating" (even in a
film where his consciousness is the center of the universe). There are
giggles, there are guffaws, and then there is laughter that comes from
sheer awestruck surprise. Guess which kind BEING JOHN MALKOVICH engenders.
     If BEING JOHN MALKOVICH had been nothing more than a blissfully bent
comedy, it still would have been one of the year's best films. Buried
beneath the surface surrealism is an exploration of identity that slides
from the addictive nature of virtual reality to the appeal of performance.
I speculated after the film whether the premise would work with just any
actor -- BEING HARRISON FORD, for instance, or BEING JULIA ROBERTS -- and
I don't think it would. Malkovich's unconventional looks and chameleonic
character acting become one of the film's running jokes (no one can quite
remember what movies they've seen him in), making him the ideal vessel for
a visitor to re-create himself. Craig's despair at his own failures leads
him to believe that his own identity mocks him; a look in the mirror by
his puppet-self leads to an explosion of rage. Playing into the messages
of a culture that convince you someone always has it better, BEING JOHN
MALKOVICH sends Craig on a mission to get what he can't have in his own
life by taking over someone else's. His ultimate fate is the worst kind of
tragedy: an existence over which he has no control at all.
     There's plenty more to BEING JOHN MALKOVICH for those willing to poke
around for a while -- students of Medieval French philosophy may ponder
the significance of Craig casting his own puppet doppleganger as Abelard
in "Abelard and Heloise," considering where he ends up in the film -- the
kind of stuff you just don't expect to find in contemporary film. You
certainly don't expect to find it in a film that's ridiculously
entertaining even if you don't think about it afterward for a second. 
BEING JOHN MALKOVICH is a kind of pop masterpiece -- funny, insightful,
smart, playful and heartbreaking. Few films provide such a thrilling sense
of discovery, a discovery that lingers from the first frames to subsequent
days.

Title
Review for Only You (1994)
Starring:  Marisa Tomei, Robert Downey Jr., Bonnie Hunt, Joaquim de
Almeida, Fisher Stevens.
Screenplay:  Diane Drake.
Director:  Norman Jewison.
     Ingredients: one lost shoe found by a handsome suitor, a gypsy
selling roses, a street corner saxophone player, a carriage ride,
beautiful Italian scenery (including canal boats in Venice), the moon,
the stars, and a version of the title song by Louie Armstrong.  Oh, and
a reference to ROMAN HOLIDAY.  And a nice-but-uninspiring guy for the
heroine to throw over.  Have I forgotten anything?  It doesn't appear
that the makers of ONLY YOU have.  It is packed to bursting with
everything that a Hollywood romance is supposed to have--except any
connection between its stars.  As a result, its agonizing cuteness
becomes all the more agonizing, and the hole at its center positively
gapes.
     ONLY YOU stars Marisa Tomei as Faith Corvatch, a lifelong romantic
who was told as an adolescent (by a Ouija board and a fortune teller)
that she is destined to marry someone named Damon Bradley.  Fourteen
years later, she is preparing to marry someone *not* named Damon
Bradley, a podiatrist named Dwayne.  All that changes when Faith gets a
call from an old friend of Dwayne's named ... Damon Bradley.  With best
friend Kathy (Bonnie Hunt) in tow, Faith races off for Italy on the off
chance that she might meet the man who is her destiny.  Then she does
meet a man (Robert Downey Jr.) who sweeps her off her feet and
re-introduces her to romance--only his name may or may not actually
be Damon Bradley.
     There is a trend which has developed in film romances in the last
couple of years (including SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE and, to a certain
extent, FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL) which has made me wary of them
even before they appear.  They are no longer about romances which
blossom between real people in the course of actual interaction;
instead, they are the worst kind of pop fairy tales, selling
infatuation with a romanticized ideal as true love.  Marisa Tomei and
Robert Downey Jr. end up together (and please, no one try to tell me
that I'm spoiling anything by revealing that fact) because that's the
way it has to end.  Not because these characters learn anything about
each other that would make them want to learn more, and not because
they seem right for each other.  For most of the film, their
relationship is based on self-delusion and lies.  However, since it's
all accompanied by carriage rides and flowers and beautiful Italian
scenery, it passes for a love story.  And that's fairly sad.
     Equally sad is that there is a supporting story to ONLY YOU which
is infinitely more interesting and touching, and might have made for a
movie I would truly have enjoyed.  Bonnie Hunt gives a winning
performance as Kathy, a woman whose marriage to Faith's loutish brother
Larry (Fisher Stevens) has left her wounded and bitter.  "I married a
liar," she says at one point.  "Why?  Because I married a man."  Her
tentative romance with a smooth-talking Italian (Joaquim de Almeida of
CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER) is the one thing in ONLY YOU which rings
true, and watching her struggle with her feelings about her marriage is
genuinely affecting.  Unfortunately, the story isn't about Kathy, and I
just didn't care about Faith's quest for Damon.
     Individually, as performers, I generally like Marisa Tomei and
Robert Downey Jr.  Both usually appear very natural on screen, and
Downey in particular shows the potential to be a solid, charming
romantic leading man.  In ONLY YOU, however, his lovable rascal is
completely one-dimensional, and the script's attempts to justify his
behavior don't sell.  Tomei has it even worse, directed by Norman
Jewison to a teeth-aching level of adorableness, but that's just
indicative of how everything in ONLY YOU is pitched:  lay on the syrupy
score, emphasize Sven Nykvist's cinematography, throw in romantic
signifiers by the dozen.  What it all adds up to is a film so
mechanical you can almost hear the gears grinding.

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
     Watching the most infectious comic moment in the British import THE
FULL MONTY -- a film rich with infectious comic moments -- can teach you a
lot about what so many Hollywood comedies get so wrong.  The scene is set
in a Yorkshire unemployment office where the film's six protagonists,
laid-off steelworkers in training to become male exotic dancers, are
waiting for their bi-weekly dole cheques.  As the office radio begins
playing Donna Summer's "Hot Stuff," the men begin swaying unconsciously to
the beat, eventually easing into their bump-and-grind choreography for the
song.  It's a wonderful bit of comic film-making, surprisingly restrained
and staged with impeccable momentum and timing.
     It also comes in a context which gives the laughter more bite.  The
main characters in THE FULL MONTY are frustrated and emasculated by their
unemployment:  divorced Gaz (Robert Carlyle) faces losing joint custody of
his son for non-payment of child support; overweight Dave (Mark Addy) is
rendered impotent by his feelings of physical and economic inadequacy;
middle-manager Gerald (Tom Wilkinson) is so shamed that he still hasn't
told his wife of his sacking six months after the fact.  Their spontaneous
burst of energy in that dole queue is a physical manifestation of
optimism.  They're trying something to become men again, by God, even if
it's as ridiculous a notion as dropping trou -- or going "the full monty"
in Brit-speak -- in front of 400 howling women.
     Now I'm not saying it isn't worth several chuckles simply watching
the out-of-shape mates muddle their way through their pirouettes and
pelvic thrusts; incongruity is the mother of classic physical comedy.  I'm
willing to wager, however, that a Hollywoodized version of THE FULL MONTY
would miss the point entirely.  In this hypothetical American MONTY, the
idea of six working-class blokes becoming strippers, none of them ideal
physical specimens, would be treated as inherently hilarious.  It would
become a broad farce, with Chris Farley re-creating his "Saturday Night
Live" sketch challenging Patrick Swayze for a spot in the Chippendales
line-up.  THE FULL MONTY isn't an effective comedy because the stars are
unattractive.  It's an effective comedy because the characters _are_
attractive, because their dilemma is genuine and their solution is ripe
with possibilities.
     Ironically, the most noteworthy flaws in THE FULL MONTY might have
been erased by a good old Hollywood script doctoring.  Screenwriter Simon
Beaufoy dangles a few too many plot threads for no apparent reason,
including a gay romance which never matters much to the story.  Dramatic
confrontations interfere with the comedic flow, as though Beaufoy didn't
trust the performances and basic plot situations to generate enough
sympathy for his characters.  Though not nearly as pedantic as the
similarly-themed BRASSED OFF!, THE FULL MONTY still treads dangerously
close to pathos at times, clashing with the lads' growing enthusiasm for
their new calling.
     THE FULL MONTY may be a high-concept premise, but the execution is
resolutely low-concept.  That's a combination Hollywood is having a tough
time putting together in its comedies.  Comedy with ideas doesn't have to
be leaden; comedy with big laughs doesn't have to be simple-minded.  THE
FULL MONTY gives depth to dole-line disco..._that's_ high comedy.

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Little, The (1997)
THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO LITTLE
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Bill Murray, Peter Gallagher, Joanne Whalley, Alfred Molina.
Screenplay:  Robert Farrar and Howard Franklin, based on the novel "Watch
That Man" by Robert Farrar.
Producers:  Arnon Milchan, Michael G. Nathanson, Mark Tarlov.
Director:  Jon Amiel.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes, mild violence)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At last we can answer the question that has plagued movie-goers for
ages:  what would the PINK PANTHER films have been like if Bill Murray had
played Inspector Clouseau?  All right, perhaps "plagued" is too strong a
word.  In fact, it's likely that no one has ever asked the question,
probably because the answer seemed obvious.  Murray's stock-in-trade is
the guy who pokes holes in everyone around him, smugly convinced that he's
one step ahead of the pack.  Clouseau was similarly convinced; he was also
thoroughly self-deluding.  Playing Clouseau would require Murray to play
dumb with complete earnestness.  Could he really stop winking
self-knowingly long enough for us to buy him as an idiot?
     The answer, unfortunately, is not really.  THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO
LITTLE is a de facto Clouseau premise, casting Murray as a schlub named
Wallace Ritchie whose unreasonable dreams of acting prowess have been
diverted into working at a Blockbuster Video in Des Moines, Iowa.  While
on a birthday trip to see his successful brother James (Peter Gallagher)
in London, Wallace gets a chance to perform again when James signs him up
for an audience-participation role-playing experience called Theatre of
Life.  No sooner is Wallace expecting a call to send him on a staged
adventure than he receives a call which sends him on a real (unknown to
him) adventure, one which places the future of Anglo-Russian detente in
Wallace's oblivious hands.
     Though the comedic mistaken-identity premise is sporting more than a
few gray whiskers, it can still work with the right lead performer.
Murray is a wonderful comic actor, the kind who can turn a simple reaction
take into a monster laugh, but he is at his best when asked to stand
outside the action and comment on its absurdity.  There's never a moment
in THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO LITTLE when Murray convinces you that he isn't hip
to exactly what's going on; he's too self-aware to immerse himself in
cluelessness.  Eventually, the premise begins to feel like an elaborate
waste of Murray's time.  He's forced to play a fake pseudo-suave agent who
accidentally outsmarts the bad guys, when he should be playing a real
pseudo-suave agent who quite intentionally outsmarts the bad guys.
     Ironically, THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO LITTLE is still at its funniest when
it just lets Murray be Murray.  His off-hand quips are frequently good for
a chuckle, providing goofy running commentary on the overly elaborate
silliness of secret agent capers.  They're also entirely out of place for
his character.  Murray is sharper than this concept, and he shows it by
spending most of his time looking for gags in all the wrong places,
fighting against the premise instead of trying to make it work.  Like a
superstar on a mediocre high school basketball team, he begins
freelancing, leaving the rest of the team to stand around and wait for him
to do whatever it is he wants to do.
     There are a few worth-while moments for the supporting cast, notably
Alfred Molina as a Russian agent who develops a grudging respect for his
"brilliant" American adversary, which show signs of life in a generally
under-whelming script.  For the most part, THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO LITTLE is
a less-than-stellar episode of The Bill Murray Show, sporadically amusing
when it doesn't burden the top attraction with an over-stuffed plot --
German businessmen, British and Russian secret agents, a
hooker-with-a-heart-and-wardrobe-of-gold, exploding Matryoshka dolls, and
what the McGuffin was going on with those carefully tied letters everyone
gets so worked up over? -- ill-suited to his talents.  It all adds up to
more stuff for Murray to smirk at, in a role where smirking should have
been strictly prohibited.  For a man who knows too little, he acts like he
knows it all.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
     After flaming out spectacularly in its last few attempts at feature
animation -- gems like QUEST FOR CAMELOT and THE KING AND I -- Warner
Bros. finally figured out how to guarantee a decent story: they re-made
E.T. as a cartoon.  Technically, of course, that's not what THE IRON MAN
is.  It's a loose adaptation of poet Ted Hughes' story "The Iron Man," set
here in coastal Maine circa 1957.  The protagonist is 9-year-old Hogarth
Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal), imaginative only child of a single
mother (Jennifer Aniston).  In the tense wake of Sputnik's launch, Hogarth
discovers a 50-foot-tall robot in the woods near his home.  The
metal-eating giant (Vin Diesel) has no memory of his origin or his
purpose, leading Hogarth to act as his caretaker.  Unfortunately,
over-zealous government agent Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) won't
rest until he discovers the source of local rumors about a monster from
places unknown...possibly the Communists.
     On a fairly superficial level, THE IRON MAN is a Cold War allegory
about paranoia turned against anything unfamiliar.  Screenwriter Tim
McCanlies and director Brad Bird drop in little tidbits of period detail
-- Hogarth's fascination with radiation/mutation films, his friendship
with a beatnik scrapyard owner/artist (Harry Connick Jr.) -- but they
don't really take full advantage of their setting.  The decision to set
the film in 1957 Maine seems fairly arbitrary, especially since Hughes'
book was not.  A bit more successful is the thematic treatment of the
giant as a weapon that learns how to be human.  Some viewers may shift in
their seats at the "guns kill" message-mongering, but it's intriguing to
see a family film tackling the notion of a sentient being accepting
responsibility for its own moral choices, and finding heroism in the
process.
     THE IRON GIANT ultimately does prove entertaining not because of its
astute observations about 1950s America or gun control, but because it's a
classic "boy and his dog" story -- E.T. seasoned with a generous dose of
"Johnny Sokko and Giant Robot."  The giant is given the personality of a
curious child, and the relationship between Hogarth and the giant earns
smiles from the lad's frustrations at "training" his mammoth companion.
The set-ups are familiar, but familiarity doesn't have to mean laziness.
Yes, there is a sinister government figure who wants the alien for his own
purposes; Christopher McDonald also delivers a snappy vocal performance to
spark Mansley's over-zealous patriotism.  Yes, the alien causes an
unexpected ruckus when he mimics some human activities; the scene in which
the giant executes a perfect "cannonball" into a lake also delivers a big
laugh.  As directed by "The Simpsons" and "King of the Hill" veteran Bird,
THE IRON GIANT has a slightly subversive sense of humor and a lively pace,
giving the oft-told tale its own unique spice.  It's E.T.-lite, to be
sure, but it still pushes the right buttons.
     On a technical level, THE IRON GIANT may not dazzle like some recent
Disney features.  While the integration of the digitally-created giant and
the conventionally-drawn characters is seamless, the backgrounds come out
a bit flat and the colors somewhat muted.  Yet the toned-down animation
may actually work to THE IRON GIANT's advantage.  There's more innocence
to the character design, more simple charm in the laid-back direction.
I'm not sure THE IRON GIANT earns the big emotional crescendo it's looking
for when Hogarth finally stares skyward at the giant and says "I love
you," but the fundamental appeal of the relationship between a lonely boy
and his alien puppy is always in effect.  If it's true that there are no
new stories to tell, the success of a film is always about the time the
filmmakers invest in telling the old stories well.  So E.T. is a 50-foot
robot this time around.  You'll still probably be pulling for him to turn
on his heartlight.

Title
Review for Myth of the Male Orgasm, The (1993)
Starring:  Bruce Dinsmore, Miranda De Pencier, Mark Camacho, Burke
Lawrence, Ruth Marshall, Macha Grenon.
Screenplay:  John Hamilton and David Reckziegel.
Director:  John Hamilton.
     THE MYTH OF THE MALE ORGASM is the story of Jimmy Ravinsky (Bruce
Dinsmore), a single young psychology professor who convinces his two
housemates, lovable loser Tim (Mark Camacho) and inveterate womanizer
Sean (Burke Lawrence), to join him in participating in a feminist
studies experiment at his college.  The subject of the experiment:
male attitudes about women, sex and relationships.  Only Jimmy returns
after his initial session, however, beginning a spirited exchange with
his anonymous interrogator "Jane Doe" (Miranda De Pencier).  The film
examines Jimmy's many relationships, including those with platonic
woman friend Mimi (Ruth Marshall) and narcissistic ex-lover Paula
(Macha Grenon), and how his encounters with Jane Doe changes them
both.
     I'm tempted to refer to MYTH as WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... without
the star power, but that wouldn't be entirely fair to this Canadian
battle-of-the-sexes comedy.  True, it covers some familiar territory in
the realm of contemporary sexual politics, but it adds enough twists
and fresh characters to stay interesting.  Tim is a hapless schlub who
pays lip service to enjoying "just friend"-ships with women while
suffering through a prolonged stretch without a sexual relationship;
Paula is a real rhymes-with-witch who insists on reminding Jimmy of why
their relationship failed.  Then there is MYTH's biggest asset, the
appealing and multi-layered character of Jimmy, winningly played by
Bruce Dinsmore.  Jimmy is truly intriguing, a man indignant about how
poorly other men treat women while apparently unaware of who much more
similar than different he is.  More to the point, he's someone who
thinks he's figured out everyone else but doesn't have the first clue
about himself.  Dinsmore does a fine job with Jimmy, combining charm,
arrogance, intelligence and uncertainty into a coherent character.
He's especially good in his scenes with women, strongest of all in a
restaurant scene with Paula (Grenon is the other strong point in the
cast).  The scenes with his male friends rang somewhat false, thanks
largely to a performance by Burke Lawrence that begins and ends as a
swaggering caricature.  Fortunately, these scenes are infrequent and
less critical, allowing Dinsmore to shine where he's needed most.
     The larger flaw in MYTH is an excessively stagy quality, as though
it had been intended originally as a play.  Many scenes, particularly
those involving the conversations between Jimmy and Jane, are a bit
claustrophobic, and even the lighting design suggests stage roots.  The
script often lays it on rather thick, using speeches to get points
across with little subtlety, sometimes the same point more than once.
But to its credit, THE MYTH OF THE MALE ORGASM plays fair with both
sexes' attitudes, avoiding a "women good, men bad" level of
simplicity.  Both Jimmy and Jane learn something, and the film's most
appealing message may be the need to get past assumptions and
generalizations in the formation of honest relationships.  The broad,
theatrical acting styles and blatant politics may not be for every
taste, but I found THE MYTH OF THE MALE ORGASM to be a clever and
occasionally insightful take on the collision of changing roles with
centuries-old perceptions.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
GO
(Columbia)
Starring:  Sarah Polley, Katie Holmes, Jay Mohr, Scott Wolf, Desmond
Askew, Timothy Olyphant, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner.
Screenplay:  John August.
Producers:  Paul Rosenberg, Mickey Liddell and Matt Freeman.
Director:  Doug Liman.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, drug use, nudity, violence)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In this cinematic era A.Q. (After Quentin), much film criticism is
filtered through the pop-culture sieve that is Tarantino.  We just can't
seem to help ourselves -- when we're not noting ways Tarantino has cribbed
from his film-making forebears, we're noting the ways his acolytes have
cribbed from him.  A gun can't be fired but his name is invoked; a
conversation can't be peppered with profanity and obscure references but
he becomes an adjective.  When a film like GO appears, so like PULP
FICTION in both narrative structure and style, it's easy to dismiss it on
a comparative basis without discussing why the Tarantino oeuvre has become
the Greenwich Mean Time for an entire genre -- the edgy, after-hours comic
thriller.  It's easy to miss why director Doug Liman's film works in the
ways it understands Tarantino's unique touch, and doesn't work in the ways
it fails to understand. 
     Like PULP FICTION, GO involves several non-chronological yet
intertwined stories of Los Angeles denizens with less than glowing morals.
Ronna (Sarah Polley), a young grocery store clerk, takes the shift of her
co-worker Simon (Desmond Askew) to help pay back rent, then also takes
some of Simon's side business as a drug dealer to help a bit more
substantially.  Her two customers are Zack (Jay Mohr) and Adam (Scott
Wolf), a pair of party animals who may be undercover cops, or perhaps soap
opera actors, or perhaps some interesting combination of the two.  Simon,
meanwhile, is on a road trip to Las Vegas with a trio of pals including
Marcus (Taye Diggs), a road trip which always seems to be just one step
ahead of complete disaster.  These three stories meet, swerve and overlap
through one wild 24-hour period filled with sex, drugs and a pre-Christmas
rave.
     There's something to be said for a film with the ability to grab you
viscerally, which is one of the tricks GO manages to pull off.  That
description isn't just about pacing (though GO moves with the hypnotic
momentum of a rave beat), nor is it just about the level of violence and
action (though there's one kicker of a car chase through Vegas).  Like the
most memorable moments in PULP FICTION, the most memorable moments in GO
energize you with the sense that you're really not sure what's going to
happen next.  At key junctures, you realize that screenwriter John August
is in complete command of his narrative as he turns expectations upside
down in ways that make perfect sense, not just because he can.
     That's not to say that GO doesn't wander off on tangents just because
they might prove to be entertaining.  GO isn't a clean, linear story even
in the most fundamental ways, but it's also a case of a film that doesn't
let the main storyline get in the way of some hilarious distractions:
Ronna's entrepreneurial spirit as she sells her own special brand of pills
at the party; Zack and Adam at a Christmas dinner with ulterior motives;
Simon experimenting with tantric sex with a pair of bridesmaids; the
encyclopedic knowledge of a cat during a hallucinogenic trip.  Like much
of Tarantino's work, it's a loose and sloppy sort of a film, which doesn't
mean that there's no logic to what's going on.  It's just the logic of
giving an audience one heck of a ride, letting the characters stroll and
stray because the film-makers have created an atmosphere where we trust
they'll stroll somewhere interesting.
     Unlike much of Tarantino's work, however, there's not much going on
beneath the glittering surface of GO.  The closest it gets to a thematic
link is the idea that these young people dash into dangerous situations
with little restraint on their desire to...well, to go.  There's nothing
resembling the moral center of PULP FICTION, nor do August and Liman show
nearly as much affection for their flawed, self-absorbed characters.  The
performances are solid even when the chattery dialogue feels a bit forced,
giving us plenty of reason to follow the characters even when they seem
like hopeless screw-ups, but no one is experiencing a fundamental life
change.  GO is a dazzling demonstration of how good even a derivative sort
of film can be when someone grasps the basic principles of engrossing
film-making.  It also demonstrates what we talk about when we talk about
Tarantino -- a way of telling us something about humanity between the
bursts of dialogue and gunfire.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES
(Columbia)
Starring:  James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith,
Tim Guinee, Maximilian Schell.
Screenplay:  Don Jakoby, based on the novel _Vampire$_ by John Steakley.
Producer:  Sandy King.
Director:  John Carpenter.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, profanity, adult themes, nudity)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's refreshing to see a film about vampires that's actually about
vampires.  Not vampirism as a metaphor for AIDS, not vampirism as a
metaphor for drug addiction, not vampirism as a metaphor for persecuted
minority groups, or as a metaphor for anything else -- just blood-suckin',
sun-hatin', butt-kickin' vampires.  JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES is the kind
of slick horror package that's increasingly hard to find:  raucous,
sanguine and almost utterly devoid of sociological sub-text.
     Based on John Steakley's novel _Vampire$_, it incorporates that
oh-so-90s-vogue vocation of vampire hunting into the context of an old
spaghetti Western.  Jack Crow (James Woods) is one of many vampire hunters
on a Vatican-funded mission to eradicate the plague of the undead.  One
night his team is obliterated by Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith), the oldest
vampire ever to walk the earth.  Crow and his one surviving associate
Montoya (Daniel Baldwin), accompanied by newly-recruited young priest
Father Guiteau (Tim Guinee), have to find Valek and kill him before he can
locate a mysterious relic which might give him the power to walk in the
daylight.  Add plenty of flying body parts, stark Western vistas and
Carpenter's own twangy Tex-Mex score, and you have a simple, economical
horror yarn.
     It all makes for fine gruesome entertainment, but it should have been
better.  John Carpenter has always been able to incorporate wry, weird
humor into his films -- remember the crawling head in THE THING, or
practically all of BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA, for that matter? -- and he
manages again to pull of a few nice bits of black comedy.  Woods, playing
Crow with snarling relish and a serious bad attitude, gets most of the
choice lines, all of which are either unprintable or incredibly offensive
or both.  Carpenter's sense of the horrific usually involves a kind of
self-aware outrageousness, turning his displays of blood-spraying special
effects into absurdist cinematic goofs too purely escapist to get worked
up over.
     Unfortunately, VAMPIRES keeps upsetting its delicate balance of humor
and horror by taking frequent detours into mean-spiritedness.  It's one
thing to play with notions of political incorrectness; it's quite another
to get off on it.  The only human female characters in VAMPIRES are
hookers who hang around just long enough to get naked and get turned into
lunchmeat; when Woods really wants to insult someone, a bit of gay-baiting
always fits the bill.  Even if you grant Carpenter and screenwriter Don
Jakoby the slack they seem to be searching for -- it's okay that a woman
is stripped and smacked around because she's a vampire-in-waiting, and
it's okay that a Catholic priest participates in a human sacrifice because
another priest is a stand-up guy -- the tone simply gets nastier than it
needs to be.  Everyone is too unpleasant too often.
     The thing about VAMPIRES is that when Carpenter rolls up his sleeves
and dives into genre action, it's a lot of fun.  In fact, if he had rolled
with the tone of the first 25 minutes, he might have had a minor classic
on his hands.  The opening assault on a New Mexico vampire "nest" is wild,
silly and superbly paced; Valek's first attack is a creepy and crafty
splatter-fest.  From there, VAMPIRES gets progressively more angry and
ominous, before it finally rights itself for the climactic confrontation
between Crow and Valek.  There's not enough interest in characterization
here to make the casual brutality of Crow and Montoya somehow
psychologically appropriate.  Psychology's got virtually nothing to do
with JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES, a slice of Halloween mayhem that works
wonderfully when it lets the good times roll.  For a vampire movie without
a "message," it offers some mixed messages it could do without.

Title
Review for Bulletproof (1996)
Starring:  Damon Wayans, Adam Sandler, James Caan, James Farentino,
Kristen Wilson.
Screenplay:  Joe Gayton, Lewis Colick.
Director:  Ernest Dickerson.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     All right, let's dispense with the preliminaries first:  Yes,
BULLETPROOF recycles material which has been done before -- and done
better -- in MIDNIGHT RUN and 48 HRS., among others.  Yes, it is the kind
of movie which has been a thorn in the paw of everyone who has dreamed of
a day when Hollywood values an original idea.  And yes, it includes the
kind of sexist and homophobic bits which have been all too characteristic
of films of its kind, targeted at the whooping goons of the movie-going
world like the one sitting next to me at this film.  All these things are
true, yet they are not exactly the reason why BULLETPROOF comes up short.
You see, BULLETPROOF is frequently quite funny, and it irritated me that I
was unable to enjoy the laughs as much as I should have.
     BULLETPROOF begins with partners in crime Rock Keats (Damon Wayans)
and Archie Moses (Adam Sandler) stealing a car, just one of many they have
stolen in the previous year.  They are best friends, with one small hitch:
"Keats" is actually an undercover police officer named Jack Carter, who
has befriended Archie in order to get inside the operation of drug lord
Frank Colton (James Caan), for whom Archie is a courier.  During the bust
in which Jack's cover is blown, Archie inadvertently shoots him in the
head, but somehow Jack survives.  Months of physical therapy later, Archie
is back on the job, and his first assignment is not a pleasant one.
Archie, captured in Arizona, has decided to turn state's evidence against
Colton, with one provision:  Jack has to be the man to bring him back to
L.A.  As though the company were not troublesome enough, Jack has to
contend with the killers Colton has hired to take Archie out, and who seem
to know his every move before he does.
     It is somewhat ironic that Archie frequently chides Jack for seeing
the world as "just black and white," since that is just one of many ways
this film follows the pattern of 90% of "antagonistic buddy cop" movies.
Just as a little test to check if you've ever seen a movie in this genre
before, see if you can guess whether Archie and Jack are friends when
BULLETPROOF ends.  That's right, this film takes you where every film of
its kind has taken you before, on a bickering ride to an inevitable
conclusion, and it is abundantly clear that writers Joe Gayton and Lewis
Colick are aware of that fact as well.  At only 85 minutes, BULLETPROOF
still feels long, because there is nothing of any consequence happening,
nothing to build momentum towards a resolution.  There is a recipe for a
film of this kind, and Gayton and Lewis follow it, and we are simply
watching them follow it.  The experience is like watching an hour and a
half long cooking show in which the final result is a bowl of cereal.
     I wish it had been easier to dismiss BULLETPROOF given all those
problems, but the fact is that it is also quite often funny.  Adam
Sandler, who turns in his least annoying screen performance to date (and
if that isn't damning with faint praise, I don't know what is), gets most
of the prime lines, taunting Jack and wise-cracking about the porno films
on the motel television where the two spend the night.  When Sandler isn't
trying to play a goofy character, he can deliver a line with a casual
zing, and when he isn't screaming he can be funny.  The problem is that
the story requires Archie to be hurt and angry at Jack's betrayal, and
that manifests itself in a performing style which can best be described as
"volume equals emotion."  Of course, it might also be true that screaming
is just Sandler's way of keeping a straight face; if you've ever seen
Sandler perform live, you know that he finds himself hilarious, and when
he is trying to "act" in BULLETPROOF it always seems that he is trying not
to snicker.
     Damon Wayans isn't much better as a thespian, and he is placed in the
uncomfortable role of straight man.  He does get a few brutal put-downs,
but most of the time he is simply playing put-upon, and it doesn't suit
him.  Except for the first fifteen minutes, when he is still in his
undercover role and allowed to be loose, Wayans moves as though the only
way to be serious is to clench every muscle in his body and speak very
slowly.  When he and Sandler are allowed to go toe-to-toe, the
confrontations are enjoyable, but they are interrupted regularly by
tedious and obligatory action sequences.  The result is a strange
inversion of the formula which made TWISTER so frustrating:  I wanted to
be around for the scenes when Wayans and Sandler were trading jibes, but I
was ready to head to the lobby as soon as the gunfire started.  It is
clear that both Wayans and Sandler -- and the audience -- would have
enjoyed 90 minutes of their stand-up routines more than this routine of a
somewhat different kind.  For all its humor, the real joke in BULLETPROOF
is on anyone who expected it to be more than this month's variation on a
theme.

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
     It has been a long time since a film inspired as profound a case of
"What am I missing?" in me as SHINE.  This Australian drama has been a
fixture on year-end top ten lists, won a Best Picture nod from the
National Board of Review, and picked up a New York Film Critics
Association Best Actor for star Geoffrey Rush.  So I sat myself down to
watch SHINE, and I waited to be transported.  And I waited.  And I waited.
And it never happened.  SHINE is an extremely well-crafted film, but it
doesn't pay off at a gut level.  Director Scott Hicks' restrained approach
to an uplifting story ends up choking much of the life out of it.
     SHINE is based on the true story of David Helfgott, who is an
emotionally troubled 40-year-old (Geoffrey Rush) when first we see him.
The film then flashes back to David's youth in Perth, Australia, where he
is a piano prodigy under the strict supervision of his domineering father
Peter (Armin Mueller-Stahl).  David's raw talent is apparent to all who
see him, but Peter refuses to allow David to leave home for an opportunity
to study music in the United States.  The teenage David (Noah Taylor)
accedes to his father's wishes once, but a scholarship to the Royal
College of Music in London is too much to pass by.  Disowned by his father
for his disobedience, David leaves for London and studies with Professor
Cecil Parkes (John Gielgud), but his latent eccentricities become a
full-fledged collapse which institutionalizes him for nearly twenty years.
     There is a lot to like about the first half of SHINE, which focuses
on the relationship between David and his father.  Peter Helfgott is a
great character, a Holocaust survivor whose obsessive control over his
family masks a deep fear of losing them.  Armin Mueller-Stahl brings out
both sides of the complex Peter -- the loving father who embraces David in
the middle of the night and the tyrant who beats him and forces him to
repeat "I am a very lucky boy" -- making him a sympathetic figure in spite
of his cruelty.  Noah Taylor carries his half of the relationship as well,
making his desire to master the incredibly challenging 3rd Piano Concerto
by Rachmaninoff an effort both to make his father proud and to prove his
own talent without Peter's guidance.  Perhaps the film's best sequence
involves David's performance of the "Rach 3" at the Albert Hall, wild hair
and sweat flying in slow motion as his ultimate artistic triumph becomes a
mute pounding of keys.
     The screenplay by Jan Sardi explores several other relationships of
David's, but it soon becomes clear that none of them are as compelling as
the relationship between David and Peter.  There is a briefly-explored
friendship between David and Socialist author Katharine Prichard (Googie
Withers), the teacher-student interaction with Professor Parkes, and
eventually a romance involving an astrologer named Gillian (Lynn
Redgrave), yet there is little passion to any of them.  Even the death
of one character cannot evoke much emotional response, and David's match
with Gillian is apparently the result of complementary astrological charts
instead of a genuine connection between them.  SHINE may be about David
Helfgott, but Peter Helfgott is the real soul of the film, and when he
disappears from the narrative there is nothing to drive it forward.
Geoffrey Rush's performance as the adult David is superb, a portrait of
mental illness which is vivid and lacking the obtrusive kookiness of many
screen depictions of such conditions; his mile-a-minute monologues full of
puns and streams of consciousness display a brilliant mind imploding upon
itself.  There simply isn't much to the second half of SHINE which leads
us to a conclusion.  David begins to re-enter society and to play music
again, but the process of his healing is taken almost for granted.
     The real fault for SHINE's failings lies with director Scott Hicks,
who discovered David Helfgott's story and decided to turn it into a film.
Hicks' background is in documentary film-making, and it seems that his
instinct is to let David's story tell itself.  Most films about characters
struggling to triumph over adversity play to the broadest possible
emotional canvas, and it is admirable that Hicks has chosen not to
bludgeon his audience insensible with feel-good signifiers.  However, he
takes SHINE several miles too far in the opposite direction, and finds
himself with a film which drifts when it should be building to an
emotional resolution.  SHINE is a good-looking, good-sounding and
thoroughly professional production with a pair of excellent performances
by Armin Mueller-Stahl and Geoffrey Rush.  It is also too sedate by half,
a story of shattered genius which opts for a dim glow when it needs a
dazzling shine.

Title
Review for Jefferson in Paris (1995)
Starring:  Nick Nolte, Greta Scacchi, Thandie Newton, Gwyneth
Paltrow, Seth Gilliam.
Screenplay:  Ruth Prawer Jhabvala.
Director:  James Ivory.
     If Ismail Merchant and James Ivory are not careful, their names
might very well lose their proper noun status.  Like Q-Tip or Xerox,
"Merchant Ivory" is becoming something of a generic term, a
descriptor for intimate period pieces in the tradition of critical
successes like A ROOM WITH A VIEW, HOWARDS END and THE REMAINS OF
THE DAY.  For many moviegoers, though, the term is also used to
evoke images of technically proficient but turgid filmmaking.
Sadly, JEFFERSON IN PARIS is everything their most vocal detractors
have accused Merchant Ivory efforts of being.  There are plenty of
beautiful sets, meaningful glances and profound discussions, but
there isn't a shred of compelling drama to connect them, or a single
key character into whose life we are given any insight.
     JEFFERSON IN PARIS takes place primarily in the years 1784 to
1789, when Thomas Jefferson (Nick Nolte) lived in Paris as American
ambassador to France.  His beloved wife having died, Jefferson
brings the eldest of his three daughters, Patsy (Gwyneth Paltrow),
to stay with him, but otherwise is quite alone.  That changes when
he falls in love with Maria Cosway (Greta Scacchi), the English-
Italian wife of English painter Richard Cosway (Simon Callow), but
circumstances frequently conspire to keep them apart.  After the
death of Jefferson's youngest daughter, he summons the remaining
daughter to Paris, along with her slave nurse Sally Hemings (Thandie
Newton).  Although he maintains a correspondence and friendship with
Maria, Jefferson also begins a a secretive relationship with Sally,
while the stirrings of the French Revolution cause turmoil in the
Paris courts.
     There are any number of ways the Merchant Ivory team could have
approached these years in the life of a man of many contradictions.
They could have examined his reactions to the ostentations of the
French court which expedited its downfall in 1789; they could have
explored the reasons why the architect of democracy was also a slave
owner; they could have delved into his troubled personal life.  And
that is precisely what they did, and a dozen other things besides.
This is not a biographical sketch with a point of view.  It's a
series of anecdotes, many of them apocryphal.  Of what particular
relevance, for example, is Jefferson's mission to secure a loan from
the Dutch?  Or a lengthy scene at an opera in which the relationship
between Jefferson and Maria Cosway is not furthered one bit?  Writer
Ruth Prawer Jhabvala is a genius at adapting the narratives of other
writers for the screen, but she does a terrible job of constructing
a narrative from a collection of historical footnotes.  This is
simply EVERYTHING YOU ALWAYS WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT THOMAS JEFFERSON
BUT WERE AFRAID TO ASK.
     Jhabvala's ability to create characters also deserts her,
leaving JEFFERSON IN PARIS filled with incomplete sketches.  Gwyneth
Paltrow (FLESH AND BONE) has the most interesting part as Patsy
Jefferson, the troubled girl who feels abandoned by her father's
daliance with Sally, but there are significant gaps left in her
character as well (notably her reaction to Jefferson's refusal to
allow her conversion to Catholicism).  Greta Scacchi and Thandie
Newton are both under-developed as the women in Jefferson's life,
and his attraction to Maria in particular makes no sense based on
their interaction.  But that is part of the greatest disaster, Nick
Nolte's stiff Thomas Jefferson.  It is an awful performance of a
character with tremendous potential, and the script never even
bothers to try to get inside his head.  I felt I had a better
understanding of Jefferson from staring at Mount Rushmore.
     Ivory does deliver some finely crafted scenes, of course, such
as Louis XVI learning about the revolution while on a hunt, and
Richard Robbins' score and Tony Pierce-Roberts' cinematography are
characteristically superb.  Unfortunately, the way Ivory frames the
story (beginning with a flashback featuring James Earl Jones as the
son of Jefferson and Sally Hemings telling the story to a reporter)
makes the failings of JEFFERSON IN PARIS all the more evident.  It
isn't about the scandalous, if historically questionable, notion
that Jefferson fathered children by one of his slaves.  It isn't
really *about* anything.  Like the worst high school history
textbooks, it just starts in one place and ends in another, and all
you really want to do is look at the pictures.

Title
Review for Smile Like Yours, A (1997)
A SMILE LIKE YOURS
(Paramount)
Starring:  Greg Kinnear, Lauren Holly, Joan Cusack, Jay Thomas, Jill
Hennessy, Christopher McDonald.
Screenplay:  Kevin Meyer and Keith Samples.
Producers:  David Kirkpatrick and Tony Amatullo.
Director:  Keith Samples.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A plot synopsis for A SMILE LIKE YOURS reads like the most generic of
bittersweet romantic comedies.  Danny (Greg Kinnear) and Jennifer
Robertson (Lauren Holly) are a happily married young San Francisco couple
with a bright future, until Jennifer decides that it's time for baby to
make three.  Attempts at conception put a damper on their once-vibrant sex
life; little white lies develop into larger deceptions.  Danny begins to
suspect Jennifer of cheating with a cosmetics executive (Christopher
McDonald), while Jennifer similarly suspects Danny of cheating with a
gorgeous architect (Jill Hennessy).  Eventually, tensions cause a genuine
rift between the two.  Sounds quite a bit like SHE'S HAVING A BABY,
doesn't it?
     Only it's more like SHE'S _NOT_ HAVING A BABY, because A SMILE LIKE
YOURS is a bittersweet romantic comedy about infertility.  That's right,
all the wacky hijinks of masturbating into a cup!  All the side-splitting
humor of spending an hour in stirrups!  All the unbridled hilarity of
small-talk with another pair of clinic patients who reveal their history
with gonorrhea and pelvic inflammatory disease!
     I can understand the temptation to search for humor in a subject as
frustrating, embarrassing and occasionally guilt-inducing as fertility
problems.  Perhaps either writer/director Keith Samples or his co-writer
Kevin Meyer had some personal experience in this area, and felt the need
to share their quest for a smile amidst the tears.  And it might have
worked if they had bothered to include a single honest moment in A SMILE
LIKE YOURS.  There is no attempt to understand how Danny and Jennifer
really feel about their dilemma, no sense of any genuine pain.  Samples
and Meyer have merely grafted a few scenes at a fertility clinic onto a
fluffy and absurdly predictable relationship comedy, forcing you to wonder
why it couldn't just as easily have been about a couple struggling with
financial problems, or an irritating relative, or the heartbreak of
psoriasis.
     It's actually fairly impressive how generic and predictable A SMILE
LIKE YOURS turns out to be.  The casting certainly doesn't help matters,
offering the mundanely attractive Kinnear and Holly as our protagonists
without once stepping inside their heads (we never learn why Jennifer is
so underhanded about trying to get pregnant, considering Danny seems
perfectly comfortable with the idea).  Even the supporting cast -- Jay
Thomas as the acerbic guy pal, Joan Cusack as the daffy gal pal -- appears
to have been generated by a computer program.  The film is so ennervated
for so long that a late cameo by Shirley MacLaine provides virtually the
entire energy quotient in three minutes of screen time.  For an hour and a
half A SMILE LIKE YOURS trudges in the most obvious directions, reaching a
grating climax in a scene where several agonizing seconds pass between the
moment we _know_ Jennifer is going to call Danny's hotel room and find
another woman there, and the moment the phone actually rings.
     Infertility may be a delicate issue, but it's hardly sacrosanct.  A
competent film-making team might have made either an exaggerated black
comedy or a more sensitive comedy-drama about the issue.  It deserves much
better than to become an afterthought in a story which has nothing
creative or insightful to offer on any subject.  You know you're in
trouble when the biggest laugh in a film comes during a scene when a
character is watching a rerun of "I Love Lucy"...and the laugh is actually
_at_ the rerun of "I Love Lucy."  Lucy is still funnier -- and more
inventive -- after 40 years than A SMILE LIKE YOURS is after 40 minutes.

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
Starring:  Brian O'Halloran, Jeff Anderson, Marilyn Ghiglitotti,
Lisa Spoonhauer.
Screenplay/Director:  Kevin Smith.
     For the past few years, filmmakers have been trying to capture
what it is that defines the generation which has thus far been
difficult even to name.  So-called "Generation X" films like SINGLES;
BODIES, REST & MOTION; and REALITY BITES have tried, but their target
audience seems to have rejected those attempts.  At first glance,
CLERKS appears to be cut from the same cloth, a bargain basement
variation on tales of cynical, over-qualified and under-achieving
whiners.  But CLERKS is a horse of a different color (black and white,
in fact), a sly episodic story with a challenging perspective.
     CLERKS examines one day in the life of two 22-year-old New Jersey
residents living in the exciting world of retail.  Dante (Brian
O'Halloran) is called in to work at his job at a convenience store on
his day off; Randal (Jeff Anderson) works at the video store next
door.  While they share a friendship, they have little else in common.
Dante hates his job but rejects the entreaties of girlfriend Veronica
(Marily Ghigliotti) to return to school, and worries about leaving the
store unattended.  Randal, meanwhile, shuts down the video store
whenever the mood strikes him, is openly hostile to his customers, and
goads Dante into taking more chances.  Dante also obsesses over his
ex-girlfriend Caitilin (Lisa Spoonhauer), whom he has just discovered
is engaged.
     Made for a paltry $36,000 by writer/director Kevin Smith, CLERKS
frequently shows its low-budget roots in performances which can
charitably be called amateurish.  Jeff Anderson in particular reads his
line like a student in a high school production, and his big emotional
speeches are pitched at about the same level as his sarcastic banter.
Brian O'Halloran has an easy-going and engaging presence, but he's
often far too broad in his physical acting.  Only Lisa Spoonhauer as
the sexy and sharp Caitlin puts much real spark into her performance.
Smith's direction is simple, but his insistence on swinging his camera
back and forth in two-character scenes also proves distracting.  Like
GO FISH earlier this year, CLERKS is occasionally just a bit too clunky
to be completely endearing.
     The episodes which make up CLERKS are of inconsistent quality, but
the good ones are very good.  A conversation between Dante and Veronica
concerning their respective sexual histories is a riot, and Dante and
Randal share an illuminating discussion on the moral implications of
blowing up the "outside contractors" working on the second Death Star
in RETURN OF THE JEDI.  The dialogue is filled with ultra-crude
observations which almost earned CLERKS an NC-17 rating, but they're
caustic and on-target.  Randal in particular, who acts both as the
devil on Dante's shoulder and as the real voice of reason in CLERKS,
gets some marvelous lines, though virtually every one of them is
unprintable.  Less effective are sequences involving a roller hockey
game on the store's roof which simply lasts too long, and a montage of
annoying customer types which is a bit is too cutesy.
     But CLERKS turns out to be more than just the sum of its parts.
In the final fifteen minutes, Smith begins pulling the threads of his
narrative together with a surprising message about the twenty-
somethings.  Dante becomes a character representative of everything
that is wrong with his generational peers, wallowing in self-pity and
willing to blame everyone but himself for the circumstances of his
life, and Randal's brutally honest rebuke is perhaps the film's
highlight.  Kevin Smith places himself in the awkward position of
chastising those who are most likely to be his audience, and it is that
daring that makes CLERKS most worthy of admiration; it is not often
that personal responsibility is the moral to a story.  While he may not
have had all the tools at his disposal that a studio filmmaker would
have had to tell this story, Kevin Smith did have a story to tell.
CLERKS is unquestionably uneven, but it is also a very funny wake-up
call to the over-the-counter culture.

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
DETROIT ROCK CITY
(New Line)
Starring:  Edward Furlong, Sam Huntington, James DeBello, Giuseppe
Andrews, Lin Shaye, Melanie Lynskey, Natasha Lyonne, KISS.
Screenplay:  Carl V. Dupre.
Producers:  Barry Levine, Gene Simmons and Kathleen Haase.
Director:  Adam Rifkin.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, adult themes, nudity, violence,
sexual situations)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
     By any objective standard -- assuming the term isn't meaningless as
it applies to film criticism -- DETROIT ROCK CITY is pretty inexcusable
stuff.  The humor sticks fairly consistently to drugs, alcohol, and other
undesirable teen behavior.  The Catholic Church is a constant target for
insults, with priests variously portrayed as larcenous or lecherous.  The
four principal characters have little or no personality, and aren't 
terribly sympathetic.  It's a frantically paced effort, the infantile gags
thrown around with a "quantity beats quality" mentality.  A sensible adult
human being clearly would be well-advised to hurl himself as far from this
film as possible.
     Unless, of course, that adult human being happens to have been a
member of the KISS Army in 1978.  That's when this nostalgic teen comedy
is set, sending its four garage band-mate protagonists -- Hawk (Edward
Furlong), Jam (Sam Huntington), Trip (James DeBello) and Lex (Giuseppe
Andrews) -- on a trip from their Ohio home to Detroit, where they will do
anything to score tickets to a concert by the band they adore:  KISS.  The
quartet find themselves caught up in various rowdy misadventures as they
try to get into the Cobo Hall show, including feuding with disco-lovers,
entering strip contests, and trying to escape the wrath of Jam's
fanatically religious mother (Lin Shaye).
     Director Adam Rifkin certainly took many of his cues for DETROIT ROCK
CITY from the seminal film about high schoolers desperately seeking
tickets to a hot band's concert, Paul Bartel's Ramones love-in ROCK 'N'
ROLL HIGH SCHOOL.  There are far worse models for a film of this kind.
DETROIT ROCK CITY is a dumb film, but it's a dumb film with such high
energy and such a shamelessly low-brow sensibility that it feels like
exactly the kind of film AMERICAN PIE wanted to be.  Teenage viewers may
be content to snigger at the sex, drugs and rock 'n' roll gags, but the
cartoonish delivery of those gags makes them more fun than they have any
right to be.
     Then again, I viewed DETROIT ROCK CITY through some fairly
rose-tinted spectacles.  Though sporadically guffaw-inducing as a teen sex
farce, it's far more appealing as a pure nostalgia trip for a 30-something
ex-headbanger.  The soundtrack, though heavy on the KISS tunes, also
delivers Blue Oyster Cult, Cheap Trick, Thin Lizzy and the aforementioned
Ramones, not to mention the occasional disco selection.  The 70's icons --
8-track tapes, Stretch Armstrong action figures and Farrah Fawcett posters
among them -- set just the right atmosphere.  But Carl V. Dupre's script
is best appreciated by those who spent their adolescence fighting off the
scorn of the "KISS sucks" contingent, playing air guitar to Ace Frehley
solos and dreaming of attending a true rock spectacle.  It's filled with
throwaway KISS references only a true fan could love, like Trip's ironic,
pre-"I Was Made for Lovin' You" insistence that "KISS would never do some
bull**** disco song."  In all the ways that count, you really did have to
be there.
     It would be easy enough to begin and end with the idea that I was
bored and/or repulsed by DETROIT ROCK CITY, annoyed by the projectile
vomiting humor and the limp dialogue.  I could rightly acknowledge my
frustration with set-ups designed mostly to work teenage boys into a
lather of lust or disgust.  And I could note that while the performers
work hard to be appealing, there's just not much appealing about the
characters.  When it comes right down to it, the four teens are just
types, representations of everyone who wanted to go to a KISS concert so
bad they could taste the flashpot smoke...guys like me, for instance.
DETROIT ROCK CITY isn't a good film, but it's a film I couldn't resist.
As hard as it is under the best of circumstances to watch a film
objectively, it's even harder when you're watching the story of your life.

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
THE WINGS OF THE DOVE
(Miramax)
Starring:  Helena Bonham Carter, Linus Roache, Alison Elliott, Alex
Jennings, Elizabeth McGovern, Charlotte Rampling.
Screenplay:  Hossein Amini, based on the novel by Henry James.
Producers:  Stephen Evans and David Parfitt.
Director:  Iain Softley.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     From beneath broad-brimmed hats, the dark eyes of Helena Bonham
Carter burn with primal ferocity in THE WINGS OF THE DOVE; behind veils of
lace, her mind ponders decidedly un-ladylike thoughts.  Carter's body of
film work, including noteworthy roles in A ROOM WITH A VIEW, HOWARDS END,
WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD and TWELFTH NIGHT, might lead you to suspect
she was born wearing a corset.  It also makes WINGS a particularly
intriguing addition to her resume.  Like most of her previous films, this
one is a costume drama based on a classic novel (by Henry James).  This
time, however, Carter creates a character who prowls through every scene
as though she may tear off that corset at any moment with a howl of rage
against the social order.
     Eventually she does remove the offending garment (more on which
momentarily), but the preceding moments build with a powerful sense of
anticipation.  Carter plays Kate Croy, a young turn-of-the-century
Englishwoman of minimal means taken in by her wealthy Aunt Maude
(Charlotte Rampling).  Maude has plans for her neice's future, plans which
do not include a poor husband like Kate's beloved, journalist Merton
Densher (Linus Roache).  Faced with choosing between her patron and her
heart, Kate discovers another alternative when she befriends American
heiress Millie Theale (Alison Elliott).  The terminally ill Millie has
eyes for Merton, which Kate sees as a perfect opportunity:  if Merton can
woo his way into Millie's will, Kate and Merton could eventually marry
after all.
     At the heart of this convoluted romantic triangle is author Henry
James' fascination with the differences between English and American
society.  For Kate, wealth means obligatory membership in a stratified
social system which has become a farce by 1910, with landed gentlemen like
Lord Mark (Alex Jennings) reduced to fortune-hunting to stave off
insolvency; for activist writer Merton, wealth is an arbitrary dividing
line separating him from his object of desire.  When Millie enters their
lives, both are confronted with challenges to their assumptions.  Though
wealthy, Millie is kind and never condescending, nor is she restricted by
social mandates.  While Kate envies Millie's freedom, Merton begins to
realize that Kate's actions are the result of her choices, not an
inevitable by-product of money.
     Those tense interpersonal dynamics are rendered with impressive
economy in Hossein Amini's screenplay.  THE WINGS OF THE DOVE comes in at
under an hour and 45 minutes, a remarkable achievement for a literary
adaptation made even more remarkable by the richness of the
characterizations.  The requisite sumptuous production values are all in
place (notably John Beard's spectacular production design), yet THE WINGS
OF THE DOVE never once sacrifices focus on the characters for fetishistic
period detail.  Merton's background is less focused than the rest, but
Linus Roache creates a convincing portrait of torn loyalties; as Millie,
Alison Elliott plays the doomed Millie with a tenderness of spirit which
never lapses into cinematic sainthood.
     Both Roache and Elliott are strong, but Helena Bonham Carter is a
powerhouse.  Her performance pulses with resentment and rationalized
deviousness, captured by Iain Softley in direction which holds on her face
whenever possible.  The potentially unsympathetic character of Kate
becomes a tragic figure who feels forced into plotting for her most basic
happiness.  In the film's climactic scene, Kate attempts to win back
Merton's affections by stripping naked in front of him, an achingly
desperate seduction by a desperate woman.  Carter shows plenty of nerve
(and plenty of skin) in that scene, but she also shows a range few of her
previous characters have required.  Freeing herself from the broad-brimmed
hats, veils of lace and, yes, even her corset, Helena Bonham Carter
exposes a tortured soul struggling to break free of roles dictated by
costume.  How very fitting.

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
BODY SHOTS
(New Line)
Starring:  Sean Patrick Flanery, Jerry O'Connell, Amanda Peet, Tara Reid,
Brad Rowe, Ron Livingston, Emily Procter, Sybil Temchen.
Screenplay:  David McKenna.
Producers:  Harry Colomby and Jennifer Keohane.
Director:  Michael Cristofer.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, nudity, adult themes,
violence)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     BODY SHOTS opens with a profound quote attributed to 
"anonymous": "I'll give you a ride/On my jelly roll/But I won't give you
nothin'/From my soul."  That's about as succinct a summation as any for
this lugubrious, pretentious exercise in Gen Y navel-gazing that follows
eight single young Los Angelenos through a club-hopping Friday night and a
what-the-hell-happened Saturday morning.  Four guy pals -- Rick (Sean
Patrick Flanery), Mike (Jerry O'Connell), Shawn (Brad Rowe) and Trent (Ron
Livingston) -- meet up with four gal pals -- Jane (Amanda Peet), Sara
(Tara Reid), Whitney (Emily Procter) and Emma (Sybil Temchen) -- at a hot
nightspot, and begin pairing off in various combinations.  Accompanying
their dalliances are running talk-to-the-screen commentaries by the
characters on contemporary love and sex that make the "Confessional"
segments on "The Real World" look like revelations of zen wisdom.
     Those pseudo-profound asides -- spending long stretches on subjects
like oral sex technique under the winking guise of "telling it like it is" 
-- are plenty bad enough to make BODY SHOTS an irritating experience. It
becomes positively headache-inducing when director Michael Cristofer
starts dragging out each and every scene for all the slow-motion,
lingering pause significance it's worth.  Characters spin in blissful
kisses on the dance floor for minutes at a time, serenaded by the droning
observations of their friends; interminable silences are punctuated by
someone else's equally interminable silence.  It's one thing to make a
movie about life's painfully uncomfortable moments.  It's another to make
that movie panifully uncomfortable for the people watching it.
     Things go from very bad to even worse in the final half hour, which
is dedicated almost exclusively to a he-said/she-said date rape scenario
involving testosterone-beast professional football player Mike (who
apparently didn't get the memo that the Raiders had moved back to
Oakland) and the flirtatious Sara.  The jerky flashbacks show wildly
different versions of the same event, as Cristofer strains to give the 
tale RASHOMON-like credibility.  Then, strangely, the incident becomes
less about exploring lack of communication between sexual partners than
about lecturing on the treacherous combination of alcohol and raging
libidos; you half-expect someone to step out of character and tell you
where you can find literature on helping friends avoid binge 
beer-goggling.  Both Mike and Sara get to stare at the floor pensively as
they try to figure out exactly what they really remember, every passing
second of the violent rape Sara recounts feeling more exploitative because
there's no reason for us to care about the people involved.
     The reason there's no particular reason for us to care is that these
characters aren't really people.  The ad campaign for BODY SHOTS touts it
as one of those "movies that define every decade," but screenwriter David
McKenna makes his decade-defining generalizations by making his characters
single-trait generic -- Shawn is sensitive, Emma is sensitive in a
slightly different way, Whitney has a vaguely Southern accent.  Only Ron
Livingston, as the crew's resident eccentric, gets enough unique
personality to make a comic impression (which he does admirably in the
film's few worthwhile scenes).  The monotonous talking-head asides provide
the only insight BODY SHOTS has to offer into its characters, and then
McKenna uses the time to blow the lid off the fact that -- gasp -- there's
a sexual double-standard between men and women.  With its marathon sex
scenes and graphically trite narration, BODY SHOTS generally feels like
porn with delusions of social commentary.  Ultimately, it's just there to
give you a ride on its jelly roll, but it won't give you nothin' from its
soul.

Title
Review for Marvin's Room (1996)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Meryl Streep, Leonardo DiCaprio, Diane Keaton, Robert DeNiro,
Hume Cronyn, Gwen Verdon, Hal Scardino.
Screenplay:  Scott McPherson, based on his play.
Producers:  Scott Rudin, Jane Rosenthal, Robert DeNiro.
Director:  Jerry Zaks.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (some strong profanity, mature themes).
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Please ignore the next couple of sentences if you are a stickler
about having no part of a plot spoiled for you:  in MARVIN'S ROOM, nobody
dies.  Illness plays a significant role in the story, and many viewers
have come to resent maudlin disease-of-the-week melodramas in which
everything seems to function as an extended prologue to a tear-jerking
deathbed scene.  There is something terribly dehumanizing about making an
illness the central character in a narrative, so it is a relief to
discover that MARVIN'S ROOM is actually about people.  Though occasionally
stage-bound and over-plotted, MARVIN'S ROOM finds superb actors lending a
surprisingly restrained touch to a genre crying out for a little
restraint.
     Diane Keaton plays Bessie Wakefield, a never-married woman who has
spent most of her adult life caring for her bed-ridden father Marvin (Hume
Cronyn) and somewhat simple-minded Aunt Ruth (Gwen Verdon) in Florida.
After years of helping others, however, Bessie suddenly finds herself in
need of help when she is diagnosed with leukemia.  With a bone marrow
donation her best chance at survival, Bessie calls on the only other
immediate family she has:  Lee (Meryl Streep), the sister she has not seen
in nearly twenty years.  Though miles and profound differences have
separated them, Lee comes to Bessie with her two sons -- emotionally
troubled Hank (Leonardo DiCaprio) and bookish Charlie (Hal Scardino).  The
reunion is strained by a variety of conflicts, but gradually the family
members begin to realize the strength of the bonds that connect them, and
their need for each other.
     Writer Scott McPherson died of AIDS in 1992, and if you look
carefully at MARVIN'S ROOM you can see evidence of that specific disease
in many aspects of the story:  the personal relationships between the ill
and their care-takers; the care-takers themselves becoming ill; the
tension of familial disapproval.  Fortunately, MARVIN'S ROOM isn't _about_
AIDS any more than it is _about_ any disease.  It is about estrangement
and reconciliation and family ties, and it covers this treacherous ground
with as much comedy as sadness.  There are some wonderful black-humored
moments, including Aunt Ruth's pain-blocking device which also acts as a
garage door opener and an absent-minded doctor (Robert DeNiro) who uses
tourniquets as pants clips while riding his bicycle.  Stage veteran Jerry
Zaks does fine work with his rookie screen effort, and the gifted
cinematographer Piotr Sobocinski (Krzysztof Kieslowski's RED) gives
MARVIN'S ROOM a warm, comforting glow.  The overall effect of the film is
an unusual one for films of its kind:  it draws you in without pouncing on
you with over-wrought emotions.
     The superb cast certainly deserves much of the credit for that
success.  Diane Keaton, who has been re-born with two great screen
showcases in 1996 (this one and THE FIRST WIVES CLUB), radiates a basic
decency as Bessie, but she is not painted in saintly tones.  Bessie is not
bitter at the hand life has dealt her; she is simply resentful that Lee
left her to play it alone.  She has a couple of fine moments with Leonardo
DiCaprio, who plays a stock "troubled youth" role skillfully and without
histrionics, as the two lonely souls find sympathy in one another.  And of
course there is Meryl Streep, an actress so talented it has become a sort
of cinematic sport to mock her versatility.  Here she plays Lee with an
anger which drives her every action (though she does indulge in that
well-work actor's crutch of acting with her cigarette on occasion), and
she is convincing both in her early resistance to any overtures of good
will and in her slow realization that she cares more about her sister than
she realized.  There is a particular grace to her honest portrayal of
someone terribly uncomfortable with being around illness.  In one
perfectly pitched scene, she recoils at the sheer number of emergency
numbers needed to care for her father, then slowly steels herself to
helping with his medication because she knows at that moment that she is
needed.  The conflict between Bessie and Lee is presented with an ironic
realization that each sister thinks the other one has gotten the better
life, and both Keaton and Streep make the tearing down of that wall a
moving experience.
     There are certainly times when MARVIN'S ROOM feels hemmed in by its
stage roots, and conversations build to an over-dramatized pitch.
McPherson's script also over plays its comic relief card, particularly in
the person of Dan Hedaya as a lithium-medicated receptionist who seems
more appropriate to an episode of "Murphy Brown."  DiCaprio's character
also feels out of place occasionally, as though every time the story
turned back to him it was in danger of losing its way.  The relationship
between the two sisters is the heart of MARVIN'S ROOM, and the other
conflicts and relationships feel intrusive; the focus on DiCaprio makes
you wonder why the character of the other brother (Hal Scardino, who
spends nearly the entire film reading "20,000 Leagues Under the Sea") was
included at all.  But the important factor in MARVIN'S ROOM is that these
people don't get together for the express purpose of watching one of them
die.  Living is more interesting -- and more complicated -- than dying,
and McPherson created a work which recognizes that fact.  You don't have
to have a funeral to touch real emotions.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
THE FACULTY
(Dimension)
Starring:  Elijah Wood, Josh Hartnett, Clea DuVall, Laura Harris, Shawn
Hatosy, Jordana Brewster, Robert Patrick, Famke Janssen, Bebe Neuwirth,
Piper Laurie, Jon Stewart.
Screenplay:  Kevin Williamson.
Producer:  Elizabeth Avellan.
Director:  Robert Rodriguez.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, drug use, brief nudity)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There's something very strange going on at Ohio's Herrington High in 
THE FACULTY.  It's something only six students -- sensitive drug dealer
Zeke (Josh Hartnett), tormented geek Casey (Elijah Wood), black-clad loner
Stokely (Clea DuVall), cheerleader Delilah (Jordana Brewster), quarterback
Stan (Shawn Hatosy) and sweet new girl in school Marybeth (Laura Harris)
--  seem to recognize.  It starts in the faculty, including the football
coach (Robert Patrick) and the principal (Bebe Neuwirth), then slowly
spreads to their classmates.  Herrington High has been overtaken by... a
world-shaking case of deja vu. 
     It's not just that another film from earlier this year, DISTURBING
BEHAVIOR, already suggested a sinister conspiracy to turn high school
students into obedient robots.  Deconstructionist screen scribe Kevin
Williamson managed a tightrope act across the fine line between homage
and outright theft in SCREAM and SCREAM 2.  In THE FACULTY, he stomps that
fine line into a fine paste.  The Tommy Hilfiger-bedecked sextet of
protagonists shows the meticulous cross-sectioning of THE BREAKFAST CLUB.
Their test of each other's humanity is a crib from John Carpenter's THE
THING.  Their last stand locked away from the Menace Out There recalls
NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, ALIENS, and any number of other science fiction
thrillers.  It's a monster movie that could not exist without the
existence of other -- and much better -- movies.
     Of course, some will argue that such is entirely the point of any
Williamson project, that he shows off the conventions of genre films so he
can revitalize them.  The problem is that there is nothing remotely
revitalizing about THE FACULTY.  Sure, it's a movie movie, but its quotes
are as witlessly regurgitated as in any number of recent Leslie Nielsen
projects.  Instead of having something clever to say about cliches, it
simply recycles them, tossing in the occasional reference to "The Puppet
Masters" or ALIEN's Ripley as though it suddenly makes all the trite
characterizations and profanely insult-filled dialogue tolerable.  Even
Elijah Wood's wide-eyed genuineness and some pseudo-analysis of teenage
desire for conformity can't rescue THE FACULTY from feeling exactly like
the "attractive teens in jeopardy" tales it supposedly derides.
     If THE FACULTY proves anything, it's how much Williamson needs Wes
Craven.  Both SCREAM films featured chilling sequences which could stand
with the best the genre had to offer; they showed what chould be great
about horror films even as they showed what could be awful about them.
Robert Rodriguez -- who, if nothing else, has always shown that he has an
electrifying sense of cinematic pacing -- seemingly has no idea what to do
with this material.  THE FACULTY drifts sluggishly from character to
character as though they actually mattered, and the few action sequences
are designed to show off alien effects.  Every opportunity for genuine
creativity is turned into yet another self-satisfied commentary on how
every science-fiction story is really a rip-off of some other 
science-fiction story.
     There are a couple of amusing moments in THE FACULTY -- a football
game in which the Herrington team "infects" the opposition during dogpile
tackles, for instance -- but even most of those are taken from other
films.  Williamson's name is supposed to make this a knowing satire of
alien takeover films like INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS, but there was
more inventive humor in a piece of cheese like 1985's killer yogurt film
THE STUFF.  I kept waiting for either fun or fear, and all I got was a
jokey cameo by Internet gossip guru Harry "Ain't-It-Cool" Knowles.  THE
FACULTY merely adds to the list of lame science fiction films for someone
else to satirize...and maybe even get it right next time.

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
HOLLOW MAN
(Columbia)
Starring:  Elisabeth Shue, Kevin Bacon, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg
Grunberg, Joey Slotnick, Mary Randle.
Screenplay:  Andrew W. Marlowe.
Producers:  Douglas Wick and Alan Marshall.
Director:  Paul Verhoeven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, profanity, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     HOLLOW MAN follows in the fine tradition of James Whale's 1933
version of THE INVISIBLE MAN, in which Claude Rains loses his mind and
goes on a murderous rampage. There is, however, a more realistic element
to Paul Verhoeven's contemporary version of the tale: This invisible man
tests his power by going around feeling up women. We understand this
instinctively to be realistic because it's in the DNA of every
heterosexual adolescent male to define invisibility as the power to walk
into the girls' locker room with impunity. Hell yes we'd engage in a
little mischief if no one could see us; even the best of us might find it
hard to resist the temptation. Power corrupts, and so on and so forth.
     HOLLOW MAN could have been a provocative examination of what that
temptation would do to one of the best of us. Instead, its invisible man
is Dr. Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon), an egomaniacal jerk heading a
government research project into rendering people invisible, a process
that proves much easier than rendering them visible again. After a
breakthrough leads to the apparent discovery of a method for reversing the
process on test animals, Caine decides to test the invisibility serum on
himself, against the protests of his colleagues Linda McKay (Elisabeth
Shue) and Matthew Kensington (Josh Brolin). The invisibility serum works
on Caine, but the reversal serum is not so successful, stranding Caine in
his invisible state. And Caine begins to discover that he kinda likes the
freedom it grants him to do virtually anything.
     A bunch of techno-babble sets up the notion that the subjects of
Caine's serum are "out of phase with the visible universe" blah blah blah,
and disappear from the outside in, one layer at a time. And make no
mistake about it, it's one heck of a nifty visual trick (actually
introduced in reverse when a test ape gradually turns from skeleton into
layers of musculature). In fact, HOLLOW MAN is awash in nifty visual
tricks cleverly implemented: the thermal view of a full frontal Bacon; a
scene of Caine vomiting up invisible food in silent answer to that age-old
question; Bacon's ghostly visage appearing in water, smoke and a tossed
bag of blood. As effects-heavy thrillers go, this one at least makes every
moment of technological gee-whizzery genuinely worth a gee-whiz.
     What it lacks, in essence, is anything that can be called a story. 
There's a vacant spot in the center of the film even before Caine 
vanishes, because there's nothing remotely sympathetic about him from the
outset. While we can still see him, he's an obnoxious sort who makes
off-color jokes and mocks the vivisection of his lab animals. Once we
can't see him, he's the same guy, only now with the ability to render his
obnoxiousness more directly on others. There's no character arc to
Sebastian Caine; HOLLOW MAN merely presents the fairly self-evident answer
to the question, "What would happen if you granted omnipotence to a cruel,
self-absorbed bastard with a God complex?" The script doesn't even give a
character arc to its ostensible protagonist, Shue's Dr. McKay. Perhaps she
too could have been tempted, or learned something about scientific hubris. 
But no one learns anything in HOLLOW MAN, except to stay out of the way of
an invisible sociopath. Ultimately, it's nothing but a technically
proficient mad slasher movie.
     Make that a fairly diverting, technically proficient mad slasher
movie, at least during its high-energy third act. HOLLOW MAN is giddily
gruesome from the outset -- engineered by Verhoeven, the king of giddy
gruesomeness -- but it really goes wild once Caine traps his research team
in their underground facility. The film turns from a gloss on Cronenberg's
THE FLY to a gloss on both ALIEN and ALIENS (though I actually enjoyed the
nod to WESTWORLD, with Josh Brolin following in Papa James' footsteps in a
cat-and-mouse game involving thermal perception). The final 20 minutes
becomes a frantic and generally entertaining hack-n-slash through the
supporting cast members, leading up to an appropriately ridiculous climax. 
It's too bad Verhoeven and screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe weren't 
interested in putting some meat on HOLLOW MAN's bones. Even with all its
visceral appeal, it could have been so much more interesting to watch the
story of the guy who wants to walk into the girls' locker room with
impunity, instead of the guy who wants to walk into the girls' locker room
and blow it up.

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
Starring:  Johnny Depp, Martin Landau, Sarah Jessica Parker,
Patricia Arquette, Jeffrey Jones, Bill Murray.
Screenplay:  Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski.
Director:  Tim Burton.
     It's hard to imagine a more unlikely subject for a film biography
than Edward D. Wood Jr.  When I think of bio-pics, I think GANDHI, MY
LEFT FOOT, MALCOLM X--epic tales of great and inspirational figures.
The director of PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE does not seem to be cut from
quite the same cloth.  The great surprise of ED WOOD is that in his own
unique and twisted way, director Tim Burton has turned one of the worst
filmmakers of all time into one of those inspirational figures.  Rather
than holding Wood up to ridicule, Burton makes his life an example of
artistic integrity, an extremely entertaining look at an auteur unlike
any other.
     Johnny Depp stars as Ed Wood, who is a playwright, studio hand and
would-be filmmaker when our story begins.  Ed sees his chance for a big
break in a planned screen biography of transsexual Christine Jorgensen,
which Ed thinks he's perfect for because of his own closet fetish for
women's clothing.  He is also able to deliver a "big star" for the
production:  Bela Lugosi (Martin Landau), now nearly destitute and
addicted to morphine.  With Lugosi and girlfriend Dolores Fuller (Sarah
Jessica Parker), Ed makes GLEN OR GLENDA?, a phenomenally incompetent
melodrama.  But Ed is undaunted by the ridicule of others, and forges
ahead to make more films, as well as forging a friendship with the
ailing Lugosi.  Eventually comes Ed Wood's magnum opus:  the infamous
PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE.
     Burton based his vision for ED WOOD on one question:  what if
someone had all the drive of Orson Welles, but none of the talent?
That question, and its answer, are what make Edward D. Wood Jr.'s story
a comedy rather than a tragedy.  Johnny Depp plays Ed Wood with a kind
of childlike awe in the mere fact that he is able to make films, and
his mantra of "Perfect!" after every clumsy take becomes not simply a
paradigm for self-delusion, but a reminder that sometimes process is as
important to art as product.  In one delightful scene, Ed runs into
Orson Welles (a dubbed Vincent D'Onofrio) in a Hollywood bar.  There
they exchange stories about funding problems with their latest projects
(PLAN 9 and the recently restored DON QUIXOTE, respectively).  The
sincerity with which Wood speaks to Welles as an equal, and his
determination to stay true to his vision, make him anything but
pathetic.  He becomes a strangely heroic maverick, doing it his way
even if it means doing it the wrong way.
     Yet Burton manages to tell another story in ED WOOD, that of the
curious friendship between Ed and Bela Lugosi.  It is truly an example
of mutual need--Wood needs Lugosi to lend his movies credibility;
Lugosi needs Wood to give him work, any work--but it's also something
even more touching.  As played with eerie brilliance by Martin Landau,
Lugosi is bitter, broke and depressive when Wood finds him in the late
1950s, and completely without respect.  It is respect which is the
greatest gift Ed gives him, and Laundau's portrayal of his slow return
to humanity is one of the finest pieces of acting this year.
     It is ED WOOD's niftiest accomplishment that it links these two
stories so effortlessly.  Ed Wood's uniquely wonderful naivete comes
from the fact that he never fully grasps that Hollywood was a business
first.  He is unable to understand how Lugosi could be unable to find
work, because to Ed, his talent is all that should matter.  Even
through fund-raising parties and creative recruiting of backers for his
films, it's not about the money to Edward D. Wood Jr.  It's about art.
     ED WOOD is occasionally quite slow-moving, and loses much of its
steam in its final twenty minutes.  The making of PLAN 9 seems to
deserve more than a montage, and Ed's relationship with wife-to-be
Kathy (Patricia Arquette) is given only a cursory treatment.  But the
affection in Burton's telling of this tale is infectious, and makes one
wish more talented contemporary filmmakers were as relentlessly
individual.

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
     Since I began reviewing films, no film has left me as stumped as
FORREST GUMP.  While I was watching, I was carried away, delighted by
an original and stunningly executed experience.  But almost as soon as
the closing credits started to roll, I began to feel that something
just wasn't working.  FORREST GUMP is, by turns, hilarious, overly
precious, touching and disturbingly simplistic.  So the question
becomes, which FORREST GUMP do I review:  the in-the-theater
experience, or the in-the-car experience?  The undeniably entertaining
crowd-pleaser or the pre-digested primer in pop philosophy?  Naturally,
I found my answer somewhere in the middle.
     Tom Hanks plays the title character, an Alabama naif with an IQ of
75 but a heart of gold.  His mother (Sally Field) makes sure he
maintains his dignity by going to school with the other kids, but it is
soon clear that Forrest is not like everyone else in more ways than
one.  His amazing speed lands him a scholarship at the University of
Alabama, where he is an All-American kick returner.  He joins the Army,
befriends a fellow enlisted man (Mykelti Williamson), and becomes a war
hero in Vietnam for saving his platoon leader (Gary Sinise).  And just
to top things off, he becomes an international ping-pong sensation.
Yet through all Forrest's experiences, one thing remains foremost in
his mind:  his love for childhood sweetheart Jenny Curran (Robin
Wright).
     There is little question that the craft of FORREST GUMP is a
wonder to behold.  The digital wizards at ILM have triumphed again with
the sequences placing Forrest in footage with Presidents Kennedy,
Johnson and Nixon, as well as George Wallace and John Lennon.  Perhaps
even more impressive are the shots in which Gary Sinise is made to
appear a double amputee.  Yet for all the notice- grabbing visuals, it
was the sound that blew me away.  One Vietnam battle scene will shock
you out of your seat, and the sound of a hurricane is equally
stunning.  This is not say that director Robert Zemeckis rests on his
technical support.  Several of his shots are truly beautiful:  a
wedding overlooking water; a mountain reflected in a lake; and my
favorite, a subtle moment when Jenny tells Forrest "You don't know what
love is," as the neon sign of a strip club called "Love's" appears
slightly out-of-focus in the background.  FORREST GUMP never fails to
be a feast for the senses.
     It's also frequently a feast for the funny bone, but unfortunately
Zemeckis succumbs to the same tendency that sometimes hampered WHO
FRAMED ROGER RABBIT?, namely a desire to throw in too many winking
cultural asides.  The biggest laughs are purely character moments, such
as Forrest discovering his speed while blowing apart his leg braces, or
the rambling shrimp-based menu delivered by Forrest's Army buddy
Bubba.  But Zemeckis and scripter Eric Roth feel the need to make
Forrest responsible for Elvis Presley's pelvic gyrations, the Watergate
bust and the "Have a Nice Day" smiley face.  At a certain point, it's
just overkill, and it detracts from the whimsical tone with its
heavy-elbowed nudges.
     Tom Hanks' performance as Forrest is problematic.  While he avoids
most of the one-note traps of Dustin Hoffman in RAIN MAN, he is still
far too mannered, particularly when compared to the dynamic
naturalistic performances of co-stars Robin Wright and Gary Sinise.
Wright delivers a wrenching performance worthy of high praise, and
Sinise may have found the role which makes him a household name (if THE
STAND didn't already do so).  Hanks may garner yet another Academy
Award nomination, but he was better in a comparable role in BIG, and
for my money even better in his much criticized performance in
PHILADELPHIA.
     My biggest problem with FORREST GUMP is that in its attempt to
re-construct America's turbulent last thirty years, it has created a
philosphical monster.  GUMP has most often been compared to 1979's
BEING THERE, but there is a critical difference.  Jerzy Kozinski
created a biting satire of how the platitudes of a dim-witted man
became wisdom in a sound-bite society.  There is no such distance in
FORREST GUMP; Forrest's bon mots *are* the film's philosophy, and as
such they seem like Truth McNuggets.  GUMP may be a paean to an
innocence lost, but it is also troublingly anti-intellectual, history
filtered through Robert Fulghum.  These will not be the concerns of the
average movie-goer, I'm certain.  They will be more interested in the
pure entertainment value of Forrest Gump's picaresque journey through
life, and the film's emotion.  GUMP will be many things to many
people.  To me, it was just another good but flawed movie.

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
(Columbia)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Milla Jovovich, Ian Holm, Chris
Tucker.
Screenplay:  Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen.
Producer:  Patrice Ledoux.
Director:  Luc Besson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (brief nudity, sexual situations, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw
     Here, I had thought to myself as I watched a television spot for THE
FIFTH ELEMENT, may be the acme in hyperbolic idiocy.  In one of those
exclamation point-filled critical blurbs which tend to accompany
pre-release advertising, someone was touting THE FIFTH ELEMENT as "STAR
WARS for the 90s."  I could only shake my head, especially considering it
had only been a few months since we had actually seen STAR WARS for the
90s.  Then I saw THE FIFTH ELEMENT, and I was forced to acknowledge that,
in a perverse way, the statement was completely accurate.  Like STAR WARS,
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is essentially a fairy tale, an archetypal Good Vs. Evil
story dressed up in high-tech trappings.  And like many films of the 90s,
it's so busy and loud that the compelling elements in the story tend to
get lost.
     In a prologue set in 1914, we learn the secret of the mysterious
"fifth element."  It is a weapon created a benevolent alien race called
the Mondoshawan to protect humanity from an evil force which threatens the
universe once every 5000 years.  In 2259, it is time once again for the
Mondoshawan to deliver the weapon, but their ship is downed by agents of
the sinister industrialist Zorg (Gary Oldman).  Only one key to the weapon
survives, a tissue sample which is replicated to produce a mysterious
woman called Leeloo (Milla Jovovich).  When Leeloo flees the authorities,
she ends up in the back seat of Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), a retired
military man now driving a cab.  Dallas becomes infatuated with the
strange and beautiful passenger who seems to be on everyone's most wanted
list, little expecting that his connection with Leeloo will lead him into
a battle in which the fate of humanity hangs in the balance.
     Whatever else one might say about THE FIFTH ELEMENT, you have to give
this to Luc Besson:  there is nothing he won't try to keep the audience
watching.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a blitzkrieg of images, moods and messages
which never lets up and never gives you a chance to get bored.  Scenes of
multi-level 23rd century air traffic provide a vertiginous backdrop for
chase scenes; the production design and costumes (by Dan Weil and
Jean-Paul Gaultier, respectively) are ablaze with color.  Comic relief is
provided by Ian Holm (as a cleric entrusted with the protection of the
fifth element) and Chris Tucker (as a flamboyant radio personality), as
well as by periodic phone calls from Dallas' kvetching mother.  You've got
your good aliens, your bad aliens (the shape-shifting mercenary
Mangalores), your sex (enough to push the PG-13 envelope), your violence
(ditto) and your romance, all tied up in a big shiny anti-war message
before the finale.
     If that sounds like a lot to take in, that's only because it is.  As
undeniably entertaining as individual moments in THE FIFTH ELEMENT may be,
the film never feels like a cohesive narrative with a distinctive sense of
place.  The most memorable creations of fantasy and science fiction, from
THE WIZARD OF OZ to BRAZIL, created worlds which were not just unique but
uniquely real -- every place, character and event were of a piece.  Besson
doesn't create that kind of world, one where you feel transported to
somewhere you've never been.  There are plenty of vivid details in THE
FIFTH ELEMENT, like Dallas' one-room-does-all apartment and an airport
filled with garbage, but they don't add up to anything truly intriguing.
Things happen for the sake of a momentary laugh or gasp rather than for
the creation of the film's internal universe.  It's not a specific future;
it's The Future, impressive but generic.
     It's nice to have sly performers like Willis, Oldman and Holm on
hand to make THE FIFTH ELEMENT's relentlessness somehow forgivable.
Milla Jovovich also does sharp work as Leeloo, doing a riot grrl spin on
Daryl Hannah in SPLASH.  Indeed, there are enough of the right elements in
THE FIFTH ELEMENT that you can't help but wish that they had been put 
together better.  This is a story about heroes, villains and the battle
between Good and Evil where the hero's quest is unclear, the real villain
is given just enough personality to make one threatening phone call, and
the climactic battle is over in a literal and figurative flash.  THE FIFTH
ELEMENT moves, all right, but it moves frantically, like the wired mugger
who accosts Dallas in one of the film's more amusing scenes.  I kept
thinking about how that character might have written THE FIFTH ELEMENT
after an all night bender of Jungian mythopoetics and the 23rd century
upper-of-choice.  That's "STAR WARS for the 90s":  Joseph Campbell on
crack.

Title
Review for Angela's Ashes (1999)
ANGELA'S ASHES
(Paramount)
Starring:  Emily Watson, Robert Carlyle, Michael Legge, Ciaran Owens, Joe
Breen.
Screenplay:  Laura Jones and Alan Parker, based on the memoir by Frank
McCourt.
Producers:  Scott Rudin, David Brown and Alan Parker.
Director:  Alan Parker.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, brief nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  145 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I have not read the much-loved memoir by Frank McCourt on which
ANGELA'S ASHES is based, but every indication is that the film re-creates
McCourt's Limerick of the 1930s and 1940s magnificently. Cramped Roden
Lane sits on the banks of an ersatz river of human waste and runoff from
the incessant rains; children scamper through the streets in tattered
clothing and bare feet; typhoid, fleas, consumption and conjunctivitis
plague the young. It's a life of almost inhuman squalor, compounded by the
effects of unemployment and alcoholism. It's the kind of life you might
not believe existed if someone hadn't committed his life story to the
page.
     As a snapshot of existence in this particular time and place, Alan
Parker's adaptation of ANGELA'S ASHES is exemplary. As a compelling story,
it's not half as effective. The events begin in 1935, with Irish
immigrants Malachy (Robert Carlyle) and Angela McCourt (Emily Watson) 
living in New York with their five children, including eldest son Frank
(Joe Breen as a 6-year-old). After the death in infancy of the youngest
girl, the McCourts decide to return to Limerick, home of Angela's family. 
Things are not much better there, as Malachy is rarely able to find work,
and drinks what little money he manages to earn. It is left to Frank to
grow up quickly and help the family, shoveling coal as a young teen
(Ciaran Owens) and becoming a telegram delivery boy as an older teen
(Michael Legge) to help the family and fulfill his dream of returning to
America.
     Biographical stories can be tricky to pull off dramatically, since
it's easy to portray them as a series of stand-alone episodes rather than
part of a thematically consistent story. That's the problem that plagues
ANGELA'S ASHES in Parker's attempt to maintain the integrity of McCourt's
tales. This is a film composed almost entirely of vignettes: Frank's First
Communion, Frank's work on the coal heap, Frank's visit with some
classmates to see his first naked girls, etc. Some of them amuse, and some
of them are touching, but few of them resonate the way it seems they
should. When teenage Frank begins a furtive relationship with a
house-bound consumptive girl, there's the sense we should feel his
emotions as a defining moment in his life. Instead, it plays as just one
more vignette in a life of First Communion, work on the coal heap and
seeing naked girls.
     The one place ANGELA'S ASHES does resonate -- if all too briefly --
is in the portrayal of Frank's father. Malachy is a complex character
whose life is doomed by the combination of his own weakness and his nerve
of being a Northern Irishman living in Limerick; McCourt's story
recognizes the prejudice that keeps Malachy from work, while still
acknowledging how he ruins the few opportunities he does get. Carlyle's
performance, combining a strange pride and sincere intentions with a
pathetic sickness of the soul, is one of the best things about ANGELA'S
ASHES (Emily Watson, by comparison, has little to do but smoke and look
determined). The wrenching moments in which Malachy disappoints his family
-- particularly when Frank tries to balance his disappointment with his
love for his father -- give the film its emotional weight. When Malachy
leaves the narrative, it never quite has as much to say.
     I'm told that McCourt's book uses a first person, present tense
narrative structure, allowing readers to view his experiences through the
eyes of the child he was. I can imagine that device giving his experiences
more immediacy, something to sustain the story beyond mere sympathy for
young Frank's plight. As a film, ANGELA'S ASHES works mostly as a period
record, with production designer Geoffrey Kirkland, costume designer
Consolata Boyle and cinematographer Michael Seresin working their
technical magic on a somber, straightforward script. Too much of it is
admirable without necessarily being engaging, serving as a mere litany of
childhood miseries. Without the father/son angle that had served the film
so well, ANGELA'S ASHES drifts into two and a half hours of variations on
a grim, grimy theme.

Title
Review for In the Name of the Father (1993)
Starring:  Daniel Day-Lewis, Peter Postlethwaite, Emma Thompson.
Screenplay:  Jim Sheridan & Terry George.
Director:  Jim Sheridan.
     Any time you put together a ten best list right after the first of
the year, you leave yourself open to potential embarrassment.  There
are usually three or four big Oscar contenders which go unseen outside
Los Angeles and New York until late January, meaning that a ten best
list compiled on January 1st might be notable for its oversights.  IN
THE NAME OF THE FATHER was one of those potential trouble spots, but as
it turns out I still consider my list complete.  Don't misunderstand
me; FATHER is impeccably acted and efficiently directed.  It simply
never gripped me the way it should have.
     IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER is the true story of Gerry Conlon
(Daniel Day-Lewis), a Belfast native and petty thief who finds himself
on the wrong side of the Irish Republican Army in 1974.  At the
suggestion of his father Guiseppe (Peter Postlethwaite), Gerry leaves
Ireland for London.  There he and friend Paul Hill (John Lynch)
discover their timing could not have been worse.  In the middle of an
I.R.A. bombing campaign, Gerry and Paul become scapegoats, arrested
with two other friends and tortured into confessing to the bombing of a
pub in Guildford.  When Guiseppe comes to London to help, he too is
implicated as a conspirator.  The two Conlon's end up sharing a cell,
and eventually sharing a hope that attorney Gareth Peirce (Emma
Thompson) can win them an appeal.
     There are really two stories working in IN THE NAME OF THE
FATHER:  one, the railroading of the "Guildford Four" by the British
government; the other, the developing relationship between Gerry and
Guiseppe while the two are imprisoned.  Each of these stories would
have made a taut and fascinating film, but combined both suffer.  In
particular, the father and son theme never quite clicked.  Director and
co-scripter Jim Sheridan makes some questionable choices in the early
stages of their relationship, the most notable being a lack of insight
into their interaction before their incarceration.  A voiceover
narration as Gerry leaves for London tries to explain emotions best
demonstrated, a flaw later exacerbated in a tirade by Gerry towards
Guiseppe that comes of as overwrought and lacking in necessary
background.  The later scenes, as the two men come to a grudging
understanding, are much better, but they would have been stronger still
with a more carefully crafted backstory.
     The legal story of IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER is clearly secondary,
but it provides most of the film's best moments.  Gerry's interrogation
is well-handled, including disconcerting scenes of police officials
watching the torture in silence.  Perhaps the most effective sequence
is the sentencing of the Guildford Four and several members of Gerry's
extended family, each excessive and unjust sentence punctuated by the
slam of the judge's gavel.  However, with the emphasis on Gerry and
Guiseppe's relationship, the injustice of the situation really doesn't
take hold, and the character of the chief detective on the case, played
by Corin Redgrave, is too pat in his villainy.  As an examination of
the potential for bloodlust in English jurisprudence, Peter Medak's LET
HIM HAVE IT is much more effective, a leaner and more focused story of
a truly criminal proceeding.
     The performances in IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER deliver its greatest
strengths.  Daniel Day-Lewis, building his already impressive and
diverse resume, turns in impressive work as Gerry Conlon.  His
character is not as fully written as it could have been, but Day-Lewis
fills in the cracks with his intensity and attention to detail.  Peter
Postlethwaite, as the physically frail but morally strong Guiseppe, is
a powerful presence, providing a tough counterpoint to the mercurial
Gerry.  Emma Thompson, in an extremely small role, manages to be cool
and determined but little more as Peirce; the script just doesn't ask
much more of her.
     IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER has garnered tremendous critical praise
and a handful of Golden Globe nominations, and while I found it a good
film I wonder if some of the accolades aren't a bit excessive.  With
the exception of Daniel Day-Lewis' performance, IN THE NAME OF THE
FATHER is solid but not spectacular, an example of taking two great
films and turning them into one good one.

Title
Review for Road to Wellville, The (1994)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Matthew Broderick, Bridget Fonda,
           John Cusack, Michael Lerner, Dana Carvey.
Screenplay/Director:  Alan Parker.
     Sir Anthony Hopkins doing a scene with Dana Carvey.  If you can
capture that image in your mind, you will know everything you really
need to know about why THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE just doesn't quite work.
On the one hand, the sumptuous production is filled with delightful
period detail; on the other hand, there isn't all that much going on
that one couldn't find in your typical bad, overlong "Saturday Night
Live" sketch.  Somewhere in THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE is a satire of health
fads, but it's buried beneath costumes and scatological humor.  The
result is basically a Merchant Ivory production of a "Benny Hill"
episode.
     THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE is set in turn-of-the-century Battle Creek,
Michigan, where corn flake entrepreneur and health guru John Harvey
Kellogg (Anthony Hopkins) has established a high-class sanitarium for
wealthy patrons.  Among those who journey to Battle Creek to avail
themselves of the "san's" regimen of meatless diet and frequent enemas
are Will (Matthew Broderick) and Eleanor Lightbody (Bridget Fonda), a
couple whose problems are more personal than medical.  While separated
due to the strict anti-sex rules, both Will and Eleanor find their
desires piqued elsewhere.  Meanwhile, a young fortune seeker (John
Cusack) and his shady parnter (Michael Lerner) attempt to cash in on
the health craze with their own corn flake.
     THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE opens promisingly enough, with a funny scene
of a group of women undergoing "laugh therapy."  It's delightfully
silly, but it isn't long before it becomes clear that such silliness is
about all there is to THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE.  It's a classic one-joke
film, all based on the outrageous Rube Goldberg health contraptions to
which the guests at the sanitarium are subjected.
     Actually, it may be more accurate to think of THE ROAD TO
WELLVILLE's one joke in broader terms, as the tittering variations on
an R-rated farce.  At one time or another, all of the following are
used as punch lines:  vomit, flatulence, sex, bare breasts,
masturbation, erections, enemas, urine and feces.  I'm hard pressed to
come up with anything they might have missed.  It's not that none of
the gags are amusing; some of them are.  But over two hours of such
material truly tests one's patience.
     That running time seems particularly long because screenwriter and
director Alan Parker lets his narrative wander all over the place.  The
sub-plot featuring Cusack and Lerner as a couple of hucksters
attempting to hitch their wagon to Kellogg's estranged son George
(Carvey) seems intended as a counterpoint to the sanitarium, simply
taking advantage of health obsession on a different scale.  But there
isn't anything interesting going on in that sub-plot, except watching
Cusack take a lot longer than it takes us to figure out that his
partner is a fraud.  Then there is a bizarre series of flashbacks
showing Kellogg dealing with the extremely odd behavior of a
10-year-old George.  While they may be meant to humanize Kellogg,
they're really just one more case of where judicious editing might have
benefited the film.
     As with almost everything in THE ROAD TO WELLVILLE, the acting is
almost universally too broad, probably as an attempt to disguise the
fact that there may not be a single genuinely interesting character in
the bunch.  Hopkins' Kellogg is a buck-toothed cartoon, a health
evangelist selling salvation via the bowels, but he's never a real
person.  Matthew Broderick is good in a rare adult role, but he's stuck
with every actor's bugaboo, the drunk scene, as is Cusack.  And Carvey,
naturally, mugs shamelessly.  Only John Neville and Camryn Manheim, as
a pair of older patrons who befriend Will and Eleanor respectively,
bring any kind of human warmth to their roles.  They are all surrounded
by marvelous sets, and are well-photographed by Peter Biziou, but
Parker hasn't given them any clear sense of exactly why they are making
this movie.  For a story that's supposed to be a satire, THE ROAD TO
WELLVILLE ends up mostly as a parody of itself.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
APT PUPIL
(Tri-Star/Phoenix)
Starring:  Ian McKellen, Brad Renfro, Bruce Davison, Elias Koteas, David
Schwimmer.
Screenplay:  Brandon Boyce, based on the novella by Stephen King.
Producers:  Jane Hamsher, Don Murphy and Bryan Singer.
Director:  Bryan Singer.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     APT PUPIL'S Todd Bowden (Brad Renfro) is practically the poster child
for an upstanding American teenager circa 1984.  He's a straight-A student
on track to graduate from high school at sixteen; he's a star baseball
pitcher; his parents (Bruce Davison and Ann Dowd) are successful, involved
and, astonishingly, still happily married.  It is this same Todd Bowden
who discovers that a man in his Northern California town named Arthur
Denker (Ian McKellen) is actually fugitive Nazi war criminal Kurt
Dussander.  It is this same Todd Bowden who blackmails Denker, threatening
to expose him unless he describes war-time attrocities to Todd in
unrelenting detail.  It is this same Todd Bowden who becomes obsessed with
the horrifying images of concentration camps, and who turns to strange
acts of cruelty.
     Creepy, disquieting stuff, to be sure, but there's one crucial puzzle
piece missing from director Bryan Singer's (THE USUAL SUSPECTS) adaptation
of the Stephen King novella:  why?  Why does Todd become so improbably
fascinated with the horrors of genocide and the wielding of absolute power
over the life of another?  Why do Denker's tales turn him alternately into
a nightmare-plagued wreck and a glassy-eyed borderline psycho?  There's
certainly a story to be told by making the teen demon of APT PUPIL a
golden boy rather than a troubled misfit -- perhaps to suggest the
capacity for evil within us all, perhaps as a commentary on how we make
the forbidden fascinating by hiding it from the eyes of children.  What's
missing is a motivation for this particular boy, something that makes him
more than a symbolic representation of good youth gone awry.
     That absence of motivation becomes even more glaring in the film's
second half, when the power dynamic between the two characters shifts back
in Denker's favor.  His life of quiet isolation shattered by re-living his
past, Denker begins to show that the rush he got from manipulating lives
was merely in hibernation.  McKellen's sharp performance shows Denker's 
icy confidence growing by the scene, until it's clear that the hunted has
become the hunter once more.  At that same time, Todd is trying to recover
from letting his grades slide through his frequent visits with Denker,
seemingly returning to "normal" until Denker forces him into an
acknowledgement of how far he's truly willing to go.  It's easy to
understand Denker's character and follow his twists, turns and changes.
By contrast, Todd's dark side seems to emerge strictly for bad seed shock
value.
      Even the gaps in Todd's characterization become less important as
Singer's taut direction takes over in the climactic thirty minutes.  As
circumstances threaten to expose the actions of both Todd and Denker, the
simmering tension begins building at an impressive clip.  APT PUPIL is a
rare example of a thriller that gets better as it approaches its
conclusion, rather than collapsing in a muddle of rushed plot points and
pat resolutions.  It's hard not to imagine how effective a film it might
have been if Todd Bowden made more sense as a character.  The token
glimpses of his friendships, romantic life and hobbies are maddening in
their mundanity.  Something significant happens in the space between Todd
spotting Denker on a bus and their initial contact, something reduced in
the film to a "One Month Later" title card.  That missing something is
what makes APT PUPIL merely morbidly intriguing, rather than truly
disturbing.

Title
Review for Jack (1996)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Diane Lane, Jennifer Lopez, Brian Kerwin, Bill
Cosby, Adam Zolotin, Fran Drescher.
Screenplay:  James DeMonaco, Gary Nadeau.
Director:  Francis Ford Coppola.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Once upon a time, Francis Ford Coppola was one of the most revered
directors in the world, the creator of classic films like THE GODFATHER,
THE GODFATHER PART 2 and THE CONVERSATION, part of an American renaissance
of the 1970s which included names like Scorsese, Spielberg and Altman.
Then came films which politely could be called ambitious failures -- ONE
FROM THE HEART, THE COTTON CLUB, TUCKER: THE MAN AND HIS DREAM -- and
mixed critical reception for his third GODFATHER film and BRAM STOKER'S
DRACULA.  It has been four years since DRACULA, more time to wonder if
Coppola could once again summon that special something.  What he has
summoned instead is JACK, a frustrating patchwork of slapstick and
sentimentality in which almost everything feels forced.
     JACK begins with expectant parents Karen (Diane Lane) and Brian
Powell (Brian Kerwin) receiving an unexpected surprise at a costume party:
Karen goes into labor, despite being only ten weeks pregnant.  However,
the baby she delivers appears to be full-term, leading doctors to conclude
that he has a genetic anomaly which causes him to age four times faster
than normal.  Indeed, when Jack Powell (Robin Williams) is ten years old,
he looks like a forty year old man, and is kept at home to be instructed
by a tutor (Bill Cosby).  But Jack longs for the company of other
children, and finally his parents allow him to enter the fifth grade.
Naturally, he is treated as a freak by his classmates, but when he is
accepted by a boy named Louie (Adam Zolotin), Jack begins to learn what it
means to have friends.
     At least that's what I think he learns.  One of the reasons JACK
feels so muddled is that it is a film without a clear sense of who its
vibrant character is.  In films of this type, where someone who is
"different" teaches those who are "normal" some Valuable Life Lessons(TM), 
the main character usually isn't that character, but rather the catalyst
who inspires others to change.  Those others might be Jack's classmates,
who come to accept and even to love him, and Louie gets a heartfelt and
inspiring speech to share those feelings.  At other times it appears that
Jack is supposed to be the character who is meant to change; he too gets a
heartfelt and inspiring speech.  Diane Lane doesn't get a heartfelt and
inspiring speech, just plenty of heartfelt looks to tell us that she is
learning to be less protective of Jack.  There is no law which states that
only one character in a film can change, but we have to know with whom we
are meant to identify, and Coppola spends so much time being heartfelt
that he fails to provide a definite protagonist.
     That leaves JACK as a message film in which there is no clear
message.  According to Louie's speech, it is that we should all remain
kids at heart; according to Jack's speech, it is that we should live each
day to the fullest.  JACK will quite naturally inspire a great deal of
comparison to 1988's BIG, but BIG was a pure fantasy which never felt the
need to underline its lessons.  Coppola and screenwriters James DeMonaco
and Gary Nadeau try to incorporate scenes of boys-will-be-boys playfulness
(and who among us hasn't been initiated into a club by lighting our bodily
gases or eating disgusting food mixtures), as if to tell us "we're just
having fun here."  That might be easier to accept if they hadn't also
overwhelmed simple moments like Jack calculating his mortality with the
uberdramatic voice-over, "What do I want to be when I grow up?  Alive."
     JACK's ace-in-the-hole would seem to be never-quite-grown-up Robin
Williams in the lead role, but there is something about his performance
which feels uncertain.  Admittedly it is an extremely challenging part --
he's playing not just a 10-year-old, but a maladjusted 10-year-old -- but
Williams more often seems to be acting like a 6-year-old, just a step away
from the baby-talk character he often used in his stand-up comedy
routines, while his 10-year-old co-stars often act like they're 16.
Williams is a sharp, quick-witted performer, and he always seems to be
struggling when he's asked to play whimsical (remember TOYS, or BEING
HUMAN?).
     Coppola certainly knows how to make a good-looking film, with some
clever touches like shots of Jack's light-up sneakers.  But JACK usually
comes off as sentiment without sense, and comedy without a foundation.
Once upon a time, Francis Ford Coppola appeared to know all there was to
know about making movies.  Now, he doesn't even seem to know JACK.

Title
Review for Citizen Ruth (1996)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Laura Dern, Swoosie Kurtz, Mary Kay Place, Kurtwood Smith,
Kelly Preston.
Screenplay:  Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor.
Producers:  Cary Woods and Cathy Konrad.
Director:  Alexander Payne.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     CITIZEN RUTH is not coming soon to a theater near you.  If you live
in one of the half-dozen or so cities where Miramax gave the film a trial
run, you missed it months ago; if you don't live in one of those cities,
you never even got the chance to miss it.  No one markets unconventional
or controversial films better than Miramax, but even they couldn't get
more than a handful of people into theaters to see CITIZEN RUTH.  This
time, they were dealing with the Grand Poobah of unconventional,
controversial subjects.  You see, CITIZEN RUTH is about abortion.  No,
wait, it gets worse -- CITIZEN RUTH is a _comedy_ about abortion.  It sets
out to offend nearly everyone, and succeeds.  It's got an unrepentant
loser as its protagonist, and she's the most likeable character in the
film.  In short, CITIZEN RUTH has absolutely everything working against it
except a blisteringly funny script, assured direction and a remarkably
brave lead performance by Laura Dern.
     Dern plays Ruth Stoops, a young woman with no home, no job and a
penchant for sniffing anything that comes in a can or a tube.  Ruth is
already a four-time loser as a mother when she learns after her 17th 
arrest for inhalation of dangerous substances that she is pregnant.  The
judge (David Graf) threatens Ruth with a felony charge for endangerment of
her fetus, but suggests that he might reconsider if she were to get an
abortion.  That suggestion outrages local right-to-life leaders Norm
(Kurtwood Smith) and Gail Stoney (Mary Kay Place), who take Ruth into
their home and try to turn her case into a media event.  Of course the
other side isn't about to sit still for such tactics, eventually snaring
Ruth away from the Stoneys to make their own political statement.  Stuck
in the middle is Ruth herself, who seems to have more control over
procuring her next high than over the fate of her pregnancy.
     If you were inclined to keep a tally, you'd probably find that
Alexander Payne and co-writer Jim Taylor don't split their mockery evenly
down the middle.  They take some savage shots at the Baby Savers' tactics,
including a hilarious scene at a "clinic" where Ruth receives "counseling"
about her "choice."  Norm, meanwhile, is portrayed as an ineffectual
horn-dog who ogles Ruth in a bathroom and uses his job as a hardware
store clerk to proselytize.  That doesn't mean the pro-choice advocates
get off easy.  They are portrayed as just as obsessed with "messages" and
public relations, and just as star-struck by their national leader.  It's
also hard not to chuckle at the terribly earnest paean one lesbian couple
sings to the "moon mother."
     There is only one place where the film-makers' sympathies obviously
lie, and that is with Ruth.  You may have a hard time sharing that
sympathy, however, because Laura Dern isn't interested in making you like
Ruth.  Ruth is a selfish manipulator, always ready to swear that she's
going to turn her life around a moment before she grabs a full bottle of
chianti and an empty bottle of toilet cleanser.  It is a gutsy and
brilliant performance, one on which the success of CITIZEN RUTH as a
social satire depends.  If Ruth Stoops is turned into one of the
sanctified poor, the film collapses under the weight of its sincerity.
Instead, she is made completely oblivious to anything but her own
immediate needs.  She is a walking worst-case scenario, which makes it
easy for both sides to use her as an example.  It also makes it impossible
for either side to control her, making for some of the funniest film
moments of the year.
     Payne's most extraordinary accomplishment may be satirizing both
sides of a serious issue while never understating the seriousness of the
issue itself.  In fact, CITIZEN RUTH is really about how this particular
battle has taken on a life of its own apart from the people affected by
it.  There is a scene at a protest early in the film where a clinic
employee chides protesters' behavior with a reminder that they "know the
drill."  It is a telling moment.  At some point, Ruth Stoops' case becomes
just another drill, another "war story" like the one a protester tells as
he gathers with colleagues as though in a social club.  Near the climax of
the film Ruth tries to escape from both sides, and is shocked to discover
that she can walk away virtually unnoticed; everyone is too busy shouting
to pay attention to a single troubled woman.  It's a shame that a
subversively spectacular film like CITIZEN RUTH managed to walk away just
as unnoticed.  

Title
Review for On Deadly Ground (1994)
Starring:  Steven Seagal, Michael Caine, Joan Chen, John C. McGinley.
Screenplay:  Ed Horowitz & Robin U. Russin.
Director:  Steven Seagal.
     Scott's First Law of Hollywood Auteurism reads as follows:
producer/director/star is a bad combination.  Many filmmakers need
someone to be the voice of reason, and that someone is usually the
producer.  The need can be even greater when the filmmaker in question
is a rookie director, which brings us to the First Law's First
Corollary:  be especially wary when the name appearing three times
before the title is Seagal.  ON DEADLY GROUND marks action icon Steven
Seagal's first time in the director's chair, and it looks like it.
Self-indulgent and deadly dull for at least half of its running time,
ON DEADLY GROUND demonstrates why an ego like Seagal's needs something
to keep it in check.
     Seagal's standard issue taciturn butt-kicker is this time called
Forrest Taft, an expert at putting out Alaskan oil well fires.  Early
in the film, Forrest is employed by Aegis Oil chief Michael Jennings
(Michael Caine) to deal with an explosion at one of Aegis' rigs, where
it becomes evident that everything isn't up to specs on the well's
safety equipment.  Furthermore, it appears that the same equipment is
to be used on a massive platform which must meet a start-up deadline in
order for Aegis to retain the mineral rights.  Forrest's life becomes
forfeit when he discovers this information, and Jennings' chief of
security (John C. McGinley) sets him up to die in an explosion.  Of
course, Forrest escapes, and hides out in an Inuit village, learning
Native environmental folklore.  Soon he sets out to make sure the Aegis
1 platform doesn't make its start-up, joined by a native activist (Joan
Chen).
     For those of you who didn't believe Steven Seagal could do
anything more ineptly than he acts, here's evidence to the contrary.
He appears to have learned nothing about pacing and exposition from his
two collaborations with Andrew Davis, turning in an action film
painfully short on action.  The first hour is devoted to an overlong
set-up, briefly interrupted by a barroom brawl so badly edited in
places that they had to dub in exclamations so that it would be clear
exactly where Forrest is kicking his victims.  We are subjected to a
handful of soapbox speeches about environmental degradation, including
one in the middle of a thoroughly pointless dream/vision sequence.
Seagal seems to be laboring under the deluded impression that anyone
who goes to see his films actually wants to hear him speak, because for
sixty minutes he just won't shut up.
     Once it is revealed that (surprise, surprise) Forrest is a CIA-
trained demolition expert, and Jennings sends a pack of professional
killers out to eliminate him, the action picks up.  However, almost
none of it is inspired until Forrest reaches Aegis 1, and almost
invariably the editing is attrocious.  Lots of things blow up in ON
DEADLY GROUND, but there is a "so what" quality to the pyrotechnics.
Still, Seagal at least could have had the sense to end the film with a
bang, instead of with a five minute monologue about the horrors of oil
companies which rivals Kevin Costner's JFK skreed for dramatic
ineptitude.  It isn't even the point that he may be right; he's just
chosen the wrong forum.
     Of course, the ultimate problem with any Steven Seagal project is
that it must inevitably star Steven Seagal.  Where Schwarzenegger
entertains with his comic book persona and one-liners, and Stallone
brings an underdog quality to his action flicks, Seagal's squinting
stoic is just boring.  UNDER SIEGE at least had a chance thanks to
Tommy Lee Jones' lively villain, but Michael Caine is not in that
league, playing a nasty businessman we've seen a hundred times before.
John C. McGinley puts a nice spin on the enforcer role, daring to lose
his cool and admit he's no match for the hero.  If directing ON DEADLY
GROUND is Seagal's idea of stretching himself, I'd offer the words of
Laurence Olivier as advice: "Just *act*, dear boy; it's much easier."

Title
Review for House of the Spirits, The (1993)
Starring:  Jeremy Irons, Meryl Streep, Glenn Close, Winona Ryder,
Antonio Banderas.
Screenplay/Director:  Bille August.
     Early in THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS, the narrative voice of Winona
Ryder describes her mother's reason for keeping extensive diaries:
"Everything happens so fast that we don't have time to understand
events."  And that just about covers most of what is wrong with this
adaptation of Isabel Allende's novel.  There are plenty of other things
wrong--inappropriate tone, dreadful miscasting, laughable acting--but
the fundamental failing of THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS is a screenplay
which races from scenario to scenario without any apparent concern for
the establishment of character.  When this two hour-plus "epic"
concluded, I felt nothing for the characters and embarrassment for the
cast.
     THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS spans forty-five years in the life of
Esteban Trueba (Jeremy Irons), an ambitious man in an unnamed South
American country.  Esteban soon becomes a wealthy landowner, and
eventually decides to marry Clara (Meryl Streep), the sister of his
former fiancee and a woman with supernatural gifts.  Also coming to the
Trueba home is Esteban's spinster sister Ferula (Glenn Close), who is
strangely fascinated by Clara.  Esteban and Clara have a daughter,
Blanca, who as a young woman (Winona Ryder) falls in love with poor
laborer Pedro (Antonio Banderas).  Pedro becomes a leader of the
socialist wave sweeping the country, and Esteban forbids their
romance.  As the country is torn apart by civil strife, so are the
Truebas torn apart in many different ways.
     It is difficult to comprehend how Bille August thought he could
accomplish everything it seems he wanted to accomplish in only 140
minutes.  In fact, after only twenty minutes I could tell that THE
HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS should have been a miniseries, and should have
been directed by someone else.  There is no texture, no depth and no
life to any of these characters; August directs as though he is
interested only in getting in, doing a scene, and getting out.  As just
one example, the scene in which Clara asks Ferula to come live with her
and Esteban should have been packed with emotion, as a woman who has
lived her whole life doing for others has kindness shown to her,
perhaps for the first time.  But Close has just a few minutes of screen
time before this scene, giving Ferula no chance to develop that
history.  Later, Blanca and Pedro meet after Blanca returns from
boarding school, a meeting we are told has taken place over several
summers.  The problem is that this scene is the first time Ryder and
Banderas are on screen together, making her profession of love ring
totally false.  Everything is too densely compressed and without
resonance, and THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS blasts through six decades
without leaving any emotion in its wake.
     With such a basic flaw at the core of the film, all other
criticism seems like nit-picking.  However, it is difficult not to note
that THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS could have been much better with a cast
that seemed at all comfortable in these roles.  The primary culprit is
Jeremy Irons, whose performance here is, quite simply, appalling.
Esteban is the pivotal character in this story, but Irons gives no
subtlety to his systematic alienation of his family.  In his defense,
he does have to deliver his lines through an obviously annoying set of
false teeth, but he still mugs his way shamelessly through scenes which
required an understanding of traditional Latino conceptions of
masculinity which he clearly did not have.  Winona Ryder continues to
act out of her depth, although she has some good scenes in the final
half hour when the political drama takes center stage.  Close has a
thankless, twitchy role, and Streep merely looks radiant without having
any real presence.  Only Banderas and Joaquin Martinez, as Esteban's
bastard son, show any spark.  How curious ... that two Hispanic actors
should seem to grasp this material.  It sort of makes you wonder what
might have been.
     Miramax must have looked at the pedigree on this film and thought
it had a purebred winner on its hands.  Instead they got a hyperactive
shaggy dog.  I hope someday someone films THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS as a
miniseries.  In Spanish.  The material deserves a second chance.

Title
Review for Addams Family Values (1993)
Starring:  Anjelica Huston, Raul Julia, Christopher Lloyd, Joan Cusack,
           Christina Ricci, Jimmy Workman.
Screenplay:  Paul Rudnick.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
     There were plenty of things surrounding the first ADDAMS FAMILY
film that I hated more than the film itself: its undeserved status as
blockbuster; the stupendously annoying theme song by Hammer; endless
iterations of the word "ooky" in print.  1991's THE ADDAMS FAMILY was
not a terrible film.  It was high-spirited and gleefully performed.  It
simply exhausted its premise after about fifteen minutes.  ADDAMS
FAMILY VALUES is lots more of the same, which means that its premise is
exhausted before it begins.  Yet it's both worse and better than its
predecessor, the latter the result of Christina Ricci's marvelously
morbid Wednesday.
     ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES opens with Morticia (Anjelica Huston) giving
birth to the newest Addams: baby Pubert, a mustachioed dead ringer for
papa Gomez (Raul Julia).  This development does not sit at all well
with Wednesday (Christina Ricci) and Pugsley (Jimmy Workman), who
believe that the arrival of a new child means an old one has to go.  To
help manage the children, the Addams Family hires nanny Debbie
Jellinsky (Joan Cusack), who turns out to be a homicidal golddigger out
for Uncle Fester's (Christopher Lloyd) money.  When the kids become
suspicious, Debbie has them sent away to an upscale summer camp,
leaving her to win over Fester and turn him agains the family.
     Like many recent megasequels, ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES meticulously
recreates the original, element for element.  Carol Kane replaces Judy
Malina as Granny, but the rest of the family cast is back in place.
The script is once again largely a collection of black-humored sight
gags and one-liners, and the theme song is again rap (a slightly
altered version of Tag Team's excruciating hit "Whoomp! (There It
Is)").  Even the title design is the same; "no surprises" is clearly
the motto in place.  The only real question is, is it funny, and as in
the case of THE ADDAMS FAMILY the answer is "sometimes."  There aren't
as many laughs as there were in the original, but the laughs that do
come are bigger.  There's a great photo among the shots of Debbie's
previous disguises, and the summer camp play is an anarchic riot.  What
almost never worked for me were the jokes in the "setup ... macabre
retort" format.  I kept wanting to yell out, "All right, they're weird,
I get the point."
     VALUES is broken into three almost entirely unrelated subplots
(not that plot is an issue here).  The Pubert plot is basically an
excuse for a series of elaborate attempts by Wednesday and Pugsley to
do away with the baby, and later for some "normal baby" jokes.  The
Debbie/Uncle Fester plot is extremely sluggish; Joan Cusack tries
gamely, but doesn't quite click as the villainous black widow.  The
biggest surprise may be that Gomez and Morticia play a very small role
in the proceedings.  They get a nice, goofy dance sequence, but for
most of the film Raul Julia only reacts, while Anjelica Huston spends
her time hitting lighting marks so that her eyes and cheekbones appear
translucent.
     The upside of the senior Addams' diminished role is that the
larger part is given to Christina Ricci.  The summer camp subplot is
far and away the best, and Ricci is a demonic delight.  She has a lot
to work with: a nerdy would-be boyfriend; the unbearably
up-with-everything camp counselors; a debutante rival (Mercedes McNab,
who played the Girl Scout in the first film).  Ricci spits out her
lines with comic venom, and provides most of VALUES' highlights.
     The easiest conclusion to reach about ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES is that
it will probably please those it was made to please, the same folks who
brought over $100 million to THE ADDAMS FAMILY.  If you didn't like the
original formula, there's little to inspire a change of heart the
second time around.  Cheers to Christina Ricci, but I hope her contract
doesn't demand another sequel.  She deserves better.

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
BASEKETBALL
(Universal)
Starring:  Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Yasmine Bleeth, Robert Vaughn, Dian
Bachar, Jenny McCarthy.
Screenplay:  David Zucker, Robert LoCash, Lewis Friedman and Jeff Wright.
Producers:  David Zucker, Robert LoCash and Gil Netter.
Director:  David Zucker.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, slapstick violence)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If your comic tastes run to the urbane, this is most definitely the
summer of your discontent.  THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY brought you
mangled genitalia and dangling bodily fluids; MAFIA! featured flaming
flatulence and a boy being smuggled in a donkey's rectum.  And now comes
BASEKETBALL, co-written and directed by David Zucker (THE NAKED GUN) and
starring Trey Parker and Matt Stone, the creators of "South Park" who gave
the world a talking piece of excrement named Mr. Hankey.  Anyone want to
place bets on whether it's going to be an Oscar Wilde-ian romp spilling
over with tres bon mots?
     Fact is, BASEKETBALL tosses off the kind of groin-level humor that
makes THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY look like a particularly droll "New
Yorker" cartoon.  This tale of two losers (Parker and Stone) who create a
sports sensation combining elements of baseball and basketball scurries
about in search of every imaginable source of vulgar, offensive and/or
just plain immature comedy.  Stone lactates like a Parisian fountain;
Parker slurps liposuctioned fat from a plastic bag; both stars sport
prosthetic male members which make it look like they're auditioning for
the sequel to BOOGIE NIGHTS.  No subject is too sensitive for some sort of
peurile gag:  not gays, not foreign accents, not raving bigots, not
necrophilia.
     Damn them all for making it funny too often to dismiss.  Yes,
BASEKETBALL certainly crosses the line at times from daring to
mean-spirited.  It also includes some wicked shots at professional sports,
from corporate stadium sponsorship to peripatetic franchises to bizarre
promotional giveaways (including "Dozen Egg Night," "Free Range Chicken
Night" and "Anal Probe Night").  The best running gag comes from the
baseketball rule which allows opponent to taunt the player with the ball
in an effort to psych him out.  Stone and Parker take the opportunity to
run with every possible distracting comment, gesture and visual image.
There's nowhere too low for them to sink, and they get enough laughs to
justify going just a bit lower the next time.
     It's hard to tell whether Parker and Stone have the stuff to be
legitimate big screen comic stars.  BASEKETBALL is an ideal showcase for
their malicious, "dude"-spewing wastrel characters; they're like Bill and
Ted with more acid in their veins.  Still, there's a sense that they're
just the slightest bit desperate to impress, too eager to reach for a
four-letter punch line before coming up with a more clever alternative.
When Parker finally goes for a laugh by trotting out the voice of "South
Park's" Eric Cartman, you can bet the audience will go wild with 
recognition.  It just feels lazy, one overgrown adolescent playing to
other overgrown adolescents, congratulating himself for being the id boy
of the moment.
     Strange as it may seem, David Zucker ends up being the steadying
influence which reins in Parker and Stone.  Zucker knows how to play a
near-subliminal visual joke with the best of them, and he works in plenty
of knee-slappers in BASEKETBALL.  He also calls on AIRPLANE! alums Kareem
Abdul-Jabbar and Robert Stack to help out, with Stack doing a particularly
hilarious parody of his own gig hosting "Unsolved Mysteries."  Even when
he steals from himself in the character of a sick boy at the mercy of
idiots (a la Jill Whelan in AIRPLANE!), he gives it a fresh twist; there's
nothing quite like watching an 8-year-old in need of a liver transplant
doing rounds of tequila shots.  That's one of the tamer bits in
BASEKETBALL, a film that sometimes doesn't know when to quit.  There will
be viewers who revel in that sort of "look at me, Ma, I'm being
irreverent" irreverence.  Others will shake their heads at the
continuation of their comedic summer of discontent, even through their own
embarrassed giggles.

Title
Review for Dner de cons, Le (1998)
THE DINNER GAME (LE DINER DE CONS)
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Thierry Lhermitte, Jacques Villeret, Francis Huster, Alexandra
Vandernoot, Daniel Prevost, Catherine Frot.
Screenplay:  Francis Veber, based on his play.
Producer:  Alain Poire.
Director:  Francis Veber.
MPAA Rating:  unrated (could be PG-13 for adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  80 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Francis Veber writes an interesting brand of farce.  For 25 years, he
has been the master of French high-concept comedy -- LE GRAND BLOND AVEC
UNE CHAUSSEURE NOIRE, MON PERE CE HEROS, LE JOUET, LES FUGITIFS, LES
COMPERES.  Where most farce either soars or crashes, Veber's occupies a
little-seen middle ground: funny enough that people like it, but not so
spectacular that it intimidates Hollywood's remake-happy execs.  "We can
do this even better," they quite reasonably say to themselves.  They then
proceed spectacularly not to do so -- THE MAN WITH ONE RED SHOE, MY FATHER
THE HERO, THE TOY, THREE FUGITIVES, FATHER'S DAY.  The simple talent for
being just entertaining enough suddenly doesn't seem quite so simple.
     THE DINNER GAME (LE DINER DE CONS) is quintessential Veber.  The
concept begins with the titular mean-spirited amusement, a weekly
challenge among several friends to bring the guest that's the biggest
loser, entirely unbeknownst to the mock-ees.  The story takes a turn,
however, when Dinner Game participant Pierre Brochant (Thierry Lhermitte)
throws out his back on the evening of the dinner, preventing him from
attending.  Unfortunately, Brochant's "guest" -- sadsack bureaucrat
Francois Pignon (Jacques Villeret) -- is already on his way to Brochant's
flat.  Thus begins a comedy of errors as the bumbling Pignon tries to help
Brochant with various problems, from his aching back to reuniting him with
his estranged wife Christine (Alexandra Vandernoot).
     Set almost entirely in Brochant's flat, THE DINNER GAME certainly
feels like the stage play adaptation it is.  Occasionally, that means the
film feels claustrophobic, with people waiting for phones to ring or doors
to open.  Veber can be something of a minimalist farceur, his direction 
taking the Blake Edwards route of getting out of the way of comic
situations rather than trying to contribute much to them visually.  His
best trick is cutting to stone-faced reaction takes by Lhermitte and
Francis Huster (as Brochant's pal), and his pacing isn't exactly
spectacular, especially in an 80 minute film.  By no means is this a
film-maker without his flaws.
     As a writer, however, Veber does know how to set up a gag and knock
it down.  There are punch lines in THE DINNER GAME that should be obvious
from the moment they're a speck in the distance, yet somehow they still
manage to zing.  Much of the credit for their success goes to Villeret, a
round-faced actor with a wild fringe of hair who could pass for a young
James Coco.  Villeret's Pignon is an exaggerated creation, to be sure, but
his bizarre goofs are made endearing by his obvious desire to be liked;
he's like a Great Dane who wags his tail so hard he knocks over everything
around him.  THE DINNER GAME generates some big-time laughs, and does
generate momentum towards its climax, when a visit by a tax auditor
(Daniel Prevost) creates even more chaos.
     Veber does predictably try to find a moral to the story, allowing
Brochant to learn a lesson about using cruelty as a spectator sport.  It's
a token effort, since neither Veber nor Lhermitte seem much interested in
developing Brochant as a character until the final five minutes.  There
are also a couple of jokes that just don't work in translation -- puns
that feel too forced, and a put-on Belgian accent that's only as riotous
as your familiarity with Belgian accents.  Still, THE DINNER GAME amuses
and entertains persistently, if not consistently, mining its basic
dolt-with-fuming-straight-man premise for all it's worth.  That final
point should be emphasized, since the Internet Movie Database notes that
Veber is preparing his own English-language version of THE DINNER GAME.
He should know by now that one moderately appealing comedy is generally
all his farces are worth.

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
     It's tough to knock a funny film for being not nearly as funny as it
could have been -- or thinks it is -- but that's ultimately the problem
with DROP DEAD GORGEOUS.  Using that increasingly-popular device of the
faux documentary, it tells the behind-the-scenes story of a regional
beauty pageant in the small town of Mount Rose, Minnesota.  Town grand
dame Gladys Leeman (Kirstie Alley) is one of the organizers of the local 
Miss Teen Princess America competition, but she also happens to be the
mother of contestant Becky Leeman (Denise Richards).  That gives Becky a
distinct edge, though she faces her toughest challenge from tap-dancing
trailer park ingenue Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst).  Unless, that is, Amber
meets the same sort of untimely end as others who cross the Leemans.
     It would be easy enough to call DROP DEAD GORGEOUS a second-rate 
gloss on Michael Ritchie's SMILE, or a wannabe WAITING FOR GUFFMAN, or a
half-hearted THE POSITIVELY TRUE ADVENTURES OF THE ALLEGED TEXAS 
CHEERLEADER-MURDERING MOM (also, not coincidentally, directed by Michael
Ritchie).  Such criticisms don't do justice to the number of belly laughs
this film provides.  Some are exaggerated, like the behavior of one
judge's mentally handicapped brother (Will Sasso).  Some are subtle, like
the production number that finds pageant contestants smearing themselves
on freshly-painted stepladders.  And some are sharp, like the smoking,
drinking, pregnant teen who says she can't make an event because she's
"like, due, or something."  By the time the talent portion of the
competition rolls around -- complete with dog impressions and monologues
from SOYLENT GREEN -- DROP DEAD GORGEOUS has provided enough humor to
avoid being buried by comparative criticism.
     The thing about those comparitive criticisms is that you'd also be
right.  As scripted by Lona Williams -- herself a former Minnesota beauty
contest participant -- the film takes on too many targets to skewer any of
them with maximum effectiveness.  The peek at pageant contestants finds
only the occasional insight, opting instead for broad caricatures and even
broader gags.  The film's small-town setting is given a similar treatment,
with freakishly outrageous characters (including chief overacting
offenders Alley and Ellen Barkin) undercutting the more spot-on
observations of provincial foibles.  In fact, director Michael Patrick
Jann almost always opts for over-the-top, making the documentary set-up
seem completely inappropriate.  It's impossible to get caught up in DROP
DEAD GORGEOUS's verisimilitude when the action arbitrarily switches to 
rapid-fire, multiple-angle edits the likes of which I've never seen in any
documentary.
     It's that aggravating refusal to look for genuine humor that makes
DROP DEAD GORGEOUS so frustrating.  When it's funny, it's quite
entertaining, but there's always the suspicion that it could have been
hilarious with a bit of care.  Why make the teen-obsessed judge (Matt
Malloy) a nervous, chain-smoking cartoon character patterned after
Martin Short's shyster Nathan Thurm?  Why continue the story for fifteen
minutes after the film's natural climax, including a vomit-spewing journey
to the state finals?  Why give the one recognizably human character (the
wonderful Allison Janney as Amber's surrogate mother) so little to do?
Every joke made in DROP DEAD GORGEOUS made me think of a joke missed;
every raucous chuckle called to mind an even better sly snicker.  It's
like a vaudeville act that will do anything to please the crowd, only it's
a vaudeville act that thinks it's a wicked satire.  You'll laugh, you'll
sigh, you'll think about the better films covering similar subject matter.
This may be one of the least satisfying entertaining films of recent
years.

Title
Review for Blown Away (1994)
Starring:  Jeff Bridges, Tommy Lee Jones, Forest Whitaker, Lloyd
Bridges, Suzy Amis.
Screenplay:  Joe Batteer & John Rice.
Director:  Stephen Hopkins.
     Sometimes, timing is everything.  A few years ago, Kevin Costner
beat two other Robin Hood projects into production, forcing one to
television and killing the other entirely.  This year, Costner is on
the other end, as his WYATT EARP was beaten into theaters *and* onto
video by TOMBSTONE.  Now, in the mad bomber department, BLOWN AWAY
comes hard on the heels of SPEED, and suffers greatly by comparison.
SPEED's greatest asset was that it never took itself seriously; BLOWN
AWAY, on the other hand, takes itself far too seriously.  Though there
are some nice moments of suspense, BLOWN AWAY sputters out in puddles
of melodrama.
     Jeff Bridges stars as Jimmy Dove, a member of Boston's bomb
squad.  What only Jimmy's Uncle Max (Lloyd Bridges) knows is that Jimmy
was once Liam McGivney, a radical in Northern Ireland who now sees
defusing bombs as a kind of penance for the crimes of his youth.  But a
blast from the past comes to Boston in the form of Ryan Gaerity (Tommy
Lee Jones), Jimmy's former Irish cohort.  Escaped from prison after 20
years in custody, Gaerity blames Jimmy for his incarceration and begins
targeting friends and loved ones with elaborate bombs, including
Jimmy's new wife (Suzy Amis).  Jimmy, along with his new partner
(Forest Whitaker) must track down Gaerity before all of Beantown is
blown away.
     There's no better way to describe the key problem with BLOWN AWAY
than to say that it's overblown but underdeveloped.  Everything in the
screenplay by Joe Batteer and John Rice feels forced and artificial.
Nothing exemplifies this more than the attempt to ladle on the Irish
atmosphere.  The characters in BLOWN AWAY speak in heavy brogues, drink
Guinness, dance jigs, even listen to us ... everything, practically,
but say "faith an' begorrah."  Fine, they're Irish already; they're
just not real.  The same is true of the Boston locations, which are so
omnipresent they cease to be atmospheric and become simply oppressive
(and there's no excuse for a television announcer calling a home run in
Fenway Park "over the Green Monster" when the ball is shown landing
over the right field wall).  And the same is true of the big emotional
breakdowns, and the slow motion build-ups to the explosions, and the
length of nearly every scene.  BLOWN AWAY simply never clicks because,
like Gaerity's bombs, everything is far more convoluted than it needs
to be functionally.
     Meanwhile, two of the most talented actors in America are stuck
with underwritten characters and ineffectual direction.  Jeff Bridges
is supposed to be haunted by his past, but instead he generally appears
simply dazed.  He brings no energy and none of the intelligence he
usually brings to his roles.  Tommy Lee Jones doesn't fare much better,
as there is never any clear sense of Gaerity's motivation or state of
mind.  He's just plain weird, bouncing on beds and making bizarre
videotapes, but for all his supposed cock-eyed creativity he never
comes off as smart enough to be genuinely threatening.  Forest Whitaker
is good as the cocky new guy on the bomb squad, but he is the only
bright spot among the actors.  When two actors like Bridges and Jones
go wrong, it's difficult not to point the finger of blame at a director
who wasn't doing his job.
     Though he fails his actors, Stephen Hopkins has other things
working.  He manages to create a mounting tension with each subsequent
bomb, as we begin to suspect that at any given moment, anything could
be a trigger.  This is nowhere better handled than in a great scene
where Bridges' wife and stepdaughter proceed through their kitchen
turning on appliances which may be set to blow.  But the production
just isn't lean enough to sustain that energy.  Watching BLOWN AWAY, I
felt that I had had slightly too much to drink:  everything seemed a
step slow and Peter Levy's photography seemed slightly out-of-focus.
Oh, to be sure, there are lots of big explosions in BLOWN AWAY, but the
amount of cinematic heat generated could be measured with an oral
thermometer.

Title
Review for Drop Zone (1994)
While watching DROP ZONE, I kept thinking about those ski films Warren
Miller has been making for years.  You know the ones--they're
basically a bunch of impressive stunts and nice photography.  Well,
DROP ZONE looks like a skydiving version of one of those films, to
which someone has attempted to add a plot.  I emphasize the word
"attempted," and it's an extremely lackluster attempt at that.  There
is some great aerial footage in DROP ZONE, but the story is a complete
bore, and Wesley Snipes continues to bury himself in Z-grade action
films.
     Snipes plays Pete Nessip, a Federal marshall assigned with his
brother (Malcolm-Jamal Warner) to escort a mob computer whiz (Michael
Jeter) on a prison transfer.  While the plane is in mid-air, a group of
terrorists hijack it, and when there is an explosion during the attack,
Nessip's brother is killed, with Nessip himself blamed for contributing
to the disaster.  But Nessip doubts that it was a simple hijacking, and
he is right:  a team of expert skydivers led by Ty Moncrief (Gary
Busey) intends to use the computer whiz to break into government
records and provide drug dealers with the identity of undercover
agents.  With the aid of sometimes-reckless skydiving instructor Jessie
Crossman (Yancy Butler), Nessip sets out to infiltrate the skydiving
fraternity and thwart Moncrief's plan.
     We've already had one skydiving movie this year (TERMINAL
VELOCITY), and it wasn't a particularly good one.  However, TERMINAL
VELOCITY did have one very important thing going for it--no one
involved seemed to be taking themselves at all seriously.  It was
light-hearted, and occasionally quite funny.  DROP ZONE, on the other
hand, is best taken with meals as a mild sedative.  In lieu of creating
their own set-up, screenwriters Pete Barsocchini and John Bishop appear
to have given Snipes the opportunity to do PASSENGER 57 again (I
suppose to get it right this time).  They also wrack their brains to
come up with such cinematic innovations as a bar fight and a dead
relative to avenge.  It's not stretching the point to say that the plot
between skydiving sequences in DROP ZONE is somewhere on the order of
the plot between sex scenes in your standard X-rated film.
     Of course, as with that example, most viewers probably aren't
coming to DROP ZONE for riveting plot turns and crackling dialogue.
The skydiving sequences are fantastic, perhaps the best I've ever
seen.  They are creatively shot, and include some impressive
synchronized stunts.  As long as DROP ZONE is in the air, it is
something quite exciting.
     Then it hits ground again, and it burns in hard.  After beginning
as a rip-off of PASSENGER 57, DROP ZONE ends like a rip-off of DIE
HARD, and a really bad one at that.  Gary Busey delivers a performance
that has stamps on it, practically sighing audibly as he wanders
through a half-hearted version of his UNDER SIEGE psycho act.  It is
inexcusable in an action thriller to have a boring villain, and Busey
has not an ounce of charisma in this role.  Director John Badham has
made exciting films in the past, but even he appears to be slumming
here.  While the action in the air (which was not his to shoot) is
great, the action on the ground is often ineptly staged and badly
edited.
     What is genuinely depressing is watching the direction Wesley
Snipes' career is taking.  Snipes is a fine actor with a tremendous
range, but for a few years now he has appeared almost exclusively in
bad action films.  It is fine that he has carved out a niche for
himself, and heaven knows it's not easy being an African-American
leading man in Hollywood.  But Snipes should really think about taking
a few character parts that force producers to take him seriously as an
actor, and for him to have a chance at the kind of roles Samuel L.
Jackson and Laurence Fishburne are given a shot at.  His performance in
DROP ZONE is thoroughly competent, but that's all it has to be.  If he
contines to appear in films like DROP ZONE, he might as well take his
career and jump out of a plane with it.  Without a parachute.

Title
Review for Oleanna (1994)
Starring:  William H. Macy, Debra Eisenstadt.
Screenplay/Director:  David Mamet.
     The advertising campaign for OLEANNA features the line, "Whatever
side you take, you're wrong."  Behind that statement is the conceit
that this adaptation of David Mamet's play, and by extension the
original play itself, is a balanced presentation of a controversial
issue.  It is not.  Whatever OLEANNA might be--provocative,
infuriating, incendiary--it is not balanced; it is a technically
proficient but inaccessible piece of reactionary agit-prop.  There are
two fine performances at the center of the film, but it was impossible
for me to separate them from Mamet's smug attempt to pass this off as
thought-provoking theater.
     OLEANNA is essentially a study of two characters:  an unnamed
professor (William H. Macy) at an unnamed college, and Carol (Debra
Eisenstadt), one of his students.  Carol, having just received a very
poor mid-term grade in the professor's social sciences class, comes to
his office to find out what she can do to improve her grade.  Though
the professor is extremely busy, he decides to try to explain some of
the concepts of the class to Carol, in a session that occasionally
becomes quite emotional.  The next day, the professor is stunned to
discover that Carol has charged him with inappropriate conduct--in
effect, sexual harrassment--during their encounter.  When he
confronts her, she attempts to show him how power has corrupted him,
though he isn't even aware of it.
     Those familiar with David Mamet's elliptical dialogue will
instantly recognize OLEANNA as his work; those unfamiliar with it will
wonder what the heck he's trying to do.  The staccato rhythms don't
sound conversational, and in fact sometimes seem even more stagey than
conventional stage dialogue.  But though the first act of OLEANNA is
occasionally very rough going, there is something compelling about that
dialogue.  I found myself paying closer attention, and noticing
recurring motifs and shifting roles.  William H. Macy, who originated
the role of the professor on Broadway, has a gift for making Mamet's
words sound as close to natural as they can, and gives a haunting and
haunted performance.  Debra Eisenstadt is also impressive, alternately
cowering and commanding, but the words sound more forced in her mouth.
Unfortunately, that is symptomatic of what is really wrong with her
role.
     Here, then, is where OLEANNA becomes truly insidious.  The
conflict between Carol and the professor, as it plays out in the second
and third acts, becomes one largely of interpretation.  Has the
professor, by virtue of the power inherent in his position, placed
Carol in a compromising position, or is Carol reacting too much in
accord with a pre-determined agenda?  Mamet pretends to make a case for
both sides, but in reality he has done no such thing.  Though Carol
talks a good talk bout how the professor has wronged her, and attempts
to make her case both to him and to the audience, the way Carol is
portrayed makes her completely unreliable.  In the first act, she is
deferrent to the point of neurosis, taking copious notes which it is
later suggested might have been part of a plan to bring him down;
later, she makes repeated references to an unnamed "group," a
presumably radical campus organization to which she belongs and has as
its insignia a pseudo-swastika design.  At this point, while Carol
speaks wearing this insignia on her lapel, nothing that Carol says can
be taken seriously, even if we are inclined to thing that we may be
seeing events through our own prejudiced lenses.  When the voice for
one side of an argument is presented as a devastated family man, and
the voice for the other side is a caricature of a fascist, the author
surrenders the right to claim that he is being balanced.
     Issues of politics aside, OLEANNA just doesn't connect beyond a
level of detached technical admiration.  Perhaps seeing the play live,
where post-performance discussions were almost always part of the
experience, provided more immediacy, more intensity.  On the big
screen, for all its controversy, OLEANNA is just too cold and
intellectualized.
     Mamet expressed concern when audiences at advance screenings
cheered when the professor struck Carol.  I think that reaction might
inspire Mamet to take a good, long look at the messages he is sending.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
THE X FILES
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, John Neville,
William B. Davis, Mitch Pileggi, Blythe Danner.
Screenplay:  Chris Carter.
Producers:  Chris Carter and Daniel Sackheim.
Director:  Rob Bowman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Two key questions surrounded the big-screen incarnation of THE X
FILES, one applicable to each of the film's two potential audiences.  For
devoted fans of the television series -- and "devoted" doesn't do justice
to the fervor of X-Philes -- the question was whether the film would
reveal too much of the government/alien conspiracy FBI Special Agents Fox
Mulder (David Duchovny) and Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson) have battled
for five years, laying bare the "mythology" at the heart of the show.  For
those unfamiliar with the series, the question was whether the uninitiated
could follow a labyrinthine plot even die-hard fans don't entirely
understand.  Chris Carter, the series' guru and the film's
writer/producer, faced a delicate situation:  he stood to alienate
absolutely everybody.
     In retrospect, it's hard to believe the first question was ever a
question at all.  After all, how many revelations could you expect in a
film where even the title was a source of conflicting information -- was
it THE X FILES: FIGHT THE FUTURE?  THE X FILES MOVIE?  Just plain THE X
FILES (for the record, the only title that appears on screen)?  Yes, the
story does launch from this year's season finale, placing Mulder and
Scully on a relatively mundane detail after the FBI shut down Mulder's
paranormal-focused project "The X-Files."  Yes, it does reveal the nature
of a mysterious "black cancer" featured in several episodes.  Yes, it does
expand on the involvement of the Well-Manicured Man (John Neville) and the
Cigarette-Smoking Man (William B. Davis) in some dark plan involving alien
visitors.  And yes, it does give Mulder and Scully a bit of quality
personal time together.  But does it throw open every door and tie up
every loose end?  Please...you'd be more likely to find the
Cigarette-Smoking Man chomping away on Nicorette gum.
     THE X FILES is not, repeat, _not_ the Place Wherein All Things Shall
Be Made Known Unto Thee.  Essentially it's a two-hour long episode of the
series with amped-up production values, taking our cell-phone wielding
protagonists from North Texas to the Mexican border to Antarctica on a
quest for the truth that is out there.  Yet there's something strange
about moving the show's moody claustrophobia to the big screen.
Cinematographer Ward Russell maintains the high quality which has long
made "The X-Files" one of the best-looking shows on television, but the
problem is less one of style than it is one of scale.  Blown up larger
than life, the conspirators seem less sinister, the situations less
sublimely creepy.  The atmosphere may leave some fans wondering who took
their Mulder and Scully and dropped them into a summer action blockbuster.
     Which brings us to question number two:  how does THE X FILES play if
you've never seen Mulder and Scully before in your life?  Quite simply,
it's an sharp suspense thriller which sets up the characters and
situations with impressive effectiveness and economy.  Director Rob Bowman
complements the necessary exposition with energetic, visually arresting
set pieces, creating a visceral entertainment as satisfying as anything
else you'll find in a multiplex.  Though "X-Files" novices may be left
behind with references to the Lone Gunmen and Mulder's notoriously deadpan
demeanor, it doesn't take familiarity with the series to get a charge out
of the well-paced chases, or a chuckle out of Mulder using a poster from a
certain 1996 blockbuster as an impromptu urinal.
     It's important for those viewers to know that they can have a
perfectly enjoyable time with THE X FILES and still not understand exactly 
what's going on after the film has ended.  In fact, THE X FILES may work
best as a cunning lure, drawing potential new viewers into the fold with a
final shot that might as well have included a "To Be Continued..."
caption.  Regular viewers, on the other hand, have seen better stories
with these characters.  Maybe that should have been the real first
question:  how do you make a unique film event from a series where the
quality already regularly surpasses most theatrical films?  The truth is
only partially out there in THE X FILES, and the truth is that X-Philes
with high expectations may be much harder to please than the average
summer movie-goer.  

Title
Review for Selena (1997)
     I was ready to learn a few things from writer/director Gregory Nava
(MY FAMILY [MI FAMILIA]) about Selena Quintanilla Perez, the superstar of
the Tejano music scene who was shot to death in 1995 at the age of 23.
Selena enjoyed a phenomenal popularity among Mexican-Americans, and seemed
poised to cross over to mainstream English-language success as well.  What
was the secret of Selena's stardom?  How did she make it to the top?
Well, after two hours and ten minutes of SELENA, I'm still not quite sure.
I know a few things about her family, a couple of things about her love
life...I even know that she loved pizza.  There are plenty of details
about Selena's life, but no _story_ of her life.  Without a compelling
narrative direction, SELENA becomes a polished and respectful feature film
version of an A&E "Biography."
     Jennifer Lopez plays the title role in SELENA, which opens in 1995 at
a record-setting Houston Astrodome concert, then flashes back 34 years in
her family's history.  We see her father Abraham first as a young man
trying to make it in a doo-wop vocal group, then twenty years later
(played by Edward James Olmos) as a middle class oil company employee with
wife Maricela (Constance Marie) aand three children.  When Abraham spots
musical talent in the 10-year-old Selena (Rebecca Lee Meza), he pushes all
the children into music, and forms an act with Selena singing out front.
The band begins to hit it big with the Spanish lyrics and cumbia rhythms
of Tejano music, launching Selena into regional recognition.  Abraham
dreams of even bigger things, however, and doesn't want anything to get in
the way, including Selena's romance with band guitarist Chris Perez (Jon
Seda).
     Nava tries to cover a lot of ground in SELENA, and one of the film's
primary flaws is that it seems more interested in relating events than in
giving those events any shape.  There are a dozen minor conflicts strewn
throughout SELENA, many of which could have been used to define what this
film is about.  Instead, Nava treats each one episodically, like a minor
hiccup in Selena's life which proves of little long-term consequence.
Maricela rails against Abraham's decision to quit his job and open a
restaurant, but then she goes silent for almost the entire rest of the
film; Abraham forbids Selena from seeing Chris, but all is forgiven once
they are married.  There are even confusing gaps in the story-telling (Who
were those guys who trashed Chris's hotel room, anyway?  And when did the
band get a recording contract?) which make SELENA feel even more
unfocused.
     SELENA generally feels most on-track when it captures her 
performances.  The concert footage is somewhat over-dramatized, but
Jennifer Lopez gives a charismatic performance as Selena, lip-synching to
the real Selena's recordings while smiling a thousand-watt smile and
radiating a genuine affection for her fans.  Nava tries to give her
calling more weight -- Selena says at one point that she feels "all the
hopes and dreams" of her fans -- but mostly she just seems to be a born
performer with an approachable personality.  Lopez has some very nice
moments, as does the generally reliable Olmos.  His intensity, and the
sense of responsibility he instills in Selena as a Mexican-American
celebrity, give SELENA its greatest sense of purpose.
     Even then, however, it still feels compromised by its unwillingness
to dig very deeply.  SELENA is a _very_ authorized biography, supervised
and executive produced by Abraham Quintanilla, which means that the only
villain in the piece is going to be Yolanda Saldivar (Lupe Ontiveros),
the Selena Fan Club president who shot Selena in an argument over
embezzlement from the club.  Abraham is given a tap on the wrist for his
stubbornness in opposing Selena's relationship with Chris, but otherwise
he comes out looking pretty good.  Nava doesn't challenge Abraham's
obsessive stage parenting as a substitute for his own failed music career,
nor does he wonder whether the children actually enjoyed their life on the
road.  More to the point of the film, Nava tells Selena's story as though
she should be a hero simply because she was a successful Chicana.  There
are worse reasons to lionize someone than for being a good role model, and
it is certainly a tragedy that a young woman died too soon, but the story
of Selena's life just doesn't make for a very compelling dramatic film.
SELENA didn't need to be filled with dirt; it just needed a reason for
being besides providing a pleasant but unremarkable memorial to a pleasant
but unremarkable singer.  The well-made and well-acted SELENA will almost
certainly satisfy Selena's fans.  Those of us who didn't understand why
she was so beloved may have to wait for the unauthorized biography.

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR
(Columbia)
Starring:  Craig Bierko, Gretchen Mol, Vincent D'Onofrio, Dennis Haysbert,
Armin Mueller-Stahl.
Screenplay:  Josef Rusnak and Ravel Centeno-Rodriguez, based on the novel
_Simulacron 3_ by Daniel Galouye.
Producers:  Roland Emmerich, Ute Emmerich and Marco Weber.
Director:  Josef Rusnak.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  99 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It would be easier -- and kinder -- to think of THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR
as a simple case of bad timing.  After all, this is the fourth film in
three months in which characters begin to doubt the nature of their
reality, following THE MATRIX, eXistenZ and OPEN YOUR EYES.  That much
head-tripping could be wearying under the best of circumstances, and THE
THIRTEENTH FLOOR is far from the best of circumstances.  This is genre
film-making at its most superficially plot-driven, compounding its shallow
characterizations with a ridiculous degree of self-importance.
     The story opens with the murder of Hannon Fuller (Armin
Mueller-Stahl), a software engineer who has created a fully functional
simulated computer world modeled after 1937 Los Angeles, complete with
digital characters possessing a sense of self.  One prime suspect is
Fuller's partner Douglas Hall (Craig Bierko), who stands to profit most
from Fuller's death and can't remember where he was at the time of the
murder...or how bloody clothing ended up in his laundry.  When he learns
that Fuller left a message for him inside the simulation, Hall "jacks in"
to the life of one of the simulation characters, and discovers that
another one of the characters (Vincent D'Onfrio) has learned that his
world isn't real.  As Hall continues to investigate, he begins to suspect
that there is more to his own reality than meets the eye.
     There's nothing remarkably innovative about the film's premise at
this point, but director/co-writer Josef Rusnak can't be faulted for
bringing up the rear of the virtual reality parade.  He can certainly be
faulted, however, for the way he approached that premise.  THE THIRTEENTH
FLOOR apparently wants Hall's existential crisis to matter, yet the film
never gives us enough background to understand Hall, his friendship with
Fuller, or any of his anxieties.  It often appears that key scenes of
character development have been edited out and replaced by expository
dialogue, leaving little but essential plot-advancing events and Craig
Bierko's dead-eyed performance.  That makes it virtually impossible for
the story to develop any depth, or for Hall's romance with a mysterious
woman (Gretchen Mol) to be anything but functional.  When the film's real
"villain" shows up for the first time with about 15 minutes left, it's
obvious that Rusnak's primary goal is moving the story, character
development be hanged.
     A science-fiction thriller can work, of course, without much profound
commentary on the human condition; heaven knows THE MATRIX wasn't out to
score philosophical brownie points.  THE MATRIX also didn't make the
mistake of pretending to be anything more than it was, treating its
subject matter with a playful, giddy energy.  THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR is one
of those bleak, somber exercises in which the gloom is meant to suggest
significance but instead makes it even more impossible to enjoy the story.
On only one occasion, involving the confusion of Fuller's simulation
counterpart, does THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR aspire to some kind of
understanding.  Most of the time it's a plodding bore, grinding through
the plot as though its themes were medicinally good for you instead of the
stuff of paperback novels.
     I suppose it's praiseworthy that THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR does work at
providing clues for its plot twists instead of dropping them in your lap.
Mueller-Stahl and D'Onofrio are solid in their dual roles, almost making
up for the blank attractiveness of Mol and Bierko.  The film certainly
achieves the atmosphere it's aiming for; unfortunately, that atmosphere
provides neither entertainment nor insight.  Even if you're prepared to
overlook the inevitable head-scratching convolutions of plot, you're not
likely to care about where they're taking you.  I can imagine an alternate
reality in which film-makers have figured out there's nothing more to say
about alternate realities, at least for the time being.  It must be a
better place than this.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
ALIEN RESURRECTION
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Sigourney Weaver, Winona Ryder, Ron Perlman, Dominique Pinon,
Dan Hedaya, J. E. Freeman, Brad Dourif, Michael Wincott.
Screenplay:  Joss Whedon.
Producers:  Bill Badalato, Gordon Carroll, David Giler and Walter Hill.
Director:  Jean-Pierre Jeunet.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, profanity, brief nudity)
Running Time:  109 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm sure that someone could -- and will -- come up with an
explanation for all the pseudo-science involved in the premise for ALIEN
RESURRECTION.  I'm sure there is some reason to accept why the cloning of
Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver), apparently dead at the end of 1992's
ALIEN3, allowed Evil Military Scientists to produce an alien queen.  I'm
sure there is some reason why that same cloning process turned Ripley into
a human/alien hybrid with memories of her previous life.  I'm sure there's
some reason why the same alien queen which had been producing eggs could
suddenly become viviparous.  I'm sure there is some reason why I should be
able to yank "willing suspension of disbelief" from the jaws of "oh,
_please_."
     The thing is, ALIEN RESURRECTION didn't give me much reason to care
about what those reasons might be.  Screenwriter Joss Whedon spends plenty
of time on the particulars of the situation -- the aforementioned Evil
Military Scientists and their unholy experiments, a close-knit band of
space pirates delivering cryogenically frozen hosts for the alien eggs, a
mysterious woman (Winona Ryder) with a secret -- without realizing that
we're really here to watch Ripley battle aliens.  And that would be the
same Ripley who became an action icon in three previous films, not the
vaguely sinister approximation served up here.  All the effort to make
Ripley's return "realistic" still adds up to a cargo hold full of question
marks and an emotional vacuum at the film's center.  Call me crazy, but if
a writer's going to push the limits of credulity, I'd prefer him to say,
"ALIEN3 was just a dream.  Now here's Ripley, here's some aliens, here's a
space ship...go!"
     And go they eventually do, in some wild and truly bizarre set pieces.
Director Jean-Pierre Jeunet (DELICATESSEN, CITY OF LOST CHILDREN) has a
genuine visual flair which inspires some sharp sequences, notably an
underwater escape for our protagonists which leads into an alien trap.
Unfortunately, he devotes most of his creative energy to coming up with
new and innovative ways for the aliens to treat the heads of their victims
like unsightly facial blemishes.  ALIEN RESURRECTION is frequently a bath
of viscera, a collection of graphic deaths rendered in glorious,
gratuitous detail.
     It all contributes to the impression that ALIEN RESURRECTION is a
"moment" film -- a bunch of neat ideas for individual scenes so
impersonally rendered that they never add up to a coherent narrative.  As
a film, it's never boring, featuring a typically whacked-out performance
by Brad Dourif as one of the scientists, a clever instance of alien
teamwork and self-sacrifice, and a potent encounter between Ripley and a
laboratory full of abominations.  It's also never compelling in a way we
should expect when a character has this much cinematic history.  By the
time its climactic confrontation rolls around -- involving a creature
resembling the evil doppleganger of the Pillsbury Doughboy -- ALIEN
RESURRECTION has become flat-out ridiculous, a big violent joke at the
expense of viewers expecting a real story about Ellen Ripley.  I can't see
most fans of the series walking away from this experience satisfied.  More
likely, the'll walk away muttering, "oh, _please_."

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
TEACHING MRS. TINGLE
(Dimension)
Starring:  Helen Mirren, Katie Holmes, Barry Watson, Marisa Coughlan,
Jeffrey Tambor, Michael McKean.
Screenplay:  Kevin Williamson.
Producer:  Cathy Konrad.
Director:  Kevin Williamson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Kevin Williamson needs to remember why he was in a position to direct
a film in the first place.  On the big screen, Williamson made buckets of
money for Dimension Films by writing SCREAM and SCREAM 2; on television, 
he helped raise the WB network's profile by creating "Dawson's Creek."  In
both cases, he managed the nifty trick of subverting the conventions of a
genre -- teen horror and teen angst melodrama, respectively -- while still
satisfying the traditional audience for each.  TEACHING MRS. TINGLE, an
early Williamson script dusted off for his first stint in the director's
chair, seems to have been written before Williamson figured out tone and
avoiding cliches.  As a teen drama, it's soggy and predictable; as a
thriller, it's a soggy and predictable teen drama; as a comedy, it's a
soggy and predictable teen drama.
     Williamson's "Dawson" ingenue Katie Holmes stars as Leigh Ann Watson,
a high school senior counting on her academic excellence to get her out of
her dead-end small town.  Standing in her way is Mrs. Tingle (Helen
Mirren), a nightmarish history teacher from whom no one is safe.  When an
innocent Leigh Ann is caught in a compromising position with a stolen
final exam, Mrs. Tingle appears ready and eager to destroy her.  Leigh
Ann's best friend Jo Lynn (Marisa Coughlan) and surly stud Luke (Barry
Watson) have other ideas, however, and pay Mrs. Tingle a home visit.  That
visit soon goes dreadfully wrong, ending with Mrs. Tingle tied to her own
bed and the three students seeking a way out of the mess.
     You might be expecting a dark satirical comedy from that set-up, or
perhaps a humor-laced thriller.  Either choice might have salvaged
TEACHING MRS. TINGLE, which instead opts for absurd sincerity.  Williamson
is careful to place Leigh Ann's anxieties and moral quandaries at the
forefront of every scene, delving into her insecurities at being the
daughter of a single mother waitress (an uncredited Lesley Ann Warren).
Holmes is an appealing actress, but she's stuck looking pensive and
wounded much of the time, thinking deep thoughts while the soundtrack
blares with angsty rock.  Her ostensible growth from timid schoolgirl to
self-assured woman is the heart of the film, and a frighteningly weak
heart it is.  Introspection and depth of character has rarely felt such a
bore, or so wildly inappropriate.
     Sadly, the same could be said for Helen Mirren's performance as Mrs.
Tingle.  At the outset, she's the manifestation of every high school
survivor's nightmares of unforgiving instructors.  Mirren goes for the
jugular with every line, and she has some fantastic moments.  Williamson,
unfortunately, isn't sure quite what to do with her.  At times, she's an
inhuman demon, smacking Luke around and returning from the dead like
Michael Meyers. At other times, she's an insidious Hannibal Lecter-like
psychological game-player, or an object of ridicule when the teens
discover her dominatrix relationship with the football coach (Jeffrey
Tambor).  And in the final, worst possible decision, she becomes a vaguely
pathetic victim of her own tormented past.  The many sides of Eve Tingle
don't add up to a multi-faceted character.  They add up to confusion.
     Williamson's inability to figure out Mrs. Tingle is exemplary of his
inability to figure out much of anything in the film.  The farcical gags
with Tambor's masochistic coach are over-played, especially when
juxtaposed with Leigh Ann's sympathy for the coach's unsuspecting wife.
Only Marisa Coughlan truly emerges unscathed, sparking her every scene as
the theatrical Jo Lynn.  Coughlan's funky energy, and Williamson's fairly
effective pacing, keep inspiring the hope that something entertaining will
be just around the corner.  Instead, there's only a sort-of-thriller, a
not-quite-comedy, and a story ultimately about how someone learns an
important lesson in self-acceptance, and not to steal her best pal's guy.
Even when he's flopping, Williamson is still subverting genre  
expectations.  He's taken a provocative dark comedy thriller and turned it
into mush.

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
     FALLEN proves that if you want to evoke millennial dread, you can't
just flirt with it -- you've got to embrace it.  The supernatural thriller
stars Denzel Washington as John Hobbes, a Philadelphia homicide detective
whose greatest success -- the capture and subsequent execution of serial
killer Edgar Reese (Elias Koteas) -- is about to turn into his greatest
challenge.  It seems that a copycat is on the loose, committing murders
with Reese's m.o. and leaving teasing clues for Hobbes.  Is the new killer
a former accomplice of Reese?  Is a rogue cop involved?  Or is the truth
even more sinister, that the same dark spirit which drove Reese to kill
can migrate to other human hosts?
     Along to help answer those questions are John Goodman as Hobbes'
loyal partner, Donald Sutherland as his uptight lieutenant and Embeth
Davidtz as a theology professor.  All are talented performers who acquit
themselves admirably, but not not a one of them has much to work with in
Nicholas Kazan's script.  The dialogue is certainly effective,
particularly in its laconic familiarity of co-worker and familial
interaction.  The story simply doesn't create a single compelling
character to anchor the narrative.  That includes Hobbes, who remains a
vaguely heroic cipher despite the work of consummate professional
Washington.  In fact, the only real spark of personality comes from the
film's body-hopping villain, who occupies so many different characters
that he provides more of a menacing general presence than a specific
personality.
     Consequently, FALLEN becomes a thriller almost entirely of situation,
that situation being the threat of a malevolent eternal entity.  While
Gregory Hoblit puts together a few unique and creepy moments, including a
chase through a busy city street which becomes a psychic relay race, his
approach to the material is disappointingly conventional.  His tone is
that of a slightly-gloomier-than-average crime drama, with filtered
point-of-view shots used and over-used ass the only distinctive signal of
a demonic presence.  In short, it's just not all that disturbing, or even
particularly creative in its approach to the subject of demons walking
among us.  Isolated moments build effective tension, but Hoblit and Kazan
ultimately resort to the kind of obligatory "gotcha" climax which can
leave an audience with the faint aftertaste of cleverness despite a
general lack of substance.  Like Hoblit's PRIMAL FEAR, FALLEN is a
well-made and well-acted film which too often settles for the easy or
obvious way to handle a situation.  When that situation involves the
vengeful soul of an ageless fallen angel, you should hope for a bit more
than gunplay and the crooning of Rolling Stones tunes.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
CHICKEN RUN
(DreamWorks)
Voices:  Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda Richardson, Tony Haygarth,
Benjamin Whitrow, Jane Horrocks, Timothy Spall, Phil Daniels.
Screenplay:  Karey Kirkpatrick.
Producers:  Peter Lord, David Sproxton and Nick Park.
Directors:  Peter Lord and Nick Park.
MPAA Rating:  G
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Nick Park's three Wallace and Gromit shorts for Aardman Animation --
A GRAND DAY OUT, THE WRONG TROUSERS and A CLOSE SHAVE -- are examples of
inspired, brilliant film-making. Park's feature film debut -- CHICKEN RUN,
co-directed with Peter Lord -- is not. Sometimes it's hard to accept
simple quality when you've come to expect genius; I suspect I'll cry a
river of tears when John Lasseter finally produces a film that's merely
good. CHICKEN RUN is unlike virtually any other animated film you're
likely to see this summer, and not just because the characters are
manipulated pieces of clay instead of drawings or CGI creations. It's an
appealing, well-crafted film with a unique sensibility and a few
wonderfully imaginative scenes. And its script can't manage one-tenth of
the wit verbally that the rest of the film creates visually.
     The familiar Aardman goggle eyes and extra-wide mouths are attached
to fowl faces in CHICKEN RUN, set at a Yorkshire poultry farm. One
industrious hen named Ginger (Julia Sawalha) is ever plotting her escape
from the clutches of Mrs. Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) and Mr. Tweedy (Tony
Haygarth), but every plan she hatches is thwarted by her well-intentioned
but bumbling fellow egg-layers. Then a potential savior literally falls
from the sky: Rocky (Mel Gibson), a cocky American cock who has escaped
from his gig as "amazing flying chicken" with the circus. Rocky has
wounded a wing in his crash landing, but Ginger sees him as the final
piece of the escape puzzle. After all, if Rocky can fly, he can surely
teach the chicks of Tweedy Farm a thing or two about getting airborne.
     The broad structure of CHICKEN RUN is a satire of World War II POW
films -- Ginger and her pals are "inmates" of Coop 17 -- but the genre
gags form only a tiny part of the film. The rest of the narrative involves
a fairly banal bickering relationship between Ginger and Rocky,
occasionally jazzed up by a nod to the love-hate relationship between
Brits and Yanks. The dialogue could have stuck to that angle for its
humor, but screenwriter Karey Kirkpatrick instead opts for a seemingly
endless litany of ghastly puns. Gibson, Sawalha and many of the other
performers do energetic voice work, despite the absence of much energy
devoted to developing characters. As long as the characters are flapping
their beaks, CHICKEN RUN is fairly limp stuff.
     That CHICKEN RUN soars highest when it's silent probably comes as no
surprise to Wallace and Gromit devotees, who know that Park has a gift for
elaborately constructed sight gags. CHICKEN RUN's finest moments showcase
that gift, from the opening credits montage of Ginger's unsuccessful
escape attempts to the climactic mid-air showdown with Mrs. Tweedy. In
between, there's the deliriously funny sequence in which Rocky comes to
Ginger's rescue when she's strapped into an automated chicken pot
pie-making machine. The clockwork comic timing is vintage Nick Park, with
the nods to RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK actually underplayed so that they
simply add flavor to an already priceless set piece. And then there are
tiny pleasures like a teapot disguised as a hen, and a group of hens in a
synchronized tai chi display. The depth and texture of the clay-mation
world is satisfying enough; the things the film-makers do with that world
are a joy to behold.
     There's nothing about the Aardman style that demands the animated
equivalent of silent film storytelling; the classic short CREATURE
COMFORTS wedded person-on-the-street dialogue with clay critters to
charming effect. This particular story, however, has the processed flavor
of a dozen other animated films. The characters never get enough chance to
develop the personality Gromit packs into one furrowing of his plasticine
brow, because they're too busy clucking off Kirkpatrick's one-line 
groaners. I'm thoroughly convinced Nick Park has a positively glorious
feature film in him -- perhaps it's the Wallace and Gromit feature planned
for a few years hence -- but this one isn't quite it. It's an entertaining
warm-up, a few bits of brilliance packed in disposable kiddie fluff. In
short, it's simply good. When you've got a genius at your disposal, that's
not quite good enough.

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY
(Paramount)
Starring:  Will Ferrell, Chris Kattan, Molly Shannon, Richard Grieco, Dan
Hedaya.
Screenplay:  Will Ferrell & Chris Kattan and Steve Koren.
Producers:  Amy Heckerling and Lorne Michaels.
Director:  John Fortenberry.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  83 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As evidence of my exodus from the Land of Hip, I offer the confession
that it's been about three years since I've seen an episode of "Saturday
Night Live."  I gave up on producer Lorne Michaels 'round about the time
he was turning "SNL" sketches into hideous excuses for feature films, from
THE CONEHEADS (shudder) to STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY (shudder shudder) to
IT'S PAT (full grand mal seizure).  The show that used to be cutting edge
had turned into a pop culture butter knife:  dull and pointless.
     If A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY is any indication, I haven't missed much
from "SNL" other than an attempt to recapture past glory by regurgitating
old premises.  Steve (Will Ferrell) and Doug Butabi (Chris Kattan), the
socially intept, utterly oblivious night-clubbing L.A. siblings whose
attempts to "score" from one of the film's plot lines, are pretty familiar
creations.  The Butabis are basically a post-disco gloss on the
Czechoslovakian brothers played by Dan Aykroyd and Steve Martin twenty
years ago, they of the wide-open shirt collars and "wild and crazy guys"
finger-pointing.  Only the lingo appears to have changed.  You say tomato,
I say tomahto; you say "foxes," I say "babes."
     I'm not suggesting that a film based on the Czechoslovakian brothers
necessarily would have been funnier than this one.  It's almost axiomatic
at this point that trying to turn a five minute sketch into a full-length
feature is a very, very bad idea (particularly when those five minute
sketches are only funny for the first two).  The fact is, it's briefly
amusing watching the Butabis' synchronized head-swaying to the beat, or
listening to them spew out decrepit pick-up lines.  But the rest of A
NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY demonstrates exactly what kills sketch-to-feature
concepts:  once the sketch material is exhausted, you've got to humanize
characters that are much funnier as broad caricatures.  Doug and Steve,
even though they still live at home with their parents (Dan Hedaya and
Loni Anderson), are really guys with a dream to create their own nightclub
with the help of Roxbury owner Mr. Zadir (an uncredited Chazz Palminteri).
Do you think the Czechoslovakian brothers would be hysterical as earnest
immigrants who decide to clean up their act and improve their English
skills?
     When A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY isn't just plain boring, it's actually
kinda sad.  In case the taut visage of Loni Anderson wasn't frightening
enough, the film wheels out Richard Grieco as himself, doughy and
mascara-covered.  The idea that Grieco still carries enough clout to get
our loser protagonists into the ultra-exclusive Roxbury is one of the 
film's best jokes; Dana Carvey would have dismissed him in an old "SNL"
sketch with an admonition to "wait at the bar."  It's nearly as sad
watching other "SNL" cast members (Molly Shannon, Colin Quinn, Mark
McKinney) turn up as though they were in need of Lorne Michaels' charity.
And it's saddest of all being a member of the audience watching the script
scramble in search of a concept on which to hang something vaguely
humorous, and watching director John Fortenberry's clunky comic pacing.
     Ultimately, there are about five decent laughs and another handful
of chuckles in A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY, and I was counting those in the
stony audience around me, not my own.  I'll give Ferrell and Kattan credit
for a clever combo-poke at SAY ANYTHING... and THE GRADUATE, and I'll give
major credit to the music supervisor for coming up with great song cues
for a number of scenes.  Otherwise, A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY continues two
noteworthy "Saturday Night Live" traditions:  loser brothers infatuated
with trendy night-spots, and generally unwatchable feature films.  Looks
like I could pick up right where I left off.

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
BELOVED
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards.
Screenplay:  Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese and Adam Brooks, based on
the novel by Toni Morrison.
Producers:  Edward Saxon, Jonathan Demme, Gary Goetzman, Oprah Winfrey and
Kate Forte.
Director:  Jonathan Demme.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, nudity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  172 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     BELOVED doesn't feel like a typical Oscar-hyped fall "prestige
release," full of cathartic emotion and earnest dignity.  Its opening
minutes portend something quite different:  two silent exterior shots, one
tracking through a graveyard and the other establishing a rural Ohio home,
shift to a scene of sheer supernatural terror.  Inside the home, a woman
named Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) and her three children cringe in fear as the
family dog spins through the air, an eye torn out and a leg broken by an
anguished spirit.  We learn that the entity is the ghost of another
daughter, who has haunted the house long enough for the latest event to
drive the two boys away from home.  So much for earnest dignity; this is a
prestige release as American gothic horror film.
     That shouldn't be terribly surprising coming from director Jonathan
Demme, who turned 1991's THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS into an Oscar-winning
prestige release.  Yet this is no more a conventional thriller than it is
a conventional epic drama, though it incorporates elements of both.  The
bulk of the film takes place eight years after that prologue sequence,
when the arrival of two strangers shake up the isolated lives of Sethe and
her remaining daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise).  Paul D (Danny Glover), a
former slave with Sethe on the Sweet Home plantation, provides a
companionship Sethe hasn't known for years.  The other arrival is more
mysterious, a child-like woman calling herself Beloved (Thandie Newton).
Their interaction, interwoven with selected flashbacks, turns BELOVED into
a complex ghost story in which the ghosts take on many forms, attacking
both from without and from within.
     It's what BELOVED does with the idea of a ghost story that made Toni
Morrison's novel so powerful, and makes Demme's film so gripping.  The
true horror in the story is Sethe's past, the painful and humiliating past
of all slaves which involved so many horrifying events.  Most film-makers
would have taken those events and shown them off with sincere indignation.
The images created by Demme and cinematographer Tak Fujimoto are jittery
and chilling, designed more to invade the sub-conscious than to inspire
tight-lipped head-shaking.  Beloved appears initially as a sort of
earth-spirit, covered with insects; the bright ribbons of a family
celebration become a lingering symbol of decayed hopes.  With Oprah
Winfrey effectively conveying Sethe's hollow-eyed resignation, BELOVED
shows how a tormented past can corrupt the present to the point that it
feels perpetually haunted, holding meaning only as a constant reminder of
unforgettable evils.
     If BELOVED had intended merely to shock and dismay, it would have
been a very shallow and disspiriting experience.  Instead, it becomes a
call to the living to dare existing in the present, conveyed through two
supporting characters marvelously performed.  Kimberly Elise takes Denver
on a journey from trying to re-capture her own past -- treating Beloved
both as her own child and as the sister she never knew -- to shaking
herself and Sethe into a desire for survival.  Stronger still is the
bright angel of the deceased Baby Suggs (Beah Richards), Denver's paternal
grandmother and the spiritual leader of her community.  Her glorious
sermons, which call all around to celebrate their bodies even as they
acknowledge sorrow, provide stirring punctuation for this tale.  As
counterpoint to Sethe's inability to forgive herself, Baby Suggs enjoins
her listeners to "kiss your hands; love your heart."
     BELOVED is such a side-ranging story that it's bound to feel slightly
disjointed at times.  The flashback to Sethe's escape from Sweet Home
feels particularly drawn out, slowing down a nearly three-hour film.  It's
impressive, however, that three different screenwriters could create so
cohesive an adaptation.  Demme infuses BELOVED with the feverish intensity
of a recurring nightmare, then leaves us with hope of awakening to a new
day.  There is emotion, yes, and dignity; there is also evil, and even
horror.  I can only think of one way to categorize a film like BELOVED:
it may be the most uplifting horror film you'll ever see.

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
(Hollywood/Caravan)
Starring:  Halle Berry, Peter Greene, Clive Owen, Christopher McDonald.
Screenplay:  Amy Holden Jones.
Producers:  Roger Birnbaum, Julie Bergman Sender.
Director:  Amy Holden Jones.
Running Time:  96 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm walking on very thin ice as I prepare to discuss THE RICH MAN'S
WIFE, because in order to explain what is really wrong with it, I'm going
to have to reveal some critical plot details.  Sure, I could try to
tap-dance around it, but in so doing the context would probably still make
it clear what to expect, and I wouldn't have the luxury of discussing
particulars.  So I'm going to do something I've never done before:  I'm
going to encourage you not to read this review if you have any intention
of seeing THE RICH MAN'S WIFE.  Please skip to the bottom, where you will
note my less than enthusiastic rating, and avoid my point-by-point
analysis of how a rather mundane thriller can become an actively annoying
one.
     The title character in THE RICH MAN'S WIFE is Josie Potenza (Halle
Berry), the young spouse of wealthy television executive Tony Potenza
(Christopher McDonald).  The marriage is not a happy one, however, and
when Tony bails out on a romantic weekend for business, Josie seeks
comfort with Cole Wilson (Peter Greene), a man she meets in a bar.  Their
conversation turns to Josie's unhappiness with Tony, a problem Cole
suggests solving by killing Tony.  Josie bolts at the suggestion -- and
away from Cole -- but Cole decides to do the job anyway.  When he reveals
to Josie what he has done, Cole makes it clear that they are in this
together -- he demands $30,000 or he will tell the police that Josie, the
person who stood to gain the most from Tony's death, was the one who
arranged it.
     That is a decent enough premise for a psychological thriller, but
writer/director Amy Holden Jones doesn't begin to make it pay off.  After
an interminable opening which takes several trite scenes to show us how
unhappy the Potenzas are when one good one should have done the job, THE
RICH MAN'S WIFE introduces us to Cole, and any chance at originality
vanishes.  To Peter Greene's credit, he does the best he can with the part
as written, which is as a happy-go-lucky sadist.  If Cole is more
well-intentioned and genuinely obsessive in his murderous behavior,
Josie's dilemma becomes a more compelling one, one which might be solved
by brains rather than by gunfire.
     But there was never really any chance for that to happen because --
here's the big revelation, so don't say I didn't warn you -- we discover
in the film's final moments that Josie herself engineered everything, and
has been spinning an elaborate lie to the police.  Even though I smelled
it coming as soon as I saw that the story was set up as a flashback, I
still cringed when I saw Halle Berry smirk in triumph and get in the car
with her co-conspirator Nora (Clea Lewis, in a performance which
jump-starts the film with its only measure of intentional idiosyncrasy).
Not only had I been subjected to a mediocre thriller, but nothing I had
seen mattered at all.  THE RICH MAN'S WIFE is an elaborate cheat, and the
ending is an opportunity to dupe the audience into believing it had been
watching something unusually clever instead of something unusually lazy.
     "Ah," some of you must be musing to yourselves, "but isn't that
scenario he just described remarkably similar to THE USUAL SUSPECTS, a
film widely praised for its cleverness?  How is THE RICH MAN'S WIFE so
different?"  In one extremely significant way:  in THE RICH MAN'S WIFE,
the ending serves absolutely no dramatic purpose.  Too few critics of THE
USUAL SUSPECTS gave it credit for making Keaton's desire to go legitimate
a critical element in the resolution of the story; the final revelations
make him a tragic character, and there is evidence to allow us to reach
different conclusions.  No such evidence exists in THE RICH MAN'S WIFE.
If the revelation that the story is an complete hoax serves any purpose,
it is as an excuse for suspense cliches (see, that's what they would be
_expecting_) or for day to turn miraculously to night for added artificial
tension.
     There is a smug pseudo-feminism in Amy Holden Jones' script, a sense
that we should be inspired to whoops of "You go, girls!" because Josie and
Nora do in the obnoxious men in their lives and dupe more men to get away
with it, or inspired to self-flagellation because we have under-estimated
them.  But Jones denies us the chance to under-estimate them because we're
never allowed to estimate them in the first place.  She isn't playing with
expectations or with genre conventions.  She's playing us for suckers.

Title
Review for Sister Act 2: Back in the Habit (1993)
Starring:  Whoopi Goldberg, Lauryn Hill, Barnard Hughes, Kathy
Najimy, James Coburn, Maggie Smith.
Screenplay:  James Orr & Jim Cruickshank and Judi Ann Mason.
Director:  Bill Duke.
     Let's play a little "Jeopardy."  The answer is, "140 million
dollars."  If you said the question was, "Why make a sequel to SISTER
ACT?" you'd be right.  It certainly wasn't because anyone had an actual
idea or, if onscreen evidence serves, because Whoopi Goldberg was
brimming over with enthusiasm to don the robes again.  SISTER ACT was a
simple but extremely pleasant entertainment which worked thanks to a
solid set-up and lively performances.  SISTER ACT 2: BACK IN THE HABIT
strips away the last shred of energy, originality and fun, leaving only
a few good musical numbers and a stupefyingly uninteresting story.
     Goldberg again plays Deloris Van Cartier, who is enjoying a
successful career as a Las Vegas singer when our story begins.
Attending one performance are three old friends:  Sister Mary Patrick
(Kathy Najimy), Sister Mary Robert (Wendy Makkena) and Sister Mary
Lazarus (Mary Wickes).  They bring a request from Mother Superior
(Maggie Smith) to return to San Francisco, rejoin the fold as Sister
Mary Clarence, and help straighten out the streetwise students of St.
Francis School.  She naturally agrees, and finds herself music teacher
to a sassy-but-good-hearted bunch of homegirls and homeboys, including
acid-tongued Rita (Lauryn Hill).  Unconventional methods ensue, leading
Deloris to bump heads with St.  Francis' principal, Father Maurice
(Barnard Hughes), and diocese administrator Mr. Crisp (James Coburn),
along the way trying to save the inner city school from closing down.
     If the preceding summary betrays my antipathy, well, it was going
to come out sooner or later.  The irony of SISTER ACT 2 is that where
so many recent sequels have done nothing by Xerox the original, there
was at least an attempt in this case to do something different.
Unfortunately, the attempt was dreadfully misguided.  The charm of
SISTER ACT was based on Goldberg's fish out of water frustration and
the interesting collection of characters in the convent.  There was a
plausible reason for her to be there, and a genuine conflict.  In
SISTER ACT 2 there's no conflict, no plausibility and nowhere for the
humor to come from.  Screenwriters James Orr, Jim Cruickshank and Judi
Ann Mason throw Goldberg into one of the most overused situations in
films, the underachieving bunch of kids who just need a
tough-but-understanding teacher with a fresh perspective.  Even so,
they at least could have played it for laughs, but there is nothing
funny going on anywhere.  A couple of the kids are flat out annoying,
and the resolution of this story is telegraphed from the moment they
appear.  This is nothing but STAND AND DELIVER with a wimple.
     What's truly depressing is that none of the returning characters
even needed to be here.  Kathy Najimy, Wendy Makkena and Mary Wickes
stay pretty much in the background, because their characters haven't
been given anything to do.  Maggie Smith, who was so delightful as
Goldberg's foil in the first film, is reduced to a cameo role; in her
place are Barnard Hughes as the befuddled principal and James Coburn,
and neither are up to the task.  Coburn is ostensibly the villain of
the piece, but there is no effort to define his character or his
motivations, so he just becomes a scowling oaf.  As for Goldberg
herself, there is similarly little for her to do, and she looks bored.
Anyone could have wandered into that classroom and it would have been
the same movie.  Maybe BEVERLY HILLS COP 3: AXEL TEACHES TRAFFIC
SCHOOL.  There's some small attempt to portray a balanced picture of
inner city life, but basically it's Disney 'N the Hood.  Lauryn Hill
gives a nice performance as Rita, and I did enjoy the music.  But
SISTER ACT 2 is supposed to be a comedy, and I did not laugh *once*.
     One more round of "Jeopardy."  The answer is, "Nun."  The question
is, "How many sequels to SISTER ACT should have been made?"

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
subURBIA
(Sony Classics/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Giovanni Ribisi, Nicky Katt, Amie Carey, Steve Zahn, Jayce
Bartok, Parker Posey, Dina Spybey, Ajay Naidu.
Screenplay:  Eric Bogosian, based on his stage play.
Producer:  Anne Walker-McBay.
Director:  Richard Linklater.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief nudity)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the production notes for subURBIA, director Richard Linklater
comments on his working relationship with writer Eric Bogosian that "we
decided somewhere along the way we were separated at birth," to which I
can only add that the nurse in question must have known what she was
doing.  No two sensibilities could be more dissimilar -- Bogosian the
high-energy Easterner and Linklater the laid-back Texan -- even when
addressing similar subject matter.  subURBIA is a frequently compelling
film, but there is a terribly fragmented feel to it.  While Linklater's
natural affection for his characters' generational anxieties gives the
story much of its charm, he frequently finds himself fighting with a
writer who seems to despise those characters.
     subURBIA takes place during one night in the generic (and poetically
named) American suburb of Burnfield, where a group of friends gathers as
they have gathered so many nights before by a corner convenience store.
Among them are Jeff (Giovanni Ribisi), a cynical would-be writer and
part-time community college student; Sooze (Amie Carey), Jeff's girlfriend
and aspiring performance artist; Tim (Nicky Katt), a surly Air Force
drop-out; Buff (Jeff Zahn), a hyper-kinetic pizza restaurant employee; and
Bee-Bee (Dina Spybey), Sooze's friend recently released from a rehab
clinic.  What makes this night different is the return of Pony (Jayce
Bartok), a former classmate now making it big as a rock star and visiting
town with his publicist Erica (Parker Posey) for a concert.  The friends
wander the night in search of entertainment, responding to Pony's presence
and dealing with the lack of direction in their lives.
     The opening images of subURBIA show an endless stream of tract houses
and strip malls, peppered with construction sites building even more of
the same.  Linklater films it almost as one uninterrupted drive-by take, a
numbing panorama of monotony representing a world which seems designed to
destroy imagination, and it suggests that the director's rage, such as it
is, is directed at the place rather than at the people.  The characters in
subURBIA were raised by parents who viewed the placid comfort of their
surroundings as the achievement of a dream and instilled that same idea in
their children.  While they realize that they want something different,
however, they young characters don't know what that something could be;
their souls lack the vocabulary to define their dreams in any other way
but "not this."
     Bogosian, on the other hand, is far less forgiving.  His script sets
up a counterpoint between the principal characters and Nazeer (Ajay
Naidu), the Pakistani immigrant whose family owns the convenience store
where the friends congregate.  In one blistering exchange, Nazeer mocks
Buff by noting that he will be an engineer after two more years of
college, while Buff and his friends will still be wasting their lives
sitting in front of convenience stores.  Nazeer also clashes with Tim,
whose racist tirades are an expression of his twisted sense of the way the
world ought to be.  It is Tim, the alcoholic who cut off part of his own
finger to get out of the service when he realized it was hard work, who
gets the film's best line, a brutal summation of Bogosian's disgust:  "I'm
an American; I'm owed something."  While Sooze plays at addressing
"issues" she knows nothing about and Jeff strips naked in an expression of
divine apathy, Bogosian can only shake his head at them through the words
of Nazeer:  "You people are so stupid.  You throw everything away."
     The schism between the perspectives of Linklater and Bogosian makes
subURBIA a film of mixed messages, but it is still worth watching thanks
to the talented cast members and some individual moments of genuine
clarity.  Dina Spybey is particularly affecting as Bee-Bee, who struggles
against a relapse after an unfortunate encounter with Buff; Steve Zahn
(THAT THING YOU DO!), who originated Buff on stage, channels what begins
as a Crispin Glover impression into a unique portrayal of blissful
oblivion.  The echoes of Glover call to mind another film about
disaffected youth, 1986's RIVER'S EDGE, but subURBIA is wittier and not
nearly as bleak.  Though you may find yourself wondering why these
characters would have been high school friends, the interaction between
them is almost always interesting enough to hold your attention.  The
problem is that, while your attention is held on those characters, you
can't get a handle on what you are supposed to think about them.  Critics
of films about Generation X-ers often repeat the criticisms of real-life
Generation X-ers, that they are merely whining children of privilege who
have never had to struggle for anything in their lives.  Bogosian is one
of those critics; Linklater seems intent on answering them.  subURBIA
would have been a more powerful film if between them they had chosen one
object of scorn:  suburbanites, or suburbia itself.

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
FACE/OFF
(Paramount)
Starring:  John Travolta, Nicolas Cage, Joan Allen, Alessandro Nivola.
Screenplay:  Mike Webb and Michael Colleary.
Producers:  David Permut, Terence Chang, Christopher Godsick, Barrie M.
Osborne.
Director:  John Woo.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In John Woo's FACE/OFF, two men exchange faces.  They don't wear
masks of one another or impersonate one another -- they actually,
physically exchange faces.  Castor Troy (Nicolas Cage) is an infamous
international terrorist; Sean Archer (John Travolta) is a Federal
anti-terrorist agent who has been obsessed with Castor for six years since
Castor was responsible for the death of Archer's young son.  After Castor
is rendered comatose during his capture, Archer learns that Castor has
left a bomb filled with nerve gas somewhere in Los Angeles.  Only Castor's
imprisoned, paranoid brother Pollux (Alessandro Nivola) also knows the
bomb's location, leading Archer to submit to a radical procedure:  he will
have his own faced surgically replaced by Castor Troy's, then go into
prison to get information from Pollux.  The problems begin when Castor
wakes up, and takes on Archer's face while destroying all evidence of the
switch.
     The premise is, of course, absolutely ridiculous.  It also is
absolutely brilliant, and incredibly subversive.  Hollywood film-making is
built around the idea of the star, around the idea that the audience is
always and automatically on the side of the star.  It's not necessary to
write an interesting character for Arnold Schwarzenegger, because the
people in the audience aren't expected to be rooting for the character.
They're rooting for Arnold Schwarzenegger, the actor, the star.
     FACE/OFF, ridiculous though its premise might be, demands the
creation of compelling characters.  For the first forty minutes, John
Travolta plays Sean Archer, the tormented hero who has the audience's
sympathy.  Then comes the switch, and suddenly Nicolas Cage is playing
Sean Archer.  The only way viewers can transfer their allegiance is if
they spent the first forty minutes rooting for Sean Archer, not John
Travolta.
     To make FACE/OFF work, director John Woo had to hand Mike Webb and
Michael Colleary's sharp script to a couple of movie stars who could act,
who could transcend persona for the demands of a dual role.  Both Travolta
and Cage are in fine form in FACE/OFF, tearing up scenery with eye-popping
relish when playing Castor or seething with intensity as Archer.  Of the
two, Cage has the greater challenge, and pulls off the more impressive
transformation.  His Castor Troy is flamboyant, lusty and brutal, the
perfect action villain; his Sean Archer faces the agony of becoming the
man who ruined his life.  Travolta, meanwhile, proves that an action film
with thematic depth can still be a whole lot of fun, riffing on Cage's
manic acting style and offering self-deprecating observations about his
own "ridiculous chin."  Woo delivers the kind of surging action summer
movie-goers have come to expect, while adding touches they probably don't
expect:  evocative musical interludes, confident pacing and -- wonder of
wonders -- an actual script.
     FACE/OFF only really loses its way late in the film, when an
apparently climactic showdown between Archer and Troy in a church instead
turns into a speedboat chase chock-a-block with explosions.  Woo has
always loved his action on a grand scale -- grand opera, actually -- but
the final ten minutes of FACE/OFF are just a bit much, especially at the
tail end of 135 minutes of running time.  Perhaps Woo, who built a loyal
following by filling his Hong Kong action films with stories of guilt,
family ties and redemption, was so excited to be making this kind of film
in America that he just didn't want it to end.  He certainly pulls of a
neat trick in FACE/OFF, investing a conventional genre with unconventional
resonance.  He also challenges the star system of 1990s Hollywood with the
revolutionary notion that an audience can invest itself emotionally in
the characters in the story, not just the names above the title.

Title
Review for American Buffalo (1996)
     "The dialogue."  "Yeah?"  "The dialogue."  "What about the dialogue?"
"Nothing, I'm just talking."  "I know you're talking, but what the ****
are you saying?"
     Just this:  because it is so easy to get caught up in David Mamet's
distinctive brand of rat-a-tat, profanity-laden dialogue, it is even
easier not to notice that he may be one of America's most deeply humanist
playwrights.  OLEANNA, for all its incendiary subject matter, had its
foundations in a frustration over societal impediments to communication;
GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS showed the business world hammering people into the
ground.  The twenty year old AMERICAN BUFFALO was one of Mamet's first
plays, and it retains the ferocity of youth in its film incarnation, a
set-bound but affecting study of trust and the lack thereof.
     Dennis Franz plays Don Dubrow, the owner of a second-hand store and a
man with an axe to grind.  It seems that a customer in his shop bought a
buffalo nickel for a price Don later learned was a steal, and the deal has
left him burning.  With the help of a neighborhood kid named Bobby (Sean
Nelson), Don intends to steal the nickel back from the customer -- along
with other rare coins -- and sell them to another collector.  It is a
simple enough plan, until Walter "Teach" Cole (Dustin Hoffman), one of
Don's poker buddies, learns about it.  Teach is not sure Bobby is up to
the task; in fact, he's not convinced Bobby won't run off with the entire
haul.  Gradually, Teach persuades Don to let him in on the score, setting
in motion a chain of events which will show just how much honor there can
be among thieves.
     It is a challenge to make a play work on the screen, particularly if
the play is as dialogue-heavy as a David Mamet play, and director Michael
Corrente (FEDERAL HILL) seems content to follow the lead of film versions
of OLEANNA and GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS by refusing to "open up" the action.
AMERICAN BUFFALO takes place almost entirely in one location -- Don's
store -- and there are times when the production begins to feel very
cramped and oppressive.  That actually works in favor of Mamet's vision,
however, as this one small shop becomes a microcosm for an urban America
where suspicion has become the defining quality, inhabitants retreating
into locked, gun-protected rooms because someone out there is ready to do
them harm.  It is a bleak tale filmed in bleak tones, but Corrente retains
a necessary urgency.
     He also has two sensational lead actors and one up-and-comer to play
the key roles, and they make AMERICAN BUFFALO even more compelling.
Corrente lured Hoffman into playing Teach by arguing that it was one of
"three great male roles in American theater" (the others being A STREETCAR
NAMED DESIRE's Stanley Kowalski and another role Hoffman has played, Willy
Loman of DEATH OF A SALESMAN), and while that may be arguable, Teach is a
dynamic, pathetic fulcrum for Mamet's story.  He is a small-timer so
convinced that everyone is out to rob him of his small place in the world
that he sees threats, offenses and conspiracies everywhere, and he acts as
a carrier of paranoia, infecting those around him.  Hoffman brings to the
role the dissolute swagger of Ratso Rizzo, and while that makes the
characterization familiar, it doesn't make it any less intriguing.  Dennis
Franz does superb under-stated work as Don, a man trying to believe that
there are some things he can trust,, but the ease with which he is swayed
by Teach betrays how similar the two men are.  There is a slight weak link
in Sean Nelson, who made an electrifying debut in 1994's FRESH but appears
to have grown more self-conscious; he clearly never quite gets a handle on
Mamet-speak.  Still, when the three actors share the climactic final
scene, they refuse to surrender your attention.
     Mamet is very much an acquired taste, and the taste of BUFFALO will
be unappetizing to many.  As a film, AMERICAN BUFFALO is not spectacular,
but it brings a great play to a wider audience, and that alone makes it
noteworthy.  Those who might find it too pessimistic should think of it
instead as a plea for a society where we can trust again, as Mamet's
raging attack on a world where civilization hangs by a thread and where
friendship isn't worth a nickel.

Title
Review for That Old Feeling (1997)
     Bette Midler is not the star of THAT OLD FEELING, and neither is
Dennis Farina.  Actually, that's not entirely true.  Midler _is_ a star,
which is why she gets lead billing, and Farina is at least a recognizable
face, which is why he gets second billing.  THAT OLD FEELING isn't really
about Midler and Farina, however, which is why is needs some kind of
warning for unsuspecting audiences.  Call it the A TIME TO KILL Memorial
Disclaimer:  "The big star getting lead billing is actually playing a
supporting role, and the previews are remarkably deceptive."  Instead of
getting a brassy broad starring in a brassy broad farce, viewers will find
a surprisingly mellow comedy starring someone named Paula Marshall.  It is
only because Marshall is so charming that THAT OLD FEELING doesn't fall
flat on its mellowness.
     Marshall plays Molly DeMauro, a young woman who has just gotten
engaged to aspiring politician Keith (Jamie Denton).  It should be a
blissful time for Molly, except that she knows the wedding will mean
getting her divorced parents -- actress Lilly Leonard (Midler) and
novelist Dan DeMauro (Farina) -- together in the same place.  Dan and
Lilly's divorce was anything but amicable, and the expected shouting match
causes quite a spectacle at the reception.  Unexpectedly, the shouting
becomes smooching, as the feuding ex-spouses find their animosity turning
into animal attraction.  This development causes no end of trouble, as
Keith fears the scandal will harm is Congressional campaign, and Dan and
Lilly's new spouses -- interior designer Rowena (Gail O'Grady) and
self-help author Alan (David Rasche), respectively -- fear they will
become exes themselves.  It is left to Molly, accompanied by a tabloid
photographer named Joey (Danny Nucci), to track down parents who have had
the nerve to commit adultery with each other.
     The first half-hour certainly fosters the expectation that THAT OLD
FEELING is going to be a tart-tongued parade of family quarrels,
exaggerated characters and physical comedy.  The opening scene trots out
the familiar "woman swallows her surprise engagement ring in a desert"
scenario (seen most recently in Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU),
but it is still goofy fun.  The wedding gives the sniping Dan and Lilly
some clever insults, and also introduces the one-dimensional characters
of their second spouses.  David Rasche is particularly funny as the
incessantly jargon-spewing touchy-feely therapist, who talks himself
hoarse and makes terribly sincere pronouncements about how important it is
"to dialogue and to language."  Director Carl Reiner keeps all these
elements under control, never allowing scenes to degenerate into pie
fights or prat-falls, while still keeping THAT OLD FEELING lively and
sharp-witted.
     That sharp wit is dulled, however, once Dan and Lilly run off
together, drastically reducing the level of comedic tension and shifting
the focus to Molly's quest for her parents and for her own romantic
happiness.  The story ends up emphasizing Molly's ambivalence over her
marriage to Keith, but the script by Leslie Dixon gives us no reason to
expect any problems between them until the plot arranges to separate them.
THAT OLD FEELING needs to lay more foundation for their incompatibility --
more early scenes of Molly's playful streak, more sense of Keith's stuffy
careerism and hypocrisy -- so that we understand the story is really going
to be about Molly.  As it stands, THAT OLD FEELING often seems disjointed.
The reunion of Dan and Lilly has little meaning besides as a plot device
to get Molly on the road with Joey, and Keith's drunken seduction of
Rowena becomes an afterthought to justify our distaste for him.  There is
too little conflict for too much of THAT OLD FEELING as we wait for Molly
to make her choice between Keith and Joey.
     Thank heavens Paula Marshall is such a find.  She is the kind of
actress who seems to be comfortable in any kind of scene, combining an
intelligent sexiness with a willingness to look completely silly; the
single funniest moment in THAT OLD FEELING may be a depressed Molly
drowning her sorrows in a mouthful of spray whipping cream.  There are
some very nice scenes between Marshall and Danny Nucci, whose photographer
begins as a supreme annoyance but gradually develops an adorably scruffy
puppy-dog quality, and Molly's romantic dilemma becomes interesting only
because Marshall makes her such a flustered sweetheart.  While Bette
Midler goes about the business of playing Bette Midler (including singing
a song) and Dennis Farina enjoys the chance to play against career-long
type-casting as a hoodlum, THAT OLD FEELING quietly becomes a showcase for
a talented young performer.  If you find yourself entertained by THAT OLD
FEELING, it may not be in the way you expect, or by whom you expect.

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
GLADIATOR
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed,
Djimon Honsou, Derek Jacobi, Richard Harris.
Screenplay:  David H. Franzoni & John Logan and William Nicholson.
Producers:  David H. Franzoni, Branko Lustig and Douglas Wick.
Director:  Ridley Scott.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, adult themes)
Running Time:  154 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "I am just an entertainer," sniffs one character to another late in
Ridley Scott's GLADIATOR. The comment is intended as counterpoint to the
hero's moral courage and desire to right wrongs, but it also rings an
all-too-familiar chord as the movie season heads into its "summer event" 
phase. How often have brain-dead films been defended with a sniff that
it's "just meant to be entertaining?" How often has "entertainment" in the
blockbuster era been defined as "tens of millions of dollars thrown at a
production that began without a completed script?" Critics cringe as the
first of May draws near, knowing that a cadre of Hollywood film-makers who
consider themselves "just entertainers" will be spewing forth grotesquely
inept stories peppered with explosions and digital effects.
     With such images in mind, I shouldn't diminish GLADIATOR by tossing
out so banal a word as "entertaining" -- but it is. I shouldn't succumb to
the temptation to describe it with ad-copy buzzwords like "spectacular!" 
or "dazzling!" or "epic!" -- but it is. Movies just don't get much more
fundamentally satisfying on so many levels -- simple without being
simplistic, grand in scope without losing track of its basic appeal.
     The time is 180 A.D., where the Roman Empire is finishing the
military campaign in Germania that will eliminate the last outpost of
resistance. Leading the troops is General Maximus (Russell Crowe) --
valiant warrior, humble farmer and favorite of Emperor Marcus Aurelius
(Richard Harris). Though Maximus wants nothing more than to return home to
his family at the end of the war, the ailing Marcus Aurelius wants him to
become the next emperor, ultimately to return Rome to a republic. This
understandably troubles Marcus Aurelius' son Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix),
who kills his father before his will can be known. Succeeding to the
throne, Commodus orders Maximus and his family executed. Maximus escapes,
only to find himself enslaved by gladiator owner Proximo (Oliver Reed). 
>From his now-lowly state, Maximus vows to avenge the deaths of his family
and his emperor.
     The story is, to put it bluntly, older than the Roman Empire: 
reluctant-but-impossibly-noble hero fights against great odds to bring low
a regal-but-impossibly-dastardly villain. It has been done and done and
done again, because when it's done well, few stories are as viscerally
effective. And GLADIATOR does it remarkably well. Crowe plays Maximus as
straight as he can possibly be played, giving him an iconic grandeur; it's
the kind of role that makes actors into movie stars. Phoenix makes a
sensational sniveling villain, wrapping his parricidal tendencies and
incestuous lechery after his sister Lucilla (Connie Nielsen) in a
pathetically sincere need to be adored. The late Oliver Reed also scores
in his final role as the casually cynical Proximo. Every one of them is
playing a standard film type; every one of them refuses to submit to the
notion that a type can't be played with energy and commitment. As a basic
film story, GLADIATOR is lean and effective.
     And it's not too bad as a visual treat, either. Copious use of
digital effects is de rigeur for epic genre films circa 2000, yet there is
nothing remotely obligatory or pointlessly showy about GLADIATOR's
re-creation of ancient Rome. It's stunning work that raises the ruins of
the Colosseum and captures both the magnificence and the casual brutality
of the culture. The scenes of warfare and gladitorial contests are taut
(and graphically gruesome) pieces of action film-making, bringing Ridley
Scott back to the artistic heights he abandoned for films like G.I. JANE
and WHITE SQUALL. It is becoming a Hollywood clich to claim that "every
dollar is up there on the screen," but that's the way GLADIATOR feels. The
execution of its technical detail is so precise that it never feels like
more or less than exactly what is necessary to complement the story.
     If there's a weak link to GLADIATOR, it's the amount of time devoted
to Roman political intrigue. The imperial/republican squabbling and
back-stabbing certainly recall classic sword-n-sandal films like
SPARTACUS, but GLADIATOR starts to drag a bit whenever Derek Jacobi's
plotting senator is on screen. Perhaps it's just that GLADIATOR is so
invigorating as a stripped-down, nuts-and-bolts dramatic adventure that
anything remotely resembling subtext just gets in the way. It's even more
silly than amusing to contemplate parallels between GLADIATOR's
crowd-pleasing bloodsports and professional wrestling (complete with
Maximus's combat moniker "The Spaniard"). The usual caveat for summer
event films has been something akin to "leave your brain at the door," but
that's not entirely appropriate or fair to apply to GLADIATOR; it's too
smartly scripted in its old-fashioned way. The better suggestion is to
leave your expectations of hipness, reflexivity and big-budget bombast at
the door. GLADIATOR is just entertaining ... in all the wonderful ways
that word can be a good thing.

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)
     I'll be honest with you:  the last thing I was expecting from the
Paramount-distributed TREKKIES was a warts-n-all documentary about "Star
Trek" fandom.  Paramount, after all, was the corporate homeworld of the
United Federation of Planets; how critical a look could the studio
_really_ take at those who so proudly wore the milk moustaches from its
most lucrative cash cow?  Roger Nygard's TREKKIES, however, is about as
far from an officially endorsed whitewash as one could imagine.  In fact,
though its character studies are at times undeniably amusing, it's almost
too focused on turning its subjects into the oddballs everyone already
suspects Trekkies of being.
     Narrated by actress Denise Crosby (who portrayed Tasha Yar on the
syndicated "Star Trek: The Next Generation"), TREKKIES is essentially a
loosely assembled collection of cast member anecdotes and portraits of the
hardest of hard-core fans.  Among the individuals profiled is Barbara
Adams, a Little Rock, Arkansas bookbinder and "Commander" of a local fan
organization who gained national attention when she served as a Whitewater
trial juror in her full Starfleet uniform.  Another tour guide is
14-year-old Gabriel Koerner from Bakersfield, California, who leads
viewers through a typical "Star Trek" convention -- one of 28 he has
attended -- complete with merchandise tables, auctions and guest
appearances by cast members past and present.
     The bad news for many "Trek" fans expecting a sympathetic portrait is
that those two characters are among the more mainstream folks in the film.
TREKKIES doesn't hesitate to show us characters like the cross-dresser who
performs "Trek"-inspired folk songs, or a woman whose obsession with Brent
Spiner (the artificial life form Data on "The Next Generation") borders on
stalking, or an engineer who travels the streets of Minneapolis in an
enclosed wheelchair-like device modeled after a "Trek" prop.  When the
subject matter swerves into the pornographic fan fiction which has been
created using "Trek" characters, it no longer feels like Nygard is just
creating a comprehensive catalog of the manifestations of Trekkie-ism.
There's an element of side show exploitation to these aspects of TREKKIES,
a sense that Nygard is less interested in understanding the phenomenon of
Trekkies than in turning their eccentricities into punch lines.
     That's truly a shame, because the "why's" of Trekkies could have been
at least as fascinating as the "who's".  In an utterly unique way, the
universe created by Gene Roddenberry affected viewers as no other
television program has in the history of the medium.  There are moments of
insight into the way "Star Trek" changed the lives of those involved in it
forever, as in actor James Doohan's ("Scotty") emotional story about how
he helped save the life of a suicidal woman.  TREKKIES also touches on the
impact of the show's positive portrayal of multi-ethnic integration, and
on the optimism of its messages of inclusion and acceptance.  Such ideas
should have made it easier to see Trekkies as social outsiders who have
embraced a mythology in which they are tolerated, and even celebrated.
It's ironic -- and somewhat disappointing -- to watch the film turn them
into social outsiders once again.
     There's no denying that TREKKIES is occasionally quite funny, whether
in the answers of cast members to the strangest fan experiences they have
had, or in the ways various Trekkies have integrated their love of "Trek"
into their lives (like dentist Dennis Bourguignon's "Starbase Dental"
office). It was only after I left the theater that I realized I had been
laughing at these people more than I was laughing with them.  Yes, there
are comments about how intelligent most "Star Trek" fans are; it's too bad
they feel like token gestures.  Many Trekkies themselves seem to have
embraced the film, but I'm not sure they should appreciate the way they
are turned into exactly what the broader population generally thinks of
them.  There's not enough balance between the unusual things these people
do and the love that inspires them to do those things.  It was brave of
Paramount to endorse a film like TREKKIES.  It also seems like a bit of a
betrayal.

Title
Review for Sirens (1994)
Starring:  Hugh Grant, Tara Fitzgerald, Sam Neill, Elle Macpherson,
           Portia de Rossi.
Screenplay/Director:  John Duigan.
     I'm no marketing whiz, but it would appear that someone made a
serious error in the advertising campaign for the new Australian import
SIRENS.  The posters prominently feature the bare back of
co-star/supermodel Elle Macpherson accompanied by the line, "Be
seduced."  One might be inclined to believe that the target audience is
men, and that SIRENS is simply some soft-core porn throwaway.  In fact,
SIRENS has more in common with ENCHANTED APRIL than it does with
EMMANUELLE.  Writer/director John Duigan, creator of the wonderful
coming-of-age films THE YEAR MY VOICE BROKE and FLIRTING, has fashioned
another tale of sexual awakening, this time focusing on an adult, and
it's a delightfully acted and beautifully filmed comedy-drama.
     SIRENS is a fictional story based on the true-life 1930s artist
Norman Lindsay (Sam Neill), a free-thinking Australian whose nude
studies, particularly "The Crucified Venus," created a stir in
conservative British circles.  When the Anglican church becomes
concerned about the "blasphemous" painting's inclusion in an
international exhibition of Lindsay's work, it sends clergyman Anthony
Campion (Hugh Grant) and his wife Estella (Tara Fitzgerald) to convince
Lindsay to withdraw it voluntarily.  The very proper British couple is
invited to stay at Lindsay's wild and lush compound, where they meet
his three principal models:  lusty Sheela (Elle Macpherson), socialist
Prue (Kate Fischer) and innocent Giddy (Portia de Rossi).  While
Anthony works to persuade Lindsay, Estella is left to discover the
untamed world of the Australian Blue Mountains.  Gradually, a change
comes over her, as the influence of the uninhibited models opens
Estella's eyes to desires she didn't know she had.
     SIRENS skillfully interweaves two themes without seeming
overstuffed.  The principal story, that of Estella's response to the
liberated and liberating world of the Lindsay estate, focuses on how
that world interacts with the restrictive female sexual mores of the
time.  Tara Fitzgerald does an impressive job of conveying Estella's
growing curiosity through her open face and subtle body language, and
our view of an Australia only just on the edge of "civilization" comes
through her eyes.  That world is populated by wombats, insects and even
flowers which take on a kind of personality.  However, most
significantly, there are snakes, and the Linday compound is established
as a kind of reverse-Eden where humans have the chance to return to a
state of nature through acknowledgement of sensuality.  The characters
native to this world are frequently shown eating apples, practically
wallowing in their connection to original sin.  Lindsay challenges the
Christian notion of sin as linked to female sexuality, and SIRENS is
largely the playing out of that challenge.
     At the same time, the issue of artistic censorship is very much
part of the subtext.  The dinner table debates between Anthony and
Lindsay frame the argument, and while it is clear where Duigan's
sentiments lie he doesn't turn Anthony into a dogma-spouting
stereotype.  He presents the Church's case with a respect for its
views, and Hugh Grant is a charming and surprisingly hip spokesman.
While the arguments are nothing special, and in fact tend towards the
cliche, Duigan treats the issue of art, its influence on the public and
the artist's responsibility as a legitimate subject of debate.
     If there is any fault to be found with Duigan's script, it's that
he does skimp on his characters in the interest of establishing his
analogy.  The relationship between Anthony and Estella is not as
well-established as it might be, and Lindsay himself is little more
than a catalyst for Estella's transformation.  Macpherson and Fischer
look good, but they're given too much to say and it's never all that
interesting when they do speak.  However, SIRENS does quite a lot with
its visuals, highlighting its glorious Australian settings, and it
maintains a frisky sense of humor about its sensual subject matter
without sniggering over it.  Those who might be looking for a leering
sex romp should look elsewhere; SIRENS is lyrical, lively and
thoughtful and always a feast for the senses.

Title
Review for Theory of Flight, The (1998)
     If it's December or January, it must be time for "triumph over
illness/handicap" films.  They spew forth during Oscar season like colored
hankies from a magician's sleeve, playing to the Academy's time-honored
tradition of tossing nominations at anyone who hops into a hospital bed,
or occupies a wheelchair, or otherwise tackles physical or mental
adversity.  Into this crowded field comes THE THEORY OF FLIGHT, a quirky
comedy-drama of romantic friendship starring Kenneth Branagh as Richard
Hawkins, an artist so flighty that he actually does try to take
flight...right off the roof of a building.  For his trouble Richard is
sentenced to community service, which takes the form of assisting Jane
Hatchard (Helena Bonham Carter), a young woman stricken with ALS (better
known in the U.S. as Lou Gehrig's Disease) and confined to a wheelchair.
She wants only one thing from Richard:  for him to help her realize her
life's dream before she dies.  Cue soaring music and inspirational
message.
     Well, not exactly.  It seems that Jane's life's dream is to lose her
virginity.  None-too-keen on doing the deed himself, Richard instead
decides to rent her a gigolo for one night.  And none-too-wealthy, being a
flighty artist, he decides to rob a bank to pay for it.  Thus unfolds a
singularly odd sort of film, at once a dark comedy, an unconventional love
story and, yes, a triumph over illness/handicap film.
     The strange thing about THE THEORY OF FLIGHT is that it's not always
clear whose triumph over a handicap will be the focus of the film.  As the
narrative progresses, it becomes ever more clear that Richard is the real
protagonist of the piece, the character who is supposed to learn and
change through this experience.  Unfortunately, he's also the character
who is least interesting, and makes the least sense.  There's something
emotionally amiss with this fellow, that's for certain; exactly what that
something is, not so much.  Kenneth Branagh (apparently still suffering
side effects from channeling Woody Allen in CELEBRITY) is all neurotic
discomfort and goofy twitches.  The character's intense desire to follow
through on the bank robbery falls somewhere between melodramatic
affectation and sincere-though-misguided expression of resolve, when only
one or the other would truly clarify things.
     Meanwhile, Helena Bonham Carter continues to act circles around most
of her contemporaries.  Jane is a superb piece of characterization, never
merely the self-pitying, hard-on-the-outside-soft-on-the-inside person
with a handicap that has become such a cinematic cliche.  There's wicked
self-deprecating humor in the character -- she posts a message to an
Internet personals board stating "Hideously crippled young woman seeks
sex" -- but also an innocent wistfulness.  Though it's a challenging bit
of physical acting for Bonham Carter to wrap her mouth around Jane's
slurred speech and adopt the distinctive movements, her finest moment is a
silent one -- a pleading glance at Richard as her voice synthesizer plays
her recorded request.
     It's the clash between our interest in those two characters which
prevents THE THEORY OF FLIGHT from soaring to the highest possible level.
While Richard's awakening to his own self-indulgence may be the point,
it's still tedious watching him indulge himself when watching Jane is so
much more interesting.  Perhaps the problem is that there is too much
high-concept to this tale, too many silly little bits of business to
distract from genuine interaction between the two principal characters.
It's hard for a love story to be great when you want one of the lovers to
end up happy, and the other just to end up an adult.  You have to commend
THE THEORY OF FLIGHT for taking a slightly different flight plan towards
soaring inspiration.  It just can't quite get there on only one good wing.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
CITY OF ANGELS
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Meg Ryan, Dennis Franz, Andre Braugher.
Screenplay:  Dana Stevens, based on WINGS OF DESIRE by Wim Wenders.
Producers:  Dawn Steel, Charles Roven.
Director:  Brad Silberling.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     First, this important preface:  I love WINGS OF DESIRE.  Wim Wenders'
lyrical 1988 film, positing angels roaming through Berlin and one
particular angel fascinated with the human experience, caught me
completely by surprise when I first saw it.  It was less a narrative than
a visual tone poem of division -- between heaven and earth, between
monochrome and color, between East and West Berlin -- which eventually
finds unity.  The experience, terribly un-critic-like though it may sound,
was spiritually moving.  That emotional response contributed significantly
to me distaste for Wenders' own ill-fated attempt at a sequel, FARAWAY, SO
CLOSE!; it similarly led me to dread the impending arrival of the
Americanized re-make CITY OF ANGELS.  Why re-make perfection, especially
to engage in the typical Hollywood reductionism of making it all about the
love story between the curious angel and his human object of desire?
     Perhaps it is because I expected so little that I was so improbably
delighted by CITY OF ANGELS.  ANGELS does indeed move the love story to
the forefront, following an angel named Seth (Nicolas Cage) on his
observational wanderings through contemporary Los Angeles until he meets
and falls in love with troubled surgeon Maggie Rice (Meg Ryan).  Though
the decision to play up that relationship was certainly a practical one --
WINGS OF DESIRE's stream-of-consciousness eavesdropping hardly screams
"commercial" -- it also gives CITY OF ANGELS its unique identity.  Certain
specific elements remain from the original, including the library milieu
and a former angel (Peter Falk in the original, Dennis Franz here) who
acts as the angel's human guide, but screenwriter Dana Stevens and
director Brad Silberling choose to re-imagine the story from a different
perspective rather than re-make it.  The result is sort of a strange
cousin to ROSENCRANTZ AND GUILDENSTERN ARE DEAD -- a story based on
existing characters and situations, yet thematically independent and
appealing in its own right.
     Much of that appeal springs from CITY OF ANGELS' commitment to
its tone.  Few mainstream Hollywood movies of recent years have been so
willing to adopt a reflective pace, to paint broad canvases of human
experience and allow us to watch in peace.  Cinematographer John Seale
(THE ENGLISH PATIENT) gives Los Angeles a serene, otherworldly glow, while
composer Gabriel Yared (also of THE ENGLISH PATIENT) lays an underscore of
hypnotic strings.  While never earth-shaking, Silberling's compositions
are rarely predictable and frequently memorable.  It's that rare
big-screen movie that uses the big screen, allowing its intimate story to
unfold in the grandeur of a massive city.
     Ultimately, it's that intimate story which will win over viewers.
Cage and Ryan make a superb romantic pair, each actor reaching for the
longing in their respective characters and connecting that longing to the
other.  Though Cage may not be the most obvious choice for a role based on
preternatural calm, the intensity percolating beneath his benevolent
glances heightens the anticipation of his possible "fall" to humanity.
It's a bit harder to get a handle on what Maggie wants from her
relationship with Seth, and harder still to care a whit about the
obviously superficial relationshp she is in when we first meet her.  Few
quibbles about the characters matter, however, when they share the screen;
the sheer force of their eye contact is often enough to wipe away any
doubts about their feelings.  A story about life-changing emotion is a
hard sell to cynical audiences, but Cage and Ryan sell it.
     For all its meaphysical musings, there's never any question that CITY
OF ANGELS is an old-style Hollywood love story, a multi-hanky weeper light
years removed from the dream-like WINGS OF DESIRE.  It's almost enough to
make you forget that ANGELS is based on WINGS...which, for my money, is
the best thing that possibly could have happened.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
     A message to all you aspiring screenwriters:  know your genre.
Don't misunderstand, I'm not suggesting a writer should limit him or
herself to only one genre, or that film script formulas couldn't stand a
little innovation.  However, there are good reasons why you shouldn't
write a farce the same way you write a biographical drama.  It's about
pacing, about knowing your audience, about delivering the emotions the
genre promises to deliver.  Scott Rosenberg has made a decent career for
himself writing primarily comedies (BEAUTIFUL GIRLS) and action films (CON
AIR, uncredited contribution to ARMAGEDDON).  His chosen style is arch
dialogue and lots of it, which works out just fine when you're writing a
comedy or an action film.  A dark thriller is another cinematic beastie
entirely.  In the case of DISTURBING BEHAVIOR, that critter is a great big
turkey.
     It didn't necessarily have to be so foul a fowl.  The premise is a 45
degree spin on Ira Levin's THE STEPFORD WIVES, the tale of a troubled teen
named Steve Clark (James Marsden) trying to adjust to his new home of
Cradle Bay, Washington after a family tragedy.  But there's something
strange going on among the teens of Cradle Bay, something stoner Gavin
Strick (Nick Stahl) tries to warn Steve about: a group of frighteningly
civic-minded students called the Blue Ribbons.  You see, when they're not
holding bake sales, they're breaking the necks of their girlfriends and
recruiting other students into a state of lobotomized pleasantness.
     It's a nifty idea to create a creepshow out of the recognition that
a teenager who's acting "normal" probably isn't.  DISTURBING BEHAVIOR,
however, isn't really a creepshow.  Instead, it's a frantic and unfocused
teen-sploitation in which the re-programmed adolescents get violent when
they get horny, which, being teenagers, they do with some regularity.
"X-Files" and "Millennium" veteran David Nutter drags out plenty of
familiar tricks (point-of-view camera tricks, bobbing flashlights in the
woods, even a score by Mark Snow), but his efforts to create mood can't
get past who-cares characterizations and unexplained motivations.  There's
nothing frightening about the mastermind behind the plot, since he's just
another one of the malicious or oblivious adults who populate films of
this kind.  The notable exception is the wacky janitor (William Sadler)
who hangs out in the high school basement killing rats.  Score one for the
parents of Cradle Bay for being more concerned with rebellious attire than
with a rodent-obsessed lunatic working in their children's school.
     Ultimately, DISTURBING BEHAVIOR crashes on the failure of Rosenberg's
script.  Leave aside for a moment the perfunctory romantic interest (Katie
Holmes), the forced dialogue like "Self-mutilate this, Fluid Boy," or the
pointless extended riff in which Gavin hips Steve to the startling
revelation that -- gasp! -- high school students form cliques.  DISTURBING
BEHAVIOR is simply a miserable thriller, because Rosenberg rarely bothers
to build any tension into his scenes.  Sure, he has people jump out to go
booga-booga every once in a while.  That doesn't add up to a second of
genuine suspense, even when our heroes find themselves the next candidates
for CLOCKWORK ORANGE style "treatment."  The film merely tears along from
start to finish in a brisk 80 minutes, and when it's all said and done the
only thing you'll remember is how ridiculous it all is.
     DISTURBING BEHAVIOR isn't a lousy thriller because it tries to be
funny.  "The X-Files" has successfully paired satire and scares, as have
the two SCREAM films.  It helps, however, if the humor supports character
development, or perhaps elicits a laugh once in a while (all right, the
Blue Ribbons' Olivia Newton-John-playing yogurt shop hangout is worth a
chuckle).  No, DISTURBING BEHAVIOR is a lousy thriller because it never
tries to be thrilling.  It's just a big dumb goof, cynically pitched at
youth with sex, violence, loud music and a story that doesn't make a shred
of sense.  Having made two recent films with Michael Bay, Rosenberg's
mistake is understandable.  But if you're going to write an action film,
you'd better not try to make it a suspense film.  The idea of Scott
Rosenberg's next thriller if he doesn't learn a few new tricks...now
_that's_ scary.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
SMALL SOLDIERS
(DreamWorks/Universal)
Starring:  Gregory Smith, Kirsten Dunst, Jay Mohr, Kevin Dunn, Phil
Hartman, voices of Tommy Lee Jones, Frank Langella.
Screenplay:  Gavin Scott, Adam Rifkin and Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio.
Producers:  Michael Finnell and Colin Wilson.
Director:  Joe Dante.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some films are so bald-faced in their attempt to have it both ways
that you just have to hand it to 'em for their chutzpah.  On one level,
for instance, it's obvious SMALL SOLDIERS wants to skewer gung-ho
militarism.  The set-up finds defense contractor Globotech purchasing a
toy company with the cheerfully all-American name of Heartland, attempting
to diversify before post-Cold War down-sizing down-sizes it right out of
existence.  Instructed by Globotech boss Gil Mars (Denis Leary) to create
state-of-the-art action toys, designer Larry Benson (Jay Mohr) slips a
prototype weapons system microprocessor into the new Commando Elite and
Gorgonite action figure lines, creating intelligent, interactive toys
designed "with the same rigorous standards demanded by the U.S. Defense
Department" (perhaps the film's best joke).
     The kicker is that the Commando Elite figures, led by Chip Hazard
(voice of Tommy Lee Jones), are the merciless and vaguely racist bad guys,
programmed to seek out and destroy the gentle, noble, home-seeking Archer
(Frank Langella) and his insecure fellow Gorgonites (no one explains why
the Gorgonites couldn't have been programmed as slightly more challenging
antagonists than the therapy group from "The Bob Newhart Show").  When
troubled teen Alan Abernathy (Gregory Smith) allies himself with the
Gorgonites, he too becomes a Commando target, along with his New Age-y
parents (Kevin Dunn and Ann Magnuson) and his would-be girlfriend Christy
(Kirsten Dunst).  As Chip rallies his troops against the enemy, framed
Patton-like by the U.S. flag and spouting a succession of non-sequitur
patriotic cliches, it becomes clear that director Joe Dante and his team
of writers want us to nod knowingly at how the destruction to come will be
the result of hard-wired hyper-hawkishness.
     Those same folks also know that the destruction to come will be
considered bitchin' cool by a contingent in the audience which might be
inclined to by SMALL SOLDIERS merchandise.  In an era where action figure
tie-ins are as much a part of popcorn movie-making as plastic fast food
cups, SMALL SOLDIERS bypasses the inconvenient middle step of figuring out
how to turn the characters into toys.  It also bypasses the inconvenient
middle step of explaining why we should side with the peace-loving
Gorgonites when the film makes the Commando Elite's assault (complete with
flaming tennis balls, nail guns and make-shift helicopters) look like so
much fun.  In many of his previous films (including GREMLINS, which is the
most obvious model for SMALL SOLDIERS), Dante was able to give a dark edge
to his invasions of suburban serenity.  He loses that edge early on in
SMALL SOLDIERS to meet the demands of marketing.  It's almost as though
the checks Mars (the God of War, get it?) passes out to every one at the
end to buy their silence bought off the film-makers as well.
     It would be easier to dismiss SMALL SOLDIERS if the result weren't so
entertaining, not to mention frequently amusing.  For adults, it will be
clever mostly in an in-jokey sort of way, from references to GREMLINS'
Gizmo to the use of he-man icons like Ernest Borgnine, George Kennedy and
Clint Walker as voices for the Commando Elite.  The rest of the voice
talent -- Spinal Tap alums Christopher Guest, Michael McKean and Harry
Shearer re-united as Gorgonites; Sarah Michelle Gellar and Christina Ricci
voicing mutant versions of a Barbie-style doll -- isn't too shabby either.
The humans may be a pretty boring lot (excluding Phil Hartman, in his last
film role as Christy's consumer electronics-obsessed dad), but the
combination of Stan Winston's animatronics and perfectly-integrated CGI
versions make the toy story a fairly lively one.  
     SMALL SOLDIERS is just weird and twisted enough to be worth a
matinee.  It's also a poorly-concealed version of the same action worship
you find in a film like ARMAGEDDON, though it's almost better when the
worship is thoroughly unironic.  The token attempts at satire
notwithstanding, SMALL SOLDIERS plays most like a juiced-up feature-length
commercial for _real_ Commando Elite action figures, available now at a
store near you.

Title
Review for Island of Dr. Moreau, The (1996)
Starring:  Marlon Brando, Val Kilmer, David Thewlis, Fairuza Balk, Daniel
Rigney, Ron Perlman, Temuera Morrison.
Screenplay:  Richard Stanley, Ron Hutchinson.
Director:  John Frankenheimer.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Apparently the chaos involved in the making of THE ISLAND OF DR.
MOREAU was such that even the publicity people at New Line couldn't keep
up; the press release had Val Kilmer playing the wrong role.  About the
only constant in the production was the title, as writers (Michael Herr
and Walon Green replaced by Ron Hutchinson), directors (Richard Stanley
replaced by John Frankenheimer) and actors (Rob Morrow replaced by David
Thewlis) all played musical chairs.  And that isn't even mentioning the
production delays brought on by tropical storms and Kilmer's ego (you
decide which was bigger).  Sounds like the making of APOCALYPSE NOW, right
down to the presence of Brando.  The major difference?  The end result.
APOCALYPSE NOW was an inspired fever dream, while THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU
is just a nightmare.
     The story begins in a raft on the Java Sea, where U.N. representative
Edward Douglas (Thewlis) finds himself the only survivor of a plane crash.
He is found by a supply boat bringing a doctor named Montgomery (Kilmer)
back to his base of operations, a small Pacific island.  There Montgomery
works with Dr. R. G. V. Moreau (Brando), a Nobel Prize-winning biologist
who had disappeared years earlier.  Douglas wants nothing more than to
radio for help and be on his way, but once he discovers the nature of
Moreau's experiments, it becomes unlikely that he will be allowed to
leave.  Those experiments have Moreau combining human and animal DNA,
resulting in mutant creatures in an attempt to isolate the source of human
aggression.  But his island is not a paradise, especially once the animals
observe cruelty in action and decide to return the favor.
     The H. G. Wells novel on which THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU is based has
been committed to film twice before, in 1933 and 1977, and naturally this
version tries very hard to convince us that there is a compelling reason
to do it again, and important themes the other versions failed to uncover.
The great revelation in the script (credited to Hutchinson and erstwhile
director Stanley) is -- get this -- that humans are actually quite
animalistic themselves.  This bit of wisdom worth of the Burning Bush is
delivered scattershot -- a piece here in the split-second intro which
finds a pair of Thewlis' fellow survivors throwing themselves to a
conveniently circling shark in a fight over water, a piece there in a
montage of documentary footage you expect to be underscored by "Imagine."
     It's all spectacularly sloppy, but it's hard to know whom to blame.
Stanley might have wanted to do a cerebral observation on violence and/or
religion, but Frankenheimer seems to want a good old thriller, and the two
angles are not at all complementary.  Somebody cut this film to ribbons
trying to find a point to it all, resulting in a giddy
incomprehensibility.  Exactly what was Douglas' role in Moreau's
experiments supposed to be, anyway?  Why are the mutant rats isolated to
the boat?  What exactly did Douglas use to pick the lock in his room?  THE
ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU just keeps staggering forward and swinging wildly,
like an overweight boxer without the faintest glimmer of strategy.
     Speaking of overweight...oh, but that's far too easy.  It would be
too simple to observe that when Brando makes his first appearance, covered
in heavy white makeup and a white muu-muu the size of a circus tent, he
looks like nothing so much as the Michelin Man on safari.  It's too simple
and somewhat unfair, because even under the burden of all that weight and
a ridiculous accent, there is still something compelling about Brando on
screen.  His Moreau is what Richard Attenborough should have been trying
to go for as Hammond in JURASSIC PARK, a pleasant enough chap with a
monstrous god complex.  Val Kilmer, who is said to have quite a god
complex in real life, seems to have decided to act in a completely
different film, one which is much more fun.  His Montgomery is a casually
nasty pot-head, but at least he is entertaining to watch, particularly
when he does his dead-on Brando impression.  And poor David Thewlis, whose
character has no common sense and no particular reason for being a U.N.
peace negotiator (you'd think that might have been a useful subtext to the
war which breaks out on the island), tries to look frightened by more than
the lack of direction in the film, with little success.
     The production design for THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU is quite sharp,
and Stan Winston's make-up effects are worth a nod of recognition; it is
also interesting to find Ron Perlman (of TV's "Beauty and the Beast") once
more buried under mounds of makeup as the Sayer of the Law.  But this is a
badly fragmented piece of work which manages to achieve tedium in only 96
minutes.  Perhaps some day they will make a documentary about the making
of the film, like they did with APOCALYPSE NOW in HEARTS OF DARKNESS.
Then maybe it won't have been a total loss.

Title
Review for Emperor's New Groove, The (2000)
     At various points during Disney's THE EMPEROR'S NEW GROOVE, it
becomes apparent that it could have been a mediocre-at-best piece of
animated film-making. Here there's a significant lack of detail in the
background animation; over there, a gaping hole where a catchy tune might
have buoyed the proceedings; throughout, a narrative that doesn't exactly
set the world on fire. Yes, it's all pretty tepid stuff -- and then a
character will open his mouth, and set you to giggling uncontrolably.
After years of watching its animated features soar on various permutations
of stunning visuals, engaging story-telling and memorable songs, Disney
has finally made a film that succeeds almost exclusively on the strength
of its vocal performances.
     And it does so by a fairly narrow margin. The straightforward plot
focuses on Kuzco (voice of David Space), an arrogant teenage emperor of a
culture somewhere in pre-Colombian America. Kuzco is on the verge of
turning the family home of a gentle peasant named Pacha (John Goodman)
into a summer palace when he invokes the ire of his nasty advisor Yzma
(Eartha Kitt). With the aid of her simpleton henchman Kronk (Patrick
Warburton), Yzma slips Kuzco a potion that turns him into a llama.
Stranded alone in the jungle, Kuzco's only chance of returning to his old
imperial, human self is  you guessed it, the same gentle peasant whose
family home he was set to destroy. Bonding and learning of important
lessons ensues.
     In a way, the whole business is quite beneath Disney. Much of THE
EMPEROR'S NEW GROOVE feels cobbled together as an afterthought, as though
the real A-team Mouseke-thinkers were too busy making FANTASIA 2000 or
figuring out how to promote 102 DALMATIANS. While the character animation
is effective, virtually everything else is about as eye-catching as your
typical Hanna-Barbera background. The progression of the story is bland,
with only a couple of really good action set pieces to liven things up.
Meanwhile, the music is left to score composer John Debney (okay, but
unmemorable) and the songwriting tandem of lyricist Sting and composer
David Hartley (whose two numbers feel jarringly out of place in the
otherwise non-musical film).
     Not exactly the stuff of which Disney animated "classics" are made,
at least until the voice actors get to strut their stuff. David Spade
provides the perfect petulant, all-about-me vibe for Kuzco, though it
certainly helps to be in tune with Spade's typical caustic sense of humor.
As the villainous Yzma, Eartha Kitt growls her role with such delicious
malevolence it boggles the mind that she has never been cast as a Disney
animated villain before. But the real show-stopper is Warburton's Kronk,
one of those essentially decent lunkhead sidekicks who eventually do
their evil bosses more harm than good. The part is a familiar one, but
Warburton delivers his lines with such a combination of deadpan idiocy and
absolute sincerity that nearly every syllable out of Kronk's mouth is
hilarious. Screenwriter David Reynolds provides some clever dialogue, but
it's not nearly as good as the people who bring it to life.
     The one weak link in the cast is Goodman, though it's not really his
fault. Pacha is as personality-impaired a character as Disney has created
in a long time for a central role (okay, probably since POCAHONTAS). He's
not exactly the hero, not exactly the comic relief -- he's just the big,
good-natured guy necessary to move the plot along. Considering the
relative blandness of the plot itself, there are all kinds of reasons to
suspect that THE EMPEROR'S NEW GROOVE should have been a dud.
Congratulations to Spade, Kitt and Warburton -- and to the casting
director -- for giving the film the spark the rest of the creative team
couldn't quite manage.

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)
THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Noah Wyle, Julianne Moore, Blythe Danner, Roy Scheider, Michael
Vartan, Hope Davis, Brian Kerwin, Laurel Holloman, Arija Bareikis.
Screenplay:  Bart Freundlich.
Producers:  Mary Jane Skalski, Tim Ferrell and Bart Freundlich.
Director:  Bart Freundlich.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, drug use)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS is a subtle, restrained film in a genre
crying out for a little subtlety and restraint.  The familiar setting is
the Thanksgiving gathering of an New England family; the issue at hand is
how the children ended up variously damaged by their upbringing.  Yet THE
MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS isn't about raised voices, cathartic confrontations
or healing embraces.  Over the space of three days, we simply observe:
emotionally wounded Warren (Noah Wyle) still coping with the end of a
relationship three years earlier; bitter Mia (Julianne Moore) lashing out
at every available target; commitment-shy Jake (Michael Vartan) trying to
be in love with his effervescent girlfriend Margaret (Hope Davis);
cheerful younger sister Leigh (Laurel Holloman) somehow emerging whole,
healthy and happy; Mom (Blythe Danner) trying to understand everyone; Dad
(Roy Scheider) not trying at all.
     Many viewers might find THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS rather
inconsequential in its paucity of fireworks and dirty laundry.  It has
become so commonplace for such stories to center on Big Revelations -- who
confesses to being gay, who turns out to be a child molester, who's been
unfaithful to whom (or _with_ whom) -- that it's almost disappointing when
they're absent.  Neither are there many resolutions, with some
relationships just as unstable at the fade-out as they were at the
fade-in.  Bart Freundlich's script is about relatively mundane familial
discord, but it's expertly observed mundanity.
     If there is one major stumbling block in THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS,
it's the lack of sufficient time to do justice to its broad canvas.
Freundlich has so many characters and so many relationships to cover that
he inevitably short-changes some of them, perhaps even all of them.  He's
fortunate that he has such a stellar cast to fill in the spaces,
particularly Moore and Davis.  There is an ease to the way the characters
interact, even in their uneasiness, which makes it easy to get caught up
in the simple tensions.  The confidence with which Freundlich directs THE
MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS practically forces you to concede that this story
matters.  To paraphrase Tolstoy, every unhappy family is unhappy in its
own unique way.  This one happens to be unhappy quietly, but its an
unhappiness worth exploring.

Title
Review for Guarding Tess (1994)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Shirley MacLaine.
Screenplay:  Hugh Wilson and Peter Torokvei.
Director:  Hugh Wilson.
     I mean no condescension when I say that GUARDING TESS is the kind
of movie that my grandparents would love.  They see about a movie per
year, if that, and when they do choose to plunk down their $7.00 a
piece they tend to opt for something light and frothy, usually one of
those comedies featuring two decent but strong-willed characters who
spar but obviously care about each other.  These films are always good
for a few smiles, and are generally inoffensive.  Intellectually, I
understand the appeal of such once- in-a-blue-moon-night-on-the-town
entertainments, and some of them do give the character interaction
zing.  GUARDING TESS isn't one of them.  It's just two pleasant,
well-acted characters with nothing to do.
     GUARDING TESS has been the assignment for the past three years for
Secret Service agent Doug Chesnic (Nicolas Cage).  Tess is Tess
Carlisle (Shirley MacLaine), an irrascible widowed former First Lady,
beloved by the public but held in a slightly different regard by those
close to her.  Doug has just completed his three years, much to his
delight, when he is informed that Tess has personally asked the
President to keep Doug on the detail.  It is with reluctance that Doug
returns to guard Tess, and the two find themselves perpetually at odds
as Doug insists on doing everything by the book.  When tensions boil
over, both become aware of an underlying respect that grows into an
unlikely friendship.
     GUARDING TESS owes every ounce of charm it displays to the very
engaging lead performances of Nicolas Cage and Shirley MacLaine.  Cage
often seems to have only two gears on screen--frantic and manic--but
here he des a surprisingly restrained turn as the frustrated agent.  He
is appropriately humorless about a job Doug takes very seriously, yet
he doesn't go for wooden.  MacLaine, who seems to get every role in
Hollywood written for a woman over 50, has mastered the flinty dame bit
by now, while always managing to leave a bit of softness around the
edges.  Tess is not a particular stretch for MacLaine, but she never
mails in a performance.  The interaction between Doug and Tess in the
film's first half hour is amusing in a low-key way, never degenerating
into over-the-top theatrics.  At almost every stage the relationship
seems completely natural, and that relationship makes for some
entertaining scenes.
     What torpedoes GUARDING TESS is the sense that director and
co-writer Hugh Wilson didn't really know what to do with these two
characters.  Wilson's most notable previous contribution to film has
been the POLICE ACADEMY series, but he did create the popular TV sitcom
"WKRP in Cincinnati" and the critically acclaimed but short-lived
"Frank's Place."  Since Wilson's greatest success has come on the small
screen, it should come as no surprise that GUARDING TESS feels a lot
like a pilot for a series.  The characters are established, but the
plot is nearly non-existent.  Very quickly, GUARDING TESS begins to
repeat itself, with too many redundant scenes of Doug and Tess butting
heads, Tess winning and Doug fuming.  It's a film that just floats
around like a hovercraft on a layer of niceness.
     Then, when Wilson finally seems to realize the need for a second
plot point, he creates an utterly ridiculous subplot involving a
kidnapping.  I have this feeling the conclusion we see was not his
first choice.  There is a silly red herring involving Tess's son which
I suspect was not a red herring in some earlier incarnation, because
the revelation of who the kidnappers are inspires a big "what?"  I also
believe Wilson might have considered a slightly darker resolution, but
was concerned about ruining all the good will he had worked so hard to
generate.  The result is just grossly out of touch with the rest of the
movie anyway.
     Fluffy and inconsequential doesn't have to mean tedious.  GUARDING
TESS might make a fine bargain matinee for someone seeking a chuckle or
two.  At least that's what I'd tell my grandparents.

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
THE BACHELOR
(New Line)
Starring:  Chris O'Donnell, Renee Zellweger, Hal Holbrook, James Cromwell,
Artie Lange, Marley Shelton, Edward Asner, Peter Ustinov.
Screenplay:  Steve Cohen, based on the film SEVEN CHANCES.
Producers:  Bing Howenstein and Lloyd Segan.
Director:  Gary Sinyor.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time: 100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I came to an epiphany while watching THE BACHELOR, an
innocuous-enough-on-the-surface romantic comedy. It's not the sort of film
in which one would expect to achieve any moment of clarity, but there it
was nonetheless. I sat there watching this marshmallow of a movie unfold
when suddenly I realized what is so ridiculously wrong with the entire
romantic comedy genre circa 1999. In a word, it's the same thing that's
wrong with so many movies circa 1999: writing. More to the point, it's the
refusal to acknowledge that characterizations matter when you're telling a
story about a relationship. THE BACHELOR is merely the latest in a long
line of films where we're expected to get dewy-eyed over any pairing of
attractive, pleasant people just because they're attractive and pleasant.
     In this particular case, Attractive and Pleasant Exhibit A is Jimmy
Shannon (Chris O'Donnell), a single guy who has been watching his friends
slowly but surely sucked into marriage. It's a scary notion for Jimmy,
even though he dearly loves Attractive and Pleasant Exhibit B Anne (Renee
Zellweger), his girlfriend of three years. Convinced despite his
reservations that it's time to "sh*t or get off the pot," Jimmy proposes
to Anne -- very badly. Anne refuses, which leaves Jimmy in a very odd
position when his eccentric grandfather (Peter Ustinov) dies and leaves a
very specific video will. Jimmy stands to inhereit $100 million if he is
married by 6:05 p.m. on his 30th birthday, stays married for 10 years and
produces a child. There are only a couple of minor problems: 1) Jimmy's
30th birthday is the next day; 2) Anne is nowhere to be found, meaning
Jimmy has to find another willing bride from among his many
ex-girlfriends.
     It's a wacky, BREWSTER'S MILLIONS-esque premise (acknowledged as such
in one of the film's better, more self-aware lines of dialogue), the kind
where a shallow and materialistic guy learns What Really Matters. At least
that would be the case if Jimmy weren't already a world-class altruist.
Screenwriter Steve Cohen slides into the story an even more draconian
condition in the will: If Jimmy doesn't get married, not only will he lose
all the money, but the family billiard table buisness will be sold out
from under him, costing hudreds of jobs. From the outset, Jimmy's
motivation isn't cash; it's the livelihoods of his devoted employees. It's
almost embarrassing for his marital misgivings to play a role in THE
BACHELOR's plot development. By any human standard, the guy is impossibly
selfless.
     And that's the essence of the gutlessness endemic to films like THE
BACHELOR -- the fear of giving the characters flaws to overcome on their
way to happiness. There's never any tension between the two star-crossed
lovers, because there's no sense that anything remotely significant is at
stake. The blandly nice O'Donnell couldn't pull off a randy cad if he
tried, so the filmmakers don't even let him; Zellweger's Anne may have
issues with her sickeningly affectionate parents as an impossible standard
to live up to, but no one dares make her anything but the woman (lightly)
wronged. And forget about seeing enough of Jimmy and Anne together to feel
invested in their potential reconciliation. The parade of sit-com set
pieces had better be damned funny, since they're all that stands between
us and a blissfully sweet foregone conclusion.
     I'll admit a couple of those set pieces are amusing, including
Ustinov's rantings about procreation and a restaurant full-to-bursting
with men popping questions and champagne corks. Far more of them are
either tedious or downright ghastly, like the shudder-inducing sight of
Brooke Shields as an icy fortune-hunter or the hideous collection of
stereotypes when hundreds of potential brides gather in a church. You're
never going to get too many raucous belly laughs from a film like THE
BACHELOR, but that's not the real problem. Nor is it the real problem that
you know exactly the kind of warm-n-fuzzy conclusion it's leading up to.
The problem are a beginning and middle that are equally warm-n-fuzzy --
there's no spark, no energy, no humanity. It's an emotional pudding
guaranteed not to offend any consumer's digestions. We've reached a point
where our proxies for cinematic romantic wish fulfillment don't even have
a pulse. THE BACHELOR is love among the mannequins.

Title
Review for Star Maps (1997)
STAR MAPS
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Douglas Spain, Efrain Figueroa, Kandeyce Jorden, Martha Velez,
Lysa Flores, Annette Murphy, Vincent Chandler, Al Vicente.
Screenplay:  Miguel Arteta.
Producer:  Matthew Greenfield.
Director:  Miguel Arteta.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes, sexual situations,
violence)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Good intentions can make up for a lot, but they can't make up for
STAR MAPS.  Writer/director Miguel Arteta's debut feature concerns a Los
Angeles family as thoroughly dysfunctional as you'll find anywhere, which
is saying a lot for L.A.  Patriarch Pepe (Efrain Figueroa) pimps for young
boys whose street-corner sales of maps to the stars' homes is a front for
selling themselves to kinky Hollywood hot shots; Pepe's 18-year-old son
Carlos, recently returned from two years in Mexico with dreams of becoming
an actor, offers to work for his father as a chance to meet some
well-connected people.  Meanwhile, Carlos' mother Teresa (Martha Velez) is
recovering from a breakdown while seeing visions of the late Mexican
comedian Cantinflas, sister Maria (Lysa Flores) puts her own life on hold
to care for Mama, and brother Juancito (Vincent Chandler) sits mutely
watching television when he's not dressed up like a professional wrestler.
     The fact that this family is Mexican-American should be incidental,
but it's likely that the ethnic angle (along with the "controversial"
material) is all that snared STAR MAPS a distribution deal.  It's clear
that Arteta wanted to say something about the dark side of Hollywood,
about self-delusion for one's dreams, about the ways people use each
other, and about the struggle to find some normalcy in the middle of a
chaotic life.  He simply says them all at the same time, creating a
cacophany of heavy issues colliding with one another.  Every once in a
while, moments of humanity creep unexpectedly into Arteta's story.  Too
often, the impact of those moments is blunted by lack of direction.
     And "lack of direction" applies in both senses of the term.  Even
more than by its rambling script, STAR MAPS is thwarted by Arteta's
inability to put together a remotely professional production.  His
performers, it can be said charitably, read their lines in comprehensible
English sentences; his copious use of slow-motion, flashbacks and low-tech
visual tricks can't camouflage a basic technical clumsiness.  Somewhere in
STAR MAPS are a few interesting ideas, but Arteta forces viewers to wade
through a swamp of muddled exposition and amateurish film-making, then
doesn't offer them a map to get out again.

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
CRAZY IN ALABAMA
(Columbia)
Starring:  Melanie Griffith, David Morse, Lucas Black, Meat Loaf Aday,
Cathy Moriarty, John Beasley, Richard Schiff, Rod Steiger.
Screenplay:  Mark Childress, based on his novel.
Producers:  Meir Teper, Linda Goldstein Knowlton, Debra Hill, Diane Sillan
Isaacs.
Director:  Antonio Banderas.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I spent much of CRAZY IN ALABAMA trying to figure out the connection
between its two largely parallel storylines.  I spent much of the rest of
the time surprised how little I cared.  And I spent the final ten minutes
marvelling how quickly a pleasant little film can turn ghastly.  Adapted
by Mark Childress from his own novel and directed by erstwhile Zorro
Antonio Banderas, CRAZY IN ALABAMA takes us back to 1965 in the small town
of Industry (accent on the second syllable), Alabama.  Our narrator is
Peter Joseph "Peejoe" Bullis (Lucas Black), a 13-year-old orphan living
with his grandmother.  Life is turned upside down when Peejoe's Aunt
Lucille (Melanie Griffith) announces to her mother that she has killed and
decapitated her abusive husband, and that she's leaving her six children
behind while she flees to Hollywood to become a star.  Meanwhile, back in
Industry, the influx of kids sends Peejoe and his brother Wiley to live
with Uncle Dove (David Morse), the segregated town's mortician for whites. 
Soon Peejoe becomes aware of racial unrest stirring in the town, and
becomes an eyewitness to the extreme response of Sheriff John Doggett 
(Meat Loaf Aday).
     I must confess that I kept forgiving CRAZY IN ALABAMA its excess just
because it was so unexpectedly weird at times, primarily in the
Lucille-on-the-lam segments.  Melanie Griffith is an eccentric hoot as
Lucille, carrying around her husband's head in a Tupperware container
because she wants him around to see her make it as an actress.  Her
adventures are so ridiculous it's hard not to smile.  She seduces a cop
and leaves him handcuffed to his own jail cell.  She wins $13,000 playing
roulette in Las Vegas.  She turns the hostess (a splendidly uptight
Elizabeth Perkins) at a Hollywood party into a catatonic mess with hubby's
strategically-placed noggin.  She even does a guest spot on "Bewitched," 
reading her lines to toneless stand-ins for Sam, Darrin and company.  The
story keeps hopping in so many directions, zestfully directed by Banderas,
that it's almost impossible to lose interest for long.
     It also hops back in the direction of Peejoe's story, where
strangeness generally gives way to sluggish sincerity.  CRAZY IN ALABAMA
plays its racial themes deadly straight, turning Peejoe into a
preternaturally wise and moral lad who even gets to shake Dr. Martin
Luther King's hand.  In more ways than one, it's all black and white --
the buffoonishly nasty sheriff, the calmly liberal father figure, the
noble African-American protesters whose plight is rendered in grainy
newsreel-style footage.  Everyone carries on in the expected ways on the
expected subjects, all leading to the one-would-hope-obvious conclusion
that segregation was a very bad thing indeed, and thank heaven for a few
good white people to help set things right.
     Still, the zestful style of the Lucille storyline makes it possible
to get past the heavy-handedness of the Peejoe storyline ... until Lucille
returns to Industry.  Thus is set in motion one of the most painful
courtroom finales in cinema's long, sad history of painful courtroom
finales, presided over by Rod Steiger as the judicial equivalent of
Col. Kurtz.  First Lucille tells her tale of woe to the jury, rambling on
about the horrors of domestic abuse for reasons too contrived to fathom.
You'd suspect it was a matter of Banderas indulging his real-life leading
lady, if not for the fact that Steiger follows Lucille's monologue with a
rant of his own.  Banderas loses complete control over his actors at the
film's conclusion.  Worse yet, the film takes two sensitive issues -- the
subjugation of African-Americans and the subjugation of women -- and, in
attempting to equate them, doesn't do justice to either one.  It's a
tragic miscalculation in a film which at least had a chance when it was
quirky and frivolous.  The real craziness in CRAZY IN ALABAMA is that a
viewer might spend so much time giving it the benefit of the doubt.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
MUMFORD
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Loren Dean, Hope Davis, Jason Lee, Alfre Woodard, Mary
McDonnell, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Zooey Deschanel, Martin Short, David
Paymer, Jane Adams, Dana Ivey, Ted Danson, Jason Ritter.
Screenplay:  Lawrence Kasdan.
Producers:  Charles Okun and Lawrence Kasdan.
Director:  Lawrence Kasdan.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, drug use, profanity, nudity, sexual
situations)
Running Time:  111 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Lawrence Kasdan has grown to adore narrative sprawl.  A writer who
once contributed to tight genre entertainments like THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK and BODY HEAT, Kasdan became a film-maker
with a problem: He over-indulged his own characters, and let his stories
wander wherever those characters wanted to go.  He attracted wonderful
actors because he wrote wonderful parts, but he seemed little interested
in making those parts part of a whole.  Sometimes (THE BIG CHILL,
SILVERADO, GRAND CANYON) those untamed scripts still turned into
satisfying episodic films; sometimes (THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST, WYATT EARP)
they turned into meandering acting showcases.
     MUMFORD, Kasdan's latest exercise in free-form ensemble, has the germ
of a great story at the core of his narrative...and he promptly drowns
that germ in the pencillin of his herky-jerky directing.  The story begins
in the small town town of Mumford, where a recently-arrived psychologist
also named Mumford (Loren Dean) is developing a booming practice with his
unconventional methods.  Doc Mumford endears himself to virtually
everyone, including the town's equally unconventional billionaire modem
magnate Skip Skipperton (Jason Lee), but it turns out Doc Mumford has a
secret.  Though his therapy brings results, his credentials aren't exactly
conventional either.  In fact, he's not a psychologist at all.
     It takes a while before Kasdan spills all the beans about Doc 
Mumford's back story, but by then you can already see everything that's
right and everything that's wrong about MUMFORD.  On the plus side --
predictably for a Kasdan film -- is the cast, filled with appealing
character performers.  Loren Dean's low-key, natural delivery is perfect
for the no-nonsense Doc Mumford, Jason Lee shows a sweetness far more
convincing than it was in KISSING A FOOL, and the radiant Hope Davis lends
her unique gifts to Sofie, the chronically fatigued patient for whom Doc
Mumford falls.  Kasdan drops these characters into the kind of bucolic,
milkman-served town that would appeal to anyone looking for a fresh start.
It's the ideal set-up for a comic romance with complications.
     But MUMFORD isn't a comic romance with complications, at least not
often enough.  Much of its running time is devoted to Doc Mumford's
sessions with a variety of patients:  a housewife who shops compulsively
(Mary McDonnell); a pharmacist with pulp fiction fantasies (Pruitt Taylor
Vince); a sulky teen with self-image problems (Zooey Deschanel).  Though
the actors are all fine, their characters are a huge distraction.  Kasdan
certainly needs to show Doc Mumford's gift for helping people, but he
includes far too many such scenes.  Once again, Kasdan finds himself
unable or unwilling to rein in his supporting characters.  In the process,
he loses track of MUMFORD'S backbone, creating a film that bumps along
with virtually no flow.
     That lack of momentum is most evident when it becomes clear that
MUMFORD's payoff will be a relationship between Mumford and Sofie.  There
are a couple of perfectly charming scenes between Dean and Davis, but
there's no way to anticipate that the film is leading up to a choice based
on those scenes.  MUMFORD more often plays as a subtle jab at therapy,
suggesting that a really good listener who knows something about
overcoming troubles is all an unhappy soul really needs.  That's an
interesting enough concept, but it doesn't exactly make for a satisfying
story; watching Doc Mumford's patient list hijack the film only emphasizes
that MUMFORD should have been about the doctor.  The saying goes that
there are no small parts, only small actors.  Lawrence Kasdan seems to
agree...to a fault.

Title
Review for Malice (1993)
Starring:  Alec Baldwin, Nicole Kidman, Bill Pullman.
Screenplay:  Aaron Sorkin and Scott Frank.
Director:  Harold Becker.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It has long been my belief that the best movie mysteries are those
after which you can say to yourself, "I should have figured that out."
I loathe Joe Eszterhas-style thrillers which make me feel as though
I've been had; nothing that can change the "whodunnit" by shooting five
new minutes of footage is constructed tightly enough.  Almost equally
annoying are those which seem to twist and turn just for the sake of
twisting and turning, forcing you to engage in a two-hour discussion
with your fellow moviegoers just to figure out what the heck you just
saw.  MALICE avoids all these pitfalls.  This is a sharp,
artfully-constructed thriller, a snappy entertainment that does
everything I ask a film in its genre to do:  keep me guessing without
manipulating me.
     Andy Safien (Bill Pullman) is a student dean at Westerly College,
a picturesque New England campus plagued by a string of serial rapes.
While following up on the latest assault, Andy meets Dr. Jed Hill (Alec
Baldwin), a cocky new thoracic surgeon who turns out to be an old high
school classmate of Andy's.  Andy soon invites Jed to move into the
house being remodeled by Andy and his wife Tracy (Nicole Kidman) in an
attempt to defray expenses.  Tracy is none-too-pleased by Jed's playboy
manner, an added burden to the chronic abdominal pain she is
experiencing.  However, life in the Safien household will soon go from
bad to worse.  Andy becomes a suspect in the rapes, and Tracy suffers a
severe medical emergency, forcing Jed to make a decision which will set
in motion a serpentine chain of danger and deceptions.
     This is the point where reviewing a film like MALICE gets tricky.
Comment on the plot is next to impossible, particularly on those few
points where I felt credibility is stretched.  All I can really say is
that the script by Aaron Sorkin (A FEW GOOD MEN) and Scott Frank (DEAD
AGAIN) is intelligent and impressive in its plausible intricacy.  There
is an ingenious red herring crafted into the story which successfully
diverts attention from other key elements.  There were moments when I
sensed the entire audience realizing the same thing at the same time.
I saw very little of that telltale sign of a confusing mystery:  people
leaning over to friends and spouses to ask what just happened.  Every
explanation was clear and smooth, if not always perfectly believable.
     If there's one problem with the plot-heavy script, it's that
certain character developments are shallow.  Bill Pullman is very good
as the pleasant Everyman with a streak of jealousy, but his character
would have benefited from some early evidence to make his later
behavior more believable.  Ditto Nicole Kidman, who has the most
challenging role.  I found Bebe Neuwirth basically annoying as a police
detective sporting an accent that appeared to be a mutant hybrid of
Boston Brahmin and Brooklyn Italian.  On the plus side, Anne Bancroft
has a showy bit part as a loony mentor a la Robin Williams in DEAD
AGAIN (apparently a Scott Frank trademark).  Alec Baldwin is perfect as
Jed, delivering a great speech about his "God complex" with utter
conviction.  Baldwin should stick to roles such as this which require
colossal displays of hubris.
     Director Harold Becker showed his talent for atmospheric suspense
in SEA OF LOVE, and surpasses that effort with MALICE.  While never
spectacularly tense, MALICE is always gripping, thanks to a methodical
unfolding of the story with something important happening in almost
every scene.  Becker even cleverly undercuts genre expectations,
particularly in an ominously underscored shot of a big dark house ...
on a cliff ... overlooking crashing surf ... during a thunderstorm.
The audience was in hysterics.  This is a smart, deft directing job,
and one that establishes Becker as a name to watch for.
     I think I can get away with saying that you shouldn't go into
MALICE expecting a scream-out-loud suspense film.  It's more subtle
than that, but never less than thoroughly intriguing.  This is a
mystery for mystery lovers.

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
     David Webb Peoples has contributed to some of the most compelling
screenplays of recent years.  He fashioned haunting visions of the future
in the seminal science fiction film BLADE RUNNER and the psychologically
gripping 12 MONKEYS; he has deconstructed the mythology of heroic violence
in UNFORGIVEN.  Peoples has shown a facility for turning genre films into
films of ideas.  The specific ideas with which he has concerned himself
held out the hope that SOLDIER might be something more than this week's
disposable bit of whoop-it-up mayhem.
     Instead, SOLDIER shows what happens when the writer of BLADE RUNNER
and UNFORGIVEN meets the director of MORTAL KOMBAT and EVENT HORIZON:  the
director wins, and we lose.  Peoples's script sends us to a near-future
where government soldiers are trained from birth for no other purpose but
battle.  One of these soldiers is Todd 3465 (Kurt Russell), a scarred
veteran of multiple wars who has served as the perfect warrior -- no
family, no emotional connections of any kind, no reluctance to obey any
order, no mercy.  Unfortunately, he is rendered obsolete when an even more
perfect, genetically-enhanced breed of soldier becomes the new standard.
Left for dead after a display of prowess by new soldier Caine 607 (Jason
Scott Lee), Todd is tossed on the scrap-heap of waste disposal planet
Arcadia 234, where he tries to fit into a society of marooned humans
understandably wary of this new arrival.
     I suspect that Peoples's original script focused on how the
functionally anti-social Todd begins to explore human interaction for
the first time.  He recuperates in the home of a kindly man named Mace
(Sean Pertwee), begins feeling desire for Mace's wife Sandra (Connie
Nielsen), and bonds with their son Nathan the only way he knows how.
The prologue depicting Todd's relentless training is an effective
set-up for a story about the psychology of warfare, the challenges of
re-adjusting to civilian life, and whether or not it's actually better
to create a cold killing machine to survive the horrors of war.
     That's not the story director Paul Anderson insists on telling.
Though in his production notes Anderson describes the story as "SHANE in
outer space," he actually makes it much more like RAMBO in outer space.
When the new-breed soldiers arrive on Arcadia for a training exercise led
by the heartless Col. Mekum (Jason Isaacs, wearing a thin moustache so we
_know_ he's dastardly), Todd straps on the artillery, slaps on the
camouflage paint and sets out to tear the new soldiers some new orifices.
The final half-hour generally finds Todd picking off his faceless
adversaries like red-shirts in a "Star Trek" episode, occasionally
interrupted by immense explosions and flying bodies.  All this naturally
leads to a climactic mano-a-mano between Todd and Caine in which the
hulking one-eyed terminator becomes evil personified.  Never mind that
Caine is a programmed soldier just like Todd himself, and that it would be
much more interesting to sympathize with him than to cheer his inevitable
defeat mindlessly.
     There's nothing inherently wrong with black hat/white hat action
adventures where we watch a bit of carnage and root for good to triumph
over evil.  The problem is that Anderson pretends SOLDIER is more than
that, offering scenes of Todd perplexed by a tear rolling down his face,
or recoiling at displays of kindness.  Moments that might have been
genuinely affecting instead inspire derisive laughter, because Anderson is
far more interested in visceral response than in emotional response.
Ironically, he spends most of the film reveling in dehumanizing violence
instead of showing how dehumanizing violence created his protagonist.  I
can't believe that's the story David Webb Peoples wanted to tell, which is
what makes SOLDIER more disappointing than it might otherwise be.  He
turned over a smart idea to a director determined to make a dumb movie.

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)
THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE
(Universal)
Starring:  Rene Russo, Jason Alexander, Piper Perabo, Randy Quaid, Robert
DeNiro; voices of June Foray, Keith Scott.
Screenplay:  Kenneth Lonergan, based on characters created by Jay Ward.
Producers:  Jane Rosenthal and Robert DeNiro.
Director:  Des McAnuff.
MPAA Rating:  PG (cartoon violence, mild profanity)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE is _not_ a bloated big-screen
vehicle that misses the point of its source material entirely. Indeed, the
opening five minutes represent a surprsingly clever brand of
self-awareness, the kind that promises a brisk and satisfying stroll dose
of cartoon nostalgia. From the outset, it's clear that this is Jay Ward's
Rocky and Bullwinkle, complete with adult references, howlingly awful puns
and still more howlingly awful puns. Could this finally be the kind of
live-action cartoon Hollywood has been trying to make for years, only to
botch the job over and over again?
     Believe me, I wanted to get giddy over THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND
BULLWINKLE, which opens with protagonists Rocket J. Squirrel and
Bullwinkle J. Moose. (voiced by original Rocky June Foray and Keith Scott,
respectively) living tedious animated lives in Frostbite Falls, Minnesota
35 years after the cancellation of their television series. Their
arch-nemeses Boris Badenov, Natasha Fatale and Fearless Leader have been
similarly stuck in re-runs, until Fearless Leader formulates a plan to get
them yanked into the real world. The now-real Leader (Robert DeNiro),
Boris (Jason Alexander) and Natasha (Rene Russo) then develop a scheme for
world domination through stupefyingly bad television, and it appears that
nothing can stand in their way. Unless, that is, wet-behind-the-ears FBI
agent Karen Sympathy (Piper Perabo) can yank a pair of cartoon animals
into reality to save the day.
     The aforementioned prologue gets ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE off to a fast
start, with Keith Scott doing amusing work both as Bullwinkle and 
replacing William Conrad as the narrator. The opening sets up Frostbite 
Falls as an animated ghost town, its economy left in a shambles when the
moose and squirrel's show got the axe; even the narrator has been reduced
to commenting dramatically on events in his home after being forced to
live with his mother. It's a funny idea, as is the idea of Fearless
Leader's plot to entrap a Hollywood producer (Janeane Garofolo) by
offering the movie rights to "Rocky and Bullwinkle." Jay Ward's cartoons
were always a strangely deft mix of smart and silly, which is a fairly
accurate description of THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE for a few
hundred blissful seconds.
     Then, inevitably and tragically, we leave the hand-drawn world for
something considerably more drab. Whatever twisted force convinces studio
executives that THE FLINTSTONES, 101 DALMATIANS or ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE
have something more to offer us with human actors is in need of immediate
exorcising. There's something about an animated world, even a
crudely-drawn animated world, that changes the rules; Ward could get away
with groaners that would make you want to stuff a sock in a human mouth
that uttered them. It certainly doesn't help that some of the human actors
appear befuddled by the whole enterprise. Rene Russo waits for about half
an hour before she gets to utter a word of dialogue, and still looks like
she's waiting around for the rest of the film. As for newcomer Piper
Perabo, what little comedic timing she may have isn't enhanced by acting
opposite a pair of visual effects. DeNiro has fun with Fearless Leader,
but it's not nearly enough. A self-deprecating gag referring to WHO FRAMED
ROGER RABBIT? doesn't change the fact that ROGER's concept was made for
its format, and vice-versa. Rocky and Bullwinkle are cartoons in a human
world simply because they could be.
     There are more than a few decent gags in playwright Kenneth
Lonergan's script for ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE -- the title of Fearless
Leader's perfectly awful televsion series will set me to giggling for a
few days -- and a lack of bombast that makes it infinitely easier to
swallow. It's also a cheerful film that's perfectly suitable for kids,
even as it offers tidbits for adults. There's just something inescapably,
inherently wrong about turning these characters into CGI wise-crackers who
interact with Whoopi Goldberg, John Goodman and all the other cameo actors
trotted out for our knowing amusement. THE ADVENTURES OF ROCKY AND
BULLWINKLE may be close to the best live-action film that could be made
with these characters, and that's not saying much. It's time for
film-makers to stop fighting a losing battle with dragging 'toons into
mediocre realities. Call it a draw.

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
THE LEGEND OF BAGGER VANCE
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Will Smith, Matt Damon, Charlize Theron, J. Michael Moncrief,
Bruce McGill, Joel Gretsch.
Screenplay:  Jeremy Leven, based on the novel by Steven Pressfield.
Producers:  Jake Eberts, Michael Nozik and Robert Redford.
Director:  Robert Redford.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, wartime violence)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Philosophy generally makes for godawful cinema. Steven Pressfield's
novel THE LEGEND OF BAGGER VANCE seemed like a terribly unlikely candidate
for a film translation, because it wasn't really a novel. It was a primer
in Hindu spiritual thought (Bagger Vance, Baghavad ... get it?) combined
with a mash note to the game of golf, wrapped loosely around a period
narrative. There was no way Pressfield's book could be turned into an
engaging film. Then again, that's what people said about Norman Maclean's
A RIVER RUNS THROUGH IT, and somehow director Robert Redford managed to
turn that book into a pretty solid film. But how would a text comprised
primarily of mystical lessons and play-by-play from the links be rendered
on screen?
     Redford's adaptation of THE LEGEND OF BAGGER VANCE radically
re-imagines Pressfield's novel to make it a more palatable screen story. 
In so doing, he rips out its soul and leaves a fairly bland sports drama
in its place. The bulk of the film takes place in Savannah, Georgia in
1931, where a once-in-a-lifetime event is about to take place. 
Cash-strapped heiress Adele Invergordon (Charlize Theron), desperate to
generate interest in her late father's golf resort while the Depression
rages, arranges for an exhibition match between the era's two golf giants: 
Bobby Jones (Joel Gretsch) and Walter Hagen (Bruce McGill). There's also
interest in adding a local boy to the field, and everyone knows that World
War I hero and former amateur champion Rannulph Junuh (Matt Damon) should
be the one. But Junuh, psychologically scarred by the war, has no interest
in playing  until a mysterious fellow named Bagger Vance (Will Smith) 
shows up and offers to be Junuh's caddy.
     It's easy to see the logic behind most of screenwriter Jeremy Leven's
decisions in adapting BAGGER VANCE. He creates a romantic sub-plot by
casting Adele and Junuh as former lovers separated by circumstance; he
excises most of Baggers' lengthy speeches; he even tries to build up the
character of the young boy (J. Michael Moncrief) who will become the
story's flashback narrator (an uncredited Jack Lemmon) by exploring his
family's losses due to the Depression. The story is streamlined into a
tale of redemption and lost love regained, and the climax is rendered as a
nigh-mythical clash of titans. It's all quite clean and efficient, with
all the prosaic descriptions of transcendentally significant dogleg lefts
and most of the revelatory visions left on the page.
     In fact, it's so clean and efficient that it hardly registers as a
drama at all. While Pressfield's novel wasn't terribly concerned with
making his characters genuinely complex, it didn't really matter
contextually. Leven and Redford don't add much to that complexity, and
here it matters a lot. Redford is too concerned with making the atmosphere
mystical to give Junuh's pain an earthly urgency, and Matt Damon's
performance suffers as a result. Charlize Theron gets to weep a bit, but
Adele has "romantic interest" written all over her from the outset. Will
Smith does fine, relaxed work as Bagger, but his importance as a spiritual
teacher is diminished with his teachings reduced to fortune cookie-sized
aphorisms. BAGGER VANCE was not going to work on the screen with twenty
minute sermons on the Authentic Swing; it makes perfect sense to shift the
focus to the characters. It makes no sense to shift the focus, then still
leave the characters underdeveloped. 
     As usual, Redford directs a technically accomplished piece of work,
beautifully photographed by Michael Ballhaus and smoothly edited. There's
simply no weight to any of it, despite the intrusively heavy score by
Rachel Portman. Instead of a meditation on a personal journey to
enlightenment told through the unique nature of the game of golf, the film
becomes a period piece with a few appealing performances. What remains is
a film about whether or not Junuh will win the big golf match and/or win
the girl. And while it's competently rendered, it's not exactly the matter
of cosmic import the film builds it up to be. You can't blame a filmmaker
for radically altering a text as inherently uncinematic as THE LEGEND OF
BAGGER VANCE. Redford, however, alters it to the point that you wonder why
he bothered to make it at all. He understood that philosophy generally
makes for godawful cinema. He didn't understand that without the
philosophy, or rich characterizations to replace it, THE LEGEND OF BAGGER
VANCE just barely breaks par.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
ENEMY OF THE STATE
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Tom Sizemore, Lisa Bonet, Gabriel Byrne.
Screenplay:  David Marconi.
Producer:  Jerry Bruckheimer.
Director:  Tony Scott.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Director Tony Scott presents what sometimes seems like a documentary
on electronic surveillance in ENEMY OF THE STATE.  His vehicle is the
story of Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith), a Washington D.C. attorney who
unwittingly becomes embroiled in a conspiracy when a computer disk finds
its way into his shopping bags.  On the disk is evidence that a National
Security Agency boss named Reynolds (Jon Voight) engineered the murder of
a U.S. congressman (an uncredited Jason Robards) who would have killed
legislation making it easier for the NSA to spy on citizens.  Piece by
piece Dean's identity is destroyed and accusations are trumped up against
him, until the only chance he has left is a secretive former government
operative known only as Brill (Gene Hackman).
     It's a great button-pushing premise for a millenial-angst-heavy
information age, full of shadowy government operations and technological
voyeurism of every shape and form.  Early on, however, Scott starts to
fetishize all that technology.  Satellites sweep across the sky from
hundreds of miles above to pinpoint a fleeing target; microtransmitters
are planted in shoes, pens and cell phones; phone and bank records betray
every personal secret.  The first time a chase scene spills over with
surveillance details, it's effective and alarming.  The second time, you
start to notice that it drags scenes out much longer than they need to be.
The third, fourth and fifth times, you wonder why the omniscient gadgetry
is beginning to seem more cool than scary.  Is this a movie about people
oppressed by electronics, or a commercial for electronics?
     Fortunately, the human angle is in the capable hands of Will Smith.
In his first purely starring role -- no buddy cop, no aliens -- Smith
continues to show the charisma of a star.  He's a more effective hounded
Everyman than you might expect, cracking wise when it serves the moment 
while generally handling his predicament with intelligence and resolve.
Hackman arrives fairly late in the film to provide some requisite bonding
moments, but mostly the weight of ENEMY OF THE STATE falls squarely on
Smith's shoulders.  He proves more than capable of handling it.
     He also gets to work with an action/thriller script considerably more
coherent than average.  Dean's imperfect relationship with his wife
(Regina King) links deftly into the conspiracy plot, as does the
connection between Brill and go-between Rachel (Lisa Bonet).  The
resolution is a rushed disappointment -- mixing in a dopey mob sub-plot
just when the table-turning pleasures of Dean and Brill watching the
watchmen had been so promising -- but for nearly two hours it's pretty a
effective story.  With Scott keeping the pacing steady and intense, all
the script needs to do is avoid situations so obviously stupid that you
feel insulted.  Marconi's script may not be impressive, but it's
unobtrusive, which is one of the higher compliments you can pay an
action/thriller script in 1998.
     Still, there's the matter of all those gee-whiz shots of satellite
cams, computer extrapolations and general manipulation of technology.
Tony Scott has always been a director who never met a five-second piece of
film he liked, and in ENEMY OF THE STATE it often proves distracting as he
whips back and forth between Smith talking to someone and someone
_listening_ to Smith talking to someone, a couple dozen times in the space
of a minute.  Sure it's unsettling to consider that the only privacy you
may have is inside your head, but it's most unsettling if we connect with
a character connecting with that reality the hard way.  Will Smith
provides that humanity almost in spite of Scott's inventory of spy gear.
The director takes the edge off the edgy concept, turning in a solid
thriller that hypes us up when it should be freaking us out.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Kenneth Branagh, Helena Bonham Carter.
Screenplay:  Steph Lady and Frank Darabont.
Director:  Kenneth Branagh.
     In the first place, this is *not* Mary Shelley's FRANKENSTEIN.  As
iconic and thematically fascinating as Shelley's novel might be, it is
unfilmable as written, a rambling piece more notable for long
philosophical musings than for any action one would consider
cinematically ideal.  No, while this version may be more faithful than
most, it is really Kenneth Branagh's FRANKENSTEIN, and therein lies its
crucial failing.  While ostensibly attempting to stay close to
Shelley's often tedious narrative, Branagh is more frequently indulging
his bombastic filmmaking style, giving us the gee-whiz camera work of
DEAD AGAIN without any of that film's sense of fun.
     Branagh also stars as Victor Frankenstein, the Swiss medical
student haunted by the death of his mother.  Determined to find a way
to defeat death, he decides to pursue the experiments of his mentor
Dr.  Waldman (John Cleese) into the re-animation of dead tissue.
Frankenstein's experiment is a success, but when he sees the creature
(Robert DeNiro) that is his handiwork, he abandons it.  However, the
creature survives, escaping into the country to learn about its own
nature.  When it realizes who is responsible for its existence, the
creature decides to seek vengeance, on Frankenstein and his beloved
fiancee Elizabeth (Helena Bonham Carter).
     There are a truckload of bad decisions involved in MARY SHELLEY'S
FRANKENSTEIN, but the most glaring might be Branagh casting himself as
the good mad doctor.  As talented a Shakespearean stage actor as he is,
he is also a Shakespearean stage actor on film.  Victor Frankenstein is
a character defined by torment, but Branagh's version of torment often
consists of howling and tearing at his hair.  The screenplay by Steph
Lady and Frank Darabont does far too little to establish the Oedipal
subtext which is the basis for Frankenstein's obsession, making
Branagh's reaction to his mother's death look comically overboard.
When nearly a full hour goes by before the creature plays a significant
role, Frankenstein's characterization needs to be developed more
consistently and subtly, and Branagh can't pull it off.
     He also seems to direct that first hour without any thought of the
audience.  It's true that he's dealing with a script that leap-frogs
over twenty years in the first ten minutes, but Branagh's editing
choices are baffling.  The opening sequence, which takes place on a
ship in the Arctic, is so loud and fast that it borders on the
incoherent; the next twenty minutes are a crashing bore.  FRANKENSTEIN
always looks impressive, particularly the mammoth stairway of the
Frankenstein manor which seems to take on a life of its own, but until
the creation sequence Branagh spends an awful lot of time doing
precious little but creating atmosphere as precociously as possible.
     The creation sequence does signal a significant improvement in
FRANKENSTEIN, and that is largely due to the surprisingly expressive
performance of Robert DeNiro as the creature.  Even under mounds of
gruesome latex, DeNiro gives the creature an interior life, and some of
the scenes which focus on his interaction with a peasant family are
extremely touching.  But he is frequently failed by Branagh's
direction, because Branagh doesn't want to concentrate on the story's
philosophical underpinnings--he wants to film an opera.  He directs
the same way someone once described Whitney Houston's singing:  he
never walks when he can cartwheel.
     There are moments of undeniable power in MARY SHELLEY'S
FRANKENSTEIN, including a horrifying sequence involving the creation of
a bride for the creature, and they are so strong that they almost make
up for the flotsam between them.  Unfortunately, for the most part
FRANKENSTEIN the movie ends up a lot like the creature itself:
alternately lumbering and chaotic, and a patchwork mess.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
A BUG'S LIFE
(Disney/Pixar)
Voices:  Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfuss, David Hyde
Pierce, Denis Leary, Joe Ranft, Phyllis Diller, Richard Kind.
Screenplay:  Andrew Stanton and Donald McEnery & Bob Shaw.
Producers:  Darla K. Anderson and Kevin Reher.
Directors:  John Lasseter and Andrew Stanton.
MPAA Rating:  G.
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A BUG'S LIFE deserves better.  It deserves better than to be held up
to that other computer-animated insect film from earlier this fall.  It
deserves better than to be compared to that other feature from Pixar.
It's virtually impossible to talk about A BUG'S LIFE without invoking ANTZ
and/or TOY STORY, but it deserves better.  Films with this much wit,
energy and imagination are too uncommon to diminish this one with such
petty comparisons.  A BUG'S LIFE is not just a delightful
computer-animated family film about insects.  It's a delightful film.
     Not that it's a perfect one.  It gets off to a slightly sluggish
start, introducing an ant colony forced to collect a winter food supply
for Hopper (Kevin Spacey), a grasshopper gang leader running an
entomological protection racket.  Our protagonist Flik (Dave Foley), a
dreamer whose innovations tend to cause aggravations for the Queen
(Phyllis Diller) and her successor-in-training Princess Atta (Julia
Louis-Dreyfuss), inadvertently destroys the grasshopper offering one day,
endangering the entire colony.  Thus Flik takes it upon himself to head
out from Ant Island and find warriors who will defend the ants when the
angry grasshoppers return.
     A BUG'S LIFE doesn't really take off until we meet the "warriors"
Flik eventually finds in the big city.  In actuality, they're a band of
disgraced bug circus performers Flik mistakenly assumes are warriors,
including put-upon walking stick bug Slim (David Hyde Pierce), clownish
caterpillar Heimlich (Joe Ranft) and the hilarious, imcomprehensible
acrobatic pill bug tandem Tuck and Roll (Michael McShane).  The botched
circus sequence in which they are introduced recalls Warner Bros. cartoons
at their most rapid-fire anarchic, with the cast of colorful performers
all delivering laughs.  Though Foley is a pleasant enough presence, his
redemption storyline isn't nearly as interesting as the circus performers'
search for an adoring audience.  He serves much the same function here as
he does on TV's "NewsRadio," acting as the sane center around which more
charismatic characters can do their thing.
     He's also the center around which the animators can do their thing,
and they do more than enough things to make for a wonderful ride.  The
throwaway gags in Flik's visit to the "big city" -- an annoying street
mime mimicking Flik's every move, a cricket panhandler with a sign 
announcing "Wings pulled off by kids" -- are consistently appealing to
viewers of all ages.  Meanwhile, the big action set pieces, including an
attack by a hungry bird, offer splendidly-paced thrills.  Director John
Lasseter has an uncanny eye for setting up a scene, and a comic
sensibility most directors of live action should be willing to kill for.
Nowhere is that more evident than during the closing credits, when
Lasseter pulls out the kind of brilliant conceit that makes really good
films feel like great films.  Miss the final five minutes at your own
peril.
     Sure, it would have been nice if A BUG'S LIFE had had a story as
tightly constructed as the buddy bonding of Woody and Buzz in TOY STORY.
It would have been nice if the lead character had had as distinctive a
personality as Woody Allen's Z in ANTZ.  Those are the nit-picking details
you have to come up with when a film offers as much pure fun as A BUG'S
LIFE.  Silly enough for kids, smart enough for adults, grandly-staged
enough for anyone who loves movies, it offers entertainment that deserves
a different kind of comparison.  Understand that there probably haven't
been a half-dozen better films of _any_ kind this year, and you'll be on
to the kind of comparison A BUG'S LIFE really deserves.

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mississippi (1996)
(Columbia/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Alec Baldwin, Whoopi Goldberg, James Woods, Craig T. Nelson.
Screenplay:  Lewis Colick.
Producers:  Nicholas Palelogos, Andrew Scheinman, Frederick Zollo, Rob
Reiner.
Director:  Rob Reiner.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It took watching A TIME TO KILL for the second time in less than a
year for me to realize that I had been too easy on it the first time
around.  Actually, it wasn't A TIME TO KILL I saw the second time -- it
was GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI -- but that's merely a technicality.  One film
per year about a white Mississippi lawyer struggling to Do the Right Thing
in the face of familial protest, racist threats and an intransigent
justice system should be the legal limit, and the second such film is
bound to feel like the end of a marathon session of multi-cultural
sensitivity training.  The premise is simplistic and obvious, but at least
A TIME TO KILL featured some strong performances.  GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI
is a plodding, ridiculously earnest film in which any potential drama gets
water-logged in a big puddle of white liberal guilt.
     The fact-based GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI opens in 1963, with the murder
of civil rights leader Medgar Evers (James Pickens Jr.) by white
supremacist Byron De La Beckwith (James Woods).  Though the evidence
against Beckwith is strong, the presence of more than a few similarly
minded witnesses and jurors results in two hung juries in 1964.
Fast-forward to 1989, where assistant D.A. Bobby DeLaughter (Alec Baldwin)
finds the Evers case brought to public attention again by Evers' widow
Myrlie (Whoopi Goldberg) and a newspaper article about jury tampering in
the 1964 trials.  Bobby begins to re-open the case against Beckwith, but
finds little which promises any success:  evidence has disappeared,
witnesses have died, and plenty of people feel the past is best left
undisturbed.  But the case becomes a personal quest for Bobby, who finally
brings Beckwith to trial again in 1994 only to discover that his mission
of healing still has a long way to go.
     The first images in GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI are icons of the fight for
racial equity -- segregated drinking fountains, Jackie Robinson, Martin
Luther King -- underlined by Marc Shaiman's spiritual-influenced score,
and you need no further information to figure out where Rob Reiner plans
to take the story.  This is a film which wants you to leave with the
message "Racism is bad" tattooed across your backbrain, and I suppose
you'd have to say that it succeeds.  Unfortunately, Reiner and writer
Lewis Colick spoon-feed that message to the audience like it was cough
syrup; they are so concerned with making GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI good for
you that they don't take the time to make it good.
     Many of the same problems were evident in A TIME TO KILL, along with
more than a few of the same specific plot details.  The hero's wife
admonishes him for his irresponsibility, anonymous racists vandalize his
property, and a threat to his family merely serves to stiffen his resolve
-- all familiar elements in serious-minded social dramas.  At lest A TIME
TO KILL had the benefit of some strong performances to give the stock
scenarios some spark, though.  Alec Baldwin plays Bobby DeLaughter as an
inscrutable portrait in solemn determination, tempered with patient
parenting; Whoopi Goldberg plays Myrlie Evers as an inscrutable portrait
in solemn determination, tempered with dignified grief.  As rabble-rousing
as A TIME TO KILL managed to be at times, at least there appeared to be a
few characters in it who were passionate about the incendiary issues
involved.  William H. Macy, on hand for comic relief as Bobby's nervous
investigator, often seems to be the only person in GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI
with a pulse.
     You might expect some energy from James Woods as the unrepentant
bigot, and to a certain extent you get it.  Smothered in old age make-up,
Woods works up a thespian sweat to make Beckwith an easy-to-hate villain.
His arrogance that no one would possibly convict a white man for killing a
black man is the only genuine emotion in GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI, but he
obscures it with mannerisms:  pursed lips, sniffs of disdain, bits of
background business.  There is such an obvious build-up toward a big
courtroom confrontation between Beckwith and Bobby that you can almost
hear Rob Reiner in the background coaching Woods on his "You can't handle
the truth" speech, yet that moment never comes.  And I found myself
missing it, as melodramatic and historically inaccurate as it might have
been, because at least it would have given GHOSTS OF MISSISSIPPI a fire to
match its sincerity.  I'm sure everyone involved felt they had made an
important film, and in one sense they have:  it is important to remember
that even sentiments this honorable needs to have an interesting story to
tell.  This MISSISSIPPI isn't burning...it's boring.

Title
Review for Trois couleurs: Bleu (1993)
Starring: Juliette Binoche, Benoit Regent, Charlotte Very.
Screenplay:  Krzysztof Kieslowski & Krzysztof Piesiewicz.
Director:  Krzysztof Kieslowski.
     I can't claim that my experience with French films has been all
that extensive, but the limited experience I have had has lent itself
to the following stereotypical image:  two characters sitting in a
dimly lit cafe, smoking cigarettes and speaking cryptically to one
another in extremely muted tones.  These films tended to deal with
emotionally stunted people in an emotionally stunted manner,
potentially intriguing but inert, if not downright soporific.  It
caused me no end of amusement to find a scene exactly like the one I
just described in Krzysztof Kieslowski's THREE COLORS: BLUE.  It caused
me more pleasure to discover that scene only one part of a complex and
fascinating character study of grief, directed with a mesmerizing
grace.  So now I wonder...is it French cinema that has changed, or is
it me?
     THREE COLORS: BLUE opens with a car crash which claims the life of
renowned composer Patrice de Courcy and his five-year-old daughter,
leaving wife Julie (Juliette Binoche) as the only survivor.  Julie
first considers suicide, but eventually decides to sever all ties with
her previous life and move into a small flat in Paris.  There she
wishes nothing more than to spend the rest of her days doing nothing,
free of the loves and friendships she describes as "traps."  However,
she finds that freedom difficult, as she develops a friendship with
neighbor Lucille (Charlotte Very).  When her husband's former partner
Olivier (Benoit Regent) goes public with his intention to complete
Patrice's unfinished final concerto, Julie is forced to confront facts
which might finally shake her from her reverie.
     From a narrative standpoint, BLUE is not the most easily
accessible of films.  There is very little dialogure, in fact very
little sound of any kind; even the car crash is notable for its
understatement.  Only the occasional explosions of Zbigniew Preisner's
score tend to break the silence, loading the music with significance.
Kieslowski chooses to allow us into Julie's world almost entirely
through images, but how arresting those images are.  In one scene,
Julie sits in a cafe and listens to a street musician playing one of
Patrice's compostions; Kieslowski indicates how long she stays simply
through the changing shadows cast by Julie's coffee cup.  Another scene
shows Julie standing in her flat as a man runs down the hall banging on
doors, seeking help while being chased, apparently by muggers.  It's a
confident but rarely showy directing job by Kieslowski, allowing
Julie's story to unfold slowly and clearly.
     The centerpiece of BLUE is the performance of Juliette Binoche as
Julie, and it's a winner.  While not the type of performance American
film audiences are used to seeing, it is nonetheless extremely
effective.  Like many characters we saw in 1993, Julie tries to make
herself safe by placing herself in an emotional vacuum, but she betrays
her natural inclinations to reach out in scenes with her elderly mother
and with Lucille.  At times the role might appear one-note, yet there
are deeper shadings.  The early scene in which Julie sleeps with
Olivier simply to provide him with closure to his previously unrequited
love is strangely emotional.  and her physical response to a group of
young girls coming into the pool where she is swimming packs a punch.
Binoche proves herself as deserving as any actor this year of Oscar
consideration.
     Where BLUE is likely to irritate many is in the deliberate
opaquity of some of its images.  Julie's reaction to the discovery of a
nest of mice in her apartment never really connects, nor do the images
of bungee jumping.  A scene between Julie and the young man who
witnessed the car crash seems repetitive, relevant only for the
introduction of an object which will later prove significant.  BLUE
proves to be very slow going at times, and requires immense patience.
However, as details concerning the relationship between Julie and
Patrice unfold, such patience will be proved worthwhile.  THREE
COLORS:  BLUE is an intensely focused examination of one woman's
attempt at self-deception for her own perceived good, and will likely
stick with me for some time.

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
     "It's not SHOWGIRLS" one trailer for STRIPTEASE bluntly announces,
capping off a marketing campaign which may be the first in recent memory
to attempt to convince the movie-going public that a new film is _nothing_
like a previous film.  Sure, it works the other way all the time, thanks
to pre-fabricated critical blurbs like "This year's FORREST GUMP" or
reminders of the director's previous successes, but the stink of SHOWGIRLS
is such that it threatens to contaminate anything featuring a pelvis and a
pole.  Of course, if you remembered that writer-director Andrew Bergman is
behind such comedic gems as THE IN-LAWS, THE FRESHMAN and HONEYMOON IN
VEGAS, you'd know not to expect SHOWGIRLS.  The real question is whether
you'd expect STRIPTEASE, a film as inconsistent in its tone as it is
occasionally hilarious.
     Demi Moore stars as Erin Grant, a Miami woman forced to extreme
measures when her pill-popping, police-informant ex-husband Darrell
(Robert Patrick) is granted custody of their 7-year-old daughter Angie
(Rumer Willis, Moore's real-life daughter).  To earn the necessary money
for the appeal, Erin takes a job dancing at the Eager Beaver, a topless
bar which counts Congressman Davey Dilbeck (Burt Reynolds) among its
regulars.  One night, Dilbeck is caught on film assaulting another patron
at the bar, a fact which deeply concerns Dilbeck's staff and corporate
supporters.  When the photographer and another man turn up dead, homicide
detective Lt. Garcia (Armand Assante) begins an investigation which draws
Erin and her daughter into a nasty mess of sleazy politics.
     Moore received the surprising sum of $12.5 million to bump-and-grind
her way through STRIPTEASE, and at the very least the producers should
take solace in the fact that she picked up dancing a heck of a lot faster
than she has picked up this whole acting thing.  There is something both
smug and overly earnest about Moore's standard screen pose, as though she
never wanted there to be any doubt that she felt deeply about whatever her
predicament might be, but also that nothing could stop her if she set her
mind to it.  In STRIPTEASE, that is a major problem.  This is supposed to
be a frisky comedy, but Moore's deadly serious performance acts like ankle
weights on a swimmer.  There are scenes between her and Armand Assante
which seem to come from a second-rate TV-movie -- "Baring Her Soul: The
Erin Grant Story."
     That's a real shame, because there are plenty of moments in
STRIPTEASE where Bergman's wonderfully weird sense of humor gets to shine
through.  Ving Rhames has a great role as the Eager Beaver's put-upon
bouncer Shad, a man looking for the get-rich-quick scheme which will allow
him to get out of the bouncer business; he gets one of STRIPTEASE's best
moments as he impresses a couple of thugs with tales of his
responsibilities "auditioning" topless dancers.  Burt Reynolds is
completely over the top as Dilbeck, a pathetic, fetishistic drunkard who
coats himself in Vaseline and sniffs Erin's dryer lint before addressing a
Young Christians' conference, and there is something improbably enjoyable
about the way Reynolds doesn't even pretend to modulate his performance.
Bergman makes fine use of oddball supporting characters, and seasons
STRIPTEASE liberally with his trademark unpredictability, like a priceless
scene during the film's climax involving Erin's daughter, two well-endowed
dancers and a jump-rope.
     There are plenty of laughs in STRIPTEASE, enough to make it
moderately entertaining, but the reason STRIPTEASE isn't a better movie is
that they're the wrong _kind_ of laughs for the material.  Based on Carl
Hiaasen's novel, the story demands a darker edge in its political satire,
a sense of irony that the topless dancer is one of the few characters in
the film with any morals.  That simply isn't Andrew Bergman's style; his
comedy may be wild, but it's always good-natured.  When Burt Reynolds'
Congressman is as absurd a character as the general played by Richard
Libertini in THE IN-LAWS, it's tough to extract any biting commentary.
The result is a film which is moving in several different directions at
once:  the source material is trying to make it dark, Bergman is trying to
make it silly, and Moore is trying to make it serious.  When it's silly,
STRIPTEASE is super, but a lot of the time it's not clear _what_
STRIPTEASE is.  Except, of course, that it's _not_ SHOWGIRLS.

Title
Review for Big Momma's House (2000)
BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Martin Lawrence, Nia Long, Paul Giamatti, Jascha Washington, 
Terrence Howard.
Screenplay:  Darryl Quarles and Don Rhymer.
Producers:  David T. Friendly and Michael Green.
Director:  Raja Gosnell.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  99 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The plot of BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE is Martin Lawrence in a fat suit and a
dress. That's not just the high-concept premise; it's the fully-realized,
all-encompassing plot. Such an emphasis is not unheard-of in the world of
Hollywood summer entertainment. One need merely look back to last summer,
when the plot of BIG DADDY was Adam Sandler being an incompetent surrogate
parent. The trap inherent in such an approach is that the high-concept
plot idea better be pretty well-realized, or rest on the shoulders of an
extremely talented performer, because you can bet there will be nothing
else worth a second of your time -- not a developed character, not a
provocative theme, not a witty twist. You will get 90-plus minutes of
Martin Lawrence in a fat suit and a dress -- nothing more, nothing less.
     Those who find Martin Lawrence more than an occasionally amusing
screen presence may have a shot at enjoying the one-note dud that is BIG
MOMMA'S HOUSE. Others will simply stare, mouth agape, at its sheer
unapologetic laziness. Lawrence plays FBI agent Malcolm Turner, an
undercover expert on a stakeout assignment with his partner John (Paul
Giamatti). Dangerous convicted bank robber and murderer Lester Vesco
(Terrence Howard) has escaped from prison, and the Feds think he's headed
for his former girlfriend and presumed-but-never-proved accomplice Sherry
(Nia Long). Sherry, however, has fled with her son Trent (Jascha
Washington), possibly to visit her grandmother Hattie Mae (Ella Mitchell),
better known as Big Momma. Indeed, Sherry appears to be on her way, but
Big Momma is headed out of town without knowing Sherry is coming. That
leaves master of disguise Malcolm to go under very heavy cover as Big
Momma and find out what Sherry knows.
     BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE's bloodlines are certainly traceable to
MRS. DOUBTFIRE -- director Raja Gosnell edited that film, and the makeup
effects were similarly created by Greg Cannom -- but there's just as
strong a whiff of TOOTSIE in the main character's attempt to use his
alternate identity to get closer to a woman. Unfortunately, BIG MOMMA'S
HOUSE makes a ridiculous decision neither of those other films made:
Instead of having the protagonist pose as a completely manufactured
character unfamiliar to anyone elses, it places Malcolm in the position of
playing a friend and family member to several other characters. Suspension
of disbelief in BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE requires you to believe every other
person in the film is blind and/or stupid, since no one notices that one
Big Momma looks or sounds absolutely nothing like the other.
     Of course, laughs trumps logic every time, and BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE
probably still would have worked in spite of its utter disdain for common
sense if it had just managed to be funny. And it misses its best possible
opportunity for some great farce by ignoring the simple fact that the real
Big Momma is set up as a foul-tempered beast, while Malcolm has to be
nurturing in order to get the information he wants out of Sherry. 
Unfortunately, no one involved appears to have the faintest idea how to
deal with the comic gold mine involved in one real person pretending to be
another, very different real person, so they fall back on an endless
parade of sight gags: Malcolm reacting violently to Big Momma's explosive
diarrhea attack; Malcolm-as-Momma schooling a pair of cocky teens in
basketball; Malcolm trying to avoid detection as various prostheses give
way at inopportune moments; Malcolm delivering a baby because Big Momma is
the town midwife (one of the few sequences that works). Martin Lawrence
can be likeable enough at times, but there's no reason to care a whit
about his budding romance with Sherry because Malcolm is never an
independently significant character. He's just Big Momma without the
makeup on.
     I won't waste time commenting on how ineptly the set-up of the
escaped convict is employed, since it was clearly a waste of time to the
film-makers. There are a few token scenes of Lester looming as a
threatening figure, but he's ultimately a distraction in a film that's
really about its central visual incongruity (and the accompanying
lascivious glances at Nia Long's posterior). I'm never prepared to
underestimate how appealing that idea may be to other people -- several
million of them apparently found Adam Sandler as an incompetent surrogate
parent appealing -- but I know that when a film-maker tries to throw a
concept at me and pretend that it's an entire film, I duck out of the way. 
The gross implausibility of BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE might have been tolerable if
it was seasoned with more big, cleverly-constructed laughs. Its lack of
big laughs might have been tolerable if its characters were at all
relevant. BIG MOMMA'S HOUSE is ridiculous _and_ not funny. It's just a sad
exercise in the jaded presumption that any scene should be considered
wacky and hilarious if it involves Martin Lawrence in a fat suit and a
dress.

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Barbra Streisand, Jeff Bridges, Lauren Bacall, Mimi Rogers,
Pierce Brosnan, George Segal, Brenda Vaccaro.
Screenplay:  Richard LaGravenese.
Producers:  Barbra Streisand, Arnon Milchan.
Director:  Barbra Streisand.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Mock Barbra Streisand if you will for her insistence upon being
photographed with the kind of back-lighting we haven't seen since Stevie
Nicks was making music videos; after all, you'll be in good company if you
do.  Cinematographer Dante Spinotti and many of his technicians were fired
from the production of THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES, supposedly for not
shooting her in the most flattering manner possible, leading to insider
jabs like "The Mirror Has Two Chins."  Whatever the reasons for the rosy,
soft-focus look of MIRROR, it is a style which works for this decidedly
old-fashioned romantic comedy.  It is only when the film strays from the
traditions of 1940s screwball that it loses its opportunity to be a real
comic treat.
     Streisand plays Rose Morgan, a Columbia University literature
professor resigned to the role of ugly duckling, living in the shadow of a
glamour-obsessed mother (Lauren Bacall) and losing lovers to her more
beautiful sister Claire (Mimi Rogers).  A well-meaning Claire tries to
help Rose by responding for her to a personal ad placed by Gregory Larkin
(Jeff Bridges), a math professor whose inability to deal rationally with
sexual relationships has led him to seek celibate, intellectual
companionship.  When the two meet, they become fast friends, exactly the
kind of non-romantic partners Gregory has in mind, inspiring him to
propose a marriage which will be of minds only.  Rose accepts, but
complications arise when she finds herself violating their arrangement by
making the mistake of falling in love with her husband.
    THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES draws most of its charm from the appealing
pairing of Streisand and Bridges.  Bridges has long been one of our most
under-appreciated actors, but his versatility is on full display in the
quirky role of Gregory.  There is a certain stock quality to the "hapless
intellectual" part, but Bridges gives it more warmth and self-awareness;
it is because he _knows_ that he is hapless that he resorts to such
unconventional methods in the first place.  Streisand also does nice work
making Rose's growing frustration both funny and touching, and she has a
wonderfully natural scene giving a lecture on love in romantic literature.
Together Bridges and Streisand share a goofy chemistry in their very lack
of chemistry, supported admirably by Rogers, Bacall, Pierce Brosnan (as
Rogers' husband), George Segal (in the "his confidante" role) and Brenda
Vaccaro (in the "her confidante" role).
     In many ways, THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES is the perfect set-up for a
throwback romantic farce, but along the way to the "happily ever after" it
keeps stumbling over some fairly fundamental points.  The script by
Richard LaGravenese has its share of tart one-liners, but it is awfully
talky.  MIRROR's one entertaining scene of physical comedy, in which Rose
tries gamely to seduce Gregory, comes quite late in the game, by which
time it has become clear that its two hour plus running time was doing the
story no favors.  Streisand may have wanted a lush romantic fairy tale
full of Marvin Hamlisch strings and doe-eyed conversations, but she
sacrificed a lean, sharp comedy in the process.  She also doesn't use that
extra time to establish how much alike Rose and Gregory are in their
romanticism; if Bridges makes one big mistake in his performance, it is
making Gregory's rationalizations for his behavior sound too pat.  It
should be clear that both parties are struggling against the same
feelings, if struggling unequally, rather than appearing that Streisand is
the desperate woman pursuing the reluctant man.
     There is, of course, also the matter of how convinced you are that
Rose is the homely closet case she is supposed to be.  Streisand may be
nobody's idea of a conventional beauty, but her boudoir-photograph style
close-ups throughout the film tend to work against the baggy sweaters and
frumpy demeanor; when she finally goes for full-on glamour late in the
film, it is less a metamorphosis than a relief.  Many viewers may find her
character too far-fetched to swallow, much as they had problems with
Janeane Garofolo as the "ugly one" in THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS, but I'm
not convinced that is the problem.  THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES is
reminiscent of Hollywood film-making when the star was always filmed, like
Claudette Colbert, with only her best side to the camera, and it is
pleasant enough in its retro sort of way.  The smiles rarely turn into
laughs, however, and Streisand's notorious attention to detail has somehow
caused her to miss the big picture:  at some point, this romance needed to
set off a spark.  THE MIRROR HAS TWO FACES doesn't quite have that fire,
substituting a warm, soft lamp placed strategically behind Streisand's
hair.

Title
Review for Three Musketeers, The (1993)
Starring:  Kiefer Sutherland, Charlie Sheen, Chris O'Donnell,
           Oliver Platt, Tim Curry, Rebecca DeMornay.
Screenplay:  David Loughery.
Director:  Stephen Herek.
     The epithets practically write themselves.  "Young Swords."
"Teenage Mutant Ninja Musketeers."  "The Three Mouseketeers" (this one
is a Disney product).  Pejoratives all, and all suggesting something
constructed in a zealously commercial fashion.  That's exactly what the
latest incarnation of THE THREE MUSKETEERS is:  pitch meeting
filmmaking in all its overstuffed glory.  What is astonishing is that
something vaguely resembling entertainment emerged.  Thanks to a
high-energy finale and a wonderfully goofy performance by Oliver Platt,
THE THREE MUSKETEERS narrowly avoids complete disaster.
     For those unfamiliar with the basics of Alexandre Dumas' story, it
involves a brash young 17th Century Frenchman named D'Artagnan (Chris
O'Donnell) who yearns to follow in his dead father's footsteps as one
of the king's personal protectors, the Musketeers.  Unfortunately, he
sets out for Paris just as the Musketeers are being disbanded by the
villainous Cardinal Richelieu (Tim Curry).  Three Musketeers refuse to
surrender their commissions:  Athos (Kiefer Sutherland), Aramis
(Charlie Sheen) and Porthos (Oliver Platt).  Together with D'Artagnan,
they set out to foil Richelieu's plans to usurp the throne from young
King Louis XIII (Hugh O'Conor) with the aid of the mysterious Milady de
Winter (Rebecca DeMornay).
     Two huge problems, actually two parts of the same problem of
overly-commercial decision making, thwart THE THREE MUSKETEERS from the
start.  The first is that the casting has virtually nothing to do with
appropriateness for the character.  Kiefer Sutherland is atrociously
wrong as Athos, the former nobleman with a haunted past.  He appears to
believe that a frown is sufficient for showing melancholia, and he
delivers every line exactly the same, as though he were in dire need of
more fiber in his diet.  Charlie Sheen is a bit better for Aramis, but
he too is just plain under-talented.  Chris O'Donnell turns D'Artagnan
into a bland puppy dog, all youthful bluster and no charisma.  Then
there's Tim Curry, who plays Richelieu as half Dr. Frank N. Furter,
half Alan Rickman's Sheriff of Nottingham from ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF
THIEVES.  His lecherous grinning and campy one-liners are supposed to
be amusing, but I found them merely sad.  My first rule of
action/adventure films--that they're only as good as their
villains--once again proves true.  Fortunately, as uninteresting as the
rest of the cast is, Oliver Platt is that engaging.  His comic-relief
Porthos could have been awful, but he plays it with devilish
enthusiasm.  Every moment he's on screen is worth watching, and the
laughs he generates are as much out of the fun he is so clearly having
as they are from anything in the script.
     The other big-time mistake is a screenplay by David Loughery and
direction by Stephen Herek that cobbles together elements that worked
somewhere else, apparently under the impression that great pieces from
other films would add up to another great film.  We get Spielberg's
trademark zoom-to-closeup, and entrances and exits by Richelieu,
complete with billowing cape and ominous underscore, that have
"Cardinal Vader" written all over them.  The chase scenes and duels are
lively and fun, but never seemed to be in the flow of the story.  One
of these duels was so reminiscent of THE PRINCESS BRIDE that two
different members of the audience shouted out, "Prepare to die" at
exactly the same time.  THE THREE MUSKETEERS just doesn't hold
together, often looking like it was edited together from other much
better adventure films.
     Yet for all its calculatedness, I must admit that MUSKETEERS does
at least part of what it sets out to do: provide brainless mass-market
adventure.  After a sluggish first hour, it hits a gallop and cruises
to the finish with gusto.  The closing half hour is nearly non-stop
action, some of it surprisingly good.  Perhaps most important, the kids
seemed to love it.  While somewhat violent, it's mostly slapstick, and
appropriate for most of the family.  I didn't laugh a lot, but others
did, and there was some genuine applause.  So go figure.
     THE THREE MUSKETEERS will be compared frequently to Richard
Lester's definitive 1974 version, which is certainly a much better film
overall.  Disney's version doesn't pretend to aim for real wit or
originality, just a big-budget, big-name piece of cotton candy.  There
are worse ways to spend a matinee.

Title
Review for Gone Fishin' (1997)
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Joe Pesci, Danny Glover, Rosanna Arquette, Nick Brimble, Lynn
Whitfield.
Screenplay:  Jill Mazursky Cody and Jeffrey Abrams.
Producer:  Roger Birnbaum and Julie Bergman Sender
Director:  Christopher Cain.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, violent situations)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I was sitting next to a Laugher as I watched GONE FISHIN'.  When I
say "Laugher," I don't just mean someone who laughs loudly, or someone who
laughs frequently.  I mean someone who laughs loudly _and_ frequently.
The most innocuous line of dialogue was greeted with a hearty chuckle,
while a full-fledged sight gag inspired the kind of explosive bellow which
I was certain would cause a loss of bladder control.  If Disney had
test-screened GONE FISHIN' for an audience comprised entirely of clones of
this fellow, the champagne corks would have been popping like bubble wrap
in the hands of a 10-year-old.
     Under most circumstances, the Laugher would have annoyed me to
distraction.  In the case of GONE FISHIN', the distraction was welcome.
The film's breathtaking awfulness forced my mind to wander in sheer
self-defense, leading me to spend a lot of time thinking about what a
splendid time the Laugher was having.  As a critic, it is sometimes useful
for me to confront how uniquely personal the movie-going experience can
be, particularly when it comes to comedy.  In my world, GONE FISHIN' was a
complete catastrophe.  In the Laugher's world, it was an unqualified
delight.
     There's certainly nothing inherently clever about the premise.  Joe
Pesci and Danny Glover play a couple of life-long pals named Joe Waters
and Gus Green, who share a love of fishing and a talent for leaving
heaping piles of rubble in their wake.  And that, ultimately, is what GONE
FISHIN' is about.  Forget the contest which sends Joe and Gus to the
Florida Everglades from their New Jersey home, forget the run-ins with a
creepy con artist (Nick Brimble) and the search for his hidden loot,
forget the cameos by Louise Fletcher and Willie Nelson (they'll certainly 
hope you do).  GONE FISHIN' is about boats crashing through plate glass
windows, exploding gas stations, exploding hotel rooms, and wild rides on
runaway vehicles of every possible kind.  In other words, it's in the
tradition of the slapstick-y live-action comedies Disney made when Dean
Jones and Kurt Russell were foiling the nefarious schemes of Joe Flynn and
Cesar Romero in various permutations.
     At least those concoctions were fast-paced and enthusiastically
silly.  For every two minutes of action in GONE FISHIN' there are at least
twenty minutes of inane chatter between Pesci and Glover.  The two are
supposed to be lovable, incurably optimistic simpletons, but someone
forgot to spend any script time on the "lovable" part.  Joe and Gus are
dull, immature and, worst of all, they simply refuse to shut up.  They're
like two long-lost Howard brothers, a pair of Stooges whose suburban
upbringing bred most of the malice out of them and left them garrulous,
well-intentioned accidental anarchists.
     Thoughts of the Three Stooges led me back to the Laugher, and his
enjoyment suddenly made a lot more sense.  He was laughing at Joe and Gus
because they were losers who managed to take con men and slick-talking
salesmen down along with them.  They were Everymen looking for a break,
but they were also trouble-makers.  The were rebels without a clue, making
an id-level connection the way the Stooges have made id-level connections
for sixty years.  It's actually a bit of an insult to the Stooges to
compare them to the ponderous shenanigans of Joe and Gus, except to note
that the audience may find the mayhem similarly appealing.  For the
Laugher, Joe and Gus's adventures were a riotous 10+.  The less
Stooge-inclined may consider them nothing but a pair of foreheads waiting
for a swinging two-by-four.  Now _that_ would be comedy.

Title
Review for Spanking the Monkey (1994)
Starring:  Jeremy Davies, Alberta Watson, Benjamin Hendrickson,
Carla Gallo.
Screenplay/Director:  David O. Russell.
     SPANKING THE MONKEY is as difficult to watch as any film this
year.  Let me clarify that--that is not because it is terrible.  On
the contrary, SPANKING THE MONKEY is one of the best films of 1994 to
date.  But it is not a pleasant experience.  It's a blacker- than-pitch
comedy about a particularly dysfunctional family, one in which we are
witnesses to the implosion of the main character's psyche.  What makes
it impossible to look away is a pair of stunning lead performances in a
story as horifically comic as anything concocted by David Lynch.
     Jeremy Davies stars as Raymond Aibelli, a young man looking
forward to a prestigious medical fellowship in Washington following the
completion of his freshman year at M.I.T.  However, there is a detour
along the road to Washington.  His mother (Alberta Watson) has suffered
a compound fracture in her leg, and his father (Benjamin Hendrickson)
is heading off on a long business trip.  This leaves an extremely
reluctant Raymond as the only one available to care for his mother.
It's not an easy task.  Mrs. Aibelli is demanding and depressive, and
takes more than a passing interest in Raymond's sex life.  The tensions
between them build, and the result forces Raymond to drastic action.
     At the center of SPANKING THE MONKEY is the convoluted
relationship between Raymond and his mother, established in intricate
detail by writer/director David O. Russell.  We learn that Mrs. Aibelli
gave up her own dreams of a medical career in a bargain with her
husband, a bargain which allowed Raymond to be born at all.  With her
husband on the road almost constantly, her entire identity has been
connected to Raymond, and with the empty nest has come a profound and
complicated depression.  Alberta Watson navigates this character with
astonishing grace, making her simultaneously pathetic and sympathetic,
a still-beautiful woman facing a mid-life crisis which she can only
seem to resolve in destructive ways.  It is only because Watson allows
us to see Mrs.  Aibelli's deep pain that actions which instinctively
cause the audience to cringe also seem to make a kind of twisted
sense.  To use the comparison which has frequently been made between
SPANKING THE MONKEY and THE GRADUATE, this is Mrs. Robinson the way she
should have been played.
     Jeremy Davies' performance as Raymond is more restrained, but just
as poignant.  There is a lack of back story written in to Russell's
script, but Davies fills in all the blanks with a reading that tells us
that while what we see are extremes, this kind of dysfunction is
nothing new to this family.  From the moment his father tells him that
he is going to have to stay with his mother, it is clear that the
internship is not the main reason he is resistant; there is nowhere he
would less like to be than home.  Davies carries himself in a state of
perpetual tension, a tension which is denied simpler release at every
opportunity, and finally boils over with results that prompt very
nervous laughter.  Davies and Watson deliver two of the best
performances of the year, and give the unpleasant subject matter a
surprising appeal.
     It does at times seem that Russell has expended all his energy on
the complexities of Raymond and his mother.  Mr. Aibelli is something
of a cartoon figure of a traveling salesman, bombastic and
philandering, but a scene in the woods with Raymond cuts through much
of the stereotype.  Raymond's psychobabbling girlfriend Toni (Carla
Gallo) is nicely underplayed, but is too much of a prop; the same is
true of Raymond's busybody aunt.  However there are so many piercingly
insightful moments that these sketchy characters are easier to
tolerate.  One extremely effective scene shows Raymond hanging out with
some old high school acquaintances, guys he clearly didn't like then
and likes even less now.  It's a scene comic in its painful
familiarity, and one more of the many things Russell does right to
highlight how trapped Raymond feels.  SPANKING THE MONKEY deals with
difficult subjects in a brutally honest manner, and will have an
inherently limited audience, but it so daring and well-acted that it is
worth risking the unpleasant taste it may leave in your mouth.

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
     A few months ago, I was at a press screening for another Touchstone
film which was preceded by a teaser trailer for MISSION TO MARS. As the
trailer unfolded, the critics in the audience began to snicker with
increasing frequency. The imagery used was startling similar to images
from 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY -- an astronaut in a white room, an approach to
a dark object in the distance, a figure spinning off into space.
     It was comical not just because of the familiarity, but because it
seemed so quintessentially Brian De Palma. This was, after all, the
director who had built a 25 year career on cribbing from his most talented
predecessors. The train station sequence in THE UNTOUCHABLES came from
Eisenstein's POTEMKIN; the single-take opening sequence in SNAKE EYES felt
like Welles' TOUCH OF EVIL; whole heaping chunks of his early films
appropriated Hitchcockian devices and themes. So why wouldn't De Palma
take on the most iconic science-fiction film ever made while making his
first science-fiction film? Why not add Kubrick to his list of victims of
auteur homage?
     To be fair, MISSION TO MARS the film is not nearly as similar to 2001
as the trailers might lead you to fear. It's more alarming that it's
similar to the cookie-cutter Hollywood approach to any story. The film
focuses primarily on the aftermath of the first manned mission to Mars in
the year 2020. After an unexplainable phenomenon kills the rest of his
crew, Mission Commander Luke Graham (Don Cheadle) sends a cryptic message
back to mission control. That message sets in motion a recovery mission
led by Commander Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and pilot Jim McConnell (Gary
Sinise), both close friends of Graham. The recovery team members face
their own perils on the way to the Red Planet, risking their lives to
discover its mysterious secret.
     The frustrating thing about any Brian De Palma film is that you can
always count on at least one extended sequence where you realize what a
brilliant technical craftsman he can be. That sequence in MISSION TO MARS
comes about halfway through the film, a 20-minute stretch following an
accident in which the recovery craft starts losing atmosphere. A chain
reaction of events following that accident keeps building tension, leading
to some genuinely tense moments. De Palma's sense for timing this sort of
sequence is impeccable -- recall the editing of Tom Cruise's computer room
break-in in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE -- leading to the hope that MISSION TO
MARS can maintain that sort of visual and emotional energy.
     And then you remember this is Brian De Palma. Every once in a while,
by sheer twisted accident, De Palma ends up working with a rich, smart
script -- THE UNTOUCHABLES, BLOW OUT, CARLITO'S WAY. More often, you get
the impression that he looks for a script with a few places he can show
off his visual flair. MISSION TO MARS has its showcase sequence, but it
also has a leaden script full of plug-and-play characterizations. Sinise's
McConnell is portrayed as haunted by the death from cancer of his beloved
wife/fellow astronaut ("NYPD Blue's" Kim Delaney in flashback); Cheadle
gets a sensitive moment with his anxious son on the night before his
departure. It's the sort of mawkish back-story screenwriters use all the
time in adventure films, in a token -- and usually futile -- attempt to
show that the people matter more than the concept.
     Ironically, MISSION TO MARS is that rare case where the concept does
matter more than the people. Kubrick understood that 2001 was about the
mysteries of the universe and the flight of the entire human race, not
just whether Dave Bowman was torn up over his personal tragedies. When
MISSION TO MARS gets metaphysical, it makes sure there's someone on hand
to narrate every brutally obvious revelation, and someone whose individual
journey to wholeness will be completed by this close encounter. This film
doesn't end with the awe of creation; it ends with tedious exposition
topped off by an interplanetary clasping of hands. There are flashes of
Brian De Palma the visceral thrill-master in MISSION TO MARS, but he
doesn't seem to know what to do with its limp conclusion. This time
around, he opts not to rip-off a master. This time around, it probably
would have been a good idea.

Title
Review for Ba wang bie ji (1993)
     1993 has been quite a year for films with Chinese and
Chinese-American themes.  THE WEDDING BANQUET has received tremendous
critical praise; M. BUTTERFLY brought a Tony Award-winning play to the
screen; THE JOY LUCK CLUB has been playing to full houses and seems a
lock for many major award nominations.  Now comes Cannes Film Festival
Palme D'Or co-winner FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE, and it becomes clear that
everything else was just a warm-up.  Director Chen Kaige has fashioned
a drama mesmerizing from first frame to last, and does so without
getting artsy or obscure.  This is a remarkably accessible epic, and
the best film of this year in any language.
     FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE spans fifty years in the relationship
between two Chinese opera stars.  In 1925, the two meet when the shy
Douzi is brought by his mother, a prostitute, to a training school for
opera performers.  He is immediatedly drawn to the cocky Shitou, and
the friendship grows through the often cruel training.  As adults, the
two become the most renowned opera stars in Beijing, and adopt new
stage names.  Douzi becomes Cheng Dieyi (Leslie Cheung), who plays the
female roles; Shitou is Duan Xiaolou (Zhang Fengyi), who plays the male
roles.  The love of Dieyi for Xiaolou in their stage roles carries over
into real life, and he becomes jealous when Xiaolou marries savvy
prostitute Juxian (Gong Li).  Over the years, their personal and
professional relationship is tested by the great events of their times,
including the Japanese invasion in 1937, the Communist takeover in
1949, and the Cultural revolution of the 1960s.
     Perhaps the most astonishing thing about FAREWELL is that in spite
of its scope, it's really a very simple, old-fashioned love triangle
which happens to be about a man and a woman both in love with the same
man.  The three principals are bold and dynamic characters, each of
whom never does exactly what is expected.  Dieyi is a fascinating
character, a man whose latent homosexuality is twisted as a youth by
training which requires him to sing, "I am by nature a girl, not a
boy."  Since it is only on stage in his role as Concubine Yu (in the
opera from which the film takes its name) that he can express his
sexuality and his love for Xiaolou openly, it is there that he chooses
to live his entire life.  When he makes a plea to students of the
Cultural Revolution not to abandon the opera of the Old Society, it's a
plea not just for the art form but for his only chance to by truly
himself.  Xiaolou is equally intriguing, a brash man who is more
interested in the fame performing grants him than the purity of the
form.  He is oblivious to Dieyi's feelings, referring to him frequently
as "my stage brother," yet even that level of friendship eludes
Xiaolou.  Rather, he treats Dieyi more or less as nothing but a
co-worker, a man whom he likes and even needs for his career, but
doesn't really respect.  This convoluted relationship leads the two men
to acts both of selfless heroism and complete betrayal.  Then there is
Juxian, perhaps the strongest character emotionally, self-assured to a
fault in male-dominated China and capable in that confidence of
surprising displays of forgiveness.  Her conflict with Dieyi powers
FAREWELL's most haunting moments.
     Chen Kaige's direction demonstrates a mastery of composition and
narrative structure rarely seen.  The opening sequence, a reunion
between Dieyi and Xiaolou which frames the flashbacks to come, is a
triumph of lighting and texture.  Chen crafts brilliant cuts, such as a
cut from Xiaolou's announcement of his engagement to Juxian, and his
request for Dieyi "to be my best man," to a full screen closeup of
Dieyi, still in his concubine makeup and looking not like a "best man"
but a rejected woman.  Also well-handled is Dieyi's affair with a male
arts patron whom he uses as a surrogate for Xiaolou, painted up as
Xiaolou's Chu King character from the opera.  Every shot is a minor
revelation, raising Chen to the level of one of modern cinema's true
masters.
     No amount of hyperbole will get some filmgoers to see a 2 1/2 hour
story with subtitles about marginalized characters.  I can't think of a
greater artistic tragedy.  FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE is a thrilling love
story, a political epic and an intimate character study rolled into one
stunning package.  If you've never seen a non-English language film
before, find this one.  It's just that good.

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
BABE: PIG IN THE CITY
(Universal)
Starring:  Magda Szubanski, Mary Stein, Mickey Rooney, James Cromwell,
voices of E. G. Daily, Danny Mann, Glenne Headly, Steven Wright.
Screenplay:  George Miller, Judy Morris and Mark Lamprell.
Producers:  George Miller, Doug Mitchell and Bill Miller.
Director:  George Miller.
MPAA Rating:  G (mild bodily function reference).
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Like a classic storybook tale, 1995's BABE was set no-where and
no-when in particular.  The singular world in which the rosy, glowing
Hoggett farm and its chattering menagerie existed added to the charm that
made the original film a surprise hit and an Oscar-nominee.  BABE: PIG IN
THE CITY takes that anywhere-ness a step farther...actually, a step too
far.  The story begins as Farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell) suffers an 
unfortunate accident, making him unable to work the farm.  With financial
ruin imminent, Mrs. Hoggett (Magda Szubanski) decides to take the
now-famous Babe (E. G. Daily, replacing Christine Cavanaugh) for a
lucrative state fair appearance, only to end up stranded in The Big City.
Where, exactly, _is_ that Big City?  Well, a view from Babe's hotel window
includes The Statue of Liberty, the Sydney Opera House, the Eiffel Tower,
and the Hollywood sign.
     It's a cute gag the first time, but it also signals a not-so-subtle
shift in tone from BABE.  The setting is no longer Anywhere, but
Everywhere; the story isn't just a fantasy where anything could happen,
but one where the film-makers try to make everything happen.  Babe and
Mrs. Hoggett contend with suspicions that they are drug smugglers; Mrs.
Hoggett goes to jail when she inadvertently causes a mess in downtown
Metropolis; Babe comes to the rescue of a massive collection of
sort-of-homeless animals.  BABE: PIG IN THE CITY is so full of plots and
sub-plots that saving the Hoggett farm practically becomes an
afterthought, with a resolution so silly it almost seems a waste of time.
     You might suspect that a pace that frantic would be a sop to younger
viewers, but it's hard to imagine George Miller (who produced the original
and also directs here) had kids in mind making this film.  A catastrophic
performance by a low-rent circus (featuring Mickey Rooney in a weird cameo
as a clown of indeterminate personality) turns into a moody and murky
slow-motion sequence like something out of PLATOON; later, a dog with a
bad heart has a near-death experience with pastoral visions.  BABE
certainly had a few dark moments, but nothing like the consistently creepy
feel of PIG IN THE CITY.  Miller may have been playing to the kiddies when
Mrs. Hoggett goes bouncing around a reception hall in inflatable pants,
but not when a dog insults a cat with an epithet that could be interpreted
as quite vulgar.
     Ironically, that strangely mature tone introduces the film's only
truly compelling element, a melancholy performing orangutan named
Thelonious (voice of James Cosmo).  He's a mysterious presence who can't
seem to bear the idea that he's not human, and both the animal and vocal
performances are wonderfully sympathetic.  I sat just a bit forward in my
seat every time Thelonious appeared, gradually realizing that this one
character also served to point out how bland the rest of the characters
are in BABE: PIG IN THE CITY.  There are too many animals milling about to
care about any of them all that much; even the little pig himself seems to
have been sapped of personality.  The easy rapport between Babe and Farmer
Hoggett (relegated here to little more than a glorified cameo) is sorely
missed.
     Then again, a whole lot of things from BABE are sorely missed.  It's
a nice change of pace to find a sequel that doesn't merely try to remake
the original, but BABE: PIG IN THE CITY lack any of the original's
endearing gentle spirit.  It's so hyped-up and busy, it's almost as
though John Hughes got hold of our sweet little pig and tossed him into a
HOME ALONE sequel.  Too many chuckles in BABE: PIG IN THE CITY are too
forced; too many others are too close to a shudder.  This is one major
holiday disappointment, a storybook tale that should have quit with its
original happy ending.

Title
Review for Intersection (1994)
Starring:  Richard Gere, Sharon Stone, Lolita Davidovich.
Screenplay:  David Rayfiel & Marshall Brickman.
Director:  Mark Rydell.
     Exactly when it happened, I can't put my finger on.  For about
half an hour of INTERSECTION, I was intrigued, and wondered whether I
was on to my first guilty pleasure of 1994.  Then, at some point, I
began to realize that INTERSECTION was taking itself far too
seriously.  While the film is cleverly structured and reasonably
well-acted, it began to irritate me that it was trying to turn a
mid-life crisis into a great existential drama.  Worse yet, it
presented me with a "hero" I couldn't stand and an ending that left me
angry.
     As INTERSECTION opens, Vancouver architect Vincent Eastman
(Richard Gere) is spinning his Mercedes into an oncoming truck.  The
rest of the film takes us back to the events leading up to that crash,
as well as its immediate aftermath.  We learn that Vincent is separated
from his wife and business partner Sally (Sharon Stone), and living
with journalist Olivia Marshak (Lolita Davidovich).  Vincent and Olivia
are planning to be married and to move into a house Vincent is
designing, but Vincent still finds himself jealous of Sally's new
relationship.  Throughout are additional flashbacks to the early years
of Vincent and Sally's marriage, and his first meetings with Olivia.
Vincent finds himself torn between the two women, and his decision will
place him on the road to that fateful encounter with a big rig.
     As I noted, INTERSECTION's early scenes boast enough slickness and
craft to lend the illusion of consequence.  The lead performances by
Gere, Stone and Davidovich are all understated, and Davidovich in
particular generates quite a bit of audience sympathy.  Efficient
editing by Mark Warner and glossy photography by the talented Vilmos
Zsigmond create a dreamy atmosphere, and James Newton Howard's jazzy
score plays up the romance angle.  The dialogue in the script by David
Rayfiel and Marshall Brickman is snappy, keeping conversations lively
enough to maintain interest.
     It isn't all that long, however, before it becomes evident that
there isn't all that much going on beneath INTERSECTION's shiny
surface.  The performers are "understated" primarily because there is
so little substance to any of the characters.  Olivia is perky and
sweet, but it's never particularly clear why she's so into Vincent.
Sally, in the flashback sequences, is made to appear icy and reserved,
and one of those scenes is quite clever.  Still, nothing in her
character seems to justify Vincent's behavior, and this may be
INTERSECTION's critical failing.  Vincent never becomes a man facing a
real problem; he's just a jerk playing both ends against the middle.
It was impossible for me to work up any sympathy for a man who leaves
his wife without ever discussing his problems with his marriage, then
fires snide and jealous questions at her about a new boyfriend.  To
make matters even worse, the resolution is a complete cop-out, allowing
Vincent somehow to make both women happy inadvertently.  If it seems
like I was expecting a morality tale...well, by the time it was over, I
was.
     But even those who allow Vincent more leeway than I did are likely
to be turned off by Mark Rydell's heavy handed direction.  Gere's angst
ridden face is frequently in close-up, usually while driving; he
probably ends up playing as many scenes with a steering wheel as he
does with another actor.  An antique clock becomes a distracting
SYMBOL, and the omnipresent Northwest rain an objective correlative I
could have done without.  Frequent flashbacks and dream sequences make
for a dizzying narrative.  So many stylistic choices in INTERSECTION
turned me off that I'm tempted not to mention the off-handed allusion
to the fact that Vincent's 13-year-old daughter has an eating
disorder.

Title
Review for Interview with the Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles (1994)
Starring:  Tom Cruise, Brad Pitt, Kirsten Dunst, Antonio Banderas.
Screenplay:  Anne Rice.
Director:  Neil Jordan.
     INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE has far more in common with MARY
SHELLEY'S FRANKENSTEIN than a November release date.  To begin with the
obvious, both are based on florid novels featuring "monsters" in
existential crisis, rooted deeply in the authors' feelings of loss.
And both were the subject of intense pre-release scrutiny as a result
of off-beat casting decisions.  However, the most relevant--and
unfortunate--similarity between the two is what ends up on the
screen.  INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE is a spectacularly executed
production, perhaps more consistent in its tone than FRANKENSTEIN, but
it also lacks that film's high points; it's simply too plot-heavy, and
ends up feeling extremely rushed.
     The story is told in flashback, as 200-year-old Louis de Pointe du
Lac (Brad Pitt) tells the story of his life to a young interviewer
(Christian Slater) in contemporary San Francisco.  In 1791 New Orleans,
plantation owner Louis despairs over the deaths of his wife and
daughter, a despair sensed by the vampire Lestat (Tom Cruise).  Lestat
offers Louis the chance to become like him, but after he accepts, he
soon realizes the implications of his choice--a bloodlust he loathes
but can't resist.  When Louis contemplates leaving Lestat, Lestat
creates another vampire, the child Claudia (Kirsten Dunst).  But Louis
and Claudia still rebel, and attempt to find out more about their
nature when they travel to Paris and find a cadre of vampires led by
the seductive Armand (Antonio Banderas).
     First, to the single most pressing question to anyone familiar
with Anne Rice's novel:  is Tom Cruise an acceptable Lestat?  The
answer is, sometimes.  There are moments, and not isolated ones, where
Cruise is positively fiendish, more so than one could have any right to
hope.  There are also moments when he is so completely wrong that every
fear of his detractors appears to have been justified, and this
schizophrenia is typical of the bumps in INTERVIEW.  More damaging
still is Brad Pitt, the real star of the film as Louis.  He has said in
interviews that he grew to hate playing the depressive vampire, and
that fact is sadly evident in his performance, a dazed and lackluster
turn.  Both Pitt and Cruise are put to shame by eleven-year-old Kirsten
Dunst, who does riveting work as the vampire who becomes a woman
trapped in a child's body.  She becomes the tortured soul whose plight
truly connects with the audience in a way that Louis's should have, but
never does.
     Part of the problem is that among the elements of Rice's novel
which are altered or abandoned, the one which is most ill-advised is
ignoring Louis's religiosity.  His despair is linked to a very Catholic
sense of guilt, and when all reference to his faith is excised he loses
a critical motivating factor.  Often his reluctance to take human lives
comes off as mere distaste, rather than a profound fear that he has
become an agent of the devil, or that there may be no God to judge
him.
     Of course, this is one of the dangers inherent in doing a big
Hollywood adaptation of what is essentially an interior monologue.
Director Neil Jordan has filmed the story beautifully, busing Philippe
Rousselot's cinematography to perfection, and scenes like the Theater
of Vampires production are nearly ideal translations from the novel.
The production design is magnificent, and Elliot Goldenthal's score is
a great mood setter.  It looks so good that occasionally I could
overlook the fact that in their rush to pack as much plot as possible
into two hours, Jordan and Rice had severely skimped on their
characters' motivations.  This is not to say that there haven't been
some significant improvements made from the novel, particularly adding
some much-needed black humor.  But for INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE to
work as anything besides simply spectacle, Louis had to becomes
something besides a pouting immortal, and Lestat had to be something
more than a sporadically zany eternal adolescent.  Lestat is more like
an abusive father, and that relationship is very poorly handled.
INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE ends up positively gorgeous, and extremely
hollow.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT
(Paramount)
Voices:  Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes.
Screenplay:  Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady.
Producers:  Trey Parker & Matt Stone.
Director:  Trey Parker.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, adult humor, cartoon violence,
sexual situations)
Running Time:  81 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT is crude and profane.  It's
more-than-occasionally offensive.  It's naughty just to see how much
naughtiness you can get away with.  It's repetitious in its dependence on 
obscenity from the mouths of babes.  In short, it's everything critics of
the Comedy Central series "South Park" have accused it of being for three
years, with the added benefit of including several hundred choice R-rated
profanities.  This is about as vile and inexcusable as comedy film-making
gets, a distillation of everything people fear popular culture is doing to
our sensibilities, and I laughed so hard I thought I'd harm an internal
organ.
     There's no question that "South Park" is for a very specific taste,
or lack thereof.  Even those who had been embracing the series now seem to
have tired of Trey Parker and Matt Stone's crass market approach to
grabbing laughs, as evidenced by the show's plummeting ratings.  BIGGER,
LONGER & UNCUT's missed jokes and sniggering immaturity probably wouldn't
surprise even the staunchest "South Park" fan; its sporadic brilliance may
surprise everyone.  The premise is a reflexive commentary on "harmful"
film-making, with the show's four young pals -- Eric Cartman (Parker),
Stan Marsh (Parker), Kyle Broflovski (Stone) and Kenny McCormick (Stone)
-- learning some interesting words from an R-rated feature film starring
scatalogical cartoon stars Terrance & Phillip.  The children's profane
outbursts cause a parental panic in which Terrance & Phillip's home nation
of Canada is held accountable for many societal ills.  War with our
neighbor to the north ensues, as well does a preparation for the
Apocalypse by Satan and his new lover Saddam Hussein.
     The broad pot-shots at censorship and moralistic hysteria aren't
surprising coming from Parker and Stone, who have been heralded as
harbingers of the Apocalypse themselves.  They get in a few swipes at the
MPAA (which branded Parker's ORGAZMO with an NC-17), taking particular aim
at the greater concern with vulgarity than with violence.  Also in their
crosshairs are nationalistic fervor, happy-talk psychology, Internet
pornography and media sensationalism, all compared to the relatively
mundane sin of potty-mouthing.  The target may be easy and some of the
jokes obvious, but Parker and Stone keep the chuckles coming at the
expense of those who would condemn them.
     As it turns out, the film is far less effective as social satire than
it is at pop culture parody.  You see, BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT is a
musical, with many of the numbers by Parker and composer Marc Shaiman 
patterned after the recent Disney formula.  There's a scene-setting
introductory number ("Mountain Town"), a song for the heroes' dilemma
("What Would Brian Boitano Do?"), a song for the villains ("Blame
Canada"), and a show-stopping production number ("It's Easy, Mmmkay").
Parker and Stone then switch gears to target LES MISERABLES, as the
children's "La Resistance" movement opposing their parents' proposed
execution of Terrance & Phillip generates numbers keyed to "One Day More"
and "A Little Fall of Rain."  The fifteen songs provide the film's most
riotous moments, including Terrance & Phillip's explosively obscene ode to
molestation and Satan's tender ballad about his quest for happiness.  You
may never feel guiltier about laughing harder.
     A style like Parker and Stone's, similar to scattershot predecessors
like Mel Brooks and the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker team, is bound to produce
its share of duds like the go-nowhere jabs at a perpetually horny Saddam
Hussein.  Many viewers will just be turned off by the use of homosexuality
or military racism as punch lines, or even the whole idea of 
easily-influenced kids in today's charged post-Columbine High climate.  
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT isn't going to make anyone prouder to
be an American, or any less convinced that movies are all about shock
value. It's not even going to earn points for preaching to the choir about
letting parents do the job of parenting.  It may do nothing more than
leave you choking back the laughs for fear of acknowledging the power of
your inner 12-year-old.

Title
Review for Eddie (1996)
(Hollywood)  
Starring:  Whoopi Goldberg, Frank Langella, Dennis Farina, Richard
Jenkins, John Salley, Malik Sealy, Rick Fox, Dwayne Schintzius.  
Screenplay:  Jon Connolly, David Loucka, Eric Champnella, Keith Mitchell,
Steve Zacharias, Jeff Buhai.  
Producers:  David Permut, Mark Burg.  
Director:  Steve Rash.  
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw. 
     I have a great idea for a movie, one that can't miss.  See, I've got
Coolio to do a song for the soundtrack, and about fifty athletes and
celebrities to do cameo appearances.  It's about professional basketball,
so I'll release it right around the NBA finals to guarantee added
publicity.  As for what the movie is actually about...well, that will all
sort itself out eventually.  I figure it will be a comedy, so I'll throw a
half-dozen writers at it and take the best of whatever they come up with. 
Maybe we'll put a gender spin on it, see if we can get some women out to
see it, too. 
     EDDIE is one of those phenomenally lazy films that infuriates me more
than any other kind.  TWISTER, as inane as the script might have been, at
least required some creative technicians; MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, overwrought
plot and all, at least involved genuine effort.  EDDIE just sits there,
hawking up a formula story without any laughs, and makes every possible
bad decision when a decision is required.
     Whoopi Goldberg plays Eddie Franklin, a New York limo driver and
die-hard Knicks fan who is suffering through a dismal season for her
beloved team.  Coach John Bailey (Dennis Farina) has lost control of his
overpaid prima donnas, and the losses are beginning to mount.  The
dwindling attendance inspires new team owner Wild Bill Burgess (Frank
Langella) to try a publicity stunt in which a lucky fan will get to be an
honorary coach of the team.  The winner (surprise, surprise) is Eddie, who
becomes a fan favorite, and eventually the actual coach.  The Knicks
continue to lose, but Eddie has some sassy tricks up her sleeve to inspire
her troops.
     Incidentally, the Knicks eventually start winning.  Please raise your
hand if that comes as a shock, and I will invite you to my all-night
marathon of THE BAD NEWS BEARS, MAJOR LEAGUE, ANGELS IN THE OUTFIELD, THE
MIGHTY DUCKS, THE BIG GREEN, COOL RUNNINGS and LITTLE GIANTS.  Awful teams
in sports comedies make miraculous turnarounds; it's what they do.  Those
teams usually involve kids, for a very sound comedic reason:  it's funnier
when they screw up, and they're more sympathetic.  Those which _don't_
involve kids usually have actual actors in the lead roles, for another
very sound comedic reason:  they generally have developed some sort of
comic timing.  EDDIE was cast under the misguided premise that it's easier
to make basketball players look like actors than it is to make actors look
like basketball players.  This finds NBA players like Greg Ostertag,
Dwayne Schintzius, Rick Fox and Malik Sealy delivering punch lines as
though they were reading them for the first time off a Bazooka wrapper
(though Sacramento Kings center Olden Polynice has a nice moment
describing a black hole to fellow players).
     Perhaps that all didn't matter to anyone because there are so few
punch lines, and because the whole film is one big casting gimmick.  Steve
Rash directs the spiritless script as though waving a flag of surrender
and screaming, "Don't blame me, I just work here."  Perhaps it was
patently obvious to him that EDDIE isn't a movie -- it's a cameo
appearance that trips over a plot every once in a while.  Among the
notables who lend their faces to this travesty are Donald Trump, New York
mayor Rudolph Giulianni, former New York mayor Ed Koch, David Letterman,
Letterman regulars Mujibur Rahman and Sirajul Islam, ESPN broadcaster
Chris Berman and Knicks announcer Marv Albert, as well as dozens of NBA
players and several NBA arenas.  And those are the real jokes in EDDIE.
Nothing these individuals say or do is funny; you are supposed to be
laughing simply because you notice, "Hey, it's Donald Trump!" or "Hey,
it's Mujibur and Sirajul!"
     It's difficult to decide whether EDDIE is so bad because it was so
shamelessly lacking in imagination or because it can't even get the
cliches in a cliche-ridden genre script right.  The Knicks coach who is
Eddie's antagonist early in the film reappears at the end, but he isn't
given a chance to be the villain EDDIE desperately needs.  Neither is
Frank Langella, and none of the athlete-actors have the ability to give
Whoopi Goldberg anything to play off of.  That leaves her to do her
street-wise Miss Thang routine, but with no character, no sharp lines and
no help.
     EDDIE isn't just a bad movie with a formulaic premise.  It's a movie
that makes you feel cheated and offended, because someone came up with a
poster and a marketing plan to which they had to attach an actual movie,
and you had the nerve to believe it was going to be a comedy.

Title
Review for Widows' Peak (1994)
Starring:  Mia Farrow, Joan Plowright, Natasha Richardson,
           Adrian Dunbar, Jim Broadbent.
Screenplay:  Hugh Leonard.
Director:  John Irvin.
     I can't think of a film in the last few years set in Ireland that
I did not enjoy, and I'm fairly sure it's not coincidence.  When an
Irish setting is involved, I tend to lose all objectivity.  It's me
Celtic roots crying out, it is.  The verdant hills, the piqued accents,
the mystical Catholicism ... all grip me in a way that is difficult to
explain.  So I warn ye to take my comments regarding WIDOWS' PEAK with
a certain grain of salt, even though I believe that you don't need to
be a Celtophile to find it a wonderfully entertaining comedy-mystery.
     Set in 1926, WIDOWS' PEAK is the story of a unique community of
Kilshannon, Ireland, so nicknamed by the locals because of its rather
restrictive demographics.  The mother of Mrs. Doyle Counihan (Joan
Plowright) left a will permitting only widows to live in the houses on
her land, with special exceptions allowed like that for Miss Katherine
O'Hare (Mia Farrow).  Into this insular world comes Mrs. Edwina Broome
(Natasha Richardson), a flamboyant Englishwoman raised in America.
Although Mrs. Broome claims to be the widow of a wealthy English
soldier, Miss O'Hare is very vocal in her suspicions that Mrs. Broome
is not what she claims to be, particularly when Mrs. Broome begins
romancing Mrs. Doyle Counihan's son Godfrey (Adrian Dunbar).  The feud
between the two women escalates until scandalous secrets come to the
fore, and the town is filled with talk of murder.
     WIDOWS' PEAK was directed by John Irvin, whose previous projects
have been primarily action-oriented (RAW DEAL, HAMBURGER HILL), and it
may be that sensibility which makes this film more than just another
pastoral romp.  While there is plenty of lovely scenery, there is also
a tremendous level of energy, a sassy edge uncommon to films in similar
settings.  A sequence involving Miss O'Hare and Mrs. Broome racing
across a lake on motorboats is staged with zest, and the town regatta
seems genuinely alive with activity.  The high spirits are further
enhanced by the performances.  Joan Plowright is wonderful as the
dowager queen of Widows' Peak, even if she could play a part like this
in her sleep by now.  Her matter-of- fact confidence that her every
whim should be gospel is delightful to watch, as are the subtle ways in
which she demonstrates her condescension.  Natasha Richardson goes
appropriately over-the-top as the sexy and (perhaps) sinister Mrs.
Broome, looking precisely like the personification of a red dress at a
funeral.  Adrian Dunbar is also exceptional as Godfrey, who puts on a
great show of wanting to break free of his mother's overbearing will,
but proves too willing to play the doting son.
     Of course, there is also Mia Farrow.  In her first post-Woody
outing, Farrow reminds us that she can indeed play something besides a
female version of Woody Allen's neurotic persona.  Her role here is a
tricky one to pull off, balancing several layers of suspicion and
deception, but she does pull it off, and with surprising grace.  She
gets some positively venomous lines, and seems to delight in delivering
them.  Irvin has clearly made her role the showcase, and in one last
lingering shot, seems to be saying, "I knew you could do it."
     The mystery elements which drive the second half of the film are
perhaps a bit too easy to figure out, as Irvin and screenwriter Hugh
Leonard underline each of their clues with too much emphasis.  But if
they are not tremendously surprising, it doesn't seem as though they
were really intended to be.  This is not a film predicated on some
gasp-inducing, CRYING GAME-like twist; rather, the plot twists are just
there to allow the character development, befuddling at first, to fall
into place.  In fact, the only time WIDOWS' PEAK really slows down is
when there is lengthy exposition, particularly at a dinner party which
is unfortunately handled in a slightly clumsy manner.  But with or
without the mystery, WIDOWS' PEAK would still have been funny and
frisky, filled with nicely detailed cultural moments but mostly just a
crisp and fun-filled hour and forty minutes.

Title
Review for My Father the Hero (1994)
Starring:  Gerard Depardieu, Katherine Heigl, Dalton James, Faith Prince.
Screenplay:  Francis Veber & Charlie Peters.
Director:  Steve Miner.
     For a while there, I had declared a personal moratorium on
Disney's live-action formula pictures.  Although I found COOL RUNNINGS
moderately entertaining, I realized that was about as much as I could
expect: a smile here, a chuckle there, something I'd take my kids to
see if I had any and wanted to get them out of the house on a Saturday
afternoon.  With the presence of Gerard Depardieu, I had slightly
higher hopes for MY FATHER THE HERO, but I was kidding myself.  While
he lends a roguish charm to the proceedings, he's still trapped in a
movie which seems designed more to divert than to entertain.
     Depardieu plays Andre, a divorced father who has planned a
Bahamian vacation to spend time with his fourteen-year-old daughter
Nicole (Katherine Heigl).  Andre has been mostly absentee in recent
years, and as a result Nicole has developed a rather confused attitude
towards her father.  When she falls for a handsome island resident
(Dalton James), she tries to impress him by concocting a wild story
about her past, including telling him that Andre is her lover.  Word
spreads quickly around the resort, and Andre finds himself tremendously
confused at the reactions he's getting.  Eventually, Andre becomes
privvy to the story, and spins an even more complicated yarn in an
effort to win back his daughter's affections.
     It would be one thing if MY FATHER THE HERO were simply
predictable, which it is, but it is also just badly written.  MY
FATHER THE HERO is based on a French film I have not seen titled MON
PERE, CE HEROS, but it is hard to believe that the characters could
have been as fuzzy as they are here.  We are supposed to understand
that Andre has a selfish streak and a tendency to disappear from
people's lives, asserted by Nicole and emphasized by a telephone
relationship with a girlfriend who doesn't appear until the last scene
(in a cameo which shouldn't be a surprise if you recognize the voice).
However, we never see any indication in his interaction with Nicole
that he is anything but a completely doting father.  It is she who
tries to distance herself from Andre, not the other way around, so her
subsequent string of lies doesn't seem particularly motivated.  The
lies are just a device, and even if we believe it's just adolescence at
work there's no particular reason to care.  One doesn't necessarily
expect well-rounded characters from a film like MY FATHER THE HERO,
but one should at leas find reasonably coherent types.
     Still, as silly and incoherent as the script may be, Gerard
Depardieu still gets to read many of the lines, and he has superb comic
timing.  Once Andre is part of his daughter's fabrication, he plays
some light and clever scenes with the object of her affections, bland
Bill Campbell look-alike Dalton James.  Depardieu has a pleasant
rapport with Katherine Heigl, and with a flirtatious tourist played by
Faith Prince.  But it's part of the problem that he has such a rapport
with everyone; if part of the point is that Andre needs to become a
better father and a more selfless person, we never see any indication
that he is anything but a perfectly nice guy, if slightly
overprotective.  There would have been so many more comic possibilities
in a rakish playboy being saddled with everyone's belief that he is a
cradle-robber.  Heigl is lovely as Nicole, perhaps too lovely; I'm not
sure why she'd need to lie to hook anyone.
     MY FATHER, THE HERO is wholesome, good-natured and does virtually
nothing to offend.  But it needs more than that, namely something to
make it worth ninety minutes of anyone's time.  Gerard Depardieu is fun
to watch, and proves surprisingly adept at physical comedy.  It would
have been nice to see him work with a script that seemed to have any
imagination or sense of structure behind it.

Title
Review for Last Days, The (1998)
    There's more than a touch of irony to the title of THE LAST DAYS, the
first feature film project from Steven Spielberg's Shoah Foundation.  On
the surface it refers to the time when the film's five principal subjects
-- Hungarian-born Holocaust survivors Tom Lantos, Renee Firestone, Alice
Lok Cahana, Bill Basch and Irene Zisblatt -- were taken from their
homeland in 1944, as Germany saw its chances at winning the war slip away
and made a last desperate attempt to complete Hitler's Final Solution.
Yet for these five people and thousands of other survivors like them, the
last days were only the beginning, the first days of a lifetime spent
trying to make sense of what had been taken from them.
     It's this concern with the world of the survivors -- rather than
simply the world of the concentration camp internees -- that makes THE
LAST DAYS more than "just another Holocaust documentary."  The film is
told entirely by witnesses to the Holocaust, without a moment of
narration, yet accounts of attrocities in the camps make up a relatively
small portion of the film.  There are certainly many powerful
recollections in the survivor testimony, the kind that can make you cry
out in pain.  Irene Zisblatt tells a tale of preserving the family
diamonds that makes Christopher Walken's gold watch monologue in PULP
FICTION seem appallingly banal; she describes seeing two children killed,
and realizing "that's when I stopped talking to God."  Director James Moll
also uncovers rare footage for which no adjectives will suffice, images
shot by liberating Allied forces of skeletal survivors walking in a
ghostly parade.
     As effectively as THE LAST DAYS captures the "during" of the
Holocaust, it also takes time to explore both the "before" and the
"after."  If there is anywhere it disappoints, it is in capturing the
uniqueness of this particular "before."  Bill Basch ruefully notes in the
film's opening moments the absurdity of Hitler's late push to add the
Hungarian Jews to his European slaughter -- "killing Jews," Basch says,
"was more important than winning the war" -- but Moll doesn't build on
that premise.  While his focus on the survivors keeps the story personal,
it doesn't allow for a perspective on what was happening in the bigger
picture of 1944, and how a different allocation of resources by the
Germans might have changed that picture.  Accounts of how Hungarians
believed the stories drifting in from Poland could never happen in their
own country feel more like generic back-story than a context for this
particular phase of the genocide.
     Ultimately, however, Moll finds his most powerful stories in the
"after."  There is still 35 minutes of screen time left when the war ends,
leaving us with stories of our five narrators trying to pick up the
pieces.  We see scenes of the survivors returned to Birkenau and
Bergen-Belsen with their families, memories and tears washing over them.
We see Renee Firestone visiting her childhood home, and breaking down at
finding a locked gate.  We see Firestone confronting a German
concentration camp physician with evidence that he experimented on her
sister, receiving evasive responses to the medical records like "yes,
everything normal."  Most significantly, we see the survivors turning
their experiences into art (by Lok Cahana), into political action (by
Lantos, now a California Congressman), into education for another
generation (by Firestone in lectures).  Their days in concentration camps
could have been the last days for these five individuals, either for their
lives or for their souls.  THE LAST DAYS shows survivors in action,
seeking resolution, working for a world that will never forget.

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
THE APOSTLE
(October)
Starring:  Robert Duvall, Farrah Fawcett, Miranda Richardson, John
Beasley, Walter Goggins, June Carter Cash, Todd Allen, Billy Bob Thornton.
Screenplay:  Robert Duvall.
Producer:  Rob Carliner.
Director:  Robert Duvall.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, mild profanity, brief violence)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A moment of mild understatement:  people of Christian faith haven't
fared well in film.  When Hollywood was still afraid to offend, Christian
characters were flawless, salt-of-the-earth folks; later, as cinematic
taboos vanished through the 60s and 70s, religion became a sure sign of
either mental illness or hypocrisy.  Improbably extremes ruled, with few
film-makers bothering to delve into the complex middle ground occupied by
millions of Americans:  flawed human beings who are nevertheless
completely sincere and devoted to their faith.
     Pentecostal minister Euliss F. "Sonny" Dewey, the title character in
THE APOSTLE, may be the most wonderfully complex Christian character ever
depicted on film, and every ounce of credit for that creation goes to
Robert Duvall.  Duvall wrote, directed and stars as Sonny, a man with an
unfailing passion for his calling as a preacher.  Unfortunately he also
has an unfailing passion for women, leading his wife Jessie (Farrah
Fawcett) to throw him out of the house and engineer his ouster from his
church.  The short-tempered Sonny responds by taking a baseball bat to the
head of Jessie's new lover, then quickly taking it on the lam from his
home in Texas to Bayou Boutte, Louisiana.  There he re-christens himself
"The Apostle E. F.," dedicating himself to beginning a new ministry in his
new home.
     Duvall works wonders with Sonny, depicting every possible facet of
this complicated man's personality.  An early scene, in which Sonny stops
at the scene of an automobile accident to guide a critically injured young
man to salvation, depicts the single-minded, necessarily arrogant
conviction of the evangelist that everyone needs "saving" (as well as the
accompanying prideful glee when he succeeds).  Sonny's belief that his
work as a preacher supercedes all other obligations unifies every action,
from his rationalization of his infidelities to his decision to run from
the law.  Duvall even touches humorously on the reaction of others to
Sonny's fervor -- one man who offers Sonny hospitality also sleeps warily
with a shotgun by his side.
     If there's one major stumbling block in THE APOSTLE, it is that the
other characters in the film exist entirely to react to Sonny.  While the
performances are uniformly strong and naturalistic, the supporting players
rarely seem to have lives of their own.  From Jessie, to the young
mechanic (Walter Goggins) who becomes Sonny's close friend, to a racist
troublemaker (Billy Bob Thornton), all serve as spectators or functional
props in the story of Sonny's redemption.  Duvall commits so much energy
to making this one character completely real that he has little left to
spend on anyone else.
     You may not end up minding all that much, since that one character
becomes so fascinating.  Duvall has long been one of America's finest
actors, but this is the kind of role into which he disappears most
completely -- slightly roguish but unmistakably human souls like his roles
in TENDER MERCIES and LONESOME DOVE.  When Sonny gives his final sermon in
THE APOSTLE, in a sequence which lingers and builds in intensity, you
realize exactly what Duvall is aiming at.  It is possible for a man who is
quick-tempered, stubborn and unfaithful to his wife to change lives for
the better; it doesn't take a saint to be a good Christian.  Ultimately,
THE APOSTLE is a strange sort of character study, because Sonny doesn't
really change all that much.  Like most well-intentioned by imperfect
people, he just keeps trying to be better.

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
     TOPSY-TURVY is not a bio-pic in the conventional sense of the term.
It's a bio-pic in the Mike Leigh sense of the term, which may be
redundant. However, it may not even be appropriate to call it a Mike Leigh
film in the conventional sense of the term. Leigh has spent most of his
career on contemporary character studies, structuring scripts out of
character improvisations. One does not think of period pieces when one
thinks of Mike Leigh, nor would one likely think of him as the ideal
film-maker to look behind the scenes at the creation of Gilbert &
Sullivan's "The Mikado." How would this fashioner of human drama approach
the fashioning of light opera?
     As it turns out, he does so with detail, detail and more detail --
occasionally to nerve-wracking excess. The story opens in 1884, where
"Princess Aida" -- the latest creation of the immensely popular team of
lyricist William S. Gilbert (Jim Broadbent) and composer Arthur Sullivan
(Allan Corduner) -- is receiving tepid notices for the excessive
familiarity of its themes. Gilbert responds defensively, retiring to write
his latest fanciful libretto, while the ailing Sullivan resolves never to
write light opera again. He is persuaded to reconsider when Gilbert
attends a Japanese exposition and comes up with one of his most original
ideas in years. But the concept for "The Mikado" is only the beginning of
the arduous process of staging it.
     When TOPSY-TURVY finally hits its stride, with Gilbert's visit to the
exposition, it's an extraordinarily entertaining piece of work. Leigh
dives into the pre-production process with gusto, exploring every possible
element of a theater company's work. The rehearsal scene, in which Gilbert
attends to the details of pacing and the inconvenient absence of two
actors, is hilarious even in its attention to the mundane; a scene of
Gilbert using Japanese women as advisors for cultural authenticity has a
similarly unexpected charm. Leigh even finds drama in the finances of
theater, creating a nice scene in which the theater's manager (Ron
Cook) negotiates salary with featured performer George Grossmith (Martin
Savage). You know a film-maker is doing something write when he can wring
comedy out of a wardrobe session, and drama out of whether or not a song
will be cut from the production.
     It would be easy to embrace TOPSY-TURVY unreservedly if Leigh seemed
to know what to cut from his own production. Even at 160 minutes, the film
never seems tedious; it does, however, seem unnecessarily meandering.
There are detours into Sullivan's European trip to recharge his batteries,
brief explorations of Gilbert's contentious relationship with his mother
and a late surge of sympathy for Gilbert's perpetually abandoned wife
(Lesley Manville). Leigh also goes overboard in the inclusion of musical
numbers, giving us full-scale recreations of at least a half-dozen songs
from three different productions. While the inclusion of some Gilbert and
Sullivan work would seem necessary as context, Leigh takes too much
liberty with the length and breadth of his musical interludes. By the end
of TOPSY-TURVY, you may feel you've sat through "Princess Aida" and "The
Mikado" in their entirety.
     In most films, the extra weight would probably have sunk the whole
endeavor. Blessedly, TOPSY-TURVY is that rare film that gets better with
every passing minute, building to that enchanting final hour of
preparation for production. Still more blessedly, Leigh has put together
another superb cast to give the scenes as much bite as possible, including
Leigh veterans like Alison Steadman (LIFE IS SWEET) and Timothy Spall
(SECRETS & LIES). Most blessedly of all, he has Allan Corduner and Jim
Broadbent in his lead roles giving two of the best performances of the
year. Broadbent's Gilbert has a bit more to work with -- and hence the
showier part -- but Corduner's more amiable, artistic integrity-bound
Sullivan is a delight as well. Leigh covers a lot of ground in TOPSY-TURVY
-- perhaps, ultimately, too much -- but he has the good sense to come back
around to the good stuff. The result is a biography as singular as Leigh
himself: messy, insightful and, of course, very human.

Title
Review for Cure, The (1995)
     There is a scene in THE CURE in which two boys face down a trio
of taunting bullies.  One of the boys has AIDS; the other boy, who
earlier in the film had been afraid of catching the disease, is now
his best friend.  The newly-enlightened boy lectures the bullies
about how the disease could have happened to anyone, and the
chastened bullies walk away.  You might not be surprised to find
such a scene in a movie like THE CURE, but you probably would be
surprised to find it only twenty minutes into the film.  While it is
exceptionally well-acted, THE CURE rambles on for far too long
without a sense of purpose, like an attempt to stretch an
"Afterschool Special" into a feature film.
     Brad Renfro plays Erik, a young loner coping with the absence
of his father and an alcoholic mother (Diana Scarwid).  His new
neighbor is Dexter (Joseph Mazzello), a boy who contracted the AIDS
virus from a blood transfusion, and his mother (Annabella Sciorra).
Although Erik is initially confrontational, the two boys without any
other friends soon develop a close friendship.  Among the activities
they share is an attempt of their own to find a cure for the fatal
disease, and when Erik sees an article in a tabloid newspaper about
a "miracle cure" found in Louisiana, he becomes determined to get it
for Dexter.  Leaving their home in Minnesota, Erik and Dexter travel
south in an attempt to find the key to saving Dexter's life.
     To THE CURE's credit, the most important thing about it, the
relationship between Erik and Dexter, is also the best thing about
it.  Brad Renfro, who made an impressive debut in THE CLIENT, has
the more dynamic role of Erik, the cocky inveterate liar.  There is
an edge to his acting which is uncommon in younger actors who
generally seem to eager to have the audience adore them, and he uses
that to his advantage as the troubled young man in need of a friend.
Mazzello is more than equal to him, granting Erik his tall tales and
half-baked explanations like only young best friends do.  Their
rapport is genuine and very touching, and complemented by the fine
supporting work of Diana Scarwid and Annabella Sciorra as their
mothers.  Sciorra in particular has some great moments as she
becomes a kind of surrogate mother to Erik.
     What sabotages the emotional impact of their friendship is THE
CURE's clumsy and episodic story arc.  By the time the
aforementioned scene between Erik, Dexter and the three bullies
occurs, everyone in the story who is really going to do any changing
has already changed.  There is nothing to do with them but send them
off on a series of adventures, some of which are mildly interesting
but don't really have a dramatic purpose.  While Erik and Dexter are
well-acted and sympathetic characters, at a certain point it becomes
clear that all we are really going to be doing for the rest of THE
CURE's running time is waiting for Dexter to die.
     And what a wait it is.  There is manipulation, and then there
is what THE CURE traffics in, a lingering conclusion in the hospital
which attempts to pull the tears out of you with an industrial
strength vacuum cleaner.  It seems as though screenwriter Robert
Kuhn had an idea for a drama about AIDS and a drama about two
friends on a journey, but neither one was long enough independently
to turn into a feature.  The problem is that THE CURE says nothing
new about AIDS, and bails out on the potentially intriguing
connection of absent fathers between the two boys.  We never learn
anything about where Dexter's father is, and the anticipated meeting
between Erik and his father in New Orleans never materializes.  It's
a shame, because director Peter Horton (TV's "thirtysomething") has
a deft touch with much of the film's potentially pathos-inducing
material.  But when you're playing the AIDS card, you had better
have a really strong hand.  THE CURE has one solid pair of aces, and
a lot of spaces.

Title
Review for Love & Basketball (2000)
LOVE AND BASKETBALL
(New Line)
Starring:  Omar Epps, Sanaa Lathan, Alfre Woodard, Dennis Haysbert, Debbi
Morgan, Harry J. Lennix, Erika Ringor.
Screenplay:  Gina Prince-Bythewood.
Producers:  Spike Lee and Sam Kitt.
Director:  Gina Prince-Bythewood.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Love for the game of basketball -- and for women's basketball in
particular -- fills virtually every frame of Gina Price-Bythewood's LOVE
AND BASKETBALL. The first-time filmmaker grasps the frustrations of female
athletes struggling against societal expectations and limited
opportunities to make their passion part of their lives. She gets inside
the head of a basketball player as she makes split-second game decisions. 
She even does something I never expected to see in a sports film,
something that sent this hoops purist into a rapture: She has her heroine
win a big game not by taking the last shot, but by taking an offensive
foul.
     Yes, Gina Price-Bythewood knows her ball, and she knows the
psychology of women who love the game. She knows them well enough that it
makes up for the sluggish narrative to which she attaches them. The story
begins in 1981, where the Wright family moves in next door to the McCall
family in their Los Angeles neighborhood. Middle-school hoops junkies
Quincy McCall (Glenndon Chatman) and Monica Wright (Kyla Pratt) instantly
develop a competitive love-hate relationship, one that reaches full bloom
when Quincy (Omar Epps) and Monica (Sanaa Lathan) excel for their high
school teams. That relationship turns more to love than hate in college,
but their personal lives begin colliding with their hoop dreams. While
Quincy's desire to follow in his father Zeke's (Dennis Haysbert) footsteps
to the NBA is complicated by a startling revelation, Monica's professional
aspirations collide with notions of femininity espoused by her housewife
mother (Alfre Woodard) and even Quincy himself.
     LOVE AND BASKETBALL gets off to an appealing start with the
adolescent tug-of-war between Quincy and Monica. There's a nice scene in
which the two 11-year-olds go from first kiss to knock-down brawl in the
space of a few seconds, neatly summarizing the competitiveness that will
sabotage their mutual attraction. Price-Bythewood is interested most
strongly in the second-class status of women athletes, and the fierce 
attitude Monica develops as she struggles with the tacit disapproval of
her mother and the awareness that her quest to be a pro may be over before
it begins. Sanaa Lathan does a wonderful job as Monica, capturing the
moping tomboy, the uncertain teenager and the ever-more-confident athlete
with strength and grace. It takes a special performance to lend
credibility to wild swings of emotion. Lathan nails every twist in
Monica's life journey.
     Monica is such a dynamic individual presence that she overwhelms
almost everything else in LOVE AND BASKETBALL. In theory, the film follows
the careers of both Quincy and Monica equally, but it's always evident
where Price-Bythewood's heart is. Quincy's character is far less
interesting from the outset, since he's already a high school star. When
Quincy and Monica get together, Price-Bythewood lets Quincy off the hook
by not exploring the blow to his ego when Monica's fortunes begin to
eclipse his own. Nearly every time Quincy or his family are drawn into the
story, there's a palpable loss of energy, a more predictable arc to the
drama. The "love" part of LOVE AND BASKETBALL starts to feel tacked on for
the sake of convention. Making it a story with two equal protagonists
repeatedly makes it evident that Price-Bythewood doesn't understand Quincy
nearly as well as she understands Monica.
     LOVE AND BASKETBALL is structured in four time period segments over
some dozen years, each segment identified as a basketball "quarter." By
the time the film draws to a close after two hours, you may feel as though
it has gone into at least one overtime. Gina Price-Bythewood builds a
sense of the epic into the relationship between Quincy and Monica, but
there's always the sense that it would have been much more effective as a
smaller, more intimate story. It's a very good film when it focuses on one
woman's attempt to create a happy personal life that also includes the
game she loves; it's pretty mediocre when it tries ineffectively to give
equal time to the men. It may be my long-standing affinity for women's
basketball talking, but I wanted a film about the one character in which
the filmmaker clearly had the most emotional investment. Women finally
have a basketball league of their own; it shouldn't have been too much to
ask to give them a basketball movie of their own.

Title
Review for Pelican Brief, The (1993)
Starring:  Julia Roberts, Denzel Washington, Sam Shepard, John Heard,
           Tony Goldwyn, Robert Culp, John Lithgow.
Screenplay/Director:  Alan J. Pakula.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE PELICAN BRIEF has a lot in common with this summer's THE
FIRM.  Of course, both are based on uberbestsellers by John Grisham,
but the similarities run deeper than that.  THE FIRM starred
Hollywood's most marketable male star, Tom Cruise; THE PELICAN BRIEF
grabbed the most marketable female star, Julia Roberts.  Both were
directed by "prestige" directors, and both were constructed from the
"slicker is better" model of thriller-making.  In short, THE PELICAN
BRIEF might as well *be* THE FIRM:  an overlong, over-plotted,
instantly forgettable entertainment sporadically enlivened by decent
supporting performances.  Unfortunately, it doesn't have Gene Hackman.
     THE PELICAN BRIEF opens with the assassination of two Supreme
Court justices who appear to have little in common, one an aging
liberal and the other a young conservative.  However, a possible link
is discovered by Darby Shaw (Julia Roberts), a law student at Tulane
University.  Through her law professor/lover Thomas Callahan (Sam
Shepard), Darby's theory, which comes to be known as "The Pelican
Brief," is circulated in Washington.  Among its implications are
possible connections between the assassinations and the president
(Robert Culp), and suddenly people start turning up dead.  A frightened
Darby turns to Gray Grantham (Denzel Washington), a White House
reporter investigating the assassinations, and soon the two are running
for their lives, desperately searching for proof of their theory before
they too are added to the growing body count.
     Technically, THE PELICAN BRIEF is just fine.  Director Alan J.
Pakula (ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN, PRESUMED INNOCENT) knows how to
ratchet up the tension, using pull-back crane shots to heighten the
sense of paranoia.  James Horner's score works well, even if it does
depend overmuch on dissonant piano chords and wood block percussion.
The problem with THE PELICAN BRIEF, the movie, is the same thing that's
wrong with THE PELICAN BRIEF, the book:  there's not a single
interesting or original thing happening, either from a story or
character perspective.  The big conspiracy at the heart of the story is
both insipid and insulting to one's intelligence.  It's impossible to
accept that no one considered the possibility of spacing out the
assassinations, or being slightly more creative than putting a bullet
in the head of a man who was on a respirator.  There's only one
possible reason for such stupidity:  there wouldn't have been anything
for a clever law student to sniff out.  It's equally ludicrous to
suggest that no one else in Federal law enforcement would have
considered the possibilities Darby Shaw comes up with.  Grisham's story
is loaded with implausibilities and the payoff it offers for accepting
them is simply not worth it.
     The characters in Pakula's adaptation don't fare much better.
Julia Roberts chose Darby Shaw as her first role in two years, but it's
difficult to figure out why.  There is not a shred of back story,
nothing to suggest why she pursues the assassination story, nothing to
make her anything but a positively bland lady in distress.  To her
credit, Roberts' reaction to an explosion is gripping, and she's
thoroughly convincing at suggesting dazed trauma, but dazed and
traumatized is about as fara as this role goes.  Denzel Washington, one
of the most talented and charismatic leading men around, has an equally
blank slate with Gray Grantham; somehow he manages to act circles
around a part where there's really nothing there.  Up and down the cast
it's the same story:  Tony Goldwyn is the President's shadowy Chief of
Staff; John Lithgow is Washington's skeptical editor; Stanley Tucci is
the icy killer.  Only Hume Cronyn, in a single scene as the aging
justice Rosenberg, has any spark.  No one else has a thing to work
with.
     THE FIRM was no piece of art, but at least its characters were
reasonably fleshed out for the screen.  THE PELICAN BRIEF asked me to
sit through nearly two and a half hours of repetitive chases involving
people I didn't care about.  A third Grisham adaptation, THE CLIENT, is
on its way next year.  I suppose it's too much to ask that he's learned
to write an interesting story by now.

Title
Review for Basquiat (1996)
Starring:  Jeffrey Wright, Michael Wincott, Benicio Del Toro, Claire
Forlani, David Bowie, Gary Oldman, Dennis Hopper.
Screenplay:  Julian Schnabel.
Director:  Julian Schnabel.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Yes, I understand:  happy artists do not exactly make for compelling
drama.  Still, you have to admit that the Cult of the Tortured Artist
seems to have more adherents in Hollywood than Scientology.  Van Gogh in
LUST FOR LIFE...tortured.  Toulouse-Lautrec in MOULIN ROUGE...tortured.
Mozart in AMADEUS, Beethoven in IMMORTAL BELOVED, Rimbaud in TOTAL
ECLIPSE...call in Torquemada.  So why is it that BASQUIAT feels so
completely unique?  Perhaps it is because, for a change, its principal
character is portrayed as a tortured human being first and foremost.  Art
is connected to his suffering, but he does not suffer for his art.
     This measured approach is surprising not just because write-director
Julian Schnabel is a first-time film-maker, or because he was a friend of
the film's subject, Haitian-American artist Jean-Michel Basquiat (Jeffrey
Wright), but because Schnabel himself is an artist of no small renown.  It
has been a characteristic of the works of artists-turned-auteurs
(including Andy Warhol's and the ugly recent example of Robert Longo's
JOHNNY MNEMONIC) that you could expect to find very little beyond the
images.  Schnabel does create some extremely arresting images, including a
sharp opening title sequence underscored by The Pogues, but he has also
left no doubt that this is a film about _someone_, about some_thing_.  He
tells of Basquiat's days as a homeless teen-ager in the late 70s, living
in a cardboard box in New York and creating graffiti art with the
recognizable tag of "SAMO."  He is "discovered" by writer Rene Ricard
(Michael Wincott), who introduces Basquiat into the circles of art dealers
like Bruno Bischofberger (Dennis Hopper) and gallery owners like Mary
Boone (Parker Posey).  Before he even realizes it, Basquiat is the toast
of the New York art scene, and even becomes a close friend of Andy Warhol
(David Bowie).  But Basquiat's success changes him very little -- an
unfortunate situation, since he is a drug addict haunted by his
institutionalized mother (Hope Clarke).
     BASQUIAT is a film full of vibrant characters, none more so than
Jean-Michel Basquiat himself.  Jeffrey Wright, a Tony Award-winning stage
actor, gives a stunning performance as Basquiat, a lonely wraith who
always seems to be hovering just on the edge of coherence.  Schnabel
portrays him as a man who doesn't know how unhappy he is until he realizes
that fame isn't making him any happier, that it has changed nothing.
There is a series of wonderful scenes in which Basquiat, already a force
in the art world, is treated as just another black man to be viewed with
suspicion; in the best of them, he defiantly buys lunch for an entire
table of white businessmen.  But Schnabel also manages to show how
absurdly easy art came to Basquiat.  Indeed, when he is creating is the
only time he does not seem to be suffering.  Schnabel's direction and
Wright's wrenching work present a sad man whose brilliance can't save him.
     It is also impressive that Schnabel is savvy and confident enough to
acknowledge the flaws of his own milieu, and the perceptions of the
general public towards that milieu.  BASQUIAT opens with a quote from
Ricard about the art world's paranoia about overlooking The Next Big
Thing:  "Nobody wants to miss the Van Gogh boat."  The battle to represent
Basquiat is sometimes presented in melodramatic terms, with the artist
forgetting the little people as he hits the big time, but Schnabel doesn't
gloss over the cult of personality of the art world.  He adds the year's
second superb portrayal of Andy Warhol, with David Bowie perhaps providing
even more clever detachment than Jared Harris's work in I SHOT ANDY
WARHOL.  Watch also for a marvelous scene in which Christopher Walken
plays a journalist interviewing Basquiat, trying to bait him with subtle
jabs at abstract modern art; he speaks for everyone convinced that art is
an elaborate con.
     There are a few clumsy moments in the structure of BASQUIAT, notably
the presentation of his relationship with another aspiring artist (Claire
Forlani), and the first half of the film is rather sluggishly paced.
Still, for a newcomer to film, Julian Schnabel is remarkably assured.  He
knows his subject, and he knows the story he wants to tell.  BASQUIAT is
not about art as torture.  It is about creation as escape, and Schnabel
captures the vision of a tragic genius while refusing to diminish his life
with as simplistic an epithet as "tortured artist."

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
LIVING OUT LOUD
(New Line)
Starring:  Holly Hunter, Danny DeVito, Queen Latifah, Martin Donovan.
Screenplay:  Richard LaGravenese.
Producers:  Michael Shamberg, Danny DeVito and Stacey Sher.
Director:  Richard LaGravenese.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, drug use, brief nudity)
Running Time:  93 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Judith Moore Nelson (Holly Hunter) is a woman sort of on the verge of
a nervous breakdown.  On the surface she appears to have it all, from a
professional career as a nurse to a spacious Manhattan co-op apartment.
Underneath, she's still reeling from her husband (Martin Donovan) leaving
her for a younger woman.  Alone in her apartment, she fantasizes about
committing suicide; sitting alone in a restaurant, she fantasizes about
being invited into the company of two friendly women.  Living single has
left Judith frazzled, overwhelmed and unsure what her next step in life is
going to be.
     No, it's not the plot for an episode of "Ally McBeal," though it sure
seems like it at times.  Writer and first-time director Richard
LaGravenese sets up LIVING OUT LOUD as a wistful comedy about adults
reaching a point in their lives where they wonder if it's too late to make
up for their bad decisions.  In addition to Judith, we meet Pat (Danny
DeVito), the elevator operator in Judith's building and a man with
problems of his own.  Divorced and coping with the recent death of his
young daughter, Pat is a big dreamer perpetually just one step ahead of
complete financial ruin.  When Judith actually strikes up a conversation
with him one evening and the two begin spending time together, we get to
see the power of simple companionship for people who need a break from the
company of their own thoughts.
     At least initially, it appears that LIVING OUT LOUD is going to
balance the stories of its two main characters, and that's when the film
is at its best.  DeVito's performance may be his best screen work to date,
finding the romanticism at the heart of Pat's irresponsibility.  Playing a
decent guy is one of an actor's toughest challenges, but DeVito makes Pat
a genuinely decent guy who's also an interesting guy.  With Queen Latifah
added to the mix as a singer with unique relationship issues, there's an
earthy counter-point for Hunter's nervous energy.
     The importance of that counter-point is only truly evident when it's
gone.  At 93 minutes, LIVING OUT LOUD feels strangely incomplete, perhaps
because Pat vanishes into the background in the final half of the film and
Judith takes over completely.  Unfortunately, a little of Judith goes a
long way.  While it's easy to sympathize with her situation, it's much
harder to sympathize with her, because -- to put it bluntly -- she grows
annoying to spend time with.  Holly Hunter is a very talented actress, but
here she acts with mannerisms instead of finding the character's emotional
center.  She plays Judith like an alien investigating the world -- an
interesting choice for a character in existential crisis, but one that
underlines things rather than letting them unfold.  In nearly every scene,
you can see Hunter's acting muscles bulging and flexing.
     LIVING OUT LOUD still manages to be somewhat satisfying, largely
thanks to DeVito and LaGravenese.  For a writer making his first venture
into directing, LaGravenese shows a solid cinematic sensibility, though he
does also let the camera linger on people delivering dialogue.  It's
wonderful to find a writer actually writing for grown-ups, and some of his
tart lines and absurdist fantasy situations are fun in bits and pieces,
but ultimately LIVING OUT LOUD is a frustrating experience.  It could have
been an off-beat love story, or even an off-beat friendship story -- in
either case, a story about two people who help each other stop living
inside their dreams and start living out loud.  Instead, it's primarily
about the contributions other people make to one quirky woman finding
herself.  All that's missing is a computer-generated baby dancing to
"Hooked on a Feeling."

Title
Review for Josh and S.A.M. (1993)
     Every once in a while, I come upon a movie where I simply can't
get beyond the basic premise; as well as certain individual elements
might be executed, I'm so turned off by that premise that I can't
possibly enjoy the film.  Such was the case with last year's RADIO
FLYER, where children in a dysfunctional household were used as the
launching pad for an adventure.  Now comes JOSH AND S.A.M., similarly
focused on the exploits of two troubled kids, and again my rejection
mechanism kicked in.  There is some charm to be found in the
performances, but overall it simply depressed me, and wrapped up a
disturbing package far too neatly.
     JOSH AND S.A.M. is the story of two children struggling to cope
with their parents' divorce.  12-year-old Josh (Jacob Tierney) is a shy
computer whiz who prefers living with mom; 8-year-old Sam (Noah Fleiss)
is a fight-prone daydreamer who enjoys time with dad (Stephen
Tobolowsky).  On one visit with their father's new family in Florida
tensions boil over between the brothers, and Josh convinces Sam that
he's a Strategically Altered Mutant, or S.A.M.  Josh uses the deception
in an attempt to run away, but instead the boys end up on the road
together, depending on each other and a friendly hitchhiker (Martha
Plimpton).
     JOSH AND S.A.M. hinges on the fact that Sam almost immediately
believes the improbable story that he is a genetically engineered
fighter, the evidence consisting of "documents" that Josh has mocked up
on his father's computer.  It's a stretch to accept that Sam would buy
such a ridiculous concept, especially when he knows his brother is so
adept with computers.  Screenwriter Frank Deese attempts to bypass this
plausibility problem by having Sam say that the "fact" that he is an
S.A.M. explains why he thinks about being dead all the time.  Suddenly
JOSH AND S.A.M. becomes the tale of a cruel prank perpetrated on a
deeply disturbed little boy, and it becomes extremely unpleasant to
watch.  These problems are further compounded when JOSH AND S.A.M. aims
for an inappropriately upbeat conclusion.  The two children are
repeatedly treated with cruelty and inconsideration by their parents
and extended families, and these issues are almost completely glossed
over.  Dad makes a relatively sincere apology, but for a film which
uses serious family problems to set up its hijinks, it's
disappointingly timid in dealing with the repercussions.
     Its dark undertones are not the only problem with JOSH AND S.A.M.,
however.  A certain amount of contrivance is practically required in
capers such as this, but JOSH AND S.A.M. really pushes the envelope.
The event which forces Josh to run is a strained sequence involving
Chris Penn as a drunken Texan, and he really doesn't work.  Most
baffling is the role played by Martha Plimpton, an ill-defined runaway
who appears and disappears without leaving any recognizable imprint on
the story.  Somewhere in that character was a relevant back-story, but
it never made it to the screen.  There is even a tossed-off attempt to
make her a romantic interest for Josh, which is raised and resolved in
under five minutes of screen time.  JOSH AND S.A.M asks for far too
much leeway, and offers far too little reward in return.
     As disturbed and disappointed as I was in the story, I have to
acknowledge the appeal of the two lead performances.  Jacob Tierney is
very good as the bright and resourceful Josh, best of all in the
obligatory "fool the stupid cop" sequence, and Noah Fleiss brings real
heartbreak to the truly confused Sam.  The two are convincing brothers
throughout, and I liked the rapport between them.  Still, I found
myself dwelling on its handling of a serious subject matter in a manner
I found inappropriate.  There is no such thing as an objective review,
but in this case I can't even pretend otherwise.  I found nothing fun
about watching two kids in desperate need of therapy taking a joy
ride.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
U-571
(Universal)
Starring:  Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi,
Thomas Kretschmann, Jake Weber, Jack Noseworthy, David Keith.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery and David Ayer.
Producers:  Dino de Laurentiis and Martha de Laurentiis.
Director:  Jonathan Mostow.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'll tell you how U-571 ends: The good guys win. I'll let on another
key piece of information: When two characters are engaged in conversation
during a non-combat moment, you can bet your life that there should be a
bright red neon sign beneath the characters' faces that flashes the word
"FORESHADOWING" over and over again. We know the villains are villains
because they mow down unarmed survivors with their deck guns; we know the
heroes are heroes because they'll even save the lives of one of the
villains. Moral complexity? Psychology? Subtext? Who has time for 'em? 
U-571 is a relentless plot machine. It's narrative film-making stripped
down to the barest essentials: a plot, people to move the plot forward and
a director to set the pace.
     The director in this case happens to be Jonathan Mostow, who
previously helmed the relentless plot machine called BREAKDOWN. And he's
very good at wringing every last drop of adrenaline out of his propulsive, 
generic tales. U-571 wrinkles history a bit to tell the story of an
American mission to nab an Enigma code device -- which had been allowing
German U-boats to pick their way through the North Atlantic fleet with
little resistance -- from a crippled U-boat. The crew of an American
submarine gets the job, including just-passed-over-for-a-command Lt. Andy
Tyler (Matthew McConaughey). Posing as part of a German supply crew, the
Americans manage to subdue their German counterparts. In fact, that turns
out to be the easy part of the mission, as a torpedo to the American sub
leaves her crew trapped on U-571.
     The emphasis should be on the word "crew," because it's not
particularly easy -- or, in fact, necessary -- to distinguish between
individual crew members. Since McConaughey and Harvey Keitel (as Chief) 
are the most recognizable faces, they get a few moments of individual
character development. The rest of the bunch either play necessary plot
roles -- the radio operator (Jack Noseworthy) keeps us up to date on
exactly how close to disaster our protagonists are; the vaguely unsavory
military intelligence operative (Jake Weber) is around to remind us they
must succeed or die trying -- or have endearing nicknames like Tank,
Rabbit or Trigger. I have now effectively put as much time into 
delineating the individual characters as the screenwriters did. For two
hours, they are asked to scramble about madly trying to keep the sub from
sinking. Thank you for your time, Mr. Noseworthy, and here's your check.
     Ordinarily, an action film with such a minimal concern for its human
beings sets me to slumping despairingly in my seat. Mostow, on the other
hand, has a knack for keeping me on the edge of it. U-571 takes us from
one almost-impossible situation to another, never allowing the film to
rest long enough for the whole enterprise to seem shallow. There would
seem to be only so many ways to make spraying water, shuddering submarines
and nautical maneuvers exciting, but Mostow finds every one of them. You
know you're in the hands of a gifted action film-maker when you find
yourself watching scenes that should have you scoffing, but instead have
you cringing in anticipation. There's not a reason in the world to care
about any of the people on board U-571, except as representations of our
noble fighting men. Mostow managed to keep me enthralled in the fate of a
sub full of puppets.
     Of course it would have been preferable for U-571 to seem a bit more
concerned with men under fire. In a way it's a throwback to the World War
II films of a bygone era, interested primarily in waving the flag for the
bravery of those who whipped Jerry into submission. Circa 2000, you can
also add big-budget special effects and killer sound to the mix (do
yourself a favor and see it in a theater that will have you shrinking from
the straining walls). And you can add Jonathan Mostow, a director who's
never going to be confused with Eric Rohmer when it comes to exploring the
nuances of the human condition. The man can keep you hanging on to your
armrests, though, and that's a rare talent. U-571 doesn't take its sub to
any great depths. It just keeps the boat rockin'.

Title
Review for Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994)
Starring:  Hugh Grant, Andie MacDowell, Kristin Scott Thomas, Simon Callow,
           James Fleet, Charlotte Coleman.
Screenplay:  Richard Curtis.
Director:  Mike Newell.
     Where romantic comedy is concerned, I am a tough sell.  Too many
of them seem to put across the impression that all you need to do is
put two people on the screen and have them end up together, regardless
of whether or not they are developed with an interesting conflict (or
even speak to one another, as in the monstrously overhyped SLEEPLESS IN
SEATTLE).  I'm not going to turn into a pile of goo every time I see a
screen kiss, but I will respond if I've spent two hours with two
well-developed characters who seem to belong together.  The new British
comedy FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL delivers only halfway.  Hugh Grant
turns in a charming, star-making performance in this uneven character
piece, but Andie MacDowell always appears to be more of a prop than a
person.
     Grant stars as Charles, an inveterate bachelor who seems to find
himself going to a friend's wedding every weekend.  At one of these
weddings, he spots a beautiful American named Carrie (Andie MacDowell),
and finds himself instantly smitten.  Their encounter is brief, but
leaves him wondering about his own desire for a lasting relationship,
and his ability to make it succeed.  Then, to Charles' surprise, he
meets Carrie again, at yet another wedding.  However, there is an
impediment to his affections:  Carrie is engaged.  While their flame
smolders throughout their periodic meetings, Charles is ultimately left
to deal with his own fears and to make some difficult decisions about
what he really wants.
     FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL was written by Richard Curtis,
co-creator of the popular British television import "Black Adder," a
series not renowned for its sentimentality.  And FOUR WEDDINGS is
extremely winning when it's not focusing on relationships.  The film is
loaded with goofy moments--Charles the best man frantically trying to
improvise for the forgotten wedding rings in the first ceremony; "Black
Adder" vet Rowan Atkinson as a nervous novice priest malapropping his
way through the second wedding; Charles trapped in a room with two
newlyweds with impressive stamina.  There are enough of these lively
set pieces that FOUR WEDDINGS rarely lags for too long, and the laughs
come at fairly regular intervals.
     It is when Curtis shifts to his characters that he stumbles.  Part
of the problem is that in an attempt to create yet another ensemble
friends piece he overloads the film with supporting characters, giving
short shrift to the crucial relationship between Charles and Carrie.
What's worse, almost all of the friends are drawn in only the
sketchiest of terms; characters like Charles' cynical friend Fiona
(Kristin Scott Thomas) and flatmate Scarlett (Charlotte Coleman) are
given a few lines to establish their particular romantic dilemma, then
sent to fade into the background.  Only James Fleet, as befuddled
aristocrat Tom, provides any spark to the proceedings.  The simple fact
is that I kept losing track of the relationships between all these
people, and didn't particularly care when I could figure them out.
     This lack of focus is inexcusable considering the cursory
treatment Carrie's character is given.  Part of FOUR WEDDINGS AND A
FUNERAL's message about love is that we should all be looking for that
one person who makes "lightning strike," and while the romantic
sentiment is laudable it also assumes that we as an audience should
recognize it when we see it.  Hugh Grant, looking frighteningly like
Harold Lloyd in his horn-rims, is an absolute delight; he turns Charles
into a wonderful, funny, fallible character, and we want to see him
happy.  But Carrie is simply a plot device.  We know virtually nothing
about her except that Charles has a crush on her, and Andie MacDowell
is not subtle enough an actress to fill in the blanks.  It also might
have been helpful to understand Charles' romantic history better, which
could have been accomplished through a more complete picture of
ex-girlfriend Henrietta, but that too is absent.  There is much to
recommend FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL as a comedy; it's bright and
spirited and well-paced.  As a romance, it leaves much to be
desired ... primarily a second party for the romantic pairing.

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
Starring:  Matthew McConaughey, Sandra Bullock, Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin
Spacey, Brenda Fricker, Oliver Platt, Charles S. Dutton, Ashley Judd.
Screenplay:  Akiva Goldsman.
Director:  Joel Schumacher.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
Opens Wednesday, July 24 in wide release.
     This just in:  Matthew McConaughey has already won the 1997 Best
Actor Oscar, will be on the cover of every magazine published in the
English language, and has been named Time's Man of the Year.  Those
suggestions should be absurd, but the way Warner Bros. is pushing John
Grisham's anointed one, they're merely the next logical step.  It's one
thing to be the Flavor of the Month, but McConaughey has become the Flavor
of Next Month, a star without a previous starring role.  That's a rather
unfair burden to place on an actor, but now that A TIME TO KILL is finally
here, it looks like the talent is up to the hype.  Leading an exceptional
cast, Matthew McConaughey helps create some riveting moments in an
occasionally melodramatic story.
     McConaughey plays Jake Brigance, a young lawyer in Canton,
Mississippi struggling to keep his practice afloat.  With bills to pay and
a family to support, Jake needs a big case, and he is about to find one.
Following the rape of a 10-year-old black girl by two white men, the
girl's father, Carl Lee Hailey (Samuel L. Jackson) guns the two men down
before their arraignment, and now faces first-degree murder charges.  And
if it isn't bad enough that Hailey is a black man accused of murdering two
white men, he faces an ambitious district attorney (Kevin Spacey) who is
cozy with the trial judge (Patrick McGoohan).  Jake takes the case,
assisted only by law student Ellen Roark (Sandra Bullock), but a lack of
resources may be the least of his problems when the brother of one of the
murdered men (Kiefer Sutherland) sets out to teach Jake -- and anyone
close to him -- a lesson.
     There is a fundamental problem which prevents A TIME TO KILL from
being a truly exceptional film, and it comes down to three letters:  KKK.
White supremacists are the Nazis of the 90s; film makers love them because
they know we love to hate them, and because they don't have to worry about
anyone protesting if they are portrayed as hissable cartoons.  But somehow
it detracts from the racial tensions at the heart of A TIME TO KILL to
have cross-burning, linen-wearing good ol' boys at the center of them.
There are plenty of complex issues involved in the story of A TIME TO
KILL, foremost among them the criminal justice system's entrenched racial
inequities, but director Joel Schumacher and his frequent screenwriting
collaborator Akiva Goldsman can't resist the impulse to be crowd-pleasers,
providing plenty of moments for audience members to applaud Klansmen being
beaten, spit upon, arrested or otherwise mocked, all underscored by Elliot
Goldenthal's strident strings.
     It is too bad that A TIME TO KILL needed the sneering evil and
repetitive cruelty of overt racists like Sutherland's character, and even
the poorly developed sub-plot involving the involvement of the NAACP,
because it is so much better at exploring its more three-dimensional
characters.  Samuel L. Jackson is superb as Carl Lee, a shaken man trying
to get some small piece of his life back.  Goldsman gives him a great
speech late in the film in which he forces Jake to confront his own racist
feelings, and what makes Jackson's delivery so potent is that there is so
little anger in it; he has come to an understanding of the gulf race
places between them.  Sandra Bullock, given an extremely misleading first
billing, turns in what may be her best work yet as the cocky legal prodigy
who smells a ticket to notoriety in the much-publicized case, and there
are memorable supporting turns by Oliver Platt (as a lovably unscrupulous
friend and colleague of Jake's) and Chris Cooper (as a sheriff's deputy
caught in Carl Lee's line of fire) among a handful of others.  A TIME TO
KILL is exceedingly well cast, and the performances sparkle.
     Then there is Matthew McConaughey.  He is being compared to everyone
from Paul Newman to Marlon Brando to Kevin Costner, but none of those
comparisons really does justice to his unique appeal.  There is an
absolute ease to his acting which you almost never see in actors his age
(McConaughey is a ripe old 26), along with a screen presence you rarely
see in actors of any age.  His Jake is a bit of an idealist and a bit of a
scoundrel; it's hard to get inside his head, but it's easy to like him.
And in a film which features a few too many loud and obvious scenes,
McConaughey is absolutely electrifying in a scene which is emotionally
crippling in its quiet power:  Jake describing the rape of Carl Lee's
daughter to the jury in graphic detail.  It is almost possible to accept
that Spacey's savvy prosecutor doesn't object to the obviously
inflammatory remarks.  Perhaps he, like us, was simply transfixed by
witnessing the birth of a star.

Title
Review for Once Were Warriors (1994)
Starring:  Rena Owen, Temuera Morrison, Mamaengaroa Kerr-Bell,
Julian Arahanga, Taungaroa Emile.
Screenplay:  Riwia Brown.
Director:  Lee Tamahori.
     Critics are often heard complaining about the lack of
originality in American filmmaking, about remakes, TV-retreads and
tired concepts dominating the multiplexes.  When Hollywood does
decide to show the audience something it has never seen before, it
is usually technology leading the way (JURASSIC PARK, TERMINATOR 2).
ONCE WERE WARRIORS is a wonderful example of what the movie-going
experience can teach us given the opportunity.  As an examination of
the Maori culture in contemporary New Zealand, ONCE WERE WARRIORS
showed me a world I had never seen before, and up until its overly
melodramatic final half hour, it is a fascinating and unsettling
drama.
     ONCE WERE WARRIORS is the story of the Heke family, people of
Maori descent living in present day Auckland.  Beth (Rena Owen), a
stoic homemaker, faces tremendous family pressures, most dangerously
from her unemployed and frequently abusive husband Jake (Temuera
Morrison).  The children also present problems:  oldest son Nig
(Julian Arahanga) has left home in favor of the company of a Maori
gang; middle son Boogie (Taungaroa Emile) has frequent run-ins with
the law and may be taken away by social services; daughter Grace
(Mamaengaroa Kerr-Bell) dreams of being a writer but is discouraged
by the culture's traditional roles for women.  These pressures
continue to build, until a family tragedy forces Beth to decide if
she can continue to live the same life.
     The first image in ONCE WERE WARRIORS is an idyllic landscape,
which is quickly revealed to be a billboard over a busy highway and
a Maori "ghetto."  Director Lee Tamahori sets up his story as one
far removed from a perhaps-mythic past, and defined by a warrior
culture in a land where the war for survival is fought against less
tangible enemies.  Often poor and treated with disdain by white
authority figures, the Maori turn their aggression inward, in
pointless and explosive barroom brawls and domestic violence.  ONCE
WERE WARRIORS has become a massive box office success in New Zealand
for addressing this culture which accounts for almost 10% of its
population, but it doesn't require a stretch to recognize that it is
a story which translates all too well to stories of America's
economically disadvantaged minority cultures.  It is a specific
story, but in many ways it is also a universal one.
     The specific story is most effective thanks to several powerful
performances.  Rena Owen's Beth is a proud woman whose beauty still
appears in a bright smile on her weathered face, though nearly
twenty years of marriage have beaten her down.  Her love for Jake is
as genuine as her frequent fear and hatred of him, and that conflict
drives the film.  Temuera Morrison is even more complex as Jake,
because he makes a violent drunk appealing enough during his good
moments to make the relationship convincing; he is Fred Flintstone
with a serious attitude.  Mamaengaroa Kerr-Bell, as the ever-more-
pessimistic Grace, is also good, as is Taungaroa Emile as the
troubled Boogie.
     While it is frighteningly real violence which drives ONCE WERE
WARRIORS for much of its running time, pathos unfortunately takes
over in the third act.  There is a drawn-out sequence which gives
everyone a chance to cry and make a speech, and characters start to
speak in platitudes like, "You're still a slave, Jake ... a slave to
your fists" and "I'll wear my (tatoos) on the inside."  By the end,
I was wondering whether Tamahori was taking his cue from Hollywood,
providing a feel-good resolution which tied up loose ends far too
neatly, rather than sticking with the harsh realities of the world
in which he has placed us.  This takes nothing away from everything
that has gone before, however.  ONCE WERE WARRIORS is filled with
memorable images, solid acting and a keen sense of place and
character, but without even realizing it, Tamahori has also told a
story about urban sub-cultures far from his own home.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
     Some scattered thoughts on KISSING A FOOL, a film too aggressively
mediocre to permit much more:
     ...Memo to David Schwimmer and Jason Lee:  it's nice to see that you
wanted to stretch a bit and try change-of-pace roles.  Now quit it.  In
KISSING A FOOL, Schwimmer plays a womanizing sportscaster named Max Abbitt
who thinks he has finally found The One in editor Samantha Andrews (Mili
Avital); Lee plays Max's best friend Jay Murphy, a sensitive writer who
has spent a year moping over the end of a relationship while turning it
into his first novel.  The premise finds sensitive Jay struggling with
insecure Max's request that he test Samantha's fidelity by trying to
seduce her, leading to all sorts of wild hijinks.  
     That is assuming you are willing to suspend your disbelief from the
rafters long enough to buy the puppy-dog Schwimmer as an irresistable sex
machine, or Lee (the abrasive Banky in CHASING AMY) as Mr. Nice Guy.
Schwimmer's rendition of machismo consists of using a certain four-letter
explitive around forty times, while Lee seems to be comfortable only when
he's yelling at somebody (though he can be very funny when he is yelling
at somebody).  Both try so hard to create their own respective anti-image
that they don't create actual characters.
     ...Memo to the American movie-going public:  make Bonnie Hunt a star,
or else.  Hunt, who plays Jay's publisher and narrates the film in
flashback, is simply one of the funniest women in any medium, bringing
life to otherwise lifeless films like ONLY YOU or JUMANJI.  In KISSING A
FOOL, I kept waiting for the action to switch back to Hunt telling the
tale to a couple of annoying party guests, where her unmatched reaction
shots could provide all the zing the script lacked.  Sadly, no one seems
willing to give Hunt a chance to carry a film, which means she's generally
relegated to mop-up duty in supporting roles.  Until we all rise up and
demand a better showcase for this wonderful performer, we'll all have to
sit through films like KISSING A FOOL in order to see her.
     ...Memo to screenwriters of mainstream romantic comedies:  enough
with the coy pretext that everyone in the audience doesn't know exactly
how the story is going to end.  The flashback framing structure of KISSING
A FOOL teases us by not showing us the groom to whom Samantha is getting
married, but I mean _really_.  The set-up is so transparently headed in
one direction that it's insulting to suggest that anyone would guess
incorrectly, not to mention the small fact that Hunt's character makes it
explicitly clear with one comment.  All this playing around with "who's
gonna get the girl," with the accompanying wacky plot machinations,
becomes just a way to pass the time.  
     News flash:  romance is about _chemistry_.  How about giving us a
reason to _care_ who ends up with whom?  How about giving us the faintest
clue who Samantha (the appealing Israeli actress Avital) really is?  How
about a couple more scenes between her and, oh, I don't know, anybody?  If
you judged strictly on the basis of shared scenes, you might think KISSING
A FOOL was a romance between Schwimmer and Lee (shades of CHASING AMY,
anyone?).

Title
Review for Meet Wally Sparks (1997)
     I have to give this to MEET WALLY SPARKS:  if you've ever seen Rodney
Dangerfield before, you're going to get exactly what you expect, and if
you've never seen Rodney Dangerfield before, you have no business being in
the theater.  Dangerfield isn't an actor; he isn't even a personality.  He
is a persona, a leering 70-year-old adolescent who has parlayed not
getting any respect into a career most entertainers would envy.  The irony
in the Dangerfield persona is that he has in fact gained respect, or at
least appreciation, from a generation of young comedians.  MEET WALLY
SPARKS turns out not to be simply a vehicle for Dangerfield to do his
schtick, but a great big tribute in his honor, a dopey but almost reverent
celebration of Rodney at his Rodney-est.
     Dangerfield plays Wally Sparks, the host of a tabloid talk show which
has developed a reputation for being the sleaziest example of a sleazy
genre.  When one advertiser too many pulls out of Wally's show, the
network's president (Burt Reynolds) threatens to give Wally the ax.  Wally
and his producer Sandy (Debi Mazar) plead for a chance to clean the show
up, and it is with that goal in mind that they head to Atlanta for a
chance to meet with conservative Georgia governor Floyd Preston (David
Ogden Stiers) at a fund-raiser for the governor's Senate campaign.  When
Wally is injured in an incident at the party, he feigns being unable to
walk so that he can televise from the governor's mansion and try to get an
interview with the governor.  While the governor and his wife (Cindy
Williams) try to maintain order, Wally turns the house upside down, even
as he helps bring the governor's poll numbers up.
     MEET WALLY SPARKS is an extremely busy movie, which is not the same
as saying that a lot happens.  Even the most die-hard Dangerfield fan must
admit that a little bit of Rodney goes a long way, and the script seems
almost desperate to provide sub-plots which will allow the star to take a
breather.  There is a tangent involving an attempt to blackmail the
governor, a tangent involving a network toadie (Eamonn Roche) who wants
to sink Wally, a romance between Wally's son (Michael Weatherly) and the
governor's daughter (Lisa Thornhill), and sentimental musings about being
a good father on the part of both Wally and the governor.  There really
isn't any point to any of it, except to pad the running time, and at 106
minutes it certainly feels padded.  When it all wraps up -- with a
wedding, no less -- there are going to be a lot of numb buttocks in the
theater.
     I'm not really sure why the even bothered with a plot at all, since
it's all about Rodney.  The 25 minutes which take place at the governor's
fund-raiser set the tone, as Wally wanders through high society like an
even more lecherous Groucho Marx, a walking punch line in search of a
straight line to a gag about sexual potency, sexual frequency, sexual
organs or just good old-fashioned sex.  It is so obvious Rodney's world
that it is almost a shock when anyone else gets a joke (the pratfalls to
which Stiers, Roche and others are subjected notwithstanding).  The rest
of the cast is around to set 'em up, then get out of the way while Rodney
knocks 'em down.
     Or at least taps them over.  There are a couple of genuinely funny
bits in MEET WALLY SPARKS -- in one, Wally inadvertently breaks the
genitalia off a male nude statue, then does a very bad job of hiding it in
his pocket -- but this isn't a film built around comedic creativity.  On
the contrary, it is a tribute to comedic venerability, like a Henny
Youngman performance with half the audience providing the obvious and
familiar double entendre before Rodney can.  The film is so self-aware on
that point that Wally's son gets one scene in which _he_ anticipates the
joke and mouths the punch line.  It's all terribly dumb and predictable,
but it doesn't matter to anyone involved because this is less a Rodney
Dangerfield film than "Rodney Dangerfield: This Is Your Life," with a host
of guest stars turning up to honor the star:  Jay Leno, Roseanne, Tim
Allen, Bob Saget.  Tony Danza and Michael Bolton even turn up to do
Dangerfield impressions, and if you think you've seen it all, you haven't
until you've seen Michael Bolton do Dangerfield.  MEET WALLY SPARKS is
likely to be a snooze to anyone who is not arriving similarly to worship
at the altar of Rodney.  It is a strange experience watching a movie where
everyone in the film, perhaps hoping for Dangerfield's personal
benediction of "Hey, kid, you're all right," seems more interested in
entertaining the star than in entertaining the audience.

Title
Review for Une liaison pornographique (1999)
AN AFFAIR OF LOVE (UNE LIAISON PORNOGRAPHIQUE)
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Nathalie Baye, Sergi Lopez.
Screenplay:  Philippe Blasband.
Producers:  Patrick Quinet, Rolf Schmid, Claude Waringo.
Director:  Frederic Fonteyne.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  77 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
      In the early scenes of AN AFFAIR OF LOVE, two characters appear in
documentary-style interview vignettes. In separate one-on-one interviews,
an off-camera voice prods an unnamed woman (Nathalie Baye) and man (Sergi
Lopez) for information about a relationship that is now clearly some time
in the past. As the interviews are cross-cut with scenes from their actual
meetings, the two voices turn into something akin to a spoken-word version
of "I Remember It Well." They met on-line, she says; they met through a
personals ad in a magazine, he says. They exchanged photos, he says; not
so, says she. Their first sexual encounter was satisfying, she claims with
a smile; a bit disappointing, he recalls. Ah, yes  they remember it well.
     The hazy recollections and unreliable perceptions could have been
played as little more than an amusing conceit, but in AN AFFAIR OF LOVE,
they form the backbone for one of the most stunningly rendered
sort-of-love stories in recent years. A few things do become more-or-less
clear as the story unfolds, despite the differing retrospective accounts. 
The man and woman initially come together to fulfill a mutual, somewhat
unusual sexual fantasy, one that is never explicitly defined. Though the
encounter is initially meant to be a one-time, purely physical event, they
agree to meet again, and again, until they contemplate a more "normal" 
sexual encounter. Eventually, each begins to feel that the relationship
has more potential, even though they do not know each other's name, or
occupation, or anything that, as the woman describes, makes up "what we
normally call our lives."
     It doesn't take a Francophone to recognize that the French title UNE
LIAISON PORNOGRAPHIQUE doesn't exactly translate to AN AFFAIR OF LOVE. 
Indeed, Fine Line Films' American title proves not only to be an obvious
bow to marketing concerns, but a patently absurd take on the development
of the relationship. What begins as a pornographic liaison does mutate,
but it does not mutate into a love affair. AN AFFAIR OF LOVE is a
meditation on what happens to people when they find themselves in a
relationship where they feel no pressure to do what they think they should
do, because the rules have been discarded from the outset. The man and
woman's growing affection builds to a climax that has been telegraphed by
the framing structure -- we know they don't end up together -- yet packs a
wallop because it's not about whether they will end up together. In fact,
the scene is brilliant because it works on two levels: as a tragedy of a
relationship that didn't have to end, and as evidence that neither one
knew the other in any substantial way.
     By all rights, AN AFFAIR OF LOVE should never have worked as anything
more than an intellectual exercise, with a little sex thrown in for spice. 
The characters are defined exclusively within the context of their 
arm's-length relationship, leaving huge chunks of their lives unexplored. 
Yet they still emerge as fascinating and complex people, thanks to a
subtle script by Philippe Blasband and two remarkable performances. Baye
and Lopez play off each other masterfully -- hinting at emotions beneath
the surface, capturing awkward moments with a sensitivity that almost
forces you to look away. Fonteyne pulls it all together with an unfailing
visual sense, and a rhythm that pulls this 77-minute film together without
an ounce of flab.
     The only time AN AFFAIR OF LOVE feels remotely strained in its
presentation involves an episode where the lovers have an encounter with
an estranged elderly couple. It's an unnecessarily obvious counterpoint to
the fantasy world in which they live, one that spells out what any viewer
should understand: that the relationship being explored has nothing to do
with the reality of a life together. Fonteyne says more when he's saying
less, as he does when he leaves his camera at a distance outside the hotel
room door when the lovers are engaged in their mysterious fantasy 
activity. It is the one moment where the two characters come together in
their story; they both respect the privacy and intimacy of the reason they
came together in the first place. The irony of Fine Line's title is that
it plays to the distorted memories of the characters who, over time, have
turned their pornographic affair into an affair of love. Ah, yes  they
remember it well.

Title
Review for Hitman Hart: Wrestling with Shadows (1998) (TV)
SPECIAL NOTE:  Longtime readers will realize that I am breaking with a
longstanding tradition of reviewing only theatrical films.  There is a
very good reason.  Please note the air times listed above and don't miss
this one.
     The best documentaries, like the best art of any kind, have always
been about more than their easily-summarized subject.  HOOP DREAMS may
have been about high school basketball, but it was also about race, class
and the cultural deification of athletics.  Great documentary film-makers
take individual lives and find stories that resonate beyond the
individuals whose lives are being explored.
     HITMAN HART: WRESTLING WITH SHADOWS is set in the world of
professional wrestling, and shame on you if that's enough to keep you from
watching.  Paul Jay's documentary is a brilliant, riveting, touching and
funny biographical study of a man who happens to be a professional
wrestler:  Calgary native Bret "The Hitman" Hart, a 40-year-old, 14-year
veteran of the World Wrestling Federation and heavyweight champion crowd
favorite when we meet him.  Actually, "happens to be a wrestler" may be an
understatement.  In fact, Bret Hart's entire universe is wrestling -- his
father Stu was a pro wrestler and promoter, his seven brothers also became
wrestlers, and his four sisters all married wrestlers.  In interviews with
family members, we see how Stu's old-school style -- twisting opponents
into excruciating submission holds until blood vessels burst in their eyes
-- came to define not just Bret's wrestling persona, but his entire view
of integrity via his relationship with his father.  Manhood meant no
compromise and no submission, inside the ring or out of it.
    This background provides a crucial context for the central story of
Bret's fall from grace within the WWF.  He describes how his virtuous,
heroic Hitman character became passe as anti-heroes like Stone Cold Steve
Austin grew in popularity, leading WWF owner Vince McMahon to engineer
Bret's shift from "good guy" to "bad guy."  Yet even in that role Bret was
able to remain true to himself, becoming a Canadian patriot who criticized
the moral collapse of American society.  Unfortunately, he extended that
criticism to the WWF itself, arguing that the family entertainment
morality plays of the 1980s glory days -- Hulk Hogan urging kids to "say
their prayers and take their vitamins" -- had given way to increasing
vulgarity and the glorification of villains.  And McMahon, needless to
say, was not pleased.
     That conflict sets up a climactic showdown in Montreal between Bret
and the WWF's reigning glamour boy, Shawn Michaels.  Facing the end of his
contract with the WWF -- perhaps due to financial pressure from Ted
Turner's competing WCW, perhaps due to more personal issues -- Bret is
asked to lose the championship match in Canada.  The circumstances leading
up to that request, including Bret's refusal of a sizable raise to jump
ship to the WCW only months earlier out of loyalty to McMahon, leads Bret
to hope there is some way he can leave his home country a winner.  What
follows is as tense and dramatic as any confrontation in any fictional
sports film, this in a "sport" where the outcome is carefully
choreographed ahead of time.  
     Viewers expecting HITMAN HART: WRESTLING WITH SHADOWS to be a
behind-the-scenes expose of the "phony" wrestling world will find that,
but only to a certain extent.  They'll also find a man named Bret Hart who
made the tragic mistake of attaching his identity to a fictional construct
in a multi-million dollar business.  As clearly as Vince McMahon is the
villain of this piece, he also makes one extremely insightful comment
about Bret Hart:  "He forgot that this is sports entertainment."  HITMAN
HART: WRESTLING WITH SHADOWS is a tale of capitalism and personal
integrity, and the extent to which one has anything to do with the other.
It's a human drama, a social satire and a thrilling adventure.  And it is
not, repeat, _not_ "just about wrestling."

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
(Paramount)
Starring:  John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Cromwell, James Woods,
Timothy Hutton, Clarence Williams III.
Screenplay:  Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman, based on the novel
by Nelson DeMille.
Producer:  Mace Neufeld.
Director:  Simon West.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER will probably be the cleverest stupid film
we'll see this year -- or perhaps the stupidest clever film.  It's
confusing to a critic when so much knuckleheaded plotting and ostentatious
direction shares the screen with so much snappy dialogue and crisp
character interaction.  That, however, is what happens when legendary
screenwriter William Goldman takes a pass at an otherwise brutally
predictable conspiracy thriller. The punched-up punch lines are ever on
the verge of convincing you THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER has a brain in its
head, even as the remaining 75% of the narrative punches you in the face
with its lack of common sense.
     Our hero is warrant officer Paul Brenner, a brash investigator for
the U. S. Army's Criminal Investigation Division.  His latest case is the
murder of Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) at a Georgia base,
the victim found tied to the ground after an apparent sexual assault and
strangulation.  Complicating the case is the fact that Capt. Campbell is
the daughter of General Joe Campbell (James Cromwell), a war hero and
potential vice-presidential nominee.  General Campbell wants to keep the
case out of the press, which gives Brenner only the 36 hours before the
FBI steps in.  Teamed with rape investigator Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine
Stowe) -- who, coincidentally enough, once had a romantic relationship
with Brenner -- Brenner begins uncovering dark secrets from the late
captain's past that make the case ever more sordid.
     If only the sordidness were the worst of THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER's
problems.  Scenes of sexual degredation do linger much longer than
necessary, their negligible dramatic value overwhelmed by filtered-light
sleaze.  Director Simon West likely thinks he's covered himself by
juxtaposing these images of violence with sweet flowers, but all he does
is prove himself dependent on visual cliches, which is the film's fatal
flaw.  It's a trend he continues for two hours, taking the story's few
virtues and slapping a coat of moron-proof obviousness over them.
Characters who may (wink wink) turn out to be villains are photographed in
ominous shadow; cutaway inserts of the Captain Campbell's still-living
face after the corpse is uncovered insure against five-minute attention
spans.  West just can't help himself from overdirecting every minute of
THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER.  He even turns a scene of footage shown on CNN
into an excuse for slow-fade edits.
     Bubbling up from this overcooked stew are enough tasty lines to
distract you from its smell.  The slickest scene finds Brenner squaring
off with Captain Campbell's mentor, a psychological warfare expert named
Moore (James Woods).  There's something invigorating about watching two
smart actors playing smart characters firing honesty at one another.
Indeed, Travolta gets to sink his teeth into dozens of choice lines based
on his delight at provoking authority figures (to the local sheriff of the
Georgia county: "Shouldn't you be out night-sticking the colored folk?").
Even the lame device of Brenner and Sunhill's sexual history provides a
few winning zingers.  Goldman's dialogue can serve up a bigger laugh than
you'll find in most so-called comedies.
     Dialogue, unfortunately, just isn't enough to make a quality script.
It's difficult to take a movie about a criminal investigation seriously
when the investigators are both too stupid to solve it sooner (an idiotic
inability to recognize the nature of the crime scene) and too lucky for it
to last any longer (not one but two occasions where Brenner catches a
vital piece of evidence out of the corner of his eye).  By the time THE
GENERAL'S DAUGHTER wanders towards its over-wrought, psycho-in-the-rain
finale, West's heavy hand has obliterated most of what made the film
occasionally fun.  It's silly and pretentious film-making, but at least
it provides a giggle or five.  Goldman should tear the 15 decent pages out
of this script and turn them into a stand-up routine.

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
SLIDING DOORS
(Miramax/Paramount)
Starring:  Gwyneth Paltrow, John Lynch, John Hannah, Jeanne Tripplehorn.
Screenplay:  Peter Howitt.
Producers:  Sydney Pollack, Philippa Braithwaite and William Horberg.
Director:  Peter Howitt.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A woman, just fired from her job as a London public relations
executive, rushes dejectedly towards the Underground, eager to return to
the comfort of home.  A young girl steps into her path for a moment,
impeding the woman's progress just long enough so that she misses the last
train before a long, system-wide delay.  Or does she?  What if the girl
doesn't get in the woman's way, permitting her to make that last train?
How much does that one, seemingly inconsequential variable change the
woman's life?
     SLIDING DOORS is a gimmick film, the gimmick being that it allows us
to watch both alternate courses determined by that one moment.  When Helen
Quilley (Gwyneth Paltrow) makes the train, she meets a charming fellow
named James (John Hannah), and also gets home in time to catch her
layabout live-in boyfriend Gerry (John Lynch) in the middle of a little
afternoon delight with his ex-girlfriend Lydia (Jeanne Tripplehorn).  When
she misses the train, she and Gerry continue together, taking Helen down a
radically different career path.
     SLIDING DOORS works on enough different levels that I wonder whether
it succeeds because of its gimmick or in spite of it.  As a
straightforward relationship comedy, it's generally delightful, crafted by
writer/director Peter Howitt with unusually sharp comic dialogue.  The
principal characters are uniformly well-drawn, from the unsteady
confidence of Paltrow's Helen, to the genial wit of Hannah's James, to the
confused and almost sympathetic philandering of Lynch's Gerry.  Even a
minor supporting performance from Douglas McFerran as James' no-nonsense
best friend shines with energy and humor.  Howitt explores familiar modern
romance territory, but does it with enough intelligence and commitment to
the characters that it feels fresh.
     Of course, he's also playing an extended game of "what if", one which
sometimes intrudes on the perfectly enjoyable conventional narrative.
Though rookie director Howitt handles the interplay between the
story-lines with surprising deftness, the shifts from one plot to the
other often deny both plots momentum.  Nowhere is this more evident than
during a pair of climactic confrontations, where Howitt cuts back and
forth to the point of distraction.  He may be intending to build tension,
but instead he builds frustration, using neck-stapping editing to show the
pivotal moments occurring simultaneously while sacrificing dramatic
urgency.  A version of SLIDING DOORS which offered a simple,
smartly-written romantic triangle might have been just as winning without
all the fuss.
     It's also true that something would have been lost.  Though at first
glance SLIDING DOORS seems to flirt with the celebration of fate and
destiny so popular in recent love stories, Howitt offers something a bit
more thought-provoking than that.  By allowing us to get to know the
characters -- and Helen in particular -- as well as he does, he gives us
much more reason to believe that destiny is simply the tendency of people
to act according to their character.  Helen's determination, pride and
sense of self-worth are what make it likely that any course of her life
will have a happy ending, not the capricious opening or closing of a pair
of sliding doors on a train.  The film may be a bit of speculative
gimmickry, but it's also something more -- and less -- than that.  In some
alternate reality, Peter Howitt may have made SLIDING DOORS a romantic
comedy without a gimmick.  Like Helen's life, it's hard to know for sure
which version would have been more engaging and appealing.

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON
(Sony Classics)
Starring: Chow Yun-Fat, Michelle Yeoh, Zhang Ziyi, Chen Chang, Sihung
Lung, Cheng Pei-Pei.
Screenplay: Wang Hui-Ling, James Schamus and Tsai Kuo-Jung, based on the
book by Wang Du-Lu.
Producers: Hsu Li-Kong, William Kong and Ang Lee.
Director:  Ang Lee.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Before delving into the reasons CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON isn't
the unqualified masterpiece it's been touted as, let's revel in the
reasons it's still a cinematic joy in a year of mostly leaden
entertainments. In one of the film's many inspiring action sequences, a
pair of adversaries square off in battle, employing a mystical fighting
technique that allows its adherents to virtually defy gravity. This
particular battle takes place not in a bar, or in a city street, but above
a forest, with the combatants surfing the leaves and tap-dancing across
branches. It is the moment when it's easiest to appreciate CROUCHING
TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON as a giddy exercise in pure cinema showmanship. Over
and over again, it lifts you out of the mundane world of a theater seat.
     It also drops you back into that seat a bit roughly every once in a
while, but why quibble? As directed by Ang Lee, the story is both
mythologically basic and epic in scope. In an unspecified year in the days
of Imperial China, veteran Wudan warrior Li Mu Bai (Chow Yun-Fat) is
preparing to retire from his fighting ways. His famed sword, Green
Destiny, is to be carried by his long-time friend and unconsummated love
Shu Lien (Michelle Yeoh) to Peking as a gift to elder statesman Sir Te
(Sihung Lung). But the sword is soon stolen by a mysterious figure
familiar with the ways of the Wudan, one who is able to match Shu Lien in
battle. Is it the infamous Jade Fox, who once slew Mu Bai's master? Or is
it Jen (Zhang Ziyi), the young daughter of a politician who longs for a
more adventurous life than the one designated for her?
     As solid as the narrative is in many ways, it would be ridiculous to
argue that its critical and commercial success will be rooted in the
story. CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON is first and foremost an adventure,
one that turns choreographed action into pure film art. The action
sequences combine the astonishing talents of fight choreographer Yuen
Wo-Ping (THE MATRIX) with spectacular wire work to create moments that
make you want to stand up and applaud. There's never even a sense of
redundancy as the film progresses; each sequence serves its own purpose,
and offers wonderful variations on the clashing of metal, feet and fists,
and escapes up sheer walls. It's pure INDIANA JONES fun with an unexpected
sense of consequence.
     It's also a martial arts-heavy film in which the thematic elements
actually matter. While CROUCHING TIGER is certainly enjoyable as a distaff
spin on the usually testosterone-soaked chop-socky genre, it's more than a
feminist action flick. It explores the human toll of unthinking tradition,
tradition that wears the kind of deep grooves into the world that, in one
lovely early scene, Shu Lien's wagon must follow to remain upright.
Characters struggle with frustration over conflicts between their desires
and their destinies. The performances are strong, with all three of the
principal players (Chow, Yeoh and Zhang) conveying the burdens of living
expected lives in expected ways. For an action-filled film, there's a lot
going on above the neck.
     That's quite a load for an adventure film to carry, and occasionally
it's not quite up to the task. CROUCHING TIGER is full of sub-plots that
make it denser than it needs to be functionally, dashing from Jen's
encounter with a desert raider (Chen Chang), to the political implications
of the sword's disappearance, to the soon-to-be-irrelevant roles of a
police officer and his daughter. Particularly underdeveloped is the
relationship between Jen and her governess (Cheng Pei-Pei), which
ultimately plays a crucial role in the climax but feels like there's
something missing. Yet as ambitious as it is, CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN
DRAGON never feels self-important. As beautifully crafted as it is
(notably Peter Pau's cinematography and Tan Dun's score), it never turns
into a stagnant parade of lovely images. And as fanciful as its action
sequences are, they never inspire eye-rolling. CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN
DRAGON isn't a masterpiece, but it doesn't have to be. There's pleasure
enough in a film that doesn't make you feel stupid while it sends you
soaring over the treetops.

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi III: Chao ji jing cha (1992)
Starring:  Jackie Chan, Michelle Khan, Maggie Cheung, Ken Tsang, Yuen Wah,
Bill Tung.
Screenplay:  Edward Tang, Fibe Ma, Lee Wai Yee.
Director:  Stanley Tong.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Imagine a country where few people had ever seen an Arnold
Schwarzenegger film (it's hypothetical, work with me here).  Imagine that
ERASER was the first of his films to get a wide release there, and that it
became a moderate success.  If you have the rights to COMMANDO, TRUE LIES,
the TERMINATOR films and all the rest, think of what a gold mine you would
suddenly find yourself sitting on.  That is Miramax's good fortune after
RUMBLE IN THE BRONX finally became Hong Kong action legend Jackie Chan's
American breakthrough, and RUMBLE was supposed to be one of Chan's weaker
efforts.  SUPERCOP has the same high-flying action as RUMBLE, a much
stronger story, a bit less of a sense of absurd fun, and presents the
distraction of terrible dubbing.
    In SUPERCOP, Jackie Chan plays Kevin Chan, a Hong Kong police
detective selected for a dangerous undercover assignment.  Working in
conjunction with the Chinese government, and their Chief of Security Yang
(Michelle Khan), Kevin infiltrates a drug ring by helping one of its
leaders, Panther (Yuen Wah) to escape from prison.  With Yang posing as
his sister, Kevin is brought into the cartel's inner circle, including its 
ruthless leader Chaibat (Ken Tsang).  The only potential problem:  Kevin's
girlfriend May (Maggie Cheung), who is unaware of his assignment, and
inadvertently threatens to blow his cover.
     SUPERCOP is actually the third film in the popular POLICE STORY
series, but that is almost as relevant to the story as it was when Steven
Seagal did UNDER SIEGE 2.  Jackie Chan, for the most part, is about a
persona, not a character.  His goofy grins and self-deprecating manner
make him a uniquely likeable action hero, and his ability to get out of
impossible situations often seems as much a product of resourcefulness as
sheer physical ability.  As amazing as some of his fight sequences can be,
he is just as appealing in scenes like the one in which he is taken by
Panther to the home town of his undercover identity, and forced to
improvise with the assistance of several "family members" he has never
seen before.
     Chan's sense of humor is such an asset that it is unfortunate
SUPERCOP doesn't integrate it into the story very smoothly.  In many ways,
SUPERCOP is a straightforward formula action film of the kind we tend to
see a lot of in America, with evil drug lords, can-you-top-this stunts and
a minimum of distracting characterization.  When director Stanley Tong
decides it's time for comic relief, he tends to stop SUPERCOP in its
tracks for funny business like the aforementioned visit to the phony home
town, or for a squabble between Kevin and may which results in the
ever-popular shove into a swimming pool.  RUMBLE IN THE BRONX may have
been silly, but it was silly start to finish, and Chan's fight sequences
were part of the humor.  SUPERCOP feels more divided, half Jackie Chan the
action hero and half Jackie Chan the clown.
     To give SUPERCOP its due, there are some significant ways in which it
is more than a typical American action film, and nowhere is that more
evident than in the presence of Michelle Khan (Michelle Yeoh to her Hong
Kong fans).  Capable female action stars are a non-entity in Hollywood,
but Khan packs a wallop both literally and in her screen presence.  Yang
never seems to be just a foil or a sidekick for Kevin; she is a partner,
and saves his skin as often as he saves hers.  She also gets two of
SUPERCOP's best stunts -- a leap onto a moving truck, and a motorcycle
jump onto a train -- providing just some of the thrilling action moments
typical of Chan's films.  It is also a lean and mean 85 minutes; American
action directors could take a lesson in efficient editing.
     Action has always translated well on an international level, which
makes it all the more annoying when making a film like SUPERCOP acceptable
to American viewers requires dubbing which seems to have been recorded in
a tin outhouse (although a theme song by Devo is almost as baffling).  If
Miramax is serious about making Chan's films an American staple, they
should consider investing in some decent sound mixing.  Solid efforts like
SUPERCOP will continue to build Jackie Chan's audience; now it's time to
bring on the big guns.  Anyone for POLICE STORY 1, 2 or 4?

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
THE LITTLE MERMAID (1989)
(Disney)
Voices:  Samuel E. Wright, Jodi Benson, Pat Carroll, Christopher Daniel
Barnes, Buddy Hackett, Kenneth Mars, Jason Marin.
Screenplay:  John Musker and Ron Clements, from the story by Hans
Christian Andersen.
Producers:  Howard Ashman and John Musker.
Directors:  John Musker and Ron Clements.
MPAA Rating:  G.
Running Time:  82 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It may be an exaggeration to say that THE LITTLE MERMAID saved
feature animation from extinction.  If so, it's not much of one.  In 1989,
when MERMAID was first released, only one man in Hollywood seemed to
believe that family films weren't inevitably box office poison:  Disney's
Jeffrey Katzenberg, who re-committed Disney to its historical life's-blood
after costly flops like THE BLACK CAULDRON.  His vision was rewarded with
$90 million in U.S. grosses, at the time the highest total ever for an
animated film.  And THE LITTLE MERMAID begat a feature animation
renaissance, which begat box office giants like BEAUTY AND THE BEAST,
ALADDIN and THE LION KING, which begat billions in merchandise and video
sales, which begat a desire in other studios to get their fingers in the
lucrative animation pie.
     The wonderful thing about THE LITTLE MERMAID is the wonderful thing
about most unwitting trend-setters:  it was made not to set trends, but to
be an entertaining film.  That's certainly what it turned out to be,
telling the story of a teenage mermaid named Ariel (voice of Jodi Benson)
fascinated with the surface world.  That fascination only intensifies one
day when she saves the life of a human prince named Eric (Christopher
Daniel Barnes), with whom whe instantly falls in love.  Determined to join
her true love despite the objections of her father King Triton (Kenneth
Mars), Ariel finds a willing assistant in the sea-witch Ursula (Pat
Carroll), who offers the Faustian trade of Ariel's voice for the chance to
become human.  Thus begins Ariel's quest to win Eric's heart, ably
assisted by her guardian crab Sebasian (Samuel E. Wright).
     To their everlasting credit, writer/directors John Musker and Ron
Clements weren't looking forward to LITTLE MERMAID coloring books or
sing-along tapes when they put together their narrative.  The were looking
_backward_, to the reasons Disney's classic cartoons endured, beginning
with a timeless story (Hans Christian Andersen's fairy tale, tweaked for
an appropriately happy ending).  Musker and Clements crafted THE LITTLE
MERMAID with attention to the fundamentals of storytelling, little things
like coherent plotting, charming characterizations and clever writing.
They made sure they had key elements like an appropriately loathsome
villain and sharp comic relief, applied the talents of a gifted group of
character animators and voice actors, and ended up with a minor gem on
their hands.
     They also realized the crucial role of music in the Disney animated
canon, so they made the smartest of all the decisions which went into THE
LITTLE MERMAID:  they got Alan Menken and Howard Ashman to score it.  The
talented composing team behind LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS turned the film into
a full-fledged musical, establishing the fundamental song requirements for
all the successful Disney features to come:  a song for the hero/heroine
("Part of Your World"), a song for the villain ("Poor Unfortunate Souls"),
a love theme ("Kiss the Girl") and a grand, show-stopping production
number ("Under the Sea").  The latter two proved to be among Disney's most
delightful tunes ever, adding the special spark which turned Samuel E.
Wright's already-exceptional vocal performance as Sebastian into the stuff
of classics.  In fact, even the minor numbers in THE LITTLE MERMAID were
strong enough to re-surface later (listen again to "Les Poissons," and
tell me you don't hear the beta version of BEAUTY AND THE BEAST's "Be Our
Guest").
     Disney has re-released many of its animated films to theaters in
recent years, but there's something special about the return of THE LITTLE
MERMAID.  It's not that it's the best of Disney's New Wave, not even with
digitally improved prints and multi-track sound.  BEAUTY AND THE BEAST
provided richer characters, ALADDIN was more energetic, and THE HUNCHBACK
OF NOTRE DAME was more emotionally resonant.  THE LITTLE MERMAID, however,
was the most innocent, and perhaps the most purely enchanting.  Its
exuberance and humor made animation hip again, which may be why THE LITTLE
MERMAID marked the turning point for feature animation as a viable
commercial entity.  20th Century Fox should consider that history in all
the release-date jockeying between MERMAID and their own ANASTASIA.  A
trail-blazer deserves some respect.

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
PALMETTO
(Columbia/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Elisabeth Shue, Gina Gershon, Chloe Sevigny,
Michael Rapaport.
Screenplay:  E. Max Frye, based on the novel "Just Another Sucker" by
James Hadley Chase.
Producers:  Matthais Wendlandt and Al Corley.
Director:  Volker Schlondorff.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A wronged man.  A femme fatale.  A body.  A deception.  Avarice 
and alcohol.  Sweat, sex, cigarettes and shadows.  These are the little
things of which the contemporary film noir mystery is made, so predictably
that the genre has descended into the kind of ridiculous self-parody of
which direct-to-video Mickey Rourke vehicles are made.  With too many
film-makers content to keep re-making DOUBLE INDEMNITY and BODY HEAT,
there doesn't seem to be anywhere to go but subversion.
     For a while, that looks like where PALMETTO is headed.  The
obligatory sucker is a former reporter named Harry Barber (Woody
Harrelson) who has learned the hard way that honesty is not necessarily
the best policy.  After threatening to expose corrupt government
officials and refusing to accept hush money, Harry found himself framed,
convicted and sitting in jail for two years.  Now released and
understandably bitter, Harry becomes the perfect target for Rhea Malroux
(Elisabeth Shue), the trophy wife of an ailing millionaire.  Rhea invites
Harry to participate in a scam to fake the kidnapping of Malroux's teenage
daughter Odette (Chloe Sevigny) and share in a $500,000 ransom.  Harry
finds the offer too tempting to pass up, but the deal begins to sour when
bodies start turning up at inconvenient times, with a trail that keeps
pointing directly at Harry.
     Standard noir stuff, to be sure, tag-teaming with a sultry South
Florida setting to create some major deja vu.  Then screenwriter E. Max
Frye (working from James Hadley Chase's novel "Just Another Sucker") pulls
out some of the expectation-twisting tricks he showed off in his script
for Jonathan Demme's SOMETHING WILD.  The oddball touches start popping up
with regularity:  Harry lighting a cigarette which flares up in his face;
Harry running face first into a post; Harry fumbing with a tape recorder
as he tries to catch his accomplices scheming; Harry "seducing" Rhea with 
all the romantic subtlety of a stud horse.  Suddenly PALMETTO seems to be
coming from a slightly different place, one where the protagonist isn't
just an ordinary guy led into a bad situation by his zipper.  Harry
appears to be hopelessly inept, portrayed by Harrelson with his impressive
gift for convincing ineptitude.
     Sadly, PALMETTO soon veers from goofiness to predictable
over-complexity to twisty-turny absurdity.  The plot twists become ever
more elaborate and ever more unnecessary, burying a few sturdy sequences
like Harry's efforts to keep a cop from spotting a body in his car's
trunk.  Since there's never any real attempt to establish the
relationships, it's hard to care much about how Harry will explain his
actions to his artist girlfriend Nina (Gina Gershon), or what exactly
Harry might learn from his ordeal.  Finally, the whole film goes
completely mental in a finale which finds Harrelson suspended over a vat
of acid, Gershon tied to a chair and Shue vamping around in a black
pixie-cut wig.  I half expected the story to be concluded next week, same
Bat-time, same Bat-channel.
     I suppose at the very least PALMETTO succeeds at avoiding the film
noir rut where only the names change from one film to the next.  It's just
bizarre enough that it might have been entertaining, if only it made an
ounce of sense.  Credit Harrelson and Frye with providing a brief, faint
hope that noir might have a few more miles left in it, provided somebody
remembers to bring along a steering wheel.

Title
Review for Girls Town (1996)
     Somewhere near the middle of GIRLS TOWN, after its three female
protagonists have begun to assert themselves, Emma (Anna Grace) notes that
the experience "feels like a movie."  "If this was a movie," retorts Patti
(Lili Taylor), "we would've killed, like, fifty people by now."  It's the
THELMA & LOUISE model of female empowerment -- sisters only start doin' it
for themselves when men are doing them wrong, and then they do it up with
a vengeance.  The result is often self-righteousness without much of a
story to tell, with shallow female characters who are supposed to deserve
our sympathy because they are less shallow than the shallow male
characters.  In the space of two weeks, we have two films -- GIRLS TOWN
and FOXFIRE -- which continue to show what a hard time film-makers are
having creating real drama out of the perils of being a young woman.
     In GIRLS TOWN, the focus is on three best friends at a New Jersey
high school, college-bound Emma and Angela (Bruklin Harris) and their
single-mom cohort Patti, who are forced to confront harsh truths when
their friend and classmate Nikki (Aunjanue Ellis) commits suicide.  When
the girls get their hands on Nikki's journal, they discover that she had
been raped, and begin to discuss the various wrongs men have done to each
of them.  Eventually, talk isn't enough, and they decide that it's time to
take action.
     Move the story to Portland, and basically you have FOXFIRE.  It
begins when a drifter called Legs (Angelina Jolie) walks into a high
school biology class and stands up for a shy girl named Rita (Jenny Lewis)
who is being taunted by the teacher, Mr. Buttinger (John Diehl).  When
several girls -- including Legs, our artsy narrator Madeline (Hedy
Burress), pot-smoking Goldie (Jenny Shimizu) and promiscuous Violet (Sarah
Rosenberg) -- learn that Mr. Buttinger has been sexually harassing Rita
and other students, they join together to confront him.  That
confrontation results in a group suspension, and a week where the five
girls meet at an abandoned house to become inseparable friends.
     There are a few fairly significant things GIRLS TOWN does right that
FOXFIRE does not.  Most notably, the girls in GIRLS TOWN talk like high
school seniors, not like some vague melodramatized approximation.
Co-stars Harris, Taylor and Grace all contributed to the script, and they
have given the dialogue a real punch.  GIRLS TOWN also gives its
characters' acts of defiance a kind of offhandedness which makes them
considerably more interesting.  When Emma, Patti and Angela trash the car
of a boy who assaulted Emma, there is a casual glee in their retaliation;
when they confront the man named in Nikki's journal as her assailant,
their actions do not seem pre-meditated.  These are young women with
little if any idea that their actions are political, and it would seem
absurd to play their scenes of vindictiveness as though "I Am Woman"
should be playing in the background.
     That is exactly the opposite of the impression you get from FOXFIRE,
where Legs walks into the lives of her four comrades like the
Ur-Feminist, and where cries of "It's not fair!" resound through
courtrooms.  That might lead you to expect a hearty round of man-bashing,
with Legs providing the bashing primer for her less hardened friends, and
to a certain extent you would be right.  But FOXFIRE, despite being based
on a novel by a woman (Joyce Carol Oates) and being written and directed
by women, plays decidedly like a male fantasy of female bonding.  In a
sequence which seems to last several hours, the five principal characters
take turns getting a flame tattooed on their breasts to signify their
shared trials.  It's just like we men have always hoped...when women get
together, they sit around topless in a candle-lit room drinking liquor
from the bottle with a subtle-but-recognizable atmosphere of lesbian
eroticism permeating the proceedings.
     The basic problem with both films is the basic problem with so many
female bonding films:  they define the characters almost exclusively in
terms of their problems with men.  Lili Taylor's Patti in GIRLS TOWN is a
notable exception, a spunky, lively but not terribly bright young woman
who is doing all she can just to keep running in the same place, but Emma
and Angela are given little genuine personality.  It's even worse in
FOXFIRE, where there is so little effort made to understand the characters
as individuals they might as well be hand puppets.  Madeline develops an
intense bond with Legs, but we have virtually no idea why because we know
nothing about her life; there are vague references to Goldie's home life,
and no reference to Rita's or Violet's at all.  They're just female
figures to occupy the car in which they take a joy ride, stolen from one
of the shadow males who try to keep them down.  GIRLS TOWN at least has a
bit of verisimilitude working for it, but both GIRLS TOWN and FOXFIRE
mistake vandalism for character:  I kick ass, therefore I am woman.

Title
Review for Before Sunrise (1995)
Starring:  Ethan Hawke, Julie Delpy.
Screenplay:  Richard Linklater and Kim Krizan.
Director:  Richard Linklater.
     Slacker.  Generation X.  Twenty-something.  There, now that I
have dutifully trotted out all the terms that are *supposed* to
apply to BEFORE SUNRISE, perhaps we can talk about what it really
is.  That is increasingly difficult to do with relationship-based
films about characters in their 20s, which seem to come with
generational baggage by the ton, and even harder to do when the
director of the film in question is Richard (SLACKER) Linklater.
But leave your pre-conceptions at the door, and you will be rewarded
with a nearly perfect romance, a sweet, funny and poignant character
study which, if there is any justice, will make Julie Delpy a star.
     BEFORE SUNRISE is the story of a chance meeting between two
people on a train in Europe.  Jesse (Ethan Hawke) is an American
touring the continent; Celine (Julie Delpy) is a French student
returning to the Sorbonne after a summer holiday.  The two strike up
a conversation which both enjoy, but which seems destined to end
when the train reaches Vienna, Jesse's destination.  Jesse, however,
has another idea:  for Celine to join him wandering through the
city while he waits for his flight back to America the next morning.
Celine agrees, and the next several hours become a whirlwind of
discussion about life, death, family and falling in love.
     BEFORE SUNRISE is likely to be a very polarizing kind of film,
because it consists almost entirely of conversation between Jesse
and Celine.  There is a certain segment of the viewing public which
will be driven to distracion by such a structure, and they should do
themselves a favor and avoid it.  I could argue with these
individuals all day, and not convince them to see what I saw in
BEFORE SUNRISE:  two complex characters developing as genuine a
relationship as you could hope to see on the screen.  Linklater and
co-screenwriter Kim Krizan allow Jesse and Celine to unfold slowly,
so that the characters we think we have figured out early in the
film turn out to be something very different by the end.  Jesse at
first appears to be carefree and confident, but as he lets his guard
down he displays a deeply rooted cynicism and insecurity; Celine,
whose early discussions focus on death and her very practical
parents, becomes someone torn between the romantic she wants to be
and the pragmatist she feels obliged to be.  Even in isolation, I
found getting to know these characters fascinating.
     Together, I found them even more remarkable.  Ethan Hawke and
Julie Delpy both deliver marvelous performances, developing an
affection and connection which always seems absolutely real.  Some
of their tentative early scenes were so perfect that I had to look
away, particularly a hilariously uncomfortable moment in a record
store listening booth where they refuse to make eye contact.  While
both are impressive, it is Delpy who commands the camera's
attention; every reaction is on target, and every line seems
spontaneous.  It is difficult to choose one moment in her
performance above the others, but one will linger in my memory:  the
look of giddy uncertainty on her face when she steps off of the
train in Vienna.  In that one look, Delpy says as much about what
this film is about--the risk of romance--than all the dialogue.
     I keep returning to certain terms when thinking about and
describing BEFORE SUNRISE--perfect, genuine, real.  If that is so,
it is because I have seen film after film over the past few years
try to pass itself off as a romance without demonstrating the most
cursory understanding about the way a real relationship develops.
Linklater does so many things right, but I would like to bring
attention to things he *doesn't* do.  He doesn't wait until the
final reel for Jesse and Celine to kiss, accompanied by a full
orchestra; he doesn't manufacture pointless conflict; and most
astonishingly, he doesn't ever have them say "I love you."  BEFORE
SUNRISE is about a single night which will become a perfect memory,
and I am beginning to believe that is what the film will become for
me.

Title
Review for Radioland Murders (1994)
Starring:  Mary Stuart Masterson, Brian Benben, Ned Beatty, Michael
Lerner, Jeffrey Tambor, Anita Morris, Stephen Tobolowsky.
Screenplay:  Willard Huyck & Gloria Katz and Jeff Reno & Ron Osborn.
Director:  Mel Smith.
     A couple of years ago, director Barry Levinson made a movie based
on a twenty-year-old idea.  This pet project was loud, heavy-handed
and self-indulgent, and clearly showed why it hadn't been made twenty
years earlier:  it wasn't a very good idea.  However, Levinson had
acquired the cachet to make any movie he wanted to make, so he made
TOYS.  George Lucas has even more cachet, and he also decided to
produce a twenty-year-old idea.  The result, unfortunately, is similar
to TOYS.  RADIOLAND MURDERS is an attempt at farce that is simply
chaotic and grating, and its frantic pace can't disguise the fact that
it just isn't funny.
     RADIOLAND MURDERS is set in 1939 at WBN, a Chicago radio station
that is planning to launch a fourth national network.  On this evening,
the station owner (Ned Beatty) is entertaining potential affiliates and
a live studio audience with a sampling of the shows the network will
offer.  However, there is a lot more going on backstage than onstage.
Writer Roger Henderson (Brian Benben) is desperately trying to convince
his wife Penny (Mary Stuart Masterson), the station's do-everything
assistant, that he hasn't been unfaithful; the writing staff is
desperately working against the clock to make the changes ordered by
the chief sponsor (Brion James).  And someone is killing off members of
the station staff, with Roger becoming the chief suspect.
     For nearly its entire first hour, RADIOLAND MURDERS succeeded
primarily in giving me a terrible headache.  The story rockets from
character to character, lingering just long enough to let us see that
each one is defined almost exclusively by a single annoying character
trait.  The incompetent director (Jeffrey Tambor) has a bad toupee; the
station manager (Larry Miller) has a German accent; the head writer
(Harvey Korman) is a mush-mouthed drunk; another writer (Bobcat
Goldthwait) is...well, Bobcat Goldthwait.  Subtle nuance in
characterization may be too much to expect from a broad comedy like
RADIOLAND MURDERS, but it's still a problem when virtually the entire
cast is so irritatingly one-note that you begin hoping various
characters will be the next to die.  They are also stuck with dialogue
that must have had whiskers on it in 1939, like the ever-uproarious
"You may think you know what I know, but I don't think you know what
you think you know" bit.  The slapstick is better, but it too is simply
too stale to sustain the energy.
     The second half is a significant improvement, focusing on Roger's
attempts to stay one step ahead of the police and solve the murders
before he himself is arrested for them.  Brian Benben (of HBO's "Dream
On") is a charming comic actor, and his gifts with physical comedy make
a perilous descent down the side of the station building and dressing
in a Carmen Miranda get-up far funnier than they have any right to be.
But director Mel Smith (THE TALL GUY) makes the horrendous decision to
keep cutting away to the performers on stage.  Every time he does so,
RADIOLAND MURDERS just stops dead, and it's not worth the jerky ride
simply to see cameos by Billy Barty, Rosemary Clooney and George
Burns.  Benben is the best thing RADIOLAND MURDERS has going for it,
but Smith doesn't seem to realize it.
     Ultimately, that decision is indicative of what is most wrong with
RADIOLAND MURDERS:  no one seems clear exactly what it is supposed to
be.  An homage to the days of live radio?  A backstage farce a la
NOISES OFF?  A murder mystery?  A romantic comedy?  Lucas and his team
of screenwriters seem to want it all, and as a result they end up
without much of anything.  RADIOLAND MURDERS is one of those
unfortunate films which equates loud and fast with entertaining, when
in reality it's simply noisy and busy.

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)
BLACK AND WHITE
(Screen Gems)
Starring:  Power, Ben Stiller, Brooke Shields, Robert Downey Jr., Claudia
Schiffer, Raekwon, Allan Houston, Bijou Phillips, Elijah Wood, William Lee
Scott, Mike Tyson, Joe Pantoliano, Gaby Hoffman, Jared Leto.
Screenplay:  James Toback.
Producers:  Michael Mailer, Daniel Bigel and Ron Rotholz.
Director:  James Toback.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity, drug use, violence,
adult themes)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The title of James Toback's BLACK AND WHITE carries several
meanings. It refers partly to the growing influence of hip-hop culture on
the dress, speech and attitudes of suburban white youth. It also refers to
the dichotomies present in most of the main characters -- between what
they have been and what they want to be, between what others expect of
them and what they expect of themselves. And, sadly, it also refers to
writer/director Toback's presentation of his story. There's nary a scrap
of subtext to be found in his painfully shallow piece of exploration into
a complex cultural phenomenon.
     BLACK AND WHITE winds its way through the intertwined stories of
several New Yorkers over the space of a few days. Rich Bower (Power), a
Harlem crime boss, is trying to diversify into legitimate business,
working to break into rap music along with his buddy Cigar (Raekwon). 
Another buddy, college basketball star Dean Carter (New York Knick guard 
Allan Houston), faces a moral choice when he's approached by Mark Clear
(Ben Stiller) to shave points on a game. Another of Rich's running buddies
is white kid Will (William Lee Scott), the black-sheep son of a New York
district attorney (Joe Pantoliano). Tied into their world are a group of
high school students fascinated with black culture, who become the
subjects of a documentary film by husband-and-wife film-makers Sam (Brooke
Shields) and Terry Donager (Robert Downey Jr.).
     There are plenty of characters for Toback to keep track of in BLACK
AND WHITE, but apparently that's not a matter of great concern to him. And
it's not surprising, since he hasn't got the slightest interest in
developing any of those characters. Toback throws out plenty of scenes in
which we are supposed to understand what a problem it is when people
pretend to be something they're not. The actual people, however, are
absurdly static; there may be one moment in the entire film when we 
glimpse an emotion that's recognizably human. The stunt casting certainly
doesn't help, as Houston, Power and Raekwon do little more than recite
lines competently (Mike Tyson does do a surprisingly effective job of
playing himself, unconcerned about allaying fears that he's a psycho). 
With the notable exception of Stiller -- who brings some pitiable 
self-absorption to his role -- the entire cast of BLACK AND WHITE is used
by Toback as meat puppets to deliver his thoughts on race relations and
sexual politics.
     He might as well have rented a billboard. As cinematic anthropology
lessons go, BLACK AND WHITE is about as clumsy and uninvolving as you
could imagine. When Toback wants to explore why white kids are interested
in hip-hop, he has a teacher (Jared Leto) or Shields' film-maker ask them
to explain, turning the teens into talking heads. When he wants to touch
on the complexities of interracial dating, he has two characters start
chatting about it. When he wants to show that a white recording studio
manager becomes more comfortable renting to black rappers when a white
lawyer is representing them, he has the black rappers comment
significantly on the development. Every theme is laid out in expository
dialogue, crushing the attempt to give the film an improvised urgency. In
the first 15 minutes, Toback has told you absolutely everything he has to
say.
     If you suspect that might turn the remaining 85 minutes into a
pretentious bore, you're right. Most of BLACK AND WHITE consists of
episodes with no sense of consequence: Will Will and his father reconcile? 
Will Bower get nailed by the police detective who's tracking him? Will Sam
and Terry's marriage of convenience last? Will teen lovebirds Wren (Elijah
Wood) and Charlie (Bijou Phillips) stick together through Charlie's
fascination with Bower? Who cares? Toback certainly doesn't, or he would
have devoted as much energy to giving his characters personalities as he
does to giving them speeches and a crossover-ready soundtrack for their
lives. By the time BLACK AND WHITE's "Six Months Later" coda rolls around
-- so abruptly you may be left disoriented by the shift -- you wonder why
Toback bothers to tie up loose ends at all. His notion of keeping it real
means keeping it tedious and pedantic. Everything he has to say is up 
there on the screen in black and white, often underlined just for good
measure.

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
THE GAME
(Polygram)
Starring:  Michael Douglas, Deborah Kara Unger, Sean Penn, James Rebhorn.
Screenplay:  John Brancato and Michael Ferris.
Producers:  Steve Golin and Cean Chaffin.
Director:  David Fincher.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, intense situations)
Running Time:  123 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are bound to be fans of SEVEN who will view director David
Fincher's follow-up project, THE GAME, as a sell-out...but then again,
where was there to go from SEVEN?  Fincher's 1995 thriller may have been 
the decade's most baffling blockbuster -- a horrifying, unnerving, bleak
vision of millennial dread which was everything a Hollywood success
wasn't supposed to be, yet still somehow made $100 million.  It left
viewers shaken and emotionally drained like nothing in recent memory.  If
Fincher had decided to remake THE EXORCIST for his next project, someone
would have accused him of going soft.
     The wonderfully surprising thing about THE GAME is that it may be the
best choice Fincher could have made.  Free from the ridiculous
expectations of ALIEN3 and the off-putting subject matter of SEVEN,
Fincher might finally be recognized as the most gifted director of
suspense films working today.  THE GAME is a gripping, dizzying and
thoroughly entertaining thriller which bears no resemblance whatsoever to
SEVEN, except in the obvious talent of the director.
     Michael Douglas stars as Nicholas Van Orton, a millionaire San
Francisco investment banker with a big empty house to match his big empty
life.  Enter Nick's black sheep brother Conrad (Sean Penn), with a special
48th birthday present for the man who has everything:  a gift certificate
to a mysterious enterprise called Consumer Recreation Services.  Once
signed up, Nick learns that he will be participating in a
specially-designed game with unknown rules and an unknown object.  He's
not even sure when -- or if -- it will begin.
     And for the audience, that's half the fun.  Fincher wrings an
unbelievable amount of tension out of the likelihood that something will
happen, even though nothing is actually happening.  As Nick strides
through an airport shortly after receiving his first clue in the game, the
confident businessman slowly begins to see every person as a potential
participant, every mundane action or object as potentially loaded with
significance.  The mere idea of loss of control drives Nick nuts; the game
is playing him even before it begins.
     Then the game does begin, and Fincher tightens the screws
psychologically as well as viscerally.  As tautly as he can fashion a
chase or an action sequence, he's even better at creating a pervasive
atmosphere of impending doom, or the unsettling possibility that literally
anything could happen next.  If action/suspense films, according to the
popular metaphor, are roller-coasters, Fincher's ride is a suspended
roller-coaster:  not only are you moving at breakneck speed, you can't
even see the track to anticipate which way you're going to turn.  That's
saying quite a lot because, if you think about it carefully, you'll
realize there's really only one way the film can pay off.  Even though you
may know where THE GAME ultimately will end up, Fincher makes sure you
don't know how you're going to get there.
     THE GAME's somewhat predictable script comes from the team of John
Brancato and Michael Ferris, who sent Sandra Bullock through similar
Everyperson-in-peril paces in THE NET.  Don't let that keep you away.
Michael Douglas' characteristic intensity and determination give THE GAME
an edge Bullock couldn't muster, while Fincher sets up even simple shots
with a shudder-inducing elegance (I'm not sure I've seen an elevator door
open with more menace than it does in THE GAME, and that includes THE
SHINING).  This time, however, it's possible to enjoy Fincher's shudders
with a smile.  THE GAME may not be as profound an experience as SEVEN, but
it's a more satisfying one.  If this is David Fincher's idea of selling
out, I hope folks are buying.  We may be looking at the emergence of this
generation's Hitchcock.

Title
Review for Broken Hearts Club: A Romantic Comedy, The (2000)
THE BROKEN HEARTS CLUB - A ROMANTIC COMEDY
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Timothy Olyphant, Dean Cain, Andrew Keegan, Matt McGrath, Ben
Weber, Zach Braff, Billy Porter, John Mahoney, Mary McCormack, Nia Long.
Screenplay:  Greg Berlanti.
Producers:  Mickey Liddell and Joseph Middleton.
Director:  Greg Berlanti.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  94 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The helpful sub-title tagged on to THE BROKEN HEARTS CLUB is not the
only time you'll be instructed exactly what you're supposed to understand
about the film. Throughout this tale of a group of gay West Hollywood
friends, rookie writer/director Greg Berlanti includes title cards
defining key words and phrases in the characters' lingo. "Meanwhile" is
code to draw attention to an attractive guy nearby; a "newbie" is a
recently-out young man; "gym bunnies" are the muscle-bound hunks desirable
primarily (if not exclusively for sex). It's more than a movie, it's an
anthropology class. Welcome to "Intro to Gay 101."
     THE BROKEN HEARTS CLUB clearly has its broken heart in the right
place, but it's too concerned with making statements about its milieu to
let the narrative work organically as a character study. And there are
lots of characters to study in this ensemble dramedy. Dennis (Timothy
Olyphant) is a nice guy trying to make the transition from sex to
relationships. Cole (Dean Cain), Dennis's roommate, is an aspiring actor
who loves 'em and leaves 'em. Howie (Matt McGrath) has trouble admitting
when he loves someone. Patrick (Ben Weber) has trouble loving himself.
Taylor (Billy Porter) is the only one in a long-term relationship, though
perhaps not for much longer. Benji (Zach Braff) looks for a more
party-filled lifestyle. And Jack (John Mahoney) is their collective
father-figure, the older restaurateur whose softball team brings them all
together.
     Those are just the members of the core group of pals, not even
counting Patrick's lesbian sister (Mary McCormack) and her partner (Nia
Long), or the sweet "newbie" (Andrew Keegan) Dennis takes under his wing.
That's a whole heap of humanity to which Berlanti must be attentive, and
he's not quite up to the task. Most of his characters remain types
throughout, particularly the more effeminate Benji and Taylor. Olyphant
(the menacing drug dealer in GO) is surprisingly good as Dennis, the most
fully-developed of the characters, and Cain does a nice job of
under-playing the philandering Cole. The rest of the actors just don't
have enough to work with. In 94 minutes, THE BROKEN HEARTS CLUB just can't
support a half-dozen major characters.
     It's a shame, too, because Berlanti actually has an intriguing
concept at the core of his film. Unlike most gay-themed films, this one
isn't about coming out, or dealing with the straight world, or AIDS. It's
a fairly risky statement about the complications when members of a
minority group become so insular that their entire frame of reference
becomes their other-ness. Berlanti's portrays his characters alternately
coping effectively with their lives and dealing with the constant
disappointment of not yet being able to define who they are or what they
want. This is a film that's ready to acknowledge that sometimes gay
men -- even after they've said, "We're here, we're queer" -- haven't quite
gotten used to it.
     An idea, unfortunately, isn't enough to sustain a film. While the
characters struggle to emerge as individuals from Berlanti's broad thesis,
the film struggles to avoid basic miscalculations in structure (case in
point: After one character comments about rumors that a famous actor is
gay, and another character responds, "Just because he's every gay man's
fantasy doesn't mean he's gay," several seconds of idle banter commence
before the cutaway to the famous actor in a clinch with another man).
There is plenty of tart dialogue, and not all of it is of the bitchy-queen
variety. The individual moments of humor and discovery are nice, but they
don't add up to enough. THE BROKEN HEARTS CLUB is a movie determined to
teach you something, rather than a movie about people whose experiences
teach you something. A lecture with romance and comedy is still a lecture.

Title
Review for Looking for Richard (1996)
Director:  Al Pacino.
Producer:  Michael Hadge.
Director of Photography:  Robert Leacock.
Music:  Howard Shore:
Starring:  Al Pacino, Kevin Spacey, Winona Ryder, Alec Baldwin, Aidan
Quinn, Harris Yulin, Estelle Parsons, Penelope Allen.
     Part English lecture, part behind-the-scenes documentary and part
theater piece, LOOKING FOR RICHARD is an ambitious experiment created by
Al Pacino as a sort of "Everything You Always Wanted to Know About
Shakespeare but Were Afraid to Ask."  Motivated by a desire to make the
works of William Shakespeare speak to a contemporary audience, Pacino
spent several years (evidenced by his now-you-see-it, now-you-don't facial
hair in the film) putting together a film version of "Richard III" which
would combine performance of key scenes, observation of the actors
wrangling over interpretation of those scenes, and historical background
for the play.  To that end he brought together a group of actors including
Alec Baldwin, Winona Ryder, Kevin Spacey and Aidan Quinn to make their
"Richard III" a Shakespeare for the uninitiated.
     It is a noble goal Pacino has set for himself, but there is something
inherently contradictory about the way he has chosen to go about achieving
it.  As an educational tool, LOOKING FOR RICHARD isn't exactly pitched at
those individuals represented in his person-on-the-street interviews, most
of whom greet the word "Shakespeare" with a shrug or a grimace (the
notable exception being a panhandler who speaks eloquently about how the
Bard "instructed us how to feel").  It is a fairly academic piece of work,
with lectures about iambic pentameter intermingled with talking heads
describing the events in the play.  Pacino employs rat-a-tat editing to
cut back and forth between locations for rehearsals, descriptive narration
and the play itself, resulting in a film which may have been made with the
multiplex audience in mind but which seems destined exclusively for the
art houses.
     Yet LOOKING FOR RICHARD is likely to bore those same art house
viewers, because the film does not offer much in the way of insight.  The
actors and academics who speak throughout LOOKING FOR RICHARD go to such
lengths to make the basic plot of "Richard III" understandable that they
have little time or inclination to dig deeper.  Pacino may have wanted to
foster the "appreciation" of Shakespeare, but he is willing to settle for
people being able to describe what happened and who is doing what to whom,
and that doesn't leave much for those who already know and love
Shakespeare.
     It is also likely that those same art house-attending,
Shakespeare-loving viewers saw Ian McKellen's dynamic RICHARD III last
year, a cinematic rendering which does far more to thrust the play into a
20th century context.  Pacino himself plays the hunch-backed villain with
his typical intensity, and he often shifts into his habit of indicating
the significance of a given line by the volume at which he delivers it.
It is a straightforward performance, but far better ones are turned in by
Kevin Spacey (whose Buckingham seems so fiercely intelligent that he
becomes like an advisor to a modern politician) and even Alec Baldwin (a
surprisingly sympathetic Clarence).  Winona Ryder is a bit less successful
as Lady Anne, and Aidan Quinn is even less successful as Richmond; Quinn
in particular is like a walking manifestation of John Gielgud's comment in
the film that American actors become intimidated by Shakespeare because
"they've been told they can't do it."
     If LOOKING FOR RICHARD does one thing particularly well, it is to
emphasize the interpretive process which makes Shakespeare a living text.
There may be little inherent drama in a group of actors sitting around a
table talking about what they see going on in any given scene, but the
scenes of those conversations help to show the unique qualities of
performed literature.  It is one of the film's best moments when Pacino's
collaborator Frederic Kimball explodes in frustration at Pacino's plan to
ask an "expert" why a character might have acted in a certain way.  "You
know more about this character," Kimball bellows, and it is a perfectly
succinct description of how a role is re-defined by every actor who
performs it.  That makes LOOKING FOR RICHARD an interesting supplement for
a drama class, but it isn't nearly as worthwhile for an English class.
With its snippets of scenes and specific historical asides, LOOKING FOR
RICHARD doesn't exactly teach how to explore the Bard's texts.  It is more
like a filmed version of the Cliff's Notes.

Title
Review for Paradise Lost: The Child Murders at Robin Hood Hills (1996)
(Gotham)
Documentary by Bruce Sinofsky and Joe Berlinger.
MPAA Rating:  Not rated (graphic depictions of corpses, profanity)
Running Time:  150 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
(*Note: PARADISE LOST premiered on HBO this summer prior to its theatrical
release)
     Three years ago, I might have given a perfect rating to PARADISE
LOST: THE CHILD MURDERS AT ROBIN HOOD HILLS; two years from now, I might
be similarly inclined to honor it.  Such are the vagaries of critical
opinion, that temporal beast, that I found my experience of Joe Berlinger
and Bruce Sinofsky's documentary both enhanced and diminished by recent
pervasive coverage of high-profile murder cases.  As a carefully
constructed detective story, PARADISE LOST is riveting; as a study of
small town America at its best and its worst, it is compelling.  However,
as an examination of publicly-aired grief and suspicion of the criminal
justice system, it is merely exemplary rather than extraordinary.
     PARADISE LOST begins with chilling footage of a May 5, 1993 crime
scene outside of West Memphis, Arkansas:  8-year-old classmates Michael
Moore, Steven Branch and Christopher Byers have been hot-tied, beaten and
stabbed to death, and Byers castrated.  The murders naturally outrage the
insular and deeply religious community, and families of the victims are
only too ready to believe the worst when three likely enough suspects are
arrested.  17-year-old Jessie Misskelley confesses under police
questioning to participating in a Satanic ritual in which the three boys
were killed, and implicates 16-year-old Jason Baldwin and 18-year-old
Damien Echols as well.  Damien, an occult-fascinated, heavy
metal-listening eccentric, is particularly tailor-made for prosecution,
but there are potential problems with the case.  Jessie has an IQ of only
72, and his confession is riddled with inconsistencies.  There also
happens to be virtually no physical evidence, and plenty to suggest that
the crimes may have occurred somewhere beside the muddy ditch where the
bodies were found.
     The first half hour of PARADISE LOST introduces us to a fascinating
cast of characters, and to a setting which is as critical to the case as
any piece of evidence.  John Mark Byers, stepfather of victim Christopher
Byers, is shown in a tirade against the killers laced both with hatred and
with Scripture, and he becomes a personification of a town as obsessed
with its perceptions of the devil as it is steadfast in its Christianity.
There are moments of powerful emotional honesty which capture the deep
conflict between the need for catharsis and the call for forgiveness --
one victim's grandfather holds back tears as he refuses to hate the
accused teens, while Byers' mother lashes out against them and "the
mothers that bore them."  Hovering over the proceedings like a dark angel
is the film's most enigmatic figure, Damien Echols -- a perceptive,
self-absorbed and vaguely frightening young man who is like a Satanist
from central casting.  Misskelley and Baldwin, both tiny and timid, seem
physically incapable of the crimes; when Echols takes the stand, toying
with his hair and answering questions as though the world were wasting his
time, you can see him digging shovelsful of his own grave.
    The courtroom scenes are rife with the kind of confrontations familiar
from both fictional and real-life proceedings, but the knowledge of its
reality makes every unexpected revelation all the more enthralling.  For
much of the film, Sinofsky and Berlinger let the trials of Misskelley
(tried separately) and Baldwin and Echols unfold slowly, and it seems
their focus is the railroading of the three accused boys as a result of
their outsider status.  Then new bits of evidence keep exploding like land
mines.  Another possible suspect emerges after turning over a weapon to
the film-makers; Damien's testimony appears to trip him up; another
character is revealed to have a brain tumor.  It is a case of such
complexity that any amateur juror who has railed against noteworthy
verdicts should be forced to watch PARADISE LOST as a civics lesson.
     The courtroom drama of PARADISE LOST is certainly intriguing, but I
think the film spends a bit too much time in the courtroom, because the
actual evidence is only half the story.  When Sinofsky and Berlinger spend
time with the families, they force us to confront the scars the families
on both sides will bear, and to confront our own preconceptions in the
process.  At the same time, it was difficult to listen to the righteous
wrath of the victims' parents and not recall the media trials waged by the
fathers of Ronald Goldman (in the O.J. Simpson trial) and Polly Klaas (a
much-publicized California rape-murder case).  Outrage against the concept
of presumed innocence just isn't news in this age, and PARADISE LOST
simply underlines this trend rather than exposing it.  That is not to
diminish its power -- PARADISE LOST will have you asking yourself
questions long after it ends.  Perhaps by the time I reach my own personal
verdict, its power will have overwhelmed its familiarity entirely.

Title
Review for King of the Hill (1993)
Starring:  Jesse Bradford, Jeroen Krabbe, Lisa Eichhorn,
           Spalding Gray, Karen Allen.
Screenplay/Director:  Steven Soderbergh.
     It's called the sophomore slump, and it's a pitfall common to all
contemporary art forms.  A writer has a lifetime to create the
breakthrough debut, and eighteen months to create a follow-up everyone
will expect to be equally good; as just the most recent cinematic
example, witness John Singleton's POETIC JUSTICE.  Writer/director
Steven Soderbergh turned heads with his first feature, 1989's SEX,
LIES AND VIDEOTAPE, then stumbled with the atmospheric but empty
KAFKA.  In such cases, the third try often will tell which was the
exception, and which the rule.  If this is true of Soderbergh, the
evidence that this is one auteur with staying power is KING OF THE
HILL, a beautiful and darkly poetic adaptation of A. E. Hotchner's
memoir of life during the Great Depression.
     Our tour guide through 1933 St. Louis is Aaron Kurlander (Jesse
Bradford), a bright and creative twelve-year-old.  His father (Jeroen
Krabbe) is an unemployed salesman, forcing the family to live in the
gloomy Empire Hotel.  When his younger brother (the adorable Cameron
Boyd) is sent away to live with relatives, Mom (Lisa Eichhorn) gets
sick and Dad gets a traveling salesman job, Aaron is left by himself.
The film follows his encounters and friendships with several fellow
residents of the Empire, including larcenous but good-hearted Lester
(Adrien Brody), well-heeled alcoholic Mr. Mungo (Spalding Gray) and
Ella (Amber Benson), a gawky, sad-eyed young girl with a big crush on
Aaron.  They all try to stay one step ahead of Ben (Joseph Chrest), the
Empire's reptilian bellhop who locks out delinquent guests at a
moment's notice.
     KING OF THE HILL's greatest triumph is one of tone.  As somber as
the subject matter could have been, Soderbergh opts neither for
grittiness nor Spielbergian sentimentality.  None of the Empire's
residents are treated as pathetic or heroic; they're simply decent
people trying to do their best with what they've been given.  There is
as much humor as their is sadness in KING OF THE HILL, perhaps more.
There are some truly charming moments:  Aaron's 8th-grade graduation
ceremony; Aaron and Lester saving the Kurlander's car from
repossession; Aaron improvising an exciting career for his father to a
wealth classmate between swigs of Coca-Cola.  All are lovingly
photographed by Elliot Davis and accented by a giddy Cliff Martinez
score reminiscent of Randy Newman.  To be certain, this isn't an
entirely pleasant film; there are some dark and bittersweet moments.
However, the balance is maintained so that it feels (at the risk of
sounding cliche) like life.
     The splendid ensemble cast only adds to the richness.  Heading the
list is Bradford, perfectly cast as the imaginative Aaron.  He manages
to capture both a savvy born of necessity and pubescent awkwardness
with understated style.  Krabbe is solid as the father unaware of how
his well-intentioned actions are hurting his son; Eichhorn is good but
misused as the fragile mother.  Of the hotel's denizens, I was
particularly taken with Amber Benson as Ella, who conveys a heartfelt
desperation for contact that generates some touching scenes with
Aaron.  Spalding Gray, as he does when he's cast in a film, basically
plays Spalding Gray.  Also worth noting is Karen Allen in an appealing
turn as Aaron's supportive teacher.
     I have no frame of reference for the historical accuracy of KING
OF THE HILL, but I do know that it *felt* real.  The tent cities,
railyard Hoovervilles and slum hotels coexist with mansions in casually
accepted fashion, free of some "issue" of class conflict.  There are
also intriguing character types, particularly the fascistic beat cop
who treats his street like a fiefdom.  In short, KING OF THE HILL feels
like a man's vivid memory of a difficult but enriching boyhood, told
with power and grace.  Soderbergh has a gift for visual narrative, and
it makes for an outstanding film.

Title
Review for Eyes of Tammy Faye, The (2000)
     As is probably the case for many of my worldly generation, my
defining image of Tammy Faye Bakker isn't even really of Tammy Faye 
Bakker. It's the image of "Saturday Night Live's" Jan Hooks doing Tammy
Faye, all squeaky rebuking of demons and freely flowing mascara. Tammy
Faye herself was a caricature, easy to mock because of that
heart-on-the-sleeve demeanor and that garishly made-up face on that tiny
body. Who knew who she really was  and, frankly, who cared? She was part
of that whole PTL scandal with its juicy melange of God, sex and fraud. 
And she was so easy to laugh at.
     Randy Barbato and Fenton Bailey's documentary THE EYES OF TAMMY FAYE
is clearly an attempt to rehabilitate Tammy Faye now-Messner's image, made
with the full cooperation of the First Lady of Televangelism. And it's a
frequently fascinating character study that puts a truly human face on the
much-maligned woman. After an introduction to Tammy Faye's childhood, much
of the film is devoted to the peaks and valleys in Jim and Tammy Faye
Bakker's multiple attempts to create a Christian-themed satellite
television network. Naturally, there's also a heavy focus on the 1987
scandal that toppled the Bakkers' PTL empire, including Jim's confession
to a one-night stand with Jessica Hahn and a fraud trial related to
fund-raising for the Heritage U.S.A. vacation resort. Along the way there
are glimpses at the present-day Tammy, starting over once again with a
marriage to former Bakker associate Roe Messner and attempting to put her
troubled past behind her.
     THE EYES OF TAMMY FAYE is full of the sort of eye-opening tidbits
that make a documentary more than a parade of facts, places and dates. 
Barbato and Bailey give the Bakkers their due as pioneers who started The
700 Club, Trinity Broadcasting and PTL before being forced out of each and
every one by savvier folks. There are funny archival clips of the Bakkers'
mostly-improvised Christian children's show with Tammy Faye performing
hand puppets, and surprising glimpses of Tammy Faye reaching out to AIDS
patients at a time when many religious leaders were still referring to the
disease as punishment for homosexuals. There's humor in the clips of a
pre-Oscar Kevin Spacey playing Jim Bakker in a made-for-TV movie, and
drama in the machinations of Jerry Fallwell to force the Bakkers out of
PTL (Fallwell himself refused to be interviewed for the film). All
documentaries should be this entertaining.
     It's also not clear until the film is nearly over that it has spent
most of its running time avoiding its most intriguing subject: the
present-day Tammy Faye. Once the whole sordid PTL mess had been laid out,
Barbato and Bailey shift gears to show Tammy Faye trying to revive her
career as an entertainer. She appears on the now-defunct "Roseanne" talk
show; she meets with a photographer for new head shots (and throws the
makeup artist for a loop with her permanently lined lips, eyes and
eyebrows). She even pitches ideas for television projects -- including
"Tammy's Terrific Teens" and a show about medical advances -- to an
incredulous USA Networks executive. Tammy Faye emerges as a wonderful
contradiction: a born performer whose 30 years in the public eye have done
nothing to erase her essential naivete. The goofy genuineness that emerges
in scenes like her reaction to being in a grounded airplane during an
electrical storm make for a much more human story than the story of the
Bakkers' pre-scandal careers.
     None of that makes THE EYES OF TAMMY FAYE any less worth watching; in
fact, it's almost like two provocative short films effectively fused
together. It's also playful (the BABE-esque chorus of sock puppets reading
the chapter titles), informative and even a little bit inspirational. 
Comic Jim J. Bullock, Tammy Faye's former daytime chat-show co-host,
claims that after the world ends, all that will remain is "roaches, Tammy
Faye and Cher." It's a treat getting to know that plucky survivor, and
learning that there's something more than someone else's caricature behind
that trademark mascara.

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
THE NEWTON BOYS
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Matthew McConaughey, Ethan Hawke, Skeet Ulrich, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Dwight Yoakam, Julianna Margulies.
Screenplay:  Richard Linklater, Claude Stanush and Clark Lee Walker, based
on the book by Stanush.
Producer:  Anne Walker McBay.
Director:  Richard Linklater.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (frequent profanity, violence)
Running Time: 122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I've got to be honest with you:  if I were producing a "true crime"
bio-pic, Richard Linklater would not be my first choice as director.  In
fact, I'm not sure he'd make the top fifty.  This is, after all, the man
who chronicled the meandering SLACKER culture, the man who followed DAZED
AND CONFUSED 1970s youth in their hazy misadventures, the man who let two
young lovers talk the night away BEFORE SUNRISE.  Not exactly the stuff of
which blazing shootouts and narrow getaways are made, is it?
     As one might expect, there is an amiable, unhurried pace to Richard
Linklater's THE NEWTON BOYS.  The surprise is that it turns out to be one
of the film's most appealing qualities.  Based on Claude Stanush's
non-fiction book, THE NEWTON BOYS tells the story of the most successful
gang of bank robbers in American history:  Texas siblings Willis (Matthew
McConaughey), Jess (Ethan Hawke), Joe (Skeet Ulrich) and Dock Newton
(Vincent D'Onfrio), along with their explosives expert Brentwood Glasscock
(Dwight Yoakam).  In the early 1920s, the five men went on an unparalleled
spree throughout the West and Midwest, working at night and reaping the
rewards of the last remaining easily-accessed safes in left in the
country.
     From the opening credits, it is clear that Linklater is aiming for an
old-fashioned whimsy in his telling of the tale.  The title cards are
styled after silent films, with "The Players" introduced in sienna-tinted
head shots, tipping their hats to the camera.  THE NEWTON BOYS generally
paints its protagonists as light-hearted, almost casual outlaws, polite
young men who happened to be very good at robbing banks and milked one
effective modus operandi for all it was worth.  The script (by Linklater,
Stanush and Clark Lee Walker) shows little interest in digging deep into
the characters' psyches or exposing the gritty violence of the Old West's
final days.  Though the climactic train robbery features a bit of
bloodshed, far more typical is a scene where a bungled daylight heist
turns into a comedy of errors resulting in nothing worse than a couple of
flesh wounds.  Even the obligatory montage sequence, spinning newspaper
headlines and all, is edited with a less frantic sense of urgency than you
might expect.
     THE NEWTON BOYS is such a lightweight bit of history that it
sometimes threatens to float away entirely whenever there's not a robbery
going on.  The characters are energetically portrayed by the top-notch
cast, but they're little more than a token trait a piece -- Joe is the
Religious One, Brentwood is the Cautious One, Jess is the Cocky Drunken
One, Dock is...well, the _other_ Cocky Drunken One.  Only McConaughey is
given a bit more to work with, playing Willis as a wronged man
rationalizing his lawlessness as payback to the world.  Even then, the
attempts to flesh out his life -- a romance with a single mother (Julianna
Margulies), ill-fated attempts to funnel his ill-gotten gains into
legitimate businesses -- feel half-hearted and only sporadically
effective.
     Still, there's something undeniably charming about THE NEWTON BOYS,
some intangible alchemy between the actors' obvious enjoyment of their
roles and a story with no greater agenda than spotlighting a previously
unknown bit of Americana.  Two hours may be a bit too much time to support
the substance of THE NEWTON BOYS, but if you've indulged Linklater's
episodic films in the past, you probably won't be disappointed by his
willingness to wander down the side roads of a story.  Not a bad choice at
all, as it turns out, for a story about some nice young fellas who just
happen to rob banks.

Title
Review for Simple Twist of Fate, A (1994)
Starring:  Steve Martin, Gabriel Byrne, Catherine O'Hara, Laura
Linney, Stephen Baldwin, Alana Austin.
Screenplay:  Steve Martin.
Director:  Gillies MacKinnon.
     Give this to Steve Martin:  he has an eye for the classics.  In
1987, he updated "Cyrano de Bergerac" into the gentle romantic comedy
ROXANNE; this year, he has turned George Eliot's SILAS MARNER into A
SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE.  It would appear, however, that Martin did not
learn the lesson of ROXANNE's success.  His script for ROXANNE retained
only the most basic plot elements, while ditching the tragedy.  With A
SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE, he has been perhaps too faithful, letting a
deliberate exposition and somber tone dull a potentially appealing
redemption tale.
     Martin stars as Michael McCann, a one-time schoolteacher who
retreats into seclusion and bitterness in a small Virginia town after
his wife betrays him.  Five years later, McCann's life takes another
unexpected twist when an infant girl wanders into his home.  The
child's mother, a heroin addict, has died of an overdose; her father,
Congressional candidate John Newland (Gabriel Byrne), is unwilling to
take the political risk of claiming his illegitimate daughter.
Instead, Newland arranges it so that McCann can raise the girl, who is
named Mathilda.  Fatherhood coaxes McCann out of his shell, and he
begins to live life again.  However, as the years pass, Newland begins
to regret his decision, and tries to insinuate himself back into her
life.
     There is something jarring about watching a film constructed like
a 19th century novel set in the present day.  A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE
takes its own sweet time establishing its plot and characters, and for
the first half hour it seems muted to the point of inaudibility, and
very dark in its tone.  But curiously, the one thing missing from this
overlong first act is any sense of who Michael McCann really is.  He is
viewed mostly through the reactions of townspeople, or filmed in shadow
hoarding his precious gold coins.  I felt that I knew more about
characters like Newland's wayward brother (Stephen Baldwin) than the
man whose transformation is to provide the centerpiece for the film.
     To be fair to Steve Martin the screenwriter, Steve Martin the
actor may not have been the best choice for this role.  For the past
couple of years, in such films as LEAP OF FAITH, Martin has been trying
to establish himself as a legitimate dramatic actor, and while he is
always an appealing presence, he just doesn't look comfortable in
scenes which require serious emotion.  His standard "repressed emotion"
take is on frequent display in A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE, and it usually
just makes him look slightly constipated.  At those moments, I just
couldn't lose myself in the pre-Mathilda McCann.
     There is much more to enjoy in the second act of SIMPLE TWIST.
Martin is very good as the nervous novice father, and his scenes with
the various child actors playing Mathilda are generally quite
charming.  Alana Austin gets the most screen time as the 11-year-old
Mathilda, and she has an easy chemistry with Martin (her sister Alyssa
plays the 5-year-old Mathilda).  Also appealing are the performances of
Catherine O'Hara as a quirky antique shop owner who befriends McCann
(and, in a pleasant surprise, *doesn't* become his romantic interest),
and Gabriel Byrne, slipping in and out of a Virginia accent but
providing some nice shading for a part that could have been a stock
villain.
     Unfortunately, the conclusion of A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE becomes a
predictable and overlong custody battle, complete with courtroom scenes
and a hissable lawyer.  The more melodramatic A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE
became--and ironically, the more like its source material-- the less
effective it was as a film.  As nicely as the bonding between father
and daughter was portrayed, it couldn't compensate for the plodding
story on either end of it.

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
PRIMARY COLORS
(Universal)
Starring:  John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob
Thornton, Kathy Bates, Maura Tierney, Paul Guilfoyle, Larry Hagman.
Screenplay:  Elaine May, based on the novel by Anonymous.
Producer:  Mike Nichols.
Director:  Mike Nichols.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  143 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Just so there's no confusion:  Jack Stanton (John Travolta), the
"fictional" scandal-plagued Democratic presidential candidate whose
campaign is the subject of PRIMARY COLORS, is Bill Clinton.  His ambitious
wife Susan (Emma Thompson) is our First Lady.  Stanton's home-state buddy
and campaign strategist Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton) is James
Carville.  The waffling, never-seen Italian-American governor of New York,
called Orlando Ozzio here, is Mario Cuomo.  And for that matter, the
"Anonymous" author of the best-selling novel on which PRIMARY COLORS is
based is actually former "Newsweek" writer Joe Klein.
     It's ironic that Klein could tell a story about the effect of
scandal-mongering on American politics only by creating a bit of scandal
himself, that he could uncover a few brutal truths only by hiding a few.
It's even more ironic that the film version of PRIMARY COLORS appears just
as President Clinton finds himself entangled in new scandals, virtually
guaranteeing that most coverage of the film will both miss the point
entirely and help make the film's point for it.  PRIMARY COLORS isn't
simply a chance to giggle at Clinton's foibles without naming him.  This
is a story about giggling at foibles masquerading as serious news, about a
political process which has become a seemingly endless cycle of
mud-slinging and spin control because we continue to create an audience
for it.
     In that sense, it's a very similar story to the recent WAG THE DOG,
though simultaneously more human and more cynical.  PRIMARY COLORS unfolds
through the eyes of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), an up-and-coming
campaign pro desperately seeking a candidate worthy of his admiration.
Burton begins to develop what Jemmons calls "True Believer-ism" as
Stanton's campaign progresses, convinced that this is a candidate with
vision and a genuine desire to help others.  As revelation builds upon
revelation, however, the questions he has to ask himself grow ever more
troubling.  Does it matter that this man who wants to do so much for the
country seems to be doing it one woman at a time?  Do the ends of getting
into office where you can do some good justify the means of slinging even
more mud at the opponent than he slings at you?  And how can you make
ideas worth anything in a culture where viewers watch an interview with
the Stantons and can only comment that Susan "should wear her hair
longer."
     PRIMARY COLORS the movie manages to wrap all of the novel's tough
questions and roman-a-clef characters into a surprisingly funny and
entertaining package.  Though the running time of nearly 2-1/2 hours feels
excessive near the end, director Mike Nichols crafts so many sharp comic
scenes that the film never becomes a tedious political science lecture.
He also gets one particularly dynamic performance from a generally solid
cast -- Kathy Bates as Libby, the Stanton's borderline-loony long-time
friend and the campaign's designated "Dust-Buster" (because she's "tougher
than dirt").  Though the role initially seems like just a minor variation
on Bates' brassy, no-nonsense characters in DOLORES CLAIBORNE, THE LATE
SHIFT or TITANIC, Libby eventually develops into the real soul of PRIMARY
COLORS:  the last true idealist, a woman whose very sanity depends on the
notion that there has to be a better way to select those who will lead us.
     Of course, another performance will draw far more attention, which is
precisely why PRIMARY COLORS couldn't possibly work as well on film as it
does on the page.  Without a face, Jack Stanton is a complex and
sympathetic character study representing a wide-spread problem.  The
moment John Travolta appears on screen with his salt-and-pepper pompadour,
the titters begin; the moment he opens his mouth and begins his sandpaper
drawl of a Clinton impression, the full-fledged laughs begin.  As
effective as Elaine May's script may be -- and Travolta's performance, for
that matter -- plenty of viewers will simply gape at PRIMARY COLORS in
tabloid fascination, thinking of it as THE BILL CLINTON STORY.  There's a
sad lesson behind the laughs in PRIMARY COLORS, one you'll be able to spot
in reviews and reactions colored by the lenses of Intern-Gate, Grope-Gate,
or any other Gate:  we're getting exactly the leaders we deserve when we
refuse to make their messages matter, and all we can do is throw up an
endless series of Gates in front of them.

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
THE CONTENDER
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Gary Oldman, Joan Allen, Jeff Bridges, Christian Slater,
William Petersen, Sam Elliott.
Screenplay:  Rod Lurie.
Producers:  Marc Frydman, Douglas Urbanski, Willi Baer and James Spies.
Director:  Rod Lurie.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     After a decade as a film critic, Rod Lurie has apparently decided
that not only does he really want to direct, he also really wants to be
President. Lurie made his debut behind the camera earlier this year with
DETERRENCE, a political thriller about the President trying to manage an
international crisis while snowbound in Colorado. The Commander-in-Chief
is once again front and center in THE CONTENDER, suggesting that Lurie may
have been missing his calling as a journalist. Instead of aspiring to be
the next John Ford, he may really be aspiring to be the next John
McLaughlin.
     It's clear that Lurie has a lot of interesting things say about
contemporary American politics on a national level. It's equally clear
that he still has a few things to learn about turning those things into
smoothly satisfying film stories. THE CONTENDER is set sometime in the
near future, during the second term of the Jackson Evans (Jeff Bridges) 
administration. The sitting Vice President has recently died in office,
leaving Evans with a tough political choice. He wants to name a woman to
the post to secure his legacy, and he wants Ohio Senator Laine Hanson
(Joan Allen) to be that woman. Unfortunately, he faces opposition in the
person of Sheldon Runyon (Gary Oldman), the Congressman who will chair the
confirmation hearings. Runyon is opposed to Hanson's nomination to begin
with, but he finds ammunition for his opposition when evidence appears
suggesting sexual indiscretions from Hanson's youth. And while Runyon
plants the seeds of public suspicion, Hanson refuses to comment on the
issue in any way.
     Questions regarding the pertinence of private life to public service
have certainly been part of the political landscape in recent years,
making THE CONTENDER's subject matter timely food for thought. Lurie
hammers the willingness of politicians to expose every skeleton in an
opponent's closet, and turns Hanson's refusal to comment on the
accusations against her into an expression of contempt for the fact that
the subject has even been raised. Oldman makes for a superb antagonist as
the cutthroat Runyon, whose motivations are always swaying between genuine
conviction that Hanson isn't ready for the job and retribution for earlier
political losses to the President. There are fine moments exploring the
slippery slopes on which politicians walk in order to gain power, none
more effective than a scene in which Hanson -- armed with information that
could allow her to make an effective personal attack on Runyon -- is
forced to decide whether or not to use it. The excruciatingly long silence
in that scene says more about the tension between principle and expedience
than any line of dialogue.
     That's also one of the few moments in THE CONTENDER when Lurie nails
the timing of a scene. Throughout the film, there's a sense that virtually
every scene is about a minute too short, that virtually every character or
sub-plot has been short-changed in some fashion. Crucial relationships --
between Hanson and her father (Philip Baker Hall), a former governor; 
between another potential candidate for the Vice Presidency (William
Petersen) and his ambitious wife -- never develop a rich enough context
for their inclusion to be effective. Hanson herself remains enigmatic
through much of the film, robbing the film of a real protagonist for the
audience to embrace. And Lurie sticks too closely to the insider wheelings
and dealings, never venturing into the realm of public opinion to explore
how scandals affect the public. THE CONTENDER has the scope of an epic
political drama without enough of the detail.
     Fortunately for Lurie, he scores several points for detail with Jeff
Bridges' performance as President Evans. Plenty of actors have essayed
portrayals of American Presidents with an emphasis either on sheer
authoritative presence or flawed humanity. Bridges nails both, switching
from genial charm to icy political determination in the blink of an
eye. He also gets the film's best running joke, as Evans attempts to stump
his kitchen staff with off-beat menu requests. It's a near-perfect piece
of film acting, capturing every one of a modern Chief Executive's many
faces; he even gives a kick to the obligatory climactic preachy-speechy. 
That's the only bit of greatness THE CONTENDER can muster, however; it's
otherwise a merely solid piece of drama. Perhaps next time around, Rod
Lurie will pick up a few lessons from Bridges on putting all the pieces
together around a persuasive ideological core. Such is the stuff of a
great leader, whether behind the camera, or behind the desk in the Oval
Office.

Title
Review for Playing God (1997)
    There is no doubt in my mind that David Duchovny can be a movie star.
His often under-appreciated work on "The X-Files" has demonstrated both
dramatic chops and a wry sense of humor, as well as the requisite
physicality for action.  Duchovny has the looks, the smarts and the range
on the big screen to go places most fellow TV alums never go.
     It's also clear that he knows how to pick interesting scripts.  To a
resume which already includes unconventional fare like KALIFORNIA and THE
RAPTURE, Duchovny adds Mark Haskell Smith's PLAYING GOD.  It begins with a
solid premise, introducing us to a former surgeon named Eugene Sands
(Duchovny) one year removed from losing his license for operating on a
patient while high on amphetamines, and beginning a downward spiral into
addiction.  A chance at returning to his trade comes when Sands helps save
the life of a wounded associate of crime boss Raymond Blossom (Timothy
Hutton).  Raymond offers Sands a job as his organization's designated
"gunshot doc," an offer Sands accepts with some reservations.  Eventually
he begins to question his decision, but it may be too late to get out once
he's in, especially with an over-zealous FBI agent (Michael Massee)
breathing down his neck.
     Smith's script does about all you could ask a script to do,
delivering some well-developed characters and smart dialogue (okay, there
are a couple of howlers) in service of that premise.  Duchovny selected a
nice piece of material to work with, but PLAYING GOD shows that an actor
can't choose most of the things which go into the making of a good film.
It has the feel of a film which should have been much better, but turned
out inconsistent and sloppy under the first-time direction of Andy Wilson
(of the popular cable mystery series "Cracker").  There are times when
Wilson tries so hard to create his gritty thriller atmosphere -- all
distorted imagery, slow motion and awkward cross-cutting -- that the
narrative begins to get lost.  He's going for the right mood, but with the
wrong methods.
     Duchovny also had no control over the performances of his
cast-mates, though from all appearances, neither did the director.  While
Duchovny and Angelina Jolie (as Hutton's girlfriend) play low-key to nail
the wounded psyches of their characters, all around them fall victim to
the notion that louder acting is better acting.  Hutton goes irretrievably
bonkers as the bleached beach-bum majordomo whose actions rarely make
sense, various and sundry gangsters exchange profane threats with bug-eyed
malevolence, and Michael Massee plays his off-kilter Fed as a perfect
partner for the cross-dressing G-Man played by Duchovny himself on "Twin
Peaks."  John Hawkes does steal a few scenes as one of Hutton's edgier
hired guns, a ring-nosed psycho with a soft spot for his partners.  His
performance might have been even more effective if a dozen other
supporting players weren't making unhinged seem so unnecessary.
     The general tone of the performances makes Duchovny stand out like
Buster Keaton in a Three Stooges short.  His deadpan demeanor begins to
seem like a reaction to a bunch of nutcase actors let loose on the screen,
rather than the appropriate personality for his redemption-hungry
character.  In fact, Duchovny is too "together" most of the time; rock
bottom doesn't look all that bad if that's where he's supposed to be when
we meet him.  Then again, it's hard to say whether that particular
character choice was Duchovny's to make.  A thousand choices go into the
making of a movie; Duchovny's choice to accept this role was only one of
them.  You can see his star quality in PLAYING GOD, but you can also see
that picking a sharp script is no guarantee that an actor will be in a
sharply-made film.

Title
Review for Dangerous Ground (1997)
(New Line)
Starring:  Ice Cube, Elizabeth Hurley, Ving Rhames, Sechaba Morojele.
Screenplay:  Darrell Roodt and Greg Latter.
Producers:  Gillian Gorfil and Darrell Roodt.
Director:  Darrell James Roodt.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, drug use, brief nudity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Director Darrell James Roodt (SARAFINA!, CRY THE BELOVED COUNTRY) has
again returned to his native South Africa for the new urban crime drama
DANGEROUS GROUND...at least nominally.  Yes, the events of the story take
place in Johannesburg and Soweto and Sun City, but they might just as well
be taking place in New Jack or South Central.  I believe that is part of
the point Roodt is trying to make -- that post-apartheid South Africa has
become a dangerous ground of a different kind, much like the American
inner cities -- but he has chosen a singularly monotonous and pedantic way
of doing it.  Just beyond the nods to African culture and the wall of
homilies you will find a dreary guns-and-drugs picture that feels like the
least inspired of a hundred guns-and-drugs pictures you might have seen
before.  Only the accents have been changed to distinguish the guilty.
     Ice Cube stars in DANGEROUS GROUND as Vusi Madlazi, a South
African-born man who went into exile in the United States in 1983 to avoid
political persecution.  Now, 14 years later, Vusi returns to his homeland
for the first time to attend his father's funeral, and finds his family
facing other problems as well.  His youngest brother Stephen has not been
heard from in months, and Vusi's mother implores him as the new head of
the family to look for his brother.  Vusi ventures into Johannesburg to
find Stephen, finding a country much-changed after the fall of apartheid,
as well as finding some unpleasant truths about Stephen.  His girlfriend
Karen (Elizabeth Hurley) is a white stripper and a crack addict; Stephen
himself also apparently has a drug habit.  Worst of all, Stephen has
stolen $15,000 from an unforgiving drug lord named Muki (Ving Rhames),
putting everyone who knows Stephen in danger.  Vusi spends the next 48
hours trying to find Stephen before Muki does, dealing with a new South
Africa he understands only too well.
     The majority of DANGEROUS GROUND consists of Vusi wandering through
South Africa facing a variety of urban perils at carefully spaced
intervals:  a carjacking at the hands of sneering black youths; a racist
assault at the hands of sneering white youths; threats from a paranoid
coke dealer (co-screenwriter Greg Latter); kidnapping by Muki's henchmen.
We are left with little doubt that South Africa has become a place as full
of black self-destruction as America's inner cities, and not just because
Vusi gets to make laughably sincere speeches to force the point home.
"They got free and then they got high," Vusi says of American blacks to
his other brother Ernest (Sechaba Morojele); "don't fall asleep...the
struggle's not over."  Unfortunately, Roodt is so intent on making us see
the similarities between the current situations in South African and in
America that he doesn't seem to care about the similarities between his
movie and other movies about blacks facing a decaying environment.  Once
you acknowledge the sociological curiosity, you are left with a film
lacking anything new or interesting to say as a story.
     It doesn't help matters that Ice Cube is woefully miscast in the lead
role.  Ice Cube has proven that he can act, and he has a powerful screen
presence, but the character he is playing is supposed to be a doctoral
student in literature who has lost touch with "the struggle" while
ensconced in the Ivory Tower.  As he marches through DANGEROUS GROUND
wielding both an AK-47 and a certain four-letter epithet as though he were
writing his dissertation on those subjects, Ice looks about as much like a
bookish student as Keanu Reeves.  It is also a terribly one-dimensional
performance; it often seems that if he didn't have something to scowl at,
there wouldn't be any reason for him to have a face.  To be fair to Ice
Cube, I don't think there's much that anyone could have done with such a
ridiculous character.  If I were asked to deliver lines like "That's how
you fight a war...with education," or, "Guns are for cowards, not
warriors," I'd probably spend the entire film scowling, too.
     The main problem with DANGEROUS GROUND even as visceral entertainment
is that Roodt doesn't know how to do it.  He has written himself into a
corner by setting up a story like American urban crime stories, but he
seems wildly uncomfortable filming traditional action scenes.  The result
is perhaps the least interesting car chase in recent cinematic history, as
two cars chase each other around the spiraling levels of a parking garage,
and a climactic gunfight which is edited more with an interest in getting
it over with than making it interesting to watch.  If this same story had
been set in an American city, it would be hooted off the screen for its
derivative narrative, stupid characters and limp action.  It is certainly
depressing to think that black South Africans won a hard-fought struggle
against institutional racism only to fall to other foes; it is also
depressing to think that movies about blacks in South Africa can now be as
obsessed with drugs and violence as movies about blacks in America.
DANGEROUS GROUND, yes...and all-too-common ground, as well.

Title
Review for Maximum Risk (1996)
     What is it exactly about Jean-Claude Van Damme that is so appealing
to Hong Kong directors?  His familiarity with the action genre in which
they made their names?  A common struggle with the English language?  His
refusal to let plot interfere in a stunt?  Whatever the reason, two of the
great action directors of the last decade have chosen Van Damme vehicles
for their English language debuts, John Woo in 1993's HARD TARGET and now
Ringo Lam (CITY ON FIRE) in MAXIMUM RISK.  And what else do the two films
have in common?  Uninspired situations and action which is unlikely to
make anyone forget the director's Hong Kong efforts.
     Van Damme plays Alain Moreau, a Nice police officer who discovers,
much to his amazement, that he had a twin brother who was given up at
birth and raised in New York.  That brother, Mikhail Suverov, turns out to
have been involved with the Russian mafia, and is killed in Nice by
unknown assailants for an unknown reason.  Alain is determined to find out
about the brother he never knew, and sets off for New York to investigate.
There he discovers plenty of people who mistake him for Mikhail, most of
whom are none too pleased to see him, like mid-level mafia boss Ivan (Zach
Grenier) and federal agents who have their own reasons for wanting Mikhail
dead.  The only person Alain can trust is Mikhail's girlfriend Alex
(Natasha Henstridge) as he tries to stay alive long enough to find out
about the mysterious contents of a safe deposit box which everyone wants
to get their hands on.
     I find myself at something of a loss as I try to come up with
something worth saying about MAXIMUM RISK, because it is such a resolutely
mediocre film.  From the screams-of-generic title (fill in your favorite
dangerous-sounding adjective and noun here) to the screams-of-generic plot
(they killed his brother...now he's going to make them pay) to the
screams-of-circa-1986-generic villain (he may not be a Russian spy, but
he's still Russian), MAXIMUM RISK is a film that takes absolutely _no_
risk.  It even wastes the presence of Natasha Henstridge, who may not have
proven herself to be a gifted thespian yet but still has nearly as much
impressive physicality at her disposal as Van Damme, and the only use to
which it is put is in a nude scene which may re-define gratuitous.  The
one possible interesting twist -- Alain is a military-trained crack shot
-- is mysteriously kept under wraps until only ten minutes remain in the
film, when suddenly he can shoot an eye out at 200 yards.
     Van Damme himself is making gradual strides as an actor, something
genre cohorts like Steven Seagal may never do.  It may be a sign of his
desire to be taken seriously that the obligatory shot of his bare backside
does not appear in MAXIMUM RISK, although he does participate in a
fist-fight in a sauna where towels remain strategically placed in a manner
defying all known laws of physics.  The problem is that, through his own
decisions or those imposed on him by the Hollywood hierarchy, Van Damme
performs in the kind of films where serious acting usually looks just
plain silly.  Alain may be deeply affected by learning of the existence of
his twin, but when he is forced to react to that knowledge by throwing yet
another roundhouse kick or, worse yet, staring into a metaphorically
convenient fractured mirror, it is like Van Damme is playing at acting
rather than really acting.
     Still, there is a certain atmosphere to MAXIMUM RISK which shows
Ringo Lam struggling to assert himself over his soggy material.  It has a
dirty feel which is atypical of glossy Hollywood adventures, and a few
action sequences have real crackle, particularly the opening chase through
the streets of Nice.  Lam clearly has the chops to put the action in an
action film, a knack for pacing and an awareness of where a camera should
go.  What he can't do is turn lead into gold, and in MAXIMUM RISK he is
working with a script that is about as leaden as they come.  John Woo made
the big time when he moved from Van Damme to Travolta in BROKEN ARROW;
here's hoping Lam gets the same shot some time soon.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
DEEP BLUE SEA
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Samuel L. Jackson,
Jacqueline McKenzie, Michael Rapaport, Stellan Skarsgaard.
Screenplay:  Duncan Kennedy and Donna Powers & Wayne Powers.
Producers:  Akiva Goldsman, Tony Ludwig and Alan Riche.
Director:  Renny Harlin.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Steven Spielberg has said for years that one of the keys to the
success of JAWS was technical failure.  The mechanical shark
affectionately nicknamed "Bruce" wasn't necessarily supposed to be a
shadowy figure menacing the protagonists from the fringes of the frame --
he just didn't work right.  Bruce's frequent unannounced work stoppages
forced Spielberg to get more creative.  The rest is a milestone in
cinematic suspense history, further proof that real terror comes not from
what we see, but from what we're afraid we're going to see.
     It would be easy enough to scoff at DEEP BLUE SEA as a gloss on JAWS
that just doesn't "get it," but that wouldn't be entirely fair.  JAWS,
whether intentionally or made necessary by technical limitations, was a
suspense film; DEEP BLUE SEA is an old-fashioned monster movie.  The
killer predators here are experimental subjects in a floating research
facility off the coast of Baja California, enhanced by Dr. Susan McAlester
(Saffron Burrows) to promote her research into a shark-based cure for
degenerative brain disease.  An unfortunate side effect of her research is
that the brains of her test sharks are now large enough to permit higher
cognitive functions, inspiring such fishy thoughts as "I guess it's about
time to destroy the facility and kill all the humans."
     Thus begins a person-by-person chomp-fest through a cast that
includes (not necessarily in order of consumption) Samuel L. Jackson (as a
pharmaceutical company bigwig), Thomas Jane (as a shark diver with a
checkered past), LL Cool J (as a religiously devout chef), Michael
Rapaport (as the chief engineer) and Stellan Skarsgaard (as a vaguely
eccentric research scientist).  The genre conventions are all terribly
conventional, but director Renny Harlin stages them with methodical
effectiveness.  There are a few solid scares and one magnificently
effective shock, the kind that leaves an audience giggling nervously for
several seconds.  There's even some cautionary nonsense about scientific
hubris, in the fine tradition of FRANKENSTEIN or THE FLY.  It's what
monster movies are supposed to do, and DEEP BLUE SEA uses its trio of
toothy villains to deliver the requisite armrest-gripping.
     If only anyone involved with the script had taken a second to go
beyond the merely requisite.  DEEP BLUE SEA is full of half-completed
characters doing generally stupid things.  Granted, the monster movie as
we know it would not exist without people doing generally stupid things,
but it's still frustrating to put up with them saying stupid things at the
same time.  The film gets even sloppier by positing not merely that the
sharks have developed advanced intelligence, but that they have apparently
studied physics and engineering, and had access to detailed schematic
diagrams of the facility.  There's only so far a film can involve you when
it treats the viewers as though they're dumb and treats the characters as
though they're chum.
     DEEP BLUE SEA is, of course, following in some mighty big footsteps
in the killer shark milieu, which makes it even more surprising that there
are so many echoes of JAWS and its sequels.  The opening sequence involves
a night attack on some frivolous teenagers; one shark is dispatched with a
bite on an electric cable (JAWS 2); another ends up raining down in
bite-sized chunks.  It's almost as though Harlin and company _want_ the
film to be compared to JAWS, as though they think they've one-upped the
ultimate shark film.  In the press notes, Harlin says of JAWS, "It's 25
years later, and audiences, accustomed to animatronics and
computer-generated imagery, need to see more."  And perhaps he's right,
but that still only makes DEEP BLUE SEA a technically-proficient monster
movie.  As character-driven suspense, it bites off much more than it can
chew.

Title
Review for Tombstone (1993)
Starring:  Kurt Russell, Val Kilmer, Michael Biehn, Sam Elliott,
Bill Paxton, Dana Delaney, Powers Boothe, Stephen Lang.
Screenplay:  Kevin Jarre.
Director:  George P. Cosmatos.
     After a few decades when Westerns were about as easy to find as
Jimmy Hoffa, it seems like you can't sneeze at the movies these days
without hitting a horse.  The success of DANCES WITH WOLVES and
UNFORGIVEN has inspired a whole herd of giddyap yarns.  In 1993 we've
already seen POSSE and GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND, and now comes the
first of two Wyatt Earp projects set to hit theaters in a six month
span (a Lawrence Kasdan/Kevin Costner project is due in late spring).
TOMBSTONE is the name, ma'am, and surprisingly lively entertainment is
the game.  While no great piece of art, TOMBSTONE is a real
old-fashioned shoot-em-up, energetically staged and acted and featuring
a particularly memorable performance from Val Kilmer.
     TOMBSTONE opens in 1879 as Wyatt Earp (Kurt Russell) arrives in
Tombstone, Arizona to join brothers Virgil (Sam Elliott) and Morgan
(Bill Paxton).  Although a legendary lawman in Kansas, Wyatt insists
he's retired, content to run a small casino in the booming mining
town.  However, peace and quiet are not in the cards for the Earps.
The wild and violent Cowboys, led by Curly Bill (Powers Boothe) and
Johnny Ringo (Michael Biehn), hold Tombstone in a perpetual state of
lawlessness, and eventually the violence escalates into the legendary
showdown at the OK Corral, with the Earps and gambler Doc Holliday (Val
Kilmer) facing a group of Cowboys including Ike Clanton (Stephen
Lang).  But even that battle is not the end, as Tombstone becomes the
nexus of a blood feud which won't end until one side or the other is
completely dead.
     Director George P. Cosmatos is best known for the ultra-violent
RAMBO, and TOMBSTONE shows many similarities.  There is a great deal of
montage-style violence, and an armory full of bullets fired.  It's
action that TOMBSTONE is about first and foremost, and it delivers big
time.  There are few slow stretches, and they usually build towards
something.  The big shootout at the OK Corral might be the least
effective of the action pieces; it's edited in a fairly confusing
fashion which may accent the chaos of the situation but doesn't always
make it clear who's shooting whom.  Otherwise the action is extremely
well-choreographed, backed up by a Bruce Broughton score a bit too
reminiscent of his work on SILVERADO.
     Fortunately, the action is where the comparisons to RAMBO end.
TOMBSTONE is well-acted by its ensemble cast, in spite of the most
distracting (if authentic) facial hair this side of GETTYSBURG.  Kurt
Russell, never the most versatile of leading men, does bring an intense
and reluctant heroism to Wyatt.  He's particularly good in a couple of
scenes where he uses his reputation to force other men to back down,
burning holes in them with his eyes.  Sam Elliott and Bill Paxton are a
bit more wooden in less-developed roles, but for the stoic and
civic-minded Earps it's not a distraction.  The lead Cowboys are
uniformly good, notably Stephen Lang as the cowardly Ike Clanton and
Michael Biehn as the icy Johnny Ringo.  However, the real star of
TOMBSTONE is Val Kilmer, who has a devilishly wonderful time with the
acerbic, sickly Doc Holliday.  Sure, his lines are campy and
anachronistic, but they are also quite funny.  He drawls out his quips
with a sly confidence, and turns in probably his best all-around
performance yet.
     TOMBSTONE's one glaring misstep is spending any time at all on the
relationship between Wyatt and a traveling actor played by Dana
Delaney.  Delaney is lovely, but her character is just a distraction
(as, unfortunately, are all of the female characters in TOMBSTONE),
never adding anything in particular to the story or to Wyatt's
character.  Their scenes together seem simply to be a nod to the
conventional wisdom that you need a love story to get women into the
theater.  While it's spending time wandering through the flowers,
TOMBSTONE is nothing special, but when it sticks to its guns it
generally finds its target.

Title
Review for Shadow Conspiracy (1997)
     For the record, I don't tend to put much stock in conspiracy
theories.  I don't believe the CIA had Kennedy killed, I don't believe
there is a flying saucer hidden somewhere near Roswell, New Mexico and I
don't believe that polio vaccinations are part of a secret plot to place
tracking devices in our bodies.  Call me a starry-eyed optimist if you
must, but I think people are capable of quite enough selfish nastiness on
an individual basis, and that that very same selfishness makes cooperative
nastiness an endeavor riddled with problems.  When it comes to Hollywood,
however, I might be willing to make an exception.  Studios just may be
conspiring to sap from our brains the ability to recognize clumsy stories
which make only the faintest sense.  By comparison to the crimes SHADOW
CONSPIRACY perpetrates on an unsuspecting audience, the crimes in its
so-called plot seem positively benign.
     Charlie Sheen stars as Bobby Bishop, a Presidential speech writer and
advisor on his way up the Washington power chain through his deft ability
to doctor a spin.  It is just another day in the capital when a former
professor of Bobby's (Theodore Bikel) meets Bobby on the street to warn
him of a secret government cabal called Shadow -- just before the
professor is shot in the head by a brutal agent (Stephen Lang).  Suddenly
Bobby finds himself running for his life, able to trust only two people:
Jake Conrad (Donald Sutherland), Bobby's mentor and the White House
Chief-of-Staff, and Amanda Givens (Linda Hamilton), a reporter and Bobby's
former girlfriend.  Together, they must find out who is behind Shadow and
what their diabolical plans are.
     Sheen appears to be basing his film career on playing the dupe (he
was also a patsy sniffing out dirty doings in TERMINAL VELOCITY and THE
ARRIVAL), but if he could be suckered into taking on a script like this,
perhaps he's not doing all that much acting.  SHADOW CONSPIRACY, credited
to the writing tandem of Adi Hasak and Ric Gibbs, appears to be the
product of screenplay software, introducing hackneyed situations and
characters without enough energy to make the cliches tolerable.  The hero
is established as a cocky smooth-talker, but instead of giving him chances
to talk himself out of difficult situations the script keeps him
perpetually running away from the Terminator-like Lang (Linda Hamilton
must have been experiencing serious deja-vu).  Hamilton acts as the
obligatory romantic sparring partner, except that Bobby and Amanda grumble
at each other only briefly before settling into a dreary camaraderie.  The
betrayal, the chase scene, the narrow escape...all the ingredients are
there, but they sit there flatly without the benefit of a single moment of
imagination
     If the basic material is bad, then the execution is even worse.  The
direction (by RAMBO's George P. Cosmatos) and editing (by Robert A.
Ferretti) in SHADOW CONSPIRACY are inept to a degree that seems almost
(conspiratorially?) designed.  One chase flashes from a luxury hotel to a
homeless encampment to a sewer out of LES MISERABLES with a blissful
disregard for continuity; scenes designed for tension become
inconsequential blurs, and characters wander through the narrative for an
hour before you have a clue what they are supposed to be doing.  Cosmatos
doesn't even understand basic principles of drama, making a point of
showing us a tricky-to-unlatch seat-belt which then plays no further part
in the story, an un-fired gun which probably sent Chekhov to spinning in
his grave.  SHADOW CONSPIRACY is the kind of incomprehensible mess where a
highly trained agent is willing to run through a hotel and a city street
firing a gun in full view of hundreds of witnesses, then decides to get
secretive by building a remote-controlled toy helicopter to assassinate
the President.
     That climactic scene at least provides a moment of absurdist fun, the
only one SHADOW CONSPIRACY has to offer unless you count the floppy hats
Hamilton favors which are sure to gain a White House correspondent
professional respect.  Mostly, it is just a plodding and somber piece of
nonsense which seems to expect brownie points for showing us all the ways
the government can keep an eye on us, and ends with an ominous tracking
shot to the perspective of a spy satellite.  Personally, I feel more
threatened by the prospect of lazy, pre-fabricated thrillers foisted off 
on the American viewing public as entertainment.  If the people who
brought us SHADOW CONSPIRACY are supposed to be the ones to shine the
light on sinister conspiracies which threaten our freedoms, all I have to
say is:  who's watching the watchmen?

Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
GOODBYE LOVER
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Patricia Arquette, Dermot Mulroney, Ellen DeGeneres,
Mary-Louise Parker, Don Johnson, Ray McKinnon.
Screenplay:  Ron Peer and Joel Cohen & Alec Sokolow.
Producers:  Alexandra Milchan, Patrick McDarrah, Joel Roodman and Chris
Daniel.
Director:  Roland Joffe.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     GOODBYE LOVER is the kind of nihilistic entertainment that gives you
a few giggles while watching it, then leaves you feeling dirty for not
loathing the whole enterprise.  Aptly labeled a "film-gris" in the
production notes, it's a convoluted comic thriller centered around Sandra
Dunmore (Patricia Arquette), a real estate agent with dreams of the good
life and a car full of motivational tapes reminding her that she can have
it.  Standing in her way, unfortunately, is her alcoholic husband Jake
(Dermot Mulroney), which leads her to an affair with Jake's more
successful brother Ben (Don Johnson), while Ben also romances a co-worker 
named Peggy (Mary-Louise Parker) on the side.  When the tangled
interactions of this quartet leads to murder, Det. Rita Pompano (Ellen
DeGeneres) comes on the scene to investigate and discovers that very
little is what it appears to be.
     The reason nothing is what it appears to be is that GOODBYE LOVER is
a film about twisty-turny plotting...and, essentially, that's _all_ it's
about.  Allegiances shift, backs are stabbed (figuratively and literally),
and greed is the order of the day.  It's the kind of stuff that usually
makes a film interesting to watch thanks to its unpredictability, but
GOODBYE LOVER becomes strangely predictable in its unpredictability.  It's
so instantly obvious that it's a film about hidden agendas that it becomes
a matter of waiting until the next character's obviously hidden agenda is
revealed.  There's not much fun in the zigs and zags the story takes
because every 20 minutes or so you know it's going to be time for the next
zig or zag, and the next permutation in a series of unholy alliances.
     There's still something over-the-top goofy about GOODBYE LOVER which
makes it possible to slip into its sociopathic world.  Patricia Arquette
is an ideal cast as Sandra, a driven Barbie doll who sees herself as the
cutthroat reincarnation of Julie Andrews' Maria from THE SOUND OF MUSIC.
The performance is only so-so, but the character is such a wild blend of
madonna and whore that she's enjoyable to watch.  Ellen DeGeneres gets
most of the prime punch lines as the embittered Det. Pompano, most
directed at her morally upright Mormon partner (Ray McKinnon).  The real
key to appreciating GOODBYE LOVER, however, is slipping into the slickness
of a production which takes the image of Los Angeles as duplicity capital
of the world and blows it up to billboard size.  From the encounters with
spin-doctoring publicists to the ubiquitous use of mirrors, GOODBYE LOVER
has a blast with tarted-up sleaze and the way motivated misanthropes can
create an image that allows them get away with murder (literally and
figuratively).
     In fact, GOODBYE LOVER is so gleeful in its complete absence of
humanity that it may take you a while after it's over before you feel the
need to shower its decadence right off of yourself.  It's too self-aware
of its lack of real characters to inspire too much head-wagging, but it's
still one of those films that finds it cool to set up the only person with
an ounce of optimism as an object of ridicule.  GOODBYE LOVER is full of
ugly-on-the-inside types who feel justified doing whatever it takes to
grab the golden ring because, after all, everyone else is doing it.
There's just enough residual cheesiness to keep the film in the realm of
the surreal, with just enough bleak attitude to blunt its surreal appeal.
It's not a thriller so much as it is an ultra-black comedy, where part of
the joke is on you for leaving your moral outrage at the door.

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
Up on Wholywood Hill, over at Whoniversal
A most challenging film was beginning rehearsal --
A live-action, big-budget, super-sensation
Headlined by The Grinch, Dr. Seuss's creation.
As both book and cartoon, people loved the Yule tale,
But a feature-length Grinch?
It must certainly fail.
Now fans of a hand-drawn Grinch might say, of course,
That this version strays much too far from the source.
Yes, it's true that Ron Howard's film plays fast and loose
With the text and the themes and the verse a la Seuss,
But there's plenty of reason to feel bright and merry
At the pleasures of watching the Grinch a la Carrey.
In Whoville the story begins, as it should,
With a young-ish Who girl who thinks things aren't so good.
With Christmastime bustle abuzz in the town,
Cindy Lou sees priorities quite upside-down.
Played by young Taylor Momsen, this sweet-natured lass
Is ready to give all the presents a pass
And reach out in true Christmas spirit and joy
To the Grinch, who once lived among Whos as a boy.
As part of the back-story, added for drama
We learn that the Grinch suffered some Christmas trauma
And fled to a mountain away from these creatures
Where he grew to adulthood with Jim Carrey's features.
After one failed attempt at a Grinchy inclusion
In Who celebrations, he's back to seclusion
To plot, as we know, stealing all Christmas treasures
So no one might have any holiday pleasures.
The film-makers make a true Seussian world
Where arches may tilt and where storefronts are curled.
>From the bright, shiny colors and odd camera angles
To makeup and hairstyles and costumes with spangles,
The style of THE GRINCH is true Seuss, first to last.
But this twist on the narrative ...
Well, not so fast.
In stretching the story an hour and more,
The screenwriters miss what the tale was before.
Here the Whos are the ones who have so much to learn
And the Grinch, in a quite unpredictable turn,
Isn't just by his far-too-small ticker afflicted.
He's misunderstood, under-loved and conflicted.
The character isn't improved by the shift;
Imagine a mean one who's just slightly miffed.
This misguided Grinch psychological stuff
Might have sunk the whole enterprise quickly enough
If not for the singular sardonic spin
Of Jim Carrey under his green Grinchy grin.
THE GRINCH is his show, and he's up to the task
With the same inspiration we saw in THE MASK.
Whenever he's left to his improvisations,
His facial and physical manipulations,
THE GRINCH is a triumph of comic invention
(Though many jokes won't reach a kid's comprehension).
The rapid-fire gags and sly insider wit
Are almost all funny, nearly every last bit.
It's true that this GRINCH may have some firm detractors
Who hate the whole notion of Whos played by actors,
Or those who think classics should be left alone
And not be big-budgeted and over-blown.
It's equally true that the loss of some verse
In favor of prose is a change for the worse.
This isn't the Grinch of the Seussian vision,
And giving him "depth" proves a silly decision
But all is forgiven when Carrey takes flight
Delivering lines with that wonderful bite.
A true timeless classic this film may not be;
It's simply a package of holiday glee.
On the Renshaw scale of 0 to 10 green parties:  7.

Title
Review for Jingle All the Way (1996)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Sinbad, Phil Hartman, Rita Wilson, James
Belushi, Jake Lloyd.
Screenplay:  Randy Kornfield and Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont.
Producers:  Chris Columbus, Mark Radcliffe, Michael Barnathan.
Director:  Brian Levant.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, cartoon violence)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     JINGLE ALL THE WAY is the first film from Chris Columbus' 1492
production company which was not directed by Columbus himself, and I found
myself curious as to whether it would resemble the producing efforts of
his mentors Steven Spielberg and John Hughes -- more specifically, would
it look like a clone of Columbus' own films?  Just as an experiment, I
predicted to myself that JINGLE ALL THE WAY would involve an 
irresponsible/inconsiderate adult who, after plenty of broadly comic
trials and tribulations, learns What's Really Important.  That particular
combination of slapstick and sentimentality had served Columbus well in
two HOME ALONE films, MRS. DOUBTFIRE and NINE MONTHS (making him the third
highest grossing director in history behind Spielberg and Robert
Zemeckis), and there was no reason to suspect he wouldn't go to the well
again.
     Well, son of a gun, guess what.  JINGLE ALL THE WAY finds Arnold
Schwarzenegger playing Howard Langston, an irresponsible/inconsiderate
harried businessman who is forever disappointing his young son Jamie (Jake
Lloyd) by missing all the important events in his life.  Determined to
make it up to Jamie, Howard promises him that he will get the Christmas
present he wants the most:  the action figure of Turbo Man, a wildly
popular television action series character who has become a wildly popular
toy.  Unfortunately, Howard waits until Christmas Eve to make his
purchase, forcing him to go on a desperate search across Minneapolis to
find the scarce toy, and to battle with another equally desperate father,
mail carrier Myron Larabee (Sinbad), for one of the few Turbo Man figures
remaining in the city.
     And, of course, Howard walks away from his experiences having learned
What's Really Important.  I suspect Columbus may be fond of such
warm-n-fuzzy denouements because he wants to leave his audience with the
impression that it has watched something more meaningful than a
live-action cartoon.  The fact is that JINGLE ALL THE WAY is in many ways
a better cartoon than SPACE JAM, directed by Brian Levant (THE
FLINTSTONES) with an emphasis on absurd, elaborate sequences of physical
comedy which at least have a certain momentum.  Yes, some of them run on
past the point of diminishing returns, like a seemingly endless pursuit of
a bouncing ball, but other moments are keepers.  The "Turbo Man" TV
program is a neat little jab at "Power Rangers"-type shows in all their
over-marketed glory, and Schwarzenegger's encounter with an enraged
reindeer works better than it sounds.  Miraculously, there is also only
one scene of a kick to the groin in all the mayhem.
     It is when JINGLE ALL THE WAY turns message-y on us that it not only
loses steam, but demonstrates its crucial bit of mis-casting.  The guilty
party is Schwarzenegger himself, who has failed to understand the kind of
comedy in which he can be successful.  In the past, he has gone for laughs
playing against his image, his sheer physical presence -- see Arnie paired
with Danny DeVito as a mild-mannered genius in TWINS, see Arnie struggle
with toddlers in KINDERGARTEN COP, see Arnie pregnant in JUNIOR.  In
JINGLE ALL THE WAY, he is frequently put in the position of threatening
people to get his way, and it is not nearly the visual gag it could have
been when the massive Schwarzenegger is forced to play the part of Turbo
Man in a parade.  A Steve Martin, Michael Keaton or even Robin Williams
might have made Howard's quest more interesting, and the character more
sympathetic; with Big Arnold, JINGLE is simply frantic and a bit too
mean-spirited.
     Fortunately, Schwarzenegger has a pair of comic co-stars with more
sense for the material.  Sinbad plays a character with no consistent
personality -- sometimes a harmless nut, sometimes the film's villain --
but he can still make lame material funny (witness FIRST KID).  If JINGLE
ALL THE WAY had to star Schwarzenegger, it is to Levant and Columbus'
credit that they got someone both funny _and_ a physical match to be his
adversary.  Phil Hartman also has a fun part as the Langstons' next-door
neighbor Ted, who is like "The Simpsons'" Ned Flanders with a hyper-active
libido.  It is Ted's job to hit on Howard's wife Liz (Rita Wilson), which,
of course, helps Howard to realize What's Really Important.  What's really
important to remember about JINGLE ALL THE WAY is that its target audience
is probably under 12 years old, and that 90% of the humor involves bodily
injury, property damage, or some combination of the two.  Columbus wasn't
trying to discover any new worlds here.  He's already discovered a formula
which works.

Title
Review for Flintstones, The (1994)
Starring:  John Goodman, Rick Moranis, Elizabeth Perkins,
           Rosie O'Donnell, Kyle MacLachlan, Halle Berry,
           Elizabeth Taylor.
Screenplay:  Tom S. Parker & Jim Jennewein and Steven E. de Souza.
Director:  Brian Levant.
     I decided to try something different for THE FLINTSTONES.  I put
aside my critical notebook and tried to clear my mind of all
preconceptions: the thirty-two writers who worked on the script; the
mind-numbing marketing blitz; the dread at the appearance of yet
another TV retread.  And I resolved to let it be what it would be, to
tell myself, Norman Vincent Peale-like, "I will enjoy this film on its
own level."  Do you know what?  It almost worked.  As silly, clunky and
repetitive as THE FLINTSTONES may be, it's still something of a guilty
pleasure, at least on a visual level.  While it's no film for the ages,
neither is it a modern stone-age travesty.
     THE FLINTSTONES gathers the familiar cast of Bedrock denizens from
the 1960's animated series:  Fred (John Goodman) and Wilma (Elizabeth
Perkins) and Barney (Rick Moranis) and Betty (Rosie O'Donnell).  As the
film opens, the Rubbles are just adopting Bam-Bam, thanks to a generous
loan from Fred which improves their credit standing.  As a gesture of
gratitude, Barney secretly switches his results with Fred's on a
management training test at the quarry, knowing Fred did poorly.
Suddenly, Fred finds himself out of the quarry and into the front
office, unbeknownst to him to serve as a yabba-dabba-dupe in an
embezzlement scheme concocted by vice-president Cliff Vandercave (Kyle
MacLachlan) and sexy secretary Sharon Stone (Halle Berry).  Will
success spoil Fred Flintstone?
     It's tempting to call THE FLINTSTONES imaginative, but there
really wouldn't seem to be all that much imagination involved in
directly transferring the animated series to live action.  Every house,
every costume, even every sound effect is instantly recognizable to
anyone who grew up with "The Flintstones" either in first run or
syndication.  Of course, that is the logic behind the glut of TV-based
films:  bring in that elusive older audience with the
nostalgia/recognition factor.  If my audience was any indication, it's
working with THE FLINTSTONES.  While the kids screeched with delight at
the slapstick, the biggest laugh from the adults was reserved for Rosie
O'Donnell's pitch-perfect duplication of Betty's trademark giggle.  The
dinosaur appliances, courtesy of Jim Henson's Creature Shop, are
expertly realized, and the Bedrock town life scenes are well-staged by
director Brian Levant.  I generally found myself entertained while I
took in the production design and admired its whimsical authenticity.
     There is, however, one major problem with the casting, and it
comes as quite a surprise.  While it would seem that John Goodman was
born to play Fred Flintstone, he never looks quite comfortable.
Physically, he pulls his punches more often than not, as though he
didn't understand just how far overboard he should go in a live action
cartoon; in his delivery, he struggles with the blustering voice
originated by Alan Reed, and appears to be re-routing it through Jackie
Gleason (whose "Honeymooners" character Ralph Kramden was the model for
Fred Flintstone).  Goodman's relatively weak Fred unfortunately
overshadows his solid castmates.  Rick Moranis is an appealingly
amiable Barney, and Rosie O'Donnell, while not ideal physically as
Betty, had the mannerisms down pat.  Elizabeth Perkins has the
low-impact role as Wilma, but she too is on target.  And it may be
worth the price of admission just to see Elizabeth Taylor, as Wilma's
mother, tied up and gagged and lying on the ground.
     One interesting by-product came out of seeing THE FLINTSTONES:  I
realized that I had under-appreciated the ADDAMS FAMILY films.  Like
those films, THE FLINTSTONES primarily offers as its humor variations
on a single theme.  But the ADDAMS outings at least seemed occasionally
inspired; THE FLINTSTONES is content just to show up and toss off the
expected "rock" and "stone" puns.  This is especially disconcerting
when a FLINTSTONES franchise may be as close to a sure thing as there
is in Hollywood.  The first time around, THE FLINTSTONES' visuals are a
light-hearted kick, but there's nothing more to do.  I could write that
sequel given a day and a half ... and a $40 million budget.

Title
Review for Free Willy 3: The Rescue (1997)
     After three feature films, the FREE WILLY franchise appears ready at
last to take its natural place in the CBS Saturday night prime time
lineup.  The 1993 original was the de facto pilot, introducing Jesse
(Jason James Richter), the troubled teen who learns responsibility through
his love for a killer whale named Willy.  In two sequels, 1995's FREE
WILLY 2: THE ADVENTURE HOME and the new FREE WILLY 3: THE RESCUE, Jesse
and Willy worked to help other mixed-up kids while teaching important
lessons about environmental responsibility.  Now, with the guidance of
Jesse's wise Native American mentor Randolph (August Schellenberg), they
can continue that mission every week on "Free Willy: Touched by an Orca."
     Sure, it's easy to take cynical swipes at family entertainment,
especially formulaic family entertainment like FREE WILLY 3.  And perhaps
it deserves better.  After all, there is a modicum of intelligence to John
Mattson's script, which pits Jesse and company against the crew of a
whaling boat.  Sam Pillsbury's direction is pleasantly restrained,
particularly when dealing with his young actors.  There is an interesting
sub-plot involving the son (Vincent Berry) of the whaling boat captain
(Patrick Kilpatrick) which teaches a lesson about standing up for your
convictions.  All that, and not once does anyone get kicked in the groin
or break wind.
     But family audiences deserve better, too.  They shouldn't have to
settle for merely competent film-making like FREE WILLY 3 simply because
it's less noxious than the alternatives.  Every one of the things FREE
WILLY 3 has going for it is something the delightful SHILOH also managed
to do -- and do better -- without making the villain so predictable he
refers to whales as "fish," or padding the running time with several
minutes of second unit nature footage.  There is nothing actively
insulting, offensive or annoying about FREE WILLY 3.  There is nothing
actively entertaining or enriching about it, either, unless it is to learn
the sheer tonnage of blood which accompanies the birth of a baby orca.
     Certain self-appointed guardians of cinematic morality have
pronounced that American parents are clamoring for worthy films to show
their children.  I'm still waiting for the din to reach my ears.  I
certainly didn't hear anyone clamoring for yet another FREE WILLY film,
especially after the over-plotted and half-baked FREE WILLY 2.  It's too
easy for parents to settle, too easy for producers to give parents as much
as they will tolerate and nothing more.  It's easier still for parents to
rent videos for the kids, or to turn on America's Night of Television,
where they may be seeing Willy again before long.  Welcome home.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
(Artisan)
Starring:  Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
Screenplay:  Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Producers:  Gregg hale and Robin Cowie.
Directors:  Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, intense situations)
Running Time:  86 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The last of the 34 films I screened at Sundance this year was not
merely the best film the festival had to offer.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
is a work of genre-redefining brilliance, a strong early candidate for the
best film of 1999, and one of the most unnerving psychological thrillers
ever made.  It works on the kind of primal level that will leave you
shaking for hours afterwards.  It's the kind of film for which festivals
like this truly exist.
     The concept alone is ingenious enough to grab interest (though not
utterly unique): an on-screen caption at the beginning of the film
announces that three college students disappeared in the Black Hills of
Maryland in 1994 while making a documentary film, and that only the
footage they shot was ever found.  Thus begins a 90-minute, verite-style
tale of the three students -- director Heather (Heather Donahue),
cameraman Josh (Joshua Leonard) and sound man Mike (Michael Williams) --
and their project to make a film about a local legend.  The story goes
that mass child murders and other disappearances in the area formerly
known as Blair are the work of the "Blair Witch," who lives in the hills
above the town.  The project leads to a two-day hike for location footage,
two days that we watch turn into a seemingly endless nightmare when the
trio gets lost and the sounds at night grow ever more disturbing.
     THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT begins with a seductive lightness of tone, as
the filmmakers record both their own preparations for the project (on
digital video) and the background interviews that will become part of
their film (on 16 mm film).  The interviews are frequently quite funny --
including a mother whose toddler grows disturbed by the scary story she's
telling -- while they also provide insight that the filmmakers really
don't take the legend very seriously.  The video pieces, meanwhile,
establish character traits that become crucial later in the film.
Heather, the project's leader, shows an unshakable-bordering-on-foolish
confidence in herself, leading to trouble; Mike, who expresses concerns
earlier than anyone, becomes the voice of common sense.  Writer/directors
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez don't just set up a scary story -- they
set up the people to whom this scary story will happen.
     And folks, scary ain't even the half of it.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
is the kind of film that wreaks its havoc almost entirely in your head,
just as the events in the film wreak havoc in the heads of the characters.
The directors use darkness and sound with shudder-inducing effectiveness,
never once resorting to cheap, trite tricks like people jumping into frame
or blasts of dissonant music (there is, in fact, no musical underscore of
any kind).  What we experience in THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is the collapse
of sanity -- as days go by, the three filmmakers run out of food, suffer
from sleep deprivation and cold, and gradually come to believe that they
may never find their way home again.  Heather reassures herself and the
others early in their experience that "it's very hard to get lost in
America, and even harder to stay lost," but the film plays on exactly that
fear of the wildnerness with a technique that will leave you
adrenaline-charged and breathless.
     Some viewers may be put off by the fact that the set-up guarantees a
bad end for the protagonists, or incredulous regarding why they would
continue to record their experiences.  Those elements might have troubled
me had THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT not established its characters so well that
they mattered more than the situation in which they find themselves.  All
three of the largely-improvised performances are dead on -- I dare a
viewer to find a moment when you can tell anyone is acting -- but Heather
Donahue's work is emotionally shattering.  Late in the film, she
videotapes an apology to her own parents and the parents of the two men
for placing them in such danger, the camera capturing only her eyes as she
speaks.  They are the eyes of a hunted animal, and the words she speaks
will chill you to your soul.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT works as a study of
disintegrating humanity only because we feel the humanity of these three
brash kids to begin with.  You expect a good horror film to be terrifying.
What makes this one great -- perhaps one of the best ever -- is that it's
also heartbreaking.

Title
Review for Adventures of Pinocchio, The (1996)
Starring:  Martin Landau, Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Udo Kier, Bebe Neuwirth,
Rob Schneider, Genevieve Bujold, David Doyle.
Screenplay:  Sherry Mills, Steve Barron, Tom Benedek, Barry Berman.
Director:  Steve Barron.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is a single word which is quite conspicuous in its complete
absence from the production notes for THE ADVENTURES OF PINOCCHIO:
"Disney."  There are references to "the version most audiences find
familiar," and comments about the "watered-down" adaptation, but nowhere
does anyone acknowledge that Disney's 1940 animated classic presents a
rather tough act to follow, perhaps as though they are wishing upon a star
to erase that legacy.  Naturally, the film-makers have chosen to push the
fact that this version is more "in the spirit" of the 1883 children's tale
by Carlo Collodi than previous film versions, but while THE ADVENTURES OF
PINOCCHIO might be closer to the source material than that "version most
audiences find familiar," I suspect it won't be closer to the hearts of
many viewers.  It is a moderately diverting entertainment for children
with little to offer for adults.
     It is, of course, the story of a lonely puppet-maker named Geppetto
(Martin Landau), who many years earlier carved his initial and that of his
unrequited love Leona (Genevieve Bujold) into a pine tree.  Now an old
man, Geppetto unknowingly cuts down that tree, and carves the trunk into a
puppet boy he calls Pinocchio.  Miraculously, Pinocchio (voiced by
Jonathan Taylor Thomas) comes to life, and with a curiosity to explore his
new surroundings.  That brings him to the attention of Felinet (Bebe
Neuwirth) and Volpe (Rob Schneider), two money-hungry scoundrels who want
to bring him to the attention of wicked puppet show master Lorenzini (Udo
Kier).  Pinocchio is separated from Geppetto, and begins a series of
adventures which will bring him to the playland of Terra Magica and into
the belly of a giant sea creature on his quest to become a real boy.
     There are a number of new twists to this telling of "Pinocchio" which
are actually quite interesting, chief among them the portrayal of
Pinocchio himself.  Disney's Pinocchio usually seemed to be an innocent
victim of naivete; director and co-scripter Steve Barron (TEENAGE MUTANT
NINJA TURTLES) makes him a bit more of a mischief-maker in his own right,
never malicious but showing his share of the things that little boys are
made of so that he can experience real growth.  The Pinocchio puppet
created by Jim Henson's Creature Shop actually makes him look like an
expressive piece of wood, and Jonathan Taylor Thomas (no stranger to voice
work after doing the young Simba in THE LION KING) does a nice job of
allowing him to mature.  The production design is also exceptional, with
the Czech Republic town of Cesky Krumlov providing the perfect storybook
look for Geppetto's village.
     Still there is that legacy, and THE ADVENTURES OF PINOCCHIO finds
itself in the most trouble when it brings to mind the way similar
sequences were handled by Disney.  All of the most familiar moments are
here -- Pinocchio's triumphant performance at the puppet show; his
fib-enhanced growing nose; the transformation of Lampwick (Corey Carrier)
into a jackass; the escape from inside the whale -- but the changes in
those scenes are generally cases of trying to make them bigger rather than
better.  The transformation scene is particularly noteworthy in this
respect, placing Pinocchio, Lampwick and a pair of other boys on what
appears to be the Indiana Jones Adventure, rocketing through caverns at
maximum speed and volume.  Most disgracefully, Barron handles the
expectation for a cricket conscience by creating a computer generated
insect named Pepe (voice of David Doyle, erstwhile Bosley of "Charlie's
Angels" infamy).  Barron seems to have no idea what to do with him except
consistently have him magnified or placed in annoying perspective shots,
and his comments generally consist of limp attempts at anachronistic
humor.  Jiminy Cricket was a dignified voice of restraint; Pepe is a kooky
sidekick.
     On the one hand, I want to give Barron credit for trying to unify the
episodes of "Pinocchio," for eliminating the deus ex machina fairy and for
underscoring the relationship between Pinocchio and Geppetto which seems
to be an afterthought in Disney's version.  Unfortunately, he doesn't
really get where he wants to go, and he is too interested in keeping the
kids happy with slapstick and the ever-popular dog urination gag to pay
attention to the story which might mean something to adults.  THE
ADVENTURES OF PINOCCHIO has enough visual spark to please young audiences,
and a noble enough message to appease their parents, but it lacks the wit,
warmth and emotional highs to erase the memory it is trying so hard to
erase.  This PINOCCHIO may become a real boy, but he's not the real thing.

Title
Review for Jude (1996)
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, violence)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
     If JUDE strikes you as not at all typical of what you expect when you
think about films based on "classic British novels," it is only because it
is quite faithful to its source material in its subject matter.  Thomas
Hardy's _Jude the Obscure_ was one of the most controversial novels of its
time, one which inspired outraged reaction against its portrayal of
adultery, atheism and marital sexuality.  JUDE's still-relevant theme of
the consequences of non-conformity make it a natural for cinematic
treatment, and Michael Winterbottom has directed a beautifully filmed and
beautifully acted adaptation.  It is somewhat unfortunate, then, that JUDE
is so true to the narrative thrust of Hardy's novel yet falls short in
plumbing its thematic depths.
     Christopher Eccleston stars as Jude Fawley, a working class
Englishman of the late 1890s who is inspired by his schoolmaster Richard
Phillotson (Liam Cunningham) to dreams of becoming university-educated.
While teaching himself the classics, Jude works as a stone-mason, but he
is distracted from his plans by Arabella (Rachel Griffiths), a farmer's
daughter he marries when he believes he has gotten her pregnant.  The
marriage is not made in heaven, however, and Arabella leaves Jude,
allowing him to return to his educational pursuits in the university town
of Christminster.  There Jude meets his cousin Sue Bridehead (Kate
Winslet), a beautiful but highly unconventional young woman who becomes
Jude's close friend.  The friendship grows into something more, but the
circumstances of their lives contrive to keep them apart, and produce
terrible consequences when they reject societal expectations.
     It is often a kind of critical laziness to tick off discrepancies
between a film and its source material, but in the case of JUDE certain
omissions create gaps of logic.  Hossein Amini's script does a largely
superb job of selecting where to condense scenes and delete sub-plots,
losing little relevant narrative information, but there are problems with
the development of character motivations.  Both Arabella and Phillotson
are reduced to minor supporting players, and we don't understand enough
about what their decisions mean to the story.  One pivotal sequence
focuses on Jude's young son, who acts in a manner dependent on Hardy's
characterization of him as almost supernaturally mature and fatalistic.
Ross Colvin Turnbull, the young actor who plays Little Jude, can't quite
muster that quality, and his actions, while startling, don't seem
plausible.  Lost also are many of the contradictory facets of Sue's
personality, particularly her almost phobic aversion to sex.  Hardy's Sue
jumps out a window to avoid sleeping with her husband; Kate Winslet's Sue
becomes Jude's lover in a scene which is played almost as comic.
     That is not to slight Winslet's performance, which is captivating.
She makes Sue a vibrant, intelligent object of desire, a woman who refuses
to accept the roles anyone else imposes on her, and the force of her
spirit makes her fate all the more tragic.  Eccleston is impressive as
well as Jude, whose pursuit of his dreams results in a series of
disappointments but not in the breaking of his will.  Both are well
directed by Winterbottom, who gives JUDE a kinetic energy, though his
rush to include all the critical events in the story might leave you a bit
dizzy.  Also outstanding is the cinematography of Eduardo Serra, both in
the stark black-and-white of the prologue and in the muted colors of the
body of the film.
     JUDE is certainly effective film-making, but it could have been more
_affecting_.  This is a story of people challenging the social order at
their own peril, and once Winterbottom establishes that fact, JUDE is
quite compelling.  It simply takes a terribly long time for him to
establish that fact, and as a result JUDE is an appealing but fairly
conventional star-crossed love story for much of its two hours.  Winslet
and Eccleston are always able to make you care about whether or not Sue
and Jude will find happiness, but Amini and Winterbottom should have been
able to build the understanding that it was impossible.  There are enough
powerful moments and intriguing performances in JUDE to hold your 
interest, and the story still feels daring a century removed from its
publication.  There is just that small missing link that leaves JUDE's
fundamental tragedy a bit too obscure.

Title
Review for Cowboy Way, The (1994)
     At some point, when our collective back was turned, Woody
Harrelson became a box office draw.  All right, I'm not saying people
flocked to WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP or INDECENT PROPOSAL thanks to his name
above the title.  Nevertheless, Harrelson has demonstrated an enviable
talent for picking hits, even if that has been the only thing he has
really demonstrated in his fledgling big screen career.  THE COWBOY WAY
is in for a much harder ride towards success, facing stiff summer
competition, but whatever its box office take, there might be more in
it for Harrelson to be proud of personally than any of his previous
films.  Given the challenge of carrying a film for the first time, he
takes a tedious formula picture and singlehandedly makes it at least
moderately endearing.
     THE COWBOY WAY stars Harrelson and Kiefer Sutherland as Pepper
Lewis and Sonny Gilstrap, two New Mexico rodeo champions and longtime
friends.  That friendship is currently strained at best due to Sonny's
lingering resentment over a championship event at which the gleefully
irresponsible Pepper was a no-show.  The two reluctantly re-connect
when an old friend disappears and the trail leads to New York City.
There Pepper and Sonny encounter Stark (Dylan McDermott), a shady
character running a coyote operation bringing in illegal immigrants and
forcing them to work in garment sweat shops.  Among the victims is the
daughter of Pepper and Sonny's friend, leading the two and their
newfound friend on the New York police force (Ernie Hudson) to try to
save her the cowboy way.
     I could easily name fifty variations on this particular theme
which have graced the screen since I have been a regular movie-goer;
fish-out-of-water comedy is as venerable a genre as the Western
itself.  We all know the required elements: a plot point landing the
hero in the strange locale (usually a kidnapped or murdered friend); a
few scenes of the hero interacting with the locals, oblivious to his
own faux pas; a patient local to befriend the hero; a hissably arrogant
bad guy.  THE COWBOY WAY fits every one perfectly creating that
comfortable familiarity filmmakers seek much more frequently than
originality.  The tweaks to that formula THE COWBOY WAY incorporates
run from the obvious (the friendly cop has a romance with cowboy
mythology) to the mildly interesting (Dylan McDermott's insecure
villain), but let's be frank.  THE COWBOY WAY does not, nor was it
meant to, dazzle with its inventiveness.  In fact, there are long
stretches when it's a crashing bore.
     The showpiece here is the energetic performance of Woody
Harrelson, who has a great deal of fun with the lovably oafish Pepper.
In many ways, THE COWBOY WAY plays like little more than a series of
setups for Pepper to do something stupid, which could have been a
nightmare if so many of those stupid things weren't so funny.  His
motor-mouthed cross-country commentary, interrupted by a long silence,
is a delight; Pepper's brazen advances towards a cellist in a posh
restaurant is even more so.  Harrelson makes Pepper an eager-to-please
puppy of a guy, his every movement an ill-fated attempt to impress.
There is even a great throwaway moment near the climactic chase when
Harrelson gets out of Sutherland's pickup truck and asks, "Lock up?"
then proceeds to push the button down through the open window.  As long
as Harrelson was on the screen, THE COWBOY WAY kept me smiling.
     If only there was one interesting person for him to interact
with.  Kiefer Sutherland continues to show that screen presence is a
recessive Sutherland family trait, reading every line as though he had
something on the stove that he really needed to get back to.  Sonny is
supposed to be level-headed, but Sutherland interprets "level-headed"
as "comatose," much as he did in last year's THE THREE MUSKETEERS.
Marg Helgenberger of TV's "China Beach" has a pointless role as a New
York socialite who drags Pepper to a party straight out of MIDNIGHT
COWBOY, and poor Carlos Guzman adds to his resume of hoods.  THE COWBOY
WAY is a tired premise filled with tired-looking actors, but Woody
Harrelson was able to lasso me by the neck and take me along for the
ride.  I'd like to see a home video version where the plot is edited
out entirely; it just ends up getting in Harrelson's way.

Title
Review for Alan Smithee Film: Burn Hollywood Burn, An (1997)
     I'm guessing -- and from the available evidence, it's not a great
guess -- that BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN began life as an insider satire of
Hollywood excess, stupidity, ego and power-mongering.  If so, the film
that ended up on the screen ranks as one of the most spectacularly ironic
unintentional jokes in film history.  It has already been well-documented
that the original title, AN ALAN SMITHEE FILM, became a problem when
miserable test screenings forced re-cuts against the will of director
Arthur Hiller, prompting Hiller himself to opt for the Directors'
Guild-mandated pseudonym of Alan Smithee.  That left a film satire in the
hands of writer Joe Eszterhas, as humorless a hack as ever put finger to
word processor.  And you could just smell the disaster brewing.
     If you're unfortunate enough to sit through BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN,
you'll still be smelling that disaster long after the lights come up.
Ostensibly, it's a pseudo-documentary account of a director named Alan
Smithee (Eric Idle) who loses control of a big-budget action film called
TRIO starring Sylvester Stallone, Whoopi Goldberg and Jackie Chan (all of
whom appear as themselves).  When the only recourse available to him is
abandoning the project to be called "An Alan Smithee Film" -- which, of
course, it already is -- Smithee steals the negative of the film and
threatens to destroy it.  Among the parties interviewed are the film's
producer James Edmunds (Ryan O'Neal) and studio boss Jerry Glover (Richard
Jeni), who spend virtually the entire film narrating the story while
painfully unfunny things go on around them.
     It's bad enough that BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN has -- literally -- not a
single laugh for its entire, blissfully brief 84 minutes.  What makes it
even worse is Eszterhas' insistence upon telling every bad joke not once,
but twice or even three times.  Michael Ovitz references, SHOWGIRLS
references, oral sex references, Whoopi Goldberg/Ted Danson references --
all show up multiple times with all the subtlety that is Eszterhas'
stock-in-trade.  The reduncancy even manages to turn actively offensive
with some frequency, notably with the hilarious use of the word "feminist"
as an identifying caption for every single female character in the film.
By the time Coolio and Chuck D show up as black independent film-makers
the Brothers Brothers (cleverly identified as "bad a--" and "badder a--",
among other unprintable things), you may be ready to walk out of the
theater with your coat over your head to avoid being identified.
     Those documentary captions, for all their leaden obviousness, allow
the best insight into what's so hideously wrong with BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN.
Not content to stick any Hollywood type with only one jab from his rapier
wit, Eszterhas fills the screen with bullet points every time a new
character appears.  The producer is a "liar" who "slept in the White
House;" the media are "maggots" and "leeches" working for publications
like "The New York Slimes" and "Newsleak" (with the camera zooming in on
the altered title to make sure you don't miss the joke).  It doesn't even
matter that Eszterhas tags "penile implant" after his own name when he
makes a cameo, because it seems like such a desperate attempt to feign
self-deprecation.  This is a petulant schoolboy's idea of satire --
pictures of Hollywood insiders to which Eszterhas has taken a pen to
draw little moustaches and black out the teeth.
     The last stomach-churning straw comes when BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN closes
with out-takes over the closing credits, the kind that show the audience
how much fun everyone was having making the film that just sucked an hour 
and a half of your life away.  Perhaps it was just a final, desperate
attempt by Eszterhas to convince himself there was some purpose behind the
film, or to convince everyone involved that a few blown lines warranted
threatening to blow their whole career.  Pity everyone involved with this
excessive, ego-driven "satire" of excess and ego.  It's too bad that only
directors can remove their names from noxious material like this.
Otherwise, you might have seen credits for BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN overflowing
with Alan Smithees.

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
NURSE BETTY
(USA Films)
Starring:  Renee Zellweger, Morgan Freeman, Chris Rock, Greg Kinnear,
Aaron Eckhart, Tia Texada, Allison Janney.
Screenplay:  John Richards and James Flamberg.
Producers:  Steve Golin and Gail Mutrux.
Director:  Neil LaBute.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There's something particularly delightful -- and subversive -- about
a high-concept comedy that turns into something resonant. GROUNDHOG DAY
could have been ridiculous and repetitive, but it charmed you with an
unexpectedly touching romance; BEING JOHN MALKOVICH could have been a
simplistic tale of misguided celebrity worship, but it turned into an
absurdist existential fantasy worthy of Ionesco. Hollywood excels at
selling stories in a single sentence, and we come to expect that we know
all there is to know about the film from that sentence. When it becomes
evident that there's more to a film than its marketing-savvy premise, it's
a heart-warming experience indeed.
     NURSE BETTY isn't as thematically rich as either GROUNDHOG DAY or
BEING JOHN MALKOVICH, and it's certainly not as thematically rich as
director Neil LaBute's dazzling debut IN THE COMPANY OF MEN. It is,
however, a peculiarly entertaining comedy that sticks in the brain for a
while longer than you expect. The high concept involves a Kansas waitress
named Betty Sizemore (Renee Zellweger) whose dreary life and joyless
marriage to used car salesman Del (Aaron Eckhart) are balanced by her
intense devotion to her favorite soap opera, "A Reason to Love." One
night, she witnesses a murder committed by hired killers Charlie (Morgan
Freeman) and Wesley (Chris Rock), and something inside Betty snaps. She
escapes into a fantasy world where she was once the fiancee of "A Reason
to Love's" dashing Dr. David Ravell (Greg Kinnear), and hits the road for
Los Angeles to find him. Meanwhile, Charlie and Wesley are on her trail,
searching for the witness to their crime.
     It's entirely possible that NURSE BETTY could have succeeded as a
comedy strictly on the basis of its wild premise. LaBute directs with
effective comic short-hand -- a scene portraying Del in the middle of an
affair with his secretary shows wear marks on the wall to emphasize his
recidivist philandering -- and paces his showpiece sequences with a flair
you might not expect from the misanthropic mind behind IN THE COMPANY OF
MEN. There are sharp visual gags like Betty's perky look in her bloody
nurse's outfit after performing an impromptu medical procedure, and slick
exchanges of dialogue between Charley and Wesley. The performances are not
uniformly appealing -- Rock yells without doing much acting, and Eckhart's
mullet-headed lout of a husband is as broad a stereotype as you'll find -
but the work by Zellweger, Freeman and Kinnear more than takes up the
slack. It's simply a funny comedy.
     Simply funny, but far from simplistic. NURSE BETTY takes the somewhat
trite notion of soap operas as vicarious life for those with unhappy lives
and twists it  into provocative knots. Zellweger's performance never once
romanticizes Betty's instability, turning her into the logically illogical
extreme of a woman whose fantasy world becomes necessary for her to cope
with her present. She's also not alone in that respect. Charlie -- played
with perfect dignity by the incomparable Freeman -- comes to idealize
Betty as the paragon of human goodness waiting for him at the end of his
last job as a killer; the short-fused Wesley, also a fan of "A Reason to
Love," turns his simple assignment into a "statement" so it has more
meaning, and rationalizes his killing by comparing himself to God. Even
George McCord, the actor who plays David Ravell, comes to love playing his
part off-screen with Betty (whom he believes to be just a really committed
Method actress looking for a job on the show). The resolution may come to
some obvious conclusions about the need to face reality, but along the way
it shows a respect for the complexity of our coping mechanisms, whatever
form they may take.
     With so much strong stuff at the center, it's a shame that NURSE
BETTY gets flabby around the edges. The late re-appearance of Crispin
Glover and Pruitt Taylor Vince (as a reporter and sheriff from Betty's
home town, respectively) adds little to the already dense plot but the
presence of two actors whose quirkiness can be distracting. The attempts
at entertainment industry satire don't always mesh with the edgier stuff,
and the tone shifts from intense to playful on a dime. In fact, by all
rights it should be just another affably mediocre piece of Hollywood
joke-mongering. Yet even with its bumps and scrapes, NURSE BETTY feels
like more. There's something at stake, something recognizably human,
something you don't often find in high-concept comedy. Thanks to
Zellweger, Freeman and (of all people) Neil LaBute, there's a heart here,
and a brain, too. It's an approach that takes a high concept just a bit
higher.

Title
Review for I.Q. (1994)
Starring:  Meg Ryan, Tim Robbins, Walter Matthau, Stephen Fry.
Screenplay:  Andy Breckman and Michael Leeson.
Director:  Fred Schepisi.
     A movie like I.Q. is like a souffle.  When you're trying to mix
whimsy, romance, comedy and (of all things) physics together, the whole
recipe can collapse under its own weight without the right chef.
Director Fred Schepisi made all the right decisions in 1987's ROXANNE,
a film that could have been either cloying or tedious in the wrong
hands.  I.Q. isn't quite as successful as ROXANNE, but it is far more
entertaining than it has any right to be.  While it's rarely
laugh-out-loud funny, it's pleasant, low-key and consistently
charming.
     I.Q. stars Meg Ryan as Catherine Boyd, a scatter-brained
mathematician engaged to a boring clinical psychologist (Stephen Fry).
Her uncle believes that Catherine is an over-thinker who needs a chance
at true love, and decides to play Cupid; her uncle also happens to be
Albert Einstein (Walter Matthau).  The man chosen to be Catherine's
suitor is Ed Walters (Tim Robbins), an auto mechanic who appears to be
out of his league intellectually.  However, Einstein and a few of his
friends become physics Cyranos, convincing Catherine and much of the
scientific community that Ed is an unschooled whiz who has developed a
formula for cold fusion rocket propulsion.
     It's not easy to describe exactly why I.Q. works, because in many
ways it's extremely simple and predictable.  Meg Ryan does her
pattented button-cute number, combined with a stereotypical distracted
genius; Tim Robbins is a simple guy with a heart of gold; a la
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, Ryan is already involved with the Wrong Man.
Stephen Fry (PETER'S FRIENDS, TV's "Black Adder" and "Jeeves and
Wooster") is an unconventional casting choice as the Wrong Man, but his
part basically asks him to stand between Catherine and Ed.  There are
the standard complications, and none of them are particularly
hilarious.
     I think I.Q.'s greatest strength may be that it uses its premise
to perfection.  Einstein isn't part of the story simply as high-concept
gag; love really does become a kind of physics formula, and its
incorporation into the story is delightful.  Matthau is a marvelous
Einstein, a gentle matchmaker with a twinkle in his eye.  A trio of
colleagues of Einstein's, played with gusto by Gene Saks, Lou Jacobi
and Joseph Maher, provide assistance for Ed when he is trapped by
smarter folks, most cleverly when Ed is forced ot take a multiple
choice physics test.  The running commentary they provide on
philosophy, science and love is a goofy little trick that turns them
into an almost fantastical Greek chorus.  It's exactly what Schepisi
was able to do with ROXANNE:  keep the tone light and coax fine
supporting performances out of every last supporting character.
     Of course, a romantic comedy is generally only as successful as
the chemistry between its stars, so how do Ryan and Robbins fare
together?  Quite well, and that's mostly because screenwriters Andy
Breckman and Michael Leeson take their time bringing them together.
This is far from Ryan's best work -- I thought she was coasting much of
the time -- but a mediocre Ryan is still worth a lot in a role like
this.  Robbins, on the other hand, turns in one of his most appealing
performances yet.  Many of his previous roles have been one-note jobs,
either simpletons or sleazes, but Ed is a warm and engaging character
which shows that Robbins has a bright future as a romantic leading
man.  Their scenes together may not set the screen on fire, but they
are comfortable enough together that the smiles just keep coming.
     I didn't expect much from I.Q., and it really didn't deliver all
that much.  I just had fun, and I left with a smile.  It doesn't take a
genius to realize that achievement is worth a compliment.

Title
Review for Mrs. Doubtfire (1993)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Sally Field, Pierce Brosnan, Harvey
Fierstein.
Screenplay:  Randi Mayem Singer & Leslie Dixon.
Director:  Chris Columbus.
     I've never been a member of the Robin Williams fan club.  A little
bit of his improvisationaly schtick goes a long way, and I sometimes
feel as though I'm watching a 40-year-old class clown.  In his films,
Williams has often tried to balance his mania with touchy-feely
emotion, leading to wildly uneven performances.  MRS. DOUBTFIRE seemed
ready-made for the same problems, but instead it proves to be Williams'
best comic screen project yet.  While it still contains some
characteristic self-indulgence, MRS. DOUBTFIRE is nonetheless an
engaging belly-laugh comedy served up with high energy.
     Williams stars as Daniel Hillard, a cartoon voiceover artist with
a penchant for irresponsible behavior.  One such incident proves one
too many for wife Miranda (Sally Field), and she files for a divorce.
Unemployed, living in a disastrously unkempt apartment and faced with
limited time with his three beloved children, Daniel decides to respond
to Miranda's ad for an afternoon housekeeper.  He turns to his brother
Frank (Harvey Fierstein), a theatrical makeup artist, and emerges as
Euphegenia Doubtfire, a matronly 65-year-old Englishwoman.  Daniel uses
his access to the house to keep an eye on Miranda's flirtation with a
wealthy client (Pierce Brosnan), to spend time with the children, and
to learn something about responsible parenting, all the while trying to
keep his identity hidden from the people who know him best.
     MRS. DOUBTFIRE has to overcome a mountain of implausibilities to
work, and basically it does so.  The most crucial is that no one in the
family recognizes Daniel, and thanks to the fantastic special makeup
that's instantly believable.  It may be one of the most convincing
transformations ever committed to film, making Dustin Hoffman's Dorothy
Michaels look like Milton Berle.  More problematic was a series of
calls Daniel makes to Miranda posing as nannies from hell; it's a bit
hard to swallow that she doesn't recognize any of the voices as her
husband's.  Perhaps the biggest contrivance we're asked to swallow is
that Daniel could make a quick change into Mrs. Doubtfire in a few
minutes.  There's more to realistic makeup than slapping on a latex
mask.  Fortunately, these are inconsistencies which only attract
attention as the credits roll.  During the film, I was generally too
busy laughing.  After getting off to a slow start involving too much of
Williams' riffing, MRS. DOUBTFIRE kicks into high gear once the wig and
pads are in place.  Daniel's frantic attempt to fool a court officer is
wonderful, as is the climactic restaurant sequence, even though I saw
the resolutions coming a mile away.
     Clearly, most of the credit for DOUBTFIRE's success goes to Robin
Williams.  It took putting him in drag, but for once he plays a comic
character that isn't just Robin Williams with a different name.  He
thoroughly inhabits Euphegenia Doubtfire, and seems to relish the
scenes in which he gets to play her as blunt and foul-mouthed.  Wisely,
he never aims for saintly.  His responses to the intrusion of new
suitor Stu are often petty, but the kind of thing most of us might do
with the benefit of anonymity.  It's one of MRS. DOUBTFIRE's charms
that neither Daniel nor Miranda is perfect, just people trying to be
better.  As Miranda, Sally Field is solid in a background role, and
Pierce Brosnan is nicely understated as Stu.  The children are also
good, although Mara Wilson is almost oppressively cute as the
youngest.  The supporting players merely step aside and allow Williams
to do his thing.
     It's easy to see MRS. DOUBTFIRE as little more than TOOTSIE warmed
over, and it's true that there are both broad themes and specific
details in common.  But MRS. DOUBTFIRE manages to carve out its own
space, particularly through the surprisingly honest moments involving a
judge's decision and the ultimate status of Daniel and Miranda's
relationship.  There's nothing dazzlingly new in MRS. DOUBTFIRE, but
there are plenty of laughs, and good comedies are always in short
supply.  And it's nice to see Robin Williams just act for a change.

Title
Review for Boys and Girls (2000)
     Having ventured into the fairy tale realms of relationship dynamics
in 1999's Cinderella story SHE'S ALL THAT, director Robert Iscove and
Freddie Prinze Jr. clearly felt there was a more contemporary spin on
male-female interaction that they could rip to shreds for a youth 
audience. So in BOYS AND GIRLS they decided to tell a story of Ryan Walker
(Prinze) and Jennifer Burrows (Claire Forlani), two individuals whose
paths cross repeatedly over the course of several years before they end up
becoming friends. One of them takes a casual view of sex and a cynical
perspective on the prospects for love to succeed; the other is a
compulsive planner and hopeless romantic. Each one has a best pal of the
same sex in whom to confide -- Ryan's compulsive liar roommate Hunter
(Jason Biggs) and Jennifer's high-strung roommate Amy (Amanda Detmer),
respectively -- but ultimately they communicate better with each other
than with anyone else. Then they have sex, and everything gets terribly
complicated despite the fact that they tell each other they both believe
it was a mistake. 
     Paging Nora Ephron: I hope you've got your attorney ready, because
this is one slam-dunk of a plagiarism case. Yes, BOYS AND GIRLS is
practically a point-by-point remake of WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, dumbed down
significantly to appeal to viewers even younger than the lead actors' peer
group. Sure, there are a few minor variations -- in this incarnation, it's
Ryan who's the Type A Sally Albright, and Jennifer who's the Type B Harry
Burns -- but the devil is in the details. Jennifer tells Ryan that she's
got a date, then suggests that Ryan should "get out there" as well. 
Jennifer makes a point during a conversation with Ryan by making a scene
in a diner. The "morning after" scene finds one of the participants trying
to make an uncomfortably quick getaway. There's a montage in which
Jennifer leaves multiple answering machine messages for the emotionally
wounded Ryan. The protagonists' respective best pals get together the
first time they meet. And so on, and so on.
     Granted, Hollywood has always been in the recycling business, and
there are far worse romantic comedies to use as a model than WHEN HARRY
MET SALLY. But BOYS AND GIRLS does what most bad copies of good films
do: It mimics a structure without having the faintest grasp of the insight
or charm that fueled the original. The script, credited to "The Drews" 
(actors Andrew Lowery and Andrew Miller, whose only previous screen credit
as writers came for the Dennis Rodman action vehicle SIMON SEZ), doubles
the pain of lame situations by adding horribly forced banter, the kind of
stuff that just makes you feel sorry for the people reading it. BOYS AND
GIRLS does have a great supporting cast in Biggs, Detmer and erstwhile
BLAIR WITCH victim Heather Donahue (virtually unrecognizable as a blonde); 
their energy makes the film almost watchable, since one or more of them is
on screen much of the time. Unfortunately, the force of their 
personalities just makes the hole at the center of the film all the more
evident.
     It would be easy enough for that interpretation to be read as a cheap
bit of Freddie Prinze Jr.-bashing, which it actually is not. Granted, it's
a ghastly sight watching Prinze pretend to be a geeky, braces-wearing
16-year-old, but he's relaxed and pleasant enough for most of the film. 
Claire Forlani also does a perfectly serviceable job considering how
little context is provided for her personality. The problem with BOYS AND
GIRLS is that in the process of re-making WHEN HARRY MET SALLY with
attractive twenty-somethings, Iscove and company have lost the wisdom and
wit that comes from a story about the romantic travails of thirty- and
forty-somethings. All that remains is a familiar shell that has been
filled with silly nightclub choreography and a complete lack of chemistry
between the two leads. It's a shallow little film that's just not funny
enough or perceptive enough to register as anything but weak imitation. 
The opening credits re-make of J. Geils Band's "Love Stinks" is merely a
clever diversion; apparently Harry Connick Jr. was unavailable to do the
honors.

Title
Review for But I'm a Cheerleader (1999)
     There's something terribly depressing about a wonderful concept
turned into mush by someone who doesn't know how to handle it. The
irritations of a film like THE REPLACEMENTS are far more mundane by
comparison-you know that it will be at best a tolerable audience-friendly
mediocrity, at worst a bland, pressed and processed Entertainment 
McNugget. BUT I'M A CHEERLEADER, on the other hand, could have been a
brilliant bit of satire. It could have been the kind of film that, even
while preaching to the choir, highlights the magnificent absurdities of a
very hot-button issue. It could have been the CITIZEN RUTH of the "gay
conversion" movement.
     Could've been, but isn't. Jamie Babbit's sloppy, smirking story
introduces us to Megan (Natasha Lyonne), a middle-class girl with a
boyfriend, good Christian parents (But Cort and Mink Stole) and the
enviable life of a high school cheerleader. Her friends and family also
believe that she has a secret-namely, that she harbors unnatural,
unhealthy desires for other women. Megan denies that she's a lesbian, but
nonetheless she is sent to True Directions, a facility for curing
homosexuals headed by the tough love team of Mary (Cathy Moriarty) and
Mike (RuPaul Charles, virtually unrecognizable in male attire). Soon
Megan is deep into the five-step program, but she also finds herself
interested in a surly fellow "patient" named Graham (Clea DuVall) --
interested in an unnatural, unhealthy desire sort of way.
     Somewhere, buried deep in BUT I'M A CHEERLEADER, is the germ of a
risky comic idea: that Megan really isn't gay until she comes to True
Directions, which in effect converts her contrary to their goals by
exposing her to other lesbians. There's something in that idea to anger
virtually anyone, only Babbit doesn't pursue it. Instead, she makes it
clear from the opening minutes that Megan is repressing latent desires,
and that her denials merely represent a state of denial. Even the good
gags Babbit wrings from this variation -- like the photo in Megan's school
locker -- are underlined too obviously, and never reach into truly daring
areas. The campy tone set in the first half-hour, including Moriarty's
drag diva performance, show that Babbit isn't particularly interested in
scathing humor. Simple mockery suits her just fine.
     Even that tone, however, proves to be one she can't sustain. BUT I'M
A CHEERLEADER might never have been riotously funny as the silly spoof it
initially appears to be, but at least it might have felt consistent. 
Babbit makes the ridiculous decision to bounce back and forth between
scoring points off swishy stereotypes, exploring the conflicts of family
reaction to homosexuality and developing an actual romantic sub-plot. 
There's not nearly enough substance to BUT I'M A CHEERLEADER for its
serious side to feel anything but token, and too many misguided serious
moments to give it a real comic kick. You can feel BUT I'M A CHEERLEADER's
potential bubbling to the surface when the program participants sit around
sharing the "root" for their same-sex desire (one girl's mother wore pants
to her wedding; another saw the horror of her mother as breadwinner while
Dad was unemployed). And you can feel that potential being crushed under
Babbit's leaden heel every time Megan and Graham share a tender moment.
     There are plenty of people who take the idea of converting gays and
lesbians to heterosexuality very seriously, and plenty of people with
same-sex attractions who desperately want such programs to work. Babbit
never seems to clue into that fact, or she would base her satire more
squarely in the growing popularity of these programs. Instead, she lays
out BUT I'M A CHEERLEADER as though the whole idea were self-evidently
ludicrous, and gets lazy about finding the humor in people scrambling for
conformity, acceptance and easy answers to a challenging issue. BUT I'M A
CHEERLEADER simply isn't funny enough often enough, and that's the kiss of
death for a low-budget comedy full of broad performances and careless
story-telling (what happened to the foreshadowing involving another girl's
apparent jealousy of Megan and Graham's relationship?). There's no excuse
for a subject this incendiary to be the stuff of pratfalls and sappy
endings.

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
BOOK OF SHADOWS: BLAIR WITCH 2
(Artisan)
Starring:  Kim Director, Jeffrey Donovan, Erica Leersehn, Stephen Barker
Turner, Tristen Skyler, Lanny Flaherty.
Screenplay:  Dick Beebe and Joe Berlinger.
Producer:  Bill Carraro.
Director:  Joe Berlinger.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes, nudity, sexual
situations, drug use)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In coming up with a concept for a sequel to THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
-- as apparently sequel-proof a film as ever was made -- the producers
actually had a brilliant idea. In the summer of 1999, THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT wasn't so much an innovative, polarizing suspense film as it was a
cultural phenomenon. Somehow, a microscopic budget and an ingenious web
site had combined to create a box office smash, intensive media coverage
and fan fascination. So instead of devising a sequel to THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT, Haxan Films devised a sequel to the cultural phenomenon. BOOK OF
SHADOWS: BLAIR WITCH 2 would be set in the world where the first film was
a hit, inspiring people to tour the places where the Blair Witch mythology
had been born.
     For about five minutes, that concept is executed to perfection. 
Director Joe Berlinger (the gifted documentarian behind PARADISE LOST and
BROTHER'S KEEPER with his partner Bruce Sinofsky, making his fiction
feature debut) opens with news footage and faux interviews with residents
of Burkittsville, Maryland commenting on how the influx of Blair Witch
devotees and curiosity-seekers has turned the town upside-down. It's
clever stuff, but it's soon discarded for a "dramatization" of a story
about one particular group of tourists. Jeff (Jeffrey Donovan) is the
opportunistic tour guide; Erica (Erica Leersehn) is a Wiccan trying to
commune with the spirit of the original Blair Witch; Stephen (Stephen
Barker Turner) and Tristen (Tristen Skyler) are co-authoring a book on the
Blair Witch mythology; and Kim (Kim Director) is a psychic Goth girl. All
is well until they wake up after their first night camping to discover
their campsite trashed, and no one able to recall five hours of their
experience the previous night.
     There was no way that BLAIR WITCH 2 could capture the intensity of
the original, though it tries to cling to some of the details (like naming
all the characters after the actors playing them). It's ultimately a
pretty conventional horror film, but the reason it fails is not that it's
conventional. It's simply wretchedly executed even as a conventional
horror film. Berlinger and company never rustle up a single decent scare
during the film's hour and a half running time, opting instead for lurid
quick-cuts to brutal murders. Even the basic structure of the film
undercuts any chance for suspense. At various points in the main story,
Berlinger splices in police interviews with characters in the film,
interviews clearly intended as flash-forwards to a point after the main
story has ended. How stupid is it to telegraph exactly who will live and
who will die in a conventional horror film?
     The truly depressing thing about BLAIR WITCH 2 is that it discards
such a potentially intriguing framework for its story. There's an amusing
moment early in the film where a competing tour group crosses paths with
our protagonists, suggesting that the film will continue to draw on the
original film's appeal as a central element to the story. But ultimately
the idea of a constructed mythology and its effect on psychology gives way
to obvious apparitions and overly literal supernatural phenomenon. Then
the film can't even manage to render those obvious apparitions in a creepy
way, devoting most of the film to tedious scenes of characters watching
videotape or shrieking accusations at one another. Plenty of BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT detractors counted the incessant arguing and shouting among their
gripes. Now imagine all that arguing and shouting by actors reading awful
dialogue instead of improvising their anxiety, and you get a sense for how
irritating BLAIR WITCH 2 turns out to be.
     If nothing else made the majority of BLAIR WITCH 2 a painful
experience, there would be the inexplicably bizarre performance by Lanny
Flaherty as a surly sheriff. Flaherty acts as though his only frame of
reference for cinematic lawmen was Jackie Gleason in the SMOKEY AND THE
BANDIT films, inspiring fits of unintentional laughter every time he
appears or utters a thickly-drawled threat. It's hard to build an
atmosphere of impending doom when one of the actors appears convinced
that the film is a broad comedy. There are welcome elements of self-parody
in BLAIR WITCH 2, but Berlinger doesn't know when to turn off the gags and
make a real scary movie. The makers of BLAIR WITCH 2 were smart enough to
realize that they couldn't catch the same lighting in a bottle again. They
just weren't talented enough to catch a different kind of lightning. BLAIR
WITCH 2 proves to be nothing but a big empty bottle.

Title
Review for American Werewolf in Paris, An (1997)
AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN PARIS
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Tom Everett Scott, Julie Delpy, Vince Vieluf, Phil Buckman,
Julie Bowen, Pierre Cosso.
Screenplay:  Tim Burns & Tom Stern and Anthony Waller.
Producer:  Richard Claus.
Director:  Anthony Waller.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, nudity, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's a truly surreal experience, sitting through a film like AN
AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN PARIS with your mind overwhelmed by a piercing cry of
"What were they _thinking_?"  John Landis' 1981 AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN
LONDON was hardly an inviolable classic, but it was crafty and creative, a
comic horror film which was both genuinely scary and genuinely funny. AN
AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN PARIS, on the other hand, is genuinely unwatchable --
a collection of bad ideas thrown onto the screen without any apparent
consideration to little details like coherence or appeal to an audience.
     The tragedy is that director Anthony Waller proved he could mix
tension and comic relief quite effectively in his debut feature MUTE
WITNESS.  In PARIS, he merely regurgitates LONDON's premise of Americans
abroad, with protagonist Andy McDermott (Tom Everett Scott) and his
buddies Brad (Vince Vieluf) and Chris (Phil Buckman) replacing backpackers
David Naughton and Griffin Dunne.  The trio is on a "Daredevil Tour" of
Europe, tallying up their respective testosterone points for endangering
their lives or seducing women as college chums are wont to do.  It's not
part of the plan to get tangled up with a den of werewolves, but that's
exactly what happens when Andy saves the life of the suicidal Serafine
(Julie Delpy).  Soon Andy joins the ranks of the wolfen, and must try to
kill the wolf who bit him while also finding a cure for Serafine.
     What follows is so misguided on so many levels that it becomes
horrifying for all the wrong reasons.  The male leads fumble with inane
dialogue including such Gen X-authentic ripostes as "This is madness!";
Julie Delpy, meanwhile, is obliged to humiliate herself with one of the
lamest and most unnecessary nude scenes ever filmed.  The attempts at
humor range from turning a pair of undead characters into fourth-rate
rejects from THE FRIGHTENERS, to the wildly hilarious conceit that Andy --
get this! -- keeps bumping his head on everything in sight.  Waller
directs it all as though guided by the humanitarian desire just to get it
over with, with baffling unexplained resolutions, leading to a
cringe-inducing happy ending which looks like it was stolen from some
mid-80s shlock comedy starring Andrew McCarthy.
     It's all the more aggravating when a film this sloppy pretends to be
interested in making some sort of social statement.  The primary villains
in PARIS are a group of pseudo-skinheads who have intentionally infected
themselves with were-blood so that they might more efficiently rid French
society of its contaminating elements -- vagrants, junkies, American
tourists.  If the point was to make Americans feel better about
encountering mere attitude in Paris rather than flesh-rending canine
teeth, mission accomplished.  If Waller's intent was to offer some
metaphorical indictment of who-knows-what, it's lost in his frantic
story-telling long before we can nod in socially-conscious superiority.
     Some viewers will undoubtedly trek to PARIS simmply to see a genre
film, but even they are likely to be disappointed.  The computer-generated
werewolves are thoroughly unimpressive, and the transformation scene
tossed off so quickly you'll be instantly nostalgic for Rick Baker's
incredible makeup effects from LONDON.  the script makes its token
attempts to spice up the werewolf legend with a few new details and some
pseudo-science, but none of it generates thrills or scares (just a couple
of moderately effective gross-outs).  If they want to add a new twist to
lycanthropic mythology, here's a suggestion:  anyone who makes a werewolf
movie this bad becomes one of them.  The line to fire the silver bullets
forms behind me.

Title
Review for Naked (1993)
Starring:  David Thewlis, Lesley Sharp, Katlin Cartlidge, Greg
Cruttwell, Peter Wight, Claire Skinner.
Screenplay/Director:  Mike Leigh.
     I can thoroughly understand someone either loving or loathing Mike
Leigh's NAKED.  On the one hand, it is a rather unpleasant visceral
experience with troubling images of violence against women; on the
other hand, it is unflinching in its acidic humor and features a
tour-de-force performance by David Thewlis.  Yet for my money, there is
another level at which NAKED approaches brilliance.  This film is a
warning designed for the self rather than for society, a startling
examination of one mind's response to dehumanization.
     NAKED focuses its attention on Johnny (David Thewlis), an
intelligent but extremely bitter drifter from Manchester who takes off
for London as the film opens.  There he looks up old girlfriend Louise
(Lesley Sharp), but first finds her roommate Sophie (Katlin
Cartlidge).  They get along famously, perhaps a bit too famously as
Sophie becomes rather clinging.  Johnny spends his days wandering
through London, sharing his unique philosophies with characters like
Brian (Peter Wight), a mild-mannered night watchman.  Meanwhile, Louise
and Sophie have a run-in with their sado-masochistic landlord Sebastian
Hawkes (Greg Cruttwell), who makes himself a bit too much at home.
     With Johnny, Mike Leigh has created a magnificent character who
serves as a prophet of the apocalypse, an apocalypse he describes in
terms rather different from what one might expect.  He is intensely
aware that humans, including himself, are becoming something less than
human, and his commentary is filled with references to monkeys.  As he
watches Brian perform his mundane job, Johnny notes that it could be
done by a "tall chimp."  On another occasion, Louise asks him, "Why are
you such a bastard?"  "Monkey see, monkey do," is his response.  Still
later, Johnny asks Sondra (Claire Skinner), Louise and Sophie's
high-strung third roommate, about her experiences as a nurse:  "Is it
true some babies are born with, like, fur all over them?"  And on and
on, too many instances to mention, all connected to Johnny's larger
obsession with evolution.  The fact is that in his own unique way,
Johnny is a true optimist.  When he "preaches" to Brian about the end
of humanity as we know it, he is describing an event he looks forward
to.  We are not the ultimate expression of creation, he realizes; we
are far too base.  Johnny acknowledges the animal aspect of his nature,
but he doesn't revel in it.  When he speaks of our new form being like
the angels, he is speaking with hope and passion.  The title of the
film itself becomes an acknowledgement of our status in the universe:
when all the frills are stripped away, we're just big monkeys, monkeys
who seem to have stopped reaching for more.
     All the brilliance in the world in the writing would have counted
for little withough a perfect actor for Johnny, and David Thewlis is
that actor.  His sarcastic, often bilious musings easily could have
come off as smug and self-congratulatory, but Thewlis pours a great
deal of emotion into his lines.  Yes, he believes that he is more aware
than those around him, but he derives no pleasure from that knowledge,
instead finding only disgust with it.  Thewlis is supported by several
other fine performances, most notable Claire Skinner's small but
memorable role as the frantic Sondra; only Cruttwell rings false with
his slimy Sebastian.
     NAKED is not without its faults.  An encounter between Johnny and
a young Scots couple who can't seem to find one another is funny, but
doesn't really connect to the rest of the film.  The Sebastian
character is way too much, too crudely drawn to work as the
representation of gilded brutishness he is meant to be.  NAKED has a
semblance of a narrative through-line, but basically it's a collection
of snapshots viewed through Johnny's singular lens, and that collection
can appear somewhat unfocused.  But from its first jarring frames to
its final shot of Johnny limping down a London street, it risks showing
us the side of ourselves we don't like to see, and hoping we won't turn
away.

Title
Review for Searching for Bobby Fischer (1993)
Starring:  Joe Mantegna, Ben Kingsley, Max Pomeranc, Laurence Fishburne.
Director/Screenwriter:  Steven Zaillian.
     SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER is the kind of film that can easily
get lost in the glut of summer releases.  It boasts no superstars,
includes no gunfire or velociraptors, and has as its focal point the
game of chess.
     Let me repeat that: a movie ... about chess.  No, let me amend
that: a wonderful movie about chess.  SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER is
an emotionally satisfying and surprisingly understated film that takes
the tried-and-true formula of such crowd pleasers as ROCKY and THE
KARATE KID and adds some welcome thematic depth.
     SEARCHING is based on the true story of Josh Waitzkin (Max
Pomeranc), a seven-year-old New York boy whose parents (Joe Mantegna
and Joan Allen) discover that he is a chess prodigy.  He learns the
game from park chess hustlers like Vinnie (Laurence Fishburne), who
encourages daring and aggressive play, and is then brought by his
father to former master Bruce Pandolfini (Ben Kingsley).  Pandolfini is
reluctant to act as Josh's teacher, but agrees because the price is
right and because he sees in Josh a natural talent similar to that of
the legendary American champion Bobby Fischer.  Pandolfini is also a
purist who shuns the strategies of speed players like Vinnie, and wants
to instill in Josh the calculated single-mindedness and contempt for
opponents that characterized Fischer's play.  The film then traces
Josh's experiences with the youth tournaments, and his growing fear
that once he's the best, it's no longer "okay to lose."
     This examination of the win-at-all-costs ethos of competition
provides one of the film's most potent thematic touchstones.  After his
baseball team wins a game in an eary sequense, Josh looks on
sympathetically as the losing team walks away dejectedly.  He loves to
play, but he doesn't love to win.  It's an attitude which infuriates
Pandolfini, who tells Josh he must hate his opponents, only to receive
the simple response, "I don't hate them."  It's also a foreign concept
to his father, a sports writer who begins to live vicariously through
his son's victories.  Sports parents are given a firm tweaking,
particularly in a hilarious scene at a tournament where a fight breaks
out between two fathers.
     As Fred Waitzkin, Joe Mantegna presents a fully-realized portrait
of one of these parents.  He is a loving father who initially
encourages his son's gift out of selflessness, but slowly gets caught
up in the winning.  His feelings are brought out in a confrontation
with Josh's school teacher, whom he tells, "Do you know how good he
is?  He's better at this than I've ever been at anything in my life."
Mantegna's performance is rich and effective, and only one of many
super acting turns.  Kingsley deftly handles the cold, slightly
embittered Pandolfini, allowing him to be unlikeable but
understandable.  Fishburne has fun with his small part as the
trash-talking park player, as does David Paymer as a nervous "chess
dad."  However, it's Max Pomeranc's show, and he carries it.  With his
hair hanging just above his eyes and his mouth perpetually in something
just less than a smile, first-time actor Pomeranc projects Josh's
earnestness and ever-present tension in sighs and eye movements.  It's
a delightful performance, made even more surprising by the fact that he
is being handled by a first-time director.
     That director is Steven Zaillian (Oscar nominated as a
screenwriter for AWAKENINGS), and it's a remarkably confident debut.
He delivers the chess scenes with tremendous energy, a challenge if
ever there was one.  He frames his scenes with a sense of purpose, and
his actors are always focused.  Most tellingly, he demonstrates the
ability to develop his story visually, beginning with the opening
sequence where Josh finds a carved chess piece, is offered a softball
in trade by Vinnie, and chooses to keep the piece.  Without a single
word of dialogue, Zaillian conveys a change in focus for Josh, and the
beginning of his new life.
     If there is one place to find fault, it's with the emotional
string-pulling that's common to the "competition" genre.  James
Horner's overwrought score practically screams, "Cry now!" in a manner
I had thought only John Williams had mastered.  The climax manages to
avoid cliches, however, and I have to admit that I was grinning and on
the edge of my seat along with a couple hundred fellow moviegoers.
     Both as intelligent cinema and rousing entertainment, SEARCHING
FOR BOBBY FISCHER is a winner not to be overlooked.  Chess ... who'd
have guessed?

Title
Review for Kdisbellan (1993)
Starring:  Jasper Salen, Stellan Skarsgaard, Basia Frydman, Niclas Olund.
Screenplay/Director:  Ake Sandgren.
     It may be my imagination, but the last two years seem to have been
a particularly good time to be a young actor.  Films focusing on
younger characters have been everywhere, from FREE WILLY to SEARCHING
FOR BOBBY FISCHER to KING OF THE HILL to THIS BOY'S LIFE.  Whether it's
representative of some societal yearning for a return to innocence, a
rare influx of young talent, or some happy confluence of the two,
coming-of-age dramas have become nearly as ubiquitous as Hugh Grant.
None of which makes a good one any less desirable, and THE SLINGSHOT is
a good one indeed, a sharply written Swedish import with a singular
perspective and exceptional performances.
     Based on an autobiographical novel by Roland Schutt, THE SLINGSHOT
tells the story of ten-year-old Roland (Jasper Salen) and his trials
and tribulations living in 1920's Sweden.  He is a boy with two strikes
against him, the child of a dogmatically socialist father (Stellan
Skarsgaard) and a Jewish mother (Basia Frydman).  This lineage makes
him the target of schoolyard bullies, sadistic schoolmasters and
government officials, who tend to use him as a scapegoat.  Even with
his family he is not safe, as his older brother (Niclas Olund), an
aspiring boxer, uses him as a punching bag.  But in spite of his many
obstacles, Roland navigates through his difficult world with
determination and an inventive spirit.
     As with the other recent films I mentioned, THE SLINGSHOT rests
squarely on the small shoulders of its young star, and Jasper Salen is
up to the task.  With a round, open face reminiscent of A CHRISTMAS
STORY's Peter Billingsley, Salen manages to convey both innocence and
toughness in the delicate balancing act required by Ake Sandgren's
adaptation.  While many things happen *to* Roland, he is never merely a
receptacle.  He exhibits a cockiness born of necessity, and a gift for
utilizing the tools at his disposal to get ahead.  When another boy
offers Roland a used bike he hasn't the money for, Roland offers to
repair and paint some other bikes to repay his debt.  After a fight
with his brother results in Roland owing his father money as well, he
tries to earn it by selling balloons made out of the condoms his mother
distributes illegally.  Roland is always thinking, and it is this
intelligence that comes through in Salen's performance.  He is
complemented by a wonderful supporting cast, particularly Stellan
Skarsgaard as Roland's father, a driven man who compensates for his
crippling sciatica by pushing himself and his family to their limits.
     Although THE SLINGSHOT is, as one might expect, primarily
episodic, it is still rich enough thematically that it never feels like
merely a loose collection of scenes.  Foremost among these themes is
the clash of capitalism and socialism, personified by Roland himself.
While his father lectures to him about the revolution, Roland fashions
many creations with condoms, and imagines himself credited as the
inventor of "The Underwater Sock" and "The Condom Slingshot."  When
Roland shows a cat his newly refurbished bike and says to it, "That's
mine," it is as succinct a statement of rebellion as one might
imagine.  There is also a nicely played scene in which Roland's father,
who is acting as a body double for a portrait of the King, momentarily
forgets his politics when he puts on a pair of expensive shoes.  This
is not to say that THE SLINGSHOT acts as little more than a one-sided
political tract; Sandgren is equally critical of the restrictive
government policies which turn the Schutts into criminals for
advocating birth control.  However, it is Roland's internal struggle
with his heritage that makes his external struggles even more potent.
     THE SLINGSHOT's key failing may be that it tries to do too much,
and some of the scenes begin to seem repetitive.  The obligatory moment
of sexual awakening seems just that--obligatory--and ends with a
scene surprisingly lacking in emotional punch.  A late series of events
which involves Roland's implication in a crime bogs down seriously, and
removes him from the relationships which drive his story.  Those
relationships, particularly Roland's complex interaction with his
father, are what make THE SLINGSHOT memorable.  Thanks to Jasper
Salen's splendid work, THE SLINGSHOT takes its place as a worthy
addition to the list of fine coming-of-age films.

Title
Review for Titanic Town (1998)
TITANIC TOWN
(Shooting Gallery)
Starring:  Julie Walters, Ciaran Hinds, Nuala O'Neill, Ciaran McMenamin,
James Loughran, Barry Loughran, Elizabeth Donaghy. 
Screenplay:  Anne Devlin, based on the novel by Mary Costello.
Producers:  George Faber and Charles Patterson.
Director:  Roger Michell.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be R for profanity, violence and adult
themes)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In a scene early in TITANIC TOWN -- a drama set in Belfast during the
early days of the Troubles circa 1972 -- British soldiers go on a
house-to-house raid of a neighborhood called Andersonstown. One of the
raided residences is that of Bernie (Julie Walters) and Aidan McPhelimy
(Ciaran Hinds), quiet and non-political parents of four children. While
neighbors rage in the street at the soldiers' actions, Bernie's response
to the impending invasion of her home expresses concern of a different
kind. She frets that the army will find the beds unmade; when they search
under her daughter's bed, she laments to the child, "Ah, the dust!"
     It's a small bit of business, only one of many in the film, but it
shows how interested director Roger Michell and screenwriter Anne Devlin
(working from Mary Costello's autobiographical novel) are with
establishing character. Over the course of the film, Bernie becomes a bona
fide political celebrity, though not a much-beloved one. Incensed over a
friend's death at the hands of an IRA sniper, Bernie dares to criticize
the IRA's tactics. She joins a peace movement, and finds her criticism
drawing the ire of IRA sympathizers in the form of vandalism and threats. 
Nevertheless she perseveres in an effort to collect signatures for a
petition calling for a change in IRA tactics. What's extraordinary about
Bernie is that she's so un-extraordinary. She's simply a house-proud 
mother concerned more with keeping her kids alive than making a statement. 
At her core, she's a woman who likes the beds made, and with no dust under
them.
     This simple focus on a simple but very determined woman helps TITANIC
TOWN avoid the most common pitfall of films set against a political
struggle: It never stops to lecture about the futility of war or to make
any other grandiose statement about the events that form its backdrop. 
Walters delivers a witty, thoroughly engaging performance as Bernie, who
stumbles into a position as spokesperson by sheer accident. She's
convincing both in Bernie's political innocence -- reading a list of IRA
demands to a British official with no clue as to how implausible they are
-- and her gradual embrace of the spotlight. TITANIC TOWN paints a picture
of a world where life can't be separated from politics, and where one
person's odd brand of heroism is born of sheer necessity.
     Bernie is such a solid center of the film that its sub-plots often
feel fairly thin by comparison. There's unrealized potential in Aidan's
character, an ulcer-ridden man whose resentment of his infirmity bubbles
over into resentment of his wife's very public actions. There's also a
romantic angle involving Bernie's 16-year-old daughter Annie (nicely
played by newcomer Nuala O'Neill) that doesn't always feel connected to
the story as a whole, despite the framing structure of the story as
Annie's reminiscence of her mother's fame. TITANIC TOWN draws its strength
from Bernie's incongruous involvement in matters previously beyond her
comprehension. Nothing else in the film is ever quite as compelling.
     That one story is still compelling enough to keep TITANIC TOWN moving
briskly, and to offer a vivid insight into the chaos of 1970s Belfast. 
Ultimately, despite its milieu of wide-scale violence and strife, it's a
film that works thanks to its small moments: avid reader Annie looking out
at the war in the streets with a gasp of, "Agincourt!"; a woman dropped
suddenly in her tracks by a stray bullet; Bernie deducing the location of
the IRA meeting spot through keen recollection of interior design. Films
about Big Issues need those small moments to keep them human. TITANIC TOWN
is never the monolith its title might suggest. Tragedy sometimes appears
in a form less like a sinking ship than like an unmade bed.

Title
Review for Big Squeeze, The (1996)
     For all the talk about how safe and predictable Hollywood film-making
has become in recent years (and well-deserved talk it has been), I think
the independents have been getting a bit lazy as well.  The big studios
may try to duplicate the formulas of their blockbusters, but the small
distributors are just as eager to duplicate the successes within their own
ranks, which is why you see a lot of two kinds of film at your local art
house:  talky generational relationship comedies, and gritty, violent
capers.  Many cinephiles find the former particularly annoying, but I have
grown more tired of the attitude-heavy but substance-light films which
worship at the altar of Tarantino and turn out sour garbage like THINGS TO
DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD.  THE BIG SQUEEZE is a nice idea for a spin
on that trend, an unspectacular but surprisingly sunny film noir -- a film
blanc, if you will.
     Set in Los Angeles' low-rent Highland Park neighborhood, THE BIG
SQUEEZE is the story of Tanya Mulhill (Lara Flynn Boyle), a bartender
forced to work long hours to support her husband Henry (Luca Bercovici), a
former minor league baseball star crippled by a knee injury a few years
earlier.  Tanya is content to watch her tips go to the local mission where
Henry prays for a miracle to restore his knee, until she learns that Henry
has been hiding away a $130,000 insurance settlement.  When Henry refuses
to share the wealth, Tanya asks for help from Benny O'Malley (Peter
Dobson), a con man who has been frequenting the bar.  Together they hatch
a plan to separate Henry from his money, employing Jesse (Danny Nucci), a
bar regular with a crush on Tanya, as well as a few well-planted magnolia
trees and the promise of a miracle.
     I suppose that on a basic plot level not much separates THE BIG
SQUEEZE from those same gritty, violent capers I criticized en masse.  It
includes sex, greed, double-crosses and characters with a certain
in-your-face quirkiness, and all have an uncomfortable familiarity.  What
director and writer Marcus DeLeon understands is that a change in tone can
make for an entirely different story, and THE BIG SQUEEZE is a film which
always seems to be more inviting than ominous -- Jacques Haitkin's
cinematography is bright and cheery most of the time, Mark Mothersbaugh
provides a bouncy score, and the characters are generally likeable.
DeLeon takes the substance of a dark crime drama, paints it and throws up
some curtains, and suddenly finds himself with a comedy on his hands.
     That little trick impressed me, and it is characteristic of the minor
pleasures which allow THE BIG SQUEEZE to overcome its familiar story arc
and deliberate pacing.  Peter Dobson's Benny is shown from the beginning
as a con artist whose efforts have a tendency to backfire, making his the
cocky demeanor of a losing gambler convinced that his luck is just about
to change.  Henry is also an intriguing character, a man whose pose at
piety masks a profound selfishness and self-obsession; it is a great gag
when Henry believes he is making an amazing contribution to the Church by
parting with his California League championship ring.  Part of what makes
THE BIG SQUEEZE fun to watch is that Benny's plan is based on completely
mistaken assumptions about the other people involved -- neither Tanya nor
Jesse is as obsessed with the money as he is, and Henry may actually be
_more_ obsessed with it.
     I wish DeLeon had been content with a silly subversion of noir
conventions, because his attempts at more thematic depth fall somewhat
flat.  That is partly the result of a listless performance by Lara Flynn
Boyle, who gives Tanya a flaccid personality which doesn't seem to warrant
so much fascination by so many men.  Tanya's realization of what she wants
from life is one of several sub-texts in THE BIG SQUEEZE which are lost in
the shuffle, and there is a somewhat disconcerting cynicism to DeLeon's
rationalization of the opportunistic exploitation of religious faith.  But
for all its unevenness, THE BIG SQUEEZE provides an unexpected twist to a
genre in which guns and gloom generally carry the day.  In this case, it
is a pleasant surprise to find not a single bullet fired, and every
character experiencing some kind of happy ending.  Apparently DeLeon
prefers to make love, not noir.

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Jamie Lee Curtis, Tom Arnold,
           Bill Paxton, Tia Carrere, Art Malik.
Screenplay/Director:  James Cameron.
     Was this the same James Cameron?  I thought to myself.  The same
James Cameron who gave us ALIENS, THE ABYSS and the TERMINATOR films?
It was not for want of action that I questioned the lineage of TRUE
LIES; indeed, Cameron continues to define the state of the art in the
genre.  But was this the same man who created some of the strongest
female characters in recent memory, producing such a mean-spirited and
misogynist throwback to the glory days of James Bond?  Although parts
of TRUE LIES work extremely well, its long detour into an unnecessary
and unpleasant sub-plot left me with a very bad taste in my mouth.
     TRUE LIES stars Arnold Schwarzenegger as Harry Tasker, a mild-
mannered computer salesman--at least that's what his wife Helen (Jamie
Lee Curtis) thinks.  In fact, Harry is a government agent with the
anti-terrorist Omega Sector, and has been for all fifteen years of
their marriage.  While in the middle of an investigation, Harry begins
to think that Helen is looking for excitement in an affair with a slimy
car salesman (Bill Paxton), and sets out to find out for sure.  But bad
guys aren't considerate of marital strife, and one particular terrorist
(Art Malik) threatens to place an even darker cloud--mushroom-shaped--
over the Taskers.
     I compared TRUE LIES to the James Bond films, and those
comparisons are both for good and bad.  The opening sequence features
Harry infiltrating a Swiss mansion to obtain computer files, then
dazzling beautiful art dealer Tia Carrere with his tango skills.  When
he is discovered, he flees and ends up pursued by gunmen on skis, a
device used at least twice in the Bond series.  Not that it's a
problem; the scene is sharply executed, and complemented by the
surprisingly entertaining supporting work of Tom Arnold as Harry's
partner Gib.  However, it holds out promise for a witty film based on
action set pieces, and that's not exactly what develops.
     Instead, TRUE LIES takes a sharp left turn into farce, and for
nearly half an hour becomes an entirely different film.  TRUE LIES is
loosely based on the French farce LA TOTALE, but Schwarzenegger is
extremely ill-suited for what this sub-plot asks him to do.  When Harry
suspects his wife of infidelity, he uses all of the technology at his
disposal to find out the truth, and proceeds to misunderstand phone
conversations and catch Helen in awkward but explainable positions.
For all its flash and star power, this segment of TRUE LIES plays like
little more than a $100 million episode of "Three's Company."  But it's
not just that it is contrived and interrupts the flow of the film.  It
also features Harry treating his wife with an astonishing level of
mental cruelty, and it's all played for laughs.  With another, more
plain-looking actor, this treatment might have come off as more
light-hearted.  Schwarzenegger, however, simply looks too angry, and
scenes like Harry's interrogation of Helen which had most of the
audience howling with delight had me literally cringing.
     The spectacular final hour of TRUE LIES is almost enough to tip
the balance back in its favor.  The digital effects which enhance a
harrier jet assault on a Miami highrise are spectacular, and the
pyrotechnics are dynamic.  But I could never lose myself in TRUE LIES
because of the jarring shifts between broad comedy and big action.  It
may be a funnier, more technically proficient film than HUDSON HAWK,
but it belongs in the same genre:  the multi-million dollar caper.  For
many viewers, all that will matter is that Arnold fires of a couple
hundred thousand rounds, a bridge blows up, and there are some solid
laughs.  For me, a film like TRUE LIES could only work with a lighter
touch and considerably less of a nasty edge.  With Cameron delivering
so many of his jokes through clenched teeth, I found TRUE LIES
depressing almost as often as I found it fun.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Generations (1994)
Starring:  Patrick Stewart, Malcolm McDowell, William Shatner,
Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner.
Screenplay:  Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga.
Director:  David Carson.
     Whether or not I would be considered a Trekker probably depends on
whom you would ask.  I have been a fan of both the original series and
its recently retired follow-up, as well as the even- numbered entries
in the film series.  However, I have never been one of those folks who
store away Trek minutiae and get into debates over the relative merits
of Spock vs. Data.  Somewhere along the line, the "Star Trek" film series
began to seem more and more directed at those in the latter category,
and STAR TREK: GENERATIONS may be the natural conclusion of this
direction.  Its production values may be high, but the writing is
frequently appalling, and instead of a script has a collection of
references, in-jokes and ill-defined characters.
     GENERATIONS opens in the late 23rd Century, where members of the
original Enterprise crew, including Captain James T. Kirk (William
Shatner), are present for the christening of the latest ship to bear
that name.  No sooner is it out on its maiden voyage than a distress
signal brings them to the Nexus, a mysterious ribbon of energy.  Among
those rescued from the Nexus is long-lived alien Dr. Soran (Malcolm
McDowell), but he is none-too-pleased at being back in the real world.
Seventy-eight years later, Soran is still trying to get back to the
Nexus, and again encounters an Enterprise, this one led by Captain
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart).  Soran's plan involves destroying a
star with an inhabited planet, and the only hope for saving 230 million
people is the historic meeting of two Enterprise captains.
     I don't think it is an insult to fans of "Star Trek" to suggest that
to a certain extent, the particulars of a plot are not really the most
important elements in a "Trek" film.  It's about a chance to visit with
old friends, and if they are involved in a truly interesting story it
can be considered gravy.  But even that interpretation assumes that
characterization has to be consistent, and in GENERATIONS that just
doesn't happen.  Data (Brent Spiner) is particularly victimized by this
sloppy writing.  In the film's major sub-plot, Data decides to use a
chip which will give him human emotions, a chip he has had in his
possession for over a year.  What is his motivation for taking this
drastic and perhaps dangerous step?  He doesn't get a joke.  Once the
chip is in place, Spiner gets to have a lot of fun with Data's new
emotions, but the point is that he's no longer the Data we know.  If
the rest of the "Next Generation" cast fares any better, it's only
because they're on the screen so little that they're simply window
dressing.
     But then again, this story isn't really about the new crew.  It's
about Kirk and Picard, the cowboy and the politician, sharing the
screen.  The huge surprise is that William Shatner blows Patrick
Stewart away.  Perhaps because he knows this is his last go-round in
the part that made him a legend, Shatner looks like he's having the
time of his life; Stewart, on the other hand, borders on the
deferrential, and is saddled with the same lackluster motivations as
everyone else in the cast.  Stewart's edginess is indicative of what
may be a very bad sign for Paramount's hopes to turn the new cast into
the same kind of franchise the original cast was:  these are clearly
the Not Ready for Big Screen Players.  By contrast, the prologue which
features Scotty (James Doohan) and Chekhov (Walter Koenig) is the
highlight of the film.  These characters have become part of the
popular mythology, and when they take over the Enterprise in a moment
of distress, it's a moment of high energy.  Only thirty years of
history can create a moment like that, and that's time this new crew
doesn't have.
     It certainly doesn't help that the plot they are stuck in is so
convoluted and badly constructed that you need to leave a trail of
bread crumbs to find your way out again.  It's also loaded with little
gags all aimed at those who are familiar enough with the series to turn
to all their friends in a shared nudge of recognition.  I wonder
whether anyone who is coming in cold to the "Trek" universe at this point
would be anything but baffled and bored by what is going on.  And what
a waste of Malcolm McDowell, who could have been a great monomanical
villain but should have been given a much more compelling reason for
his obsession.
     There are plenty of details both scientific and of continuity to
pick at, but to do so would be to ignore GENERATIONS' major flaws.
However, I would like to make one recommendation:  seatbelts.  Not just
for the Enterprise crew, although you'd think by the 24th Century space
travel wouldn't involve rolling around on the floor during a battle.
No, I think the audience might need them more.  This journey is one
bumpy ride.

Title
Review for Chuck & Buck (2000)
     RAIN MAN was not about Dustin Hoffman's Raymond Babbitt. There are
some who find the film overly sentimental, and others who consider
Hoffman's Oscar-winning performance little more than a gimmick, but it's
hard to argue that the basic structure of the story wasn't what it had to
be. Tom Cruise's Charlie Babbitt was the central character, the person who
grew and changed. Raymond couldn't be that character, because it's absurd
to build a narrative around the idea that someone with a profound
emotional/psychological condition can decide through a simple act of will
to be better.
     This lesson is offered to explain why CHUCK & BUCK, for all the
quirky things it does right, is ultimately an experience somewhere between
improbable and downright insulting. The troubled hero of our story is Buck
O'Brien (Mike White, who also wrote the script), a man living in about as
arrested a state of adolescence as you could imagine. Buck has never lived
away from home, never been to college, never even held a job. He is
therefore left adrift when his mother dies, and tries to fill the void by
tracking down his childhood friend Charlie Sitter (Chris Weitz), known to
him as Chuck back in the day. Charlie has moved on to a life as recording
industry executive in Los Angeles with a beautiful fiancee named Carlyn
(Beth Colt), but Buck just wants to play the way they did 15 years ago. 
And he's determined to recapture that friendship, even if it means moving
to Los Angeles and stalking Charlie to do it.
     There's a lot of interesting stuff built into the premise, including
a not-particularly-twisty twist that still generates a bit more interest
in the Chuck/Buck dynamic. White's performance as Buck is pitched just
right, somewhere between endearing and creepy in his striped T-shirt and
perpetually Blow-Pop-stuffed grin. Director Miguel Arteta's choice of
digital video seems an ill-advised one dramatically -- why heighten the
immediacy and realism of a story centered around somebody's fantasy world? 
-- but the technology and hand-held movement are rarely distracting. 
Throw in an infectiously innocuous theme song to set the tone, and you've
got the raw material for some solid whacked-out drama and dark comedy.
     And that raw material is left to rot. CHUCK & BUCK could have been
turned into a wonderfully grim tale of go-getter Charlie having to deal
with childhood events he's tried to forget being thrust back into his 
face. But Charlie is a huge sucking black hole of a characterization, left
utterly bereft of personality or motivations in Chris Weitz's performance
and White's script. He's merely a target of obsession, carelessly created
because White never intends for the story to be about anything but Buck. 
When that story turns to Buck's introspection about his life, and actions
he begins taking when he faces some hard truths, it's enough to make a jaw
drop in disbelief. CHUCK & BUCK's resolution is centered around the idea
that 15 years of juvenile infantilism are as easy to toss off as a striped
T-shirt.
     CHUCK & BUCK's saving grace is a sub-plot that ultimately has little
to do with the ostensibly main plot -- Buck's attempt to mount a
production of a play he has written about his childhood friendship, called
HANK & FRANK. There's some wonderful interaction between White and Lupe
Ontiveros (superb as a children's theater house manager given her first
chance to direct), and some funny stuff from Paul Weitz (Chris's brother,
playing the incompetent actor Buck chooses for "Hank" for his resemblance
to Charlie). A short film entirely about the play within the play might
have been great fun, unburdened by the need for grand third-act shifts of
character. CHUCK & BUCK sinks thanks to a fundamental misunderstanding of
how to structure a plot with a plausible character arc. It's like Raymond
and Charlie Babbitt walking into the sunset arm in arm, after Raymond
decides he just doesn't want to be autistic any more.

Title
Review for Welcome To Sarajevo (1997)
     Michael Winterbottom's WELCOME TO SARAJEVO is a lot like its central
character, British reporter Michael Henderson (Stephen Dillane).  An
observer on the front lines of the Serbian siege of Sarajevo, Henderson is
torn between conflicting instincts.  As a journalist, he believes he
should be detached and objective as he tells the story of Sarajevo to the
world; as a human being, he feels compelled to beccome emotionally
involved, to take action which will help ease the suffering.
     Henderson eventually chooses the latter course.  The film, on the
other hand, isn't quite so resolute.  Much of the time, Winterbottom seems
content to provide a documentary-style history of the conflict in the
former Yugoslavia.  Archival footage of speeches and politicians' comments
are strewn throughout the narrative, while bombings and sniper attacks are
depicted with gruesome real-life footage of dead bodies and mangled limbs.
The images are powerful and immediate, but they become the story rather
than complementing it.  Henderson begins to seem like a character
digitally insterted, Forrest Gump-like, into historical events.
     When the story does focus on his actions, it fumbles away too many
opportunities to personalize its grand-scale tragedy.  Character
relationships, like those between Henderson and a brash American reporter
(Woody Harrelson) and his no-nonsense producer (Kerry Fox), get just
enough attention to be frustrating; Henderson's devotion to an orphan
named Emira (Emira Nusevic) is rushed until it feels more like a cinematic
necessity than a genuine connection.  Even the film's most potentially
intense sequence, involving the illegal transport of a bus-load of orphans
out of the country, feels strangely sedate despite one gripping encounter
at a Bosnian checkpoint.  That sequence doesn't even serve as the film's
climax, leading into a dry 20-minute search for Emira's birth mother which
grinds WELCOME TO SARAJEVO to a halt.  Far too often, Winterbottom and
screenwriter Frank Cottrell Boyce demonstrate a clumsy disregard for
building a narrative with an emotional pull beyond its bursts of authentic
violence.
     I can easily imagine a film like WELCOME TO SARAJEVO degenerating
into pathos in Hollywood hands, so perhaps it deserves some credit for
avoiding copious shots of sad-eyed waifs.  Winterbottom simply goes too
far in the other direction.  The performances and direction are sturdy but
rarely inspired, resulting in a film which makes us feel terrible about
this tragic conflict in a very abstract sense.  WELCOME TO SARAJEVO is
good reporting, but it's not particularly good drama, treating its subject
with the concerned detachment of a newsmagazine feature story.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
TOY STORY 2
(Disney/Pixar)
Voices:  Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, Wayne Knight,
Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger.
Screenplay:  Andrew Stanton, Rita Hsiao, Doug Chamberlin & Chris Webb.
Producers:  Helene Plotkin and Karen Robert Jackson.
Co-Directors:  Lee Unkrich and Ash Brannon.
Director:  John Lasseter.
MPAA Rating:  G
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is no finer comic filmmaker working today than John Lasseter. 
No one better understands how to choreograph an elaborate sight gag; no
one better nails the timing of comic dialogue. He mixes the wild visual
sensibility of the Coen brothers, the anarchic pack-the-margins madness of
the Zucker brothers, and the sly wit/broad buffoonery tag team of the Marx
Brothers. Combine these elements with a genuine warmth and love of
character, and you have one of the closest things we have to a pop culture
genius in American cinema circa 1999.
     Incidentally, John Lasseter directs computer-generated films. If you
think that qualification renders such praise moot, shame on you for your
short-sightedness. Movies just don't get much more blissfully, 
intelligently entertaining than TOY STORY and A BUG'S LIFE, and I didn't
think it would be possible for a sequel to approach TOY STORY's heights of 
savvy family filmmaking. Once again, Lasseter has broadened my thinking.
His plaything creations soar again in a story that finds Woody (voice of
Tom Hanks) kidnapped from a yard sale by unscrupulous toy store owner and
collector Al McWhiggin (Wayne Knight). It turns out Woody is a toy
connected to a popular 1950s kiddie television series, and the last item
Big Al needs to complete a set including Woody's gal pal Jessie (Joan
Cusack) and Prospector Stinky Pete (Kelsey Grammer). A future behind glass
in a Tokyo museum awaits Woody unless Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) and
company can rescue him.
     When you're dealing with a film like TOY STORY 2, it's easy to spend
far too much time talking about the technology and the referrential gags.
Yes, the technology has improved by orders of magnitude even over the
original TOY STORY, making human characters like Al an even more seamless
part of the film, and making possible some dizzying, dazzling action
sequences. And yes, you could spend multiple viewings of TOY STORY 2
looking for the inside jokes: Tour Guide Barbie (Jodi Benson) admonishing
passengers bilingually a la Disneyland to "remain seated please" in a toy
car; high-speed channel surfing including Pixar shorts like TIN TOY and
LUXO JR.; a toy repair expert (Jonathan Harris) whose face recycles the
star of the Oscar-winning short GERI'S GAME; genial pokes at TRON,
JURASSIC PARK and THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK. It's a film that easily could
have cruised on its cutting edge, its hipness and the good will of
familiar faces.
     Lasseter and his writers, fortunately, appear incapable of cruising.
TOY STORY soared not because it was revolutionary, but because it was a
marvelously told film story -- a more human story than 90% of all films
actually involving humans. That human touch continues here, from the 
splendid continuing voice characterizations of Woody and Buzz by Tom Hanks
and Tim Allen, to Jessie's mournful recollection of how long it has been
since a child played with her and loved her. The kidnap/rescue structure
of TOY STORY 2 may seem familiar, but this film may actually be a bit more
resonant than the original. Leave it to Lasseter to turn a family film
into a meditation on love: Behind the pure entertainment, there's a story
about broken hearts and the risks of potentially transient relationships.
     And in front of those themes, there's pure entertainment. The
snippets from old episodes of "Woody's Roundup" are a hiliarious homage to
Howdy Doody; the toys' adventure crossing an intersection while hiding 
beneath orange traffic cones approaches Buster Keaton brilliance. It's
true that TOY STORY 2 is somewhat busier than the original, with a few too
many characters to keep up with. Some of the additional story elements
-- like Buzz encountering a naive, fresh-out-of-the-box version of himself
in the toy store -- are fun but occasionally distracting. This may not be
the instant classic TOY STORY was, but it's too close to quibble. There is
so much here that's delightful in so many ways, you begin to realize what
movies are supposed to be, yet so rarely are: transporting experiences.
I'm sure many filmmakers would love the absolute control over their movie
universe -- every blink, every blade of grass -- that John Lasseter has
over his. I'm equally sure most of them wouldn't have a clue what to do
with it. A computer, as the cliche goes, is just a tool. It takes a
visionary like John Lasseter to turn it into a magic wand.

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
PRINCESS MONONOKE
(Miramax)
Voices:  Billy Crudup, Billy Bob Thornton, Minnie Driver, John Di Maggio,
Claire Danes, John De Mita, Jada Pinkett-Smith, Gillian Anderson.
Screenplay:  Neil Gaiman, adapted from the screenplay by Hayao Miyazaki.
Producer:  Toshio Suzuki.
English Voice Director:  Jack Fletcher.
Director:  Hayao Miyazaki.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  136 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Somehow, somewhere, this whole "anime" wave has left me behind. Sure,
the Japanese animation style is distinctive, but it strikes me that the
form has not progressed radically in the 30 years since "Speed Racer." 
Though the backgrounds may have become richer, there's still a vaguely
Anglicized blandness to the character design, a strange lack of fluidity
to the acrobatic movements. When the Japanese smash PRINCESS MONONOKE made
its way to our shores, it was spoken of as the future of animation. I was
skeptical that it would bring anything that wasn't already the past of
anime.
     From an animation standpoint, I still think that's true, though
PRINCESS MONONOKE does have some striking imagery. The real revelation in
the film is the depth and complexity of its mythology and storytelling,
which manage to overcome the problems with the human story. Hayao
Miyazaki's tale begins with a prince named Ashitaka (Billy Crudup) of an
exiled tribe. In the course of defending his village from a boar-demon,
Ashitaka is infected with a malignancy that can only be cured by the Great
Forest Spirit. Thus Ashitaka begins a quest that leads him to an iron
mining town at the edge of a huge forest, a town led by the Lady Eboshi
(Minnie Driver). The town is in conflict not only with a rival warlord who
wants a share of the iron, but with the nature spirits who loathe the
encroachment of humans on their forest. Ashitaka finds himself caught in
the middle, especially when he becomes enamored of San (Claire Danes), the
human stepdaughter of the great wolf goddess Moro (Gillian Anderson).
     In case there is any confusion on the subject, let's be clear that
PRINCESS MONONOKE is a film for adults. Heads and limbs fly at a rate
approaching that of SLEEPY HOLLOW, and the manipulative monk Jigo (Billy
Bob Thornton) uses some salty language. It also maintains an adult tone in
the set-up of its mystical world, with gods who can be petulant, violent
and even just plain stupid (a cosmology far more in keeping with most
ancient civilizations' mythologies than Disney's benign pantheisms). Most
impressive, Miyazaki keeps his story free of the didacticism so common in
films with environmental themes. Lady Eboshi isn't portrayed as some
cackling, grasping villain representing "civilization bad" -- instead,
she's a philanthropist revered by the lepers and former prostitutes she
employs in her iron works. While the nature gods are understandably bitter
as they watch forests fall, theirs is not the only side of this
story. Rare is the tale that suggests industry could be a co-existing
entity in nature, rather than an inherent evil.
     PRINCESS MONONOKE is so engrossing as both legend and lesson that you
wish it could treat its characters with more care. The conflicts of its
principal characters (Ashitaka's struggle with his ever-more-homicidal
infected arm, San's struggle to reconcile her human and lupine 
backgrounds) are given only passing attention, leaving most of the focus
on the set pieces and the philosophy. The line readings by the English
actors are flat and constricted, performances set to a stopwatch of mouth
movements instead of to the needs of the scene. And then there's the
dialogue, which generally ranges from the annoyingly literalist 
(characters seem incapable of looking at a thing without calling out its
name) to the purely giggle-inducing (I don't believe I'll ever embrace
unreservedly a film that includes the line, "Forest Spirit, we give you
back your head"). PRINCESS MONONOKE at times appears to be an animated
variation on this year's more ballyhooed version of mythopoetics over
substance, THE PHANTOM MENACE.
     Still, there is something compelling about the look of PRINCESS
MONONOKE, more so than I was expecting. The design of the supernatural
characters is always intriguing, from the writhing worm-bodies of the
demons to the Pillsbury Doughboy-cum-tiki-idol sprites called the
Kodamas; the battlefields are arresting in their gore-spattered silence.  
Indeed, silence plays an unexpectedly effective role in this epic film,
giving it a sense of reverence. There's just the problem of those darned
people, whose homogeneity in word and countenance hinders an otherwise
stellar effort. Anime may be more or less what it used to be, but at least
the storytelling behind it is growing up.

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
HAPPINESS
(Good Machine)
Starring:  Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Lara Flynn
Boyle, Cynthia Stevenson, Camryn Manheim, Ben Gazarra, Louise Lasser.
Screenplay:  Todd Solondz.
Producers:  Ted Hope and Christine Vachon.
Director:  Todd Solondz.
MPAA Rating:  Not Rated (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity).
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     HAPPINESS is almost too difficult to watch -- not because of its
potentially shocking content, but because it's so achingly sad.  Lonely
men make obscene phone calls which only seem to make them more frustrated.
Stabs at romance turn into depressing one-night stands.  A few moments of
isolated contact quickly vanish in a rage of rejection.  The dozen or so
principal characters in Todd Solondz's bleakly funny suburban nightmare
fumble and fail so consistently in their pursuit of happiness you might
suspect it was unattainable.
     And, in the sense that some of them define it, it is.  HAPPINESS
deals with people whose chances for contentment are thwarted by yearnings
for things they can't have, or have been led to believe they _should_ have
by cultural signals like the shmaltz love ballads that permeate the
soundtrack.  Joy (Jane Adams), a single aspiring songwriter, feels she
should have a man and a stable life like her married older sister Trish
(Cynthia Stevenson); Trish, a housewife, feels inferior to sister Helen
(Lara Flynn Boyle), a successful author; Helen, meanwhile, wants a life of
danger to give her writing "authenticity."  Helen's lonely, obscene
phone-calling neighbor Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman) longs for Helen
while considering her inaccessible, even as he becomes the object of
similar feelings from even lonelier neighbor Kristina (Camryn Manheim).
Solondz fills his world with people who want what they haven't got, never
realizing how much it could cost them.
     Nowhere is that more evident than in HAPPINESS' trickiest character,
Trish's husband Bill (Dylan Baker).  A successful therapist, Bill also
happens to be a pedophile who has unnervingly frank sexual discussions
with his 11-year-old son Billy (Rufus Read) and molests Billy's classmates
during sleepovers.  Baker gives Bill so many layers that he always seems 
human even through his predatory calculation.  His attempt to cajole
Billy's young friend into eating a drugged sandwich is as pathetic as it
is creepy, his parental concern as genuine as it is tainted.  Solondz is
never merely interested in the sensationalistic but trite notion that the
monsters who turn up in headlines are our neighbors.  He wants us to see
the misery of a monster who knows that he's causing pain but can't stop
himself because causing it at least for a moment eases his own.
     It's even more unsettling that Solondz sets Bill at one far end of
a continuum of pain selfishly inflicted in the desperate search for
fulfillment.  Allen humiliates women he calls in an attempt to feel
significant; the sisters' father (Ben Gazzara) abandons his wife in search
of something even another woman can't provide; Joy dumps a boyfriend (a
scathing cameo by Jon Lovitz) who may be a sensitive guy.  There are no
grand enlightenments in HAPPINESS, which may make it seem that Solondz is
simply reveling in the characters' degradation.  The fact is they're
merely deeply flawed, some making small steps towards defining their own
happiness, others too immersed in external definitions to be ready for
those small steps.
     Solondz's one real mis-step -- aside from the unnecessarily long
running time -- involves a murder/rape sub-plot which launches HAPPINESS
into an unnecessarily surreal direction.  The film doesn't need the cheap
laughs from references to cut up body parts in freezer bags, not when it
offers edgy humor that's so much more uncomfortably genuine.  A key scene
in HAPPINESS finds Billy sharing concerns with his father that he's not
"normal" because he may not be maturing sexually as fast as his peers.
It's brutally ironic that he's asking for advice on normalcy from a man
who may be nobody's paradigm of normalcy, but at least he's receiving
reassurance that he's not alone in his confusion.  The paralyzing pursuit
of "normalcy" is what makes so many of the people in HAPPINESS so
unhappy. Solondz turns what could have been a freak show into a
reassurance that we, too, are not alone in being something other than
"normal."

Title
Review for Tank Girl (1995)
     TANK GIRL is a movie made for the "you just don't get it"
crowd.  There is a segment of the movie-going audience, mostly young
and mostly male, whhich takes a certain contrarian pride i
championing oddball genre flicks which are generally met with
critical disdain or indifference.  These are the movies which come
to be known as "cult" favorites, and are treated as something of a
barometer of hipness.  This is what TANK GIRL is almost certain to
be, and I'll bet that the filmmakers are quite aware of it.  Part
ROAD WARRIOR, part ADVENTURES OF BUCKAROO BANZAI and part NATURAL
BORN KILLERS, TANK GIRL is sometimes quirky and fun, but just as
often merely loud and sloppy.
     In 2033, water is the most precious of resources after a comet
causes a global drought.  Most of that water is controlled by the
fascistic Water & Power Company, headed by the evil Kesslee (Malcolm
McDowell).  However, scattered bands of rebels try to live without
the W & P's control, one of which includes the feisty Rebecca Buck
(Lori Petty).  When the group's base is raided, Rebecca becomes
slave labor, and befriends a W & P mechanic and pilot called Jet
(Naomi Watts).  They manage to escape in W & P vehicles, but
Rebecca's young friend Sam (Stacy Linn Rawsower) is still a
prisoner.  With the assistance of the mutant Rippers, Rebecca--now
Tank Girl--and Jet attempt to save Sam and shut down the W & P.
     I'll give this to director Rachel Talalay--she seems to know
exactly what it is she wants to do with TANK GIRL.  It is a
hyper-kinetic piece of work that never seems to be taking itself at
all seriously, from the comic book page stills that introduce several
scenes to the goofy and diverse personalities of the supposedly
ferocious Rippers (genetically altered human-kangaroo hybrids,
designed by special effects make-up whiz Stan Winston).  There is
Malcolm McDowell, still resplendent in his spiky Sting-at-50 hairdo
from STAR TREK: GENERATIONS, playing a much livelier version of the
same megalomaniac.  He also gets to play with TANK GIRL's niftiest
gadget, a device which sucks all the water out of a human body.  And
of course, there is the bizarre production number in which Tank Girl
leads a group of futuristic exotic dancers in a production number to
Cole Porter's "Let's Do It."  There is one thing of which you can't
accuse TANK GIRL, and that is being conventional.
     What it can be accused of is not being nearly as clever as it
is self-consciously different.  Tedi Sarafian (sister of TERMINAL
VELOCITY director Deran Serafian) has provided Lori Petty with a lot
of one-liners, but none of them have any kick; in fact, I can't
recall a single piece of dialogue from the entire film.  Petty is a
great cast as the tough and unflappable Tank Girl, but she has to
carry far too much of the film with her cocky demeanor, because her
supporting cast (excluding McDowell, whose part is really fairly
small) is unimpressive.  The film also flounders a bit when it makes
token efforts to flesh out the characters, like giving Rebecca a
boyfriend she watches die at the hands of the W & P or her mother
hen relationship with Sam.  TANK GIRL, both the character and the
film, have attitude to spare, but often little else.
     Perhaps as much as anything, though, I was distracted by James
R. Symons trigger-happy editing which, combined with a soundtrack
compiled by Hole's Courtney Love-Cobain, makes TANK GIRL feel like a
feature length version of MTV's "Alternative Nation."  Entire
sequences are composed of snippets of Petty posing and doing cute
little things, apparently aware of the camera.  The battle sequences
are a real weak link, particularly one in which two separate battles
are cross-cut ineffectively.  Meanwhile, the made-for-playlists
soundtrack blasts out riff after riff from Devo, L7, Paul
Westerberg and other college radio darlings.  It was after about the
tenth song, sometime before the headache started to set in, that I
began to feel that TANK GIRL was one of those movies that had been
marketed, not made.  I wanted to like TANK GIRL, but I kept feeling
that the filmmakers kept daring me not to like it, daring me to be
un-hip.

Title
Review for Chain Reaction (1996)
Starring:  Keanu Reeves, Morgan Freeman, Rachel Weisz, Fred Ward, Kevin
Dunn, Brian Cox.
Screenplay:  J. F. Lawton, Michael Bortman.
Director:  Andrew Davis.
     Most of the time, it is fairly easy for me to put my finger on why a
film didn't work for me:  sloppy performances, inane writing, lackluster
production, leaden direction, what have you.  Then there are cases like
CHAIN REACTION.  There is nothing aggressively unwatchable about this new
action thriller, no glaring stupidity; even Keanu Reeves didn't make me
want to run screaming for the parking lot.  Yet I left the theater not
just unimpressed, but unsatisfied, as though I had just left a restaurant
without getting a bite to eat.  CHAIN REACTION may be one of the most
generic film experiences I have ever had, a chain of events without a
single speck of personality.
     Reeves plays Eddie Kasalivich, a machinist at the University of
Chicago working on a project to create a clean, limitless fuel source from
water, funded by a foundation headed by Paul Shannon (Morgan Freeman).
One night, Eddie stumbles onto the final piece of the puzzle, and a new
era seems right around the corner.  That is before one scientist on the
project is killed, another disappears, and an explosion at the research
facility levels several city blocks.  Suddenly, Eddie finds himself
suspected of espionage along with physicist Lily Sinclair (Rachel Weisz),
and the two take off on the run from the FBI.  Of course, the Feds prove
to be the least of their worries, as other parties seem eager to get their
hands on Eddie and Lily first, and Paul appears to be the only person they
can trust.
     It would be easy enough to pick on CHAIN REACTION for its obviousness
-- if you aren't aware that the government and oil companies would
conspire to bury alternative fuel sources, you clearly haven't been doing
your street-corner-leaflet reading -- but obviousness tends not to be
terribly troublesome to most genre film viewers.  No, the real problem is
that CHAIN REACTION traffics in a kind of monotonous obviousness.  We know
our hero is going to be in for a series of chases until he ultimately
proves his innocence, and that everyone is suspect except the spunky love
interest.  Those chases are fairly flat, however, and even paranoia
becomes mundane in CHAIN REACTION.  Director Andrew Davis appears content
to do a remake of his own THE FUGITIVE, with a wrongly-accused man,
traitorous colleagues and a hard-nosed but ultimately sympathetic law
enforcement agent (Fred Ward as the lead FBI investigator).  I suppose you
can't blame Davis for returning to familiar territory after the dismal
STEAL BIG, STEAL LITTLE, but the familiar in this case has left him wholly
uninspired.
     I think there is also a rather important lesson which Davis failed to
take away from THE FUGITIVE, namely that for a plot of that kind to work,
it is fairly important for the hero to be someone you want to root for.
Harrison Ford's Richard Kimble may not have had a complex history, but at
least you knew he had a history.  Eddie and Lily aren't even stock
characters in the service of this plot...they're non-characters.  The
script by J. F. Lawton and Michael Bortman gives us exactly one piece of
information about Eddie (he once blew up a lab by accident) and exactly
one piece of information about Lily (she's British), and neither one make
an ounce of difference.  One of the reasons CHAIN REACTION feels so dead
is that every person in the film might as well _be_ dead, even the
ordinarily ultra-sinister Brian Cox as a nasty CIA operative.  I was so
desperate for a character with some life that when Eddie announced that he
and Lily were going to hide out with an old friend named Maggie, I said a
silent prayer that she would turn out to be a lovably eccentric scientist.
And she turned out to be Joanna Cassidy playing a bland astronomer.
     I will give CHAIN REACTION credit for casting Keanu Reeves in a role
where he can do little damage.  Eddie probably has two dozen lines in the
whole film, and a quiet Keanu is a tolerable Keanu.  I will also give
credit for casting Morgan Freeman, period.  Even in a torpid piece of
film-making like this, he commands attention, and his speech about the
consequences of this new fuel takes on weight just because it is Freeman
who delivers it.  And I will give credit for a welcome refusal to explain
the pseudo-science which allows the water-fuel to work.  I just wish it
could have generated some energy for this film.  To borrow the over-worked
comparison of action film to amusement park ride, CHAIN REACTION is more
like the kiddie train at a petting zoo.  It just goes around and around
and around...and then stops.

Title
Review for Thousand Acres, A (1997)
A THOUSAND ACRES
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Michelle Pfeiffer, Jessica Lange, Jason Robards, Jennifer Jason
Leigh, Colin Firth, Keith Carradine, Kevin Anderson.
Screenplay:  Laura Jones, based on the novel by Jane Smiley.
Producers:  Marc Abraham, Steve Golin, Lynn Arost, Kaaate Guinzburg and
Sigurjon Sighvatsson.
Director:  Jocelyn Moorhouse.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     All right, let's get this out of the way:  A THOUSAND ACRES is "King
Lear" on the farm.  It's the story of an aging farmer named Larry Cook
(Jason Robards) who decides to retire and divide his massive Iowa spread
between his daughters Ginny (Jessica Lange), Rose (Michelle Pfeiffer) and
Caroline (Jennifer Jason Leigh).  Caroline expresses some doubts, however,
prompting an enraged Larry to cut her out of the deal.  That leaves Ginny
and Rose and their hubands running the farm, but it also leaves Larry on a
slow train towards madness.  One massive
external-storm-reflecting-internal-turmoil later, the entire family is
caught up in a complex web of bitterness and long-buried secrets.
     No one involved is pretending A THOUSAND ACRES _isn't_ a gloss on
"Lear."  The front cover flap of Jane Smiley's Pulitzer Prize-winning 1991
novel flatly proclaims it, and the film's production notes explain the
connection in detail.  But that didn't have to be all there was to the
film.  There was certainly plenty more to Smiley's novel, an engrossing
tale filled with lyrical prose and finely-observed details about the
daily routines of farm life.  That sense of a specific place, as well as
the specific time of malaise-era 1979, gave the novel a distinctive feel
which transcended the familiarity of the basic plot elements.
     Director Jocelyn Moorhouse's rendering of the story, on the other
hand, never quite stakes out its own territory.  Sure, it retains Smiley's
unique sympathy for the daughers -- her angle suggests Lear deserved
everything he got, and then some -- as well as the strong sibling
relationship.  Both Jessica Lange and Michelle Pfeiffer turn in strong
performances, particularly Lange as the placid, unquestioning Ginny.  Yet
even their relationship can't hold A THOUSAND ACRES together once Laura
Jones' script starts racing from melodramatic plot point to melodramatic
plot point, as though capturing every sordid detail would result in
capturing the essence of the material.  Without the poetry and perspective
of Smiley's language, the story becomes little more than a collection of
tragedies -- Shakespeare without the wisdom or the words.  It's like
something out of a pitch meeting from THE PLAYER:  "It's King Lear, but
it's funny, and sad, and with breast cancer, adultery, domestic violence,
alcoholism and child abuse."
     Actually, not exactly sad, and not at all funny.  A THOUSAND ACRES is
a terribly grim film experience, filled with bitter and unhappy people who
become more bitter and unhappy with each passing day.  Even when the film
turns to pathos, it never allows the audience an emotional catharsis
because no one seems eager to reach a resolution.  Meanwhile the only
laughs are of the gallows variety, mostly connected to realizations that
characters have suffered yet another humiliation, with a dash of mixed
Shakespearean metaphor (a reference to THE MERCHANT OF VENICE's "pound of
flesh") thrown in for good measure.
     Talented cinematographer Tak Fujimoto does his best to capture
Smiley's Iowa landscapes visually, but his is an effort doomed to failure.
Smiley was able to turn the land into a charater in her novel, perhaps its
most important character.  It's a character Shakespeare didn't come up
with, and it's one of the things which gave A THOUSAND ACRES its own
personality and resonance on the page.  How sharper than a serpent's tooth
it is to have such a disappointing adaption.

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
THE PARENT TRAP (1998)
Starring:  Lindsay Lohan, Dennis Quaid, Natasha Richardson, Elaine
Hendrix, Lisa Ann Walter, Simon Kunz.
Screenplay:  David Swift and Nancy Meyers & Charles Shyer, based on "Das
Doppelte Lottchen" by Erich Kastner.
Producer:  Charles Shyer.
Director:  Nancy Meyers.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are probably equal reasons to fear for the worst and hope for
the best in considering a remake of Disney's 1961 film THE PARENT TRAP.
On the one hand, you have Disney's recent track record plundering its own
vaults for tiresome, frantic "updates" like 101 DALMATIANS, THAT DARN CAT
and FLUBBER.  On the other hand, you have the film-making team of Charles
Shyer and Nancy Meyers, who infuriated purists by daring to remake FATHER
OF THE BRIDE then turned out a thoroughly charming father-daughter
relationship story which in some ways improved on the original (Martin
Short's over-the-top Franck-o-phone notwithstanding).  Which would rule:
1990s Disney scatalogy-mongering, or Shyer/Meyers restraint and family
appeal?
     It's a pleasure to report that the 1998 model of THE PARENT TRAP
offers far more of the latter than the former, though it's far from an
unqualified success.  The story again concerns two young twins --
California girl Hallie Parker and Londoner Annie James (both played by
Lindsay Lohan) -- who never knew of each other's existence until they meet
at a New England summer camp.  It seems that their parents Nick (Dennis
Quaid) and Elizabeth (Natasha Richardson) impulsively married then
impulsively divorced years earlier, dividing everything down the middle
incuding their children.  With each one intrigued by the prospect of
meeting the parent she has never known, as well as the prospect of
bringing Nick and Elizabeth together again, the two girls decide to switch
places when returning home from camp.  There turns out to be one major
snag in the plan, however:  Nick's new fiancee Meredith (Elaine Hendrix),
a gold-digging manipulator who spells nothing but trouble.
     What's most right about THE PARENT TRAP is that it avoids what has
been most wrong about other recent Disney remakes.  From the opening
credits sequence, which depicts Nick and Elizabeth's whirlwind marriage to
the tune of Nat King Cole's "L-O-V-E," THE PARENT TRAP seems to have a
modicum of class and an interest in telling a story without explosions or
flatulence.  There are some high-spirited pranks as the girls compete at
camp, and a bit of slapstick during a camping trip, but mostly it's just a
pleasant, amusing diversion that could have been made 30 years ago like
the original.  A high-concept premise rarely feels this low-concept.
     The one thing it couldn't have had thirty years ago is 11-year-old
Lindsay Lohan, the film's captivating star.  Child actors are trouble
enough, and child actors in their first feature film even more so, but
Lohan's good-natured sweetness is infectious.  She even adopts a quite
serviceable English accent which should make more veteran actors (are you
listening, Kevin Costner) hang their heads in shame.  Lohan is just part
of a solid cast, including Hendrix as a juicy villainess and Lisa Ann
Walter as Nick's acerbic housekeeper, which gives the story plenty of
humor and warmth.  And it's a nice touch to see Joanna Barnes, reprising
her character from the original PARENT TRAP in the appropriate role of
Meredith's mother.
     As is the case with most remakes, it's tough to argue that THE
PARENT TRAP was crying out for a contemporary re-telling.  This version
brings nothing revolutionary to the table, drags through some sluggish
spots in its two hour running time, and never really builds much chemistry
between Quaid and Richardson.  Most disappointing is the climactic camping
trip where the twins torment the hapless city girl Meredith; the sequence
is too short, the editing too choppy, and the resolution far too abrupt.
THE PARENT TRAP is basically the kind of film usually described with a
dismissive word like "cute," which is certainly accurate enough.  "Cute"
films are becoming harder and harder to find, however, and this one keeps
things light enough to sidestep any of Shyer and Meyers' more saccharine
impulses.  Every once in a while, uncomplicated and inoffensive fun feels
just right.

Title
Review for Needful Things (1993)
Starring:  Max von Sydow, Ed Harris, Bonnie Bedelia, J. T. Walsh.
Screenwriter:  W. D. Richter.
Director:  Fraser C. Heston.
     NEEDFUL THINGS is the eighteenth feature film based on the
published works of author-cum-cottage industry Stephen King.  If one
adds sequels, original screenplays and television adaptations, that
totals roughly 50 hours of film treatment, about two thirds of which
has been useful only as a mild sedative.  Although to state that King's
works have fared poorly in translation to the screen may be to give him
more credit than he is due, it is certainly true that King on screen
has been far less successful than King in print.  That is not likely to
change with NEEDFUL THINGS.  Lacking the suspense to be a crossover hit
like MISERY, or sufficient mayhem to please the Freddy Krueger crowd,
it treads a soggy middle ground, going for cheap laughs rather than
working up solid scares.
     Set in King's favorite haunted hamlet of Castle Rock, Maine (still
thriving in spite of serial killings, a rabid St. Bernard and two or
three minor demonic possessions), NEEDFUL THINGS begins with the
arrival of Leland Gaunt (Max von Sydow), a grandfatherly sort who opens
a curio shop called Needful Things.  It turns out to be a rather
special shop, one wherein every patron can find the one thing that he
or she wants most in the world.  As a fee, Gaunt asks only that the
purchaser perform a small task, a prank on a fellow citizen.  When the
pranks begin to turn sour, Sheriff Alan Pangborn (Ed Harris) begins to
investigate, and slowly begins to believe that Mr. Gaunt is not exactly
what he seems.
     There is the germ of an intriguing idea in NEEDFUL THINGS, one
borrowed from Ray Bradbury's SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES:  what
would you be willing to do for your heart's desire?  Add to that the
simmering hatreds and intolerance beneath the veneer of polite
interaction, and there's the potential for something beyond your
run-of-the-mill gore fest.  Screenwriter W. D. Richter and director
Fraser C. Heston set up reasonably well, but don't deliver.  NEEDFUL
THINGS seems to take forever to get any kind of momentum going, and
when it does at last seem to be moving it runs into a brick wall of
silly dialogue and shoddy acting.
     The latter is somewhat surprising given the reasonably talented
cast.  The performances range from the competent (Bonnie Bedelia as the
sheriff's girlfriend) to the confused (Harris) to the scenery- chewing
(almost everyone else).  Valri Bromfield sneers and swears as a loony
turkey farmer; Amanda Plummer does a New England accented variation on
her standard eccentric; J. T. Walsh seems to be channeling Jack
Nicholson's performance from THE SHINING, but without the charisma, as
the town's pompous leading citizen.  The biggest shock is von Sydow,
who seems completely miscast.  He appears to revel in the campier
elements, never bringing any genuine menace to Gaunt.  It's hard to
stir up any dread towards a character who calls his enemy a "wussy."
     I suppose the blame for that lies with Richter, best know as the
creator of the campy cult favorite THE ADVENTURES OF BUCKAROO BANZAI.
He seems to have been a poor choice for this job, sacrificing suspense
for silly punch lines.  His black-humored approach to the story just
didn't work.  Similarly, director Heston (yes, _that_ Heston's son)
doesn't quite have the deft touch required to direct suspense.  He does
a nice job with the fantasy sequences as Gaunt entices his customers,
but other elements go completely astray.  He never gives his actors a
sense for the proper tone, which makes it appear that Harris and
Bedelia are acting in a different movie than everyone else.  And he
lays on the atmospheric smoke in Gaunt's shop so thick I thought I
could see it puffing in from off-camera.  NEEDFUL THINGS is muddled,
and in too many of the wrong hands.
     I did find a few moments of amusement, all of which were probably
unintentional.  In one scene, a jukebox skips while playing "Achy
Breaky Heart," repeating the title over and over.  Also ironic is
Harris' statement that "this is a quiet town."  Given Castle Rock's
history in the King canon, "quiet" is definitely not the adjective
which springs to mind.
     I think a line by Gaunt summarizes NEEDFUL THINGS better than I
ever could:  "A couple of deaths, a few explosions ... not my best
work, but what the hell."

Title
Review for I Love Trouble (1994)
Starring:  Julia Roberts, Nick Nolte, Saul Rubinek, James Rebhorn.
Screenplay:  Nancy Meyers and Charles Shyer.
Director:  Charles Shyer.
     If you're making a list of movie terms you don't hear all that
often, "caper" has to be right up there.  It puts me in mind of
light-hearted mystery with a generous helping of romance, beautiful
people in danger but not hard-core danger; NORTH BY NORTHWEST comes to
mind, or the THIN MAN series.  I LOVE TROUBLE is an attempt to
resurrect the caper, and you've got to hand it to Nancy Meyers and
Charles Shyer for trying.  They've put two appealing stars with great
chemistry in a fast-paced film.  They just forgot to give them anything
to do.  As much as I found myself wanting to enjoy I LOVE TROUBLE, it
barely managed to divert me.
     Nick Nolte stars as Peter Brackett, a columnist for a Chicago
newspaper loved both by readers and by the ladies.  Due to a staffing
shortage, Brackett is sent out to cover a train derailment.  There he
meets Sabrina Peterson (Julia Roberts), a young reporter for a rival
paper who resists his advances.  When Peterson scoops Brackett on a
lead, his competitive juices start flowing, and the train story turns
into a good-natured game of one-upmanship.  However, it soon begins to
appear that the train wreck was no accident, and when bullets begin to
fly Brackett and Peterson form a reluctant and competitive
partnership.  Along the way, antagonism naturally turns to attraction.
     Shortly after I LOVE TROUBLE started, something began to become
clear: there were no characters.  Meyers and Shyer had thrown two
reporters of opposite genders into a movie without giving them
personalities.  At least there was an attempt to do something with
Brackett; he is shown as a self-plagiarizing narcissist who has
forgotten what real reporting is.  The problem is that that
characterization vanishes after the first fifteen minutes (easily the
film's best fifteen minutes).  Peterson is written as a good- looking
prop, a sparring partner who seems to have been born a minute before
the movie started.  Nolte and Roberts struggle admirably to generate
some kind of life for their characters, but all they can do is flash
their thousand watt smiles and hope for the best.  And they go farther
than they have any right to, purely on the strength of their charm.
When they smiled, I frequently smiled right along with them.
     It sort of makes you wonder what they could have done with a
remotely interesting story.  The big conspiracy at I LOVE TROUBLE's
center is...unique, to say the least, but it's fairly tedious stuff.
The identity of the villain is apparent from minute one, and I LOVE
TROUBLE takes far too long to get into its main plot.  In fact, I might
go so far as to say that the plot never gets going, nor is it designed
to.  It's just a device to take Nolte and Roberts from situation to
situation quickly, allow their romance to blossom, and give them a
chance to exchange witty banter.
     Only there isn't any witty banter.  All told, I have to wonder
exactly what it is that Meyers and Shyer did to earn their
screenwriting paychecks.  Their dialogue earns chuckles at best, their
sense of pacing is extremely suspect, and their characterizations are
wooden.  Like their BABY BOOM and FATHER OF THE BRIDE, I LOVE TROUBLE
seems designed only to move along affably, without spark or
inventiveness of any kind.  The fact is, there is nothing truly
off-putting about I LOVE TROUBLE.  Nolte and Roberts make an appealing
tandem, and Roberts' performance in particular is extremely energetic,
perhaps her best work to date.  But since a movie like I LOVE TROUBLE
is inevitable in its outcome--the two reporters *will* end up
together--getting there has to be more interesting.  Without any
excitement in the suspense storyline, and with two bland characters
contributing to a singularly vanilla romance, I was left watching two
beautiful people be beautiful.  It just wasn't enough.

Title
Review for Escape from L.A. (1996)
Starring:  John Carpenter, Stacy Keach, George Corraface, A. J. Langer,
Steve Buscemi, Cliff Robertson, Valeria Golino, Peter Fonda, Pam Grier.
Screenplay:  John Carpenter, Debra Hill, Kurt Russell.
Director:  John Carpenter.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Snake is Back" proclaim the posters for ESCAPE FROM L. A., and from
multiplexes across the nation, I can hear the answering cry of, "Who?"
Let's face it, this isn't exactly Indiana Jones we're talking about --
Kurt Russell's Snake Plissken last graced theater screens fifteen years
ago in ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, when a significant percentage of today's
action film audience was somewhere between puberty and mastering solid
food, and that film was not what one would call a classic of the genre.
But Russell is a born again action hero after the success of STARGATE and
EXECUTIVE DECISION, so he has once again donned the eye-patch (as well as
the titles of co-writer and co-producer) for another futuristic adventure.
The result is an attempt at self-satire which comes off as a tiresome
exercise in pyrotechnics and cheap blue screen effects.
     In ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, Snake was forced to rescue the President of
the United States after Air Force 1 crashes inside a prison colony which
once was Manhattan.  This time around, the location is Los Angeles, broken
off from the continent after a massive earthquake and turned into a
dumping round for undesirables by a morally authoritarian President (Cliff
Robertson).  But it isn't the president Snake needs to find; instead, it
is the First Daughter (A. J. Langer), who has stolen an experimental
weapon in an act of defiance.  She intends to bring it to Cuervo Jones
(George Corraface), an international criminal who rules Los Angeles and
plans to invade the U.S.  Snake is made an offer he can't refuse:  bring
back the weapon in ten hours, or die of a designer virus introduced into
his blood.
     It is a good thing Carpenter, Russell and company waited so long
between NEW YORK and L. A., because even those who actually saw the first
film probably have forgotten enough not to notice that ESCAPE FROM L. A.
is virtually a point-for-point remake of the original.  In New York, Snake
meets Brain (Harry Dean Stanton), a former running buddy who once left
Snake high and dry and whom Snake insists on calling by his real name; in
L. A., Snake meets Hershe (Pam Grier), a transsexual former running buddy
who once left Snake high and dry and whom Snake insists on calling by
his/her real name.  NEW YORK had snake on a time clock before something
introduced into his body kills him; ditto for L. A.  Both find Snake
chatting with a sympathetic woman who is promptly blown away, and both find
snake in an athletic contest for the amusement of the villains.  The
number of duplicated details is quite astonishing, actually.  At least
everyone involved did their homework.
     The twist they try to place on ESCAPE FROM L. A. is that it is
supposed to be funnier, almost a parody of the original.  I say "supposed
to" because John Carpenter may be one of the most humorless directors of
the last twenty years, taking even bizarre material like BIG TROUBLE IN
LITTLE CHINA and deadening it with his brooding style.  His idea of a joke
in ESCAPE FROM L. A. is showing every possible Southern California
landmark (Hey, it's Universal Studios!...Hey, it's the Queen Mary!) or
making a quick reference to every possible stereotype of Los Angeles
living, and to show that he isn't taking anything seriously with some
low-tech special effects, including a computer-generated submarine voyage
which makes TRON look positively state-of-the-art.  A few of the gags are
clever, like a shot at L. A.'s front-running sports fans; others can't
find a comfortable place between gruesome and silly, like a gang of
cosmetic surgery victims always in search of fresh body parts.  ESCAPE
FROM NEW YORK was overly somber, but it was lean and efficient and quite
good at creating its desolate urban landscape.  ESCAPE FROM L. A. finds
Carpenter making scattershot attempts at humor, and the experience is like
being tickled by a robot.
     There are a few simple pleasures to be found in the performances,
including Kurt Russell's laconic Snake.  It's one of the best (if
unintentional) jokes that despite the fact that everyone in the world
seems to know who Snake Plissken is, he has probably been able to escape
capture because he has no discernible personality.  Russell does a guttural
Clint Eastwood impression, and makes a solid anti-hero.  Steve Buscemi
also has fun as Cuervo's sniveling assistant Maps-of-the-Stars'-Homes
Eddie, and Bruce Campbell makes an almost unrecognizable appearance as the
Surgeon General of Beverly Hills.  Mostly, though, ESCAPE FROM L. A. is a
collection of fragments and missed opportunities where it is expected that
a multitude of sins will be hidden by big fireballs (motorcycles tend to
explode as though hit by nuclear warheads upon contact with the ground in
a John Carpenter film).  Snake may be back, but he doesn't have much to
say, and what he does have to say has been said before.

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
     It's a terrible habit of mine that I often find myself watching
non-English language films throught he lens of "how would Hollywood screw
this up." Aside from the implied inherent superiority of all things
sub-titled, there's the strange problem of comparing a film I'm watching
to a film that hasn't even been made, but which in my head is a dire
experience indeed. A film can't help but seem glorious under such
conditions, though it doesn't help the discussion of the film on its own
merits. I was doing a pretty good job of avoiding the hypothetical
comparison in Zhang Yimou's NOT ONE LESS, until a curious thing happened: 
In its final fifteen minutes, it started to turn into its own Hollywood
incarnation. Thank heaven it's so good for so long that the strange twist
can't spoil the experience.
     Using actors whose own names become the names of his characters,
Zhang tells the story of the rural Chinese village of Shuixian and its
unique educational problems. Shuixian's only teacher, Gao Enman, is
leaving on a month-long sabbatical to care for his ill mother, obliging
mayor Tian Zhenda to bring in a substitute from a neighboring village. 
The new teacher is Wei Minzhi, a 13-year-old who's the only person willing
to take the job. Wei is only in it for the 50 yuan she's been promised,
and is eager for the 10 yuan bonus Gao promises her if he returns to find
the same 28 students in his rapidly dwindling class. Then class
troublemaker Zhang Huike leaves for Beijing to help his family pay off its
debts, sending Wei on her own quest to bring Huike back to the village.
     The impressive thing about both Zhang's direction and Shi
Xiangsheng's script (based on his account of his experience as a rural
teacher) is how gradually and unobtrusively Wei's character develops.
She's pretty unsympathetic at the outset -- utterly unqualified for her
post, effective primarily at playing goalkeeper at the schoolroom door, 
but not at all troubled about demanding her money. When Huike leaves,
she's so single-minded about getting him back to guarantee her bonus that
she takes her class on a field trip that essentially amounts to slave
labor, moving bricks to earn the money for bus fare. The cleverly handled
scenes of Wei leading the class in math problems with very real-world
implications make for a solid foundation, but it's only when Wei heads
into the city that her quest becomes more selfless. The amount of time she
devotes to ensuring the welfare of one student -- although initially for
selfish reasons -- turns her into a real teacher.
     Wei's quest and the growing she does along the way make for a
thoroughly compelling narrative, but Zhang has socio-political fish to fry
as well. As NOT ONE LESS draws to a close, the story becomes a statement
about the plight of China's rural poor, including the deteriorating
conditions of schools and the flight of students to help support their
families. There's a funny bit in which a thoroughly terrified Wei goes on
television to help the search for Huike, but it leads to a sentimentalized
ending in which the troubles of the Shuixian school become a media 
sensation. A film crew rolls into town, accompanied by plenty of donated
school supplies, and the children end up gathered around Wei in an 
uplifting "to her, with love" climax while a scrolling message dutifully
informs us about the real-life conditions in rural Chinese schools. It's
still a satisfying resolution, but it's excessively underlined. It's the
way Hollywood films too often try to convince an audience they've not just
watched an enjoyable film, but also become more compassionate,
better-informed citizens of the world.
     The frustrating part is that it's so unnecessary. Virtually from the
outset, the financial conditions of the school become an effective part of
the drama; you'd never expect a film to wring such tension from a student
stepping on the school's more-precious-than-gold chalk supply. The rookie
actors are raw, but do a more than serviceable job of performing their own
lives. In short, NOT ONE LESS does everything a film needs to do to draw
you into its world, and into the characters inhabiting that world. When it
resorts to a message-heavy happy ending, it suddenly feels like another
sort of film entirely. For a thankfully brief moment, I saw a glimpse of
the mass-market crowd-pleaser that might have been. It's a reminder of how
much more pleasing a film can be when it sticks to simpler truths.

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
DOCTOR DOLITTLE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring: Eddie Murphy, Oliver Platt, voices of Norm Macdonald, Albert
Brooks, Chris Rock, Julie Kavner, Garry Shandling.
Screenplay:  Nat Maudlin and Larry Levin, based on the stories by Hugh
Lofting.
Producers:  John Davis, Joseph M. Singer and David T. Friendly.
Director:  Betty Thomas.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult humor)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm not sure exactly when it happened, but a sad development has
seized juvenile comedy as we know it.  Only token film-makers like the
Farrelly brothers (KINGPIN, DUMB AND DUMBER) have resisted what I call the
John Hughes-ification of low-brow humor:  the insistence upon wrapping up
90 minutes of crude sight gags with a great big group hug and an edifying
life lesson.  In effect, it's a con playing on the low-level guilt of
viewers who want to convince themselves that the bodily function humor is
just a necessary evil on the way to an Important Social Message.  And I'll
bet they read Playboy for the articles, too.
     Some viewers obviously manage to get past this dichotomy.
Personally, I don't want any metaphorical chocolate in my peanut butter.
DOCTOR DOLITTLE takes a salty little dab of peanut butter and smothers it
in chocolate syrup.  Eddie Murphy stars as physician John Dolittle, whose
childhood gift for communicating with animals was throttled out of him
because it made him different.  Now a straight-laced family man with a
thriving practice, Dolittle has no memory of his zooglotism until a fender
bender revives his latent ability.  Suddenly Dr. Dolittle is hearing
animal voices all around him, the news of which gets around to sick
animals everywhere keen to take advantage of being able to tell him
exactly what ails them.  This development troubles non-believers like his
medical partner Dr. Mark Weller (Oliver Platt) and his wife Lisa (Kristen
Wilson), both of whom suspect John is going a bit animal crackers.
     DOCTOR DOLITTLE has plenty of predictable charms, most of them
connected to the digitally-doctored menagerie surrounding the good doctor.
The A-list voice talent -- Norm Macdonald as the sarcastic family mutt,
Albert Brooks as a depressed circus tiger, Julie Kavner and Garry
Shandling as a pair of bickering pigeons -- offers plenty of appeal,
though prominently-featured Chris Rock as a guinea pig can only crank up
the volume on his rather boring lines.  The other critters spend a lot of
time doing cute tricks and firing off wise cracks, particularly MacDonald
and Gilbert Gottfried in a brief bit as a dog obsessed with chasing a
ball.  It's hardly classic comedy, but it's effective enough for a few
belly laughs, even with the obligatury use of various animal calls of
nature by screenwriters Nat Maudlin and Larry Levin.
     Low-brow comedy isn't the problem; lacking the nerve to stick with
low-brow comedy is.  DOCTOR DOLITTLE stretches and strains for sub-plots
on which to hang sentiment, from the self-absorbed attempts of Dr. Weller
to sell the practice to an HMO, to the troubles of Dolittles introverted
youngest daughter (Kyla Pratt), to Dolittle's noble efforts to save the
tiger from a blood clot (and you haven't really brushed aside a tear until
you've seen the touching hand-in-paw scene).  "Be who you are and love who
you are," Dolittle tells his daughter with paternal gravity, and at
precisely that moment you may want to reach out, smack him in the head and
tell him to get back to the goofy animal tricks.
     Actually, it would have been nice if Murphy had gotten back to any
tricks at all.  Murphy can be a brilliant comic performer, but he works
his finest magic as an instigator.  Aside from a few token moments of
frantic behavior, he is asked merely to react in DOCTOR DOLITTLE, to play
straight man to the talking animals, which is a huge waste of his talents.
I suppose it made sense to try another wacky re-make after the success of
THE NUTTY PROFESSOR, and I suppose it made sense to hope that director
Betty Thomas (THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE, PRIVATE PARTS) could work similar
slight-of-hand with another premise that didn't sound very promising.  It
may have seemed like a good idea at the time, but Doctor Dolittle only
works until you realize it would have worked much better with Murphy --
and the whole film -- let off the leash of excess sincerity.  When the
guffaws give way to solemnly-intoned platitudes, it spoils all the fun of
a good pigeon-crap-on-the-head gag.  Of course, I only watch for the
Important Social Message.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
     I'll admit that I didn't rent the original PSYCHO last night so I
could make my shot-by-shot comparison with a fresh memory.  I'm fairly
certain Hitchcock didn't make it explicit that Master Bates was
masturbating while watching Marion Crane disrobe, the opening helicopter
shot was definitely new, and I can't recall near-subliminal shots of
gathering storm clouds edited into the legendary "shower scene."
Otherwise, everything appeared pretty consistent with my recollection.
Director Gus Van Sant -- for reasons he has given anywhere from "why not
remake a good film instead of a bad film?" to just plain "why not?" -- had
indeed taken one of American cinema's most iconic horror films, dipped it
in color, and served it up whole to a new generation of movie-goers.
     The metronomic repetition of "why" is a bit futile at this point, but
I'm willing to hazard my own guess as to the answer:  Van Sant wanted to
remind viewers what a brilliant director Alfred Hitchcock was, and what a 
brilliant example of direction PSYCHO was in particular.  I hope viewers
(and critics) don't fold their arms in indignation so tightly against
their chests that they fail to recognize how incredibly suspenseful and
tautly paced the first hour of this PSYCHO is.  Beginning with the most
famous red herring in film history -- the theft of $400,000 from a real
estate office -- the story follows Marion Crane (Anne Heche) from Phoenix
to California, where she makes an ill-fated stop at the Bates Motel.
There she meets manager Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn), whose heart belongs
to Mommy and whose cutlery has a way of finding itself imbedded in flesh.
     Heretical though it may seem to say so, the first half of this
PSYCHO is better than the original, because Heche's interpretation of
Marion is better than Janet Leigh's.  Her steadily mounting guilt and fear
of discovery as she tries to bring the loot to her bankrupt boyfriend Sam
(Viggo Mortensen) are palpable.  The staging -- Hitch's ominous angles,
Bernard Herrmann's chilling score -- masterfully builds the tension, but
it also allows us watch Heche's mind work, and she's as fiercely
intelligent an actress as we have today.  While the narrative is focused
on Marion's flight, it really flies.
     Eventually, of course, Marion exits the film wrapped in a shower
curtain, which leaves us with Norman and the snooping of Sam, Marion's
concerned sister Lila (Julianne Moore) and private detective Arbogast
(William H. Macy).  It also leaves us with the PSYCHO's one huge problem:
Vince Vaughn as Norman Bates.  There's nothing exactly wrong with Vaughn's
performance, which is edgy and scary.  Vaughn simply can't help the fact
that physically, he is completely wrong for the role.  Towering over every
other actor in the piece, his good looks untamed by a bad haircut, Vaughn
is far too physically intimidating to play the meek, sexually repressed
basket case.  He throws the entire second half of the film out of whack,
leaving the audience with nothing to do but watch Van Sant and his cast
play out the rest of the film.
     There are any number of reasons why a PSYCHO nearly 40 years removed
from the well-known original can't work quite as well.  The shower scene
is now a film-school standby as minutely dissected as the Zapruder film,
not a viscerally shocking surprise; familiarity with the true nature of
Norman's "mother" makes some of his dialogue unintentionally humorous.
But there's no question that it does still work as an example of building
terror through film-making skill.  It also shows that the success of
particular choices may be built around the casting.  The best choice with
Anthony Perkins as Norman does not equal the best choice with Vince Vaughn
as Norman -- it's chaos theory at its finest applied to the art of
directing.  Gus Van Sant has honored the master (closing the film with a
dedication to Hitchcock), but he hasn't duplicated him.  This incarnation
of PSYCHO isn't a forgery of a great work of art.  It's more like a photo
of a great work in an art history textbook -- a bit flat, but intriguing
enough to make you want to get a better look at the real thing.

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
FELICIA'S JOURNEY
(Artisan)
Starring:  Bob Hoskins, Elaine Cassidy, Arsinee Khanjian, Peter McDonald,
Gerard McSorley.
Screenplay:  Atom Egoyan, based on the novel by William Trevor.
Producer:  Bruce Davey.
Director:  Atom Egoyan.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Without revealing too much, it's fair to say that Joseph Hilditch
(Bob Hoskins) is not what he appears to be. As catering manager for a
factory in England's industrial midlands, he is respected for his
attention to detail and the affection he brings to his food. At home,
however, he is a middle-aged bachelor who spends his nights preparing
elaborate recipes from videotapes of a 1950s cooking show hosted by his
mother Gala (Arsinee Khanjian). When he shows interest in helping Felicia
(Elaine Cassidy), a pregnant 17-year-old Irish girl looking for her
boyfriend, it seems to be the act of a kindly, altruistic fellow. Then
again, it may not.
     FELICIA'S JOURNEY, adapted by Atom Egoyan from William Trevor's
novel, is an investigation into relationship pathology that works
beautifully while those pathologies remain enigmatic. For the first half
of the film, Egoyan darts and weaves through time and place, showing us
both of the principal characters searching for someone to cling to. The
naive young Felicia, seduced by a young man who shows her the first
individual attention of her life, finds it impossible to believe that her
Johnny would have deceived her when he left Ireland without giving her an
address. Her search is clearly doomed from the start, but no less doomed
than the quest of Mr. Hilditch. He too seeks someone who will pay him
individual attention, bringing a series of troubled young girls into his
confidence and videotaping them for future reference. When the girls no
longer need his help, he's left to take other measures to keep them from
leaving.
     There's plenty of rich psychological material in the intersection of
these two characters, and Egoyan keeps it compelling for much of the
running time. His compositions (aided by Paul Sarossy's cinematography)
continue to be among the more hypnotic in modern cinema, whether lingering
over Irish landscapes, visiting Hilditch's troubled childhood or watching
Felicia wander in a strange land. Bob Hoskins' performance anchors the
material, creating a character that keeps the audience off balance.
Hilditch is a manipulator, but he's also a wounded soul who manages to
convince himself he's doing the right thing for other people. When Hoskins
wants you to feel for Hilditch, you'll feel for him. When he wants you to
fear Hilditch (as in one nerve-wracking glare directly at the audience),
you'll fear him.
     Hilditch develops in so many unexpected ways that the film's
resolution can only come as a disappointment. Egoyan is incapable of
letting FELICIA'S JOURNEY become a simple genre film, but he's stuck with
genre conventions all the same (though why he assented to Mychael Danna's
clanking, ham-fisted instrumental score, I have no idea). The finale, a
confrontation between Hilditch and a robotically sincere Christian
missionary (Claire Benedict), does have a wonderfully twisted humor to it,
as the missionary finds herself incapable of dealing with a real soul in
torment when she finds one. As a dramatic climax, however, it's
unsatisfying, a deus-by-proxy ex machina way for Hilditch's eyes to be
opened. And Egoyan should henceforth resist the temptation to close his
films with explicatory voice-overs (see also: THE SWEET HEREAFTER).
     Those flaws might have crushed another film, but FELICIA'S JOURNEY
gets off to too solid a start. I still found myself piecing together the
connections between Hilditch's past and his present after the film was
through, and pondering the circumstances that allow one unhappy person to
grow and heal while another collapses into a fantasy world. Hoskins'
performance alone makes FELICIA'S JOURNEY worthy watching; it's just a
shame that such a subtle performance ends with such melodrama. "Things
take a turn," Hilditch ominously intones at one point, which could easily
summarize FELICIA'S JOURNEY. It's a turn that wrings simple quality from
potential brilliance.

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
THE OTHER SISTER
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Juliette Lewis, Diane Keaton, Tom Skerritt, Giovanni Ribisi,
Poppy Montgomery, Sarah Paulson, Hector Elizondo.
Screenplay:  Bob Brunner and Garry Marshall.
Producers:  Mario Iscovich and Alexandra Rose.
Director:  Garry Marshall.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual content, adult themes, mild profanity)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I never bought Dustin Hoffman as an autistic savant in RAIN MAN.  Tom
Hanks as slow-witted FORREST GUMP was all vocal mannerisms.  Kevin Bacon
in the soon-to-video DIGGING TO CHINA seemed to be mimicking Pee-Wee
Herman.  Movie stars trying to play mentally handicapped characters do so
for any number of reasons -- the parts are juicy, the challenge is unique,
and (if two of the three above examples are any indication) the chance for
an Oscar is pretty good.  Clearly plenty of viewers (and other critics)
eat up such portrayals with a spoon.  I generally spend two hours watching
a movie star failing miserably at suspending my disbelief.
     THE OTHER SISTER is a ghastly exercise for any number of reasons, but
the primary reason is Juliette Lewis.  Lewis plays Carla Tate, a
24-year-old woman with a slight mental handicap who has spent several
years in a "special" boarding school.  Returned at last to her wealthy San
Francisco family, Carla finds that the adjustment is difficult on both
sides.  Her mother Elizabeth (Diane Keaton) alternately coddles Carla and
pretends she is completely normal, while father Bradley (Tom Skerritt)
quietly deals with his guilt at having sent her away at all.  Into this
picture steps Danny McMahon (Giovanni Ribisi), a young man with a similar
mental handicap living on his own.  Carla is inspired by his independence,
and tries to break away from her family even as she and Danny become
romantically attracted to each other.
     The set-up for THE OTHER SISTER owes a major debt to the 1979
TV-movie "Like Normal People," in which Linda Purl and Shaun Cassidy
played the developmentally challenged young people coping with familial
opposition to their romance.  Leave it to director Garry Marshall to make
a TV-movie look like a paradigm of subtlety and sensitivity.  THE OTHER
SISTER is nearly as big a narrative mess as Marshall's all-but-unwatchable
DEAR GOD, and as unabashedly candy-coated as his PRETTY WOMAN (the
Disney-does-lesbians subplot involving Carla's older sister is nearly as
convincing as Disney-does-hookers).  The story leaps from episode to
episode in search of a consistent tone, dragging its fine cast through the
muck along the way.  Diane Keaton fusses and fumes as a parody of a
patrician dame trying to ignore the lack of "normalcy" in her family; Tom
Skerritt fares better as the stolid, slightly passive dad.  They're the
worst kind of Hollywood character constructions, sit-com versions of Mary
Tyler Moore and Donald Sutherland in ORDINARY PEOPLE.
     And the wacky premise for that sit-com just isn't funny.  I'm sure
that everyone involved in THE OTHER SISTER felt they were making a
heart-warming tale of triumph over adversity, which it very well might
have been if there seemed to be a shred of authenticity to the situations.
Lewis is a large part of the problem, and not necessarily because she does
such a terrible job.  It's somehow easier to buy Ribisi, though his
performance certainly isn't light-years beyond Lewis's.  Juliette Lewis,
however, is always Juliette Lewis, from the first minute she's on screen
until the last, an actress trying to convince me she's a mentally
handicapped person.  Watching Lewis screw up her face and twist her
dialogue becomes like watching a white actor playing a character in
blackface -- not just a case of miscasting, but wrong on a gut level.
     That reaction isn't mitigated by a script which, frankly, draws
nearly every one of its laughs from the goofy behavior of its handicapped
characters.  Viewers may kid themselves into thinking they're laughing
good-naturedly at the struggles of these characters to be more like
"normal people," but every gag is really at their expense.  THE OTHER
SISTER is a sideshow masquerading as a feel-good tale -- see the
handicapped kids trying to figure out sex!  see them get drunk and say
inappropriate things!  Indeed, THE OTHER SISTER stands as a shining
example of all that can go wrong in a film about mentally handicapped
people.  In the rare examples that have worked -- Leonardo DiCaprio in
WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE, Tom Hulce in DOMINICK AND EUGENE -- you felt
someone was telling a real story of which handicapped characters happened
to be a part.  This one finds Juliette Lewis shucking and jiving in a
handicapped minstrel show.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
     "Look closer..." invites the tag line for AMERICAN BEAUTY, and rarely
has a two-word advertising campaign so effectively captured virtually
everything a film has to say.  AMERICAN BEAUTY is being touted as _the_
American film of 1999, a caustic no-holds-barred peek behind the curtains
of demented suburbia.  It's easy to understand much of the praise, since
it captures you in its world virtually from the first frame.  It's also a
surprisingly simple film in which the notions that should be its subtext
dominate its text.  Simultaneously gripping and frustrating, AMERICAN
BEAUTY is the best film of the year that irritated the hell out of me.
     AMERICAN BEAUTY opens on an Everytown, USA suburban street, where
42-year-old Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) is about to undergo a radical
life change.  Intimidated by his ferociously ambitious real estate agent
wife Carolyn (Annette Bening), alienated from his teenage daughter Janey
(Thora Birch) and disgusted with his job as at an advertising industry
publication, Lester feels numb to the world.  That is until he sees
Janey's fellow cheerleader Angela (Mena Suvari), a vision who comes to
dominate his every thought.  Lester suddenly decides to change everything
in his quest for what's missing, a journey paralleled by Janey's
relationship with enigmatic neighbor Ricky (Wes Bentley) and Carolyn's
affair with a big-shot competitor (Peter Gallagher).
     This, first and most important:  Kevin Spacey is brilliant.  That's
not exactly news, since Spacey has been brilliant on a regular basis for
several years, but in AMERICAN BEAUTY he burns himself into an incredibly
difficult role.  There is a hyper-real feeling to much of the film -- a
sense of people perceiving the world and people around them at an
exaggerated, almost grotesque level -- yet Spacey finds the ideal balance
between Lester the comic sadsack and Lester the rejuvenated man.  He grips
Alan Ball's best lines of dialogue and spits them out like bullets,
dominating the film so completely you may not realize how little screen
time he actually has.  Bentley and Birch are also quite effective in their
scenes together, providing the extremely relative base of normalcy around
which the more heightened performances by Bening, Suvari and Chris Cooper
(as Ricky's Marine father) whirl.
     The twisted, surreal vision of America provided by Ball and director
Sam Mendes -- even with its now-preditable assault on soul-deadening
middle class life -- could have made for a masterpiece with a revelatory
sensitbility at its core.  Instead, it's a very good film that makes a
very rare mistake.  Where most films exist entirely at the surface level,
AMERICAN BEAUTY exists entirely _below_ the surface, which is both tragic
and ironic.  It's easy to say that AMERICAN BEAUTY is about finding joy in
the improbable places already around you instead of seeking unattainable
ideals of joy, because the film makes this message excruciatingly clear in
Ricky's comments about his obsession with videotaping, as well as Lester's
narrative voice-overs.  The ostensibly surprising moments in AMERICAN
BEAUTY begin losing their power to surprise, since the film keeps telling
you that things are not what they seem on the surface.  It never allows a
moment to let the surfaces just be surfaces, opting instead to spell out
that real beauty is a wind-blown plastic bag.
     Amazingly, AMERICAN BEAUTY still manages to be occasionally
spell-binding, even as it stumbles through its literalism.  Mendes shows
an impressive command of film language for a rookie with stage roots,
using the talents of cinematographer Conrad Hall and composer Thomas
Newman to create strong, always consistent vision.  AMERICAN BEAUTY
dazzles, it entertains, it shows off an actor at the top of his form.  It
just isn't nearly as enlightening as it seems to be, because it never asks
the viewer to do too much work.  As good as the film is, it isn't
necessary for us to look closer.  The film-makers have done all the 
looking for us.

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
GOSSIP
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  James Marsden, Lena Headey, Norman Reedus, Kate Hudson, Joshua
Jackson, Eric Bogosian, Edward James Olmos, Sharon Lawrence.
Screenplay:  Gregory Poirier and Theresa Rebeck.
Producers:  Jeffrey Silver and Bobby Newmyer.
Director:  Davis Guggenheim.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Hey, did you hear about the film that took on the subject of our
collective fascination with gossip and innuendo? It takes a serious look
about how any story, told enough times, takes on the ring of truth, even
if we have no concrete sense of where the story came from. It challenges
us to be more skeptical of the tabloid-ization of our culture, our
readiness to pass judgment on situations about which we know little and
our obsession with the lurid over the substantive. It uses nuanced
performances and taut plotting to give us a chilling glimpse into the way
we contribute to warped perceptions and damaged lives every time we pay
attention to the rumor mill.
     Well, that's the story Warner Bros. would like to see disseminated,
anyway. And like most buzz, there's a germ of truth to it surrounded by a
whole lot of nonsense. GOSSIP is actually a tawdry youth soap opera full
of attractive people doing awful things -- CRUEL INTENTIONS gone to
college. The story focuses on a trio of college roommates -- trust fund
brat Derrick (James Marsden), introverted aspiring artist Travis (Norman
Reedus) and nondescript obligatory female Jones (Lena Headey) -- who are
also taking a communication class together. As a class project, the three
decide to spread a patently false rumor about a classmate to track its
progress. Their target is Naomi (Kate Hudson), spotted at a party
wandering drunkenly upstairs with boyfriend Beau (Joshua Jackson). When
Jones begins gossip that the two had sex at the party, the tale soon grows
out of control. And suddenly Naomi believes the rumor herself, and is
pressing charges against Beau for date rape.
     Ah, what a deliciously scandalous and utterly exploitative premise.
Beneath the meticulously glossy production design and lifestyles-of-the-
rich-and-beautiful voyeurism is a bubbling underground river of hypocrisy.
It's bad enough that GOSSIP feigns ambiguity just long enough to set up
obvious hedonistic villainy. It's even worse that the entire atmosphere of
the film proves the filmmakers don't take any of its serious issues
seriously. It might be interesting to explore the destructive power of
rumor in a setting where you felt there was something at stake. GOSSIP, on
the other hand, is instantly disposable foolishness more interested in
being sexy than being substantive. A film like this trying to make a case
against people succumbing to their basest fascination with sordid stories
-- it almost makes you want to laugh in the faces of those responsible.
     But there are so many more reasons to laugh at GOSSIP besides its
philosophical ineptitude. There's good old-fashioned story-telling
ineptitude, like a police detective refusing to follow up a lead because
of a story someone told her, or a college student wandering into the
library of an exclusive prep school to do some research. There's poor Lena
Headey's ineptitude at affecting a New England accent to mask her Old
England accent. Then there are the more sublime bits of silliness, like
the obligatory torrential downpour for the finale, or the stunning lack of
characterization offered to anyone in the film. And the less said about
the dialogue, the better.
     Some critics of GOSSIP will probably fixate on its final, convoluted
plot twist as the film's most ridiculous element, but I'd be inclined to
disagree. Buying the ending simply involves believing that one of the
film's characters is not just too stupid to be in college, but too stupid
to be allowed to live. Considering the rest of the stupidity involved in
GOSSIP, that's not a tremendous stretch. I'd like to think that an
intelligent film could have been made about the scorched earth effects of 
our indiscriminate telling of tales. GOSSIP, a film targeted at teenagers,
had a chance to be that film.

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Garance Clavel, Zinedine Soualem, Renee LeCalm, Olivier Py.
Screenplay:  Cedric Klapisch.
Producers:  Aissa Djabri, Farid Lahouassa, Manuel Munz.
Director:  Cedric Klapisch.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The Paris of Cedric Klapisch's disarming comedy WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY
is no City of Lights.  Quaint neighborhoods are vanishing as elderly
residents are evicted to make way for upscale cafes and trendy boutiques.
Wrecking crews clear away old buildings to make way for the new.  Lovers
in love have given way to a parade of lonely hearts trying to connect in
bars and alleyways.  Paris has rarely looked more modern -- or less
romantic -- on film.
     This is the Paris discovered by a young single woman named Chloe
(Garance Clavel) when she is forced by the disappearance of her beloved
cat Gris-Gris to get out of her apartment.  Gris-Gris, along with Chloe's
gay roommate Michel (Olivier Py), is one of the few dependable male
figures in her life, giving her plenty of incentive to track him down.
Instead of her cat, however, Chloe finds plenty of reminders that she is
not alone in her loneliness.  Her neighbor Madame Renee (the charming
Renee LeCalm) surrounds herself with pets, another neighborhood woman
(Gisele Laquit) holds conversations with her dead husband's ashes, and a
shy fellow named Djamel (Zinedine Soualem) develops a crush on Chloe while
helping her search for Gris-Gris.
     Though this all may sound quite depressing, it's actually nothing of
the kind.  Klapisch finds none of his subjects pathetic; he looks upon
them with a subtle bemusement, admiring their ability to persevere and to
adapt to the world around them.  He has a particularly good time with
Chloe, played with an arresting sweetness by Garance Clavel.  Some of the
film's cleverest scenes, including a seaside vacation rendered in one
five-second shot of Chloe swimming alone in the ocean, capture Clavel
playing a woman trying to pretend she is resigned to her fate.  The film's
final optimistic note makes her struggles all the more appealing.
     The episodic nature of WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY does grow wearying after a
while, with several encounters dissolving before they even register with
the viewer.  There isn't much narrative momentum to Chloe's adventures --
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY functions mostly as a walking tour of contemporary
Parisian heartache, emphasis on the "walking" -- but there is a
genuineness to each one.  The many characters in WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY are
looking for love in a lot of the wrong places, but at least most of them
are still looking.  Chloe's quest is really a search for the romantic
Paris of song and story, one which may no longer exist, though it
may please the heart to believe that it does. 

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
THE BIG LEBOWSKI
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi,
David Huddleston, Peter Stormare, Tara Reid, Philip Seymour Hoffman.
Screenplay:  Joel Coen and Ethan Coen.
Producer:  Ethan Coen.
Director:  Joel Coen.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     God bless the Coen brothers, the film critic's best friends.  While
the grinding predictability of most American films challenges a writer to
generate one more coherent thought than the film itself, Coen efforts like
MILLER'S CROSSING, BARTON FINK and FARGO burst from the screen like
doctoral theses waiting to be written, sending cinema scribes scrambling
gleefully for a thesaurus.  The bizarre supporting characters pinwheeling
through their films could be glossed as metaphorical proto-fascists or
subversions of traditional genre types; their apparently
stream-of-conscious narratives could reveal clockwork structure.  Oh, what
happy hours could be spent fine tuning analyses fit for literary journals
as we hurtled towards our deadlines.
     I spent most of the car ride home from THE BIG LEBOWSKI -- and a fair
chunk of time afterward -- spelunking for themes, tropes and symbols.  The
time frame of Gulf War-era 1991 was certainly meant to place the story
squarely in the twilight of the Reagan/Bush go-go 1980s.  The backbone of
the plot, meanwhile, found inveterate 40-something layabout stoner Jeff
"The Dude" Lebowski (Jeff Bridges) and his blustering Vietnam-vet pal
Walter (John Goodman) mixed up in a convoluted kidnapping plot after the
Dude is mistaken for _another_ Jeff Lebowski (David Huddleston), this one
a wealthy philanthropist with a debt-ridden former porno star (Tara Reid)
for a trophy wife.  Mix in the "Big" Lebowski's feminist avant-garde
artiste daughter Maude (Julianne Moore), ironic allusions to political
correctness and a few swipes at the boot-straps rhetoric of the
well-to-do, and clearly you have a satire of the ordinary Joe (or Jeff)
unwittingly fighting to make the world safe for Republicanism.  Right?
     It was so much fun deconstructing THE BIG LEBOWSKI after the fact
that I started trying to convince myself I had had as much fun watching
it.  The reason it's not more fun, despite a blissful singularity of
vision which always keeps you watching, is that the Coens seem to take the
same approach to making their films that we critics take to analyzing
them.  They're not stories as much as they are intellectual and aesthetic
calistheics, films which make you work hard enough that you have to
convince yourself you're getting something out of them.  Joel and Ethan's
encyclopedic knowledge of genre conventions and film expectations allow
them to understand exactly when to yank the rug, but in THE BIG LEBOWSKI
they fall into the same trap which hampered THE HUDSUCKER PROXY:  they
create so much distance from the characters that you're left with
congratulating yourself because you got the joke.
     If you're willing to surrender yourself to the Coens' characteristic
oddball flourishes, you certainly won't walk away from THE BIG LEBOWSKI
disgusted.  Second-tier Coen fare is still better than most of what's
out there; it's hard not to take some pleasure in a film which includes
among its antagonists a trio of marmot-wielding nihilists, or clothes a
meek bowling buddy named Donny (Steve Buscemi) in a succession of bowling
shirts bearing every possible name _but_ Donny.  Jeff Bridges also has
great fun as The Dude, trying to wrap his fried brain around "clues" as he
attempts to figure out exactly what's going on.  It's just disappointing
watching the Coens retreat into layers of irony once you've seen what
happens in a film like FARGO when they're willing to humanize their
phenomenal film-making talent.  As undeniably amusing as many of THE BIG
LEBOSWKI's oddball flourishes are, the film is almost nothing _but_ 
oddball flourishes, wandering along with a theme or two in tow.  Bad news
for those in search of accessible comedy; good news, as always, for those
who work at finding oddball flourishes and well-disguised social
commentary.

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
     Billy Bob Thornton has presented me with a wonderful dilemma in SLING
BLADE:  I don't know where to begin praising him.  There are writers who
get a shot at directing films, and actors who do some writing, and
film-makers who take the occasional turn in front of a camera, but in
most cases you can tell you are watching a writer direct, or an actor
write, or a director act.  In SLING BLADE, you never feel as though you
are watching a writer try to act, or an actor try to direct.  You realize
you are watching a natural born story-teller who understands that the
words, the performers and the images are not discrete elements, but
indivisible parts of a cohesive story.
    In SLING BLADE, that story is an enthralling drama centered around
Karl Childers (Thornton), a mentally handicapped man who has spent the
last 25 of his 37 years in a psychiatric hospital for murdering his mother
and her lover after catching them together.  Deemed fit to return to
society by the state, Karl is released from the hospital and returns to
the small Arkansas town where he grew up.  There he finds work as a
mechanic, and befriends a fatherless boy named Frank Wheatley (Lucas
Black).  Karl is invited to live with Frank and his mother Linda (Natalie
Canerday), but he same welcome is not extended by Linda's abusive
boyfriend Doyle (Dwight Yoakam).  As Karl tries to adjust to life in the
outside world, he finds himself caught in the middle of a growing domestic
crisis, and faced with some challenging decisions.
     Thornton, who co-wrote the acclaimed ONE FALSE MOVE with Tom
Epperson, is a writer who seems to understand every facet of the craft as
though he created it.  His setting, an insular Southern town, is rendered
with a vivid combination of characters and locations; his characters, down
to the last minor player, are given personalities uniquely their own.  But
it is the remarkable dexterity with which Thornton weaves the threads of
his story that makes SLING BLADE so powerful.  It is the story of a
simple-minded man trying to understand Christianity directly from the
source, the Bible, after being schooled in a twisted version of the faith
by his unstable parents.  Even that effort is complicated, however, by an
experience of the world which seems to contradict the Bible, particularly
when he comes to respect Linda's gay friend Vaughan (John Ritter).  Karl's
story is heart-breaking because he always is striving to do the right
thing, but it is terribly hard for him to get his mind around what that
right thing is supposed to be.
     It is a marvelous character Thornton has written for himself, and he
does an astonishing job of bringing Karl to life.  Playing someone with a
mental or emotional handicap is one of the most treacherous assignments in
acting (right up there with playing an alcoholic), because it is so easy
to nail the character's twitches without nailing his soul.  The former can
be achieved through technical proficiency and a gift for mimicry, with
Dustin Hoffman in RAIN MAN and Geoffrey Rush in SHINE as a couple of showy
recent examples.  Neither of those roles, however, showed us a character
trying to grow as a person, and that is what Thornton accomplishes in
SLING BLADE.  Karl is far from oblivious to the world around him; he is
trying to understand morality, atone for his sins and learn from the
wrongs that were done to him.  While Thornton does turn in an exceptional
physical performance, which his polite demeanor and quirky speech
patterns, he does not allow Karl to be defined by the way he talks.  This
isn't a character you feel sorry for, like a pet; this is a man you feel
for as a fellow human being.
     Thornton the director draws similar superb performances from his
entire cast, particularly Dwight Yoakam (yes, _that_ Dwight Yoakam) as the
cruel Doyle.  He is casually chilling as he mixes insults and threats with
chuckles and expressions of endearment as though incapable of telling the
difference, and we can see the pathetic man behind the monster.
Complexities spill over from SLING BLADE, a film so perfectly crafted and
acted from the moment Karl leaves the hospital that I wish Thornton had
reconsidered the first fifteen minutes.  That opening finds Karl
describing his crimes to a reporter in a darkened room, with Thornton
re-creating the stage monologue which inspired the film.  It is an awkward
conceit which gets SLING BLADE off to an uneven start, but it is just as
well Thornton demonstrated imperfection as a director.  With the kind of
flawless work he does as writer and star of SLING BLADE, he might have
become positively insufferable if he had directed a perfect film as well.

Title
Review for MatchMaker, The (1997)
     Long-time readers of this space will recall that I have never
promoted the myth of critical objectivity.  I am merely a man, folks, a
flesh-and-blood film fan with preferences and pet peeves just like
everyone else.  Brilliant special effects will never move me like a
brilliant script will.  I'm indifferent about baseball, but I love
baseball movies.  "Heartwarming comedies" leave me cold.  I'm too easy on
Woody Allen sometimes.  And so on.
     THE MATCHMAKER appears to have been made with a direct network
connection to my cinematic soft spots.  Put Janeane Garofolo in a leading
role, and I'm yours to lose.  Set a story in Ireland, and the battle for
my affections is half won.  Put Janeane Garofolo in a leading role in a
story set in Ireland...well, now you're just not playing fair.  Their
combined charm is irresistable, flimsy though the story may be.
     Garofolo plays Marcy Tizard, a second-tier worker for the re-election
campaign of Massachusetts senator John McGlory (Jay O. Sanders).  Trailing
badly in the pools, McGlory and his campaign manager Nick Ward (Denis
Leary) come up with a desperate plan to win over the state's Irish vote:
McGlory will visit with his actual kin in Ireland.  The job of actually
finding those kin is left to Marcy, who is sent to the small coastal town
of Ballinagra to dig up McGlory's roots.  Little does she know that she'll
be landing in the middle of the town's annual match-making festival, or
that the town's leading matchmaker (Milo O'Shea) has his eye on fixing up
Marcy with an enigmatic local fellow named Sean (David O'Hara).
     On a number of levels, it's clear that THE MATCHMAKER needs a bit
more fleshing out.  Character development for Marcy is sorely lacking,
leaving plenty of unanswered questions about her as she heads to Ireland.
What is her life like in America?  What kind of romantic history does she
bring to her relationship with Sean?  Why is she working for a pea-brain
like McGlory whose campaign slogan ("Hey Ho Let's Go") is a Ramones lyric?
In short, who is Marcy, besides a character for Janeane Garofolo to play?
Her relationship with Sean (nicely played by David O'Hara as a fiery
idealist) is better developed than you find in most romantic comedies, but
we never understand why it might be truly important to Marcy.  It's all
very pleasant, in an inconsequential sort of way.
     Then again, if you add up all the things about THE MATCHMAKER which
are very pleasant, you have a fairly pleasant film experience.  First
there is Garofolo herself, a screen presence unlike any other in film.
Acerbic, smart and unconventionally beautiful, Garofolo improves a story
by her mere presence.  She doesn't have as strong a character to latch on
to as she had in THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS, but she's still an energetic
presence who's easy to root for.  O'Hara is also quite pleasant, as is
O'Shea as the ethically shaky matchmaker.  And of course there's the
scenery and the local Irish color, which is very pleasant indeed.  
     THE MATCHMAKER has a heavy strain of fish-out-of-water comedy to it,
but it rarely reeks of formula thanks to Mark Joffe's low-key direction
and Garofolo's ability to underplay a reaction take.  Still, as the 
film strolls along towards its conclusion with a few unnecessary
intrusions by the political sub-plot, it might be seen as a bit uninspired
and tedious, objectively speaking.  I'm not objectively speaking, of
course.  One viewer might find little to like about THE MATCHMAKER.
Another -- who shall remain nameless -- might spend 95 minutes smiling at
a friendly face in a friendly place.

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
AIR FORCE ONE
(Columbia)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman, Glenn Close, Wendy Crewson, Liesel
Matthews, Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley, Dean Stockwell.
Screenplay:  Andrew W. Marlowe.
Producers:  Wolfgang Petersen, Gail Katz, Armyan Bernstein and Jon
Shestack.
Director:  Wolfgang Petersen.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Harrison Ford is the President of the United States" trumpet the
print ads for AIR FORCE ONE, to which the only appropriate response is:
well, of _course_ he is.  The phenomenally popular presidency of Ronald
Reagan, if nothing else, gave us a solid sense of what the American people
really want in a Chief Executive.  They want a cross between John Wayne
and Bill Cosby, someone who can be both America's Sheriff and America's
Father Figure.  In short, they want an approachable ass-kicker.
     If that phrase doesn't describe Harrison Ford among all A-list
Hollywood stars, I don't know whom it does describe.  Ford's James
Marshall, the President imperilled in AIR FORCE ONE when terrorists hijack
the First Plane, is the President every American secretly dreams about --
a resolute leader and devoted family man who also happens to be handy with
an Uzi.  Not only would we follow him into battle (and make no mistake, he
_would_ be leading the charge), we'd play a game of touch football with
him on the lawn afterwards.
     That kind of man isn't just the perfect President -- he's also the
perfect action hero.  AIR FORCE ONE is an extraordinarily effective
thriller by any standard, but it's even better with Ford on board.
Wolfgang Petersen's direction combines the claustrophobia of DAS BOOT with
the cat-and-mouse dynamic of IN THE LINE OF FIRE, then throws in a few
stomach-churning dogfights and mid-air escape attempts just for seasoning.
There hasn't been a more assured piece of technical film-making in
theaters this year, nor a more riveting action spectacle.  Ford, however,
moves AIR FORCE ONE from the realm of the mere thrill ride to something
more potent.  He gives you the sense that something is at stake:  honor,
family, the life of a real human being in danger who is also the President
of the United States.
     It is the "honor" part of that equation which may raise a few hackles
over the rah-rah patriot games of AIR FORCE ONE.  There is a decidedly
retro-80s feel to the Communist zealots led by Gary Oldman, to the TOP
GUN-style military hot-doggery, to Ford's Rambo-in-pinstripes solo
guerrilla campaign to free hostages.  Still, Andrew W. Marlowe's script
never feels jingo all the way.  Oldman's performance gives weight to lines
which might sound like token imperialist-bashing in someone else's mouth
(one such line finds him quieting a righteous hostage by screaming "You
killed 100,000 Iraqis so you could save a nickel a gallon on gas...don't
lecture me on the articles of war").  In fact, every performer takes
chances which make AIR FORCE ONE more than a simple crowd-pleaser.  The
gutsiest choices may be those made by Glenn Close, playing Vice-President
Kathryn Bennett.  In a more pandering film, Bennett would have been the
take-charge woman in a room full of ineffectual men.  Instead, Close plays
her as smart but uncertain, dedicated to her President perhaps against all
reason.
     Not that anyone could blame her.  Part of what makes AIR FORCE ONE so
satisfying -- and, at times, so wryly amusing -- is that it places
President Marshall squarely in the real world of 1990s American political 
consciousness.  The unswerving devotion, the candlelight vigils and the
tremendous popularity all make perfect sense as the reactions of cynics in
the presence of true greatness.  It's easy to get caught up in the thrills
of AIR FORCE ONE, not just because it is so well-constructed, but because
we're watching a national fantasy.  There's only one thing missing from
the finale of AIR FORCE ONE:  Harrison Ford should step onto the tarmac at
Dulles, tip his hat to the assembled throng, sweep the First Lady up onto 
his trusty horse, and ride into the sunset.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
     Watching THE CELL is akin to watching a demo reel for the film's art
directors, makeup artists, production designer and costume designer --
which, I'm sure, it will end up being. Make no mistake about it, THE CELL
is the kind of film technical craftspeople lie awake fantasizing about. 
They get the opportunity to create entirely new worlds, where the only
rules are the limits of their imagination and creativity. The result can
be the eye-popping stuff of Oscar nominations (and wins), a film people
walk away from thinking what all art directors, makeup artists, production
designers and costume designers secretly want viewers to walk away
thinking: "Boy, that looked incredible."
     THE CELL does look incredible, and since it is evident in nearly
every frame that its primary purpose for existing is to look incredible, I
suppose you'd have to say that it works in its own strange way. If only
that look seemed less familiar, or more resonant. The premise finds a team
of scientists working on a risky experimental procedure. Psychologist
Dr. Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez) has been acting as a guinea pig,
chemically stimulated to tune into the brainwaves of a catatonic young boy
and enter his sub-conscious. The procedure has yielded only the slightest
success, but it becomes the best chance for F.B.I. agent Peter Novak
(Vince Vaughn) to save a woman's life. Serial killer Carl Randolph
Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) has been rendered comatose by a rare form of
schizophrenia, leaving his latest victim stranded in an unknown location. 
If Deane can enter Stargher's mind and find out where the woman is, Novak
might be able to save her.
     First-time feature director Tarsem Singh (director of music videos
like R.E.M.'s "Losing My Religion") is clearly going for a SILENCE OF THE
LAMBS-meets-SEVEN vibe, a commercially wise decision given the financial
success of those films. There are heroes with their own demons to banish,
interactions between killer and profiler, a screaming woman to be saved,
some stark desert landscapes and some grisly images you'll just want to
purge from your brain. The parts are right, but they're not put together
in a way that adds up to anything. Both Deane and Novak get 30-second
character development moments to explain their motivations, including a
provocative hint at Novak's own dark childhood, while most of the film
treats them like props to throw into Stargher's messed-up head. 
Considering the film takes nearly an hour to throw them there -- spending
an inordinate amount of time on the police work that locates Stargher,
when that's not really the point of the story -- the fuzzy 
characterizations are eminently noticeable.
     Eventually THE CELL does dive into Stargher's messed-up head, and
things briefly start looking up. Singh's shots are often effectively
disorienting, including one arcing shot that ends with the camera swinging
upside down into water. Many of the nightmare concepts (a hideous bit of
psycho-torture) and directing tricks with which Singh dresses up his film
are utterly unique; nearly as many are stuff out of Intro to Music Video
Auteurs' Freaky Surrealist Visuals. There's a bathtub full of blood,
flocks of white birds, Lopez in Virgin Mary attire, jangly edits and
plenty of pasty-faced women. Eventually, it becomes difficult to take THE
CELL seriously, because so much of the imagery feels cribbed from 20 years
of MTV. The 1984 Dennis Quaid fantasy DREAMSCAPE at least found some fun
in walking through another person's psyche. THE CELL is supposed to be
terrifying, but when a serial killer's mindscape resembles an S&M
variation on a Robert Palmer video, his power to intimidate can't help but
diminish.
     The climax of THE CELL actually becomes two parallel climaxes: Novak
trying to save Stargher's victim-in-waiting, and Deane trying to save
Stargher's inner child from his inner pale-eyed demon lord. The
juxtaposition of the two stories allows each protagonist the opportunity
to get a big dramatic moment. Unfortunately, they have nothing whatsoever
to do with one another, which is yet another example of THE CELL's
fundamentally flawed storytelling -- it takes far too long to get into its
central concept, then tries to make up for that mistake by lingering there
once it's already served its purpose. I didn't necessarily expect THE CELL
to be a film that would stand up to much scrutiny. I did expect something
that would provide the shock of the new. Singh and his crew don't provide
enough that's shockingly new to make up for THE CELL's lapses as a
narrative. Boy, THE CELL's visuals looked incredible ... especially nine
years ago, when they were in R.E.M.'s "Losing My Religion" video.

Title
Review for For Love or Money (1993)
Starring:  Michael J. Fox, Gabrielle Anwar, Anthony Higgins.
Screenplay:  Mark Rosenthal and Lawrence Konner.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Michael J. Fox is in a *deep* rut.  While he's made the occasional
stab at drama (LIGHT OF DAY, CASUALTIES OF WAR), Fox has basically
seemed content to play the character he perfected on "Family Ties:" The
Cocky Young Go-Getter Who Learns a Lesson about What Really Matters.
It's a type that has worked for him, thanks to his charm and comic
timing, but it puts him in danger of carrying questionable projects
which seem comfortable.  As a perfect example, witness FOR LOVE OR
MONEY, a cliche-filled would-be romantic comedy that's neither
particularly romantic nor particularly funny.
     This time around, Fox's Cocky Young Go-Getter is named Doug
Ireland, concierge at the posh Manhattan hotel The Bradbury.  His
specialty is doing that little something extra for the guests--walking
their dogs, acquiring hard-to-get theater tickets--and raking in huge
tips for his efforts.  These tips have gone into a deposit on Doug's
dream, his own luxury hotel, but making that dream a reality will
require another $5 million.  Enter financier Christian Hanover (Anthony
Higgins), who's willing to exchange helping Doug with his hotel with
Doug helping him carry on an affair.  The catch:  Hanover's mistress is
Andy (Gabrielle Anwar), an aspiring singer who works at the Bradbury's
perfume counter and for whom Doug is carrying a torch.  As the two
spend more time together, a mutual attraction develops, forcing Doug to
decide whether he's willing to sacrifice Hanover's money for Andy's
love.
     If you have to guess which choice Doug will make, you haven't seen
very many romantic comedies.  The point is never whether they'll end up
together, but simply how entertaining getting there will be.
Unfortunately, the answer in FOR LOVE OR MONEY is, not very.  It starts
promisingly enough, with a focus on Doug's wheeling and dealing, but
once the romantic plot kicks in there's just no energy.  There's a
lengthy sequence at a party involving mistaken identities and Doug
trying to hold everything together which was frantic but never really
clicked; after that, the film doesn't even seem to try.  The situations
are simply tedious.  I can't begin to describe how tired I am of that
stock "we both care about each other but neither one of us will admit
it so instead we'll yell at each other" scene in romantic comedies.
There are plenty of ways to establish conflict that actually occur in
human life (or perhaps I and everyone I know have just been lucky so
far).  FOR LOVE OR MONEY uses up most of its best jokes and all of its
originality in about ten minutes.
     I also had many problems with the performances.  Fox has spent so
much time as the Cocky Young Go-Getter that he doesn't seem to know how
to vary it.  He's too likable too soon; FOR LOVE OR MONEY would have
worked much better if a man who had seen more than his share of kept
women had initially been more cynical and antagonistic towards Andy.
He also never conveys when the mild flirtation established early in
their interaction becomes real romantic interest, but perhaps a better
question than "when" is "why." Gabrielle Anwar wanders through the film
gorgeous but thoroughly uninteresting, emoting and pouting in ways that
would make a high school drama teacher cringe.  Of the supporting
players, only Michael Tucker as a nebbishy hotel guest is not a
complete stereotype.  Particularly embarrassing are fascistic German
hotel manager and a swishy fashion designer, but they are just the most
glaring examples of a script that makes all the easy choices, and all
the wrong ones.
     Director Barry Sonnenfeld was a marvelous cinematographer
(MILLER'S CROSSING), but so far only a barely serviceable director.
Like THE ADDAMS FAMILY, FOR LOVE OR MONEY is too ham-fisted, and
Sonnenfeld's few stylistic flourishes are lost in slow pacing and
mishandled actors.  FOR LOVE OR MONEY turns out to be ALEX KEATON - THE
CONCIERGE YEARS, an overlong mid-grade sitcom.

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
     Jim Sheridan and Terry George, contemporary cinema's poets laureate
of the Irish "Troubles," are building an extraordinarily well-received
body of work.  Sheridan's 1993 film IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER earned
multiple Academy Award and Golden Globe nominations; George's 1996
directing debut SOME MOTHER'S SON garnered many critical plaudits.  Their
earnest, well-crafted stories of folks caught up in the turbulence of
political violence have moved many viewers to heap adjectives of praise
upon their films.  And while all this occurs, I find myself sitting and
thinking, "You know, it was good, but..."
     Sheridan and George's latest collaboration, THE BOXER, falls into a
very similar category.  It tells the story of Danny Flynn (Daniel
Day-Lewis), a former IRA member who has just completed a fourteen year
sentence for his involvement in terrorist activities.  All Danny wants is
to pick up the pieces of his life, perhaps returning to the boxing career
interupted by his incarceration, but things are not to be so simple.  His
teenage sweetheart Maggie (Emily Watson) is now married to another
prisoner and has a teenage son of her own; Danny's former running partner
Harry (Gerard McSorley) is none-too-pleased that Danny has shunned his
former IRA friends.  While IRA political leader (and Maggie's father) Joe
Hamill (Brian Cox) tries to create peace at the bargaining table, Danny
makes his own small efforts to bring the warring factions together, but
finds his personal and professional desires encountering dangerous
opposition from Harry.
     There are always plenty of things to like about a Sheridan film, most
notably his ability to create a vibrant sense of place.  The divided
Belfast of THE BOXER is a startling image, with its physical wall dividing
the people even more concretely than the differing ideologies.  One early
scene finds IRA memberrs leading Joe through a series of cut-out walls so
that he can reach a party without having to walk outside; explosions rip
through the characters' lives without warning.  The insanity and
self-perpetuating violence of the Irish conflict are starkly portrayed,
with more ambiguity surrounding the question of right and wrong than most
films on the subject -- including Sheridan and George's own previous films
-- have managed to explore.
     For all its welcome complexity of theme, however, THE BOXER tends to
drift in the exploration of its main characters.  Nowhere is this more
evident than in the love story between Danny and Maggie, a star-crossed
romance which feels more obligatory than well-developed.  Furtive glances
and snatches of conversation establish tension between them, but their
connection is never entirely convincing.  It doesn't help that the central
impediment to their relationship -- Maggie's husband, to whom she is
expected to be unerringly faithful in support of The Cause -- never makes
an appearance.  In one sense, it's an effective device which turns him
into an abstract rallying point for the IRA rather than an individual
human being.  At the same time, we are forced to take for granted that
Maggie belongs with Danny, and that Liam's devotion to his absent father's
memory is the foolish stuff of childhood.
     None of which is to suggest that the performances aren't strong from
top to bottom, because they are.  Daniel Day-Lewis brings a resigned
dignity to Danny; his unwillingness to return to the IRA's ways seems as
much a result of fatigue than moral scruple.  Brian Cox and Gerard
McSorley do solid work as the warring factions within the IRA, and Ken
Stott has a few nice scenes as Danny's old trainer, reduced to a pathetic
drunk by the dissolution of his boxing club.  Their stories always hold
your attention, but they never engross the way great film stories do.
Perhaps my sense in THE BOXER, and with IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER and SOME
MOTHER'S SON for that matter, is that Sheridan and George are more
interested in making a point than making a movie.  The result is a
cerebral film with too little gut-level emotion.  Sheridan and George are
good film-makers, but they could be great if they were as attentive to
their people as to their politics.

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
THE BIG KAHUNA
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, Danny DeVito, Peter Facinelli.
Screenplay:  Roger Rueff, based on his play HOSPITALITY SUITE.
Producers:  Kevin Spacey, Elie Samaha and Andrew Stevens.
Director:  John Swanbeck.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Raise your hand if the idea of a film version of a single-set,
dialogue-heavy play sets your pulse racing. Keep it up in the air if you'd
like to cross that with a story about the hard-knocks life of professional
salesmen. Now both of you, seek immediate help from Liars Anonymous. 
Stage-to-screen translations are hard enough without dealing with the
inherent limitations of a single location. And you can't imagine there's
anything left to be said about salesmen that Arthur Miller didn't slap a
copyright on fifty years ago. Technical stagnancy and narrative 
familiarity -- yep, sign me up for a double dose of that.
     It's hard not to go into a film like THE BIG KAHUNA without fearing
the worst, which makes it all the more impressive when it turns out to be
a splendid acting showcase with a few eye-opening bits of wisdom. The
story is set during one night in a Wichita hotel hospitality suite, where
representatives from industrial lubricant company Lodestar Industries are
throwing a little party-cum-pitch conference. Larry (Kevin Spacey) is the
pro focused on landing a potentially huge account; Bob (Peter Facinelli) 
is the young research representative with more existential concerns; and
Phil (Danny DeVito) sits somewhere in the middle, trying to balance his
job with the big picture.
     Screenwriter Roger Rueff (adapting his own play HOSPITALITY SUITE) 
writes the kind of snappy dialogue that actors kill for, and all three of
the principal performers tear into it with gusto. Spacey is predictably
sensational as the marketing rep for whom honesty has become a religion; 
there may not be a performer around who can be so pleasantly venomous. It
is surprising to see DeVito match Spacey's stride in what may be his best
film performance ever. Phil's voice of experience carries a regret that's
almost tangible, turning his every utterance into something you trust
implicitly as true and worth knowing. Facinelli has the least eye-catching
role, but that doesn't mean he's a week link; it's just Bob's job to
listen and learn. Between Spacey and DeVito, there's enough blistering
comic dialogue to keep three films afloat.
     There's also a surprising core of understanding in THE BIG KAHUNA
about the nature of salesmanship. The film's hard-nosed philosophy -- 
which wraps God and industrial lubricants in one not-so-tidy package -- is
likely to make plenty of viewers uneasy, but it's a challenging
perspective on proselytizing as a question of product, rather than
process. The subject proves to be only one of several on which Rueff
offers insights that keep you hanging on his dialogue. It's the only way a
talk-intensive film like THE BIG KAHUNA can work: Between the wicked wit
and the provocative ideas, you're too afraid to miss something to let your
attention wander.
     Director John Swanbeck does have some trouble overcoming the inherent
limitations of his setting. He's stuck in that one hotel room for 90
minutes, requiring him to have characters move the furniture around when
something needs to happen besides chatter. He does include a trio of
well-crafted fantasy sequences, including one that makes wonderful use of
Facinelli's resemblance to a certain A-list star in a sequence involving
fancy bartending moves. Still, it's essentially a film in which three
characters take turns talking to each other, a set-up that's never going
to produce the most visually arresting cinema. The only reason to watch
THE BIG KAHUNA is not to watch it, but to listen to it -- to absorb some
fine writing and the work of actors who know what to do with it. It's
enough to remind you that solid execution trumps low expectations every
time.

Title
Review for Night of the Hunter, The (1955)
THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER (1955)
Starring:  Robert Mitchum, Shelly Winters, Lillian Gish, Billy Chapin,
Sally Jane Bruce.
Screenplay:  James Agee, based on the novel by Davis Grubb.
Director:  Charles Laughton.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Because I have been privy to the forty years of screen history which
followed it -- particularly the past fifteen or twenty years -- I watched
almost 90 minutes of THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER with a combination of
technical admiration and vague consternation.  The problem was Harry
Powell (Robert Mitchum), the sinister minister who drives the narrative.
Dressed in a preacher's garb, Harry arrives in a small town to do as he
has done many times before:  rob a widow of her wealth before robbing her
of her life.  His target is Willa Harper (Shelly Winters), whose husband
shared a jail cell with Harry before his execution for killing two men
during a bank robbery.  The loot was never recovered, and only Willa's two
young children John (Billy Chapin) and Pearl (Sally Jane Bruce) seem to
know the whereabouts of the $10,000, though neither one is talking.
Spouting scripture and impressing the gullible townsfolk, Harry insinuates
himself into the Harper family to begin a greed-driven reign of terror.
     You can't blame me for fearing that THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER would
turn out to be the prototype for more recent films depicting Christians as
either a) homicidal zealots, b) unctuous hypocrites or c) simple-minded
buffoons, if not all three.  With his "love/hate" finger tattoos and his
creepy repetition of a single old spiritual, Harry is a nightmare vision
of perverted religiosity.  
     But THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER takes a surprising turn late in the
film.  Pursued relentlessly down the river by Harry, John and Pearl come
into the care of an elderly woman named Rachel (Lillian Gish) who has
taken to caring for orphans.  In a moment of chillingly perfect clarity,
Harry hovers menacingly at the garden gate, crooning that same solitary
spiritual:  "Leaning, leaning, leaning on the everlasting arm."  Rachel
recognizes the tune and begins to sing along, at which point it becomes
clear that Harry is omitting a fairly significant word from his version.
The word is "Jesus."
     THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER has earned much of its praise over the years
for director Charles Laughton's stark visual style, praise it certainly
deserves.  Some of Laughton's compositions are remarkably assured for a
first-time (and, sadly, only-time) film-maker, haunting images of Harry as
a dark horseman on the horizon, and of a dead woman's hair streaming
underwater.  There are also unexpected flashes of wicked humor, including
a woman's can't-believe-they-said-it-in-1955 reference to her sex life as
"ly(ing) back and thinking of my canning."
     It is the canny set-up of Harry and Rachel as the "love" and "hate"
on Harry's fingers, however, which will linger longest in my memory.
Many conservative critics have railed against the movies as a haven for
Christian-bashing, charges which only bear the whiff of truth because the
films criticized don't do what THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER does.  Harry Powell
may be a horrible human being, but he's not horrible because he's a
Christian.  Screenwriter James Agee makes Harry's fire-and-brimstone faith
a pathology justifying his selfishness and misogyny; Rachel interprets her
faith as a call to selflessness and defense of the defenseless.  The
narrative depth and cinematic richness of THE NIGHT OF THE HUNTER both end
up coming from the same place:  a juxtaposition of light and dark which
can be as satisfying and inspirational as it is bleak and disturbing.

Title
Review for Election (1999)
ELECTION
(Paramount)
Starring:  Matthew Broderick, Reese Witherspoon, Chris Klein, Jessica
Campbell, Mark Harelik, Molly Hagan, Delaney Driscoll.
Screenplay:  Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor, based on the novel by Tom
Perrotta.
Producers:  Albert Berger, Ron Yerxa, David Gale and Keith Samples.
Director:  Alexander Payne.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations, drug use)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     This is how I know I'm dealing with a film of uncommon intelligence:
ELECTION resists the tidy summations in which most films are all-too-eager
to wrap themselves.  Like many recent films, it is a comedy set in a high
school, but it's more than just the latest high school comedy.  It deals
with a student body election, but it's not really _about_ a student body
election.  It's a film in which characters narrate much of the story, but
it doesn't use that narration in a conventional way.  Like director
Alexander Payne's previous film CITIZEN RUTH -- if to a somewhat less
successful degree -- ELECTION is a satirical scalpel that refuses to let
you know exactly when or whom it's going to cut.
     It's spring at Omaha, Nebraska's Carver High School as ELECTION
begins, which means it's time for elections for the next year's student
body officers.  The prime candidate -- and apparently _only_ candidate --
for student body president is Tracy Flick (Reese Witherspoon), an
extracurricular machine who sees the office as her destiny.  Seeing things
a bit differently is Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick), a civics teacher
and student government advisor that Tracy rubs the wrong way.  In an
attempt to make the election less of a foregone conclusion, McAllister
convinces injured football hero Paul Metzler (Chris Klein) to mount a
challenge, which in turn generates the "third party" candidacy of Paul's
alienated younger sister Tammy.
     It would have been easy enough for ELECTION to turn into a broad
comedy about adolescent peer politics, and it _still_ would have been more
insightful than most teen comedies.  Payne and co-writer Jim Taylor, 
working from Tom Perrotta's novel, have bigger targets in mind.  They use
the Carver High election as a microcosm not just of high school life, but
of politics on a much grander scale.  Tracy Flick's campaign casts her as
a political cousin of our current president, seeking election as a "you
really like me" validation rathern than out of a desire to serve; even her
nomination speech parrots the naming-of-names, I-feel-your-pain personal
touch.  Tammy, meanwhile, rallies the disenfranchised minority behind the
idea that nothing changes but the names in conventional governance.  Even
the ridiculous posters, filled with little more than sloganeering, seem
disturbingly similar to national election campaigning.  It's savvy,
cynical, and very funny.
     Even more effective is Payne's use of that old literary device the
"unreliable narrator" as counterpoint to his direction.  McAllister,
Tracy, Paul and Tammy take turns explaining their take on the events of
the film, each one mouthing words that don't quite match their his or her 
actions.  McAllister describes his personal and professional contentment
as he sifts through a trunk full of pornography; sexually-confused Tammy
explains that "I'm not a lesbian, I'm attracted to the _person_.  It's
just that all the people I've been attracted to have been girls;" Tracy
describes her mother's actions on her behalf in a way that shows she's
being programmed for greatness.  Only Paul, perhaps too dense to be
duplicitous, seems pure of heart.  As he did in CITIZEN RUTH, Payne
explores the way we convince ourselves that our motivations are pure, even
when we don't really understand what our motivations are.
     If Payne stumbles anywhere, it's in his choice to focus much of the
film's second half on McAllister's domestic troubles.  Tammy's character
in particular is abandoned by this choice, letting the school
administration's reaction to her unconventional candidacy off the hook too
easily.  But ELECTION is too smart to be derailed by this problem, too
clear-eyed in its study of good intentions muddled by psychological
baggage.  With surprising sympathy towards all his flawed characters,
Alexander Payne creates a furiously funny film in which his surrealistic
directing touches keep the audience off-guard.  He understands that in a
world where people can't even summarize themselves in a neat-and-tidy
sentence, we can't expect to summarize the movies about them that way.

Title
Review for Johns (1996)
(First Look)
Starring:  David Arquette, Lukas Haas, Terrence Dashon Howard, Keith
David.
Screenplay:  Scott Silver.
Producers:  Beau Flynn and Stefan Simchowitz.
Director:  Scott Silver.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are moments in the course of performing this job that I wish I
had the director in front of me so I could just shake him.  It isn't the
terrible films which get me so worked up, because there is no amount of
sense I could shake into directors in those cases.  Rather, it is the near
miss which frustrates me most, when I see a potentially fine film
disappearing into a fog of pretension.  Apparently the subject of street
hustling is particularly conducive to sending directors into fits of
artistic incontinence.  Gus Van Sant had MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO soaring
until he decided to get iambic on us with an extended riff on HENRY IV,
PART I, and Scott Silver tackles a similar premise in JOHNS with similar
results.  There is an affecting human drama in there, if you can wade
through the symbolism to find it.
     JOHNS shows us one day (Christmas Eve, to be specific) in the lives
of two street hustlers on L. A.'s Santa Monica Boulevard:  John (David
Arquette), an edgy veteran of the streets, and Donner (Lukas Haas), his
inexperienced protege.  John has plans to spend his birthday the following
day living it up at the Park Plaza Hotel, but those plans hit a snag when
someone steals away John's lucky sneakers, along with the $300 he needs
for the hotel room.  With only a few hours left to scrape together the
necessary cash, John takes on clients both old and new -- each one a
potential danger -- and also tries to get help from Donner.  That might be
the easy part of the day, as John and Donner also need to stay one step
ahead of Jimmy the Warlock (Terrence Dashon Howard), the drug dealer from
whom John stole the original $300.
     Anyone who has seen MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO is going to find elements of
JOHNS familiar, including the relationship between the two protagonists
(one has an unrequited crush on the other), and the upper class background
of one of them.  There is, however, something pleasantly unfamiliar about
the authenticity of JOHNS' setting.  Silver creates a world of
fringe-dwellers who know each other but are too busy trying to stay alive
to care about each other.  John's acquaintances, like his girlfriend Nikki
(Alanna Urbach) and a twitchy paranoiac named Eli (Christopher Gartin),
drift in and out of the narrative, and Silver often shoots them from a
distance both to keep us from getting to close to them and to suggest the
distance we probably would keep ourselves.  These people don't form a
protective family, although the more innocent Donner is willing to do so;
for the most part, they have more pressing concerns.
     The unique dynamics of these characters' lives should have been
enough to sustain JOHNS, but Silver isn't satisfied with telling his story
in a straightforward manner.  It isn't enough that we realize John's
birthday is Christmas day; John also gets a chain whipped across his
forehead so he looks like he has been wearing a crown of thorns.  It isn't
enough that an enigmatic homeless man (Keith David) returns one good deed
with another; he has to turn into a hymn-crooning, all-seeing wise man.
>From the repeated use of clocks and watches as a motif to the repeated use
of John as a name for characters (there are three in addition to
Arquette's character), Silver keeps giving you pokes in the ribs which are
merely unnecessary when they aren't actively distracting.  There are
plenty of moments when Silver doesn't seem aware that, sometimes, less is
more.
     It is a particular shame when distractions interfere with a
performance as uniquely compelling as David Arquette's.  We know he is
doomed from the moment he reveals that "nothing bad ever happened to me
while I was wearing my lucky sneaks," but Arquette refuses to make him a
lost soul/victim of society.  John has no sense of a future, so he takes
any action assuming that he won't have to deal with the consequences, and
he uses people with a similar disregard.  There is something almost
unlikeable about John, but we come to care about the moment of respect and
splendor he wants from his night at the Park Plaza.  This dream leads to a
surprisingly touching moment involving the hotel's desk clerk (Richard
Kind), one of several sparkling scenes Silver gives to his supporting
characters; another clever bit finds Jimmy the Warlock becoming a bit less
menacing as he struggles with basic subtraction.  Silver had great actors
working with great characters, so it is disappointing that JOHNS is only a
good film instead of a great one.  With time, I hope Scott Silver learns
what a great chef understands:  presentation should complement a fine
meal, not overwhelm it.  You don't serve up a filet mignon just to smother
it with parsley.

Title
Review for Madness of King George, The (1994)
Starring:  Nigel Hawthorne, Helen Mirren, Ian Holm, Rupert Everett,
Julian Woodham, Amanda Donohoe, Jim Carter, Rupert Graves.
Screenplay:  Alan Bennett.
Director:  Nicholas Hytner.
     How do you market a stage-originated historical drama to an
American viewing public which forced a change in the film's title
when they struggled with the concept that THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE
III was not a sequel?  You could tell them that, like medicine or
"Masterpiece Theater," it was good for them, an approach which
rarely works.  Or you could try this truth:  THE MADNESS OF KING
GEORGE is thoughtful, funny, spectacularly staged and richly
performed.  Nigel Hawthorne's complex performance as George III
brings the humanity to the role necessary to raise Alan Bennett's
story of monarchy in decline to a work of rare insight.
     THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE opens in 1788, with the King
(Hawthorne) still bitter over the loss of the American colonies.
Always something of an eccentric, George soon appears to be growing
more and more unstable, a situation with profound political
ramifications.  The King's supporters, led by Prime Minister William
Pitt (Julian Wadham), realize that their fortunes are tied to his,
and try to keep him out of sight.  Meanwhile, the Prince of Wales
(Rupert Everett), bored with a life of "nothing to do," seeks to
have his father declared incompetent and himself named as regent,
and allies himself with Pitt's rival Charles James Fox (Jim Carter).
As support for Fox's bill grows, the King's supporters bring in
Willis (Ian Holm), an unorthodox "doctor" who intends to cure the
King's madness by any means necessary.
     Perhaps more than anything else, THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE is
about the dissolution of monarchy.  It takes place on the eve of the
French Revolution, during a time of social change throughout the
Western world, and presents in George III a king confronted for
perhaps the first time with his own humanity.  As he is subjected to
every possible indignity (including incontinence and the barbaric
treatments prescribed by his buffoonish cadre of doctors), George
III desperately and persistently pronounces his place as God's
annointed one.  Finally, as Willis straps him to a chair, his
statement that "I am the King" is greeted by a simple "No...you are
the patient."  From the opening sequence, which shows the King being
adorned for an a public appearance, it becomes clear that we will
see him stripped down to nothing, to the simple, sick man that he
is.
     If it appears from this description that Alan Bennett, who
adapted his own stage play for the screen, is baldly anti-royalty,
that isn't entirely the case.  He makes George a remarkably
sympathetic character, and casts an even darker eye on the
machinations of those whose only concerns about his well-being are
political.  Much of the credit for the success of King George as a
character goes to Nigel Hawthorne, who also played the role on
stage.  He is by turns comic, petulant, tender and infuriating,
crafting a performance so vivid that it is easy to forget that he is
playing a king.  His scenes of his private relationship with Queen
Charlotte (Helen Mirren) show a gentle and devoted husband who
refers to his wife as "Mrs. King," and they are quite affecting, but
his finest moment may be a scene with no dialogue.  With little more
than a lowering of his eyes and a swallow, he becomes a thoroughly
beaten man who has lost the last shred of his royal dignity.
     The most pleasant surprise in THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE may be
that stage director Nicholas Hytner, in his first screen directing
effort, demonstrates such an instinctive understanding of what makes
the two media different.  He opens up the play, taking advantage of
Ken Adam's superb production design, and he uses close-ups to
marvelous effect.  In fact, the only things wrong with the film
might be a few lackluster supporting performances and references
which require a bit too much knowledge of British political history
(notably a pun on "Pitt the elder and Pitt the younger").  As a
whole, however, THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE is a wonderfully realized
story of a turning point in the history of the world, when the head
that wore the crown became just the head of another man with very
human frailties.

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
     I can't remember a film getting as much mileage out of a single
visual gag as MY GIANT gets out of its one and only visual gag.  The gag,
of course, is the premise:  diminutive Billy Crystal teamed in a
buddy-bonding comedy with 7'7" professional basketball player Gheorghe
Muresan.  Crystal plays Sammy Kamin, a low-rent talent agent whose best
clients tend to work car shows or wedding receptions; Muresan plays Max, a
gentle, Shakespeare-quoting Romanian giant who saves Sammy's life when his
car plunges into a river.  Sammy immediately sees dollar signs in the
massive Max, persuading him to try movie acting with a promise to visit
Max's long-lost love Lillianna in America.  Soon the unlikely pair are on
the road together, every scene between them something that momentarily
fools you into thinking there _must_ be some special effects at work.
     It's enough to make you wonder why they don't make silent films
anymore, when this one could have been thoroughly enjoyable without a
single character opening his or her mouth.  Crystal, for his part has
always been good with a reaction take and a vaudevillian's sense for
milking a laugh visually.  Unfortunately, he has become obsessed with
plots in which he invariably plays workaholics who learn What Really
Matters -- two CITY SLICKERS movies, FORGET PARIS, MR. SATURDAY NIGHT and
now MY GIANT.  David Seltzer's script piles on the pathos so thick --
tender moments between Sammy and his estranged wife (Kathleen Quinlan),
sad-eyed tete-a-tetes with his son (Zane Carney), Lillianna's rejection of
Max, a potentially life-threatening ailment for one main character -- that
it threatens to crush everything in its path.  The few decent jokes
Crystal manages to squeeze in between the heart-felt glances hardly seem
worth the effort.
     Muresan, meanwhile, is just too endearingly goofy not to look at, a
Great Dane puppy in a peasant shirt.  If you've seen his hilarious
Snickers commercial, in which he hawks an eponymous cabbage-cented cologne
on a home shopping channel, you know Muresan has charm and a surprising
comic sense.  You would also know that, compared to Muresan's
marble-mouthed diction, Andre the Giant sounded like he studied with Henry
Higgins.  It's an undemanding role, one in which Muresan demonstrates
infinitely more screen presence than fellow hoopster-cum-thespians like
Shaquille O'Neal and Michael Jordan.  You just can't help wishing that the
big guy would continue to smile engagingly while embarking on fewer
adventures into the English language.
     Whatever its failings, MY GIANT is almost worth watching simply for a
few jaw-droppings cenes featuring Steven Seagal.  Playing himself on the
set of an action movie where Max might play the villain, Seagal shows more
willingness to poke fun at his image than I ever suspected he had in him.
When his director asks if a scene could be better with one more take, a
casually arrogant Seagal answers, "No;" when he makes a call to Sammy's
son as a favor, he allows the skeptical boy to mock his look ("that stupid
ponytail"), his acting ("lessons...how about taking a few?") and his
muttered line-readings ("are you going to go hang out with Stallone so I
can understand you _less_?")  For five minutes, MY GIANT is comic genius,
and Seagal deflates himself masterfully.
     And then, it's back to swimming through they syrup of Marc Shaiman's
score to get to the warm-n-fuzzy denouement.  MY GIANT has its moments,
but its generally such a tepid and non-threatening comedy that the moments
can't add up to much.  Feel-good shmaltz like this works much better when
you don't have to listen to the shmaltz being spelled out for you.  Call
me old-fashioned, but I prefer to imagine a version of MY GIANT made 70
years ago, where no precious speeches got in the way of chuckling at
mis-matched protagonists.

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Woody Allen, Julia Roberts, Goldie Hawn, Alan Alda, Edward
Norton, Drew Barrymore, Natasha Lyonne, Tim Roth, Natalie Portman.
Screenplay:  Woody Allen.
Producer:  Robert Greenhut.
Director:  Woody Allen.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Woody Allen is one of the unlikeliest film-makers I can think of to
try to revive the movie musical.  It is true that Allen has made nostalgia
something of his personal fiefdom, and that he clearly loves the old
standards, but that doesn't necessarily make him the best man for the job.
To oversimplify the matter somewhat, the near-total disappearance of the
musical as a cinematic genre has been the product of a less innocent era;
for a musical to work its magic on you, you had to surrender to its
often-absurd optimism, something increasingly difficult to do in a cynical
time.  Woody Allen may not necessarily be a cynic, but he has become
somewhat synonymous with sophistication.  EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU is an
entertaining trifle which never truly transports you because Allen is too
often outside the genre.  This may be the first meta-musical.
     EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU deals with the complicated romantic
entanglements of an upscale extended family.  Teenager DJ (Natasha Lyonne)
narrates the interwoven stories, beginning with her sister Skylar's (Drew
Barrymore) engagement to upstanding young Holden (Edward Norton).  Skylar
and DJ's unlucky-in-love father Joe (Woody Allen) is an author living in
Paris, currently trying to woo a young art historian named Von (Julia
Roberts); Meanwhile, Joe's dyed-in-the-wool liberal ex-wife Steffi (Goldie
Hawn) is remarried to like-minded Bob (Alan Alda), though Bob's son Scott
(Lukas Haas) has become a conservative Republican.  Naturally, all the
relationships have their problems.  Skylar is attracted to a rough ex-con
(Tim Roth), Von is still married (if unhappily) and there may still be a
bit of a spark between Joe and Steffi.
     With so many film-makers content to make the same film over and over,
you have to respect Allen for experimenting constantly with techniques
(the hand-held camera work of HUSBANDS AND WIVES and MANHATTAN MURDER
MYSTERY), narrative devices (the Greek chorus of MIGHTY APHRODITE) and
genres.  EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU is an experiment, to be sure, with most
of the actors singing their own parts and production numbers popping up in
the oddest places.  A couple of the numbers work superbly, notably a
ghostly dance to "Enjoy Yourself (It's Later Than You Think)" which is
reminiscent of Disneyland's Haunted Mansion, but watching this film makes
you realize how long it may have been since you've seen characters break
into song on screen; even though you know it is a musical, it is a bit
startling every time a song begins.  Still, no one embarrasses him or
herself (though Julia Roberts comes close), and the familiar songs are
given unique spins out of their plot-appropriate appearances.
     The problem with EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU isn't the songs, it is
Allen's approach to them.  His audience is notoriously upscale, and he
makes his films decidedly with that audience in mind; how better to 
explain the knowing laughter which accompanies a cameo appearance by
Itzhak Perlman playing violin at a party?  In fact, knowing laughter plays
a significant role in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.  Allen appears to be
banking not on the songs and dances themselves being entertaining, but on
their silly incongruity being entertaining.  One moment, a light-hearted
duet between Goldie Hawn and Woody Allen on the banks of the Seine,
strikes a perfect low-key tone, but it is a rare exception.  Allen has
made a comedy in which the object of much of the humor is the fact that
people are singing and dancing; he is getting us to laugh _at_ the musical
genre, not with it.
     One of the ironies of that effect is that Allen may also have given a
winking acknowledgment to critics of his romanticized view of New York.
An early sequence finds a panhandler breaking into song, and Allen's
tendency to focus on upper crust Manhattanites is given a nudge as he sets
a scene Le Cirque and a production number at exclusive jeweler Harry
Winston's.  There is plenty to laugh at in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU, from
Skylar's propensity for swallowing engagement rings to one hilarious swipe
at Italians from a Teutonic housekeeper, as well as inspired performances
by Edward Norton (effortlessly charming in his two musical numbers) and
Tim Roth (hilarious as a suspicious criminal thrust into high society).
Curiously, those two performances also emphasize why EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE
YOU isn't better.  They offer a couple of rare moments of unrestrained
glee in a story which feels constrained by its characters' social
positions, even though Allen is all too conscious of the world in which he
has set his story.  It is noteworthy that the Marx Brothers play a
significant role in the film's climax (as well as the title, a tune
prominently featured in HORSE FEATHERS), because EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU
is a musical in the sense that the Marx Brothers' early films were
musicals, where songs serving romantic sub-plots only got in the way of
the real funny material.  It is also set in the posh world the Marxes used
to tear to shreds, only the classy folks are the heroes this time.  Once
upon a time Woody Allen seemed comfortable with Marx-ist ideology, but
perhaps he has mellowed with age.  EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU sings, but it 
might have soared if the guiding sensibility had been Groucho instead of
Margaret Dumont.

Title
Review for Yin shi nan nu (1994)
Starring:  Sihung Lung, Chien-Lien Wu, Kuie-Mei Yang, Yu-Wen Wang,
Ah-Leh Gua, Jui Wang, Winston Chao.
Screenplay:  Hui-Ling Wang, James Schamus and Ang Lee.
Director:  Ang Lee.
     Issues of quality aside, this is the best advice I can give to
anyone considering seeing Ang Lee's EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN:  do *not* see
it on an empty stomach.  Like 1992's LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE, EAT
DRINK MAN WOMAN is a cinematic dream for those with a weakness for
scrupulously prepared cuisines, and a nightmare for dieters.  Also like
that earlier film, it is about much more than recipes.  EAT DRINK MAN
WOMAN, like Lee's Oscar-nominated 1993 film THE WEDDING BANQUET, is a
story of generational conflict, a witty and emotionally involving tale
in which food plays a pivotal role in observations on a changing
Chinese culture.
     EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN is the story of the Chus, a family living in
modern Taipei.  Old Chu (Sihung Lung) is a widowed master chef sharing
his home with three grown daughters.  Jia-Jen (Kuei-Mei Yang) is a
repressed schoolteacher who is a Christian convert; Jia-Chien
(Chien-Lien Wu) is an executive for a Taiwanese airline; Jia-Ning
(Yu-Wen Wang) is a student who works in a fast food restaurant.  All
three humor their father's elaborate Sunday dinners, but each has
desires conflicting with Old Chu's world.  Eventually all of them find
themselves entangled in complicated romances, including Old Chu
himself, who is pursued by a garrulous old family friend (Ah-Leh Gua).
The playing out of these relationships leads to a confrontation with
family tensions.
     The title of EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN comes from a Chinese proverb
dealing with the basic necessities for continuing life, but it is used
ironically by Old Chu to note how even the simplest things have become
complicated.  From the opening shots of a swarm of scooters crossing a
busy intersection juxtaposed with Chu's traditional cooking, EAT DRINK
MAN WOMAN becomes an examination of a modern world clashing with an
ancient culture.  Each of Chu's daughters represents a merging of
cultures:  Jia-Jen's religion brings Christianity into the mix;
Jia-Chien's airline is in the process of acquiring routes into new
countries; Jia-Ning's job at a Wendy's (where the customers can't
always tell what they're eating) mocks Chu's life work.  Chu copes by
maintaining a silent distance, yet as he notes other cultures seeping
into his own, he begins to lose the one thing that allows him to
preserve a pure culture, the ability to taste his food.  "We
communicate through food," notes Jia-Chien at one dinner, and with a
breakdown in the ability of the traditional cuisine to bridge the
generations comes a total failure of communication.  It's rich thematic
ground, and Ang Lee does a fantastic job of finding influences,
particularly American influences, everywhere (particularly a humorously
mis-named stuffed purple dinosaur called "Harvey").
     EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN also explores romantic relationships in this
context of generational change, and there it is less consistently
successful.  Each of the four main characters is given a subplot, and
like Old Chu's dinners the film begins to seem like there is a bit too
much to consume in one sitting.  The youngest daughter's story is
particularly weak, and the film might have been more effective if her
character had been dropped entirely.  Otherwise, solid acting makes for
some affecting stories.  Sihung Lung, so good as the father in THE
WEDDING BANQUET, is again taciturn without being one-note, and provides
a solid anchor for the film.  The best story belongs to Kuei-Mei Yang's
Jia-Jen, and she does a magnificent job of playing all of Jia-Jen's
buried emotions at just the right level.  Also noteworthy are two
delightful supporting performances:  Ah-Leh Gua (Lung's wife in WEDDING
BANQUET) as the non-stop Mrs. Liang, and Jui Wang as Old Wen, Chu's
best friend and fellow chef.
     I was not a huge fan of THE WEDDING BANQUET; I felt it was
inconsistently paced, and that its weak lead performances hindered its
emotional pull.  Here, however, Ang Lee has put all the pieces
together.  Though it runs a bit long, EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN is a warm and
keenly observed character piece, filled with mostly exceptional
performances.  See it as it makes its way to your town.  After a large
meal, naturally.

Title
Review for Jimmy Hollywood (1994)
Starring:  Joe Pesci, Christian Slater, Victoria Abril.
Screenplay/Director:  Barry Levinson.
     If there has been one theme one can identify running through the
work of director Barry Levinson, it is the search for the American
Dream.  He brought us the ambitious salesmen of TIN MEN, the optimistic
immigrants of AVALON, and the visionary BUGSY, all darkly-tinged
stories of guys trying to make their mark and make it big.  JIMMY
HOLLYWOOD is another such story, but it is lacking something previous
Levinson projects had, namely a firm grasp on what the protagonsists'
dreams were.  There are interesting ideas in the script, and some of
the dry humor characteristic of Levinson's dialogue, but it's never all
that compelling because the character of Jimmy Alto is too
schizophrenic, and with him the tone of the whole film.
     JIMMY HOLLYWOOD is the nickname of Jimmy Alto (Joe Pesci), a
struggling actor who has gone so far as to buy an advertisement for
himself on a bus stop bench.  He also adores the Hollywood of the
glamorous 1940s and 1950s, and spends afternoons memorizing the stars
on the Walk of Fame with addled friend William (Christian Slater).
That Hollywood is strongly at odds with the reality Jimmy sees around
him, however, and when a couple of crimes hit close to home he decides
to do something about it.  Along with William, Jimmy catches a thief
and turns him in with a note identifying the captors as the "S.O.S."
When the public begins expressing appreciation for the vigilantes,
Jimmy begins to play the role for all it's worth, to the dismay of
long-suffering girlfriend Lorena (Victoria Abril).
     At various times, Levinson appears to be trying to tell two
different stories through Jimmy.  One is about the thankless life of
being a struggling actor, including the cattle calls, waiting tables
and shameless self-promotion necessary to make it.  Jimmy never doubts
for a minute that his big break is just around the corner, and when his
vigilante persona "Jericho" becomes a media sensation, he is unwilling
to give up what he considers "the role of a lifetime."  At the same
time, Levinson paints a picture of a one-time Tinseltown which has
disintegrated into a city of drug deals, homelessness and ATM
muggings.  What happens is that it is never clear what motivates
Jimmy.  One moment it appears that he is a starry-eyed altruist who
wants only to return Hollywood to its former glory; the next, he is
simply a publicity-hungry would-be actor using crime to make a name for
himself.  The Jimmy who wants to strike fear into the hearts of
criminals doesn't gel with the Jimmy who reveals himself for a big
send-off.  It is typical of Levinson to make his heroes' motives less
than completely pure, but in this instance they're simply muddled.  It
is difficult to care all that much about Jimmy, and it's difficult to
figure out whether Levinson wants us to focus on his characters or the
setting.
     It is also a simple truth that JIMMY HOLLYWOOD was a hard film for
me to like.  While it has its humorous moments, it's too grim to be a
purely entertaining comedy, and it doesn't explore its dark themes
deeply enough to be an insightful drama.  Its two principal characters
are frequently more pathetic than they are sympathetic, the pacing is
extremely deliberate, and the shifts in tone had me shifting in my seat
a lot.  When I did find interesting elements, it was more a case of
detatched admiration than enjoyment.
     Among the objects of admiration were two performances, neither of
them Joe Pesci's.  Pesci needs to step back from motor-mouthed New
Yorkers, because they are all beginning to look the same.  His
co-stars, however, are quite good.  Victoria Abril livens up the token
girlfriend role with some strong scenes, particularly a hillside
farewell.  The big surprise is a funny and affecting Christian Slater,
whose forgetful William does the low-key performance in UNTAMED HEART
one better.  Slater is developing into a complete actor, and his
performance here is extremely interesting.  Yet perhaps "interesting"
is the faint praise with which I ultimately damn JIMMY HOLLYWOOD.  I
found a number of things in the film interesting.  I just found none of
them truly engaging.

Title
Review for Sydney (1996)
(Samuel Goldwyn/Rysher)
Starring:  Philip Baker Hall, John C. Reilly, Gwyneth Paltrow, Samuel L.
Jackson.
Screenplay:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
Producers:  Robert Jones and John Lyons.
Director:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'll give this to Paul Thomas Anderson:  he's got a sense of
atmosphere.  HARD EIGHT, Anderson's feature writing and directing debut,
may be even more successful than LEAVING LAS VEGAS at making casinos look
ugly, and his characters exchange dialogue as though every word had to be
yanked out of them with pliers.  That's the good news.  The bad news is
that HARD EIGHT is yet another frustrating independent film by a rookie
film-maker who has an idea of what his film should be _like_ without
having an idea of what it should be _about_.  Though generally well-acted
and interesting to look at, HARD EIGHT is more a collection of thematic
ideas than a story.
      HARD EIGHT opens with an encounter between two men at a roadside
diner somewhere in the American West.  John Finnegan (John C. Reilly) is
down on his luck after a failed attempt to win the money for his mother's
funeral playing blackjack; Sidney (Philip Baker Hall) is a solemn older
man who seems interested in helping John out.  A veteran gambler, Sidney
offers to drive John to Las Vegas and teach him a few tricks of the trade.
Though suspicious at first, John accepts Sidney's offer, and soon learns
that his methods work.  Two years later, the two are still friends and
companions now working the casinos of Reno.  There John gets involved with
a young cocktail waitress named Clementine (Gwyneth Paltrow), an
involvement which soon turns into trouble.  As Sidney tries to help John
out of his predicament, he finds himself in a predicament of his own when
a man named Jimmy (Samuel L. Jackson) reveals that he knows some dark
secrets from Sidney's past.
     An extended sequence during the first half hour of HARD EIGHT might
lead you to believe that the film is going to be a revelatory study of the
gambling culture.  On the evening of the day they first meet, Sidney
teaches John how to fool a casino into believing he had gambled thousands
of dollars, prompting offers of a free room and other perqs from the floor
manager.  It is an interesting lesson in deception -- as is a later
instruction on how to steal pay-per-view movies which could send hotels
all across America scrambling to cover themselves -- which gives HARD EIGHT
a welcome sense of authenticity.
     That sociological curiosity factor isn't enough to sustain a film,
though, and sooner or later Anderson has to get down to the business of
examining the relationships between these characters.  At least he should
have, but he never does.  We see far too little of Sidney and John
together to get a sense of their friendship, making the significant
revelations to come ring totally false.  Philip Baker Hall, the
too-little-seen actor who was so masterful as Nixon in Robert Altman's
1984 SECRET HONOR, gives an impressive, controlled performance as the
Weary Sidney, but Anderson doesn't seem to know what to do with him.  We
get a chance to see him in a variety of situations -- playing the big shot
at a craps table, cleaning up after John's messes, showing kindness to
waitress/hooker Clementine (a thanklessly unpleasant role for Paltrow) --
without really giving us a sense of who he is, as though Anderson thinks
teasing us with a dark past is sufficient.  It's not.  Every once in a
while, HARD EIGHT breaks out of its languid stupor long enough for some
gratuitous violence, a half-hearted attempt at fooling the audience into
thinking something is happening.  Every time, it doesn't take long for the
film to settle back into a bleak somnambulism.
     The only time HARD EIGHT really wakes up is when Samuel L. Jackson
turns up in two scenes, once to be crude and once to be nasty.  Jackson's
profanity-laced tirades are entertaining to a point, but it soon becomes
clear that he's merely recycling riffs from PULP FICTION's Jules because
there isn't anything here on which he can base a unique character.  He's
not really a character at all here; he's a plot device, someone who turns
up when it's necessary for something to happen.  A number of things happen
in HARD EIGHT, but none of it adds up to a narrative we should care about.
If Anderson is trying to tell a tragic tale of a man's misguided attempts
at redemption, he doesn't succeed because he has forgotten to give us
enough information about Sidney to make his fate matter.  HARD EIGHT is
evocative but thoroughly unsatisfying, a film in which an oppressive
atmosphere of foreboding is the real central character, crushing the human
characters like empty beer cans.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
     I am reminded of a favorite line from the Coen brothers' 1991 film
BARTON FINK in this era of the wildly over-produced blockbuster.  Barton
Fink, an intellectual writer who has come to Hollywood in the early 1940s,
reports to his studio boss that he's having trouble getting started on his
first assignment, a wrestling film starring Wallace Beery.  The baffled 
mogul responds, "Wallace Beery, wrestling picture...what do you need, a
road map?"  When it comes to genre film-making, there's an easy way to get
the audience to respond the way you want them to respond, and there's the
way writer/director Stephen Sommers chooses to craft his remake of THE
MUMMY.  Rarely has a film exterted so much narrative effort to say so
little.
     That narrative begins in 1719 B.C., where the Egyptian high priest
Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo), after an affair with the Pharaoh's mistress, is
buried alive to carry a curse on the world should he ever be awakened.
Flash forward to 1923, where soldier of fortune Nick O'Connell (Brendan
Fraser) discovers the lost city of Hamunaptra, legendary site of untold
treasure and -- unbeknownst to anyone -- Imhotep's tomb.  Flash forward
again three years, where Egyptologist/librarian Evelyn (Rachel Weisz) and
her ne'er-do-well brother Jonathan (John Hannah) learn that the jailed
O'Connell knows the location of Hamunaptra, and win his freedom in
exchange for his aid.  Thus begins a journey to the lost city which
results in the release of Imhotep, who emerges into the 20th century with
a mission, an attitude and a whole lot of nasty supernatural powers.
     Unlike the 1932 original, this version is more action-adventure than
horror, focusing on derring-do over scaring-do.  It certainly delivers its
share of fight sequences; some of them are even fairly rousing, combining
unique visual effects with narrow escapes and a dose of visual humor.  The
echoes of RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK are obvious, but THE MUMMY may actually
owe an equal debt to Sam Raimi's ARMY OF DARKNESS in its attempts at
supernatural slapstick.  Though nowhere near the level of the "Indiana
Jones" films -- and indeed, not even necessarily at the level of ARMY OF
DARKNESS -- THE MUMMY at times manages to deliver the goods.
     The goals of a film like THE MUMMY should be fairly simple, yet
Sommers manages to miss the point entirely over and over again.  The plot
summary above doesn't do remote justice to the sacks of exposition,
extraneous plot threads and go-nowhere characters with which THE MUMMY is
burdened.  The film takes forever to set up the premise, with the
exploration party finally reaching Hamunaptra at about the one hour mark.
Unnecessary complications ensue with the inclusion of a rival team of
explorers guided by a sniveling former colleague of O'Connell's (Kevin J.
O'Connor), increasing the body count in the least efficient manner
possible.  The danger to Evelyn -- targeted by Imhotep as part of his plan
to resurrect his former love -- is buried beneath the ten plagues of
Egypt, which Imhotep conveniently controls to allow for some more cool
special effects.  There's no economy to THE MUMMY, no understanding of how
to create a solid hero, a solid villain and a solid conflict and let the
action roll.
     It would be easy enough to snipe at the dopey dialogue and silly
performances in THE MUMMY -- I'm still waiting for someone to convince me
that Brendan Fraser has leading-man charm -- especially since it would
deserve every snipe.  There are a few clever touches, but mostly Sommers
seems to show the typical blockbuster disdain for characters and 
situations which do anything more than set up the next effects shot.  Yet
such complaints miss the point that THE MUMMY isn't even a good brainless
action film with its lumbering pacing.  All the jaw-dropping visual
trickery in the world doesn't help if a film wanders around in circles
before pulling out its "A" material.  Groan if you must, but THE MUMMY
needed to be wrapped up much more tightly.  The Mummy, horror
picture...what do you need, a road map?

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
TITAN A.E.
(20th Century Fox)
Voices:  Matt Damon, Bill Pullman, Drew Barrymore, Nathan Lane, John
Leguizamo, Janeane Garofolo.
Screenplay:  Ben Edlund and John August and Joss Whedon.
Producers:  David Kirschner, Don Bluth and Gary Goldman.
Directors:  Don Bluth and Gary Goldman.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  93 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Early in the animated science fiction/adventure TITAN A.E., in a
scene that takes place in the year 3028, the earth is obliterated by an
alien race called the Drej. Apparently, the Drej fear humanity, and want
it stamped out forever. Why exactly do the Drej fear humanity? Who cares? 
     Flash forward 15 years, where a human survivor named Cale (Matt
Damon) is living among aliens and other scattered humans as a laborer. 
Cale is the orphaned son of a scientist who created a near-mythological
ship called Titan, hidden somewhere out in space. He is supposed to be
deeply embittered by feelings of abandonment, but why are we supposed to
understand that when Damon's vocal performance never suggests anything
more than mild annoyance? Who cares?
     A spacecraft captain named Korso (Bill Pullman) arrives, and informs
Cale that the location of Titan is locked into his DNA. Cale accompanies
Korso and his crew on a mission to find Titan, and along the way becomes
smitten with Korso's pilot Akima (Drew Barrymore). Why exactly does Cale
fall for her, except for the fact that she appears to be the only human
female he's ever met? Who cares?
     TITAN A.E. is a stunningly crafted piece of film animation. It is
also inexcusably lazy and dramatically inept, and there is no earthly or
after-earthly reason why that had to be the case. Director Don Bluth has
made fine animated films like AN AMERICAN TAIL, THE LAND BEFORE TIME and
ANASTASIA, which would be reason enough to hope for the best. But look at
the talent credited with this script: Ben Edlund created the wonderfully
satirical comic book "The Tick;" John August wrote the propulsively clever
GO; Joss Whedon co-scripted TOY STORY, and created "Buffy the Vampire
Slayer." Put those three writers together, and the law of averages would
almost demand something smart, unconventional and utterly original.
     Instead, they pasted together a story so blatantly cribbed from so
many different sources that it would be an endless and thankless task to
list them all (STAR WARS, STAR TREK 2 and BATTLESTAR GALACTICA are only
the most obvious). That's not an uncommon problem with films of this
genre; after all, there are certain buttons one is expected to push, and
certain hero-on-a-quest motifs one is obliged to include. That doesn't
excuse creating a thoroughly unappealing protagonist, introducing an evil
alien race whose motivations never make any sense, or filling the script
with dialogue that could have come from a Random Cliche Generator. Not a
single line stuck in my head within minutes of leaving the theater; not a
single character relationship was explored with any care.
     Of course, it doesn't help that virtually every voice performance in
TITAN A.E. feels as though it were completed while the actor involved was
preoccupied with some other mundane task, like making dinner reservations,
or trying to get out of traffic. Damon's lackluster work is most evident,
but Pullman and Barrymore certainly give him a run for his money; even
Janeane Garofalo and Nathan Lane are wasted. Only John Leguizamo, as a
high-strung scientist/navigator on Korso's ship, seems at all interested
in creating a character, and he does so primarily by talking really fast
in a squeaky voice. There isn't a single moment in TITAN A.E. when a
performance feels directed. Bluth and co-director Gary Goldman appear to
have felt the actors had done their job if they read their lines without
stuttering.
     There's no question that TITAN A.E. is visually striking, and that
the action sequences are well-paced. There are two stunning flights of
fantasy in particular that briefly give the film a vivid sense of place: a
planet with a sea covered in plants that bloom as hovering balls of
hydrogen, and a nebula filled with massive reflective ice crystals. Both
effects are computer generated, and the mix of conventional animation and
CGI elements continues to push the boundaries of the form. But TITAN A.E. 
can't survive on its dazzle; it's too grim and mirthless to hold anyone's
interest as pure fantasy. This is one long, long 90 minute wait for us to
see whether Cale and his cohorts can save humanity. Do they save humanity? 
Who cares?

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
GODS AND MONSTERS
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Ian McKellen, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave.
Screenplay:  Bill Condon, based on the book "Father of Frankenstein" by
Christopher Pram.
Producers:  Paul Colichman, Gregg Fienberg and Mark R. Harris.
Director:  Bill Condon.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Ian McKellen -- who has already won two year-end critics' awards as
of this writing -- has a sinfully great time in GODS AND MONSTERS.  He
stars as James Whale, the director of 1930s horror classics like
FRANKENSTEIN and THE INVISIBLE MAN.  When we meet him in the film,
however, it is the late 1950s, a tough time to be an openly gay man even
in Hollywood.  Twenty years removed from his film-making peak and
suffering the after-effects of a stroke, Whale has been left to putter 
in his Los Angeles home, accompanied by his memories and housekeeper
Hannah (Lynn Redgrave).  That doesn't mean he won't try to seduce the
occasional film student who comes to interview him, or even new gardener
Clay Boone (Brendan Fraser).  Growling innuendo and wrapping his lips
around a cigar that's not just a cigar, McKellen fashions Whale early on
as a dirty old man with little left to embrace but his own lasciviousness.
     There's no question that McKellen's work is a great time...great
acting, not necessarily.  It is McKellen's misfortune that GODS AND
MONSTERS is the second film of 1998 in which an older gay man tries to woo
a young heterosexual.  The first was called LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND,
and starred John Hurt as the older man.  In every other way the characters
are completely dissimilar -- Hurt played a timid professor who had lived
his entire life as a straight husband, while McKellen takes on a
flamboyant artist utterly at ease with his lifestyle.  Hurt's was the more
difficult role, one in which a small man confronted upheaval and potential
humiliation; McKellen got a part full of punch lines and haunted 
recollections, the stuff actors turn into audition monologues.  James 
Whale isn't a role that requires a great performance.  It's a role that
requires an _entertaining_ performance.
     And entertaining it is, particularly in service of Whale's intriguing
biography.  That biography comes both in spoken recollections and
scattered flashbacks, revealing Whale's rise from impoverished youth to
soldier to stage designer to film director.  Writer/director Bill Condon
makes it evident that Whale's affinity for creating screen monsters was
born of sympathy, one outcast giving voice and soul to other outcasts.  He
even makes the sly suggestion that Whale was also the father of camp,
creating intentionally humorous films from horror stories as a sop to his
own amused sensibilities.  McKellen makes Whale far too inventive to be
pathetic, yet also shows him fighting with the shadow of his former self. 
As Whale's mind deteriorates, he becomes an ever-sadder figure, a living
relic who has begun thinking of himself in the same past tense others
think of him.
     But there's another character gobbling up chunks of screen time, and
that's Brendan Fraser as the wrong-side-of-the-tracks gardener.  Clay is
set up as a kindred spirit to Whale, another outcast from a disapproving
family who turns to sex when he needs to define himself.  It's a solid
enough performance by Fraser, but there's something trite about the entire
structure of Clay's friendship with Whale, nearly as trite as Lynn
Redgrave's fussy German housekeeper.  It reaches the point where the story 
actually appears to be about Clay, which is a big mistake.  McKellen's
performance may not be perfect, but it's still the best thing about GODS
AND MONSTERS.  It's not incredibly touching, and it's not incredibly
profound.  It is, however, quite a lot of fun for a while.  There are
worse places to cast your lot than with the year's second best performance
as an older gay man trying to woo a young heterosexual.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT
(DreamWorks)
Voices:  Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock,
Jeff Goldblum, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin, Martin Short.
Screenplay:  Philip LaZebnik.
Producers:  Penny Finkelman Cox and Sandra Rabins.
Directors:  Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner and Simon Wells.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There's precaution, and then there's what DreamWorks has done to
insure that THE PRINCE OF EGYPT would not become a lightning rod for
controversy.  Religious leaders were consulted on early drafts of the
script; word went forth that this would be a serious, respectful dramatic
film with no Disney-style animals for comic relief.  The film-makers even
attached an opening disclaimer about "artistic license" taken with the
story, which also referred viewers to the Book of Exodus for the Biblical
story of Moses.  The public relations message has been strong and
consistent:  befitting its subject matter, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT would be a
different sort of animated film.
     In some very important ways, that message was completely accurate.
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is a visually spectacular and impressively faithful
account of the first 14 chapters of Exodus, beginning with Moses' mother
placing him in a basket on the Nile to save him from Pharaoh's order to
slay Hebrew newborns.  The basket reaches the palace of the Pharaoh, where
Moses is found by the Queen (Helen Mirren) and raised as a brother to
Rameses, heir apparent to the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart).  As adults,
Moses (Val Kilmer) and Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) are close companions,
little concerned with the plight of Hebrew slaves.  That's before a chance
encounter with his birth sister Miriam (Sandra Bullock) informs Moses of
his true lineage, and sends him on a course which will set him against
Rameses as liberator of his people.
     Some viewers may be troubled by the fact that the key relationship in
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is that between Moses and Rameses, not that between
God and His chosen people.  While God is certainly present in the film,
the religious elements have been subsumed to the human elements.  The
result is still an extremely strong story of two men both troubled by
their destinies.  Moses laments when he realizes that his calling must
take him from his luxurious life as a prince, while Rameses struggles with
the mantle of leadership.  Rameses' character actually ends up the more
compelling of the two, with Ralph Fiennes giving expressive voice to the
ruler tormented by the fact that the only friend he has known has become
his only enemy.  It's a tricky element to introduce -- that we should care
about a personal tragedy in this tale of God's commitment to the Hebrews
-- but it works to give the film the feel of a mature drama rather than
just another animated fairy tale.
     With such a strong foundation, it becomes distracting when THE PRINCE
OF EGYPT adopts the rhythms and songs of a typical animated musical.
Stephen Schwartz's tunes are generally solid, but it becomes too easy to
think of the film as nothing special when the structure ventures into such
familiar territory.  There's no need for a Biblical epic to turn into "Les
Miserables," or the Old Testament equivalent of "Jesus Christ Superstar",
particularly when the images unaccompanied by music are so compelling.
The slaying of the Egyptians' newborns unfolds with a chilly silence; the
trek across the floor of the Red Sea is set against brief lightning-strike
illuminations of whale silhouettes behind walls of water.  There's enough
story to this story, and enough vision to the animation, not to require a
tune every 10 minutes.
     In a way, the inclusion of musical numbers could have been an attempt
to make THE PRINCE OF EGYPT a transitional form of feature animation.  It
was no surprise to find a screening audience filled with children; it was,
however, something of a surprise to notice them so engaged in such a
somber, challenging story.  Perhaps the songs, and the occasional flashes
of humor, served to ease younger viewers into something not so far removed
from the videos that line their parents' shelves.  DreamWorks tackled an
incredibly challenging task in THE PRINCE OF EGYPT, the task of turning
scripture into family entertainment.  It's about as successful a
conclusion to that task as I can imagine, one which combines tradition and
imagination into a powerful animated experience.

Title
Review for Walk on the Moon, A (1999)
A WALK ON THE MOON
(Miramax)
Starring:  Diane Lane, Liev Schreiber, Viggo Mortensen, Anna Paquin, Tovah
Feldshuh, Bobby Boriello.
Screenplay:  Pamela Gray.
Producers:  Dustin Hoffman, Tony Goldwyn, Jay Cohen, Neil Koenigsberg, Lee
Gottsegen and Murray Schisgal.
Director:  Tony Goldwyn.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, profanity, adult themes, drug
use)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A WALK ON THE MOON is a coming-of-age film, which may lead you to
expect the fetishizing of adolescent sexual experimentation; it's set
during 1969's Summer of Love -- and at Woodstock, no less -- which may
lead you to expect even more "Wonder Years"-esque navel-gazing than usual.
There are some pleasant surprises in A WALK ON THE MOON, actor Tony
Goldwyn's directing debut, but the most pleasant may be that it's mature.
Taking a unique perspective on that singularly revolutionizing American
summer, it's a simple, occasionally corny story with enough wisdom to
realize that comings-of-age don't happen exclusively to teenagers.
     In this case, it happens to Pearl Kantrowitz (Diane Lane), a married
Jewish mother of two living in New York City.  The Summer of '69 finds the
Kantrowitzes taking the same vacation to the same Catskills resort where
they vacation every summer, with Pearl's husband Marty (Liev Schreiber), a
television repairman, commuting from the city on weekends.  This summer
seems certain to be something different, however.  Pearl's daughter Alison
(Anna Paquin) is about to "become a woman," and the resort is abuzz with
the anticipation of the impending moon landing.  Most significantly, Pearl
becomes attracted to the resort's itinerant blouse salesman Walker Jerome
(Viggo Mortensen), and begins to wonder how she got so old so fast.
     Pearl's story is a particularly interesting one to set during a time
of social upheaval.  Obliged to surrender her youth when she got pregnant 
as a teenager, Pearl suddenly finds herself compelled to flirt with
youthful irresponsibility when it's a luxury she can no longer afford.
Surprisingly, screenwriter Pamela Gray doesn't celebrate Pearl's affair
with Walker as the action of a woman "finding herself," nor does she turn
Marty (nicely underplayed by Schreiber) into an easy scapegoat.  A WALK ON
THE MOON doesn't shy away from the self-absorption of a wife and mother
falling into the "if it feels good, do it" ethos of the time, embracing
instead the idea of facing one's difficult choices.  Though Gray
occasionally turns her subtext into overly melodramatic text (Alison: "You
had your chance to be the kid!"  Pearl: "No, I didn't!"), A WALK ON THE
MOON generally lets Diane Lane's solid performance bring out Pearl's
conflicts.
     Goldwyn also does a nice job of creating his 1960s Catskills milieu
as a distinct, amusing time and place.  The camp's never-seen public
address voice (an unbilled Julie Kavner) makes ubiquitous announcements,
including the onset of Alison's menstrual cycle; women play mah jongg at
outdoor card tables; the men compare boastful tales of how quickly they
managed to make the drive up from the city.  The portrayals do
occasionally drift into the stereotypical, notably Tovah Feldshuh as
Marty's predictably iron-willed, oy-spouting mother, but the characters
still maintain a sense of individuality even within their own world.  When
the throng of counterculture kids descends on this world for the
generation-defining concert -- including a quick skinny-dip in the camp's
private lake -- it provides a well-realized picture of the new freedom
that calls to Pearl.
     The only reason A WALK ON THE MOON feels awkward is that it fumbles
the sub-plot involving Alison's own adventures.  Gray and Goldwyn clearly
want Alison's experimentation to parallel that of her mother, but they
don't dive into Alison's character with nearly enough care.  They take a
half-hearted middle ground when one of the two extremes -- focusing
entirely on Pearl or making the two stories equally significant -- would
have been genuinely effective.  Alison's flirtations and rebellion end up
feeling token, her relationship with her mother never fully explored.
Fortunately, when A WALK ON THE MOON sticks with Pearl's growth --
including getting to know who her husband _really_ is for the first time
-- it's an appealing character study.  From its atmosphere to its acting,
it's a nicely grown-up story of growing up, not just physically but
emotionally.

Title
Review for Stealing Beauty (1996)
Starring:  Liv Tyler, Jeremy Irons, Sinead Cusack, Donal McCann, Rachel
Weisz, D. W. Moffett, Carlo Cecchi, Stefania Sandrelli, Roberto Zibetti.
Screenplay:  Susan Minot.
Director:  Bernardo Bertolucci.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Bernardo Bertolucci's STEALING BEAUTY opens with a point-of-view
video sequence focusing on the journey of 19-year-old American Lucy Harmon
(Liv Tyler) via plane and train to Tuscany.  As she steps off the train in
Tuscany, Lucy hears a man call to her, and sees a hand bearing a unique
bracelet drop the videotape he had just taken out a window of the train.
A bit of mystery is established:  who is the man in the bracelet, and why
was he following Lucy?  It is a clue to what is wrong with STEALING BEAUTY
that, though the man appears again, his behavior on the train is never
explained, or even addressed.  This is a film of false starts, dead ends
and pointless distractions which pays too little attention to what should
be its central premise.
     Tyler's Lucy is traveling abroad for a couple of very distinct
reasons, we learn.  Returning to the estate of sculptor Ian Grayson (Donal
McCann) and his wife Diana (Sinead Cusack), family friends with whom she
had vacationed five years earlier, virginal Lucy hopes to find the Italian
boy (Roberto Zibetti) who gave her her first kiss, perhaps to share
another first.  She also hopes to find the meaning behind the final entry
in her late mother's diary, which hints at a special connection to the
Graysons' place.  Lucy befriends several other guests at the Graysons',
including terminally ill author Alex Parrish (Jeremy Irons) and Diana's
free-spirited daughter Miranda (Rachel Weisz).
     They are not the only guests at the Grayson residence, which appears
to be a kind of expatriate artist's Hotel Algonquin.  Other regulars
include Noemi (Stefania Sandrelli), an advice-to-the-lovelorn columnist;
Richard (D. W. Moffett), an American entertainment lawyer and Miranda's
lover du jour; and M. Guillaume (Jean Marais), a slightly dotty old poet.
Most of them are given some kind of romantic sub-plot -- just enough, in
fact, to be genuinely annoying.  Bertolucci repeatedly cuts away in the
middle of a scene to an irrelevant tangent, or introduces characters for a
few superfluous moments.  In one scene, an army lieutenant (Leonardo
Treviglio) has his car break down near the Graysons, and ends up joining
them for dinner; in another, Lucy's dance with an older gentleman (Carlo
Cecchi) is interrupted by a drunken, jealous woman who promptly urinates
on the floor.
     All this activity might suggest that Bertolucci simply wants to revel
in the Bohemian lifestyle of the artistic types who populate the Grayson
estate, except that he plays Lucy's quest for her mother's past and the
illness of Irons' Alex so seriously.  It is as though he is afraid that
with all the drinking, dancing and baring of breasts going on, we in the
audience will forget that there are also Serious Issues to be addressed.
The problem is that it is always clear which of Lucy's two missions is of
greater interest to him, to the other characters in the film, and probably
to us.  There's nothing wrong with a simple, erotic coming-of-age story,
but Bertolucci appears to be embarrassed at the thought of making a film
which is about something as base as the loss of virginity.  Consequently,
he piles on the characters and the distracting editing to provide the
illusion of substance, when in fact he is ready to end his story as soon
as Lucy is de-flowered.
     It's truly a shame that Bertolucci was unwilling to focus on that one
story, because it provides a few touching moments.  Liv Tyler, who has
improved exponentially as an actor since her debut in SILENT FALL, is a
radiant presence at the center of the story.  She makes the best of the
sketchy relationship with her poet mother through her own abortive
attempts at verse, and shares some appealing scenes with Irons (in one of
his least mannered recent performances), including one where she reveals
her sexual inexperience.  That revelation finds its way to the other
guests, leading to an effective and poignant sequence in which Lucy, in an
attempt to convince everyone that she finally has a lover, picks up a
drunken young man at a party and makes a point of being seen kissing him
and taking him to her room, where she then watches him pass out in her
bed.  There are moments like that when Lucy is every bit as beguiling as
everyone in STEALING BEAUTY seems convinced that she is, but Bertolucci
still carries on as though he is above it all.  By trying to turn STEALING
BEAUTY into something deep, he muddles it.  He also makes that voyeuristic
opening video sequence all the more telling.  Instead of watching his
character's life unfold, he tries to catch it out of the corner of his
eye, without letting anyone else know that he's looking.

Title
Review for Fast, Cheap & Out of Control (1997)
     FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL may be the most reflexive film
experience of the year, as well as one of the richest.  As he did in
previous efforts like GATES OF HEAVEN and A BRIEF HISTORY OF TIME,
director Errol Morris charges the non-fiction film with a unique energy as
he celebrates the out-liers of American culture.  His subjects this time
around are four men who, at first glance, appear to have little in common.
Dave Hoover is a circus wild animal trainer; George Mendonca is a topiary
gardener; Rodney Brooks is a robotics engineer; Ray Mendez is an
entomologist studying the insect-like African mole rat.  For 85 minutes
Morris lets them speak passionately about their crafts, until you begin to
suspect that FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL is less about those four men
than it is about Morris himself.
     That's not to say that the four men are not interesting subjects.
Mendez proves to be the star of the bunch, an animated character in a
butterfly bow tie who discusses the mole rat with a delight transcending
scholarship; Brooks also offers his insights on artificial intelligence
with the wide-eyed, mad-scientist glee.  Yet Morris isn't necessarily
interested in painting detailed portraits of his four subjects.  Though he
shows each one at work for brief snippets, he eschews the traditional
documentary approach of following them around from minute to minute.
Frequently, he simply uses their voices to underscore stock footage, or
scenes unrelated to their specific occupations.  Morris teases with
darting images, forcing us to draw connections where connections aren't
obvious.  In so doing, he reveals the connection between the four men as
people who draw connections.  Each one sees something beyond the obvious
in his chosen field, applying unexected psychology to animals, plants and
even machines.  Each is both an explorer and (in the film's most frequent
motif) a circus performer -- they do what others would never think of
doing with an enviable singularity of purpose.
     The same sentiment could be applied to Morris himself.  Where most
documentarians seek to capture nobility or significance through big names
or big events, Morris peers into more obscure corners to find the beauty
in eccentricity; where most documentarians consider overtly "cinematic"
non-fiction works somehow tainted, Morris creates vivid visual tapestries
which should make Oliver Stone shake his head in embarrassment (and he
uses Stone's frequent cinematographer Robert Richardson, just to compound
the misery).  Simply put, Morris creates daring, captivating work in a
convention-bound genre.  Perhaps one could see FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF
CONTROL as self-congratulatory, if it weren't such a giddy, intellectual
thrill ride.  When Mendez shares the idea that "the other isn't something
to be feared, it's something to be explored...it's trying to figure out
the purpose that interests me," he could be speaking for the director, or
for any viewer ready to view the human circus through new eyes.

Title
Review for Kansas City (1996)
Starring:  Jennifer Jason Leigh, Miranda Richardson, Harry Belafonte,
Michael Murphy, Dermot Mulroney.
Screenplay:  Robert Altman, Frank Barhydt.
Director:  Robert Altman.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is a very risky think Robert Altman is attempting in KANSAS CITY,
but then Altman has never shied away from risk.  At the height of the
Vietnam War, he made the darkly anti-establishment MASH; he turned
free-form character study into the brilliant NASHVILLE; he made satires of
the very insider worlds of Hollywood film-making (THE PLAYER) and high
fashion (READY-TO-WEAR).  For the most part, however, those were risks in
subject matter.  In KANSAS CITY, Altman structures his narrative like an
improvisational jazz solo, with a payoff in the final ten minutes that is
a real kicker.  The question is whether he will have lost his audience in
the 100 minutes of riffes which precede it.
     KANSAS CITY takes place over the course of two days in the title city
in 1934 leading up to municipal elections, beginning with the kidnapping
of Carolyn Stilton (Miranda Richardson) by Blondie O'Hara (Jennifer Jason
Leigh).  Carolyn is the wife of Henry Stilton (Michael Murphy), a local
political leader Blondie believes can help her with a serious problem.  It
seems that her husband Johnny (Dermot Mulroney) made the mistake of
robbing a black gambler while wearing blackface, incurring the wrath of
black crime boss Seldom Seen (Harry Belafonte), and Blondie wants Henry to
do whatever is necessary to orchestrate Johnny's safe release.  With the
laudanum-addicted Carolyn as her hostage, Blondie moves through every
level of Kansas City society, waiting for the word which will bring her
Johnny marching home.
     Altman has a very specific image of Kansas City he is trying to get
across, and he accomplishes that task.  It is a city which seems to exist
outside of the time, with races mixing in jazz clubs, liquor flowing
freely despite Prohibition, prosperity still evidenty despite Depression.
It is also a city where the petty corruption of gambling and alcohol
exists side by side with the hard-core corruption of the brutal Democratic
political machine controlled by Tom Pendergast, and where violence was the
real law.  The soundtrack crackles with magnificent jazz tracks, a
constant underscore to brutatlity, and Altman grounds his story in the
city's real history by incorporating Pendergast and a young saxophone
player named Charlie Parker (Albert J. Burnes) into the events fo the
story.
     The product of those elements is a fusion of music, mood and plot in
which the latter often gets short shrift.  Altman has one of his typically
large casts to keep track of, and his shifts back and forth between them
seem to have little to do with pacing.  The encounters between Seldom Seen
and Johnny are basically a series of monologues in which Belafonte's
Seldom holds forth with his captive audience on race relations, the media,
his beloved jazz music and whatever other issue happens to strike his
fancy.  Those speeches are far from riveting -- once you get the point
that he is "seldom seen and often heard," Seldom's sociological
observations simply serve to stall KANSAS CITY.  The same is true of a
sub-plot involving Charlie Parker and a pregnant teen-ager (Ajia Mignon
Johnson) which eventually proves relevant but is largely distracting while
you are waiting.  Even the ostensible main plot, the relationship between
Blondie and Carolyn, is troublesome.  For a long time, it seems to be just
another example of the kind of film I criticized MANNY & LO for being, a
hostage drama in which captor and captive predictably become friends.
     Then, just as I was prepared to give KANSAS CITY up for dead, it
assaulted me with developments so unexpected that they left me breathless.
Suddenly, a performance by Jennifer Jason Leigh which had seemed like just
another one of her mannered stabs at imitating 1930s screen actresses
made beautiful, terrible sense; suddenly, Miranda Richardson's
opium-addled society dame was even funnier and more tragic; suddenly, the
Johnny who had been little more than a piece of furniture during Seldom's
speeches came to life.  After struggling through most of its running time,
KANSAS CITY heads for the finish line in a dead sprint.  The problem is
that by the time Altman begins his kick, he's nearly out of the race.
KANSAS CITY's tale of brutal truths beneath glossy surfaces is the polar
opposite of most of this summer's fare:  it is a film which works far
better when you are thinking about it afterwards than it does while you
are watching it.  I only hope audiences are willing to trust Altman the
risk-taker as long as it takes.

Title
Review for Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994)
Starring:  Jennifer Jason Leigh, Campbell Scott, Matthew Broderick.
Screenplay:  Alan Rudolph and Randy Sue Coburn.
Director:  Alan Rudolph.
     The collection of authors, journalists and performers who gathered
for lunches at New York's Hotel Algonquin in the 1920s are among those
peculiarly American individuals who are perhaps more famous for being
famous than for anything they actually said or did.  There is a great
historical disagreement as to who was there at any given time, to whom
certain famous quotes should be attributed, and even whether those
quotes were actually spoken.  More than anything, they became symbolic
of the kind of dissolute Jazz Age bon vivants immortalized by
Fitzgerald and Hemingway.  But who were they, really?  At least part of
that question is answered by MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE, an
uneven but still quite intriguing examination of the Algonquin Round
Table's most famous member.
     That individual was Dorothy Parker (Jennifer Jason Leigh), an
author and freelance critic who was renowned for her often caustic
theatrical reviews.  The film opens with Dorothy as a screenwriter in
1930s Hollywood, then flashes back to 1920s New York.  There Dorothy is
working for Vanity Fair with Robert Benchley (Campbell Scott), her
editor and close friend.  Her husband Edward (Andrew McCarthy) has a
war wound and a serious morphine addiction, and the marriage is far
from a happy one.  After Dorothy is fired from Vanity Fair and Benchley
quits in sympathy, they begin meeting with other journalists and
writers at the Algonquin.  Among those who join their company is
reporter Charles MacArthur (Matthew Broderick), with whom Dorothy has
an ill-fated affair which comes to define the tragedies of her life.
     Director and co-scripter Alan Rudolph is a disciple of Robert
Altman, and the mentor's style is as evident in MRS. PARKER as it has
ever been in Rudolph's work.  Altman's trademark overlapping dialogue
is particularly noteworthy, and it is one of Rudolph's most
questionable decisions.  The Round Table was defined by the volleys of
bon mots exchanged by its members, and while many clever lines come
through, nearly as many are drowned out by other conversation.  I often
caught uproarious laughter in response to a joke I hadn't heard.
     Now with the same breath that I knock Rudolph on practical
grounds, I must acknowledge that as an artistic choice, it is largely
successful.  Rudolph uses the interactions of these individuals to
demonstrate a superficiality which defined Dorothy Parker's world:
everyone at the table was too busy trying to be clever to pay much
attention to anything anyone else had to say.  "I write doo-dads,"
Parker comments in one scene, "because it's a doo-dad kind of town,"
and that remark speaks volumes about the Round Table regulars, and
perhaps even the Jazz Age as a whole.  As we watch Parker slip deeper
and deeper into depression, it becomes astonishing that none of her
so-called friends, with the exception of Benchley, ever seem to notice
or care.
     That relationship between Dorothy Parker and Robert Benchley is
the backbone of MRS. PARKER, and it is captured in dead-on performances
by Jennifer Jason Leigh and Campbell Scott.  Scott has played mostly
pretty-boy roles to date, but his Benchley is a complicated character,
a teetotaling homebody who is pulled to his eventual destruction by the
people around him.  Leigh's performance is stunning, though she does
affect a speech pattern that sounds like a gin-soaked variation on her
Stanwyck/Hepburn bit from THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, and she seemed to
swallow many of her lines.  It's a piece of work made all the more
challenging by the odd structure of the script, which has Leigh playing
Parker at several different phases of her life, as well as reading
selections from Parker's poetry directly to the camera.  She manages to
capture the soul of an extremely troubled survivor whose final line in
the film ("I can't believe I made it") is both comic and touching.  Her
performance *is* MRS. PARKER, and through all of Rudolph's fits and
starts I found that I actually felt I had met Dorothy Parker.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
DEEP IMPACT
(Paramount/DreamWorks)
Starring:  Tea Leoni, Robert Duvall, Morgan Freeman, Elijah Wood, Leelee
Sobieski, Vanessa Redgrave, Maximilian Schell.
Screenplay:  Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin.
Producers:  Richard D. Zanuck and David Brown.
Director:  Mimi Leder.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, intense scenes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If ever a film begged -- nay _pleaded_ -- to be a mini-series, that
film is DEEP IMPACT.  The first of this year's Large Celestial Object on a
Collision Course with Earth films (soon to be followed by ARMAGEDDON)
begins with the discovery of a comet which appears to be heading straight
for us.  Flash forward a year to an ambitious young MSNBC reporter named
Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) who stumbles onto the story which the government
has kept under wraps for fear of causing a panic.  The President of the
United States (Morgan Freeman) finally makes the comet's existence public
at the same time he announces a plan to send an experimental spacecraft
called the Messiah on a mission to deflect the comet from its trajectory.
Flash forward another few months to the Messiah crew, including retired
astronaut Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall) completing their mission with
less than ideal success.  Flash forward another few months as a plan to
save humanity by hiding a million people in underground caves is set in
motion.
     That's enough flashing to give you the disorienting sensation of
sitting through a cinematic strobe light.  DEEP IMPACT wants to be a
heroic disaster epic, examining the effect of impending devastation on
individual people and their relationships, but that can only happen if we
get to know the characters a little.  Every one of DEEP IMPACT's sub-plots
feels forced into a chunk of time far too small to do it justice.  The
central romance, involving a pair of high school sweethearts (Elijah Wood
and Leelee Sobieski), makes the leap from tentative hand-holding to
marriage without a single moment of conversation between them, deadening
every supposedly emotional scene.  Leoni's problems with her divorced
parents (Vanessa Redgrave and Maximilian Schell) and the interpersonal
dynamics of the Messiah crew members suffer a similar fate, straining for
an audience response strictly on the basis of composer James Horner's
over-wrought orchestrations.  In fact, it often seems as though every bit
of character interaction has been edited out of DEEP IMPACT except the
tear-filled separations and reunions, leaving little more than a hollow
succession of musical cues.
     That may not be a tremendous surprise when you're dealing with a
big-budget disaster film.  What should come as a surprise is DEEP IMPACT's
disappointing lack of visual energy.  This is one sedate blockbuster,
offering one invigorating set piece of the Messiah mission before settling
into a dull march towards five minutes of destruction.  Every other
opportunity to dazzle is either turned into exposition or ignored
entirely.  The comet's separation into two fragments is explained by the
President using a simple computer graphic, but never depicted; ditto for
an attempted missile strike on the comet.  We never even get to see the
massive underground Ark after a huge narrative build-up.  DEEP IMPACT is
so bereft of spectacle and detail that it's never possible to grasp the
immensity of the impending tragedy, or watch a year of mounting dread
unfold.  In fact, I can't imagine a more absurdly optimistic portrayal of
human reaction to the coming Apocalypse, with the isolated traffic jam and
a few fires being the only intrusion on a general response of beatific
acceptance.  It may be the end of the world as they know it, but they feel
fine.
     DEEP IMPACT boasts such a talented cast -- Duvall, Freeman, Redgrave,
Schell, Charles Martin Smith, James Cromwell -- that occasionally it feels
weightier than the script deserves.  Mimi Leder's direction also offers a
few effective moments, including a montage of reaction shots which
provides more insight than all the dialogue combined.  Most of the time,
however, DEEP IMPACT feels like six hours of raw footage hacked to ribbons
to meet the imperatives of feature film length.  It's not exactly a bad
film; it's just about one-third of an acceptably engrossing one.  If you
want to do justice to an Extinction Level Event, you need the 366 minutes
of 1994's television adaptation of Stephen King's THE STAND.  DEEP
IMPACT's 115 minutes manage to turn a comet strike into a moderate
inconvenience.

Title
Review for Silent Fall (1994)
Starring:  Richard Dreyfuss, Liv Tyler, J. T. Walsh, Ben Faulkner,
Linda Hamilton, John Lithgow.
Screenplay:  Akiva Goldsman.
Director:  Bruce Beresford.
     If you have not already done so, please add to your list of movie
cliches the "psychiatrist/psychologist who is as screwed up as anyone
he/she is treating."  While some might argue (and suicide statistics
might support) that this is a case of art imitating life, it is
becoming far too predictable to toss a psychiatrist with personal
demons into a suspense plot as flavoring; they are the MSG of the
psychological thriller.  Surely there's a happy, well- adjusted shrink
out there somewhere.  Well, not in SILENT FALL, and the inclusion of
that tired standby is just one of the many, many things wrong with this
good-looking but gimmicky thriller.
     The psychiatrist is Dr. Jake Rainer (Richard Dreyfuss), an expert
in autism who has given up his treatment of children in the wake of a
patient's death.  He is called in by the local sheriff (J. T. Walsh)
when the only witness to the murder of a prominent couple appears to be
their autistic son Tim (Ben Faulkner).  With the assistance of Tim's
sister Sylvie (Liv Tyler), Jake attempts to reconstruct what happened
the night of the murders before Tim is turned over to a less
compassionate psychiatrist (John Lithgow) for more radical treatment.
Their best shot:  Tim's uncanny ability to remember and mimic
conversations.
     I don't think I'm breaking any new ground when I say that Richard
Dreyfuss, talented though he may be, is a ham.  And if there is
anything more unintentionally amusing than watching a ham act, it is
watching him try desperately *not* to be a ham.  In SILENT FALL,
director Bruce Beresford has Dreyfuss wandering around in a daze of
what is supposed to be self-pity, but instead looks mostly like a
particularly bad Hamlet.  In the one scene where Dreyfuss plays
Dreyfuss, rattling off multiple voices in an attempt to calm Tim, it's
almost a relief.  Unfortunately, that is the level at which Beresford
has everyone pitch the performances; you only know they're alive
because they blink.  Linda Hamilton, energetic star of the TERMINATOR
films, has the appallingly under-written role of Jake's
oh-so-supportive wife, who struggles with dialogue like, "You're the
one hiding from the world, Jake."  Liv Tyler (daughter of Aerosmith's
Steven Tyler in her first major role) is lovely, but lacks any screen
presence, and her big emotional scenes are truly laughable.  From start
to finish, SILENT FALL is just so sluggish that I felt I was being
hypnotized.
     It's even harder to stay awake once you realize the preposterous
story that you are being asked to swallow.  First of all, no one from
social services ever appears to guard Tim's interests, allowing the
sheriff to treat him like a narcotics dog, expected to sniff out the
murderer.  Tim and Sylvie are allowed to return to their house,
disturbing a crime scene of an investigation in progress.  Most
ridiculous of all is Tim's special talent, and not so much because it's
impossible to believe his tape-recorder memory.  Rather, it is the
mimicked voices dubbed over Tim's lips which cross the line into
silliness, and every time they are used they just get sillier.
     Of course, a fundamental problem with SILENT FALL is that it's a
mystery where everyone seems too stupid to figure out the obvious.
Ultimately there are only three suspects in SILENT FALL, and it tips
its hand far too soon.  What pass for attempts at diverting attention
from the only real suspect fail miserably, and SILENT FALL is left to
fall back on the developing relationship between Jake and Tim for any
drama.  While there are moments in that relationship which work quite
well, they lead to the film's single most infuriating scene, a miracle
cure for Tim at a crucial moment.  For a film that wants to appear
serious in its treatment of a perplexing medical condition, it traffics
in solutions which are far too pat, and acts as a slap in the face to
everyone who has ever had to live with autistic individuals by
suggesting that all it takes to bring them out of it is just a little
more love.  And maybe the violent death of one or two family members.

Title
Review for Ed's Next Move (1996)
     I know that Americans love an underdog, but really...enough already.
It has gotten to the point in the marketing of independent films where
selling the meagerness of the budget and the film-makers' sacrifices in
getting their pet projects made has turned into a kind of bizarre
one-downmanship.  If your guy made his movie for $20,000, our guy made his
for $15,000; if your guy financed his movie with Visa cards, our guy sold
one of his kidneys to pay the caterer.  It is tempting to sell the
compelling story behind the movie (particularly if you arc concerned about
whether there is a compelling story _in_ the movie), but I believe that
there are negative consequences to turning every independent film-maker to
come down the pike into Horatio Alger.  These young directors are
experiencing success, but it is success with an asterisk, because the
audiences have been asked to appreciate their work not on its merit but
because they worked so darned hard.
     Take ED'S NEXT MOVE, for example.  Written and directed by newcomer
John Walsh, it is the story of Eddie Brodsky (Matt Ross), a Wisconsin
chemist who decides to take a big step when his long-time girlfriend
(Cathy Curtin) dumps him:  moving to New York to take a job in a genetic
engineering lab.  The big city is daunting, but Eddie begins to adjust
once he finds an apartment -- and a roommate named Ray (Kevin Carroll) --
and begins to get into a routine.  The one thing missing is a romantic
relationship, a special someone like Lee (Callie Thorne), a musician Eddie
keeps running into.  When he finally gets up the nerve to ask her out.  He
finds the road to true love is complicated by boyfriends, mousetraps, the
common cold and the double-edged sword of being a Nice Guy.
     ED'S NEXT MOVE is a perfectly pleasant little romantic comedy, an
unassuming and unpretentious character study which makes more than a
casual not to ANNIE HALL.  Walsh has fashioned an outsider's-eye-view
valentine to New York's idiosyncracies the way Allen fashions
insider's-eye-view valentines, and both films find neurosis getting in the
way of a potential romance; Walsh even cribs from ANNIE HALL's more
surreal moments, like a scene with translators interpreting the 
conversation in which Anne breaks up with Eddie which recalls ANNIE HALL'S
sub-titles scene.  Still, there is an appealing performance by Matt Ross
as a smart, likeable protagonist who, blessedly, is not a self-absorbed
aspiring artist of some sort like so many indie film protagonists, and
solid supporting work from Kevin Carroll as a ladies' man who is not a
stereotypical jerk.  Although Walsh provides few laugh-out-loud moments,
he also doesn't seem wrapped up in showing off his own cleverness, and the
result is a comedy which makes you feel comfortable.
     And that is about all it does.  There is a place for entertainments
like ED'S NEXT MOVE, and you could spend your seven dollars at the movies
in far worse ways, but it would not surprise me to see a rush to anoint
Walsh as the next Edward (THE BROTHERS McMULLEN) Burns or Kevin (CLERKS)
Smith.  Of course, we saw how short the honeymoon was for those two after
SHE'S THE ONE and MALLRATS, respectively.  There is a disturbing tendency
among critics (and yes, I include myself among them) to treat an
independent film like a high school play, where it is considered a great
show if everyone remembers their lines and no one trips over the set.  The
thing is that those high school actors and directors turn into college
actors and directors, and mere competence suddenly isn't quite as cute.
     Getting a film made -- independent or otherwise -- is a brutal
business, but a film is no more or less worthy of praise because it was a
labor of love.  ED'S NEXT MOVE has several things going for it, notably
young characters who have some ambition and common sense, but Walsh shows
no particular facility with a camera, and his story has virtually nothing
going on beneath its agreeable surface.  Basically, it is an amusing bit
of fluff which is quite similar to other bits of fluff you have seen
before, one which promises and delivers little more than a few inoffensive
smiles.  It is the independent film world's fickle romance with starving
artists which starts making promises which John Walsh and other young
directors -- armed a couple of years later with more money but the same
amount of talent -- might find themselves unable to keep.

Title
Review for Murder at 1600 (1997)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Wesley Snipes, Diane Lane, Alan Alda, Daniel Benzali, Ronny
Cox, Dennis Miller.
Screenplay:  Wayne Beach and David Hodgin.
Producer:  Arnold Kopelson and Arnon Milchan.
Director:  Dwight Little.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When I first saw MURDER AT 1600 on the release schedule, I was hoping
against hope that it was about a crime on board a low-flying aircraft.  No
such luck...MURDER AT 1600 is yet another in the long line of recent films
(SHADOW CONSPIRACY, MY FELLOW AMERICANS, ABSOLUTE POWER) which have turned
the White House into cinema's reigning repository of all things dark,
sinister and/or lascivious.  It's not that some of that building's 
residents haven't done a good job of that on their own, at least according
to the juicier innuendo, but come on already.  One Oliver Stone film a
year is enough without every suspense hack to come down the pike throwing
an army of sinister Secret Service agents and megalomaniacal policy wonks
at some poor sucker every six to eight weeks.
     In MURDER AT 1600, the poor sucker is Harlan Regis (Wesley Snipes) a
Washington D.C. homicide detective assigned to the case when a young
female White House staffer is found stabbed to death in a bathroom.  It's
instantly obvious that the White House security, led by Nick Spikings
(Daniel Benzali), is covering something up, but it's not clear what, or
whether Secret Service liaison Nina Chance (Diane Lane) is around to help
Regis or hinder him.  It would be telling to reveal the plot behind the
murder, but naturally it's more complicated than we or Regis initially
believe, and involves a more far-reaching conspiracy.
     I've said before that I'm not a big believer in conspiracy theories,
but that's not why I think most films about conspiracy theories are so
mediocre at best.  Screenwriters Wayne Beach and David Hodgin aren't
interested in creating characters -- Regis and Chance each have one hobby,
as though that defined a personality -- and it's fairly obvious why.  The
conspiracy _is_ the central character in films like this, with the actors
merely running around to achieve dastardly ends or to thwart them.  A film
isn't "important" just because it shows people in power abusing that
power, but the film-makers behave as though the seriousness of their
subject matter should be enough to satisfy the audience.  Worse still,
they behave as though no one else had ever thought of the idea.
     That leaves actors stranded in parts that are as lively as the
miniature figurines Snipes' Detective Regis sets up in recreations of the
Battle of Bull Run.  Snipes is a likeable enough performer, but he is not
doing himself any favors by adding this film to a string of lumbering
action duds like DROP ZONE and MONEY TRAIN.  When a role makes you smart
enough to save the government but stupid enough to walk up to a suicidal,
gun-wielding lunatic and start chatting about your bureaucratic pet
peeves, it's time to use the script for something useful like smacking
your agent in the head.  Daniel Benzali and Alan Alda have more to do with
the heavy roles, but they're just as stranded; Dennis Miller's snarky
sarcasm as Snipes' partner is more a comment on the quality of the film
than anything going on in the film; TV pundit John McLaughlin looks
delighted at the prospect of earning his SAG card for his 100th cameo
appearance.  MURDER AT 1600 is full of paycheck parts, and the cast
doesn't dignify them with anything more than paycheck performances.
     MURDER AT 1600 might have been at least a moderately diverting
thriller if director Dwight Little (RAPID FIRE, MARKED FOR DEATH) had
included a few...well, thrills.  It's a startlingly suspenseless suspense
thriller Little has cobbled together, with drawn-out chase scenes and
shoot-outs which create a lot more noise than tension.  By the time our
heroes begin their invasion of the White House through the underground
tunnel system -- which gets so much pedestrian traffic in these films that
there ought to be a hot dog cart and a souvenir shop -- the audience
probably won't care very much who is responsible for the film's central
crime.  If you've never seen one of these films before, you might get a
buzz out of seeing the mighty brought low.  Some of us have been on this
particular White House tour too many times to find anything interesting
about one more secret meeting in the Oval Office or one more clandestine
rendezvous in the Lincoln Bedroom.

Title
Review for Eraser (1996)
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, James Caan, Vanessa Williams, Robert
Pastorelli.
Screenplay:  Tony Puryear, Walon Green.
Director:  Charles Russell.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     ERASER is a strange case this summer.  Here is an Arnold
Schwarzenegger action film, carrying an estimated $80 million price tag,
recently in entertainment headlines for last-minute digital work required
to change the name of the company in the film due to a legal
challenge...and hardly anyone seems to be talking about it.  In a movie
season where marketing has attempted to turn every subsequent blockbuster
into a pop culture happening, ERASER seems to be just another supporting
player; it is even sharing its release date with Disney's latest animated
fiscal printing press THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME.  Arnold seems to have
managed the heretofore unthinkable feat of becoming unobtrusive.  The
result might be an absence of overly high expectations, which can only
work in ERASER's favor.  It's generic Schwarzeneggerian action fare which
almost manages to seem quaint in its cartoonish basic-ness.
     Schwarzenegger plays John Kruger, a U. S. Marshal working for the
Federal Witness Protection Program whose specialty is staging the deaths
of his charges to keep them safe -- hence his code name "Eraser."  His
latest case is Lee Cullen (Vanessa Williams), an employee at defense
contractor Cyrez who has agreed to obtain proof that the company is
involved in the sale of experimental weaponry on the black market.  What
Kruger is soon to realize is that even government officials are involved
in the operation, perhaps including his own mentor Robert Deguerin (James
Caan).  But it is Kruger himself who is set up as a traitor, and forced to
keep both himself and Lee alive.  With no one he can trust except his
other re-located witnesses, including mob stool pigeon Johnny Casteleone
(Robert Pastorelli), Kruger must find proof of his own innocence as he
tries to stop the gun-runners.
     ERASER is pretty much everything you've come to expect from a
Schwarzenegger action vehicle:  impossible odds, explosions, predictable
and groan-inducing one-liners (if you can't tell me what precedes the line
"They had to catch a train," please sign up for Remedial Arnie-isms), big
cool guns, and big cool Arnie firing them with abandon.  Director Charles
Russell (THE MASK) leaps right into the action with scarcely a breath, and
for the next 100 minutes seems blissfully concerned with little else.  It
is as though he were saying to the audience, "I've given you a good guy
and some bad guys -- you know how it's going to end, now enjoy the ride."
     And in spurts, it's actually possible to do so.  During one
marvelously sill twenty minute stretch, Schwarzenegger leaps from a plane
to catch up with a parachute he has already thrown out of it, faces down
the same plane while still floating through the air, crash lands in a
junkyard, appropriates a truck, races to a zoo and ends up battling with
villainous Feds _and_ digitally-created alligators.  In those scenes,
ERASER is pure mindless fun in the best sense of the term, but those
scenes are also somewhat isolated.  There is a surprising grimness to much
of ERASER, including two separate incidents where Kruger takes an
excruciatingly long time to remove a piece of shrapnel from his flesh, and
Schwarzenegger himself is overly somber in much of his performance,
brooding over a Dark Past to which we are not made privy.  These token
attempts by Russell and his screenplay-by-committee team to make
Schwarzenegger more vulnerable and human demonstrate a real
misunderstanding of his appeal.  Audiences come to see Schwarzenegger the
super-hero, and to laugh along with his awareness of the absurd situations
in his action films; he is the master of the catch phrase because they are
winking distillations of those absurdities.  There are far too few
opportunities to laugh in ERASER, except those provided by Robert
Pastorelli as the motor-mouthed wiseguy who becomes Kruger's assistant.
     The irony of ERASER is that it turns its greatest asset into a
weakness.  In a season filled with films which seem to be playing hyped-up
games of "Can You Top This?" with their visual effects and decibel levels,
ERASER provides an odd familiarity -- it's just li'l ol' Arnie, playing
hero and making the world safe for democracy.  Unfortunately, ERASER just
rests on its familiarity, providing a bland villain (Caan playing Sonny
Corleone as a turn-coat G-Man), a bland heroine (Vanessa Williams running
and serving up the occasional "I-am-woman-watch-me-kick-a-little-ass" bit
of crowd-pleasing) and a finale which is truly anti-climactic.  ERASER
manages a few solidly entertaining moments, and serves up the kind of
meat-and-potatoes action Schwarzenegger's fans have come to expect.  It
also is a film which spends a lot of time shuffling its feet, and it will
be interesting to see how audiences respond to a blockbuster which seems
to be saying, "Don't mind me."

Title
Review for Chill Factor (1999)
     For nearly 15 minutes, CHILL FACTOR actually warrants comparison to
the film it tries so hard to bring to mind.  The sequence occurs on a
switchback section of highway, where our protagonists -- Mason (Skeet
Ulrich) and Arlo (Cuba Gooding Jr.) -- are trying to escape our villains
-- a military unit headed by renegade army man Maj. Andrew Brynner (Peter
Firth).  Mason is trying to get a dangerous and volatile chemical
defoliant known as "Elvis," which must be kept below 50 degrees to avoid a
deadly explosion, to a military base, and has commandeered ice cream
delivery driver Arlo's truck for the job; Brynner wants to auction the
weapon to the highest foreign bidder.  As the wreck of a truck rattles
along the two-lane highway, the passengers must contend with members of
Brynner's team jumping on board, a blown-out section of blacktop over a
precipitous fall, and close-encounters with other vehicles.  For 15
minutes, it's almost SPEED with a thermometer instead of a spedometer.
     During that 15 minute chunk of the film, director Hugh Johnson does
everything an action film director needs to do, offering plenty of close
calls and nervous laughter.  Unfortunately, those 15 minutes occur smack
in the middle of the film, between 45 minutes of excruciating introductory
exposition and 45 minutes of alternatingly absurd and tedious conclusion.
The burst of action seems like it's going to be the payoff for sitting
through one of the longest, least interesting prologues to an action film
_ever_, a prologue which lays out Brynner's feud with "Elvis's" creator
(David Paymer) in exhaustive detail.  Then, almost before you get a chance
to enjoy the few thrills CHILL FACTOR can provide, it sends Mason and Arlo
on a leisurely paddle down the river so they can bond over their past
mistakes.  And it's all downstream from there.
     It might have been at least remotely worth sitting through all that
exposition if the characters or performances hadn't made you want everyone
involved to end up chemically defoliated.  Cuba Gooding Jr. is rapidly
turning into one of the most aggravating Oscar-winning actors in history,
a one-note performer who widens his eyes and tightens his jaw to express
practically every emotion (the direction of the corners of his mouth is
the only hint as to his mood).  His work in CHILL FACTOR borders on the
embarrassing, a frantic collection of over-the-top reactions that would
make Martin Lawrence and Chris Tucker blush.  Skeet Ulrich could only hope
to register an emotion of any kind, using a flat delivery for even flatter
lines.  And Colin Firth squints and rasps his way through the villain
role, never quite sure whether he should be a moustache-twirling melodrama
baddie or tormented soldier with shattered patriotism.
     The absence of a sympathetic hero and solid villain damage an action
film, but they're not always fatal.  It can even get away with ridiculous
plot developments, like the idea that a toxic chemical gas could be
contained inside a traffic tunnel by blowing up both sides of the tunnel
(creating the ever-effective pile-of-rubble vacuum seal).  But there is no
way an action film can get away with so little action.  CHILL FACTOR just
sits there, inert, for nearly its entire running time, even forgetting
during its best moments to remind us of the status of its key plot
element's rising temperature.  It's hard to believe that a film this
weightless would waste so much time on setting up the premise, then never
exploit the premise.  If you want to want to imagine CHILL FACTOR -- and
imagine why it's not even worth the time of a true-blue action fan --
think of SPEED, with 90 minutes of the film set at a bus stop.

Title
Review for Price Above Rubies, A (1998)
     At the 1998 Sundance Film Festival, writer/director Boaz Yakin
commented that A PRICE ABOVE RUBIES isn't so much specifically about life
in the Hasidic Jewish community as it is about "being an individual in any
society where conformity and tradition dominate."  The story could just as
easily have taken place in the Amish country, apparently, or in any other
highly conservative culture.  Why, our ambitious, determined heroine Sonia
Horowitz (Renee Zellweger) might have been Sonia Smith if the mood had
struck him, or Sonia Gomez.
     In a cinematic era of hot air and gimmickry, it's hard to fault a
film-maker when he's trying to tell a story _about_ something.
Unfortunately for Yakin, beginning with a theme doesn't work when the
cultural atmosphere is as crucial to a story as Hasidic Judaism is to A
PRICE ABOVE RUBIES.  The narrative follows wife and mother Sonia as she
struggles to express her passions -- for sexuality, for a career in the
jewelry business -- in a world where the highest passion is expected to be
reserved for God.  Though her husband Mendel (Glen Fitzgerald) is a decent
and holy man, she finds herself caught up in affairs with her
brother-in-law Sender (Christopher Eccleston) and a Puerto Rican artist
(Allen Payne), facing the unimaginable fate of complete exclusion from her
community.
     It's an intriguing story, told by Yakin with an aura of mysticism as
Sonia frequently converses with a mysterious homeless woman (Kathleen
Chalfant) and the spirit of her dead brother Yossi (Shelton Dane).  You
can feel the world shifting constantly within her, conveyed through the
naked emotionalism of Zellweger's performance.  The world around her,
however, never seems to be a real place of strictures and conventions.
It's a movie set with costumes and props, into which Sonia might just as
well have been dropped like an alien into a Spielbergian American suburb.
Yakin commits himself so thoroughly to making Sonia a genuinely complex
character that he doesn't take the time to fill in the background.
     It certainly doesn't help that some of the blind-to-a-fault casting
stretches credulity to the breaking point.  British actor Christopher
Eccleston chews on his New Yawk accent as though he were about to blow a
bubble with it, while creating a borderline melodramatic rendition of
manipulative villainy.  Zellweger, meanwhile, throws her heart and soul
into Sonia but can't quite turn rural Texan into New York Jew.  If you
want to distill what doesn't work in A PRICE ABOVE RUBIES into two words,
try to imagine Renee Zellweger convincingly uttering the magic words, "Oy
gevalt."
     A PRICE ABOVE RUBIES is the sort of sincere, well-meaning movie which
makes you feel vaguely guilty for not liking it more, since it is never
sincere and well-meaning in that ponderous, self-righteous way which
characterizes so many Hollywood "issue" dramas.  There are some wonderful
touches to enjoy, notably an insinuating score by Lesley Barber, which
complement Yakin's patient narrative development.  Sonia's story of
self-actualization is bound to resonate with some viewers, because it is
both heartfelt and honest.  But while Yakin manages to make the film feel
honest, he doesn't make it feel _true_.  Without the richness of a
fully-realized society as a foundation for character study, A PRICE ABOVE
RUBIES essentially offers solid actors in an under-stated tolerance
lecture.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
     In this summer of uniquely adult suspense fare like THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT and THE SIXTH SENSE, THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE initially seems like a
promising companion piece.  Writer/director Rand Ravich's tale begins with
blissfully happy couple Spencer Armacost (Johnny Depp) and his wife
Jillian (Charlize Theron) sharing a tender moment before Spencer's latest
mission as a shuttle astronaut.  That mission goes awry, however, sending
Spencer and a fellow astronaut home unconscious after an unexplained
communications failure during a spacewalk.  Both men initially seem to
come through the experience fine, but Jillian slowly begins to sense
something amiss with Spencer after they move to New York City.  She's even
more troubled once she becomes pregnant with twins, and a former
colleague of Spencer's (Joe Morton) shows up with some disturbing
information.
     There's certainly an aura of familiarity to the story, but that
almost seems to work for the build-up of suspense.  Charlize Theron's Mia
Farrow-circa-ROSEMARY'S BABY hairstyle hardly seems coincidental, much
like the mere casting of Theron after THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE (Theron
characters clearly need to stop moving to New York, encountering sinister
forces and going insane).  Everything about THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE aims for
an ever-growing sense of menace -- Ravich's odd camera angles, time-lapses
and slow motions; cinematographer Allen Daviau's murky photography;
production designer Jan Roelfs' sterile interiors.  Technically, there's a
lot to like about THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE and the way it keeps a viewer
unsteady and uneasy.
     As a narrative however, nearly everything seems just ever-so-slightly
off.  The film feels like it starts too late, eventually revealing crucial
pieces of Armacost family history that really should have been shown to
us. Individual scenes flow smoothly, but the transitions between them are
awkward and abrupt.  Characters who seem like they should play a much more
significant role flit in and out of the story inconsistently.  Ravich
doesn't seem entirely in control of the pace, letting the film ooze along
eerily without ever knowing where to crank it up or tone it down.  The
familiar "devil inside" plot elements are played deadly straight, creating
the impression that Ravich is taking his story far too seriously.  Even
the key moments of exposition drift by so deliberately they're gone before
you have a chance to register that they might be important.  THE 
ASTRONAUT'S WIFE spends 106 minutes convincing you that it's just about to
turn into something compelling, then never does.
     The performances and characters are certainly a significant part of
the problem.  Like the rest of the story, the characters feel incomplete.
Depp plays the post-close encounter Spencer with a disquieting flatness,
but we see too little of Spencer the good guy to make the transition
unsettling.  Theron has already proven in THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE that she
knows how to play frantic and tormented, but again there's a back-story
missing from her performance (though it's dropped into the dialogue).
Even the usually reliable Joe Morton is left adrift when his NASA
operative turns up as an unshaven wacko with no sense of how he became
one.  Ravich keeps building THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE as though the plight of
the characters is going to elevate the genre story, when ultimately the
characters don't mean a thing.
     I must admit that I was startled to find THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE
remotely watchable when it appeared without preview screenings.  The look
of the film is nearly enough, combined with Theron's haunted stares, to
make it linger in your head for a while.  It just doesn't deliver on the
most basic level, leaving you itchy and unsatisfied as though you had just
watched a film that wasn't quite finished yet.  There are too many other,
better choices for viewers who want a little substance with their chills.
After you get through admiring the style of THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE, all
you're left with is a lot of empty space.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
THE STORY OF US
(Universal)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rob Reiner, Rita Wilston, Paul
Reiser, Tim Matheson.
Screenplay:  Alan Zweibel and Jessie Nelson.
Producers:  Rob Reiner, Alan Zweibel and Jessie Nelson.
Director:  Rob Reiner.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  92 min.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As THE STORY OF US nears its conclusion, Katie Jordan (Michelle
Pfeiffer) finally breaks down.  Katie, a detail-oriented crossword puzzle
creator, and her husband Ben (Bruce Willis), a free-spirited writer, have
spent the summer in a trial separation while their two kids are away at
camp, trying to determine whether their 15-year marriage is worth saving.
Finally, the tense meetings and what's-best-for-the-children 
rationalizations dissolve into tears as Katie rants for several minutes
about everything that has been right and wrong with their relationship,
and about the history they share.  It is a wonderfully affecting moment,
beautifully performed by Pfeiffer with all the love and frustration that
makes up a marriage.  It's a moment that can't help but bring mist to the
eyes of anyone who has known that love and those frustrations.
     It's also a moment that is a complete cheat.  Theoretically, THE
STORY OF US is the story of how easy it is, in the middle of all the white
noise and tension of everyday life, to lose track of why you fell in love
with someone in the first place.  Unfortunately, it's such a fragmented
narrative that it's just as easy for the _audience_ to lose track of why
they fell in love in the first place.  The script by Alan Zweibel and
Jessie Nelson sprinkles flashbacks through the summer of the Jordan's
separation -- a peek at their meeting and first date here, an interrupted
dalliance on the butcher block there -- but there aren't nearly enough of
them.  THE STORY OF US spends virtually all its time showing us the
relationship already in trouble, making it incredibly difficult to
appreciate what made the relationship good in the first place.  We're
asked to invest ourselves emotionally in the success or failure of the
Jordans' marriage without getting enough evidence that it should succeed.
     It's even more frustrating to realize that THE STORY OF US is so
solid at its core that it could have been wonderful.  The film is not
always a pleasant experience, showing off some extremely unfair fighting
between its protagonists and the wrenching moments when emotional damage
seems beyond repair.  Willis and Pfeiffer deftly turn their
post-separation scenes into awkward shuffles between longing and despair;
where most films treat divorce either as all-acrimony or all-indifference,
this one captures how much people want it all to work out.  But at only 92
minutes, THE STORY OF US feels bereft of context.  Somewhere on the
cutting room floor is the arc of a relationshp from affection to simple
coexistence to a blur of petty bickering.
     If only more of the so-called humor had found its way to the same
floor.  Along for comic relief are some usually reliable performers --
director Rob Reiner as Stan, Ben's best friend; Rita Wilson as Rachel, 
Katie's best friend and Stan's wife; Paul Reiser as Ben's agent -- who
wind up stuck with painfully un-funny material.  Wilson rants about how
men never change the toilet paper roll, a gag that hasn't gotten any
fresher since it was generated by bad stand-up comics 20 years ago.
Reiner waxes philosophical about how "there is no ass, just the fleshy
tops of your legs."  Reiser spends five minutes degrading an idea for a
book about Ben's grandparents, inspiring only stony silence from the
audience.  Reiner and his writers keep trying so hard to lighten the mood
they only end up breaking it, with little to show for their efforts but a
few half-hearted chuckles.
     It's easy to see the comedy as part of Reiner's attempt to create a
companion piece to his 1989 gem WHEN HARRY MET SALLY.  With its direct
addresses to the camera and hairdo-change time lapses, THE STORY OF US
does sometimes feel like WHEN HARRY LEFT SALLY.  Yet while this film was
unlikely to be as purely entertaining, it could have been far more
resonant.  Some of the individual scenes in THE STORY OF US are
heartbreaking, and a few are truly charming.  They just never quite add up
to the story of them in a way that provides real catharsis.  Just before
Katie's big emotional scene, we get a 60-second montage of hights and lows 
from a 15-year marriage.  It's easy to understand why those snippets would
move Katie to tears; after all, she lived those moments.  THE STORY OF US
could have moved us all if only we'd been allowed to live them, too.

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
AN IDEAL HUSBAND
(Miramax)
Starring: Jeremy Northam, Cate Blanchett, Rupert Everett, Minnie Driver,
Julianne Moore, John Wood.
Screenplay: Oliver Parker, based on the play by Oscar Wilde.
Producers:  Barnaby Thompson, Uri Fruchtmann and Bruce Davey.
Director: Oliver Parker.
MPAA Rating: PG (mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time: 96 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     AN IDEAL HUSBAND is so determinedly droll that it's likely to leave
your cheeks aching from a sustained 96 minute smirk.  That shouldn't be a
tremendous shock considering we're talking about a play by Oscar Wilde,
whose penchant for the tres bon mot was matched only by his curious desire
to cobble them together into plots.  He was smart enough to craft his
stories into a crowd-pleasing romantic form, but he was generally less
interested in emotional insight than he was in a witty turn of phrase.  In
the mouths of actors who know how to use them, his epigrams can make you
forget that the narrative you're watching is fairly forgettable.
     There are many such actors in AN IDEAL HUSBAND, enough to give the
tale some devilish fun.  Jeremy Northam essays Sir Robert Chiltern, an
up-and-coming Member of Parliament in 1895 well-known for his integrity;
the ever-radiant Cate Blanchett is his wife Gertrude, who places her
husband on a pedestal of moral rectitude.  There's Julianne Moore as Mrs.
Chevely, who knows a dark secret from Sir Robert's past and expects
political favors for her silence, and Minnie Driver as Sir Robert's
high-spirited younger sister Mabel.  And foremost there is Rupert Everett
as rakish bachelor Lord Arthur Goring, the very portrait of slothful
privilege and the dispenser of Wilde's most cutting social commentary.
     Director Oliver Parker (who also adapted the screenplay) works at
fleshing out the relationships in the story, trying to make the crisis in
the Chilterns' marriage more significant.  It's a noble idea, though the
time isn't particularly well-spent.  Northam broods as he faces his moment
of truth, Blanchett melts in disappointment over dashed illusions, and
both actors attempt to show us deep internal turmoil.  Parker wants us to
feel for them, while I suspect Wilde is more interested in making them
look a bit foolish.  Playing the characters with too much sincerity may be
too "heavy" a reading of the material.
     Fortunately, Parker still has plenty of juicy Wilde-ian dialogue to
distribute.  Much of it goes to Everett's Sir Arthur, who bites into his
commentaries on marriage, politics and deception with relish.  Many actors
have opted to play Wilde with an eyebrow arched into the flight path
passenger jets, as though we all must know they view life itself as a
grand joke.  Everett smartly opts for a refined weariness, the cynicism of
a man who doesn't take much pleasure in his cynicism.  It's a choice that
makes his later romance with Mabel (played with beautiful intelligence by
Driver) feel less like a plot device than it has any right to.  When
Everett and Driver banter, AN IDEAL HUSBAND floats on their appeal.
     It's true that a little droll can go an awfully long way, and that AN
IDEAL HUSBAND hardly offers a riveting portrait of scandal and redemption.
Mostly it's a comedy of manners, one of Wilde's forrays into the
difference between our public and private faces (a subject with which he
was well acquainted).  Though Parker's pacing lags between gags, there is
just enough surprisingly modern satire -- and just enough Rupert Everett
-- to maintain interest. The chuckles may rarely turn into belly laughs,
but then again, that never was Wilde's style.  AN IDEAL HUSBAND is the
work of a writer who preferred his comedy on wry.

Title
Review for One Eight Seven (1997)
     Don't make the mistake of assuming that "187" is gritty, urban
classroom drama in the mold of DANGEROUS MINDS.  Yes, it does deal with an
inner city teacher (Trevor Garfield, played by Samuel L. Jackson), and it
does deal with his attempts to get through to certain of his students.
But this story isn't about the amazing power of dedicated teachers to
effect change in the face of socio-economic hardships and an oppressive
tie-in soundtrack.  No, "187" is about a man's descent into madness.
"187" is a horror movie.
     At least that's what it _should_ have been.  You see, it turns out
that while teaching at a Brooklyn high school, science teacher Garfield
found himself on the wrong end of a disgruntled student's ten-penny nail.
Fifteen months later, he attempts to get back on the horse by going to
work as a substitute at a run-down Los Angeles school.  Unfortunately,
Garfield discovers that things aren't much different from coast to coast
-- every teacher fears the threat of student violence (187 is a police and
gang code for homicide), and every administrator fears the threat of a
lawsuit.  And in his own mysterious way, Garfield sets out to guarantee
that the inmates will not run this particular asylum.
     Samuel L. Jackson seems pefectly clear about the critical theme of
"187."  For most of the time he is on the screen, Jackson generates a
tension which threatens to explode at any moment.  His performance is raw
and haunting, like a priest experiencing a crisis of faith.  You keep
watching "187" because Garfield's response to his crisis is chilling and
provocative:  he sees his best option as becoming the devil. 
     Credit Jackson with an insight screenwriter Scott Yagemann and 
director Kevin Reynolds both lack.  Yagemann's script -- full to bursting
with good teachers (Kelly Rowan) and bad teachers (John Heard), good
students (Karina Arroyave) and bad students -- fairly yanks the outrage
out of us with pliers, dwelling on the unconscionable conditions and trite
confrontations.   Reynolds, meanwhile, perhaps in an attempt to create an
atmosphere of surreality, opens up the film school grab-bag -- dizzying
360 degree tracking shots, blurred focus, black-and-white video footage,
jittery hand-held camera work, slow motion, rust-tinged cinematography.
It is a dreadfully misguided choice.  Every flashy gimmick proves
distancing and distracting, pulling us away from the painful reality of
Garfield's life.
     It's clear that the makers of "187" want to leave viewers angry and
frustrated.  And they succeed, though not in the way they intended.  We
don't need another film to drag us into the classroom to show us how bad
things are.  We don't need another film to lecture to us, or to try to
impress us with cinematic puffery.  "187" is frustrating because it had
the chance to be unique, to pull us into the psyche of a man operating on
sheer survival instinct.  Only in a riveting climax do we ever get a
chance to see Garfield in his darkest moments, as Reynolds and Yagemann
create a pointless did-he-or-didn't-he mystery.  This could have been the
urban high school film which has been begging to be made for years, one
which avoids inanely and simplistically describing that world as "gritty"
or "tough."  The appropriate word is "terrifying."  The appropriate mood
is horror.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
THE CIDER HOUSE RULES
(Miramax)
Starring:  Tobey Maguire, Charlize Theron, Michael Caine, Delroy Lindo,
Paul Rudd, Erykah Badu, Kathy Baker.
Screenplay:  John Irving, based on his novel.
Producer:  Richard N. Gladstein.
Director:  Lasse Halstrom.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A word of sympathy, first of all, for the marketing and publicity
people at Miramax Films. I guarantee you I would not want the job of
selling to the American public a film in which the character arc of the
protagonist is completed by performing an abortion. They'll avoid the
subject assiduously, of course, focusing instead on the idea that THE
CIDER HOUSE RULES is about a journey to self-awareness, about learning to
make complex choices, and so on, and et cetera, and yada yada, all of
which is even (more or less) true. It's also true that John Irving has no
qualms about being provocative, and that he's willing to cast performing
abortions in a quasi-heroic light if it serves the purpose of one of his
uniquely compassionate tales. 
     THE CIDER HOUSE RULES isn't worth avoiding simply because of that one
thematic element ... nor, unfortunately, it is particularly worth seeking 
out. Once again delving into protagonists with atypical parental
circumstances, Irving (adapting his own novel) tells the story of an
orphan named Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire). Homer has lived his entire life
at St. Cloud's Orphanage in Maine, and now, as a young adult in 1943,
finds himself apprenticed to the orphanage's unconventional obstetrician
and caretaker Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine). Unsure of his own place in
the world, however, Homer decides to explore it. He leaves with Candy
Kendall (Charlize Theron) and Wally Worthington (Paul Rudd) -- a young
couple who have come to St. Cloud's for Dr. Larch's illegal services --
eventually landing as a picker at Wally's family apple orchard. It is
there that Homer has experiences that broaden his horizons, from
encounters with romance to encounters with the grey areas of morality.
     The first half of THE CIDER HOUSE RULES walks an awkward tightrope
between edgy humanism and dangerous sentimentality. The relationship
between Larch and Homer is the focal point, a strange father-son
connection that gives two actors intriguing material to work with. Caine
is particularly good as Larch, playing devilish advocate regarding the
harsh realities of the world. That relationship, however, is played out in
a setting filled with adorable urchins, including one inquisitive but
doomed fellow who spends his days under an oxygen tent. Irving tries to
wink at the mawkishness (plenty of Dickensian references abound), but 
director Lasse Hallstrom spends a bit too much time lingering on the
orphans' upturned faces. For a story that's ultimately not about orphans,
the opening of THE CIDER HOUSE RULES is too much about orphans.
     What the story is about, ultimately, is Homer's progress towards
understanding life outside the orphanage. To that end, Tobey Maguire
proves to be a marvelous Homer Wells. His performance is a challenging mix
of innocence and experience; his face captures both a hard life and a life
lived in isolation. He's certainly the best choice for an Irving
protagonist since Robin Williams' Garp, but THE CIDER HOUSE RULES still
can't quite achieve Irving-style magic, even with Irving himself doing the
script honors. The narrative meanders appropriately between Homer's
relationship with Candy, his work with the apple-picking crew and life
back at the orphanage, yet the meandering just doesn't have that whimsical
sense of purpose that marks Irving's novels. 
     It is most worth noting that THE CIDER HOUSE RULES on film packs 15
years of Homer's life into about a year and a half. There may be no better
evidence that Irving is a writer whose stories really need to be turned
into mini-series. The film does do a nice job conveying the theme that
"situational morality" need not be an epithet; indeed, this is may be one
of the most deeply radical concepts you'll see on film this year. It is
there you see a glimmer of the literary Irving, one of the glimmers you
can see in Maguire and Caine. Too often, though, those glimmers are
obscured by conventional filmmaking. Maybe those marketing folk don't have
such a tough job after all. In THE CIDER HOUSE RULES, you have to work a
little too hard to find Irving the provocateur.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
     LIFE is funny sometimes...just not as often as you might expect.
Universal is promoting LIFE just the way you'd expect it to promote a film
starring Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence -- as a raucous comedy with
plenty of the insult humor, attitude and gay-baiting their target audience
has come to expect.  The funny thing is -- or isn't, as the case may be --
that LIFE is actually an attempt by the two comedians to grow up a little.
Anyone expecting to see Eddie and Martin doing their version of STIR CRAZY
is bound to be somewhat surprised to find Eddie and Martin doing their
version of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.
     It's a commendable effort by two performers best known for more
simple-minded material; it's just not a very successful one.  The
principal action begins in 1932, where two different men find themselves
in similar trouble.  Small-time hustler Ray Gibson (Eddie Murphy) is in
trouble with Harlem crime boss Spanky (Rick James) for running numbers in
his territory; mild-mannered Claude Banks (Martin Lawrence) is in trouble
with Spanky for being short on the bill in Spanky's club.  To save both
their skins, Ray offers to bring Spanky a shipment of bootleg liquor from
Mississippi, with Claude as his partner.  Unfortunately, things go from
bad to worse down South, where Ray and Claude are convicted for a murder
they didn't commit and end up sentenced to life in the Mississippi State
Prison.
     Once the narrative gets to the prison setting (which takes around 30
minutes), the story predictably involves the new city-slicker inmates
learning the hard facts about their new milieu -- when not to back-talk
the bossman (Nick Cassavetes); when to turn over your cornbread to the
largest land mammal on two legs (Michael "Bear" Taliferro); why prison
makes strange bedfellows (literally).  The pacing may be a bit pokey, but
it still looks and smells like a mass-market comedy for a while.  That's
before screenwriters Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone and director Ted
Demme start taking some intriguing detours.  In one scene, Ray begins
describing the nightclub he dreams of starting one day, momentarily taking
his fellow inmates somewhere wonderful; in another, a gay inmate (Miguel
A. Nunez Jr.) about to be released is treated with sympathy and a bit of
dignity.  As LIFE unfolds, it starts to feel surprisingly ambitious, not
at all like a whoop-it-up crowd-pleaser.
     As admirable as LIFE's reach may be, however, it generally exceeds
its grasp.  While it lays out the sub-plots and advancing years like an
epic in the making, the film-makers never appear entirely committed to
making a film that could alienate many of the stars' core fans.  Key
elements of the story -- Claude's fiancee leaving him for another man; a
sympathetic superintendent (Ned Beatty) dying before he can act on
evidence of our protagonists' innocence; even Ray and Claude's fate in the
film's climactic fire -- never actually appear on screen, the information
tagged on by an inmate (Obba Babatunde) narrating the tale in flashback.
LIFE is a frustrating experience, because every time it appears close to
making a connection to its characters it falls back on a lame joke to
reassure the viewers that they're still watching a comedy.
     I may be kinder to LIFE than it really deserves, simply because I was
so surprised by its tone.  Martin Lawrence, whose screen work has
generally bordered on the insufferable, does some fairly nice work as the
straight man in the duo, and Murphy is in fine form as his quintessential
fast talker.  Rick Baker's old-age makeup is also a star of the show,
taking the stars into their 90s (and, in the case of Lawrence, making him
look frighteningly like Whitman Mayo).  LIFE is effective in bits and
pieces, building on the predictable comedy in some unexpected ways.  It
just never builds on them in the necessary ways, never making the
friendship between Ray and Claude its primary dramatic concern.  It's a
film caught between what the film-makers wanted to do and what the studio
must have wanted them to do, just the clashing creation you'd expect from
a story that's part STIR CRAZY and part SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.

Title
Review for Love and Other Catastrophes (1996)
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Frances O'Connor, Alice Garner, Matthew Dytkynski, Matt Day,
Radha Mitchell.
Screenplay:  Helen Bandis, Yael Bergman, Emma-Kate Croghan.
Producer:  Stavros Andonis Efthymiou.
Director:  Emma-Kate Croghan.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  76 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For what it's worth, I suppose I learned something from LOVE AND
OTHER CATASTROPHES:  romantic comedies can be just as predictable and
uninspired in Australia as in the U.S.  If attractive, likeable actors and
a non-threatening lightness of tone count for anything -- and heaven knows
that they can -- LOVE AND OTHER CATASTROPHES may find an audience
receptive to its nominal charms.  I suspect audiences are more likely to
discover that it has absolutely nothing new to say, and that its
moderately eccentric/neurotic characters are very familiar.  LOVE AND
OTHER CATASTROPHES is a ride on flat, straight ground to nowhere in
particular.
     The plot follows a day in the life of five Australian university
students coping with various minor dilemmas.  Mia (Frances O'Connor), a
flighty lesbian, is forced to navigate a bureaucratic obstacle course to
change programs, on the same day she is struggling with commitment issues
with her girlfriend Danni (Radha Mitchell).  Mia's roommate Alice (Alice
Garner) is trying to complete her film studies thesis on Doris Day as
feminist icon, while pining from afar for a notorious womanizer named Ari
(Matthew Dytkynski).  Meanwhile, medical student Michael (Matt Day)
responds to Mia and Alice's ad for a third roommate, unaware that Alice is
the coffee shop clerk to whom he is attracted.
     There is a certain energy to LOVE AND OTHER CATASTROPHES which makes
it hard to dislike actively.  Director/co-writer Emma-Kate Croghan keeps
things moving at a brisk clip, and provides at least a couple of amusing
sequences; the best involves Mia racing from place to place trying to find
someone to approve her change of program before the deadline at the end of
the day, dealing with dilemmas like the inconvenient death of her advisor.
The cast is uniformly appealing, and unlike may romantic larks about young
people, the characters never start to grate on your nerves with their
insecurities and crises.  All things considered, these five seem pretty
well-adjusted.
     So much for the damning with faint praise.  The fact is that LOVE AND
OTHER CATASTROPHES is a 76-minute movie which takes forever to end.  As
nice as the characters are, most of them never progress beyond a single
dimension.  Alice is the most complex character, a perfectionist whose
impossibly high standards for a significant other take a back seat to some
animal lust for Ari, but Croghan and her co-writers never explore that
dynamic; it's just a blip on Alice's emotional radar which quickly
vanishes.  The characters march with such ease toward their respective
happy endings that there is not a moment of tension, and it's all so
shallow that you may forget every relationship half an hour after
watching.  Even the very 90s twist of making one of the couples lesbian
can't generate much spark.  A couple without chemistry is a couple without
chemistry, gay or straight.
     Among the more perplexing aspects of LOVE AND OTHER CATASTROPHES are
Croghan's few attempts at idiosyncrasy, all of which fall flat.  A
farcical scene of film students dressed like their idols (Quentin
Tarantino, Woody Allen, etc.) seems wildly out of place, and the burnt
orange cinematography makes you wonder whether Don Simpson and Jerry
Bruckheimer hijacked the production somewhere along the line.  I suppose
Croghan had to do something to spice up the material, but it might have
been a better idea to write a complete script, develop the characters and
their relationships, _then_ put together a good-looking cast of
characters.  Frances O'Connor's bright smile and Matt Day's geeky
handsomeness can buy few minutes of good will, but sooner or later people
have to do something vaguely interesting.  LOVE AND OTHER CATASTROPHES
isn't a catastrophe; it's just the kind of aimlessly frothy romantic
comedies America has churned out a hundred times before.  Only the accents
have been changed to distinguish the guilty.

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
     Making a movie about racism is virtually a no-win proposition.
Ninety-nine percent of the time, a film-maker will spend two hours making
it excruciatingly clear that racism is bad, inspiring either righteous
nods of approval or rolled eyes at the explication of the self-evident.
We all feel good abour ourselves as right-thinking people, but we get the
point already.  What more is there to say if you're only making a
cinematic sermon for the choir?
     There is another option, which is even tricker:  exploring the gray
areas of what makes racist principles attractive.  It's a risky endeavor
-- you might find people chastising you for not making racism obviously
bad _enough_ -- but it's the most potentially compelling.  For all its
flaws, AMERICAN HISTORY X grabs you because it throws you inside the
racist mind more effectively than any film I can remember.  The center of
that exploration is Edward Norton's creepy-smart performance as Derek
Vinyard, a young skinhead we meet in two incarnations.  Just released from
a three year prison sentence, he's a reformed neo-Nazi trying to save his
hero-worshipping younger brother Danny (Edward Furlong) from a similar
fate.  In flashback, he's a revered skinhead adept at recruiting new blood
into the white power gangs led by Cameron (Stacy Keach).
     Those flashback sequences are by far the most effective, photographed
by director Tony Kaye in icy black-and-white.  Remarkably, they begin from
the premise that Derek and Danny are both intelligent rather than red-neck
morons.  Devastated by his firefighter father's murder in a predominantly
black neighborhood, Derek has justified his hatred with ideas disturbingly
familiar from contemporary policy discussions about affirmative action and
welfare.  Derek is chilling because he's not merely spewing bile and
epithets -- he's making racism _make sense_ like a master rhetorician.
It's that kind of audience-baiting that makes portions of AMERICAN HISTORY
X so disturbing, particularly in a neighborhood basketball game sequence
where Kaye masterfully manipulates viewers into siding with Derek and his
skinhead cronies.
     Eventually, of course, the rhetoric of hatred turns into actions of
hatred, leading to AMERICAN HISTORY X's most devastating sequences.  The
first shows Derek leading his gang on a rampage through a Korean-owned
grocery store, terrorizing a black female clerk in a manner somehow more
unsettling than the physical assaults on Mexican-American employees.  The
second shows us the reason for Derek's incarceration -- the murder of two
black carjackers -- in a moment more shocking than you might think movies
can be any more.  Norton is perhaps at his most brilliant in this
sequence; his raised eyebrows of triumph as he is being arrested may be
the most memorable single moment of screen acting this year.
    It's hard to imagine AMERICAN HISTORY X ever getting made without the
redemption/salvation angle, but it would have been much stronger without
it.  Though Derek's transformation further emphasizes his intelligence --
he's forced to change his views when his friendship in prison with a black
inmate (Guy Torry) provides him with new evidence -- it can only lead to a
great big Moral to the Story.  Even more unnecessary is the contrived
device in which Danny is forced to write a history paper on Derek's road
to ruin, leading to a resolution that feels disappointingly pat.  There's
a grand sense of Shakesepearean tragedy to the conclusion, but not nearly
the intensity of emotion present as we're pulled into Derek's racist
world.  We get that racism is bad.  AMERICAN HISTORY X works because it
risks showing us why some people believe it's good.

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, John Cusack, Jack Thompson, Alison Eastwood, The
Lady Chablis, Irma P. Hall.
Screenplay:  John Lee Hancock, based on the book by John Berendt.
Producers:  Clint Eastwood and Arnold Stiefel.
Director:  Clint Eastwood.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  151 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Here's a brain teaser for all you aspiring screenwriters out there:
how do you adapt MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL, a 350-page
true-crime drama in which the crime doesn't occur until around page 170?
Before you answer, I should warn you that it's a bit of a trick question.
John Berendt's 1994 non-fiction novel, based on the author's experiences
while living in Savannah, Georgia in the 1980s, defies simple
categorization.  Part travelogue, part character study, part cultural
anthropology lesson and part courtroom thriller, it combined disparate
elements into the hypnotic tale of a unique place.  So that screenwriting
assignment might be better phrased as:  how do you adapt MIDNIGHT IN THE
GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL, a 350-page true-crime drama which isn't really a
true-crime drama?
     John Lee Hancock had more or less the right idea when he chose to let
his screenplay wander and sprawl.  The backbone of the narrative involves
Berendt's fictional stand-in, a New York writer named John Kelso (John
Cusack) who comes to Savannah on assignment for Town & Country Magazine to
cover the city's most lavish Christmas party.  The host of that party is
Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey), a wealthy antiques dealer who instantly
charms Kelso with his wit, hospitality and fondness for Kelso's writing.
Then Kelso finds his assignment taking an unexpected grim twist when
Williams is charged with first-degree murder in the death of his assistant
-- and lover -- Billy Hanson (Jude Law).
     That covers the "plot" in a video-guide-summary sense, but it doesn't
begin to do justice to what MIDNIGHT is about.  Hancock's script wisely
retains Berendt's willingness to let a collection of colorful characters
carry the story in tangential directions, painting a messy but vivid
portrait of Savannah as (in Kelso's words) "GONE WITH THE WIND on
mescaline."  Among Kelso's odd encounters are run-ins with a voodoo
priestess named Minerva (Irma P. Hall) and a flirtatious relationship with
pre-operative transsexual The Lady Chablis (played by the real Lady
herself).  Director Clint Eastwood chooses an ideal, languid pace for
MIDNIGHT which turns it into the perfect Southern story:  in no particular
hurry to get anywhere, yet still intriguing in its richness of detail.
     In Berendt's novel, that fragmented approach turns the city of
Savannah itself into the story's principal character.  The Williams trial
functions primarily as a lightning rod for the attitudes and perceptions
of the city's inhabitants, in whom eccentricity is ultimately a matter of
degree.  There are, however, some vacuums Hollywood abhors, and MIDNIGHT
IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL tries to fill two of them with some pretty
ineffective stuff.  Instead of a story about a strange and mysterious
place, it is transformed into the story of a confidence-impaired writer on
a quest for True Love and Acceptance; instead of reveling in atmospheric
unpredictability, the script introduces a romantic interest (Alison
Eastwood) so token you could use her to ride the subway.  Hancock works
wonders with the novel's decade-long time frame, condensing events with
impressive economy.  He also strains to shove the story's square pegs into
the gaping round hole of studio picture paradigms.
     Hancock and Eastwood may very well have made the best adaptation of
MIDNIGHT possible within a studio system.  The acting is first-rate from
top to bottom (including a sly and charismatic debut by The Lady Chablis
as him/herself), Eastwood's technical team delivers typical excellence,
and many of the book's best situations are re-created with sharp humor.
There's just something vaguely unsatisfying about MIDNIGHT, and not just
in comparison to its source material.  This story cries out for a less
conventional treatment, though it's still fairly unconventional by most
standards.  The makers of MIDNIGHT had their heart in the right place, but
the result teases with the promise of an off-beat exploration it delivers
only sporadically.  Perhaps the answer to that screenwriting assignment is
even trickier than the question.  How do you adapt MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN
OF GOOD AND EVIL?  You don't.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
MEN IN BLACK
(Columbia)
Starring:  Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda Fiorentino, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Rip Torn.
Screenplay:  Ed Solomon, based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham.
Producers:  Walter F. Parkes and Laurie MacDonald.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If BATMAN & ROBIN arrived as the summer film everyone was ready to
hate, MEN IN BLACK arrived as the film everyone was ready to love.  This
was to be the antidote to a season filled with moribund sequels and
lackluster high concepts, a cinematic life preserver for movie-goers
drowning in over-promoted and under-developed bilge water blockbusters.
It would bring together an appealing rising star, a savvy veteran
character actor, an idiosyncratic director, a clever concept and fun
visual effects.  This, at last, would be something worth standing in line
for.
     MEN IN BLACK the movie -- as opposed to MEN IN BLACK the
much-anticipated event -- isn't worth standing in line for.  It's a
frisky, fairly enjoyable summer fantasy, one which avoids the common
big-budget trap of over-staying its welcome.  At the same time, it's a bit
disappointing, and for an unexpected reason.  MEN IN BLACK has been edited
to the point where scenes collide awkwardly, where attempts at sub-plots
cry out for more development.  It's a film which actually _under_-stays
its welcome.
     That says a lot for what is on the screen for just over 90 minutes.
The story, based on the comic book series by Lowell Cunningham, deals with
a top-secret government agency called the Men in Black.  Their
responsibility is overseeing the earth's alien population -- alien, as in
the extra-terrestrial kind -- as well as keeping the existence of those
aliens secret from the general population.  Tommy Lee Jones plays a
veteran MiB known only as Agent K who brings in New York cop James Edwards
(Will Smith) as a new recruit.  The newly-christened Agent J soon
discovers that he has come aboard at a particularly bad time, as one
foul-tempered alien visitor arrives on a mission which could spell the
destruction of the planet.
     When director Barry Sonnenfeld plays that premise for its most
outrageous and witty comic possibilities, MEN IN BLACK is a whole lot of
fun.  Jones and Smith have a solid rapport in a variation on the standard
buddy-cop pairing, turning in performances which are knowing without
winking too obviously at the audience.  Their supporting cast is sharp as
well, particularly Vincent D'Onofrio in a hilarious turn as the sadistic
alien Bug who inhabits the skin of a redneck farmer; D'Onofrio's physical
movements are even more hideously other-worldly than Rick Baker's make-up
effects.  The grandest, goofiest moments involve MiB Headquarters,
rendered by Bo Welch's production design and Eric Brevig's visual effects
as a cross between Kennedy Airport, Ellis Island and Mos Eisley Spaceport.
When a bank of television monitors show "known aliens" including Newt
Gingrich, Dionne Warwick and Sylvester Stallone, you know that MEN IN
BLACK will proceed with tongue firmly in cheek.
     That wry charm, along with the collected talent in MEN IN BLACK,
should have been enough to justify the hype.  And so they might have been,
if Sonnenfeld had put together a film with a momentum to match its
moments.  The plot races from place to place so quickly that you're never
given a chance to piece it together.  K's recruitment of J is handled
awkwardly, attempts at creating an emotional core in K's pining over his
lost love feel rushed and unnecessary, and Linda Fiorentino (as a coroner
caught up in the alien shenanigans) never develops a character.  As a
collection of amusing individual scenes, MEN IN BLACK is just fine.  It
just never makes sense when precious minutes are devoted to half-hearted
attempts at character development.
      It's not fair to call MEN IN BLACK unsatisfying, because there's a
lot of great stuff in it.  It does, however, feel unfinished; it's great
stuff not yet formed into a great movie.  More to the point, it functions
best as a set-up for -- oh bitter irony -- yet another big-budget summer
sequel.  Only when compared to its current competition is it the summer
masterpiece everyone was ready for it to be.

Title
Review for Don Juan DeMarco (1995)
DON JUAN DEMARCO
Starring:  Marlon Brando, Johnny Depp, Faye Dunaway.
Screenplay/Director:  Jeremy Leven.
     Once upon a time, Marlon Brando was considered by many to be
the best American actor in film.  It is difficult to keep that in
mind sometimes, since so many off-screen issues have turned him into
something of an eccentric joke:  his infamous rejection of the 1972
Best Actor Oscar via Sacheen Littlefeather; the massive weight gain;
his stream-of-consciousness turn in APOCALYPSE NOW; most recently,
his televised smooch-fest with Larry King.  Brando has been on the
big screen only a handful of times in the last twenty years, so the
myth has transcended the actor.  That is a shame, because not only
can the man still act, he has shown a great sense of humor about
himself.  Exhibit A:  his hilarious self-parody in 1990's THE
FRESHMAN.  Exhibit B:  DON JUAN DE MARCO, a wonderful romantic
comedy in which the unlikely pairing of Brando and Johnny Depp adds
up to an enchanting fantasy.
     Brando plays Jack Mickler, a psychiatrist at a New York mental
hospital who is just a few days shy of retirement when he comes upon
a most intriguing case.  That case is a young man (Johnny Depp) who
claims he wants to die--and who also claims that he is Don Juan de
Marco, the world's greatest lover.  Mickler is intrigued by the
young man, and asks to treat him until his committal hearing.  Over
the next several days, Don Juan tells Mickler his life story, a
fanciful tale full of love, adventure, tragedy and exotic locations.
Although Mickler questions the veracity of the stories, he finds
himself drawn into them, and inspired to re-discover the romance in
his 30 year marriage to wife Marilyn (Faye Dunaway), and in all
aspects of his life.
     DON JUAN DE MARCO is the kind of story which has been done many
times before--the benevolent eccentric who teaches a lesson to
unhappy realists--but Jeremy Leven works wonders with it wearing
both of his hats.  As writer, he has crafted a screenplay full of
instantly quotable lines.  When Don Juan describes telling his true
love about his 1,500 previous lovers, he explains, "I could see that
the number was substantially more than she was expecting."  The
opening sequence, in which Don Juan seduces a woman in a restaurant,
is also a highlight, full of big laughs.  But as clever a script as
he has at his disposal, it is one of Leven's choices as a director
which makes it something special.  While the narrated flashbacks of
Don Juan's life are given a surreal tinge both by the nature of the
subjects and Don Juan's florid description, the scenes involving
interactions between other characters are almost hyper-real.  The
dialogue is simple, with lines frequently overlapping, and the
camera is usually stationary.  DON JUAN DE MARCO is most about the
beauty of a romantic life, and the manner in which Leven juxtaposes
Don Juan's world with the "real" world is ideal.
     Leven also coaxes two superb performances out of his lead
actors.  Brando is effortless as the run-down Mickler, whose early
connection to Don Juan in the persona of Don Octavio belies his
latent romanticism.  He is marvelously tender in his scenes with
Dunaway, and a riot when he takes a shot at his own girth in a scene
working out with a home exercise unit.  It is a light and very funny
performance, matched and perhaps surpassed by Johnny Depp.  Don Juan
is in the mold of the romantic dreamers Depp has played in films
like BENNY & JOON and ED WOOD, but with a sexual dimension he hasn't
showed previously.  Much of DON JUAN DE MARCO depends on Depp
selling his conviction that the stories he narrates are true, and
his passionate delivery makes it work.
     He works so well, in fact, that several scenes between Brando
and Dunaway probably ended up on the cutting room floor to allow
Depp's character more screen time.  That's something of a shame,
because the film is really about how Mickler changes, and how those
changes re-energize his marriage, and Dunaway is too good to be so
under-used.  However, it is quibbling to fault DON JUAN DE MARCO for
what isn't on the screen, when what is on the screen is so
appealing.  Sweet, funny and unapologetically upbeat, DON JUAN DE
MARCO is a perfect breezy spring entertainment.

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce, Bruce
Greenwood, Blair Underwood, Philip Baker Hall, Anne Archer, Ben Kingsley.
Screenplay:  Stephen Gaghan.
Producers:  Richard D. Zanuck and Scott Rudin.
Director:  William Friedkin.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, combat violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  128 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm not sure which would be more depressing -- if the makers of RULES
OF ENGAGEMENT were simply exploiting soldiers for a gung-ho patriotic
courtroom drama, or if they actually believed they were doing justice to
the complexities of warfare. The former would be a fairly typical case of
Hollywood opportunism, a predictable but nonetheless annoying reduction of
tangled moral issues to simple flag-waving absolutes. The latter would
indicate good intentions gone horribly awry in the execution. You can
figure out everything you need to know about how RULES OF ENGAGEMENT will
approach its Marine characters from the tag line on the poster, set 
against a shot of Samuel L. Jackson carrying a young boy to safety: "A
hero should never have to stand alone."
     From the set-up, there's reason to hope for and expect something
more. A prologue set in 1968 Vietnam introduces us to Marines Terry
Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) and Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), brothers
in arms connected for life when Childers helps save a wounded Hodges'
life during battle. Flash forward 28 years, where both men are colonels,
but Childers is a commander while Hodges is about to retire after three
decades of military law desk work. But its Hodges' turn to come to
Childers' rescue after a mission at the American embassy in Yemen goes
sour, resulting in the deaths of 83 people including women and children. 
Though Childers insists he was responding to gunfire from the protesters,
he faces a court-martial for murder when evidence suggests he ordered the
attack on civilians without provocation. It's up to Hodges, as Childers'
defense attorney, to save his career.
     That's fertile ground to explore the split-second life-and-death
decisions involved in combat, including the possibility that good soldiers
can still make bad decisions based on emotional reaction. We see in the
Vietnam prologue that Childers is capable of resorting to extreme acts
under extreme circumstances, leading to reasonable questions about his
mental state, and the mental state of any military commander. Did the
gunfire to which Childers responded actually come from the jeering crowd
below, instead of just from the rooftop snipers above? Is Childers a
hot-head willing to commit murder to save his men? Are such means
justified by the ends of saving the lives of fellow soldiers? Is there
anything as black-and-white as the notion of a hero where warfare is
concerned?
     I refer you again to that tag line for the answer to the final
question, and by extension every other question the film could have
raised. For you see, there is no question about whether or not Childers
responded appropriately; there's videotape evidence to prove that he did.
There's also a nasty National Security Advisor (Bruce Greenwood) to hide
and eventually destroy that videotape evidence, creating an easy villain
when a much more interesting villain would have been the chaos of combat
itself. The painfully drawn-out courtroom sequences might have been a
place for exploring issues of how hair-splitting rules of engagement are
interpreted when the bullets are flying. Instead, they're a place to
conclude that Hodges is even a worse lawyer than he self-deprecatingly
calls himself, since he never bothers to check the embassy building for
the angle of entry of bullet holes.
     Jones and Jackson are, of course, talented actors whose intensity
makes it easier to watch everything they do. It's simply obvious from the
first moments of RULES OF ENGAGEMENT that they're not playing characters.
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT is about as thoroughly plot-driven as movies get,
filled to its two hour-plus rim with action, exposition and testimony.
It's too busy being a melodrama to worry about ambiguity or nuance of
character, too busy appealing to viewers eager to root for Our Boys
against the Bureaucracy. In fact, RULES OF ENGAGEMENT is so enamored with
its own sense of doing justice to military men that it ends with the kind
of postscript captions usually associated with fact-based films, just to
let you know that those weasels in suits eventually got theirs. Heroes
will never have to stand alone. Not as long as there are simple-minded
crowd-pleasers like RULES OF ENGAGEMENT to stand up for the idea that
heroes are always right.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
     So much for Adam Sandler, "normal" guy.  In THE WEDDING SINGER, it
looked as though Sandler were trying to shrug off the infantile,
silly-voiced persona he took from "Saturday Night Live" to BILLY MADISON
and HAPPY GILMORE.  While still fairly silly in its own way, THE WEDDING
SINGER was a somewhat more mature, somewhat more clever vehicle for
Sandler, and his first attempt at actual screen acting.  In THE WATERBOY,
Sandler is once again in infantile, silly-voiced rare form, the kind of
character that strikes unholy terror in a critic's heart.
     It would be a gross exaggeration to call THE WATERBOY a smart film,
but it's funny in ways I didn't quite expect.  Sandler plays a 31-year-old
simpleton bayou boy named Bobby Boucher who still lives with his
domineering Mama (Kathy Bates) and has been the University of Louisiana's
water boy for 18 years.  When U. of L.'s nasty Coach Beaulieu (Jerry Reed)
finally fires Bobby, the hydrophilic lad hooks up with the hapless South
Central Louisiana State University Mud Dogs, led by jittery Coach Klein.
Coach Klein inadvertently unleashes Bobby's inner linebacker when he
encourages Bobby to defend himself against the taunting of team members,
discovering in the process one of the greatest pass rushers in college
football history.  Thus are the Mud Dogs on their way to their greatest
season -- and, naturally, a showdown with the University of Louisiana --
provided they can keep over-protective Mama from finding out her baby boy
is playing "the foosball."
     The opening minutes of THE WATERBOY don't hold out much hope for
anything beyond 12-year-old comic sensibilities.  Sight gags predominate,
from a football hitting Bobby in the head, to pratfalls over a water
cooler, to Sandler motoring about on a riding lawn mower.  Yawn-inspiring
running jokes involve a perpetually drunken cheerleading squad, a pair of
dim-witted die-hard fans (Clint Howard and Allen Covert), and an assistant
coach (Blake Clark) who speaks in an incomprehensible accent.  A few
giggles leak out of the predictabe sophomorism, while Sandler's
stuttering, soft-spoken variation on Cajun Man threatens to wear out his
welcome very early on.
     Then something strange happens some time after the fourth or fifth
reference to Bobby's backwater, snake-and-squirrel-eating background.  The
dialogue starts getting sharper, including Bobby's bizarre cover story to
Mama for his football-related bruises.  Sandler starts getting more
endearingly innocent rather than acting like an oblivious moron.  And the
sight gags start getting funnier, perhaps as much related to a build-up of
good will as to any change in approach.  The incongruous presence of Bates
and Winker (the latter sporting decidedly un-Fonzie-esque love handles)
certainly helps, but there's something about the writing in THE WATERBOY
that kept sneaking up on me, delivering a left-field laugh at times when I
was expecting an obvious bit of slapstick idiocy.
     Many people probably associate Sandler with moron comedy in the
Ernest/Pauly Shore/Carrot Top vein, perhaps without having seen any of his
films.  He and frequent writing partner Tim Herlihy are considerably more
sly than that.  They've learned a few lessons in grown-up comedy from THE
WEDDING SINGER, and bring that sensibility to the lower common denominator
audience targeted with THE WATERBOY.  They certainly miss the target
plenty of times -- Rob Schneider's extended cameo gets more insufferable
every time he appears -- but they also don't fire at the same stupid
target over and over again.  Between the lethargic opening and the
who-cares romance between Sandler and bad girl Fairuza Balk, THE WATERBOY
offers goofy entertainment.  It appears Sandler doesn't have to be
"normal" to be funny.

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
    DR. T & THE WOMEN kicks off with one of those trademarked Robert
Altman sequences of choreographed cacophany. We're in the waiting room of
Dallas OB/GYN Dr. Sullivan "Sully" Travis (Richard Gere) -- known to all
simpy as Dr. T -- where head nurse Carolyn (Shelley Long) tries to
maintain order despite a swarm of patients waiting long past their spot on
the doctor's overbooked schedule. It's a brilliantly economical way to set
up a potentially fascinating protagonist. Dr. T loves women so much (in a
purely spiritual, madonna-half of the whole madonna/whore thing sort of
way) that he just can't say no to any of them. The women love Dr. T so
much that they're willing to endure tremendous inconvenience for his
personalized stirrup-side manner. What a great character to study: a man
who idealizes women in a cultural setting -- upper-class Southerners --
where plenty of the women are just fine with being idealized.
     Only two things from that waiting room sequence forward keep DR. T &
THE WOMEN from being a provocative movie experience: Richard Gere, and
just about everything else. Altman's film itself is as tumultuous and
unfocused as Dr. T's life in the film, which starts getting complicated
when his wife Kate (Farrah Fawcett) has a mental breakdown and is placed
in a psychiatric hospital. Kate's illness coincides with preparations for
the wedding of the Travis's oldest daughter Dee Dee (Kate Hudson), as well
as an extended stay by Kate's sister Peggy (Laura Dern) and her three
little girls. And to make matters even more unstable, there's the new
country club golf pro named Bree (Helen Hunt), who turns Dr. T's head with
her unique independent streak.
     Altman and screenwriter Anne Rapp make a huge mistake early on when
they define Kate's rare condition, and along with it Dr. T's own character
flaw. He's a man who loves too much, we learn, giving the women in his
life absolutely everything because he delights in being their guardian,
and scarcely even sees them as flesh and bone. This Act One diagnosis
underlines every action Dr. T makes for the viewer's benefit: ah, note is
instinctively sexist-gallant attempts to do everything for Bree! And note
further how he seems smitten by her insistence on taking charge!
     You'd think it might underline things a bit for Dr. T himself,
especially since he gets the dialogue explaining his wife's condition.
Instead, he spends the next several days of story time in a
well-intentioned fog, manifested in Gere's beatifically squinting
countenance. Gere has never been one of our more subtle actors, but here
he simply refuses to give Dr. T's pathological sanctification of women any
edge. Altman and Rapp let him off the hook by implicitly suggesting he's
just a man tossed about by the forces of estrogen rathern than an example
of a particularly unhealthy attitude. And it doesn't help that almost
every one of the film's dozen or so female characters is written as a
cartoon -- Dern as the champagne-swilling, unhappily married belle; 
Janine Turner as a pushy hypochondriac; Tara Reid as Dr. T's conspiracy
buff younger daughter -- making it even easier to see the befuddled Dr. T
as the victim rather than part of the problem.
     This misguided characterization reaches its peak during a late
revelation about the personal life of one of Dr. T's family members. It
should have been an opportunity to let Dr. T's true colors emerge, to show
him rocked by the notion that women aren't all what he believes them to
be. Instead, it's a cheap opportunity to make him almost absurdly
sensitive and understanding, when understanding is so clearly what he
lacks. DR. T & THE WOMEN flirts with the kind of symbolism and narrative
complexity that can make it seem deep -- be sure to bring an abacus to
count the number of connections between water and female sexuality -- but
it's actually terribly shallow where it counts. Without an actor willing
to make Dr. T a sexist anachronism in need of some self-awareness, the
film is reduced to a two-hour exhibition of limp farce. How depressing to
see that wonderfully evocative waiting room turned into the place where
the big payoff is someone getting tripped and banging her head on a coffee
table.

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
WILD WILD WEST
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, Ted
Levine.
Screenplay:  S. S. Wilson & Brent Maddock and Jeffrey Price & Peter S.
Seaman.
Producers:  Jon Peters and Barry Sonnenfeld.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, adult humor, profanity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are three ways you can go when you adapt a television series
for film.  You can poke fun, which worked well with the BRADY BUNCH films.
You can play it straight, which worked well with THE UNTOUCHABLES.  Or you
can pump it up with cinematic steroids, which has crashed and burned THE
AVENGERS, THE MOD SQUAD, LOST IN SPACE, MY FAVORITE MARTIAN, etc.  In
their zeal to dust off beloved small screen properties for the big
screen, producers often have ignored everything that made those properties
beloved in the first place.  The nostalgia card only plays so far, after
all -- if you want to bring in the kids, you've got to blow more stuff up.
     There was every reason to suspect that WILD WILD WEST would be the
latest T.V. charmer-turned-blockbuster monstrosity.  Producer Jon Peters
was renowned for embracing the "too much isn't nearly enough" ethos, and
word of disastrous test screenings had been leaking out of Hollywood for a
few months.  As it turns out, WILD WILD WEST is only part monstrosity and
part faithful re-creation, with neither approach working nearly as well as
it should.
     The principals are once again James West (Will Smith) and Artemus
Gordon (Kevin Kline), Federal agents circa 1869.  West, an Army
investigator, is a man of action; U. S. Marshal Gordon is an intellectual
inventor and master of disguise.  The two clashing personalities are
teamed up at the insistence of President Grant (also played by Kline) to
find out who is kidnapping scientists and threatening to overthrow the
government.  The trail leads to Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), an
embittered former Confederate scientist determined to take out on the
United States the loss of the lower half of his body in an experiment gone
awry.
     There are at least a few hints that director Barry Sonnenfeld is
interested in evoking tongue-in-cheek spirit of the series.  The main
title sequence includes the familiar tinted freeze-frames, the
protagonists still travel in their private train the Wanderer, and the
grand plans of the maniacal villain are appropriately maniacal.  The film
also hooks in to the series' anachronistic satire of James Bond-like
secret agent hijinks, which turns into a surprising problem.  In 1965, it
was fresh to watch Artemus play fussy Q to West's brawling Bond, fresh to
watch an adventure self-aware of adventure genre conventions.  In 1999,
hip referentiality just isn't hip any more, especially when it comes to
manly action heroes and their toys.  When Will Smith's character 
introduces himself as "West...James West," it should play as a winking
homage.  Instead, it just feels tired.
     When WILD WILD WEST doesn't work as a straight return to the gimmicks
and goofs of the series, there's always the bombastic special effects
route.  Gadgetry and megalomania were common elements of the series, but
a computer-rendered 80-foot-tall mechanized tarantula-tank doesn't have
quite the same low-tech appeal.  The overkill isn't even restricted to the
special effects, with Salma Hayek's va-va-voom appeal wasted for no other
reason than a little bare flesh.  And when the script is in need of an
easy joke, there's always Smith knowingly fending off Southern racism.
Branagh seems to understand the theatrical hamminess required for
Loveless, pitching the character as cartoonish as he can be.  His
cartoonish henchmen and henchwomen, on the other hand, are a waste of time
and fight choreography.
     WILD WILD WEST is so frantic that it spends too little time on its
strongest asset, the interplay between Smith and Kline.  Both actors have
fine comic timing, and both play up the rivalry between the gunslinger and
the deep thinker.  There are more enjoyable comic moments in WILD WILD
WEST than I was expecting, thanks to Sonnenfeld's sometimes surreal comic
touch (references to E. T. and the RCA Victor dog).  He just bounces back
and forth too often between approaches to the material.  It's uneven as
throwback entertainment, and it's uneven as contemporary action film -- a
wild wild mess of a movie that shows the danger of playing around with
previously successful material, no matter how you try to play it.

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
     There's a fundamental problem with the two principle characters
writer David Mamet drops into his wilderness adventure THE EDGE.  Charles
Morse (Anthony Hopkins) is a multimillionaire businessman who accompanies
his wife, a model named Mickey (Elle Macpherson), on a location shoot in
the Arctic; Bob (Alec Baldwin) is the fashion photographer who seems a bit
too interested in his subject.  When a plane crash leaves Charles, Bob and
an assistant named Steve (Harold Perrineau) stranded miles from
civilization, the three men are forced to work together, use their wits
and overcome their antagonisms in order to survive.
     That should have been the idea, anyway.  THE EDGE is a wilderness
adventure which also wants to be a psychological drama, but forgets to
develop a convincing conflict between the two leads.  In fact, there are
precious few screen minutes of any kind between Charles and Bob before the
are stuck together.  The rivalry over Mickey is clearly meant as the main
grudge between them, but that conflict doesn't develop until quite late in
the film.  For the most part, antagonism between Charles and Bob is
presented as a given.  After all, there's a beautiful woman involved, envy
of wealth, stressful situations...what's not to be antagonistic over?
     For one thing, the situations aren't all that stressful, thanks to an
inherent lack of tension in the characters.  On the one hand there's Bob,
who proves to be a poor choice of roles for Alec Baldwin.  Baldwin can be
as menacing as they come when he's allowed to swagger a bit; Bob, however,
is generally too dim to be much of a challenge to Charles, or much of a
help to their mutual survival.  Charles, on the other hand, turns out to
be as filthy smart as he is filthy rich.  Every trivial piece of
information he has ever read has become part of his photographic memory,
making him a walking encyclopedia of primitive anthropology, basic
physics, first aid, forestry, engineering and alternative cures for
side-aches.  As you watch Charles fashion a compass from a magnetized pin
and a floating leaf, or construct a squirrel trap from bent twigs, or go
fishing with a thread from his sweater and a watch fob, you get the
distinct impression that you're watching a portrait of MacGyver as an
older man.  There's no reason to be worried about whether Charles will
make it.  He can do anything, and he knows it.
     And it's too bad that there isn't more drama to the characters in THE
EDGE, because in concept and execution it's often a thrilling adventure.
Director Lee Tamahori (ONCE WERE WARRIORS) crafts some fine action
sequences, notably those involving the survivors' ongoing battle with a
mythically persistent man-eating bear.  As photographed by Donald
McAlpine, THE EDGE is a satisfying experience both visually and
viscerally.
     Intellectually, it's an ambitious disappointment.  Stories set in the
wild usually assume that returning to a state of nature is the only way a
human can survive away from civilization, which makes it refreshing to
find a story which assumes that reason is an even more effective survival
tool.  It's particularly surprising that the writer is Mamet, who has been
known to have his characters turn animalistic while sitting at a desk.
(Which isn't to say that you can't spot a bit of cynicism creeping in --
it's hard to believe that he named his supermodel character "Mickey Morse"
by accident).  But THE EDGE isn't exactly about people forced to live by
their wits.  It's about one man who treats Arctic survival as a routine
open-book test, while a more simple-minded classmate cribs from his
answers.

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
     Tom Hanks is a nice guy, the guy everyone in Hollywood likes, so you
figure that he didn't get his first gig as a writer/director by demanding
it.  Not that he would need to -- getting on the good side of one of the
most bankable good guys in movies is a pretty smart business move, so
someone was going to give him a shot.  It could only be a fringe benefit
for Fox if Hanks' debut effort turned out to be a good film or a
successful one, and it is entirely possible that they may have gotten
both.  THAT THING YOU DO! is a nice movie, and one which a lot of people
are going to like, even if it falls apart at its conclusion.
     THAT THING YOU DO! opens in 1964 in Erie, Pennsylvania, where young
Guy Patterson (Tom Everett Scott) is working in his father's appliance
store by day and polishing his skills as a jazz drummer by night.  When a
local rock and roll band loses its drummer to an injury right before a big
talent contest, the members recruit Guy to sit in, and he joins Jimmy
Mattingly (Johnathan Schaech), Lenny Haise (Steve Zahn) and the bass
player (Ethan Embry) in the newly christened the One-ders.  Not only do
they win the contest, but their catchy original song "That Thing You Do"
becomes a local sensation.  In a blur, the One-ders become the Wonders,
sign with Play-Tone Records and find themselves on a national tour under
the guidance of Mr. White (Tom Hanks).  Naturally, success proves to be
more complicated than the Wonders expect.
     There are plenty of places Hanks could have chosen to take the
conflict in THAT THING YOU DO! -- Guy's father resisting his son's music
career, the deposed drummer growing bitter over missing the boat -- but by
the time we reach a scene in which both dad and drummer are gleefully
enjoying the Wonders' success it has become clear that Hanks is not
interested in that kind of melodrama.  THAT THING YOU DO! is intended
almost entirely as a playful romp, and for quite a while it succeeds.  Tom
Everett Scott, who bears more than a passing resemblance to Hanks, is a
charming protagonist as Guy; Steve Zahn, who bears more than a passing
resemblance to Hanks' former "Bosom Buddies" co-star Peter Scolari (who
himself makes a cameo appearance as a TV variety show host), is hilarious
as mischievous, wise-cracking Lenny.  THAT THING YOU DO! does a fine job
of capturing the exhilaration of newborn celebrity, nowhere better than in
a wonderfully crafted sequence where the band members hear their song on
the radio for the first time.  With so many films about real-life rock and
roll stars focused on the destructive nature of fame, it is a welcome
change of pace to find one which makes fame seem like so much fun.
     When Hanks finally decides that he does need some conflict, however,
he appears to manufacture it on the spot.  There is at least an attempt to
foreshadow Jimmy's ambivalence over the band's success, but he is such a
bland character compared to his bandmates that he barely even registers as
relevant.  Even worse served is the relationship between Jimmy and his
girlfriend Faye (Liv Tyler).  Though it had been little more than
wallpaper for most of the film, it suddenly becomes the defining crisis,
and you are likely to wonder if you missed something when Faye goes into a
tearful denunciation of Jimmy's inattentiveness.  There is not a single
scene between Jimmy and Faye to give us a sense of where their
relationship stands, nor is there a scene between Faye and Guy to provide
a foundation for the miraculous attraction which appears in the final five
minutes.  Hanks doesn't seem to know how he wants to end the story, except
that he wants it to end happily, and the effortless good humor of THAT
THING YOU DO! crumbles as soon as he tries to impose a structure.
     The strange thing is that even though Hanks bungles the big moments,
he does so many things right with the small moments that it is easy to
walk away with a smile, beginning with a great title song which actually
seems to deserve to be a hit.  Scenes at a rock and roll show (with Kevin
Pollak as a catch phrase-prone disc jockey/promoter) and a TV variety show
capture the glorious phoniness of early 60s show-biz, and Hanks evokes
HELP!-era Beatles with a montage of photo-op silliness.  Hanks himself
does solid work in the role of the all-business White, proving he's still
a much better actor than he is a director, and a considerably better
director than he is a writer.  THAT THING YOU DO! is clumsy but lovable,
the work of a nice guy who is far from finishing last as a film-maker,
even if he has a way to go before finishing first.

Title
Review for Vie rve des anges, La (1998)
THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS (LA VIE REVEE DES ANGES)
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Elodie Bouchez, Natacha Regnier, Gregoire Colin, Patrick
Mercado.
Screenplay:  Erick Zonca and Roger Bohbot.
Producer:  Francois Marquis.
Director:  Erick Zonca.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Many films have traced the arc of a romantic relationship in which
the two principals, despite initial appearances that they are a perfect
pair, are destined never to be happy together.  They have been sweet
(ANNIE HALL), sad (CASABLANCA), even sordid (9 1/2 WEEKS); indeed, they
have come in virtually every possible permutation.  THE DREAMLIFE OF
ANGELS is the first film I can recall which traces the arc of a platonic
friendship in the same terms.  Sparked by two superb performances in
complex roles, it's as affecting and involving as any tale in which the
doomed couple are romantic partners instead of pals.
     The two pals in THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS meet while working at a dress
factory in the French city of Lille.  Isa Tostin (Elodie Bouchez) is a
21-year-old itinerant stranded without a place to stay when the friend she
has coming looking for is nowhere to be found; Marie Thomas (Natacha
Gregnier) is a hard-edged woman living for free in the apartment of a
woman and her daughter severly injured in an auto accident.  Marie invites
Isa to stay with her, and the two kindred free spirits quickly become
inseparable.
     The dynamic between the two central characters works from the outset
only because they are so carefully, beautifully drawn by Erick Zonca and
Roger Bohbot.  The punky Isa and hair-trigger Marie click from their first
meeting, two rebels without a cent who delight in taunting bouncers at a
local nightclub or coming on to random men in a mall.  Their playful
irreverence makes for some entertaining scenes, and allows the two lead
actresses to develop a believable chemistry.  That kind of chemistry is
critical to a story about a relationship -- if Isa and Marie don't seem
like ideal best friends when they first get acquainted, the rest of THE
DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS becomes utterly irrelevant.
     It's just as important that the appearance of an ideal pairing proves
deceiving, and the film works just as well revealing that truth.  Where
Isa is sincerely searching for someone with whom she can connect, Marie
consistently sabotages every stable thing in her life.  Isa finds the
diary of the comatose teenager whose room she is occupying, and begins to
visit the girl in the hospital while manufacturing a dialogue with her.
Marie, meanwhile, dumps the chubby but loving Charly (Patrick Mercado) for
the callow, abusive Chris (Gregoire Colin), and refuses to put forth an
effort to land another job.  Though the psyches of the two women are
perhaps too easily distilled into a brief discussion of their respective
parentage, Bouchez and Gregnier flesh out their roles as opposite sides of
the same wounded coin.
     The character study of THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS is so strong that it's
easier to overlook its short-comings:  a drawn-out prologue before the two
women meet, under-developed supporting characters, and a third act which
takes an unnecessarily melodramatic turn.  Zonca's minimalist direction
never gets in the way of the performances, but it also does little to
complement them.  In fact, the story might have worked even better as a
two-character stage play.  That's not to take anything away from the
effectiveness of those characters in the film, or the skilled actresses
who bring them to life.  It's a thoroughly compelling exploration of
female bonding and un-bonding, a "chick flick" turned on its head.  The
disintegration of a friendship has rarely felt quite so tragic.

Title
Review for True Romance (1993)
Starring:  Christian Slater, Patricia Arquette, Gary Oldman,
        Dennis Hopper, Michael Rapaport, Bronson Pinchot, Brad Pitt,
        Christopher Walken, Val Kilmer.
Screenplay:  Quentin Tarrantino.
Director:  Tony Scott.
     What do you say about a movie when you thought it was filled with
great scenes, but that they didn't add up to a great movie?  That is
the problem I have after seeing TRUE ROMANCE, the new film from
screenwriter Quentin Tarrantino (RESERVOIR DOGS) and director Tony
Scott (BEVERLY HILLS COP 2, THE LAST BOY SCOUT).  As one might expect
from that pairing, this is no tea party; it's a violent, high energy
thrill ride filled with quirk characters usually engaged in shooting,
getting shot at, beating the hell out of someone, or getting the hell
beat out of them.  The pacing is frantic, and the character interplay
generally engaging.  Perhaps the problem is that when it's all over,
I'm not quite sure whether there was a point beyond a lot of sound and
fury signifying nothing.
     Clarence Worley (Christian Slater) is a Detroit comic book store
clerk with a fondness for Elvis Presley and martial arts movies.  While
taking in a triple-feature of the latter on his birthday, Clarence
meets Alabama (Patricia Arquette), a sweet young thing who turns out to
be a call girl hired by his boss.  However, it turns out to be more
than just business as the two get married the next morning.  When
Clarence visits Alabama's pimp (Gary Oldman) to pick up her things, he
ends up instead with a suitcase full of uncut cocaine.  The newlyweds
take off for California, a collection of none-too-pleased Mafiosi hard
at their heels.
     The first half-hour of TRUE ROMANCE, focusing on Clarence and
Alabama's whirlwind courtship, is perhaps its most coherent.  The story
is focused on two characters, and we have a chance to get to know
something about them.  As Clarence, Slater is cool and charismatic;
Arquette is appealing in a sketchy role (Tarrantino seems to need some
work writing women).  From there, the story launches into a collection
of vignettes, many of which pack a solid punch.  Dennis Hopper and
Christopher Walken share a tense, dynamic scene as Clarence's father
and a dapper mobster trying to discover Clarence's whereabouts,
respectively.  Bronson Pinchot has some standout moments as a Hollywood
sycophant with a particularly weak stomach.  Scene after scene was
either hilarious or gripping or both, but I felt distracted by the
sheer number of supporting characters who appeared then disappeared all
in a matter of minutes.  It's an odd sort of compliment which becomes
complaint:  I didn't get enough of almost every character.  The cast
list is filled with "names," but Michael Rapaport as Clarence's
struggling actor buddy has more screen time than most of them.  Much as
it did for me in THE PLAYER, though to a lesser degree, the star
counting just got in the way.
     The story is fairly simple; what makes the film stand out is
Tarrantino's marvelous ear for dialogue.  There's not a cliche'd line
to be found, and it makes the characters vibrant and alive.
Unfortunately, Tony Scott doesn't do the script the justice it
deserves.  I readily admit that I consider Scott a hack as a director.
He seems to have only two gears, monster close-up or rapid edit fight
scene, and he has cinematographer Jeffrey Kimball filter every shot
through a veil of smoke.  With the intensity of Tarrantino's material,
a subtler touch is required.  I give Scott credit for a nifty
roller-coaster sequence, but apart from that the monotony of the
direction wore on me.  He even cannibalizes his own silhouette sex
scene from TOP GUN.  I expected to hear "Take My Breath Away" at any
moment.
     When it comes right down to it, I was entertained by TRUE
ROMANCE.  Tarrantino knows how to deliver action and sharply drawn
characters which keep the viewer engaged.  I should also make special
mention of Hans Zimmer's infectious Calypso-tinged percussion score,
which lent a heightened sense of the surreal.  For me, however, this
was a textbook case of the whole not equaling the sum of the parts.
There was no real emotional linchpin, like Mr.  Orange in RESERVOIR
DOGS, to engage me beyond the purely visceral, and I can only care
about a movie so far if I didn't care about any of the characters.
     Like the roller-coaster in the film, TRUE ROMANCE offers on
philosophical truths, just a neck-snapping, gut churning white knuckler
of a time.  If that's what you're looking for, that's what you'll
find.  And then some.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
AMISTAD
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Djimon Hounsou, Matthew McConaughey, Anthony Hopkins, Morgan
Freeman, Nigel Hawthorne, Pete Postlethwaite, Stellan Skarsgaard.
Screenplay:  David Franzoni.
Producers:  Debbie Allen, Steven Spielberg and Colin Wilson.
Director:  Steven Spielberg.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  153 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     AMISTAD is no SCHINDLER'S LIST.  Think it unfair if you must, but
Steven Spielberg is going to face comparisons like that for the rest of
his film-making career.  In the case of AMISTAD, those comparisons are
going to be even harder to avoid, given the proximity in time (it's
Spielberg's first "serious" film since the Oscar-winning SCHINDLER in
1993), the subject matter (the trials of an oppressed people) and the
situational familiarity (if it's the December after a Spielberg dinosaur
movie, it must be time for a Spielberg fact-based historical epic).
Spielberg may never make another SCHINDLER'S LIST -- even the most
successful home run hitter isn't likely to knock _two_ World
Series-winning grand slams -- but he did raise his personal bar.  Now that
we know what he's capable of, we're not going to let him get away with
choosing less than stellar material.
     AMISTAD is hardly a half-hearted effort; in fact, there are a couple
of scenes which rank with Spielberg's best work as a director.  It is,
however, a piece of material which ends up providing far less impact than
it should.  The film is based on the true story of an 1840s court case
involving 44 black men and women, led by Cinque (Djimon Hounsou), accused
of piracy for an uprising against their capters on the Spanish slaving
ship "La Amistad."  Found off the coast of Long Island by a U.S. Navy
ship, the blacks become the subject of an intense and controversial series
of legal challenges.  Are they the property of the two surviving members
of the "Amistad" crew?  Are they the property of Queen Isabella (Anna
Paquin)?  Are they the property of the naval officers who claim salvage
rights?  Or are they the property of no one, free men illegally captured
from their homes in Africa?
     It is the latter point which is argued by attorney Roger Baldwin
(Matthew McConaughey), assisted by abolitionists Theodore Joadson (Morgan
Freeman) and Lewis Tappan (Stellan Skarsgaard), with further assistance
from former President John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins).  Faced with
direct opposition from struggling incumbent President Martin Van Buren
(Nigel Hawthorne, looking even more befuddled than he did in THE MADNESS
OF KING GEORGE) as the case becomes a flashpoint for Southern grumbling
over the slavery issue, Baldwin tries to overcome a profound language gap
and get Cinque to tell his own story.  AMISTAD is at its best when Cinque
is telling his story, allowing the electrifying performance of Djimon
Hounsou to take center stage.  Though he utters only half a dozen English
words through the entire film, Hounsou's impassioned work brings to life
an intelligent man trying to understand a thoroughly perplexing new world.
He is the heart and soul of AMISTAD.
     If it had ever been made clear that AMISTAD is Cinque's story, the
film could have been a masterpiece.  Instead, David Franzoni's script
allows too many characters to flirt with the impression that the story is
all about them.  Freeman, as a former slave turned anti-slavery advocate,
somehow gets first billing despite disappearing for most of the film;
McConaughey plays his noble lawyer from A TIME TO KILL with mutton chops,
but without a sense of what the case means to him; Hopkins'
borderline-senile Adams has little to do before delivering his oration
before the Supreme Court.  Franzoni also tosses off one of the story's
most crucial pieces of historical trivia -- that while slavery was still
legal in 1839, capturing Africans was not -- as though it were common
knowledge.  The "Amistad" case was a messy piece of history, but the
script only serves to make it messier, obscuring the human drama in a
muddle of over-plotting.
     When AMISTAD does give the Africans' plight its undivided attention,
it's a gripping piece of film-making.  As he did with the horror of the
concentration camps, Spielberg provides unflinching images of the horrors
of slave ships without exploiting those horrors.  He also creates a
splendid sequence in which one African's Bible lesson to Cinque is
cross-cut with one man's struggle of Christian conscience.  If only there
had been more of those moments, more singularity of purpose, more
complexity of character.  Spielberg brought in SCHINDLER scribe Steven
Zaillian to do some doctoring on the AMISTAD script, but the doctor
couldn't turn merely good into great.  AMISTAD is a solidly made film.
It's just no...well, you know.

Title
Review for Destiny Turns on the Radio (1995)
Starring:  Dylan McDermott, Nancy Travis, James LeGros, Jim Belushi,
           Quentin Tarantino.
Screenplay:  Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone.
Director:  Jack Baran.
     Adventurous young screenwriters and filmmakers often have to
walk a very fine line between originality and approachability.
Those seeking financing from sources like The Sundance Institute are
trying to win people over with a creative spirit, but a different
aesthetic is frequently required if the film is lucky enough to make
it into the marketplace.  DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO has already
been branded with the financially toxic label of "cult film," and it
is true that its tone bears more than a passing resemblance to films
like REPO MAN and WILD AT HEART.  But there's more than that to
DESTINY.  Although it is wild and quirky, occasionally to excess, it
is also surprisingly entertaining and grounded in real emotion by an
exceptional performance from Nancy Travis.
     Dylan McDermott stars as Julian Goddard, a bank robber just
escaped from prison after three years.  He is picked up along the
road by an odd fellow named Johnny Destiny (Quentin Tarantino), and
the two men head for Las Vegas.  There Julian hopes to be reunited
both with his partner-in-crime Harry Thoreau (James LeGros), who
should have his half of the bank haul, and with his girlfriend
Lucille (Nancy Travis).  Unfortunately, Lucille has since hooked up
with casino boss Tuerto (Jim Belushi), and the money was stolen from
Thoreau on the night of the robbery ... as it turns out, by Johnny
Destiny.  As Julian attempts to win back Lucille's heart and Thoreau
prepares for another meeting with Destiny, they all discover that
there are some things you just can't plan for in Las Vegas, "a town
of limitless possibilities."
     It would be foolish to suggest that the first thing one would
notice about DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO would be anything but it's
rather off-center characteristics.  A motel with rooms named after
Marilyn Monroe films, a shared dream which results in a pregnancy
and an electrified swimming pool which acts as a gateway to another
reality are not exactly the stuff of your average multiplex picture.
There are occasions when those elements come perilously close to
overkill, or indeed topple into overkill, but they are rare.  The
main reason screenwriters Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone and
director Jack Baran succeed is that most of the strangeness comes
from the characters, and they are well-developed and well-performed
almost to a one.  Dylan McDermott and James LeGros play off each
other well as the two thieves, each with his own ideas about the
strange events of the story, and Jim Belushi is both comic and
menacing as the big shot with a penchant for grabbing is crotch.
The smaller roles are full of winners as well:  Barry Henley and
Richard Edson as two cops in terrible sport coats; Tracey Walter as
Julian's reclusive father; Bobcat Goldthwait as an undercover cop;
especially David Cross as a hyperkinetic talent agent.  Only Quentin
Tarantino, who should be declared legally charisma-impaired, bombs
in his role.  That's a problem, because Johnny Destiny requires
_presence_, not just attitude.
     Though DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO could have been little more
than a loose conglomeration of strange scenes, the film is held
together by the location.  Las Vegas becomes a kind of character in
the film, a real-life mirage of false hopes.  One character (the
comically named recording executive Vinnie Vidivici) describes the
city as "smelling of formaldehyde," and that feeling is part of the
story.  Vegas is where dreams and careers go to die, where doomed
marriages are born, and where chance turns everyone into a loser
eventually.
     It is Nancy Travis who drives that theme home.  For all
practical purposes, DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO really revolves
around Lucille, a casino singer stuck in the place where nobody gets
"discovered."  When Julian and her one big chance at fame turn up on
the same day, Lucille faces some tough choices between her dreams of
happiness and her pragmatism.  It is an intriguing character,
wonderfully played by an actress who has been stuck too often in
minor roles in bad films like GREEDY.  And it's a shame that too
many viewers won't see her performance because of the strange story
surrounding her.  DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO is aimed at those with
a taste for the surreal, but it also has a very real heart which
makes it more than the sum of its parts.

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
     A community is being terrorized by a brutal, almost supernaturally
vicious man-eater, frightening the residents into a state of panic.  The
local authority figure wants to do something to stop the killing, but his
supervisor is more interested in economic concerns, and does not heed the
warnings.  Then one attack becomes the last straw, and an eccentric killer
of the man-eaters is brought in to eliminate the menace.  Together, the
local authority figure and the eccentric hunter set out alone on a quest
that becomes almost personal.
     PAWS.  CLAWS.  GAPING MAWS.  Pick your favorite (or least obnoxious)
analogy-inspiring epithet, because no matter how stridently the makers of
THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS insist that it is "based on a true story," it
owes at least as much to JAWS as it does to real life.  The place is
Africa and the year is 1898, but it could just as easily by Amity Island
in 1975; engineer John Henry Patterson (Val Kilmer), supervising the
building of a bridge for a railroad line, is our Sheriff Brody, great
white hunter Charles Remington (Michael Douglas) is Quint, and Patterson's
boss Beaumont (Tom Wilkinson) is the mayor.  And of course, one impossibly
large and single-minded great white shark is replaced by two impossibly
large and single-minded lions.  All right, so there isn't a Matt Hooper to
be found, but don't try to tell me this comparison is a reach, especially
when there is a scene in which Patterson and Remington attempt to attract
their prey by laying down what amounts to a chum line around a building
where they are lying in wait.
     Ordinarily, it is be a remarkably bad idea for a film in any genre
to make such obvious references to the classics of its genre, because they
only serve to emphasize that you are not watching a much better movie of
the same kind.  Yet there is something fairly satisfying about THE GHOST
AND THE DARKNESS, because it is a kind of suspense film you just don't see
very often.  A force of nature in its own element can be a truly
frightening thing; give that force of nature a vaguely unnatural
personality, and you've got the ingredients for one scary piece of work.
Screenwriter William Goldman knows what works in this kind of film, and
when the lions are on the prowl in THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS, it is
surprisingly gripping.  Director Stephen Hopkins (BLOWN AWAY) directs his
action scenes with efficiency and a sense of barely-controlled chaos, and
he is able to make the lions' every appearance a time to scoot to the edge
of your seat.  He may be no Spielberg, but that's even true of Spielberg
sometimes.
     The reason THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS never approaches JAWS in
overall quality is what happens between the attacks.  The performances are
almost uniformly under-stated, with Val Kilmer doing solid work as the
confident Patterson, and John Kani and Brian McCardie are appealing as two
of Patterson's colleagues on the bridge project.  However, they all find
themselves saddled with characterizations which hover somewhere between
spare and insufficient.  That is even more true of Douglas' Remington than
it is of the other characters -- he is a hunter with a tortured past whose
one moment of introspection is supposed to define his entire personality.
Douglas is an actor given to playing characters broadly, and even though
he is relatively restrained he still appears to be camping it up compared
to his co-stars.  You never care nearly as much about the individual
humans in THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS as you should, because you don't
really know who they are.
     Still, at least there _are_ characters in THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS,
and at least their confrontations with their adversaries get your
adrenaline pumping.  There is a tremendous primal appeal to the battle
between man and beast, and with cinematographer Vilmos Zsigmond providing
glorious photography and Jerry Goldsmith turning in one of his most
effective recent scores, THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS turns it into solid,
suspenseful film-making.  Perhaps there is less inherent claustrophobic
tension when you take the men out of a boat and put them on dry land, but
THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS makes sure you understand who has the home
field advantage here.  You may feel as though you have seen some of this
before, but you haven't seen it in a long time, and you might realize that
you have been missing it.  Classics are few and far between; THE GHOST AND
THE DARKNESS just puts Patterson in a tree, the tree on the savannah,
lions on the savannah.  Farewell and adieu to you fair Spanish ladies...

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
     Having already self-cannibalized the 1961 animated 101 DALMATIANS in
the successful 1996 live-action version, Disney had to look for a more
creative way to self-cannibalize in the sequel 102 DALMATIANS. In a scene
from the new, equally unnecessary film, dog rescue facility operator Kevin
(Ioan Gruffudd) and probation officer Chloe (Alice Evans) share a romantic
dinner while their respective menageries of pooches share an evening with
a video: Disney's LADY AND THE TRAMP. While Kevin and Chloe eat their
spaghetti and meatballs, director Kevin Lima intercuts snippets of LADY
AND THE TRAMP's famous "Bella Notte" bistro scene. How wonderfully
romantic Kevin and Chloe's relationship must be ... by association.
     102 DALMATIANS would have had to work hard to be as actively
irritating as its John Hughes-penned precursor. Instead of being actively
irritating, this one registers as merely tedious. Glenn Close returns as
Cruella De Vil, just paroled after three years in prison for her 101
DALMATIANS shenanigans. It seems she has been cured of her thirst for fur
by a new aversion therapy technique, so the aforementioned dog rescue
facility operator Kevin has no problem with Cruella stepping in as
benefactor when funds are short. Aforementioned probation officer Chloe is
suspicious, however -- rightly so, it turns out, as Cruella pulls a
FLOWERS FOR ALGERNON and reverts to her pre-therapy self. That means
dalmatians everywhere are in peril when Cruella teams up with designer
Jean Pierre Le Pelt (Gerard Depardieu) to finally create her long-desired
spotted coat.
     Like the first film, 102 DALMATIANS is designed primarily as a great
big love-fest between the audience members and the on-screen animals.
There are fewer puppies this time around, as well as a talking macaw
(voiced by Eric Idle) who thinks he's a dog, but there are still plenty of
cuddly canines to go around. Unfortunately, they're almost never asked to
do anything more interesting than sit around and look cuddly. Lima
(co-director of Disney's TARZAN, making his first live-action feature)
generally appears content to let the awww appeal of his canine co-stars
take the place of action, adventure or humor. You've probably passed the
age where 102 DALMATIANS would appeal to you if you no longer respond to
puppies in a movie with a shriek of, "Puppies!"
     That same overwhelming sense of laziness permeates the film from
start to finish. It's blessedly true that 102 DALMATIANS does not feature
a single shot of someone getting his genitals electrocuted, or any mayhem
that would bump the rating even to a PG. The slapstick is basically
harmless stuff involving dogs biting villains in the rear or Cruella's
henchman/chauffeur (Tim McInnerny) injuring and reinjuring his hands. But
there really isn't even all that much slapstick. There's a whole lot of
exposition, and it doesn't lead up to anything. In a way, up until the
final showdown on a bakery assembly line, it's all rather hypnotically
pleasant -- no off-putting violence, no real peril, and no personality.
     There's also the romantic sub-plot involving Kevin and Chloe, two of
the most blandly attractive characters committed to the screen since the
last Freddie Prinze Jr. movie. While Close does her best to inject some
life into the proceedings -- still playing Cruella as a drag queen icon
rather than a nasty villain -- the protagonists practically vanish into
the background. Like far too many sequels, this one just lies there
limply, practically daring you not to grant it good will based on another
movie. It's bad enough to do that when the other movie in question was
successful, but lousy. It's even worse when the good will being traded
upon comes from a truly classic cinematic moment. Not even a clip from
LADY AND THE TRAMP can make 102 DALMATIANS worth anything more than a
snore. And it doesn't help to prove that cute animated dogs are often
preferable to cute real-life dogs.

Title
Review for Cold Comfort Farm (1995) (TV)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Kate Beckinsale, Eileen Atkins, Rufus Sewell, Ian McKellen,
Joanna Lumley, Freddie Jones, Ivan Kaye, Sheila Burrell, Stephen Fry.
Screenplay:  Malcolm Bradbury.
Producers:  Richard Broke, Antony Root.
Director:  John Schlesinger.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     COLD COMFORT FARM is directed with such sparkle and confidence that I
almost couldn't believe John Schlesinger was behind the camera...at least
not the John Schlesinger whose recent contributions to the cinematic canon
were suspense misfires like PACIFIC HEIGHTS, THE INNOCENT and EYE FOR AN
EYE.  Even in his glory days of MIDNIGHT COWBOY, THE DAY OF THE LOCUST and
MARATHON MAN, one would hardly say that "light-hearted" was an adjective
applicable to his work.  Yet here we find Schlesinger tackling the
much-beloved Stella Gibbons novel, a parody with a giddy and irreverent
tone, and nailing it.  COLD COMFORT FARM is thoroughly entertaining and
consistently surprising.
     Our heroine is Flora Poste (Kate Beckinsale), a young woman of the
cultured class who finds herself orphaned.  With only a modest income left
by her parents' estate, Flora begins searching for a relative willing to
take her in.  She finds one in cousin Judith Starkadder (Eileen Atkins),
who seems eager to have "Robert Poste's child" come to Cold Comfort Farm
in Sussex to right a wrong done to her father.  There Flora finds a
singularly odd collection of relations:  Judith's husband Amos (Ian
McKellen), a fire-and-brimstone preacher; lusty, Hollywood-obsessed cousin
Seth (Rufus Sewell); and Aunt Ada Doom (Sheila Burrell), the mysterious
and domineering matriarch who once saw "something nasty in the woodshed."
To Flora, however, they are simply a challenge, as she sets herself to the
task of bringing a bit more life to bleak Cold Comfort Farm.
     Stella Gibbons' novel took aim at the over-wrought potboilers which
proliferated in the late 20s and early 30s, as well as Gothic tales in the
_Wuthering Heights_ mode.  A literary satire is a real challenge to film
-- it's like trying to pull the humor out of that annual contest to
duplicate Hemingway's prose style and put it on screen -- but screenwriter
Malcolm Bradbury has come up with the clever premise of following Flora's
budding writing career.  Grasping at the perfect metaphor for a sunset
(she can never quite figure out what "the golden orb" is supposed to do)
over her open D. H. Lawrence novels, Flora allows us a bit of insight into
the florid writing Gibbons was winking at.
     But COLD COMFORT FARM is even more successful at turning the
conventions of those genres' plots upside down.  Ordinarily, you would
expect to find the main point of a story like this to be Flora's nosing
into the family secrets until she finds out what wrong was done to her
father, and what that "something nasty" was that Aunt Ada saw in the
woodshed.  Those secrets turn out to be red herrings; it doesn't matter
_what_ they are, only that everyone at Cold Comfort Farm is living under
the weight of those long-past events, waiting for someone like Flora to
come along and push each of them in the direction of the one thing that
will make them genuinely excited.  The result is some hilarious moments
and sharp performances, as we watch Amos improvising a sermon before his
Church of (literally) Quivering Brethren, and Seth grabbing his chance at
big-screen stardom, and the characters are rendered with a refreshing lack
of concern over whether they are being condescended to.
     That is a criticism some detractors have leveled against COLD COMFORT
FARM, and I think they are missing the point.  COLD COMFORT FARM is a
parody, and the characters are _supposed_ to be exaggerated the literary
types they represent:  the maid's daughter is always pregnant, Seth is
always shirtless and randy, and Aunt Ada and Judith are always making
ominous pronouncements.  But Schlesinger and Bradbury show Gibbons'
characters with an eye to the basic desire for happiness which Flora is
trying to uncover.  They're not sneering at rural folk; they're sneering
at the literary conventions which turned them into mournful eternal
victims.  Flora brings a breath of life to Cold Comfort Farm, and
Schlesinger's COLD COMFORT FARM brings a breath of life to a decidedly
musty film season.

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Jane March, Ruben Blades, Lesley Ann
Warren, Brad Dourif, Scott Bakula.
Screenplay:  Matthew Chapman and Billy Ray.
Director:  Richard Rush.
     Director Richard Rush made his last film in 1980, a sly thriller
called THE STUNT MAN which was one of the year's critical favorites.
He waited nearly fifteen years before making his next film, COLOR OF
NIGHT.  And it looks like he may have to wait another fifteen years
before anyone *lets* him direct again.  COLOR OF NIGHT is just awful in
every conceivable way, lurching between tedium and wretched excess for
an excruciating two hours, and giving Bruce Willis his second
consecutive appearance in a first-degree bomb (following NORTH).
     Willis plays Bill Capa, a New York psychologist who is traumatized
when one of his patients commits suicide during a session.  He decides
to take a vacation in Los Angeles, and visits old college buddy Bob
Moore (Scott Bakula), himself a successful therapist.  When Moore is
murdered, evidence suggests someone in his Monday night therapy group,
which Capa takes over.  Soon, however, it appears that Capa may also be
the target of intended foul play.  He is also the target of attentions
from a young woman named Rose (Jane March) who seems to have a number
of secrets.
     If it were not for my personal code of ethics, I would reveal
every plot twist in COLOR OF NIGHT, since they are probably the only
thing which will keep anyone watching until the bitter end.  On the
other hand, I'm not even sure it's necessary.  COLOR OF NIGHT is so
sledgehammer-subtle that it would surprise me if anyone couldn't figure
out the identity of the killer in the first scene in which the
individual appears.  The attempts to turn the other characters into
suspects are so inept that I began to suspect that screenwriters
Matthew Chapman and Billy Ray were like those deeply troubled criminals
who *want* everyone to know exactly who did it.  Sadly, it's just one
of the many ways they treat the audience like it's made up of morons.
In one sequence, the killer uses a car to push another car off the top
level of a parking garage, endowed with a supernatural foreknowledge of
exactly where Willis is going to be walking below.  Then there are more
basic matters of stupidity, such as the condition from which the film
takes its title, Willis' inability to see red after the death of his
patient.  It has absolutely no bearing on the story, is sloppily
presented through occasional perspective shots, and is just another
example of the offensively simplistic psychology employed by the
screenwriters.
     The main question is whether the true criminals are the writers or
the actors.  With so much scenery chewing going on, they must have been
able to save a fortune on catering.  But who was the most abysmal?
Ruben Blades as the loose cannon detective who appears to be in dire
need of therapy himself?  Lesley Ann Warren as the
kleptomaniac/sexaholic refugee from a Tennessee Williams play?  Brad
Dourif (best-unknown as the voice of Chucky in the CHILD'S PLAY films)
as the obsessive-compulsive lawyer doing his impression of Dustin
Hoffman in RAIN MAN ("Yeah, definitely 58 books, definitely 58")?
COLOR OF NIGHT may have set back the cause of group therapy 30 years
with this collection of twitchy banshees.  And watching over them all
is the ever-smirking Willis, who even when he is supposed to be
radiating understanding looks like he's about to put on a pair of
shades and break into the Seagram's Wine Cooler jingle.  The whole
bunch should have their SAG privileges suspended.
     COLOR OF NIGHT was the subject of a much-publicized battle with
the MPAA over explicit sex scenes which threatened to earn it an NC-17
rating, but don't be duped.  COLOR OF NIGHT is about as sexy as a lump
of cold mashed potatoes, and less aesthetically pleasing.  It's also
extremely violent, particularly in the last fifteen minutes which
includes some intensely unpleasant business with a nail gun.  In 1980
Richard Rush clearly knew how to make a good movie.  I guess directing
isn't exactly like riding a bike.  Or in this case, like driving a
garbage truck.

Title
Review for Village of the Damned (1995)
Starring:  Christopher Reeve, Kirstie Alley, Linda Kozlowski.
Screenplay:  David Himmelstein.
Director:  John Carpenter.
     It's difficult to say whether it's a devoted core following or
monumental chutzpah which accounts for John Carpenter continuing to
receive the possessory credit before his films.  It has been over a
decade since Carpenter made STARMAN, the last of his films to
receive any kind of critical or popular reception; the intervening
years have been characterized by cult favorites like BIG TROUBLE IN
LITTLE CHINA, ambitious failures like PRINCE OF DARKNESS and
ill-advised catastrophes like MEMOIRS OF AN INVISIBLE MAN.  So
seeing a film hyped as "John Carpenter's VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED"
doesn't exactly set my heart racing.  And it's too bad, because as
stylish as it is, VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED could have been a winner if
not for some truly atrocious acting.
     In the small town of Midwich, population 2000, it's a lovely,
ordinary day.  Dr. Alan Chaffee (Christopher Reeve) is out on his
rounds; school principal Jill McGowan (Linda Kozlowski) is busy
keeping the school fair running.  Then, at precisely 10:00 a.m.,
every living thing in Midwich falls unconscious.  When they all
awaken six hours later, no one is quite sure what has happened ...
or why ten women are pregnant, having conceived during the mass
blackout.  National Science Foundation epidemeologist Dr. Susan
Verner (Kirstie Alley) comes to study the phenomenon, and follows
the children as they grow.  But it doesn't take a scientist to
figure out that something is very strange about the children of the
Midwich blackout, and that every person in town lives in fear of
them.
     Even in his most uneven efforts, Carpenter has demonstrated a
great sense for how to use the screen.  VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED is a
typically impressive piece of visual direction, filled with subtly
creepy scenes.  The shots of the town during the blackout, with
streets and schoolyards littered with bodies, are serenely chilling.
There is one very nice split screen image after a key plot point,
and a simmering level of menace in the scenes of the 7-year-old
children in their paired marches.  Unlike Carpenter's previous
remake attempt, 1982's THE THING, VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED doesn't rely
on gruesome special effects in place of a well-constructed
atmosphere.  Most of the time VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED has just the
right feel.
     If only Carpenter were as astute a judge of material and actors
as he is of shot composition.  VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED, based on a
novel by John Wyndham and a 1960 film of the same name, is an
inherently disturbing story, but screenwriter David Himmelstein
feels obliged to spice it up with OUTBREAK-style mass hysteria,
paranoia and government conspiracies in moving the scene to
contemporary America.  He also struggles with the story's broad time
frame, which moves clumsily over an eight year span.  Narrative has
never been one of Carpenter's strengths, and the failure to include
something as simple as a "2 Years Later" caption makes for some
unnecessarily awkward transitions.
     Directing actors has also been a longtime problem for
Carpenter, Jeff Bridges' work in STARMAN asside, but in VILLAGE OF
THE DAMNED that problem is tripled by some mind-boggling casting
choices.  Christopher Reeve as the tragedy-stricken, intense hero?
Kirstie Alley as a flinty, secretive government scientist?  Mark
Hamill as the town priest ... or for that matter, as anything but a
cartoon or video game voice-over these days?  Why not Macaulay
Culkin as the chief of police?  The child actors are not much
better, neither emotionless enough to be truly other-worldly or
human enough to be the kind of "hidden threat among us" which can be
so frightening.  Only Linda Kozlowski (best known as CROCODILE
DUNDEE's sweetheart) is at all believable in her role.
     VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED almost pulls out a last second victory
with a tense, well-staged climax, but it just isn't enough.  It is a
film with tone to spare, but like many of John Carpenter's works, it
could stand to trade some tone for a little substance.

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
     For more than forty years -- certainly since the 1956 film version of
THE KING AND I -- Yul Brynner has been the King of Siam, and the King of
Siam has been Yul Brynner. Actors often define roles, and roles often
define actors (the latter much to the actors' chagrin), but rarely as a
role/actor identification been so strong, and so reciprocal. A Yul Brynner
impression without the words "puzzlement" or "et cetera" just isn't a Yul
Brynner impression; a King of Siam without a bald dome just isn't the King
of Siam.
     ANNA AND THE KING may not be Rodgers and Hammerstein, but Chow
Yun-Fat still faced a vexing challenge: re-defining a part so distinctly
connected to one man. It is the authoritative grace with which Chow pulls
off that feat that makes ANNA AND THE KING such an unexpected pleasure. 
The familiar story is based on the diaries of Anna Leonowens (Jodie
Foster), a Victorian era Englishwoman who accepts a unique employment
opportunity. A widow with a 10-year-old son (Tom Felton), Anna travels to
Siam to serve as tutor for the children of King Mongkut (Chow Yun-Fat),
the country's revered monarch. Though Anna bristles at some of Mongkut's
customs, she grows eventually to respect his commitment to progress and
learning. But the meeting of East and West becomes political as well as
personal, as Siam faces threats from the Eurpoean-colonized nations
surrounding it.
     Since the story is ultimately an epic romance, nothing is more
important to ANNA AND THE KING's success than the connection between its
principal characters. Foster, not surprisingly, is quite good as Anna,
striking an effective balance between her edgy independence and prolonged
mourning over her husband. Her tough-love teacher routine with Mongkut's
eldest son Chulalongkorn (Keith Chin) is a bit overly familiar, but she
comes thoroughly to life when she's on screen with the King. Chow then
proceeds to do everything one could possibly ask of an actor. When
necessary, he is convincingly aloof and regal, looking and behaving every
bit the stern ruler. He also shows a wonderfully light touch, lending a
devilish smile to his jabs at Anna's strong will. Even the more overtly
emotional scenes -- clearly meant to pound home the heaviness of the head
that wears the crown -- are nicely under-played. Those familiar with Chow
primarily as an action star should take note: his versatility keeps the
romantic angle in ANNA AND THE KING fresh and convincing.
     He's not quite so lucky with the political angle. Much of the film's
second half is dedicated to an attempted overthrow of Mongkut by unknown
forces, leading to battle scenes and narrow escapes. The double-dealings
are pretty conventional stuff, leading to an exploding bridge climax that
feels like it belongs in an entirely different film (one directed by Jan
De Bont, perhaps). In fact, ANNA AND THE KING stumbles whenever director
Andy Tennant draws too much attention either to finger-wagging at cultural
imperialism (a blowsy British merchant insulting Mongkut at a dinner
party) or to his own direction (an operatically staged beheading). Even in
a film that runs two and a half hours, there's just not enough time to
spend away from its complicated central relationship.
     Fortunately, ANNA AND THE KING is ultimately redeemed by its
splendor. No, not the splendor of Luciana Arrighi's production design or
Caleb Deschanel's cinematography, though both pieces of work are
exceptional. It's the splendor of Chow Yun-Fat that carries ANNA AND THE
KING through its occasional stretches of anachronistic anti-colonial
posturing and trite palace intrigue. Creating the image of a king is a
difficult enough task; re-creating a king who is already an icon would
seem to be thankless. Chow is nothing less than a presence that takes over
ANNA AND THE KING -- with his humor, his poise, his majesty ... et cetera,
et cetera, et cetera.

Title
Review for Mad Dog Time (1996)
Director:  Larry Bishop.
Screenplay:  Larry Bishop.
Producer:  Judith Rutherford James.
Starring:  Jeff Goldblum, Richard Dreyfuss, Ellen Barkin, Gabriel Byrne,
Larry Bishop, Diane Lane, Kyle MacLachlan.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, brief nudity, sexual situations, profanity).
Running Time:  95 minutes.
     It is a tough call which annoying trend represented by MAD DOG TIME
is more annoying.  Is it the Cameo-Rama, the insistence upon turning every
scene into a celebrity "Where's Waldo?"  Or is it the Pulp Affliction, the
impression that a film spilling over with kooky, garrulous gangsters must
also be spilling over with style points?  Writer-director Larry Bishop has
a terrible case of both in MAD DOG TIME, a simply awful piece of
pseudo-cool tripe which holds the ignominious distinction of being the
1996 heir apparent to THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD as "Film
Most Likely to Make You Wish No Aspiring Director had _Ever_ Seen a
Quentin Tarantino Film."
     Jeff Goldblum stars as Mickey Holiday, a hired gun with more enemies
than he can count.  As if it weren't bad enough that everyone who can pull
a trigger wants to challenge him to a quick-draw contest, Mickey now faces
the return of his former boss Vic (Richard Dreyfuss), a big shot who has
been spending some time in a mental hospital.  It seems Vic is likely to
be unhappy that Mickey hooked up with Vic's girl Grace (Diane Lane) while
he was away, even though Mickey is now involved with Grace's sister Rita
(Ellen Barkin).  Vic, however, faces problems of his own from rivals who
think the time is right to move in on his territory, rivals including Jake
(Kyle MacLachlan) and Ben London (Gabriel Byrne).  Vic's solution to all
his problems is Nick Falco (Larry Bishop), a cool gunman more than capable
of dispatching each and every one of Vic's enemies.
     Bishop, the son of comic Joey Bishop, clearly wanted to take a
contemporary crime caper and mix it with the swingin' sensibility of his
dad's old Rat Pack buddies.  The soundtrack is spilling over with 40s and
50s standards, including a couple by the Chairman of the Board himself,
and everyone walks around in tuxedos (for the gents) or slinky evening
dresses (for the dames) radiating smoothness.  However, in trying to
combine OCEAN'S ELEVEN with RESERVOIR DOGS, Bishop has cranked out a
script with so much utterly ridiculous dialogue that you might not even
notice that you don't care a thing about anyone or anything in MAD DOG
TIME.  Gabriel Byrne is the worst offender, trying to make his Irish
accent sound like Brooklyn Italian while blathering on about other
characters in lines which mistake simple, inane rhymes and alliteration
for cleverness.  There is an almost hypnotic monotony to the artificial
cadence of the speech in MAD DOG TIME; after a while, it begins to sound
like it was written by the R-rated evil twin of Dr. Seuss.
     With nothing to say and a truly grating way of saying it, Bishop
resorts to trotting out cameos of guys who don't seem to belong on the
same planet, let alone in the same movie.  Billy Idol and Gregory Hines?
Joey Bishop and Burt Reynolds?  Paul Anka and Richard Pryor (whose
appearance seems not only unnecessary, but just plain cruel)?  Bishop even
goes for obscurity points by bringing in OCEAN'S ELEVEN cast member Henry
Silva as a narcoleptic hood, and flash-in-the-pan Christopher Jones of
WILD IN THE STREETS as one of Goldblum's challengers.  It doesn't matter
that none of them has anything to do except show off a skin tone which,
whether natural or induced by lighting or makeup, makes many of them look
like prime candidates for the George Hamilton Memorial Melanoma Wing of
Cedars-Sinai.  Even the notoriously bronzed Goldblum looks like a British
schoolboy next to the burnt sienna complexion of Anka, Reynolds and Bishop
himself.
     At times, Bishop seems to be making a desperate attempt to convince
the audience that he is aware of the ludicrous excesses in MAD DOG TIME,
giving Goldblum a couple of meta-conscious lines which refer to
characters, situations or dialogue.  There are even a couple of moderately
inspired moments, like having Dreyfuss and Reynolds, owners of two of the
most distinctive laughs in Hollywood, cackling away as they face each
other.  But when a film-maker spends this much time subjecting viewers to
a story which exists only as a place to put his obnoxious Rat Pack
stand-ins and have them mouth labored, grossly unfunny lines, he loses the
right to pretend it's all a lark.  The actors may have had fun playing
versions of Frankie, Sammy, Dean and the boys, but that fun isn't likely
to be shared by an audience.  MAD DOG TIME is a self-indulgent homage
masquerading as hipster cinema.  Worse yet, it's like THE CANNONBALL RUN
with cocktails and shark-skin.

Title
Review for Into the West (1992)
     Miramax is marketing INTO THE WEST as a "family film," and while
it's admirable to do so, I'm not sure it's the best idea.  On the one
hand, the deliberate pace appeared to lose the children in the audience
when I saw the film.  On the other, adults without children tend to
stay away from "family films," and that would be a shame.  INTO THE
WEST is a charming, wise and gentle film that shows enough confidence
to build slowly to a satisfying climax.
     INTO THE WEST is the story of two Irish youngsters,
twelve-year-old Tito Reilley (Ruaidhri Conroy) and his eight-year-old
brother Ossie (Ciaran Fitzgerald).  Raised among the nomadic
Travellers, the boys are brought to Dublin by their widowed Papa
(Gabriel Byrne), a hard drinker dealing with his wife's death by
removing himself from his past.  On the day they arrive in Dublin,
there is another new arrival:  a fantastic white stallion called Tir na
nOg (Gaelic for "land of eternal youth") who attaches himself to
Ossie.  When authorities discover the horse in the Reilley's flat, they
remove it and sell it off to a nasty horse breeder (John Kavanagh) who
turns Tir na nOg into a champion show jumper.  The two boys, however,
have other ideas, and decide to free the horse, becoming fugitives in
the process.
     I spent the first half hour or so of INTO THE WEST a bit edgy and
uninvolved, but it slowly began to occur to me that there might be an
intentional reason.  The scenes set in Dublin are dark and
claustrophobic, but as the action spreads into the Irish countryside
the film takes on a lyrical majesty.  INTO THE WEST juxtaposes the
mundane modernism represented by the city with the mythical wonder of
the Old Ireland, shown as both the boys and Papa travel into the
untamed West.  It's a theme similar to the one director Mike Newell
explored in his last film, 1992's ENCHANTED APRIL:  the lifting of
spirit caused by removing oneself from the city.  While INTO THE WEST
is not quite as successful overall, there is still a quiet grace to the
visual narrative, thanks to cinematographer Tom Sigel's beautiful
photography of hills and coastlines.
     The performances are not quite as engaging as the look of the
film.  Gabriel Byrne, as the dour and laconic Papa, doesn't carry off
his emotional scenes particularly well.  David Kelley is crusty but
basically cliche as the boys Old World grandfather, and Ellen Barkin,
Byrne's real-life wife, has a bland role as a Traveller who helps Papa
search for the boys.  Fortunately, the two young newcomers who carry
the film are better.  Ruaidhri Conroy is sharp and good-natured as the
protective older brother, if at times a bit affected.  Ciaran
Fitzgerald, however, is a scene-stealing charmer with great comic
sensibility.  The two are just right as brothers, and their scenes
together are light and well-directed.
     If Jim Sheridan's script is a bit thin, it's because the story is
secondary to the feel of the film.  The villainous horse breeder and
his police-officer henchman are perfunctory characters; the story might
have been done just as well without them.  I also thought the portrayal
of the Travellers was underdeveloped, but I'll admit that's because
I've studied Celtic folklore and wanted to see more.  Still, I never
really minded the lack of depth because the mystical tone seemed right
on.
     I noted earlier that INTO THE WEST was less successful as afilm
for children, and that assessment comes simply from listening.  If
you've ever seen a movie with an audience comprised largely of
children, you know that you get a minute-by-minute account of what they
think about it.  One girl said to her mother, "I don't know what he's
saying;" it seems the Irish accents were a problem.  An older boy said
simply, "Nothing's happening."  While hardly a scientific test, these
and other comment seemed to suggest that young ones without long
attention spans might be less than enthralled.
     INTO THE WEST may be, as my young audience-mate noted, a film
where "nothing's happening."  It's not a rollicking adventure, or a
HOME ALONE-style comedy.  However, for anyone with a taste for rich
atmosphere spiced with a touch of magic might be pleasantly surprised.

Title
Review for Croupier (1998)
CROUPIER
(The Shooting Gallery)
Starring:  Clive Owen, Gina McKee, Alex Kingston, Alexander Morton, Kate
Hardie, Paul Reynolds, Nick Reding, Nicholas Ball.
Screenplay:  Paul Mayersberg.
Producers:  Jonathan Cavendish.
Director:  Mike Hodges.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be R for sexual situations, nudity,
profanity, adult themes and violence)
Running Time:  91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Good noir-ish thrillers are so few and far between that it almost
breaks my heart when one with so much going for it stumbles so badly down
the stretch. That's the situation with CROUPIER, a slick tale set in the
world of a London casino. Jack Manfred (Clive Owen) is an aspiring
novelist having trouble making ends meet while he tries to get something
published. Fortunately, he has a back-up skill: Having been raised around
casinos by his compulsive gambler father (Nicholas Ball) and having worked
in one in South Africa, Jack is an adept black jack dealer and roulette
wheel operator. His talent lands him a job in a casino where the money is
great, the rules of conduct strict and the hours challenging to his
relationship with his girlfriend Marion (Gina McKee). It also introduces
him to some potentially dangerous characters, like a patron named Jani
("E.R.'s" Alex Kingston) who wants Jack to help her with a little insider
job.
     From the outset, CROUPIER looks like it has all the classic film noir
elements. The protagonist narrates the story in a hard-boiled voice-over,
using a third-person description of events as Jack forms his experiences
into something he can write. Owen's laconic performance as Jack is
perfectly pitched; he's got that Campbell Scott deadpan thing going, which
is particularly appropriate since he's a dead ringer for Scott. There's a
promising femme fatale in Kingston's Jani, who slowly insinuates herself
into Jack's life before dropping the hammer. And Paul Mayersberg's script
offers a potent combination of sly dialogue, effective characterizations
and intriguing introduction to the world of the croupier. As the world of
the casino becomes ever more attractive to Jack, CROUPIER builds momentum
towards a resolution that seems certain to have a tremendous kick.
     Only it doesn't. It's hard to imagine a more anti-climactic climax to
a thriller than the one offered up by CROUPIER. The heist into which Jack
is recruited takes some unexpected turns, but for once that's far from a
compliment. It suddenly becomes evident that Mayersberg is going to wrap
things up far too quickly to make the film's conclusion satisfying. A dead
body turns up, but it never really matters in the long run. A manipulative
plot is exposed, but Jack doesn't seem particularly concerned by it. A
character appears to confess a secret love that makes you wonder what film
you just wandered into. A film like CROUPIER absolutely demands a big
payoff -- either realization that the protagonist has been suckered into
being the victim, or a big smile as he ends up the victor. CROUPIER can't
manage to provide either one. It's almost as though Mayersberg got stuck
on the film he was writing and pasted on the end of another film entirely.
     It's a testimony to how well CROUPIER works for 90% of its running
time that the train wreck of a conclusion can't derail the whole
film. Director Mike Hodges (probably best-known stateside for the garish
1980 FLASH GORDON) stylishly captures the dim casino milieu and the
choreographed moves of the croupiers, while Owen keeps us involved in what
will happen to Jack. There are some memorable scenes -- Jack's expert
manipulation of a poker game, for instance -- and some provocatively
enigmatic holes in Jack's back-story. There are also so many missed
opportunities that you just want to shake Mayersberg for his sloppiness. 
Right up to the moment of the planned casino heist, CROUPIER is well worth
recommending. I'd also recommend leaving the theater at that point. Any
ending you can come up with in your head is better than the one that ended
up on the screen.

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
HURLYBURLY
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Sean Penn, Kevin Spacey, Robin Wright Penn, Chazz Palminteri,
Garry Shandling, Anna Paquin, Meg Ryan.
Screenplay:  David Rabe, based on his stage play.
Producers:  Anthony Drazan, Richard N. Gladstein and David S. Hamburger.
Director:  Anthony Drazan.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  123 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Eddie (Sean Penn), a second-tier Hollywood player, is slowly
realizing that Hollywood is a bad place to be if you feel things too
deeply.  His roommate and business partner Mickey (Kevin Spacey) thrives
on a callous disregard for anything but immediate satisfaction; his friend
Phil (Chazz Palminteri), a struggling actor, drifts into instability as he
tries to save his failing marriage.  In an environment where a homeless
teenager (Anna Paquin) becomes a sexual "Care Package" from a colleague
(Garry Shandling), Eddie is frustrated in his every attempt to make a
genuine human connection.  His life is a HURLYBURLY -- emotional
turbulence occasionally interrupted by attempts at communication that come
out "blah blah blah."
     It's always in fashion to take a stab at the shallow white underbelly
of Tinseltowners, but HURLYBURLY -- adapted by David Rabe from his play --
offers more than cheap shot industry-bashing.  At its heart it's a study
of a man who has set himself up for perpetual disappointment by being
tempermentally incompatible with the people who surround him.  Eddie fumes
when Mickey pursues Darlene (Robin Wright Penn), a woman in whom Eddie is
interested, foolishly ascribing scruples to Mickey; he is haunted by the
image of a 6-year-old girl watching her mother perform oral sex, an
incident Mickey barely recalls; he explodes when Darlene describes an
abortion with the same ambivalence she applies to deciding where to have
dinner.  Sean Penn brings his edge-of-control intensity to Eddie,
investing him with a savage humanity that can't be deadened by sex and
drugs no matter how hard he tries.  It's a riveting performance as one of
the best-written characters of the year.
     David Rabe's writing has the familiar rhythm of another playwright
named David -- Mamet -- giving the dialogue the snap of exchanged gunfire.
HURLYBURLY always feels like a film adaptation of a stage play, with the
action centered at all times on character interaction, which is not to say
that it's static or visually uncompelling.  Director Anthony Drazan serves
up some nice visual flourishes (a casket being lowered into the ground to
reveal the Paramount water tower in the background, a cell phone
conversation between cars driving side by side), and at least one scene of
impressive tension involving a razor and a revelation.  This is certainly
a piece for actors above all, with a uniformly stellar cast -- be prepared
to be surprised by Meg Ryan in a small role as a stripper -- but it's not
a film where the camera sets up simply for people to deliver monologues.
HURLYBURLY feels like its setting:  smooth and slick, with something dark
bubbling just underneath.
     It's easy to get caught up in one element of a film's tone,
particularly if previous films on a similar subject have led you to expect
that sort of tone.  Yes, HURLYBURLY is dark -- there are unhappy people
who spend most of their time swearing, snorting or debasing other unhappy
people, there is violence, and there is death.  There is also a strangely
touching friendship between Eddie and Phil which may be an insurance
policy for Eddie against successful friends who could desert him, but
could also be the only thing that saves his soul.  There are moments of
raw emotion that come from unexpected places and take unexpected forms.
And there is the hope that a man can remember how to care.  Those who see
this as just another nihilistic stroll down Hollywood Boulevard aren't
looking closely enough.  HURLYBURLY may be talky, but the talk isn't
cheap.  That shallow white underbelly has rarely run this deep.

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
(Hollywood/Cinergi)
Starring:  Madonna, Antonio Banderas, Jonathan Pryce.
Screenplay:  Alan Parker, Oliver Stone.
Producers:  Alan Parker, Robert Stigwood, Andrew G. Vajna.
Director:  Alan Parker.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, mild profanity)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For a project which took forever to find a director and a star, EVITA
sure ended up with the natural choice in both categories.  There aren't
too many directors in the last thirty years who have directed one
live-action musical; Alan Parker has directed two (BUGSY MALONE and PINK
FLOYD THE WALL), and the latter was probably the last through-sung
English-language film.  Madonna, meanwhile, has spent her life preparing
for the role of Eva Peron -- a controversial figure accused of sleeping
her way to the top and who re-invented herself to become a woman of
uncommon influence and power.  Well, one of them fulfilled the promise,
anyway.  Parker has made EVITA a compelling visual spectacle, but his
leading lady doesn't provide the same vibrant quality, even though it
seems she is trying desperately to do so.
     EVITA opens in 1952, with the overwhelming emotional response of the
Argentinian people to the death of their First Lady, Eva Peron (Madonna)
from cancer at the age of 32.  A cynical narrator named Che (Antonio
Banderas) then proceeds to examine who this woman was, and flashes back
through her life, beginning with her childhood as the illegitimate
daughter of a middle-class businessman.  The young Eva Duarte becomes
determined to find fame and fortune, and heads to Buenos Aires on the
coattails of a popular nightclub singer (Jimmy Nail) she seduces.
Sleeping her way to success as a model, radio personality and film
actress, Eva eventually meets Juan Peron (Jonathan Pryce), an
up-and-coming colonel in Argentina's military regime.  With Eva by his
side, Peron becomes a populist president of Argentina, and Eva becomes a
figure as revered for her acts of charity as she is reviled for her
self-promotion.
     One of the reasons Andrew Lloyd Webber's musicals have been so
successful is that they combine the appeal of grand opera with an
accessible pop sensibility, and it would seem difficult to capture that
operatic feel in a film.  Alan Parker, however, has exactly the visual
style required for a production like EVITA.  The funeral scenes which open
the film have an impressive scope, captured in mournful tones by
cinematographer Darius Khondji (SEVEN), and there is a flow between scenes
which is both theatrical and cinematic.  Parker does his job by turning in
a larger-than-life presentation of a larger-than-life woman.
     EVITA is a story told almost entirely through the songs, and Parker
doesn't add any radical new interpretations with his direction.  There are
a few changes to the material, notably the addition of the new Webber/Tim
Rice composition "You Must Love Me" which could have been dropped into any
Disney animated musical and been just as suitable, but other changes are
more interesting and effective.  The plaintive "Another Suitcase in
Another Hall," originally a song for one of Peron's discarded mistresses,
works better as Eva's awakening to taking advantage of her own sexuality.
Some exciting arrangements also give new kick to Webber's tunes.  "Buenos
Aires" gets a swirl of percussion to match Eva's drive, and "I'd Be
Surprisingly Good for You" has a seductive swing.  Certain songs do have a
dated, jangly 70s guitar sound, but the characteristic infectious bombast
of Webber's compositions holds up surprisingly well.  
     What works far less well is the presentation of the film's three
central -- and, for all practical purposes, only -- characters.  Antonio
Banderas brings his appealing swagger to Che, as well as a voice which
compensates for a weak lower range with some sweet high notes.  Che is the
voice of Eva's critics, yet he isn't a complete character, and neither is
Juan Peron.  Pryce is a versatile, talented performer, but he shrinks into
the background as soon as Juan and Eva marry.  That leaves Madonna to
carry the dramatic weight of EVITA, and it is plenty clear that she is
eager to prove she can handle it.  She acts the heck out of the role,
gesticulating for all she's worth and looking appropriately sallow when
Eva is ill, but something is missing.  Madonna understands determination,
and she can convey it; charisma is another story.  You can't act a
magnetic personality, and Madonna is left to play benevolence without the
force of will which makes her uncertain motives intriguing.  The irony is
that, for someone who has made a career of not caring about how people
perceive her, Madonna seems to want too much to be liked and respected as
an actress.  Her EVITA lacks mystery, making Alan Parker's film a sweeping
piece of visual theater with a star who wants to step into the audience
and thank everyone for coming.

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
     Long have I sung the praises of Bonnie Hunt, one of cinema's most
effortlessly entertaining comic actresses. For years Hunt has brought a
spark of devilish intelligence to roles that would vanish in other
hands; she's the living embodiment of the cliche that there are no small
parts, only small actors. It also always seems to be the case that her
small parts have been in bad films (with the occasional notable exception
like JERRY MAGUIRE), a phenomenon that has baffled me to no end. I ask the
gods of cinema: Why can't someone who brings so much to her every role
find scripts that do her talents justice? Too often, I have been left
unanswered.
     Hunt, however, now appears to have taken a proactive approach to this
dilemma -- if no one's going to offer her good scripts, she'll just have
to write and direct them herself. She also shows herself so tuned into to
her fellow supporting performers that she almost buries the leads. In
RETURN TO ME, Hunt tells the story of Bob Rueland (David Duchovny), a
Chicago construction designer blissfully married to zoologist Elizabeth
Rueland (Joely Richardson). But their happy marriage is cut short by a car
accident that claims Elizabeth's life, leaving Bob despondent and
introverted. The accident also provides a second chance for Grace Briggs
(Minnie Driver), a woman with a congenital heart defect. She receives a
donor heart from Elizabeth, and survives to begin a new life. One year
later, Bob and Grace find their paths crossing, though neither party knows
the connection that may be drawing them together.
     The premise almost sounds like one of those semi-supernatural
romantic comedies where a beloved spouse is somehow transformed into a
member of the same sex, or a daughter's boyfriend, or a houseplant. Such
business actually plays no part in RETURN TO ME, which downplays the
otherworldly element in Bob and Grace's relationship. In fact, Hunt
downplays the relationship itself, taking her time bringing the two
together, then playing up the reactions of their friends and family when
they finally do come together. Duchovny is surprisingly effective as a
romantic lead, and Driver is growing more luminous by the day, but their
romance doesn't always feel like the central point of the film. Where many
romantic comedies set up the protagonists in a vacuum, RETURN TO ME comes
dangerously close to making the protagonists themselves the vacuum.
     If that's the case, it's only because there's so much wonderful
business going on on the periphery. The sensational supporting ensemble
begins with Hunt herself, who delights once again as Grace's best friend
Megan, a married mother of five. She's nearly matched by James Belushi as
her bearish, irresponsible husband, whose propensity for swearing in front
of the children is good for laughs that should feel cheap, but somehow
don't. There's also an Irish/Italian/Polish chorus of matchmakers in
Grace's grandfather (Carroll O'Connor), her great-uncle (Robert Loggia) 
and their card-playing buddies, who debate the great dead singers between
hands of poker. Hunt and co-writer Don Lake craft rich, funny situations
so appealing that you wish every writer took half as much care developing
supporting characters.
     Of course, many writers take more care developing main characters. 
With a bit of hindsight, RETURN TO ME feels more hollow than it should
given all the laughs it generates. Hunt doesn't even seem entirely
comfortable with how to build to her big payoff, following up a reunion
between Bob and Grace with a coda that really should have preceded it. 
Still, I'm not sure I can recall the last time I responded to a scene as
shamelessly romantic as Bob's timid request to hold Grace's hand. I
certainly don't recall the last time a writer seemed so willing to share
the wealth with the punch lines. RETURN TO ME is a bit ragged, a bit
sloppy, a bit overly concerned with the people surrounding its
heart-linked lovers. It is, however, undeniably charming in its way. I'd
expect nothing less from Bonnie Hunt, whose own undeniable charm has gone
into a love story for underappreciated comic supporting performers
everywhere.

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
     Here's an easy short-hand for thinking about THE PEACEMAKER:  it's a
James Bond film without James Bond.  The protagonist, U.S. Army
intelligence officer Col. Tom DeVoe (George Clooney), is a man of action
with contacts around the globe (Armin Mueller-Stahl plays his Russian
Felix Leiter).  His partner is a beautiful and determined woman, nuclear
specialist Dr. Julia Kelly (Nicole Kidman).  Their adversary is a
nationalist from the former Yugoslavia (Marcel Iures) who has gotten hold
of a nuclear warhead.  Their search for the missing nuke takes DeVoe and
Kelly from Vienna to the Iranian border to New York City.  Okay, so
there's no sex and no vodka martinis, but THE PEACEMAKER comes with
virtually everything else you could ask for in an espionage thriller:
superbly crafted action sequences, a charismatic hero, marvelous
production values, the threat of mass destruction, humor and style.  At
times, it's as satisfying an action film as 1997 has produced to date.
     That's bound to come as a surprise considering the folks both behind
and in front of the camera.  THE PEACEMAKER marks the feature directing
debut of Mimi Leder (previously on duty as a director for "ER",
including the Emmy-nominated "Love's Labor Lost" episode), but she
shows no signs of rookie jitters.  Her sense of timing an action scene,
ably assisted by editor David Rosenbloom, creates tension in unlikely
places; her instinct for effective restraint (like the positively
heretical decision to show two trains hurtling towards one another, then
cut away before the collision) is uncommon and welcome.  Leder instantly
distinguishes herself as a big-screen action director to watch for.
     George Clooney, meanwhile, has previously distinguished himself on
the big screen largely by not distinguishing himself, disappearing into
the frenetic horror of FROM DUSK TILL DAWN and the inane vortex that was
BATMAN & ROBIN.  In THE PEACEMAKER, he's a roguish hero with an edge.
DeVoe displays an often ruthless military pragmatism, yet his very refusal
to play politics gives many of his comic lines their bite.  He's an
international enforcer as Sean Connery used to play it:  with a twinkle in
his eye and a hand at your throat.
     He's no Bond, of course, which points out the one glaring deficiency
keeping THE PEACEMAKER from being a great action film.  The Bond films'
awareness of their own high-flying absurdity forced them to avoid
self-importance, while also making it easy for viewers to overlook
mediocre scripts.  Not only is Michael Schiffer's screenplay for THE
PEACEMAKER too serious by half, it feels only half-finished.  Instead of
an arrogantly megalomaniacal villain, or even an appealingly insane one,
Schiffer offers a somber, haunted Bosnian surrounded by the somber,
haunted ruins of Sarajevo.  Leder adds a touch of irony with a passing
shot of Sarajevo's Olympic rings, at least momentarily defusing the
impression that THE PEACEMAKER is trying to Make a Political Statement.
As for the characters...let's just call them functional.  There's a
mechanical feel to the narrative flow of THE PEACEMAKER; it moves from
place to place or person to person with little connective tissue to hold
it all together.  It's an action machine, albeit an extremely well-oiled
one.
     Well-oiled action machines are rare enough that THE PEACEMAKER could
find a receptive audience, perhaps the same audience anxiously awaiting
James Bond's next adventure.  Operating without a compelling script or the
built-in goodwill which accompanies the planet's most famous secret agent,
Mimi Leder and company manage to create a worthy challenger.  With
competition like Bond, it's impressive that Leder was neither shaken nor
stirred.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
RUSH HOUR
(New Line)
Starring:  Jackie Chan, Chris Tucker, Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Pena.
Screenplay:  Jim Kouf and Ross LaManna.
Producers:  Roger Birnbaum, Jonathan Glickman and Arthur M. Sarkissian.
Director:  Brett Ratner.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity)
Running Time:  96 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Life, they say, is all about trade-offs, but RUSH HOUR asks for a
trade-off that just doesn't seem fair:  in order to watch Jackie Chan in
action, you've gotta listen to Chris Tucker in action.  Chan is one of the
most engaging performers in films, a creater of ingenious martial artistry
whose personal charm makes his jaw-dropping stunt work even more fun to
watch.  Tucker, on the other hand, may be the funniest guy on the planet
some day, but I'll never know it until he stops reading every line in the
mellifluous tones usually associated with a circular saw.  Chan is great;
Tucker is grating.
     RUSH HOUR balances the two nearly perfectly, creating a synthesis
that is pure cinematic mediocrity.  The premise, squeezed through the
Play-Doh Fun Factory of buddy-action plotting, casts Tucker as LAPD
Detective James Carter, a loose cannon perpetually aggravating his
straight-laced captain (as though there were any other kind).  When the
kidnapping of a Chinese diplomat's daughter prompts the diplomat to bring
in his old friend, Hong Kong Detective Lee (Chan) to help with the case,
the FBI looks for a sucker -- er, volunteer -- to keep Lee out of the way
of the "real" investigation.  Thus fish-out-of-water Lee ends up cruising
the L.A. underworld as Carter tries to get out of trouble by solving the
case himself; thus more-mouth-than-method Carter needs Lee's fast hands
and feet to save his skin again and again.
     I suspect Tucker might have been thinking of RUSH HOUR as his BEVERLY
HILLS COP, a chance to play the street-wise rebel with a badge in an
action comedy setting.  There's no question that he has his adherents --
the folks in the theater who were howling with glee and stomping their
feet at his every bug-eyed shriek -- but I can't see Tucker crossing over
into the kind of broad popularity enjoyed by Eddie Murphy.  The reason is
quite simple:  where Murphy generally seems amused by the foibles of his
on-screen foils, Tucker seems perpetually irritated.  Every canned insult
he spews makes him that much more unpleasant to spend time with -- not
exactly the vibe you're looking for in a leading man.
     He should take a few lessons from his co-star, who virtually defines
"pleasant to spend time with."  Director Brett Ratner may not have the
visual flair of Chan's frequent collaborator Stanley Tong, but he's smart
enough to get out of the way and let Chan do his thing (some sloppy
editing choices notwithstanding).  A Jackie Chan fight sequence still has
the ability to dazzle the way no other fight sequence can, mixing silly
bits of business with lighting-fast choreography.  RUSH HOUR is nothing
but fun when it's nothing but a showcase for Chan, whether he's fighting
bad guys while trying to protect a priceless piece of Chinese pottery from
harm, or scaling walls and trees in a manner more feline than human.
     On paper, the collaboration between Chan and Tucker probably looked
like an ideal match of opposites -- one the self-deprecating physical
comedian, the other the self-aggrandizing verbal comedian.  Their styles,
unfortunately, collide where they should commingle.  RUSH HOUR is less a
Jackie Chan/Chris Tucker film than it is a Jackie Chan film alternating
with a Chris Tucker film, each performer taking turns yanking the
predictable material into his preferred comfort zone.  If you're a fan of
both lead actors, you'll probably get the double-barreled rush the makers
of RUSH HOUR were aiming for.  If you're like me, you'll find it misfiring
as often as it hits its target.  Only when Chan was in the spotlight could
I ignore the mundane plot points, including an absurdly obviousl
"revelation" of the villain's identity and an oh-by-the-way sub-plot
involving an inexperienced bomb squad cop (Elizabeth Pena).  Only then
could I safely and happily suspend my disbelief.  Only then could I forget
what I had been forced to endure from the other half of the star tandem.
Trade-offs can be so cruel.

Title
Review for Priyatel pokojnika (1997)
A FRIEND OF THE DECEASED
(Sony Pictures Classics)
Starring:  Alexandre Lazarev, Tatiana Kravitska, Eugen Pakin, Angelika
Nevolina, Elena Korikova.
Screenplay:  Andrei Kourkov.
Producers:  Pierre Rival, Mykola Machenko.
Director:  Vyacheslav Krishtofovich.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Life in post-Communist Ukraine has not been kind to Anatoly
(Alexandre Lazarev).  A respected academic and linguist before the
collapse of the Soviet Union, Anatoly now finds his skills useful only for
translating business deals at a few dollars a shot.  Even his wife Katia
(Angelika Nevolina) is finding a better deal in an affair with a
co-worker.  Feeling depressed and obsolete, Anatoly decides on a
thoroughly market-economy solution to his woes:  through a friend (Eugen
Pachin), he hires someone to kill him.  The problems ensue when Anatoly
changes his mind, and the only way to end the contract on his life is to
hire another killer to eliminate the first.
     This might seem like the premise for a slapstick farce; in fact, it
might sound strangely similar to the premise for Warren Beatty's current
BULWORTH.  But like BULWORTH, A FRIEND OF THE DECEASED takes that premise
and steers it into some astute social commentary.  Director Vyacheslav
Krishtofovich and screenwriter Andrei Kourkov may romanticize the
Communist past, but they also paint an intriguing picture of people
adapting to the capitalist present.  Many dive into the world of crime
without any understanding of the potential consequences -- a bright-eyed
young prostitute (Tatiana Kravitska) believes she can marry a violent man
and still carry on with her work as though nothing had changed, while a
hired killer leaves behind a wife and baby when his profession finally
catches up with him.  It is left to Anatoly to grasp the dangerous course
his country is on, and to take a step which will turn compassion into a
marketable commodity.
     A FRIEND OF THE DECEASED might have been an even more compelling film
if it had been more consistent, both in tone and pacing.  At times it
takes on the tense atmosphere of an espionage thriller; at other times, it
has the loping pace of deadpan comedy; at still other times, there is the
stark sincerity of domestic drama.  Each is effective in its own way, but
in combination they can leave you wondering how you're supposed to feel
about the strange events in Anatoly's life.  Fortunately, that confusion
plays a significant role in this story of complex social change where the
rules are still being determined.  It is also fortunate that Alexandre
Lazarev, with his soulful eyes and weary decency, makes for such a
sympathetic tour guide through this world.  A FRIEND OF THE DECEASED is a
slightly blurry window onto a morally-blurry world and the people trying
to survive while they try to make it all a bit more clear.

Title
Review for Roommates (1995)
Starring:  Peter Falk, D. B. Sweeney, Julianne Moore.
Screenplay:  Max Apple & Stephen Metcalfe.
Director:  Peter Yates.
     It is a frequent but rather silly criticism leveled at certain
Hollywood films that they are "manipulative," or push emotional
buttons.  It is silly because it is self-evident; all art tries to
make you feel a certain way, and movies are no exception.  The real,
unspoken criticism is that the movies targeted manipulate too
obviously, and are usually specifically manipulating the audience
towards a good cry.  ROOMMATES is one of these awww-inspiring
efforts, but it doesn't do the job.  Comprised of all the pieces
that are supposed to work, ROOMMATES doesn't work because it lacks a
cohesive story to complement Peter Falk's engaging performance.
     ROOMMATES opens in 1963 Pittsburg, where 6-year-old Michael
Holeczek (Noah Fleiss) finds himself oraphaned when his widowed
mother also dies.  Some relatives suggest sending him away to
school, but Michael's feisty, 77-year-old immigrant grandfather
Rocky (Peter Falk) will have none of that.  Michael grows up with
Rocky, and eventually moves to Columbus, Ohio to become a doctor.
Soon, however, the adult Michael (D. B. Sweeney) will have a chance
to repay Rocky for his support, as Rocky is forced to move out of
his condemned apartment and in with Michael.  Unfortunately, Rocky
tends to cramp Michael's style, especially when Michael starts
dating Beth (Julianne Moore), a social worker whose personality
clashes considerably with Rocky's.
     ROOMMATES seems like it could have been an interesting concept.
Generational conflict in film rarely involves characters separated
by two generations, and there are very few films that deal with
characters over 70.  There are two key differences between what
could have happened and what did happen.  The first is that while
Peter Falk is playing a character who ages from 77 to 107, he is
actually just 60.  Consequently, he is buried under layers of
prosthetics by Greg Cannom (MRS. DOUBTFIRE, THE MASK) which draw
garish attention to themselves.  Make no mistake, Falk's performance
as Rocky is entertaining; he delivers his Old World wisdom with wit
and bite.  But at a certain point, his characterization becomes
caricature, just another Grumpy Old Man who is one step ahead of his
youngers.  It is pleasant to watch Rocky grow closer to his
grandchildren, but it is less so to watch him grow progressively
entombed in latex.
     The second, and far more glaring, problem is that the
generational conflict angle is only a fraction of the story.  For a
while, ROOMMATES makes the most of the comic possibilities inherent
in a young, single man sharing a small room with a very
old-fashioned old man.  When Michael brings Beth home, Rocky makes
no secret of his disapproval of pre-marital sex, and it is
refreshing that his point of view is given a certain amount of
respect by the filmmakers.  A tense exchange between Beth and Rocky
is very well handled by both Julianne Moore and Falk, and highlights
everything that was most promising about the idea for ROOMMATES.
     Then, far too suddenly, ROOMMATES lurches onto a completely
different plot branch, with Rocky living with both Michael and Beth
and offering commentary on domestic life.  After a while, the plot
jerks onto another tangent, this one spending far too much time
focused on a custody battle and movie-of-the-week style family
squabbling.  ROOMMATES is based on a personal remembrance by
co-writer Max Apple, and it appears that he wanted to write a long
love letter to his grandfather.  That is a noble goal, but it simply
does not work as a movie because there is never a clear enough sense
of what this relationship is really supposed to be about.  It
certainly does not help that D. B. Sweeney seems to be dazed and
bored through most of the film's running time.  ROOMMATES had the
potential to be a warm and sentimental film, and for about half an
hour it has the right tone of good-natured whimsy.  But for over an
hour, it is little more than a bad soap opera:  drawn-out, confused
and maudlin.

Title
Review for Bye Bye, Love (1995)
Starring:  Matthew Modine, Randy Quaid, Paul Reiser, Janeane Garofolo.
Screenplay:  Gary David Goldberg and Brad Hall.
Director:  Sam Weisman.
     A movie about divorce and custody in 1995 seems about as timely
as a movie about mood rings.  Family breakups have been an all too
familiar part of the American landscape for nearly thirty years, and
countless dramas have told stories of acrimonious court battles in
hand-wringing detail.  Still, I can't recall a comedy about the
subject before BYE BYE LOVE.  And after it, I still can't.  BYE BYE
LOVE is rarely funny, more often a weak and melodramatic retread of
common TV-movie fare.  Only a few moments which have nothing to do
with the film's main premise offer big laughs instead of cliched
emotion.
     BYE BYE LOVE follows one weekend in the lives of three divorced
fathers who get weekend custody of their children.  Dave (Matthew
Modine), a father of two, is an inveterate womanizer having
difficulty staying faithful to his latest girlfriend; Vic (Randy
Quaid) is a foul-humored father of three about to go on a rare date;
Donny (Paul Reiser) pines for his ex-wife and has trouble relating
to his teenage daughter Emma (Eliza Dushku).  Over the course of the
weekend, the three men face various crises, including Vic's blind
date from hell (Janeane Garofolo) and Donny's growing estrangement
from Emma.
     The three lead actors form a rather unlikely combo, and the
quality of their performances is of widely varying quality.  Randy
Quaid is the best of the three, bitter without being irritating,
gleefully spiteful without being frightening.  His run-ins with is
ex-wife (Lindsey Crouse) are a bit over-played, though, and his
confrontation with a pompous radio psychologist (Rob Reiner) is
gimmicky and implausible.  He does get BYE BYE LOVE's best sub-plot,
a hilarious dinner date with a gloriously demented Janeane Garofolo,
and he does a great slow burn.  Paul Reiser really has only one
character, his slightly befuddled, uptight nice guy "Mad About You"
persona, but he does it well.  As a personality, he is appealing,
but as a character, he becomes pretty boring here.  Matthew Modine,
is, quite simply, terrible.  This isn't a performance good enough to
be called mailed-in; he even forgot to put a stamp on it.  Modine
lacks any charm in an appallingly under-written role, looks bored
most of the time, and gets stuck with a trite little speech about
how it's all his father's fault he's such a cad.  Carolco's
executives, whose entire future is resting on Modine's bankability
for the upcoming CUTTHROAT ISLAND, must be sweating buckets right
now.
     BYE BYE LOVE basically comes off as a very confused movie,
because it spends far too much of its time on the new relationships
of its main characters instead of on the relationships between the
fathers and their kids, making it just another "dating in the 90s"
movie.  When the movie does deal with the children at all, it is to
have one of them scream out an accusation and/or cry, perhaps to be
resolved later by a sensitive talk and a hug, perhaps not.  Even
more confusing is a sub-plot featuring the late Ed Flanders as a
widower who goes to work and a McDonald's and befriends a troubled
youth.  It is a sad end to Flanders' career, getting caught up in
a truly annoying over-use of McDonald's as a location, a plot device
and, apparently, a major advertiser.
     Even if BYE BYE LOVE had decided to spend its time focusing
exclusively on the parent-child relationships, it still would have
been pretty difficult to pull off, because ultimately there is very
little humor one can wring from family break-ups and their effects
on children.  Any way you slice it, it is a bad situation for kids,
and the makers of BYE BYE LOVE mostly go for the heartstrings when
dealing with the single parenting issue.  It is left to the dads'
romantic fumblings to probide what little humor there is, and it
isn't enough.  There have been comparisons between BYE BYE LOVE and
PARENTHOOD, but PARENTHOOD was both genuinely funny and genuinely
touching.  BYE BYE LOVE is a genuine shame.

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Julia Stiles, Heath Ledger, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Larisa
Oleynik, David Krumholtz, Andrew Keegan, Larry Miller.
Screenplay:  Karen McCullah Lutz & Kristen Smith.
Producer:  Andrew Lazar.
Director:  Gil Junger.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  94 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It seems like only a few weeks ago -- probably because it was -- that
I was inveighing against the slew of "fill-in-the-blank, but with
teenagers" movies.  Still they show no sign of abating, with a
shudder-inducing sub-category creeping to the forefront:  Shakespeare, but
with teenagers.  Leading the charge (which will include a version of
OTHELLO later this year) is 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU, the under-20 set's
"Taming of the Shrew."  By all rights it should have been as incredibly
heinous as other recent juvenile jaunts, but it's actually kinda cute on
occasion.  Though still too concerned with cozying up to its audience's
sensibilities, 10 THINGS at least offers a blueprint for how to make such
material a bit more appealing.
    The setting is modern-day Padua High School of Seattle, where a
cunning plan is about to unfold.  New student Cameron James (Joseph
Gordon-Levitt) has become infatuated with beautiful, popular Bianca
Stratford (Larisa Oleynik), but he's thwarted by more than clashing
cliques.  Bianca's overprotective father (Larry Miller) has forbidden her
from dating until older sister Kat (Julia Stiles) does likewise, and Kat
is known as an ill-tempered girl with no interest in ordinary teen
pursuits like dating.  Cameron comes up with the creative solution of
finding someone to woo Kat, someone like mysterious loner Patrick Verona
(Heath Ledger).  Naturally the hard-edged Kat proves a tough shrew to
tame, until both prospective lovers begin to let their guard down.
     10 THINGS gets a leg up on most of its genre cousins simply by
putting people on the screen who can act a lick.  Julia Stiles is a
charming, smart and fresh presence as Kat, giving here attitude a little
something more than _just_ attitude; Australian actor Heath Ledger makes
for a nice foil with his combination of hulking presence and sensitivity;
and David Krumholtz has a solid comic relief role as Cameron's nerdy
comrade.  The adult roles are also satisfying for a change, primarily
because they aren't used simply as walls off of which teens can bounce
insults.  While Larry Miller obsesses as the Stratford' girls' teen
pregnancy-obsessed papa, Daryl "Chill" Mitchell gets a few funny scenes as
an angry English teacher and Allison Janney composes explicit romance
novels as guidance counselor Ms. Perky.  I actually found myself chuckling
at most of these characters instead of wishing desperately that they'd
just go away.
     Much of the credit for that should also go to writers Karen McCullah
Lutz and Kirsten Smith, who give the dialogue a bite that goes beyond
insult humor and high school patois.  Some of the best lines are
unprintable -- including Patrick's curiosity over why Bianca is so
desirable -- but they all seem to have been given at least a little
thought.  While the situations are teen-film predictable -- a party scene,
a prom scene, plenty of threats and posturing -- occasionally the writing
emerges to deliver an unexpected laugh.  It's not brilliant, but it's a
sharp step up from stupid.
     As likeable as parts of 10 THINGS aare, it's hard to get overly
enthusiastic about it.  Veteran sit-com director Gil Junger, making his
feature debut, slaps on a generous coat of sit-com glossiness, leaving
little room for the truly acidic wordplay of a "Taming of the Shrew."
It's a warm and fuzzy sort of teen film with some welcome positive
messages about independent thought and valuing depth of character, yet it
still rarely rises above the level of the blandly generic.  It might have
had a chance if so many sub-plots hadn't been packed into a tight
94-minute package, short-changing them all with shallowness.  Still, it's
enough of a surprise to find a teen film that doesn't overstay its welcome
instantly, let alone deserves more fleshing out.  It's enough to give you
hope that there's actually a good movie to be made in 1999 "...with
teenagers."

Title
Review for Bound (1996)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Jennifer Tilly, Gina Gershon, Joe Pantoliano.
Screenplay:  Andy Wachowski, Larry Wachowski.
Producers:  Andrew Lazar, Stewart Boros.
Directors:  Andy Wachowski, Larry Wachowski.
Running Time:  108 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, nudity, sexual situations,
profanity)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's always the same old story:  There's a poor sap just out of the
joint, just trying to make a buck to get by.  Then along comes a dame,
getting real friendly even though she's already mixed up with a guy, only
she says the guy is bad news and she wants the poor sap to help her get
out...and there's money as part of the bargain.  Yep, it's the same old
story...except that in BOUND, the poor sap is another woman.  You might
expect BOUND to try to cruise along on little more than its gender-bending
premise, but you would be wrong.  BOUND is a wickedly entertaining
thriller with a gloriously manic performance by Joe Pantoliano, and it
doesn't need gimmicks to succeed.
     Our resident poor sap is Corky (Gina Gershon), a woman trying to walk
the straight-and-narrow after serving five years for "re-distribution of
wealth."  She is doing maintenance work for a Chicago apartment building
when she meets Violet (Jennifer Tilly), the beautiful, breathy lady living
in the apartment next door to the one she is working on.  Violet is the
kept woman of a low-level mobster named Caesar (Joe Pantoliano), but it
seems she also has eyes for Corky, and the feeling is mutual.  Violet
confides in Corky that she wants to leave Caesar, and hopes to take with
her the $2 million Caesar is holding for his bosses while setting him up
to take the fall.  So Corky hatches a plan to steal the money and force
Caesar to run...except that Caesar doesn't react quite according to plan.
     The first act of BOUND sticks quite close to the standard film noir
formula story line outlined above, complete with femme fatale Violet
seducing Corky with drinks and double-entendre, Corky engaging in
suspicious second-guessing, and a partnership in crime which seems less
than entirely trustworthy.  Gershon (SHOWGIRLS), sporting lips so full she
seems unable to close her mouth entirely, makes an acceptable stand-in for
the usual male dumb lug, with just a touch of Bogart's world-weary
cynicism.  The sex scene between Gershon and Tilly is utterly gratuitous
after the much more effective seduction scene, however, and BOUND begins
to raise red flags of turning into pure exploitation when heads begin
smashing into toilets and severed fingers begin flying.
     I also feared I saw danger signs of BOUND becoming a case of
lesbian-chic meets plot-twist-chic once Violet and Corky get their hands
on Caesar's money, that it would play itself out with the two women
exchanging double-crosses until poetic justice was served.  The reason
that doesn't happen is that Andy and Larry Wachowski (ASSASSINS) have no
intention of letting Caesar be little more than a plot device.  As played
by Joe Pantoliano, Caesar is a giddy display of sheer survival instinct as
he thwarts the carefully-laid plans of Corky and Violet to set him up by
taking on the people Violet expected him to run from.  Pantoliano has some
hilarious moments as he becomes ever more desperate, including a
conversation with a corpse which is as comic as it is one-sided, and BOUND
begins building merrily tense scene on top of merrily tense scene.
     I suppose the thing that makes BOUND particularly satisfying is that
it is simply a very good thriller -- suspenseful, unpredictable,
well-acted and stylishly directed.  On one level, I suppose you could
argue that the lesbian angle is unnecessary, and that the Wachowskis
include it simply for titillation value, but it is precisely because it is
unnecessary that I think it is so noteworthy.  BOUND would have been just
as effective if Corky had been a man, or if Caesar had been a woman, or if
all three main characters had been men.  It was not all that long ago that
film-makers began talking about "color-blind casting," choosing actors not
because their race or ethnicity was intrinsic to the roles but because
they were the best actors available for those roles.  In BOUND, Gina
Gershon makes a sharp little suspense thriller that much more intriguing
by being perhaps the first example of "sexuality-blind casting."  Here's
to the poor saps of the world, whatever their gender.

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
EXCESS BAGGAGE
(Columbia)
Starring:  Alicia Silverstone, Benicio Del Toro, Christopher Walken, Harry
Connick Jr., Jack Thompson, Nicholas Turturro.
Screenplay:  Max D. Adams and Dick Clement & Ian La Frenais.
Producers:  Bill Borden and Carolyn Kessler.
Director:  Marco Brambilla.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     EXCESS BAGGAGE marks the first starring role for Alicia Silverstone
in the two years since CLUELESS became a surprise hit and made her 1995's
"it" girl.  It is also the first film under Silverstone's lucrative
production deal, as well as the first film marketed solely on the basis of
her drawing power.  It casts her in a role which seems perfectly suited to
continuing that drawing power -- she's a motherless rich girl looking for
a little affection, a la CLUELESS -- and gives her plenty of opportunities
to flash that crooked baby doll smile.  Make no mistake, EXCESS BAGGAGE is
The Alicia Silverstone Show.  So why does it feel like she is the one
thing most dreadfully wrong with EXCESS BAGGAGE?
     Perhaps because EXCESS BAGGAGE, which appears on the surface to be an
ideal comic caper vehicle for Silverstone's daffy charms, is really an
oddball black comedy struggling to break free.  The plot concerns a
neglected heiress named Emily T. Hope (Silverstone) who stages her own
kidnapping to get some attention from her papa (Jack Thompson), a
cold-hearted corporate shark.  She stashes herself in the trunk of her BMW
for Daddy and the police to find her, but a car thief named Vincent
(Benicio Del Toro) gets to the BMW first.  Vincent certainly doesn't
expect the additional cargo he finds in his latest acquisition, nor does
he know what to do with her.  The only sure thing is that the trouble gets
deeper every moment, as everyone from the police to Emily's spooky Uncle
Raymond (Christopher Walken) to Vincent's car thief cronies want to get
their hands on Vincent and Emily.
     The mainstream version of this story would find the mismatched pair
going through a streak of mutual antagonism, closing ranks through a
series of misadventures, then eventually falling in love.  That is exactly
what director Marco Brambilla tries to deliver, with miserable results.
The first half of EXCESS BAGGAGE moves with all the frisky energy of a
constipated brontosaurus, offerring little more than monotonous bickering
between the two leads.  There's never a moment of chemistry between
Silverstone and Del Toro, no magnetism -- in fact, all known natural
processes come to a dead stop when they are on screen together.  They
might as well be performing in two different films.
     At least one of those films might have been worth watching.  Benicio
Del Toro is, to put it mildly, an unconventional screen presence, but he's
never a boring one.  His every reaction in EXCESS BAGGAGE is worth a
giggle of disbelief; the more ridiculous and over-heated the plot gets,
the more interesting Del Toro becomes.  Even while the story in EXCESS
BAGGAGE wanders from the mundane to the predictable, actors like Del Toro,
Christopher Walken and Nicholas Turturro provide line readings with a
bracing dose of surreality.  When Del Toro and Walken share a scene
together, the needle on the Surreal-O-Meter whips into the red zone.
     "Surreal" might as well be something you have at breakfast with milk
as far as Silverstone's performance is concerned.  When it comes to
playing material with an edge, she seems...well, clueless; her idea of
edginess consists of muttering her lines petulantly while wearing clothes
and makeup left over from Meg Ryan's performance in ADDICTED TO LOVE.  
It's much too late for her to recover her adorableness by the time the
romance turns more conventional, complete with dialogue ("Do you like my
tummy?") which should come with a warning label if you're going to listen
to it with a mouthful of popcorn.  I can't imagine what Silverstone's
young fans will make of this strange film in which their idol is annoying
and unlikeable, then hooks up with such a weirdo. If Silverstone the
newly-crowned mogul wanted to make a romantic comedy, she shouldn't have
cast Benicio Del Toro.  If she wanted to make a bizarre crime caper, she
shouldn't have cast herself.

Title
Review for Bullets Over Broadway (1994)
Starring:  John Cusack, Dianne Wiest, Chazz Palminteri, Jennifer
Tilly, Joe Viterelli, Jack Warden.
Screenplay:  Woody Allen and Douglas McGrath.
Director:  Woody Allen.
     Over the last few years, no filmmaker's work has been linked as
closely to his personal life as Woody Allen's has been.  1992's
HUSBANDS AND WIVES focused on troubled marriages, and showed Allen's
character infatuated with a much younger woman; the parallels to
Allen's life were hard to ignore.  Last year's MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY
was the kind of light comedy Allen hadn't made in years, and seemed to
indicate a desire to return to simpler times.  BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is
another comedy, but it's no pure lark.  Hilarious as it is, it's also a
sly bit of self-mockery, an indication that Allen the artist
acknowledges the foibles of Allen the man.
     Set in Prohibition-era New York, BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is the
story of David Shayne (John Cusack), an earnest young playwright whose
two previous flops are making it difficult for him to find backing for
his latest play, "God of Our Fathers."  An opportunity presents itself
when mobster Nick Valenti (Joe Viterelli) offers to provide all
necessary backing for the play, provided one of the roles goes to his
talentless, would-be actress girlfriend Olive (Jennifer Tilly).  David
is consumed by the idea that he has sold out, but the worst is yet to
come.  As rehearsals progress, it becomes clear that there are problems
with the play, and the solutions come from an unlikely source --
Olive's bodyguard Cheech (Chazz Palminteri).
     Those who found they needed Dramamine to cope with the
hyperkinetic camera movement in HUSBANDS AND WIVES and MANHATTAN MURDER
MYSTERY will be delighted to learn that Allen lays off the hand-held.
In fact, his direction seems a bit too constrained at times, as though
the theater itself were creating a kind of claustrophobia.  But while
this is far from Allen's best work as a director, his script,
co-written by Douglas McGrath, is fantastic.  The dialogue contains as
many laugh-out-loud lines as any film this year, and the plot takes at
least one twist so delightfully unexpected that its revelation may
provide the single biggest laugh.  In a year woefully short on good
comedies, BULLETS OVER BROADWAY may be a saving grace.
     As usual, Allen has a marvelous ensemble cast at his disposal to
bring his script to life, though not all are equally well-used.  Jim
Broadbent and Tracey Ullman, as two of the play's cast members, are
basically one-note types; John Cusack has some marvelous early scenes
as he realizes the kind of person he is dealing with in Nick, but his
character gets lost in the shuffle a bit.  Jennifer Tilly, however, is
dead solid perfect as the simple-minded Olive, and Rob Reiner has a
wonderful bit part as a pretentious playwright who takes great pride in
the fact that "both intellectuals and common people find (his plays)
completely impenetrable."  But the two showcase roles belong to Dianne
Wiest and Chazz Palminteri.  As Helen Sinclair, the play's haughty
star, Wiest brings down the house with her manipulations of David to
spice up her character, and her cry of "Don't speak!"  Palminteri is
even better as Cheech, a career hood who discovers his latent talent,
and that he'll do anything to protect his creation.  It's a wonderful,
subtle performance worthy of Oscar consideration.
     Yet beneath all the laughs in BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is a moral
question framed by the Reiner character's hypothetical question of
which you would save from a burning building:  the last copy of
Shakespeare's works, or some anonymous person.  "The artist creates his
own moral universe," he says, but the turns of the story work against
that notion.  Better to be a good man than a great artist, Allen seems
to argue, and it's difficult not to read that thesis as a minor mea
culpa for his tabloid-headline exploits.  In the course of exorcising
some of his own demons, accompanied by a laugh track, Allen has created
one of his post purely entertaining films in years.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
BATTLEFIELD EARTH
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  John Travolta, Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker, Kim Coates,
Richard Tyson.
Screenplay:  Corey Mandell, based on the novel by L. Ron Hubbard.
Producers:  Elie Samaha, Jonathan D. Krane and John Travolta.
Director:  Roger Christian.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  117 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     BATTLEFIELD EARTH ... is ... 117 minutes ... long ... which is
... plenty long enough ... to spend ... watching ... a very ... bad
... film ... but I grew even ... more ... annoyed ... when I realized
... the film ... could have been ... at least ... 15 minutes ... shorter
... (therefore ending ... all our torment ... 15 minutes ... sooner) 
... if someone ... had told ... director Roger Christian ... to stop
... using ... slow ... motion ... for ... every ... freaking ... action
... scene.
     Lousy summer action films are nothing new. It is still a bit
shocking, however, when you have the misfortune to stumble upon one so
fundamentally inept even as grandiose adventure. BATTLEFIELD EARTH is such
a shambling behemoth, a film not even bad enough to be funny-bad (at least
not often enough). Based on the novel by L. Ron Hubbard, it tells of an
earth 1,000 years after a conquering alien invasion by the profit-hungry
Psychlo race. Bands of humans live primitive hunter-gatherer lives on the
outskirts of the Psychlo mining colony in Denver, while most humans work
as slave labor. Leading the Psychlo security force is the arrogant Terl
(John Travolta), embittered by his posting on earth and prepared to con
his superiors out of a recently-discovered gold deposit. But he's about to
meet his match in Jonnie (Barry Pepper), a feisty human keen on leading a
rebellion against the Psychlos.
     I've never read the L. Ron Hubbard novel on which BATTLEFIELD EARTH
is based, so I don't know how much of the film's narrative idiocy is his
responsibility. I do know that the film could set you to scratching your
head so furiously you could draw blood. How is it that in 1,000 years of
occupation strictly for the purpose of acquiring precious metals, none of
the Psychlos bothered to investigate Fort Knox, or noticed the big glowing
vein of gold in the rocks a few miles from their headquarters? What
miraculous change in the planet's weather patterns allowed books in the
Denver Library to survive 1,000 years' exposure to Rocky Mountain winters? 
And would it have been so hard to explain why the Psychlos' domed habitat
is so strategically important when both humans and Psychlos must wear
breathing devices (strangely like high-tech Breathe Right strips) in order
to survive inside it?
     Even with so much slipshod storytelling involved, I might have
settled for an action-adventure that seemed concerned about making its
action somewhat ... adventurous. Instead, Roger Christian turns every
confrontation, every chase and every battle into parade of slow-motion
explosions. The device has certainly become popular thanks to Hong Kong
directors like John Woo, but in such cases the film-maker is usually
giving viewers the opportunity to appreciate a particularly cool stunt, or
Chow Yun-Fat flying through the air with a pair of guns blazing. 
Christian, on the other hand, uses slow-motion to turn the film into an
agonizing crawl towards its conclusion. It's clear he wants BATTLEFIELD
EARTH to be something epic and mythological; the frequent George Lucas
collaborator even uses the familiar wipe-dissolves from the STAR WARS
films. In Christian's hands, unfortunately, the wipes are yet another way
he takes us far too slowly from one place to another. You know a film is
failing on its most fundamental level when an entire sell-out preview
audience responds to the climactic explosion with stony silence.
     BATTLEFIELD EARTH does offer the chance to watch Travolta -- who has
shown no reluctance to ham up his villainous characters in films like
BROKEN ARROW and FACE/OFF -- whooping it up as the gleefully duplicitous
Terl, which occasionally makes the film watchable. Sadly, his gusto only
makes it evident that someone involved in the film was actually trying to
make it watchable. It certainly wasn't the casting director, who chose as 
a protagonist the capable but uncharismatic Pepper (who may just be the
separated-at-birth triplet sibling of Skeet Ulrich and Johnny Depp). It
wasn't screenwriter Corey Mandell, whose gifts for absurd plotting are
rivaled only by his deft way with mangling dialogue and character
development. And it wasn't Roger Christian, who appears to have learned
absolutely nothing about pacing from his work as second unit director with 
Lucas. In his attempt to tell a "saga of the year 3000," Christian has
chosen ... the sneaky trick ... of making ... the film ... so ... plodding
... that you'll leave ... the theater ... wondering ... whether ... 1,000
years ... have ... passed ... since ... you ... went ... in.

Title
Review for Nina Takes a Lover (1994)
Starring:  Laura San Giacomo, Paul Rhys, Michael O'Keefe, Cristi
Conway, Fisher Stevens.
Screenplay/Director:  Alan Jacobs.
     I have this idea for a screenplay, and so do about a million other
people in the Los Angeles area alone.  The form seems so
accessible--three acts, 120 pages and a couple of meaty
characters--that the allure is easy to see.  Every once in a while, one
of these ideas will end up on the screen, and every once in an even
greater while, the writer will get the chance to direct his own story.
This can be both a good thing and a bad thing for a novice; a single
vision can be unifying or it can be self-indulgent.  Alan Jacobs' NINA
TAKES A LOVER is an extremely intriguing concept, and a handsomely made
film.  I just kept thinking that it needed another hand in the
production to point out some major distractions.
     The story of NINA TAKES A LOVER unfolds in flashback, as the
principles describe the events to a reporter (Michael O'Keefe) doing
a story on infidelity.  Laura San Giacomo plays Nina, a married San
Francisco woman whose husband is away on one of his many business
trips, this one for three weeks.  A close friend of Nina's (Cristi
Conway) is having an affair with a sleazy cafe' owner (Fisher
Stevens), but Nina doesn't seem to be the type.  One day, however,
she begins flirting with a photographer (Paul Rhys) that she meets
in a park, and the flirtation turns into a romance.  As the
relationship develops, Nina begins to realize that she is getting
much more out of her affair than out of her marriage.  She also
makes some discoveries about both her husband and her lover which
force her to decide which she wants more.
     On one level, NINA TAKES A LOVER works wonderfully, and that is
in the examination of Nina's character.  As the film opens, she is
something of a mystery, a shoe store owner given to lying around her
bed in a neglige.  Gradually, however, this somewhat bland Nina
makes sense.  She is a woman seeking, as her never-named lover
describes it, an "experience:"  something, anything different from
her marriage.  Her thrilling experimentation with her lover is
sometimes uncomfortably to watch; she asks him challenging questions
and expects answers, something that apparently is not possible with
her husband, and she feels more adventurous, more sexy.  NINA TAKES
A LOVER considers what it is that makes people stray, and succeeds
in showing people finding out that they were missing things that
they never realized they were missing before.
     The problem with this very affecting story is that it is
trapped in an awkward structure.  NINA TAKES A LOVER has the
confessional feel of a stage play, and it might have worked better
in that medium.  The segments involving the discussions with the
reporter heighten the staginess, pull the audience away from the
more interesting events of Nina's affair, and, perhaps worst of all,
suggest a rookie director resorting to telling you what he couldn't
figure out how to show visually.  The sub-plot involving the affair
between Nina's friend and her annoying lover is similarly
unnecessary, adding only some silly comic relief.  NINA TAKES A
LOVER seems best suited to being a two-character piece, since it is
the relationship between Nina and her lover which really works.
     Even that adjustment would not have addressed Jacobs' sometimes
distracting over-direction.  There are moments when scenes are
spliced together in a manner which is too self-consciously artsy and
draws too much attention to the strange cutaways, as though Jacobs
didn't trust the ability of his narrative to hold an audience's
attention.  The editing is also quite clumsy on occasion, the
choice of who is in a shot somewhat arbitrary in appearance, and
many of the performances pitched at a level of hyper-seriousness
which veers dangerously close to melodrama.  Jacobs' might have been
well-advised to have another voice around to tell him when he needed
to lighten up, or to let the story tell itself.  Still, NINA TAKES A
LOVER is a thoughtful, atmospheric film which tells a great story.
If Alan Jacobs the director could serve Alan Jacobs the writer
better, he could have a bright future.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
FINAL DESTINATION
(New Line)
Starring:  Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Kerr Smith, Kristen Cloke, Seann
William Scott, Chad E. Donella.
Screenplay:  Glen Morgan & James Wong and Jeffrey Reddick.
Producers:  Warren Zide & Craig Perry and Glen Morgan.
Director:  James Wong.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     After enduring FINAL DESTINATION, I have a renewed appreciation for
David Duchovny. I've always found his work on "The X-Files" to be plenty
entertaining, but I never realized how integral his performance as Fox
"Spooky" Mulder was to the success of the show. Duchovny has one of the
most thankless jobs on television: He spends a fair portion of every
single episode spitting out ridiculous speculative exposition. Mulder's
leaps of logic make him the Bob Beamon of investigative analysis; it is
only because Duchovny plays his dialogue with a strange combination of
confidence and deadpan resignation that you don't want to throw something
at the screen every time Mulder zigs from the Point A of "victim with cut
throat" to the Point Z of "werewolf on the prowl."
     Glen Morgan and James Wong have been part of the "X-Files" creative
team since day one, and have been key players in some of the series' best
episodes (including "Musings of a Cigarette Smoking Man"). They've teamed
up for another wild supernatural premise in FINAL DESTINATION, but instead
of David Duchovny they have ... Devon Sawa. Sawa plays Alex Browning, a
high school senior looking forward to a class trip to Paris. While sitting
in the plane waiting to take off, however, he has a powerful premonition
of a mid-air disaster. Alex and several classmates are forced to leave the
plane in the ensuing panic-induced disruption, and consequently become the
only survivors when the disaster does come to pass. They all face a
mixture of relief and survivor guilt, but Alex has an even stranger
reaction. After one of the survivors meets a strange demise, he becomes
convinced that they were all meant to die on that plane, and that Death
itself may be stalking those who cheated it.
     Exactly how Alex becomes convinced is a huge part of the problem. 
Essentially, Alex accepts the rantings of a creepy mortician (erstwhile
Candyman Tony Todd) after he and fellow survivor/pseudo romantic interest
Clear (Ali Larter) break into a funeral home. The mortician expounds at
length on how Death might take exception to having its victims slip
through its fingers, and Alex instantly begins formulating a survival
strategy based on these wild speculations. Characters like the mortician 
are commonplace in supernatural horror films -- the protagonist has to
have some expert from whom to learn the rules of the strange game he finds
himself playing -- but this particular character is a ridiculous
contrivance. Alex finds an expert on Death's psyche just when he needs
one, never questioning for a second the credentials of an undertaker for
knowing the behaviors that get Death miffed.
     It doesn't help that Sawa doesn't exactly act the heck out of the
part. An earlier incarnation of the story by Jeffrey Reddick featured
adults as the survivors, before New Line, Wong and Morgan turned it into
an adolescent-centered shocker. The performers are generally functional at
best -- Chad E. Donella, himself an "X-Files" veteran as this season's
tormented brain-sucker, is a notable exception -- but it's the tragic
combination of Sawa and the script that sinks the film. The rules Alex
intuits for Death's modus operandi -- taking the survivors in the order
they were meant to die in the plane crash, skipping victims when someone
intervenes, etc. -- are convoluted at best. With Sawa dispensing those
rules to the audience, they're laughable. A more seasoned actor might have
made something of Alex's ever-more-obsessive interest in figuring out the
workings of fate. Sawa fumbles and flounders, lacking the least shred of
what Duchovny brings to similarly exaggerated material.
     Critics and viewers have learned not to expect much from horror films
heavy on teen cast members, even those with potentially promising 
pedigrees (e.g. the work of another "X-Files" alum, David Nutter's
DISTURBING BEHAVIOR). Still, you want to believe that talented people can
take a unique premise and give it a jolt of creativity. Wong brings
plenty of visual style to the table, and long-time writing partners Wong
and Morgan have fun nodding to their thriller forebears (characters named
after Hitchcock, Browning, Val Lewton and even their "X-Files" boss Chris
Carter) and selecting John Denver's "Rocky Mountain High" as the harbinger
of the Grim Reaper. They're just missing one crucial piece: a lead actor
who knows how to play the patently absurd with a wink and a shiver. FINAL
DESTINATION is left to play around with Rube Goldberg deathtraps, fatally
bereft of anyone who can take the silly and make it Spooky.

Title
Review for Joe Gould's Secret (2000)
JOE GOULD'S SECRET
(USA Films)
Starring:  Ian Holm, Stanley Tucci, Patricia Clarkson, Hope Davis.
Screenplay:  Howard A. Rodman, based on articles by Joseph Mitchell.
Producers:  Beth Alexander, Stanley Tucci and Charles Weinstock.
Director:  Stanley Tucci.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     With JOE GOULD'S SECRET, Stanley Tucci continues his development as a
film-maker. 1996's BIG NIGHT, co-directed with Campbell Scott, was a
beautiful low-key gem, easily one of that year's best films. 1998's THE
IMPOSTORS, Tucci's debut as a solo director, was an amusing but slight
piece of episodic farce. Now comes JOE GOULD'S SECRET, a fact-based slice
of Americana that moseys along inertly in search of a compelling
point. Yes indeed, Tucci's development as a film-maker continues -- slowly
but steadily -- in reverse.
     Tucci's tale is drawn from the writings of 1950s "New Yorker" writer
Joseph Mitchell (played by Tucci) about one of his more fascinating
subjects. A low-key, Southern-born essayist, Mitchell learns of a colorful
character named Joe Gould (Ian Holm), a Harvard-educated homeless man held
in high regard by many members of the Gotham intelligentsia. Gould is said
to be working on an oral history of the people of New York, a magnum opus
of common man commentary and observational narrative Gould says runs well
over a million words. Mitchell turns Gould into the subject of one of his
profile pieces, turning Gould into an even bigger bohemian celebrity in
the process. But that's not the end of the story for Mitchell, who finds
that Gould has become unusually attached to his "biographer."
     There's no question that the eccentric Gould makes for just as
interesting a character today as he would have made 40 years ago. It just
never appears that Tucci knows exactly what to do with that character. He
fiddles about with analogies between Josephs Gould and Mitchell as
deliberate writers and human chroniclers, suggesting the very fine line
between those who can manage their neuroses and those who can't. He toys
with notions of celebrity, touching on the absurdity of those who become
famous for being famous. He nods at the ever-popular fine line between
genius and madness. And that's about all he does with any of his themes --
he fiddles and toys and nods, leaving JOE GOULD'S SECRET to drift along
with little more than its value as historical curiosity to hold it all
together.
     Mostly, Tucci indulges Ian Holm as Gould. It's the kind of role that
screams for Oscar attention, infinitely more flamboyant than Holm's
devastating turn in THE SWEET HEREAFTER yet infinitely less deserving of
praise. Sometimes Holm nails the sad soul of the exhibitionist Gould, and
even when the performance isn't perfect it's still plenty interesting to
watch. The same is true of Tucci's performance, which takes on an
interesting edge as Mitchell finds himself plainly annoyed by his
inability to close the book on his Gould story exactly when he wants
to. The interplay between Holm and Tucci makes for most of the best
moments in JOE GOULD'S SECRET, but there's always the nagging sense that
this should have been more than a showy character study.
     Every once in a while, Tucci makes the kind of interesting
film-making choices that show what he's capable of. There are a few crafty
sequences in which characters duck in and out of the frame, the individual
speakers subjugated to the conversation and the space between them. There
are also dozens of tiny distractions that make hard to view JOE GOULD'S
SECRET as more than a potentially provocative missed opportunity. It's
ironic that the story chides notions of celebrity, then casts Susan
Sarandon and Steve Martin in cameo appearances. It's even more ironic
that, in a story of artistic indecision, Tucci can't quite settle on a
solid center for his film. JOE GOULD'S SECRET is the sort of film you find
fitfully interesting while never really finding it gripping. It found me
lamenting the direction Tucci's behind-the-camera career has taken,
increasingly wondering whether Campbell Scott might have been the real
talent behind BIG NIGHT.

Title
Review for Meet the Deedles (1998)
     Walt Disney spent over thirty years turning the Disney name into the
gold standard for charming family entertainment.  In only a handful of
months, the clown princes currently ruling the Magic Kingdom appear to
have made it their mission to make the name an indicator of pure garbage.
The annual animated feature aside, Uncle Walt's factory has taken to
churning out insulting, embarrassing live-action features which stink like
the flatulence they so often feature:  101 DALMATIANS, THAT DARN CAT,
ROCKET MAN, MR. MAGOO, KRIPPENDORF'S TRIBE and now MEET THE DEEDLES.
     The story this time revolves around a pair of ne'er-do-well teenage
brothers, Phil (Paul Walker) and Stew Deedle (Steve Van Wormer), who spend
all their time surfing and slacking in Hawaii because their Dad is filthy
rich.  When Pa Deedle (Eric Braeden) finally grows tired of his layabout
sons, he sends them off to Wyoming for a character-building camp
experience.  A few misadventures and cases of mistaken identity later, the
young Deedles are rangers-in-training at Yellowstone National Park,
charged with ridding the park of a prairie dog infestation threatening to
undermine -- literally -- the Billionth Birthday Celebration for Old
Faithful.
     Predictably, a bunch of tenuously connected action-slapstick
sequences ensue.  Even more predictably, those action-slapstick sequences
include a dose of content entirely inappropriate for the target audience.
At best, we're talking about taking the toilet humor in the creative
direction of incontinent pigeons bombarding the Deedles'
stuffy-but-ultimately-sympathetic antagonist Chief Ranger Pine (played by
career stuffy-but-ultimately-sympathetic antagonist John Ashton).  At
worst, we're talking about the omnipresent smack-in-the-groin shot.  I'm
sure MEET THE DEEDLES is going to have plenty of pre-teenagers in
hysterics.  It's just depressing to watch the same Disney which used to
bring kids goofy, harmless fare like THE LOVE BUG and THE MILLION DOLLAR
DUCK resorting to such blantant pandering.
     An important programming note at this point:  in no way do I consider
myself "above" low humor.  In Mel Brooks' HIGH ANXIETY, a similar barrage
of pigeon excrement during his parody of THE BIRDS still makes me guffaw.
The problem with films like MEET THE DEEDLES is that they trot out
scatological gags with a weary inevitability, as though it wouldn't really
be a kids' film unless someone let one rip.  All of which makes it even
more puzzling when scripter Jim Herzfeld tosses in a reference to "suicide
doctor" Jack Kervorkian, which of course would be familiar to every
headline-hungry middle-schooler.  If that's Herzfeld's idea of throwing a
bone to the parents forced to squirm through this mess with their kids,
perhaps a better one might have been making the slang-spewing Deedles a
bit more than one-joke copies of Bill and Ted.  Or giving Dennis Hopper
(as the vengeance-seeking former ranger running the prairie dog scheme) a
sense of irony about his own performance.  Or providing a way to explain
to young girls why a competent female ranger (A.J. Langer) turns to mush
when an 18-year-old moron woos her with sweet nothings about how he
"totally craves (her) wave."
     MEET THE DEEDLES didn't have to be smart.  There's a place in our
multiplexes for dopey-but-innocuous family fare.  The key word there would
be "innocuous."  If Disney execs are interested in salvaging what remains
of the studio's reputation -- and its dignity -- they might stop for just
one moment to think about what Uncle Walt might say.  That is, what he
might say after he picked his jaw up off the floor and stopped slapping
the responsible parties insensible.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
BOOGIE NIGHTS
(New Line)
Starring:  Mark Wahlberg, Julianne Moore, Burt Reynolds, Heather Graham,
Don Cheadle.
Screenplay:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
Producers:  Lloyd Levinn, John Lyons, Paul Thomas Anderson, Joanne Sellar.
Director:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, profanity, adult themes, drug
use, violence).
Running Time:  150 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Potential viewers who may be scared away from BOOGIE NIGHTS by its
subject matter, take note:  you're not likely to find a more potent
morality tale anywhere this year.  The milieu may be the pornography
industry of the late 1970s and early 1980s, but those with prurient
interest need not apply.  BOOGIE NIGHTS is that rare example of riveting
film-making which also instructs, so unobtrusively you almost can't tell
you're being instructed.  Never has the self-delusional narcissism of the
"Me Decade" been portrayed with such an eye to the repercussions.  This is
the story not just of an endless party, but of the harrowing morning after
the party finally does end.
     Writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson opens his narrative in 1977,
swooping through a San Fernando Valley disco as he introduces his
principle characters:  adult film director Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds);
his leading lady Amber Waves (Julianne Moore); perpetually skating ingenue
Rollergirl (Heather Graham); black leading man Buck Swope (Don Cheadle)
and a 17-year-old busboy named Eddie Adams (Mark Wahlberg).  Horner sees
something in the young man -- not the least of which is his spectacular
male endowment -- which encourages him to bring Eddie into his film-making
family.  Re-christened Dirk Diggler, the new stud on the block becomes an
instant sensation in the industry headlining the erotic adventures of
private eye Brock Landers.
     And just as instantly, he gets caught up in the glitter and glory of
the 70s in Southern California.  BOOGIE NIGHTS does a spectacular job of
re-creating its era, with its Pee-Chee folders, 8-track tapes and Fresca,
but its greater triumph is making the tunnel vision of its characters both
hilarious and pathetic.  When Jack's sincere pronouncement that he longs
to make story-centered sex films clashes with our glimpses of the 
mechanical, blank-faced films he is creating, it's enough to make you
laugh out loud; when Dirk proudly shows off his "imported Italian nylon"
print shirts, it's like watching a smug dinosaur blissfully unaware of his
own impending extinction.  The characters in BOOGIE NIGHTS have no sense
that everything they do and everything they enjoy will soon be considered
utterly ridiculous -- or worse, that they will cast a shadow over the rest
of their lives.
     That is exactly what happens as BOOGIE NIGHTS blasts into the 80s
with a literal bang.  Anderson takes the story on a darker turn, watching
the characters discover consequences for their actions they never
anticipated.  The pace flags somewhat in the second half hour, but in a
way it had to -- after the coke-fuelled pool parties, all that remains to
show us is the inevitable, painful hangover.  It is here that the
exceptional cast truly begins to shine:  the always dazzling Julianne
Moore as a mother in search of children; a surprisingly dignified Burt
Reynolds becoming a disgusted auteur of the amateur video era; Don Cheadle
as an aspiring entrepreneur who finds his past thwarting his attempt to go
legit; and Mark Wahlberg as a cocaine addict who discovers his one true
talent vanishing with the drug's effect on his ability to "perform."
Appropriately, there isn't much about the final 45 minutes of BOOGIE
NIGHTS which could be considered "fun."  Cautionary story-telling rarely
gets this grim, electrifying and compelling.
     The most talked-about moment in BOOGIE NIGHTS will probably be the
final shot, in which Wahlberg finally displays the equipment
(prosthetically-enhanced, if you must know) which has been the subject of
so much discussion through the rest of the film.  It would be easy to
consider that moment gratuitious, but it would be just as inappropriate as
thinking of BOOGIE NIGHTS just as a movie about the porno business.  In
effect, the whole film is about the ultimate "dick thing," a group of
people who simply can't see the world beyond what's going on between their
legs.  Dirk's pep talk to his own genitalia undercuts the seemingly
idyllic conclusion which precedes it -- it turns out he hasn't really
learned much of anything.  Viewers, on the other hand, have a chance to
learn more than they might expect from BOOGIE NIGHTS...for instance, that
sometimes a sex film isn't just a sex film.

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
LOCK, STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Nick Moran, Jason Flemyng, Jason Statham, Dexter Fletcher,
Vinnie Jones, Frank Harper, P. H. Moriarty, Lenny McLean.
Screenplay:  Guy Ritchie.
Producer:  Matthew Vaughn.
Director:  Guy Ritchie.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, brief nudity, drug use)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's tough to knock a film as undeniably invigorating as LOCK, STOCK
AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS without coming off as an impossible-to-please
crank.  Yes, it's generally funny, clever and unpredictable; true, it's
plotted with a precision that should make aspiring screenwriters take
notes; indeed, it has visual style to spare.  Guy Ritchie's
caper/comedy/thriller has a savage entertainment value that's awfully hard
to find anymore.  It's also a film without an ounce of humanity, a
narrative machine where the fun feels hollow because the characters come
with names and virtually nothing more.
     That's a problem that really only nags in hindsight, since you'll
spend all your viewing time just trying to keep up.  The tale begins with
four London pals -- Eddy (Nick Moran), Tom (Jason Flemyng), Bacon (Jason
Statham) and Soap (Dexter Fletcher) -- who pool their small-time criminal
resources to come up with 100,000 pounds to get cardsharp Eddy into a high
stakes game.  Unfortunately, Eddy is victimized by some dirty dealing, and
ends up half a million pounds in debt to a sordid character named
"Hatchet" Harry Lonsdale (P. H. Moriarty).  Faced with only seven days to
avoid an unpleasant fate at the hands of Harry's henchman Barry the
Baptist (Lenny McLean), the quartet comes up with a desperate plan to get
the necessary money:  ripping off a van full of cash and marijuana from a
gang of thugs who just ripped it off from someone else.
     Believe it or not, that's the simple part of the multi-layered
plotting in LOCK, STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS.  Also tied into the main
story:  the theft of two antique guns from an estate auction; a trio of
over-their-heads pot farmers; Jheri-Curled, sports fanatic crime boss Rory
(Vas Blackwood); and an enforcer-for-hire named Big Chris (Vinnie Jones)
who has a soft spot for his young son.  There are plenty of occasions
during the first half of the film when it feels over-populated,
over-plotted and over-directed, sending situations, vertiginous camera
angles and new faces at the audience in overwhelming waves.  Only
Ritchie's appealing wit might keep you from throwing up your hands and
throwing in the towel.
     Fortunately, the second and third acts offer so much propulsive
action that forgiveness for the early excesses becomes fairly easy.
Ritchie manages to pull all these threads together quite deftly, creating
a series of confrontations which continuously whip up new permutations of
violence, dark humor and surprise.  There are missteps here as well --
including a depiction of the protagonists' celebrating an apparent victory
which resembles a drinking binge by the Monkees -- but the caper itself is
engrossing enough to help hide them.   LOCK, STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS
blindsides you with its sheer momentum, the pieces falling into place so
rapidly that you can't help but admire Ritchie's audacity.
     It's considerably harder to admire his thoroughgoing lack of interest
in his characters except as gun-toting props.  Every bit of color in the
film's performances comes from the use of physical types -- the bald,
imposing Barry; the short, high-strung Rory; strapping but soft-spoken Big
Chris.  Quentin Tarantino often is credited with inspiring a slew of
nihilistic comic-crime imitators, but Tarantino's way with actors and
redemption-hungry characters has always given him away as a closet 
humanist, and has always tempered his infamous violent streak.  Guy
Ritchie has a gift for adrenaline, to be sure, but he sends that
adrenaline through a body that has no heart.  You can't knock a director
in 1999 who at least makes you want to watch.  You just wish this rowdy
bit of entertainment made you want to care about something, anything,
besides how many bodies will pile up before the credits roll.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
     A couple of years ago, I began reading Scott Smith's novel A SIMPLE
PLAN and never made it to the halfway point.  There was nothing
particularly wrong with the plot -- a moody cautionary tale about the
resulting spiral of guilt and violence when three men find $4.4 million in
a wrecked plane -- nor did Smith's prose style offend in any way.  The
simple problem with A SIMPLE PLAN was the narrative structure, in which
Smith told the story as a first person account by one of the men.  It
seemed to me a terrible mistake, one made identification with one specific
character too explicit.  Intriguing though the premise may have been, I
couldn't get past hearing Hank Mitchell's voice while watching his story
unfold.
     Sam Raimi's screen version of A SIMPLE PLAN shows how easy it can be
to improve on a novel when point-of-view is its only real flaw.  Raimi
casts Bill Paxton as Hank, a hard-working family man in a snowy Minnesota
farm town.  One New Year's Eve, Hank -- along with his brother Jacob
(Billy Bob Thornton) and Jacob's drinking buddy Lou (Brent Briscoe) --
takes an unexpected detour into snowy woods, where they discover the
downed plane, a dead pilot and a bag full of $100 bills.  Suspecting the
money must be ill-gotten, Lou and Jacob are intent on keeping it, and
manage to talk Hank into a compromise whereby they'll sit on the money
until the plane is found in the spring.  If no one comes looking for the
money, no harm done, and three millionaires made.
     Only there is harm done.  Greed begins twisting the three men,
already divided into shifting factions -- educated Hank vs. unemployed
Jacob and Lou, the two Mitchell brothers vs. the outsider Lou -- into
ever-more-extreme methods of covering their tracks.  It also begins
twisting Hank's wife Sarah (Bridget Fonda), who eventually becomes the
most determined to keep the cash at any cost.  A SIMPLE PLAN offers an
object lesson in any number of cliched moral bon mots:  crime doesn't pay,
there certainly isn't any honor among thieves, and love of money is indeed
the root of all evil.  It's a tale of what we're made of at our core, and
how little it takes to strip away the civilization in a man like Hank and
turn him into a savage.
     That probably doesn't sound like the kind of material one usually
associates with Raimi (THE EVIL DEAD, DARKMAN), a director whose camera
often seems to need a dose of Ritalin.  He certainly tones down his
hyperkinetic visuals, but he loses none of his energy, which is why A
SIMPLE PLAN never feels like a simplistic morality play.  He merely 
harnesses that energy into scenes of superbly crafted tension, where the
moments before critical decisions linger with almost unbearable
anticipation.  Raimi allows you to feel the weight of every bad choice,
every life-threatening turning point.  He does it not by letting Hank
explain to you what he's doing, but by giving you a moment to consider
what you would do in his place.  It's a thriller as full of genuine dread
as anything a major studio has produced in recent years.
     It's also a thriller full of genuine pathos, thanks to a masterful
supporting performance by Billy Bob Thornton.  As the simple-minded Jacob,
a life-long loser who believes money might finally make him somebody, he
is the film's true moral compass.  As confused as he is physically
grotesque, he provides the sense of emotional consequence most plot-driven
thrillers lack.  The one drawback to Thornton's intense work is that he
makes his castmates look weak by comparison; Bridget Fonda's calculating
Sarah rings particularly false at times.  A SIMPLE PLAN overreaches its
grasp a bit during the final act when a sinister figure arrives to 
threaten the plan, but by then Raimi and Smith have gotten you so wrapped
up in what their characters will do next that you're willing to follow
wherever they lead.  Smith's first-person narrative in written form made
this a tale of one man's descent.  On the screen, A SIMPLE PLAN lets you
identify with every character and experience the chilly, chilling dark
night of several souls.

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
     The honeymoon is a short one for young American film-makers, a
distressing fact of life Kevin Smith had to learn the hard way.  In 1994,
Smith was the wunderkind behind CLERKS, a low-budget, day-in-the-life
twentysomething comedy which became a critical darling.  Only a year
later, Smith made a studio-financed follow-up called MALLRATS, a film so
widely reviled that Smith publicly apologized for it, announcing "I don't
know what I was thinking."  Smith was thinking much more clearly when he
returned to a sub-seven figure budget for CHASING AMY, but more
significantly, he was thinking more maturely.  Though he sometimes
explores his themes with more earnestness than clarity, Smith gives
CHASING AMY both a wicked sense of humor and a genuine sensitivity about
the complications of sexual politics.
     Smith's trademark pair of Jersey-bred buddies are Holden McNeil (Ben
Affleck) and Banky Edwards (Jason Lee), childhood friends who have
co-created a popular alternative comic book called "Bluntman and Chronic."
At a comic book convention, Holden meets a fellow artist named Alyssa
Jones (Joey Lauren Adams), with whom he is instantly smitten.  There is a
small impediment to his adoration, however:  Alyssa happens to be a
lesbian.  Holden's love appears destined to be unrequited -- a fact about
which Banky actually seems to be pleased -- until his relationship with
Alyssa begins to take some unpredictable turns.  As Holden struggles to
deal with all the complications of being with a woman like Alyssa, cracks
begin to develop in his relationships with both Alyssa and Banky.
     For the first half-hour of CHASING AMY, Kevin Smith concentrates on
churning out the laughs with his often-crude, usually pop-culture-heavy
dialogue.  He shows an admirable willingness to take on potentially thorny
topics like gay stereotypes -- there's a great sequence involving a gay
black comic book writer (Dwight Ewell) who is forced to keep up a public
image as a militant Afro-centrist -- and a conversation about Archie and
Jughead as gay lovers works despite its forced Tarantino-as-a-slacker
quality.  Smith even pulls off a riff on Jaws in which Banky and Alyssa
compare wounds from oral sex horror stories like an emotionally immature
Richard Dreyfuss and a lesbian Robert Shaw (though the flashback
literalization of those stories is ill-advised).  While the jokes are
rarely profound, they are usually effective and delivered with zing by
the actors.
     Smith _does_ try to get profound as he focuses on the relationship
between Holden and Alyssa, and it is there that CHASING AMY gets clumsy.
When there is a point to be made in CHASING AMY, it generally gets made by
people making speeches -- Holden as he confesses his love to Alyssa,
Alyssa as she responds to Holden's jealousy about her past, even Smith
himself in his recurring role as taciturn layabout-cum-philosopher Silent
Bob (the film's title comes from Silent Bob's story about an ill-fated
romance).  Smith is still a writer first and a director second, and
CHASING AMY gets awfully sluggish as he lets conversations drag into
exchanges of soul-baring testimonials.  It doesn't help that two of the
longer speeches are delivered by Joey Lauren Adams, a talented actress but
one whose Jennifer Tilly voice becomes grating when emotional scenes force
her to wail for several minutes at a time.  Smith clearly wants to stretch
himself beyond satiric comedy, but he never quite finds a pace which gives
the more serious moments in CHASING AMY a spark to match their sincerity.
     It's a shame Smith's romantic observations never quite click as
drama, because his ideas are far more intriguing than most of what is
served up in contemporary romantic comedies.  CHASING AMY is really about
male sexual hang-ups, and Smith digs deep into the insecurities of his
characters to find out why guys dwell on the sexual histories of their
partners.  There is an impressive lack of judgmental posturing in the way
Smith develops his characters, and he shows keen insight into how
different people respond to societal norms about sexual behavior.  It's
simply clear that Smith is still a guy who writes like people sitting
around talking, and that style works much better with comedy than with
drama.  When it is at its funniest, CHASING AMY reminds you why everyone
was so high on Kevin Smith in the wake of CLERKS.  And even when it
falters as a drama, it proves that Smith isn't content with making CLERKS
over and over.  Or, perhaps more important, that he won't make MALLRATS
over and over.  Anyone for a second honeymoon?

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Cameron Diaz, Ben Stiller, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris
Elliott, Lin Shaye, W. Earl Brown.
Screenplay:  Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly & Bobby
Farrelly.
Producers:  Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas & Charles B.
Wessler.
Directors:  Peter Farrelly and Bobby Farrelly.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult humor, sexual situations, brief nudity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'll worry tomorrow about whether I've consigned myself to Film
Critic Hell; today, I'm still waiting for my cheeks and sides to recover.
I'll worry tomorrow about whether or not the Farrelly brothers portend the
end of civilization as we know it; today, I'm still grateful someone is
willing to push the comedic envelope into heretofore unknown ZIP codes.
Tomorrow I many not believe I've sent the following words to an
unsuspecting world:  today, I believe THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is the
funniest comedy I've seen in this decade.
     It may also be the most consistently, unapologetically tasteless
comedy I've seen this decade.  After all, these are the Farrelly brothers
we're talking about, the same fellows who turned laxatives and "milking a
bull" into comic stomach-churners in DUMB AND DUMBER and KINGPIN.  This
time around they tell the story of Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz), every man's
fantasy:  she's beautiful, intelligent, and she loves beer, hot dogs and
football.  The film opens in 1985, where geeky Ted Stroehmann (Ben 
Stiller) is on the verge of taking the stunning Mary to his high school
prom.  Fate intervenes, however, and thirteen years later Ted is still
thinking about Mary as the one that got away.  At the insistence of his
friend Dom (Chris Elliott), Ted hires insurance claims investigator Pat
Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down Mary in Florida.  Little does Ted know
that Pat is about to become as infatuated with Mary as he is, leading to a
romantic triangle which rapidly becomes a square, then a pentagon, then...
     Never mind.  The plot is really beside the point.  THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY is really a collection of comedy-of-errors set pieces which 
find gags in the mentally handicapped, the physically handicapped,
stalking, masturbation, anonymous homosexual encounters, serial killings
and the unspeakable horror of getting..."it"...caught in one's zipper.  If
that kind of subject matter seems more likely to have you grimacing than
guffawing, don't say I didn't warn you:  there's even more where that came
from.  
     Viewers with less delicate sensibilities, on the other hand, may be
hoarse at the end of a relentlessly raucous two hours.  It's unfair to
spoil the moments with specifics; half the fun in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY comes from I-can't-believe-they-did-that reactions.  Suffice to say
that nearly everything works, from the surrealist use of alt-rock icon
Jonathan Richman as the film's narrator/troubadour to the subverted
romantic montage, from the perfectly-pitched charm of Diaz (rapidly
becoming the most appealing screen actress of her generation, if she's not
there already) to the goofy appeal of Stiller.  THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY recalls BLAZING SADDLES-era Mel Brooks, or AIRPLANE!-era
Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker -- back-brain humor which will be as dumb and/or
offensive to some viewers as it is hilarious to others.  Brilliant, it
ain't; brilliantly executed, it is.
     There are a couple of slow patches in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY,
which probably runs longer than advisable at nearly two hours.  When it
pauses long enough to pretend that the character relationships matter,
or to explain a rather unnecessary plot twist, the film could have you
shifting in your seat.  Fortunately, they're only momentary distractions
between laughs that beat down your logical objections, building and
building until they add up to more laughs than you can remember at the
movies.  I'm not proud of the fact that I'd rather sit through THERE'S
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY again than any one of the inspid romantic comedies of
the past five years that generally passed for comic entertainment, but I
would.  I'll worry about what that means tomorrow.

Title
Review for End of the Affair, The (1999)
THE END OF THE AFFAIR
(Columbia)
Starring:  Ralph Fiennes, Julianne Moore, Stephen Rea, Ian Hart.
Screenplay:  Neil Jordan, based on the novel by Graham Greene.
Producers:  Neil Jordan and Stephen Woolley.
Director:  Neil Jordan.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's entirely possible that a film version of THE END OF THE AFFAIR
-- Graham Greene's novel of passion, obsession and faith -- could be made
without getting into the explicit details of its protagonists'
extra-marital exploits. And in fact it already has, in a weepy 1955 
version starring Deborah Kerr and Van Johnson. Some would no doubt argue
that the more restrained approach has its merits, but there's something
about this source material that demands an approach that couldn't be
filmed in 1955. I can't remember the last time a mainstream film featured
as much intense, forthright sexuality -- of the groping, grinding, gasping
variety -- as THE END OF THE AFFAIR. And I can't remember the last time it
would have been quite so thematically appropriate.
     The story begins in 1946, with a chance meeting between writer
Maurice Bendrix (Ralph Fiennes) and his neighbor Henry Miles (Stephen
Rea). Henry is distraught over a notion that his wife Sarah (Julianne
Moore) may be seeing another man, a notion in which Bendrix also has a
certain interest. In flashback, we learn that Bendrix and Sarah engaged in
a passionate five-year-long affair during the war, an affair which Sarah
had abruptly ended with no explanation. Still obsessed with Sarah two
years after the end of their affair, Bendrix decides he must know what
Sarah is now up to, and hires a private detective (Ian Hart) to uncover
her secrets.
     Neil Jordan's approach to much of THE END OF THE AFFAIR is in fact
fairly restrained. Michael Nyman's string score pulses throughout the
film, adding a layer of heightened drama, but the performances play
against the music effectively. Ralph Fiennes' work may be too reminiscent
of his character in THE ENGLISH PATIENT, but it's right for the role, as
is Stephen Rea's hangdog Henry. Jordan also takes a calculated risk by
playing some scenes more than once, after a key piece of information has
been revealed. Though the repetition of those scenes gives the film a
slightly lurching pace, it also shows how easy it is to misinterpret key
moments in our lives. Ultimately, the risk pays off.
     His even bigger risk pays off even more definitively. Let viewers go
in forewarned: THE END OF THE AFFAIR is a steamy affair, the sex scenes a
deft tightrope act between pure animal passion and intense emotion. THE
END OF THE AFFAIR is a story that depends on believing in the transcendent
connection between Sarah and Bendrix, a connection Bendrix feels is broken
any time they are apart. Jordan even manages to use the sex scenes for a
couple of great punch lines (Bendrix, when Henry returns home at the
height of the lovers' passion: "What if he heard us?" Sarah: "He wouldn't
recognize the sound"). THE END OF THE AFFAIR circa 1999 combines the
appeal of old-fashioned tragic romance with Greene's ahead-of-his-time
psychology of irrational desire (whether temporal or spiritual). It may
make you uncomfortable, but you can't deny its honesty.
     The film does begin running out of gas in the third act, as the
relationship between Sarah and Bendrix becomes subservient to the
relationship between Sarah and God. Jordan does an impressive job of
making the novel's philosophical musings solid cinema, retaining all the
thematic weight without too much ponderous voice-over. There's also the
ongoing pleasure of Ian Hart's sharp, understated work as the private
detective who takes tremendous pride in his professionalism. And even when
they no longer fill the screen, THE END OF THE AFFAIR's scenes of illicit
eroticism linger like a memory of addictive high. Jordan does justice to
Greene's 1950s narrative by doing what the 1950s couldn't do -- showing
the middle of an affair that made the end of the affair a tragedy.

Title
Review for Terminal Velocity (1994)
Starring:  Charlie Sheen, Nastassja Kinski, James Gandolfini,
Christopher McDonald.
Screenplay:  David Twohy.
Director:  Deran Sarafian.
     Most of the time, I see a new movie on its opening weekend, and
it's not just so that my reviews can be fairly fresh.  It is also an
attempt to avoid, to the extent that it is possible, pre-conceptions
based on other reviews.  Such was not the case with TERMINAL VELOCITY,
which had the chance to accumulate a mountain of negative response in
the two weeks between its opening and my screening.  It's difficult to
preduct how those pre-conceptions will affect my own reaction.  In this
case, they allowed me to be pleasantly surprised.  TERMINAL VELOCITY is
frenetic and uneven, but it has a certain bone-headed charm thanks to
Charlie Sheen's improbably dense hero.
     Sheen plays Richard "Ditch" Brody, a skydiving instructor with
something of a reckless streak.  It is that reckless streak which is
blamed when a young woman named Chris (Nastassja Kinski) plunges to her
death while Ditch is giving her a lesson.  The threat of a manslaughter
charge inspires Ditch to do a little investigating of his own, during
which he discovers that for a corpse, Chris appears remarkably lively.
He also discovers that she is a former KGB agent, trying to prevent
other former KGB agents from financing a coup in Russia.  Somewhat
against his will, Ditch becomes Chris' partner in a battle to prevent a
new Cold War.
     The plot of TERMINAL VELOCITY is not exactly what you would call
inspired; it's basically classic Hitchcock crossed with classic James
Bond.  The plot's few twists and turns are spelled out in huge letters
from the outset, and a bit clumsy in the execution.  Equally
distracting is a tone which careens from brutal to near slapstick in
moments, making for a schizophrenic experience which isn't as purely
enjoyable as it might be.  Director Deran Sarafian drives the action
forward relentlessly, which is usually an ideal choice for a film of
this genre, but often seems merely hyperactive here.  TERMINAL VELOCITY
sometimes feels like a cockroach race -- moving fast, but in no
particular direction.
     Its saving graces are the characterizations and interaction of
Charlie Sheen and Nastassja Kinski.  Sheen's Ditch Brody is just a
handful of brain celss removed from his goofball HOT SHOTS! persona,
but it's a character that comes off as extremely refreshing in an
action thriller.  Rather than being either inordinately brilliant or
dumber than virtually everyone in the audience, Ditch is just simple.
He is quite entertaining in scenes where he is infuriated by Kinski's
references to his dim-wittedness, but he maintains a kind of affable
puppy-dog eagerness to please.  In one scene, he opens a cylinder which
is supposed to contain valuable information.  When what he finds (a CD
rom disk) isn't what he expects to find, he taps the cylinder on the
desk to make sure there's nothing else inside.  It's a simple gesture,
but funny because it's clear this is no rocket scientist we're dealing
with.  Kinski is also quite good as the tough, edgy agent.  She is
clearly smarter than Ditch, and it's a credit to screenwriter David
Twohy (THE FUGITIVE) that he lets her maintain the upper hand; even
when Ditch has to rescue her late in the film, it never seems as though
she's merely the "woman in distress."
     That rescue, a wildly inventive stunt, is certainly TERMINAL
VELOCITY's highlight.  Plunging through the air in a convertible
Cadillac, Ditch has to fight off villain Christopher McDonald, free
Kinski from the car's trunk and release his parachute before hitting
the ground.  It's a gag worthy of the best Bond films, and it sends
TERMINAL VELOCITY off on a note of high energy.  But it's not an
isolated moment.  TERMINAL VELOCITY is full of well-staged action
sequences, and Twohy's dialogue is rich with fine one-liners.  Though
it sometimes seems a bit too busy and scattershot for its own good,
it's still a perfectly enjoyable no-brainer worth a few solid laughs.

Title
Review for Michael (1996)
(New Line)
Starring:  John Travolta, Andie MacDowell, William Hurt, Bob Hoskins,
Robert Pastorelli.
Screenplay:  Pete Dexter & Jim Quinlan and Nora Ephron and Delia Ephron.
Producers:  Sean Daniel, James Jacks.
Director:  Nora Ephron.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Nora Ephron still has a lot to learn about making movies.  Yes, she
has shown that she has her finger on what audiences want to see in a
romantic comedy, both as a writer (WHEN HARRY MET SALLY...) and as a
director (SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE), but when it comes to her sense of
narrative as a film-maker, she has proven to be on a downward learning
curve.  SLEEPLESS coasted on the charm of its stars and a painstakingly
manufactured sense of whimsy; MIXED NUTS collapsed into a chaotic holiday
mess.  In MICHAEL, Ephron attempts to meld genial romantic comedy with
irreverent fantasy, and the result is one of the most mis-guided
high-concept films to come out of Hollywood in years.
     William Hurt stars as Frank Quinlan, a former investigative reporter
now writing for a Chicago-based supermarket tabloid.  Frank has had
trouble proving to his editor (Bob Hoskins) that he understands what the
tabloid audience wants, but a letter arrives for Frank which may save his
job.  A woman in Iowa named Pansy Milbank (Jean Stapleton) claims that an
angel is living with her, and Frank heads out to investigate with his
colleague Huey (Robert Pastorelli) and an "angel expert" named Dorothy
Winters (Andie MacDowell).  What they find is no ordinary, halo-wearing
angel, however: it is the archangel Michael (John Travolta), an
overweight chain-smoker with a very real set of wings.  Michael agrees to
be photographed for the paper, but only if they drive back to Chicago, and
thus begins a very odd road trip with one of the heavenly host.
     The story for MICHAEL is co-credited to Pete Dexter (PARIS TROUT,
RUSH), which leads me to believe that it was a very different story in an
earlier incarnation.  An eccentric angel enjoying a final go-around on
earth is an interesting concept, and John Travolta certainly appears to be
having a great time with it.  His early scenes are a riot -- a slovenly
descent of the stairs, dragging wings behind his bloated bare chest,
followed by a breakfast of alarmingly over-sugared Frosted Flakes -- but
then he becomes strangely sedate, even when he gets into a barroom brawl.
As an over-eager celestial rascal, Michael could have been an entertaining
character to follow, but Ephron appears worried that a lusty angel might
be too offensive.  Even when he has a one-night stand with a waitress,
Travolta maintains a smiling serenity rather than a bit of the devil.
     Ephron and her sister Delia probably contributed the romantic plot to
the mix, a plot which eventually subsumes Michael's story entirely.  Hurt,
playing yet another variation on his emotionally wounded ACCIDENTAL
TOURIST persona, is the lost soul in need of redemption; MacDowell does a
predictable turn as a sketchy dog trainer-cum-aspiring country singer.
Michael's mission seems to be to bring these two uncertain people
together, and the story ultimately is about their development.  They are
never nearly as interesting as Michael, though, and this budding romance
usually acts as a distraction between the angel's unpredictable pranks.
It is difficult to get wrapped up in the subtleties of a relationship
while you're watching John Travolta lead a seductive dance to "Chain of
Fools" or head-butt a bull into animatronic submission.
     MICHAEL is unfocused and disappointing for nearly all of its running
time, but it is in the final twenty minutes that it becomes absolutely
insufferable.  A sub-plot finds Pastorelli's Huey the owner of a dog with
a popular column in the tabloid, and little Sparky ends up playing a
depressingly significant role in the proceedings.  When the dog's fate
after a run-in with a truck becomes MICHAEL's major plot point, you know
Ephron is willing to do absolutely anything to crank up the audience's
sympathy.  She stages a drawn-out death scene which is a complete cheat;
she violates her own rules of angelic interaction with humanity to provide
the happy ending.  She doesn't give a single character a consistent
personality (except Hoskins as the grouchy editor), and she makes
indefensible choices in editing and shot selection which break up momentum
and make two-thirds of the frame useless.  In short, nearly every decision
Nora Ephron makes leads you to the conclusion that she had no idea how to
make MICHAEL a cohesive, coherent film.  I think MICHAEL was supposed to
be about someone who needed guidance.  I'm fairly sure it was made _by_
someone who needed guidance.

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Chloe Sevigny, Kate Beckinsale, Chris Eigeman, Mackenzie Astin,
Matt Keeslar, Robert Sean Leonard, Matthew Ross, Tara Subkoff.
Screenplay:  Whit Stillman.
Producer:  Whit Stillman.
Director:  Whit Stillman.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief nudity, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  109 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A funny thing happens when the characters start dancing in Whit
Stillman's THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO:  they stop talking.  Set in the early
1980s, the story follows several young people whose social lives revolve
around a super-trendy Manhattan disco referred to only as "the club."
Among them are Alice (Chloe Sevigny) and Charlotte (Kate Beckinsale),
roommates and co-workers as manuscript readers for a publishing house;
Jimmy (Mackenzie Astin), a junior advertising executive whose job depends
on getting potential clients into the club; Tom (Robert Sean Leonard), a
Harvard man Alice admires from afar; Josh (Matt Keeslar), an assistant
district attorney with a history of manic-depression; and Des (Chris
Eigeman), the club's womanizing assistant manager who ends his flings by
claiming to have discovered that he's gay.
     Most of the time, these characters do what characters in films by
Whit Stillman (METROPOLITAN, BARCELONA) typically do:  they engage in a
whole lot of urbane conversation.  They share views on the value of group
social activities versus "ferocious pairing-off."  They wax philosophical
on contemporary male-female relationship dynamics.  They complain about
being perceived as "yuppies" despite feeling that their career prospects
are limited.  They exchange observations on pop culture phenomena
(including how BAMBI sparked the environmental movement and LADY AND THE
TRAMP indoctrinated young girls into desiring "bad boys") like Tarantino
characters toting highball glasses.  They talk and talk and talk and talk
until amusement at their bon mots gives way to frustration as you begin
wishing you could grab every one of them by the collar and beg someone,
anyone to do something, anything.
     What they eventually do -- all they eventually do, really, besides
talk -- is dance.  For several seconds at a time, Stillman will hold the
camera on a couple doing their clumsy middle-class boogieing to Chic or
Diana Ross or Evelyn "Champagne" King with nary a sound to be heard but
the tunes.  These moments anchor a two-pronged approach by Stillman to the
disco culture.  On the one hand, he clearly appreciates selected songs
from the much-derided genre, and enjoys providing a showcase for some of
the livelier, funkier numbers (including a surreal closing scene with
subway riders jumping up to the O'Jays' "Love Train").  On the other hand,
he doesn't seem to care much for the disco environment, a haven for drugs,
corruption, sexually-transmitted diseases and ultimately disappointing
pairings of convenience, all tarted up to be irresistably hip.  For an
inveterate gab-meister like Stillman, the disco is practically his concept
of hell -- a vacuous place where people fall into bed together after
having shared only token words.
     The social angle is occasionally intriguing, but you have to wade
through an awful lot of tediousness and sloppy plotting to get to it.
It's hard to keep track of the various romantic permutations in THE LAST
DAYS OF DISCO, not because Stillman tears through the narrative at a
breakneck pace but because his characters are so interchangeably earnest
and clever.  The notable exceptions are Eigeman (a veteran of Stillman's
previous features) and Beckinsale, who at least add a bit of self-absorbed
spice to the proceedings.  Otherwise it's not easy to care about who ends
up with whom, or why Stillman muddles through plot devices like an
undercover investigation of the club's finances while abandoning the
repercussions of one of Alice's one-night stands.  The scattered comic
high points are too subdued to overcome the incongruity between the
subject matter and Stillman's approach to it.  For a film about the
flame-out of a flashy era, THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO is just too languid and
verbose.  Only for those few moments when the music starts and the talking
stops does the film feel like it's got to be real.

Title
Review for Perfect World, A (1993)
Starring:  Kevin Costner, Clint Eastwood, T.J. Lowther, Laura Dern.
Screenplay:  John Lee Hancock.
Director:  Clint Eastwood.
     Let's face it, Kevin Costner hasn't become one of the most popular
movie stars in the world because he can act the hell out of a part.
Sure, he's been charming enough in light fare like SILVERADO and BULL
DURHAM, but he's done little to prove that his ideal dramatic role
wasn't as the corpse in THE BIG CHILL.  It therefore might not seem to
mean much to say that A PERFECT WORLD features Costner's best
all-around performance yet, and indeed it's nothing earth-shattering.
However, it's more than solid, and coupled with an impressive turn by
7-year-old T. J. Lowther creates a haunting story that packs a real
punch even through its superfluous subplot.
     Costner stars as Butch Haynes, a recidivist criminal who escapes
from a Texas prison with his cellmate on Halloween 1963.  In the course
of their escape, they take as a hostage young Philip Perry (Lowther), a
fatherless boy raised in a strict Jehovah's Witness household.  In
pursuit is Texas Ranger Red Garnett (Clint Eastwood), a veteran lawman
forced to team up with young criminologist Sally Gerber (Laura Dern).
Soon Butch and Philip are on their own, and begin to form an
attachment, Butch acting as a surrogate father to Philip and Philip
reminding Butch of his own troubled youth.  As the unlikely pair head
out of Texas, they head also for a showdown with Red, and with Butch's
confrontation with his own tortured past.
     Screenwriter John Lee Hancock makes one big mistake, and that's
spending so much time and the tired and uninteresting subplot focusing
on the law enforcement in pursuit of Butch.  It seems in the early
stages that he's setting up a parallel, or is interested in creating a
hunter-hunted conflict a la THE FUGITIVE, but neither reall proves
true.  Instead we get cliche'd characters in cliche'd conflicts.
There's an icy Fed to get on Red's nerves, and plenty of pithy good ol'
boy wisdom dispensed.  Eastwood and Dern toss off token lines of
good-natured antagonism, but neither one is interesting enough to make
their story at all significant.  A tighter, potentially classic drama
might have come from chopping their segments entirely, because the main
plot is a gem.
     The relationship between Butch Haynes and Philip Perry is one of
the most unique and interesting explored in recent years.  While at
first glance Butch might seem to be a simple "victim of a negative
environment" type, he's more complicated than that.  The picture that
develops of his father is far from clear, making Butch a less than
reliable narrator.  His attachment to Philip is based on the worst
memories of his father, yet it is his father he seeks throughout.  A
PERFECT WORLD plays out like an extended therapy session for Butch, as
he attempts through Philip to create the perfect childhood he could not
have for himself.  Costner captures a surprising amount of nuance in
his portrayal of Butch, one minute the doting father, the next an edgy
psychotic.  It's a radical change of pace for Costner, and he pulls it
off.  Perhaps the larger credit for A PERFECT WORLD's success is T. J.
Lowther.  He's not asked to say much, but his expressive face becomes
one of the most vital elements in the film.  The relationship between
Butch and Philip is the heart of A PERFECT WORLD, and it's nearly
perfectly executed.
     Director Eastwood's first outing since his Oscar for UNFORGIVEN is
a similarly dark piece about a struggle for redemption, and while the
whole may not be as strong as last year's Best Picture winner, some of
the moments are even better.  The opening sequence is instantly
gripping, and a long shot of Butch and Philip walking through a field,
the boy repeatedly attempting to hold the criminal's hand, is
wonderful.  The best sequence comes near the end, as an idyllic waltz
quickly turns into a remarkably intense confrontation.  Eastwood draws
out the ending a bit too long, but by that point I was more than
willing to stick with Butch and Philip.
     A PERFECT WORLD is really two films.  One is mediocre at best, but
the other is one of the best films of the year.  Together, they still
add up to one of the better films of the year.
     A note to inside joke watchers: look for a billboard for "Bull
Durham Tobacco" in the sequence at Friendly's store.

Title
Review for First Wives Club, The (1996)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Goldie Hawn, Bette Midler, Diane Keaton, Sarah Jessica Parker,
Maggie Smith, Dan Hedaya, Stephen Collins, Victor Garber, Bronson Pinchot.
Screenplay:  Robert Harling.
Producer:  Scott Rudin.
Director:  Hugh Wilson.
Running Time:  102 minutes
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is something so unapologetically out-of-date about THE FIRST
WIVES CLUB that it becomes somewhat endearing almost in spite of itself.
If you remember the 1980 Jane Fonda-Lily Tomlin-Dolly Parton comedy 9 TO
5, you will be familiar with the basic theme of THE FIRST WIVES CLUB, as
well as the era from which it seems to arise.  The idea of mis-treated
housewives wreaking terrible vengeance on the pig-men who done 'em wrong
is likely to cause much hand-wringing in the sensitive 1990s, and I might
buy into that if THE FIRST WIVES CLUB seemed at all interested in the real
problems of real people.  What it really turns out to be is a silly
sit-com of a movie with lots of bark but very little bite.
     THE FIRST WIVES CLUB is the story of Brenda Morelli Cushman (Bette
Midler), Elise Elliot (Goldie Hawn) and Annie MacDuggan Paradis (Diane
Keaton), estranged college friends in New York who re-unite when another
friend, Cynthia Swann Griffin (Stockard Channing, in an un-credited cameo)
commits suicide.  The women learn that Cynthia's ex-husband had just
married a much younger woman, and that each of their husbands had
similarly dismissed them for a newer model.  Outraged at being thrown over
after the best years of their lives, Brenda, Elise and Annie decide that
it is time for a little payback.  Thus is born The First Wives Club,
dedicated to making the lives of their ex-husbands -- Morty Cushman (Dan
Hedaya), Bill Atchison (Victor Garber) and Aaron Paradis (Stephen
Collins), respectively -- genuinely miserable.
     For a while, it is entertaining enough to watch the stars of THE
FIRST WIVES CLUB sink their teeth into the kind of juicy roles which are
not generally available to women their age.  That context makes Hawn's
part the most fun -- Elise is an aging film actress using every surgical
means at her disposal to fight off the ravages of time and avoid playing
"the mother."  Living in a penthouse which is a shrine to her past
glories, she drinks and exercises herself into obliviousness, and Hawn
attacks the part like a great screwball comic.  Keaton is equally adept
with Annie, a woman with self-esteem issues and a terminally cheery
outlook; she has a hilarious moment when she finally releases some
pent-up aggression on her therapist (Marcia Gay Harden).  Only Midler
fails to strike a sympathetic chord; in the 17 years since THE ROSE, has
she ever played anything but an abrasive, wise-cracking loud-mouth?
     The film is supposed to kick into high gear once the three women set
their plans in motion, but that is actually when it stalls out.  Director
Hugh Wilson has a television comedy background (writer for "The Mary Tyler
Moore Show," creator of "WKRP in Cincinnati" and "Frank's Place") and an
accompanying middle-brow sensibility, resulting in a rather limp attack on
the patriarchy.  THE FIRST WIVES CLUB is not a particularly creative
revenge fantasy in the first place -- the justice isn't poetic because the
women go for their exes' wallets, not their middle-aged egos and libidos
-- but Wilson's haphazard shot selection makes it a rather clumsy one
besides.  On top of that, whatever sting there might have been in the
story is taken out by a string of pointless cameos (Kathie Lee Gifford, Ed
Koch, The Incredibly Wealthy Woman Formerly Known as Ivana Trump) and an
ending straight out of television, as the women use their ex-husbands'
money to open a women's crisis center.  Everyone pauses to make sure we
understand that whatever fun we might have been having was all in the
service of a Very Important Message.
     It is even more disappointing that one of our heroines actually
reconciles with the husband we just spend an hour and a half cheering
against, but I suppose that is actually in keeping with the retro feel of
THE FIRST WIVES CLUB.  Midler, Keaton and especially Hawn appear to be
having a blast wreaking their own brand of vengeance on an industry which
consigns actresses to oblivion when the wrinkles set in (there is a great
line about how an older male actor like Sean Connery can still be a sex
symbol).  Unfortunately, their male production team is content to turn out
a safely frivolous romp.  There are several small pleasures in THE FIRST
WIVES CLUB -- like SHOWGIRLS ingenue Elizabeth Berkeley in the karmically
glorious role of a talentless young actress -- and one large
disappointment.  As a pilot for a network sit-com, it is fairly enjoyable;
as a big-screen comedy, it is a pilot for a network sit-com.

Title
Review for Michael Collins (1996)
     MICHAEL COLLINS is a perfect project for a collaboration between Neil
Jordan and Liam Neeson, two artists whose projects tend to inspire
background articles.  Jordan had everyone talking about _not_ talking
about his 1992 sleeper hit THE CRYING GAME, then inspired controversy when
he cast Tom Cruise as the amoral immortal Lestat in INTERVIEW WITH THE
VAMPIRE; Neeson has stepped into the shoes of enigmatic historical figures
(SCHINDLER'S LIST) and national heroes (ROB ROY).  They are in familiar
territory then with MICHAEL COLLINS, which has drawn the expected fire for
glorifying an ostensible terrorist and for playing fast and loose with
history.  Unfortunately, that controversy is almost more compelling than
the film itself, which proves that hero worship and drama can make
uncomfortable companions.
     Neeson plays the title role of Michael Collins, who is among the many
Irish nationalists arrested in the wake of the failed 1916 Easter uprising
against the imperial British rule.  After two years in prison, Collins
emerges convinced that conventional warfare has no chance of defeating the
British.  The alternative is a guerrilla campaign of bombings and
assassinations of British government operatives, and that is exactly what
Collins and his friend Harry Boland (Aidan Quinn) undertake.  Though
violent and destructive, the program eventually brings the British to the
bargaining table, but the result could be even more violent and
destructive.  A compromise agreement which divides the nation physically
also divides the nation politically, as Irish Republic president Eamon De
Valera (Alan Rickman) leads opposition to the agreement against Collins
and a government which has exchanged an external battle for an internal
one.
     Neil Jordan (who also wrote the screenplay) is clearly going out of
his way to paint Collins as an extraordinary figure in Irish history, as
well as to rationalize his extremism.  "I hate them for making hate
necessary" Collins says in one of several scenes where Jordan makes his
soul-searching known to us, and it is only because Liam Neeson can sell
such a line that it doesn't inspire eye-rolling.  Neeson  has exactly the
charisma and physical presence to be convincing as a nigh-mythical figure
known as "The Big Fella," but he also conveys a moral uncertainty.  He
plays Collins with intelligence, conviction and sadness, and it is more
thanks to Neeson than it is to Jordan that Collins emerges as an
intriguing character, a man of action forced to make an uneasy transition
to man of peace.
     MICHAEL COLLINS is usually a solid piece of drama when it focuses on
the political, with Alan Rickman providing a complex counterpart to
Collins as the more politically calculating De Valera.  Jordan sometimes
over-reaches in his portrayal of the British as faceless villains,
notably in a scene where an armored car opens fire on the crowd at a rugby
match, but generally he is able to maintain a tense adversarial triangle
of Collins, De Valera and the British.  His other triangle, however, is a
perplexing mistake, and highlights how awkward MICHAEL COLLINS becomes
whenever Jordan tries to show us Collins' softer side.  There is a lovely
lass named Kitty Kiernan (Julia Roberts, improving on her MARY REILLY
brogue) who comes between Collins and Harry Boland, and perhaps the schism
is intended to foreshadow the civil strife to come.  Still, there is
little heat between Neeson and Roberts, and the relationship is not
developed in any appreciable way.  When Jordan juxtaposes a series of
political murders with an idyllic bedroom scene between Collins and Kitty
a la the baptism sequence in THE GODFATHER, the scenes do not complement
one another; every cut back to the budding romance is simply a
distraction.
     Even though MICHAEL COLLINS manages to avoid ever using two of the
most critical words in the Irish conflict -- "Catholic" and "Protestant"
-- it still provides a strong overview of the pivotal years when the Irish
rebels realized that fighting dirty was the only option left to them.  it
is a good looking film with several fine performances (including Neil
Jordan regular Stephen Rea as an informant for Collins inside the British
government), but I don't think it ever pretends to be an objective
history.  MICHAEL COLLINS is meant to be a monument to an important figure
in Irish lore, and it does a fine job of making him a monument.  It is
when it tries to make him a man that it inspires the only artistic
controversy it deserves.

Title
Review for Kurt & Courtney (1998)
KURT & COURTNEY
(Roxie)
Featuring:  Nick Broomfield, Courtney Love, Hank Harrison, Tom Grant.
Written, Produced and Directed by Nick Broomfield.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be R for profanity, nudity and adult themes)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     By the end of Nick Broomfield's controversy-plagued documentary KURT
& COURTNEY, I think I knew as much about Broomfield himself as I knew
about Kurt Cobain or Courtney Love.  The film might have begun as a
biographical study, exploring the tempestuous tives of Nirvana lead singer
Cobain and riot grrrl-cum-actress Love both before and after their 1992
marriage, but that's not the story it ends up telling.  Instead, it
becomes the tale of Broomfield's ongoing battle with Love over the making
of the film -- her successful efforts to persuade MTV to withdraw funding,
her objection to the use of several songs, her attempts to intimidate
anyone involved in the production.
     No one can blame Broomfield for being infuriated at Love,
particularly when her 11th-hour legal stunt forced KURT & COURTNEY out of
the Sundance Film Festival lineup.  It might have been easier to
sympathize with him, however, if his presence in the film weren't so
consistently intrusive.  Like Michael Moore, Broomfield has no qualms
about filming himself in the process of making his documentary film;
unlike Moore, Broomfield isn't entertaining enough to warrant all the
screen time.  In fact, he's just plain annoying at times, interjecting
commentary over virtually every musical selection (or lack thereof) and
casually referring to Cobain's hometown of Aberdeen, Washington as a
"redneck logging town."  Even his habit of shooting from inside the car as
it pulls up to various locations feels pretentious, an attempt at
you-are-there urgency which conveniently ignores that automotive jaunts
hardly make for compelling cinema.
     Lucky for Broomfield that his subject is such a wild and provocative
one.  KURT & COURTNEY features as wonderfully twisted a cast of characters
as any recent film has compiled:  Love's estranged father Hank Harrison,
whose casual aggression towards his daughter provides a frightening
insight into her childhood; Love's ex-boyfriend and former Portland-area
singer Rozz Rezabek, seething bitterness at the career he might have had
if Courtney hadn't driven him to hate it; a one-time friend of Love and
Cobain named Amy who may or may not have photos of them doing heroin
together, but certainly is trying way too hard to look like Courtney.
Broomfield also spends time examining rumors that Cobain's 1994 death,
ruled a shotgun suicide, was actually a murder engineered by Love.  This
angle introduces us to El Duce, a demented, drunken punk band frontman who
claims Love once offered him "50 grant to whack Kurt Cobain."  Watching
the kind of people with whom Kurt and Courtney surrounded themselves makes
you wonder why both of them didn't end up dead long before.
     Ultimately, KURT & COURTNEY doesn't seem out to convict Courtney Love
of soliciting murder, debunking many of the contentions of conspiracy
theorists like private detective Tom Grant.  It's far more damning in its
contention that Love's drive for fame and success tends to crush
everything in its path, and that her history of verbal and physical
assaults is just a hair's breadth removed from her obsessive need to
control her public image.  It would have been chilling to watch that
personality connected more directly to Cobain's psychological
disintegration, but the troubled soul has little more than a cameo role in
the film.  Instead, Courtney is primarily connected to Nick Broomfield,
who finally follows Love on-stage at an ACLU benefit to chastise her
hypocrisy.  KURT & COURTNEY tends to drift away from its potentially
fascinating subject; it's a record of celebrity turned caustic, intercut
with a record of a film-maker's pique.  You almost wonder why he didn't
call the film KURT & COURTNEY & NICK.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
TITANIC
(Paramount)
Starring:  Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Frances Fisher,
Kathy Bates, David Warner, Bill Paxton, Gloria Stuart.
Screenplay:  James Cameron.
Producers:  James Cameron and Jon Landau.
Director:  James Cameron.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  195 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     TITANIC, the $200 million budget.  TITANIC, the perfectionist
auteur's baby which missed its summer release date.  TITANIC, the
production where the catering table was laced with hallucinogens, sending
several cast and crew members to the hospital.  TITANIC, the mega-event
which has two studios holding their breath as though they were actually on
the fated ship.  TITANIC, the entertainment industry headline.  Not
TITANIC, the movie...TITANIC, the _story_.
     It's hard for a film to crawl out from under that kind of baggage, so
give James Cameron all the credit in the world:  for nearly half the
film's running time, I forgot that I was watching _that_ TITANIC.  I was
too caught up in the story of two fictional passengers on the April 1912
maiden voyage of the largest, most luxurious moving vessel ever created by
man.  Itinerant American artist-at-large Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio)
winds up on board when he wins a ticket in a poker game; upper class Rose
DeWitt Bukater (Kate Winslet) travels with her mother (Frances Fisher) and
fiance, million-heir Cal Hockley (Billy Zane).  Unfortunately, Rose hates
her imperious fiance, the snobbish mother forcing her into the marriage,
and the whole circumstance of her socially prescribed life.  She is
preparing to leap from the Titanic's railing when Jack saves her, and
begins to show her another world.  Only the jealous Cal -- and an
inconvenient iceberg -- can stand in the way of their love.
     That central romance -- framed by a modern-day sequence in which the
100-year-old Rose (Gloria Stuart) recounts her story to a salvage team led
by Brock Lovett (Bill Paxton) -- is captivating from start to finish.
DiCaprio and Winslet share an extraordinary chemistry, two charismatic
young actors with mischievous eyes who create a tangibly passionate
pairing.  Though most of the characters around them are more functional
than fleshed-out, particularly Billy Zane's sneering patrician, the two
stars likely would have overwhelmed all comers regardless of their
multi-dimensionality.  This may be the year's most effective and
consistently entertaining love story.
     Oh, and it's also about a big boat going belly-up.  Those who come
for the sinking rather than the swooning aren't likely to be disappointed
with the spectacle Cameron offers.  His obsession with historical accuracy
begins with the dazzling duplication of the ship's lavish decor and ends
with a virtually real-time re-creation of its journey to the bottom of the
Atlantic.  The chaotic evacuation keeps tensions high, and even mixes in
potent understated moments like the ship's designer Thomas Andrews (Victor
Garber) mournfully correcting the dining room clock while his creation
collapses arount him.  The sinking ship, while awe-inspiring, also becomes
a distraction from the focal romance.  TITANIC is an impressively-mounted
disaster movie during its second half, but it's still basically a disaster
movie.  Once the ship is down, and the lovers once again have time to
share a powerful, quiet moment, it becomes clear that the large-scale
drama can't match the small-scale drama.
     People will want to go see TITANIC simply to see what a $200 million
movie looks like.  And it looks great, rich in period detail and sweeping
views of Cameron's massive scale-model Titanic.  More important than how
it looks, though, is how it feels.  It feels like it has a heart, real
emotion powering the narrative in a way dollar signs can't.  Somewhere
past the headlines, the gossip, the turmoil and the accounting details is
a magnificent piece of epic film-making.  It's time for TITANIC, the
movie, to sink or swim on its own impressive merits.

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
WHAT LIES BENEATH
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Michelle Pfeiffer, Harrison Ford, Diana Scarwid, James Remar,
Joe Morton, Amber Valletta.
Screenplay:  Clark Gregg.
Producers:  Robert Zemeckis, Jack Rapke and Steve Starkey.
Director:  Robert Zemeckis.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A word of sympathy, first, for WHAT LIES BENEATH's director Robert
Zemeckis: It's probably not his fault that DreamWorks has been marketing
the film with one of the most appallingly wrong-headed trailer and
advertising campaigns I've ever seen. My critic colleagues and I often
respond to certain overly-expository trailers with the comment, "Well, I
don't have to see the movie now." Never has that been more true than in
the case of WHAT LIES BENEATH. If you've seen the theatrical trailer for
the film -- or virtually any of the commercials or plot summary blurbs,
for that matter -- you've been cheated. WHAT LIES BENEATH is one half
creepy, effective suspense thriller and one half predictable, over-wrought
suspense thriller ... and the creepy, effective half is utterly destroyed
by too much foreknowledge.
     If you have the good fortune to enter WHAT LIES BENEATH without that
foreknowledge, you'll be introduced to Norman (Harrison Ford) and Claire
Spencer (Michelle Pfeiffer), a married couple in a newly empty nest after
sending their only child off to college. Norman, a noted genetic 
researcher, at least has is work to keep him busy; Claire was once a
gifted cellist, but gave up her career for family and is now left to
putter about their over-sized Vermont home. And with all that time on her
hands, she starts to notice things. Their next-door neighbors seem prone
to violent arguments, and she sees strange comings and goings in the
night. Soon, there are also some alarming events in the house itself.
Doors open by themselves, pictures fall from the shelves ... and Claire
becomes convinced that a dead woman is trying to contact her.
     You will find no reference herein to a later turn of plot that
dominates advertising for the film. There may be someone out there who
could be thoroughly caught up in Zemeckis' knowing homage to Hitchcock
(most specifically REAR WINDOW), with its instantly loaded atmosphere of
menace and a notable absence of underscore that makes many scenes even
more unsettling. Unlike that hypothetical someone, however, I knew what
was coming. I knew the developments that would dominate the second half
of the film, and their relationship to the events in the first half of the
film. I realized that my time was being wasted on a set-up that had been
blasted into irrelevance by some marketing wizard with an itchy trigger
finger, the sort of cinematic thickhead who would have looked at PSYCHO in
1960 and said, "Hey, let's put that girl getting stabbed in the shower in
the trailer -- that's good stuff." And I grew angrier, and angrier, and
angrier.
     I grew angrier still when I saw the frantic mess that DreamWorks had
seen fit to promote so hard. It's bad enough that the potentially eerie
ghost story of WHAT LIES BENEATH's first act turns into run-of-the-mill
run-from-the-killer movie. Worse yet is the way the film's conclusion is
drawn out to such an agonizing degree that the approximately 2,647
individual shock scenes -- each one accompanied by a burst of Alan
Silvestri's strings, of course -- become numbing in their every-60-seconds
predictability. The final 25 minutes of WHAT LIES BENEATH eventually
degenerate into such an absurd parody of scary movie climaxes I kept
waiting for a Wayans brother to appear and exclaim, "Whazzup?!?"
     I won't deny that much of WHAT LIES BENEATH works on a purely
visceral level -- I jumped a few times, I was tense a few more times, and
so on. There's also one great sequence near the end involving a threat of
slow drowning that works on almost every possible level. It's the kind of
sequence that makes it hard to hate a film, even when the people selling
the film show such open contempt for the audience. And really, there's no
other way to describe what DreamWorks has done. Their marketing department
has decided, "Our job is to get the people into the theater; we don't care
if we've ruined the experience of actually watching the film in the
process." I don't think WHAT LIES BENEATH would have been a particularly
good film even without that disastrous decision -- there's far too much
laughable dead weight down the stretch -- but it would have been a much
more watchable one. Critics are often accused of being too hard on films
because of expectations based on how much we know about them ahead of
time. At least this time we're going to have plenty of company.

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
     As feel-good formulaic as it may be in its own way, SHALL WE DANCE?
also demonstrates a kind of charming restraint you don't often find in
American films.  This Japanese import tells the story of a middle-aged
accountant named Sugiyama (Koji Yakusho) whose mundane life is shaken up
one night when he spots beautiful Mai Kishikawa (Tamiyo Kusakari) in the
window of a dance school.  Intrigued by her melancholy demeanor (and
slightly infatuated with her), Sugiyama signs up for weekly classes at the
school -- and, much to his amazement, ends up as attracted to dancing
itself as to his young sensei.  Meanwhile, Sugiyama's wife (Hideko Hara)
becomes suspicious of his late Wednesday nights, and sets a private
detective on her husband's trail.
     In a Hollywood film, you can bet that sub-plot would be turned into a
stream of slapstick comedy and crazy misunderstandings.  In SHALL WE
DANCE?, writer/director Masayuki Suo dispenses with it in a matter of
minutes, using it to set up later character interactions rather than
letting it overwhelm the story with pratfalls.  Neither does he make the
climactic moment of victory a competition between the hero and some
mean-spirited token rival.  Suo gives his comedy the graceful movements of
his subject matter, allowing the humor to flow from the characters rather
than forcing it upon them.
     An opening prologue in SHALL WE DANCE? goes to some effort to place
the film in a sociological perspective, explaining how contrary ballroom
dancing is to the Japanese sense of propriety.  It's a forced message in a
story which doesn't need such a culture-specific angle.  The dance school
in SHALL WE DANCE? plays the role of a singles' mixer, with everyone
vaguely embarrassed to be there yet taking the opportunity to try on new
personalities.  Most amusing among these new personalities is the one
adopted by Sugiyama's co-worker Mr. Aoki (Naoto Takenaka), a balding
systems analyst who becomes a fiery Latin lover when he dons a frizzy wig
and begins to rumba.  Sugiyama's awakening is less overt, but Koji Yakusho
does a wonderful job showing a transformation of small steps.  It's a
delicate performance with a huge heart.
     SHALL WE DANCE? is a fairly lightweight experience, which makes its
final half hour rather a long sit.  Suo crams a lot of exposition into
very little time, including an unnecessarily detailed back-story for Mai,
resulting in a sluggish march towards the resolution.  It is here that
SHALL WE DANCE? feels most Hollywood-conventional, attempting to
blind-side the audience with a truckload of emotional catharsis.  Suo
might have been better advised to conclude with the small gem of a scene
in which Sugiyama and his wife take their first tentative dance steps
together.  That's the real joy of dance SHALL WE DANCE? conveys:  its
ability to create an intoxicating mood of romance which can soften the
stiffest shirt.

Title
Review for Crow, The (1994)
Starring:  Brandon Lee, Ernie Hudson, Michael Wincott, Rochelle Davis.
Screenplay:  David Schow and John Shirley. 
Director:  Alex Proyas.
     I have seen a number of reviewers falling over themselves to
praise THE CROW, and I'm not convinced that many of them haven't been 
unduly influenced by the film's morbid history.  As it is now well-
known, star Brandon Lee was killed during the filming of THE CROW, and 
consequently its storyline of a man returning from the dead to bring 
closure to his life hits close enough to home to create a natural 
fascination.  I, like many, hoped that THE CROW would serve as a 
fitting epitaph to a budding star, and show that he hadn't died simply 
to make another schlocky action-fantasy.  But sadly, that's basically 
what THE CROW is--a paper thin story supporting a lot of rain and 
moody lighting.
     Lee stars as Eric Draven, a rock guitarist killed when he
enters his fiancee's apartment as she is being raped, and eventually 
killed herself.  One year later, a supernatural crow causes Eric to 
burst forth from his grave, endowed with superhuman abilities 
including the ability to take a truckload of bullets and keep on 
ticking.  One by one he hunts down the gang responsible for his death 
and that of his fiancee, assisted along the way by the cop (Ernie 
Hudson) who worked the original case.  At the top of Eric's list is 
Top Dollar (Michael Wincott), the city crimelord who ordered the 
killing, and who proves to be Eric's most dangerous challenge.
     All right, let's dispense with the formalities right off the
top:  THE CROW *looks* great.  Director Alex Proyas (an Australian 
previously best known for music videos) and his production team have 
captured the grim feel of James O'Barr's graphic novel; the cross- 
cutting to flashbacks, freeze frames and evocative lighting all have a 
distinct comic book feel.  But there is very little THE CROW does 
visually that BLADE RUNNER or BATMAN didn't already do, and for the 
most part do better.  Proyas wheels out cliches like the cityscape on 
fire opening shot, the close-up of the hero's face dripping with rain, 
and lightning revealing something previously hidden in shadow. While 
the art direction and cinematography are striking, there is nothing 
original enough to obscure the glaring weaknesses in the rest of the 
film.
     The trouble begins with the script by David Schow and John
Shirley, but the fact is that there's no way of knowing what changes 
were made as a result of Lee's death.  Perhaps the original script 
didn't begin with Eric and Shelly already dead, giving more poignance 
to the story and a chance to understand what Eric has lost beyond the 
snippets shown in flashback.  Perhaps it included a scene between Eric 
and Sarah (Rochelle Davis), the young street kid who is his friend in 
life, where Eric confronts the fact that he can't have friends in 
death.  As it stands, there is not enough pain in Eric's 
characterization, not enough opportunity for us to see him responding 
to the circumstance in which he finds himself.  Eric should go about 
his business full of rage, not like the wise-cracking vigilante he 
becomes.
     What is true of Eric's characterization is true of the
characterizations right down the line:  they're either lazy, or they 
just don't make sense.  Rochelle Davis is the tough-but-victimized 
urchin with a skateboard; Ernie Hudson plays a gruff-but- 
compassionate cop.  Michael Wincott does fine work as the villain, but 
the attempt to explain his motivation is one of the lamest in recent 
memory.  And the rest of the villains appear to have been Xeroxed from 
ROBOCOP.
     However, I'm willing to admit that there may be only two
relevant questions for most potential viewers of THE CROW: 1) Is it a 
good action film?  2) Was Brandon Lee headed towards stardom?  The 
answer to #1 is, better than most; THE CROW is well paced, well 
choreographed and is at least somewhat creative.  As for #2, it's hard 
to say.  Unlike most action stars, Lee at least had English as his 
native language, and given time he might have become a good actor.  
But in THE CROW, he wasn't yet.  And I can't help but think that if he 
were alive today, most critics wouldn't have bee so forgiving.

Title
Review for Barenaked in America (1999)
BARENAKED IN AMERICA
(Shooting Gallery)
Featuring:  Ed Robertson, Steven Page, Tyler Stewart, Jim Creggan, Kevin
Hearn, Chris Brown.
Director:  Jason Priestley.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be PG-13 for brief nudity, profanity)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I say this as a longtime fan of Barenaked Ladies, someone who was
listening to their music years before they became an arena act: There was
no good reason for Jason Priestley to make a documentary about the band,
at least not the documentary he made. BARENAKED IN AMERICA is
actor-turned-auteur Priestley's open fan letter to his countrymen, the
Toronto quintet that hit big Stateside in 1998 with the multi-platinum
album "Stunt" and its #1 nonsense-rap single "One Week." The film follows
the band -- guitarist/vocalist Ed Robertson, vocalist Steve Page, drummer
Tyler Steward, bassist Jim Creggan and keyboardist Chris Brown -- on their
first U.S. tour after becoming big-time headliners. They're coping with
the absence of regular keyboardist Kevin Hearn, who is undergoing
treatment for leukemia, but mostly they are shown handling their nascent
fame with grins and self-effacing humor.
     That, unfortunately, is what prevents BARENAKED IN AMERICA from being
a particularly interesting film experience. The Ladies are presented by
Priestley as a group of nice, intelligent guys having loads of fun
entertaining their fans, almost completely unfazed by their sudden
notoriety in America. Great stuff for a People magazine profile; not so
much for a feature documentary. Chalk it up to bad luck, perhaps, but the
time frame for Priestley's profile is all wrong. As the film begins, "One
Week" has already become a hit, Hearn has already been diagnosed and the
high-profile tour is already underway. Start the story a few months
earlier, and you may have something: A hard-working bunch of decent guys
swooping back and forth between the highest highs and the lowest lows. As
it actually unfolds, BARENAKED IN AMERICA is utterly bereft of drama.
     Which is not to say that it's utterly bereft of entertainment. Even
viewers who are not BNL devotees will find it hard to deny the energetic
appeal of their stage shows, which turn into rowdy audience-participation
improvisations. The performance footage includes old and new song 
favorites, as well as the ad-lib raps composed by Page and Robertson while
their bandmates try to lay down an accompanying rhythm behind them. Few
popular music acts of the day would make better subjects for a
straight-ahead concert film; the Ladies, as their manager notes in an
interview, are pure entertainers whose shows are singular experiences. 
     Unfortunately, BARENAKED IN AMERICA isn't a straight-ahead concert
film. It's not really clear exactly what Priestley wants it to be, in
fact. There are token bits of archival footage, but not enough to provide
a sense of where the Ladies came from. There are moments of backstage and
person-on-the-street cavorting, but not enough to make the film a showcase
for the band members' off-stage charm. And there are token glimpses of the
easy-going fellows putting their feet down on business decisions (like
their dissatisfaction with a video for their follow-up single "It's All
Been Done"), but they feel completely incongruous with most of the film
pitched lighter than air.
     Occasionally Priestley takes an off-beat angle, like letting both
fans and detractors of the band speak their minds after hearing BNL
music. Far more often, he simply turns on his camera like a buddy of the
band making a home movie. These guys were never going to yield a SPINAL
TAP-like story of internal meltdown and rampant ego; it would have taken a
much more skilled documentarian and a much more precise time frame to make
a Barenaked Ladies film soar. The band itself deserves the attention,
because talented pop musicians and songwriters with a zeal for showmanship
are in too short supply to dismiss them as a novelty act. If anything
positive comes from BARENAKED IN AMERICA, it might be encouraging more
people to know the band from its live shows. That's the Barenaked 
experience that should be recorded for posterity.

Title
Review for Bad Company (1995/I)
Starring:  Laurence Fishburne, Ellen Barkin, Frank Langella.
Screenplay:  Ross Thomas.
Director:  Damian Harris.
     There is a trick to pulling off a neo-noir thriller like BAD
COMPANY successfully.  Many young filmmakers and screenwriters seem
convinced that it's all about mood-drenched cinematography, or a
suitably twisty-turny plot.  The fact is that while those elements
might give a film a healthy start, they can't really make anyone
care about what's going on.  John Dahl (RED ROCK WEST, THE LAST
SEDUCTION) has re-ignited interest in the genre, not simply because
he knows how to push the right technical buttons, but because he
weds a great story with interesting characters.  BAD COMPANY is
loaded with double- and triple-crosses, but it's hard to care much
because the characters are so flat and bored-looking.
     Laurence Fishburne plays Nelson Crowe, a former CIA operative
now looking for a job after an agency "downsizing."  He goes to work
for a private organization known as the Tool Shed, which specializes
in doing dirty work like espionage, blackmail and bribery for
corporate clients, run by former CIA agents Vic Grimes (Frank
Langella) and Margaret Wells (Ellen Barkin).  Crowe's first
assignment is buying the vote of a state supreme court justice
(David Ogden Stiers) on a client's case, but he's not exactly
working for the tool shed.  Secretly still employed by the CIA,
Crowe's job is gathering evidence against the Tool Shed.  But he
also has plans of his own, chief among them trying to stay alive.
     BAD COMPANY is the kind of movie with tech credits so slick
that for a while I was tricked into thinking I was watching a good
movie.  It's a good *looking* movie, to be certain, with great
production design by Andrew McAlpine (THE PIANO) and glossy
photography of Vancouver locations by Jack N. Green (UNFORGIVEN).
Then, gradually, it became clear that BAD COMPANY was all attitude.
Everyone walks with maximum swagger, they wear sunglasses everywhere
and they engage in threat-filled, under-the-breath conversations
through a haze of cigarette smoke.  There is also, of course, some
steamy sex, and it may be BAD COMPANY's strongest selling point.
It's not that the sex is all that spectacular, but it is between
Barkin and Fishburne, and it's almost unheard of for a Hollywood
movie to include an inter-racial relationship without being *about*
the inter-racial relationship.
     It's easy to see why a studio would green light this story
without fear of controversy, though:  Fishburne and Barkin may be
black and white, but they're barely human here.  Fishburne plays
Crowe with a sleepy detachment, trying to play suave but instead
coming off as mechanical.  Barkin, meanwhile, is even less
interesting.  She's supposed to be a sexy "Ice Queen," but even a
femme fatale needs some sort of personality.  A subplot in which
Margaret tries to take Grimes out with Crowe's help seems primarily
intended to give her something vaguely interesting to do, because as
far as I could tell the real story could have taken place just as
easily without her.  Almost every supporting character is the same,
interchangably cool and devious:  Michael Beach as a Tool Shed
operative; Michael Murphy as Crowe's CIA superior; Daniel Hugh Kelly
as a professional card player.  In fact, there are so many
dispassionate performances in BAD COMPANY that Spalding Gray's turn
as the neurotic CEO of the Tool Shed's main client looks like he got
the only cup of coffee on the set that day.
     The plotting in Ross Thomas' screenplay is reasonably clever,
an interesting look at post-Cold War espionage as a growth industry.
While there are plot twists aplenty, they never feel piled on, nor
did I need a scorecard to keep up with who was screwing over whom.
The problem with BAD COMPANY isn't *what* happens, it's to *whom* it
happens.  It isn't always necessary for characters to be likable,
and in a dark thriller it may not even be desirable, but they need
to be more than robots whose sole function is moving the plot
forward.  Laurence Fishburne, Ellen Barkin and company are fine
actors, but they couldn't manage to act interested in anything that
their characters had to say or do.

Title
Review for Grumpy Old Men (1993)
Starring:  Jack Lemmon, Walter Matthau, Ann-Margret, Kevin Pollak,
           Daryl Hannah, Ossie Davis, Burgess Meredith.
Screenplay:  Mark Steven Johnson.
Director:  Donald Petrie.
     In a sense, there's really not all that much to say about a movie
like GRUMPY OLD MEN.  It's the kind of movie one generally describes
with somewhat faint-praise adjectives like "cute," or "fun," or
"entertaining."  GRUMPY OLD MEN is all of these things, to a point.
There are a couple of belly laughs, but there's not much genuine
spark.  For all its manufactured whimsy, GRUMPY OLD MEN is basically a
sit-com, a moderately diverting 105-minute episode of "The Golden
Boys."
     The GRUMPY OLD MEN of the title are John Gustafson (Jack Lemmon)
and Max Goldman (Walter Matthau), 50-year acquaintances and next-door
neighbors in Wabasha, MN who carry on a long-standing feud.  John
throws fish into Max's back seat; Max changes John's television
channels with his remote control.  However, their bickering takes a
turn for the even worse when Ariel Truax (Ann-Margret) moves in across
the street.  The beautiful and spirited Airel attracts the attention of
both men, but neither is brave enough to make the first move.  So when
Ariel makes the first move--for both of them--old animosities are
stirred to the boiling point.
     GRUMPY OLD MEN opens with a great deal of promise.  For one thing,
it's simply a pleasure to see Lemmon and Matthau together again.  They
have little trouble creating the impression that their characters have
known each other for years, slipping easily into the good-natured
antagonism that fueled THE ODD COUPLE, THE FRONT PAGE and BUDDY BUDDY.
Matthau is particularly fun to watch, an ear-flapped hunting cap
comically framing his basset hound face.  The trouble is that they're
not given all that much to do besides call each other "moron" and
"putz."  There are a few nice bits of physical humor, notable Lemmon
spraying Matthau with a garden hose and Matthau taking an ax to a foot
of ice in a futile attempt to retrieve his prized ice-fishing pole.
But for the most part GRUMPY OLD MEN just strolls along, apparently
convinced that we're so comfortable with the actors that we'll find
anything they do amusing.
     The other characterizations in GRUMPY OLD MEN are wildly uneven.
On the plus side is Ann-Margret, who is positively luminous.  She's
perfect for the role of Ariel, radiating a joie de vivre which would
clearly be appealing to the two icy septugenarians.  There is a
marvelous warmth to her scenes with Lemmon and Matthau, and I was sorry
that her part wasn't even larger.  Ossie Davis, as a bait shop owner
who has put up with the bickering of John and Max for decades, is also
good.  On the down side is Burgess Meredith as Lemmon's father, playing
a male version of Estelle Getty's Sophia from "The Golden Girls."  He
appears briefly for the express purpose of being cantankerous and
sexually suggestive, once again proving that it's supposed to be funny
that older people think about sex, too.  One of the script's bigger
disappointments is a tacked-on relationship between Kevin Pollak and
Daryl Hannah, playing Max's son and Lemmon's daughter respectively.
Their characters don't serve much purpose, and while both actors are
very appealing, I couldn't figure out what the point was.  The time
spent on their flirtations would have been time better spent making
John and Max fuller characters.
     GRUMPY OLD MEN does nothing to offend overtly.  The photography of
the snow-covered Minnesota town is bright and atmospheric, particularly
the ice-fishing village; Alan Silvestri adds a cheerful if somewhat
pedestrian score.  There are enough chuckles in the film to make it a
decent matinee diversion, but overall GRUMPY OLD MEN relies far too
much on the history between Lemmon and Matthau, and far too little on
anything particularly clever in Mark Steven Johnson's script.

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
     The 20th anniversary re-release of GREASE is further proof that pop
will indeed eat itself.  Based on the successful Broadway musical by Jim
Jacobs and Warren Casey, GREASE was orginally released in 1978 in part to
cash in on that decade's wave of 1950s nostalgia -- "Happy Days,"
thin-Elvis idolatry and the like -- becoming in the process the most
successful musical in box office history.  It returns to screens in 1998
in part to cash in on this decade's wave of 1970s nostalgia -- disco
revivals, thin-John Travolta idolatry and the like.  The layers of
cultural cannibalism involved are simply staggering.
     I must admit that I was shocked by the $13 million GREASE took in on
the first weekend of its re-release.  Paramount had previously misfired
with anniversary re-releases of THE GODFATHER and -- a Grand Prize Winner
in the "Okay, I'll Bite...Why?" Sweepstakes -- DIRTY DANCING, and there
hardly seemed to be a STAR WARS-like clamor from a generation of
movie-goers deprived of watching "Hand Jive" on the big screen.  Yet there
they were, coming out in force for the simple adventures of greaser Danny
(Travolta) and Australian exchange student Sandy (Olivia Newton-John) as
they struggled to make it works from opposite sides of the Rydell High
School tracks.
     It's difficult to make sense of why GREASE is once again the word,
especially when it's difficult to make sense of why it was the word in the
first place.  The cast of "teenagers" -- Travolta, Newton-John, Stockard
Channing as lead "Pink Lady" Rizzo, Jeff Conaway as Danny's pal Kenickie
-- generally looked old enough to be attending high school reunions rather
than attending high school; the songs were an uninspired combination of
throwback homage and 70s schmaltz-pop; the dialogue and performances were
at best a half-step removed from the wooden posturing of 1950s juvenile
delinquent melodramas.  Nevertheless it thrived, both in an era where its
star was a teen heartthrob and in an era where he is a "serious actor."
What could be the common thread?
     I hope it's not just the eternal optimist in me which makes me
believe that GREASE works because it finds an audience hungry for
musicals.  Of course, this is a very different age from the Golden Age of
movie musicals, a more cynical one.  Arguably, however, the late 70s were
even more cynical -- post-Watergate national disillusionment, gas lines,
out-of-control inflation.  GREASE provided the same basic appeal the
classic musicals provided:  it was movie-going as pure escapism, full of
utterly improbable musical numbers, fresh faces and plenty of enthusiasm
set in a mythologically simpler time.  At the same time, it brought just
enough attitude and polished-up teen rebellion that young audiences could
convince themselves they weren't watching something "corny."  They could
have their SINGIN' IN THE RAIN and their ANIMAL HOUSE all in one sitting.
     It would be amusing indeed if, buried beneath the meta-nostalgia of
the GREASE re-release, you could find a nostalgia of a different kind.  I
suspect few people old enough to have seen GREASE the first time around
mark it as a seminal movie-going experience; I suspect even fewer young
movie-goers are that anxious to see what Travolta looked like before he
was big enough to play Clinton without padding.  Maybe even a mediocre
musical reminds folks of a cinematic vitamin deficiency they didn't even
known they had.  Maybe there's a part of every movie-goer that wants to go
back to the time when you could watch people sing and dance on screen
without rolling your eyes.  Maybe this kind of musical, one with
sophomoric pranks and plenty of almost-but-not-quite sexual content, is
the kind that allows viewers to let their guard down.  Somewhere, even if
they don't know it, audiences watching GREASE may be watching the 1950s of
James Dean but _seeing_ the 1950s of Gene Kelly, all filtered through the
1970s of John Travolta.  Maybe GREASE _is_ the way we are feeling.  

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
ENTRAPMENT
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Sean Connery, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Ving Rhames, Will Patton.
Screenplay:  Ron Bass and William Broyles.
Producers:  Sean Connery, Michael Hertzberg and Rhonda Tollefson.
Director:  Jon Amiel.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At least ENTRAPMENT lets you know what your in for from its opening
shot, a sweeping helicopter approach over water towards the New York
skyline.  It's a shot that has opened many a recent film, one of those
showy mood-setters of which imagination-impaired directors are so very
fond.  Of course, you can't expect much more from a director when he's
working with imagination-impaired writers.  There are movies that repulse
you, movies that enthrall you, and then there are movies that just plug
away joylessly to fill a genre slot on a release schedule.  ENTRAPMENT is
one of those movies apparently made by people who have spent their entire
lives locked away from the world watching other movies...and not even
other _good_ movies.
     The set-up finds an insurance investigator named Virginia "Gin" Baker
(Catherine Zeta-Jones) fascinated with the career of a legendary art thief
named Robert "Mac" MacDougal (Sean Connery).  Mac has cost Gin's company
millions, so Gin convinces her boss (Will Patton) to let her launch a plan
to reel him in.  Posing as a thief herself, Gin lures Mac into a
partnership to steal a priceless Chinese mask.  The alliance is, of
course, an uneasey one, complicated by the distrust of Mac's partner and
supplier Thibadeaux (Ving Rhames) and the romantic feelings developing
between the two duplicitous characters.
     It's possible that ENTRAPMENT could have gotten away with being just
a heist thriller; the elaborately choreographed break-ins are decently
crafted, and offer at least an occasional whiff of tension. Unfortunately,
the script -- credited to Ron Bass and William Broyles, but actually the
work of several more -- wants to cast Gin and Mac as star-crossed lovers,
kindred spirits divided by their hidden agendas.  It's a thoroughly failed
attempt, since the characters are kept so enigmatic that it's never
possible to understand their attraction, and their exchanges are so leaden
that they might as well have the pages of the script on the table in front
of them.  Meanwhile, the pacing grows so lugubrious as Gin and Mac
exchange loaded glances that you're likely to nod off between break-in set
pieces.
     The other option for a viewer is to use that time to play Spot the
Cliche.  Be sure to have your pad and pen ready from that opening
helicopter shot, because ENTRAPMENT appears to be the product of a
Script-O-Matic.  From the B-follows-A dialogue exchanges (She: "There
won't be any surprises."  He: "There _always_ are surprises.") to the
physics-defying disappearing acts, from the ominous location-identifying
on-screen titles to the training montage, the film is on auto-pilot from
start to finish.  Thank heaven for Ving Rhames' vaguely menacing
performance, and Maury Chaykin's bizarre Sidney Greenstreet-meets-Truman
Capote crime boss, or there might not have been a second of ENTRAPMENT
worth remembering a day later.  It's designed to be swallowed without
chewing. 
     I suppose that's partially to avoid giving anyone in the audience
reason to ponder the jaw-dropping gaps in logic.  ENTRAPMENT ends with one
of those "betcha didn't see that coming" conclusions which, frankly, I
_didn't_ see coming.  I'd also long ago given up caring, especially when
the behavior of the characters at certain points in the film makes no
sense whatsoever when compared to what we eventually learn about them.
You can only forgive that kind of laziness-disguised-as-cleverness if a
film has been working hard to entertain you, to keep you engaged from
start to finish.  ENTRAPMENT is a film that just doesn't care.  It's a
film about theft, all right...of your money, your time, and the devices of
a dozen other trite Hollywood star projects.

Title
Review for She's the One (1996)
Starring:  Edward Burns, Mike McGlone, Maxine Bahns, Jennifer Aniston,
Cameron Diaz, John Mahoney.
Screenplay:  Edward Burns.
Director:  Edward Burns.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When an independent film-maker gets his first studio deal, the fans
of his or her previous work often worry what will happen when he or she
"goes Hollywood."  There are sound historical reasons for such concern
(think of Lee Tamahori's MULHOLLAND FALLS or Antonia Bird's MAD LOVE, if
you are one of the few people who actually saw them), but in the case of
Edward Burns, such concern would seem to be misplaced.  For an independent
feature, THE BROTHERS McMULLEN was about as mainstream as they come, a
low-key charmer unlikely to offend anyone who wasn't a devout Catholic
with a short fuse.  With a budget about 120 times greater than McMULLEN,
Burns has made SHE'S THE ONE, a film just as unlikely to offend...and,
unfortunately, equally unlikely to entertain.
     Burns and Mike McGlone, who were two-thirds of THE BROTHERS McMULLEN,
again play siblings in SHE'S THE ONE.  Mickey Fitzpatrick (Burns) is an
under-motivated cab driver; his younger brother Francis (McGlone) is an
over-motivated stock broker.  What they have in common are significant
problems with women:  Mickey has never quite gotten over catching his
then-fiancee with another man three years earlier, and Francis is cheating
on his wife Renee (Jennifer Aniston) with Heather (Cameron Diaz), a
business colleague.  When Mickey marries a woman named Hope (Maxine Bahns)
after a whirlwind 24 hour courtship, at least one of the brothers appears
headed for happiness...until he learns what his ex-fiancee has been up to
since they parted.
     If there was any real criticism leveled at THE BROTHERS McMULLEN, it
was that it was simply a testosterone-enhanced version of a female bonding
film, in which the female characters existed primarily to give the men
something to complain about while sharing a beer.  At times, SHE'S THE ONE
feels like Burns' sheepish apology for that aspect of McMULLEN, a piece of
sensitive self-flagellation.  "Look how we men make everything in our
lives -- our jobs, our hobbies, our fantasies -- more important than our
wives," he says sub-textually.  "Don't we deserve whatever we get?"
     It's a nice gesture, this throwing open of the doors to the Boys Only
Club, but Burns doesn't support it with characters who ring true, male or
female.  Burns himself has a pleasant, likeable quality, but we are never
given any insight into why he would be impetuous enough to marry a
near-complete stranger.  His dramatic range appears limited to mild
annoyance and affability, and Burns the actor can't bring to the screen
whatever hidden passions Burns the writer might have put on paper.  Still,
that's at least twice the range of Maxine Bahns (Burns' real-life
girlfriend who also played his love interest in McMULLEN yet for some
reason is billed "Introducing Maxine Bahns" in ads for SHE'S THE ONE).
Let me make this point as subtly as I can:  Bahns did not get this part
because she had a particularly good audition; she reads a line as though
she were going through the script underlining it with her finger.  Mike
McGlone contributes a generic selfish, corporate go-getter, and John
Mahoney tones down his "Frasier" crankiness just a touch as the
Fitzpatricks' dad.
     Much of the pre-release interest, however, will be focused on the
other two main cast members.  Cameron Diaz, the latest Next Big Thing as
of 7:00 p.m. PDT, provides the same punch of smart sexuality she brought
to THE MASK, and works wonders with a part which could have been a
sneering bitch in other hands.  As for Jennifer Aniston, she of the hit
television series and ubiquitous coiffure, don't expect a leading role
just because she is receiving top billing in SHE'S THE ONE; it's
alphabetical.  Her part is actually relatively small, but she gets some of
the best and most poignant scenes.  She has an effective, almost silent
moment in which she slips into bed next to disinterested husband McGlone
in a sexy new negligee, only to have him ignore her completely.  While
Burns seems unwilling to break her of the habit of saying "okay" before
nearly every line, her work is still quite solid.
     There are moments like Aniston's failed seduction which have a spark
either of honesty or humor (a montage in which the cast members try to
decide whether Francis might be gay is cleverly done), but they prove more
the exception than the rule in SHE'S THE ONE.  It's all very casual and
under-stated, but it feels like an extended sit-com -- no character too
deep, no problem too complicated.  I guess you could say that Edward Burns
has indeed "gone Hollywood," in the most unfortunate sense of the term.

Title
Review for Masterminds (1997)
     "We've got a definite DIE HARD situation here," says young Ozzie
Paxton (Vincent Kartheiser) early in MASTERMINDS when he is trapped in a
private school where terrorists have taken hundreds of rich kids hostage.
It's the moment which is supposed to tell the audience that the
film-makers are hip to their own derivativeness, that it's pointless to
expect more than recycled genre conventions.  Maybe the skyscraper is now
a school, and maybe the vacationing cop is now a surly teen computer whiz,
but the rest will be chapter and verse from the Contemporary Action Film
Bible -- "DIE HARD in a prep school."  Right?
     Well, yes and no.  Though MASTERMINDS has plenty of DIE HARD in its
DNA -- including a member of the hero's family among the hostages (Ozzie's
stepsister Melissa, played by Katie Stuart), a suave villain with an
accent (Patrick Stewart) and a hidden agenda for the bad guys -- the
reference in the script is actually a clever diversion to distract viewers
from all the other antecedents.  The prep school in peril premise comes
from the 1991 adventure TOY SOLDIERS; Kartheiser's underachieving hacker
is a nod to WARGAMES.  If you've been watching movies at all over the past
twenty years, you've seen MASTERMINDS before.  You just haven't seen it
all in the same movie.
     Of course the primary audience for MASTERMINDS _hasn't_ been watching
movies for the past twenty years; in fact, it hasn't been alive for the
past twenty years.  It's strictly a youth fantasy about a kid who thwarts
the plans of criminals -- HOME ALONE with plastic explosives.  And it's a
fairly satisfying diversion for that audience, as well as one their
parents don't need to worry aobut.  For all the bullets that fly in
MASTERMINDS, not one of them ever hits a human being; plenty of cars and
land mines blow up, but they never take a living victim along with them.
With the exception of a few tranquilizer darts, a couple of punches and an
exaggerated electrocution, the damage is restricted to property.  In a
sense, it's the way that it's least like DIE HARD which makes MASTERMINDS
a solid entertainment for youngsters:  you don't need to count dead bodies
to keep track of the hero's progress.
     It's unlikely that adults will find much worthwhile in MASTERMINDS,
unless it's Patrick Stewart's jolly performance as the leader of the
terrorists.  He shows a great sense for delivering what the film's
audience demands, sneering and threatening just enough so that it's worth
a big cheer when he allows himself to be humiliated.  He also understands
that the plot of MASTERMINDS -- which adults will be ahead of by a solid
hour -- is about as inventive as your average episode of "Scooby-Doo;" you
can practically hear Stewart begging to end the film with "...and I would
have gotten away with it if it hadn't been for that meddling kid."  By the
time it reaches its big finale involving a dune buggy chase through the
storm drains beneath the school, MASTERMINDS has proven itself to be just
playful enough to overcome its obviousness...particularly for those too
young to remember WAR GAMES, or DIE HARD, or even HOME ALONE.

Title
Review for Wild America (1997)
     In the summer of 1967, three brothers -- real-life wildlife
film-makers-to-be Marty, Mark and Marshall Stouffer -- left their Fort
Smith, Arkansas home for a cross-country trip with their 16mm camera,
hoping to capture endangered and dangerous animals on film.  The story of
their adventures might have included beautiful wildlife photography,
tense moments of realistic clashes with nature and the wonder of the
natural world which made Marty Stouffer's "Wild America" series a success.
     That's not the kind of film you can expect Hollywood to make about
this kind of story, however.  WILD AMERICA is a hodge-podge of different
films nominally connected by the presence of the three Stouffer boys,
played by Scott Bairstow, Devon Sawa and Jonathan Taylor Thomas.  The bulk
of the film is in fact set in the wilds of America, but it's not likely to
inspire much reverence for nature.  For every moment of grandeur like a
stampede of wild horses, there are encounters played almost entirely for
laughs:  a tussle with an alligator, a ride on a moose's horns, a cave
full of bears dozing off to a lullaby which concludes with a chorus of
flatulence.  These scenes will likely entertain young audience members,
but they hardly inspire much respect for majestic beasts.  At least
director William Dear respected them enough to use animatronic doubles
when the animals have to play the stooge; no self-respecting bear would be
caught dead hibernating in the middle of the summer.
     The low-brow comedy in WILD AMERICA is frustrating enough, but Dear
and screenwriter David Michael Wieger aren't even willing to commit to
being low-brow.  Bracketing the goofy antics of the wilderness segments is
a terribly maudlin sub-plot involving the boys' taciturn father (Jamey
Sheridan) and his stubborn refusal to allow his sons to pursue their
dreams.  It's a trite bit of film-making which incorporates the exchange
of moderately harsh words, a moderately serious auto accident, and a few
moderately annoying bits of wisdom ladled out by young Marshall, who
(apparently because he is played by lead-billed Jonathan Taylor Thomas)
gets to lecture darned near everyone.  The wilderness-based second act of
WILD AMERICA ain't art, but at least it tries to entertain.  The twenty
minutes between the boys' return to Fort Smith and the closing credits
crawl by with an agonizing sincerity.
     Then again, WILD AMERICA isn't really about parents letting go,
either, any more than it's about learning to respect nature.  Judging by
an audience comprised largely of teen and pre-teen girls, WILD AMERICA is
really about its cute trio of teen stars.  All three get the opportunity
to look alternately grimy and dreamy, all three get the opportunity to be
alternately sensitive and scrappy, and a couple of them take off their
shirts.  Parents and young children may find a few giggles or a few gasps
in the wilderness adventures, but WILD AMERICA isn't for them.  In
retrospect, this conglomeration of themes does have one guiding principle.
It's a cross between "National Geographic" and "Tiger Beat."

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
QUILLS
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Geoffrey Rush, Kate Winslet, Joaquin Phoenix, Michael Caine.
Screenplay:  Doug Wright, based on his play.
Producers:  Julia Chasman, Peter Kaufman and Nick Wechsler.
Director:  Philip Kaufman.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity,
violence)
Running Time:  123 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As the title character in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, Woody Harrelson
says at one point (and I paraphrase), "If the First Amendment protects a
scumbag like me, then it will protect anybody." That's the approximate
thematic gist playwright Doug Wright is going for in QUILLS: an
exploration of the idea that even free speech at its most extreme and
offensive should still be free. It's a worthy enough idea to espouse, and
the movie based on Wright's QUILLS should have been plenty worthy as well
-- if only it weren't so damned self-congratulatory about its position. As
splendidly staged as Philip Kaufman's cinematic version of QUILLS may be,
it's ultimately stunted by a text so concerned with making its artistic
points that it flops as simple story-telling.
     QUILLS takes us to Paris during the reign of Napoleon, where street
vendors are selling scandalous, sexually explicit novels attributed to
"Anonymous." Of course, everyone knows they are the work of the Marquis de
Sade (Geoffrey Rush), even though he is currently an inmate of Charenton
Asylum under the kindly supervision of a priest, the Abbe Coulmier
(Joaquin Phoenix). He has been smuggling out his work with the help of a
laundress named Madeleine (Kate Winslet), arousing the ire of Napoleon
himself. The emperor sends Dr. Royer-Collard (Michael Caine), noted
alienist, to clean up matters at Charenton. But the not-so-good doctor
finds that silencing de Sade will be no easy matter, as the prolific
nobleman is practically compelled to spill his obscene thoughts onto
paper.
     Thus begins an all-around celebration of the purgative powers of
porn. The Marquis, we are told, has been so tainted by the world around
him that he must spill "the toxins in his head" into his stories;
Madeleine, who revels in his naughty work, tells Coulmier, "If I wasn't
such a bad woman on the page, I'll hazard I couldn't be such a good woman
in life." QUILLS offers a dozen different defenses of free speech at its
most unfettered, including commentary that we must know vice in order to
appreciate virtue, and a taunt from the Marquis to the Abbe: "Are your
convictions so fragile that they cannot stand in opposition to mine?"
Every five minutes or so, there's another re-phrasing of the same point in
a slightly different way: Art is just art, words are just words, and even
the most ghastly art and the most ghastly words must be given their table
in the marketplace of ideas.
     A debatable point, to be certain, but the problem isn't so much
whether or not one concurs with Wright's absolutist interpretation of
freedom of speech. The problem with QUILLS is that Wright is so intent on
hammering his point home that he ignores little matters like fleshing out
his characters. Winslet and Phoenix are effective as the essentially good
people aware of their darker impulses, but Wright is mostly interested in
them as representations of the dark impulses in all of us. Michael Caine
plays one narrow-eyed note as the hypocritical man of morality who,
naturally, is sexually cruel to his own young wife (Amelia Warner) and
leeches funds from de Sade's wife to help finish his opulent home. And
Rush, while thoroughly entertaining as the ultimate libertine, never gets
at what de Sade was ultimately all about as a human being. Once you've
figured out what Wright is saying in QUILLS -- and it doesn't take all
that long -- the playing out of the narrative feels like a long walk
around in circles.
     Wright does deserve credit for not taking the easiest ways out with
his arguments. He shows de Sade's work provoking a group of madmen to
violent acts, and he doesn't soft-pedal the cruel, petulant de Sade
himself as a torture artist just to make him more sympathetic as a
tortured artist. There are several individually enjoyable scenes in
QUILLS, from the "telephone game" rendering of one of de Sade's tales to
the staging of a bawdy play intended to humiliate Royer-Collard.
Physically, it's a lovely production to behold. Emotionally, it is
provocative stuff. But intellectually, it's redundant. It's clear that
Wright believes even the kind of art that could inspire a Columbine
massacre must not be suppressed. It's equally clear that he feels pretty
good about himself for saying so. Ironically, QUILLS probably works best
as simple, sensual, prurient-interest entertainment. As a presentation of
ideas, it's more thesis than theater.

Title
Review for Vanya on 42nd Street (1994)
     A few years ago, I saw a production of "Les Miserables" in San
Francisco, and I loved it.  I loved the experience of being in that
theater, and of giving myself over to the spectacle and the energy of
that live performance.  Some time later, it occurred to me that if I
had seen the identical production on a movie screen, I probably would
have laughed myself silly at its bombast.  What does any of this have
to do with Louis Malle's VANYA ON 42ND STREET?  Only this: live
theater and film are not the same animal, and what works in one does
not necessarily work in the other.  VANYA ON 42ND STREET is a great
stage production, but as a film it is simply good.
     The film is a rendering of a sort of guerilla theater group
performance of Chekhov's UNCLE VANYA in a dilapidated theater on New
York's 42nd Street called the New Amsterdam.  The play is set on a
Russian country estate run by Vanya (Wallace Shawn), an embittered man
passing through middle age with little to show for his life.  He is
hosting Professor Serebryakov (George Gaynes), an ailing retired
academic and the widower of Vanya's sister, as well as the Professor's
young second wife Yelena (Julianne Moore).  Vanya is in love with
Yelena, as is Astrov (Larry Pine), the doctor who visits from the city
to tend to the Professor.  Astrov has an admirer of his own, the
Professor's daughter Sonya (Brooke Smith), but none of them seems
destined for happiness.
     The framing device, which shows the cast members and director
Andre Gregory walking down bustling New York streets towards the
theater, is clearly intended to establish a relevance of VANYA in the
modern day.  To the extent that it succeeds, that connection is really
about living a life in the theater.  There is a five year history
behind this production, as the principles met in living rooms,
abandoned theaters and really any available space in a pure labor of
love.  From the moment when the actors imperceptibly begin the
production with the line, "Your looks have faded," this VANYA becomes a
kind of purgation of the agonies of being an actor, and the characters
come to represent very recognizable types.  Serebryakov is every poseur
who succeeds while more talented performers struggle in anonymity;
Vanya is the workhorse who works unappreciated for years; Sonya is the
young would-be starlet who faces cruel realities about what it takes to
be noticed.  Played on a spartan stage and in contemporary dress, VANYA
seems startlingly modern and very personal to these performers.
     The years of rehearsal and refinement show in performances which
are effortless almost to a one.  Wallace Shawn, he of the gnome-like
features and familiar lisp, finds in Vanya a reservoir of black-humored
hope even as he acknowledges the horror of lost years.  Julianne Moore
(last seen--and plenty of her--in last year's SHORT CUTS) is a
stunning Yelena, and Larry Pine's Astrov is torn and conflicted
throughout without emoting.  However, perhaps the most wrenching
performance belongs to Brooke Smith, who tears into Sonya with an
emotional ferocity few actors could muster.  Her two scenes with Moore
are powerfully played, and when she broke down I felt tears welling in
my eyes.  It is as good a performance by a supporting actress as you'll
see this year.
     All these things VANYA ON 42ND STREET does exceedingly well, but
while I was sitting in my seat watching it on a screen, I often felt
more distanced than I should have felt.  Louis Malle's choices in
framing shots are not particularly inspired, and cinematographer Declan
Quinn's camera teeters for no apparent reason, creating that verite
vertigo pioneered by Woody Allen's HUSBANDS AND WIVES.  To put it
bluntly, I couldn't quite figure out why this film had been made.  I
started to become annoyed that I couldn't be one of the lucky few who
was able to see this production in the flesh, and I wondered why these
actors who were obviously so dedicated to this play hadn't considered
touring with it.  VANYA ON 42ND STREET is a superior interpretation of
a fantastic play, but I couldn't quite shake the conviction that I
really should have seen it *on* 42nd Street.

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
     Sometimes there is no better demonstration of a concept poorly
executed than the same concept well executed. Take TUMBLEWEEDS, for
instance. It's the story of a Mary Jo Walker (Janet McTeer), a flighty and
frequently irresponsible woman, and her smart-aleck adolescent daughter
Ava (Kimberly J. Brown), who cringes at her mother's suspect 
decision-making. After the collapse of Mary Jo's latest bad marriage,
mother and daughter jump in their car and flee their home for greener
pastures, eventually landing in Southern California (the San Diego suburb
of Starlight Beach, to be precise). Ava tries to make the best of the
situation and find some stability, but Mary Jo simply jumps headlong into
another questionable relationship, this time with gruff trucker Jack
(co-writer/director Gavin O'Connor).
     Sound familiar? It should -- the plot is virtually identical to that
of the current Susan Sarandon/Natalie Portman film ANYWHERE BUT HERE. Of
course there are elements unique to each central relationship, and there
are idiosyncrasies in the personalities of the lead characters.
Essentially, however, each film is the story of a mother/daughter
friendship where the maturity hierarchy has been inverted, set against the
backdrop of the California sun. TUMBLEWEEDS just happens to be a rich
character study that feels genuinely human, instead of like a Hollywood
construct.
     It doesn't start out looking that way. The early scenes find Mary Jo
and Ava flinging their clothes out the car window in an act of liberating
littering, and tracking down an old high school classmate of Mary Jo's who
turns out to be less dreamy than she had hoped. The wacky set pieces smack
of contrivance, turning TUMBLEWEEDS into a low-budget variation on
mainstream tales of female bonding. Even the hand-held camera work starts
to seem more like a contrivance than a tool to evoke a sense of urgency
The very grittiness O'Connor is aiming for becomes just another brand of
glossiness.
     Then, right about the time the Walkers arrive in Starlight Beach,
something just clicks. Newcomer Kimberly J. Brown's performance as Ava,
which had seemed too rough around the edges, develops into something
intriguing and unique, not at all the typical mature-beyond-her-years,
foul-mouthed-beyond-prime-time movie kid. Janet McTeer's brassy Mary Jo
similarly blossoms into a character easy to understand but considerably
harder to pin down. The relationship between the two shows all the twists,
turns and knots of a complex mother/daughter pairing, but there's never a
sense of manufactured conflict. These people behave like real people;
their battles don't sound scripted, and their interdependent affection is
thoroughly convincing.
     Brown and McTeer are both pretty darned good, but the reason
TUMBLEWEEDS starts to work so well is that O'Connor doesn't force the
story to rest entirely on their shoulders. ANYWHERE BUT HERE was a
mother/daughter story in which the mother and daughter sometimes seemed to
be the only two humans in the city; TUMBLEWEEDS develops the characters
through their interactions with friends and co-workers. Ava's flirtations
with a goofy classmate show an edgy side to her emerging sexuality; Mary
Jo's scenes with Jack show her tendency to use men as a prop in her life,
as well as her problems dealing rationally with disagreements (similarly
shown in her abrupt departure from a mundane job). TUMBLEWEEDS gives its
two central characters a context in which to operate, something sadly
lacking in ANYWHERE BUT HERE. Verisimilitude isn't necessary for every
kind of film, but it's fairly useful in a character study. In TUMBLEWEEDS,
Gavin O'Connor effectively portrays a mother and daughter trying to find
their way in the world, because he effectively portrays their world.

Title
Review for Commandments (1997)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Aidan Quinn, Courteney Cox, Anthony LaPaglia.
Screenplay:  Daniel Taplitz.
Producers:  Michael Chinich, Joe Medjuck, Daniel Goldberg.
Director:  Daniel Taplitz.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  87 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I wish more films would take on issues of faith and morality in the
modern world.  And I wish that film-makers would use COMMANDMENTS as a
blueprint on how _not_ to do it.  Writer/director Daniel Taplitz has
created a bizarre conglomeration of satire and soul-searching in this tale
of Seth Warner (Aidan Quinn), a man of faith who runs into a streak of bad
luck which usually inspires country-western lyrics:  his pregnant wife
drowns, his home is destroyed by a tornado, he loses his job and his dog
is crippled by a bolt of lightning.  Convinced that God has broken His
half of the covenant, Seth decides to break his, and sets out to turn
every "Thou shalt not" of the Ten Commandments into a "Thou shalt" (and
vice versa).  His wife's sister Rachel ("Friends"' Courteney Cox) wants to
help Seth; Rachel's selfish husband Harry (Anthony LaPaglia), who tends to
break a few Commandments of his own, thinks Seth is a lunatic.
     Thus begins a film which picks the wrong tone for every occasion.
Taplitz isn't interested in treating Seth's tragedies as genuinely tragic,
making it impossible to sympathize with him.  Composer Joseph Vitarelli
provides a score full of whimsical woodwinds, turning Seth's sacrilegious
mission into an amusing lark; Quinn's performance as Seth is all wild-eyed
fervor without any genuine pain.  The actual breaking of the Commandments
is almost treated as an afterthought, with one through five dispatched in
a five-minute montage.  The result is a character whose actions feel less
like the authentic responses of an anguished man than the machinations of
a high-concept movie plot.
     It's not even entirely clear that COMMANDMENTS is about Seth.
Corporate attorney Rachel is given a case which is supposed to soften a
hard heart we see no indication she has, while Harry gets his comeuppance
as part of Seth's "false witness."  Only Courteney Cox strikes a note of
reality in a solid performance; she is sane center around which too
equally troubled men revolve.  Even she can't force Taplitz to decide
whose story this is, or what we should have learned about dealing with the
struggles in our lives and our relationship with the infinite.  By the
time Seth makes a singularly Biblical reappearance late in the film, it
has become clear that Taplitz is aiming for a fantastical fable which
makes no connection with real human experience.  COMMANDMENTS is a bad
comedy which could have been a decent drama if Daniel Taplitz had had the
guts to take faith -- and the loss thereof -- at all seriously.

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
THE NEXT BEST THING
(Paramount)
Starring:  Rupert Everett, Madonna, Benjamin Bratt, Malcolm Stumpf,
Michael Vartan, Illeana Douglas, Lynn Redgrave.
Screenplay:  Thomas Ropelewski.
Producers:  Tom Rosenberg, Leslie Dixon and Linne Radmin.
Director:  John Schlesinger.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, brief nudity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You can be sure that THE NEXT BEST THING will find plenty of viewers
unsympathetic to its message in support of unconventional family structure
-- the Christian Coalition, for example, or the Utah State Legislature. We
may have come a long way, baby, in matters of social tolerance, but we
haven't come _that_ far. Still, you would expect the people involved in
making THE NEXT BEST THING to have the passion to turn it into a
compelling story. Rupert Everett is perhaps the only openly gay actor
playing leading man roles. John Schlesinger is one of the few openly gay
directors making Hollywood films. And Madonna  well, I saw TRUTH OR DARE,
so I get the impression she's fairly familiar with alternative lifestyles.
     What, then, is the excuse for THE NEXT BEST THING turning out so
generally dreary and uninspired? It starts with a provocative premise
involving two L.A. best friends: yoga instructor Abbie Reynolds (Madonna) 
and gay gardener/landscape architect Robert Whitaker (Everett). The pair
share all their relationship traumas with one another, and spend many
nights crying on one another's shoulders. Then, one drunken evening,
crying on shoulders turns into something more complicated: a one-night
stand that results in a pregnancy. Abbie and Robert decide that their best
friendship could make them wonderful parents, so they move in together and
become mother and father to their son Sam. And all is well until six years
later, when Abbie's desire for a more conventional relationship threatens
to come between Robert and Sam (Malcolm Stumpf).
     As with many films, so far so good in the general concept department. 
It's only in the execution that THE NEXT BEST THING becomes an ordeal to
endure. The character of Abbie is the heart of the disaster, and I'd be
inclined to blame screenwriter Thomas Ropelewski (more on his faults to
come) if not for the screen performance tragedy that is Madonna. Once upon
a time she had a sassy edge, the quality that made her leap off the screen
in DESPERATELY SEEKING SUSAN. These days, it's impossible to notice
anything but that deliberate, affected speech pattern of hers. Abbie does
some pretty unsympathetic things over the course of the film, so it's
crucial that she be played with some energy and charm. Madonna can only
manage attitude, turning Abbie into a straight-up witch just when she
needs to be confused and conflicted. It's a performance so leaden it drags
every single thing about THE NEXT BEST THING down along with it.
     With such a horrendous casting mistake at the heart of THE NEXT BEST
THING, sapping it of any possible resonance, it's easy to tune out and
spend great heaping chunks of the film mulling over its other faults. 
Like, did Ropelewski think there was a rule that any film featuring a gay
character must have an AIDS-related sub-plot, no matter how irrelevant to
the rest of the story (hint: it could have been more relevant had there
been an attempt to connect the question of surviving partners' rights to
gay parents' rights)? Why did usually reliable cinematographer Elliot
Davis light the whole film as though we were in a cave, except for the
Morticia Adams Memorial Eye, Nose & Throat Spotlight used on Madonna? And
what was with Schlesinger's frequent use of fish-eye point-of-view
perspectives that merely served to make a serio-comic tale occasionally
border on the grotesque?
     It's obvious that THE NEXT BEST THING wants to make a statement about
inequities in the adjudication of custody matters, and question what it is
that makes a parent. The statement and question are both valid, but that's
all there is to this clumsy concoction. Rupert Everett is solid both
comedically and dramatically, providing virtually all of the film's 
worthwhile moments, but he's the only thing about THE NEXT BEST THING that
doesn't inspire far more head shaking than righteous indignation. Sure,
everyone involved was probably telling a story about which they felt
deeply, and their hearts were certainly in the right place. When you're
making a film, however, heart just isn't always enough. The real question
to everyone involved is where their heads were. 

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
(Sony Pictures Classics)
Starring:  Heather Matarazzo, Brendan Sexton Jr., Matthew Faber, Daria
Kalinina, Eric Mabius, Bill Buell, Angela Pietropinto, Scott Coogan.
Screenplay:  Todd Solondz.
Producer:  Todd Solondz.
Director:  Todd Solondz.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Dawn Wiener (Heather Matarazzo), an 11-year-old resident of suburban
New Jersey, is a typical seventh grader, which is to say that she's
miserable.  Actually, she may be more typical, which is to say more
miserable.  Saddled with intelligence, less than spectacular looks and a
cruelly unfortunate name, Dawn lives in a daily hell in which finding a
safe place to sit in the cafeteria is an ordeal and a good day is one in
which she isn't called "Wienerdog" or "lesbo."  Tortured at school and
ignored at home, Dawn is the kind of character which in a more mainstream
movie would find some inner reserve of strength or discover a heretofore
unknown talent, and become loved and respected by all.  Well, WELCOME TO
THE DOLLHOUSE, Todd Solondz's brutally funny portrait of the nightmare
that is adolescence.
     It should be made perfectly clear that WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE is
not, in that favored film terminology, a "coming-of-age" story.  No one
becomes an adult at 11, and while Solondz features such rites of passage
as Dawn's first big crush and first kiss, she learns no great truths about
life.  No, WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE is about a much more basic truth --
that there is no more unpleasant time in a human life than the middle
school years.
     WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE is an episodic story which follows Dawn
through several weeks of her seventh-grade year, and some of those
episodes are so perfectly handled that they are painful to watch.  When
Dawn is forced by a teacher to read an essay on "The Importance of
Dignity" in front of the class, she reads quickly and almost silently,
wanting nothing more than for the moment to be over and to shrink into the
walls.  In a later scene, Dawn plays piano for the object of her desire,
her brother's garage band-mate Steve (Eric Mabius), and practically glows
when he pays her an off-handed compliment.  It is surprising that Solondz
has captured the world of a young girl with such detail, but he is dealing
with a time where the horrors of unpopularity are very similar between the
genders, and where knowledge about sex is still too abstract to make the
psychology of adolescence completely different.  Dawn is a girl, but she
didn't have to be.
     The fact that she _is_ a girl simply allowed Heather Matarazzo to
nail the part with a startling willingness to look completely homely, and
to be less than heroic.  One of the things which makes Dawn such a
convincing character is that she is no less vicious than the classmates
who tease her; she simply doesn't have the power over them that they have
over her.  When she finds someone over whom she _does_ have power, like
her younger sister Missy (a distressingly adorable child perpetually
wearing her pink ballet outfit and prancing about, played by Daria
Kalinina) or wimpy playmate Troy (Scott Coogan), Dawn lashes out at them
in exactly the same language with which she herself has been victimized.
Solondz realizes that the essence of this time between childhood and
adulthood is status, established through threat, insult, appearance and
conformity.  Dawn is petty and vindictive, and given the opportunity, it
is clear that she would treat other classmates the way she is being
treated.  The magic of Matarazzo's performance is that we feel for her not
because she is better than those who torment her, but because her fate is
so familiar.
     When Solondz does stumble, it is because he tries to move beyond the
simple truths of Dawn's life to big-picture issues, or to give his story
an artificial sense of resolution.  A school bully (Brendan Sexton Jr.)
with whom Dawn develops a strange friendship is given a bad home life to
explain his behavior, and the plot takes an implausible turn as Dawn goes
on a quest in New York.  Some of the surreal comic moments (like Dawn
nearly blinding a teacher with a spitball) are funny, but they pull us
away from the everyday horrors of Dawn's life, which are funny only with
the remove of years.  The old saying that comedy is simply tragedy plus
time is most certainly true when it comes to adolescence, and WELCOME TO
THE DOLLHOUSE is a winning portrait of the only story that matters when
you are eleven years old and different:  getting out alive.

Title
Review for Blood and Wine (1997)
     There is a scene about half way through BLOOD AND WINE which, for the
briefest of moments, inspires the giddy sense that you may be seeing
something quite different.  In that scene, wine merchant Alex Gates (Jack
Nicholson) is preparing to take a little trip with some very special
cargo.  Thousands of dollars in debt, Alex has stolen a diamond necklace
from one of his clients with the help of jewel thief Victor Spansky
(Michael Caine), and is about to fly to New York with his mistress
Gabriela (Jennifer Lopez) to fence the necklace.  Unfortunately, Alex's
wife Suzanne (Judy Davis) comes home unexpectedly, discovers the airline
tickets for two, and confronts Alex about what she believes is a simple
case of philandering.  The confrontation turns violent, and when Suzanne
gives Alex a couple of smacks in the head with a fireplace poker and
flees with her son son Jason (Stephen Dorff), you wonder whether you are
watching a movie with the guts to kill off Jack Nicholson in the third
reel.
     Seconds later, you realize you aren't; within a few minutes, you
realize you're watching a movie with an inordinate fondness for inflicting
punishment on its characters, and Nicholson just happened to be first in
line.  With all the consternation over violence in the movies, you could
easily forget that the kind of violence you tend to see in movies is
fairly distant and antiseptic:  gunfights in which people fall over like
kids on a playground, comic book hand-to-hand combat where the winner
walks away with a split lip and a smudged forehead.  BLOOD AND WINE may be
the most brutal film ever made in which a gun is never fired.  In addition
to the aforementioned fireplace poker incident, characters in BLOOD AND
WINE are injured by golf clubs, tree trunks, spear guns and the strategic
application of a fishing boat to the back of someone's legs.  Add a slow
death after a car accident and a scene of Nicholson suturing his own
eyebrow, and you have a thriller strictly for the strong of stomach.
     With all the unpleasantness BLOOD AND WINE asks its viewers to
tolerate, you'd think it would offer a more satisfying pay-off for all the
time spent shifting in their seats.  Instead, director Bob Rafelson (who
also co-created the story) serves up a fairly conventional set of film
noir character relationships:  lovers who are using each other, family
members who hate each other, partners who are ready to stab each other in
the back at the drop of a hat.  That certainly creates an appropriately
dark tone, but there is scarcely a drop of wit to lighten the relentless
gloom.  After recent films like BOUND have found a way to make you giggle
at the tough talk even as you are engrossed in the story, BLOOD AND WINE
comes off as something to be endured rather than enjoyed.
     It might have helped a bit if there had been a hero worth rooting
for.  Stephen Dorff's Jason is ostensibly the protagonist, a simple lad
with simple dreams of owning his own fishing boat, but his character is
too much like a moody teenager.  He sneers defiant insults at stepfather
Alex and falls in lust at first sight with Gabriela, all the while acting
like a 14-year-old rather than a 24-year-old.  His refusal to get a life
of his own might have made sense if the script had really followed up on a
whisper of Oedipal sub-text between Jason and Suzanne; instead, you just
want him to stop pouting and find an apartment.  Gabriela's motives are
kept secret, but she is a pale shadow of the great noir temptresses, and
Davis has too little to do.  Alex, meanwhile, is never even given a chance
to earn our sympathy, not that Nicholson tries very hard.  If he had
played FARGO's Jerry Lundegaard, this is what he would have looked like:
a selfish jerk who thinks the world owes him something.
     The only genuinely interesting think in BLOOD AND WINE -- and it is a
very interesting thing -- is Michael Caine's performance as Victor.  A
wheezing wretch in the final stages of emphysema, Victor is chillingly
pathetic in his attempts at playing the slick con man as he repeatedly
attempts to stifle his bloody coughs.  He is the most desperate of the
desperate characters in BLOOD AND WINE, a career criminal counting on this
one big, final score to allow him to die in comfort; when Suzanne
unwittingly takes the necklace with her after her fight with Alex, Victor
is willing to do anything necessary to get it back.  Caine gives Victor
the weight of a Shakespearean villain, his rotting body a reflection of
his rotted morality, but his actions always seem born of fear rather than
spite.  Only Caine keeps you watching when your better judgment recommends
turning away from BLOOD AND WINE, a film where you find yourself ducking
to avoid the psychic shrapnel as characters inflict pain on each other as
though it were their job.

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
     The impact of STAR WARS on those who are writing about movies today
can be measured by the number of reviews or articles of the past few
months which began as follows:  "I was x years old in 1977..."  The
release of George Lucas' seminal blockbuster 20 years ago was the kind of
happening which affected a generation of movie-goers, and I include myself
in that generation.  I was 10 years old in 1977, and when you were 10
years old in 1977 you were not judged by whether you had seen STAR WARS;
you were judged by how many _times_ you had seen STAR WARS.  It awed us,
it delighted us...and yes, hyperbolic though it might seem to say so, it
changed us.
     As much as it changed the people who watched movies, however, it
changed the people who made movies even more.  Hollywood heads were sent
spinning by the success of STAR WARS, a film with no stars, a simplistic
story-line out of old Westerns and some nifty special effects.  It was not
long before studio executives realized that two fundamental lessons of
STAR WARS could be translated to other films:  1) If you made a special
effects-laden adventure with a modicum of skill and dropped it into your
summer release schedule, when young potential movie-goers had summer job
money burning holes in their pockets, they would come and come again,
story be damned; 2) One successful film could turn into one or two more,
plus action figures, lunchboxes and T-shirts (the twin goddesses of
Franchising and Merchandising).  And thus STAR WARS begat the "event
film," which begat BATMAN, which begat TWISTER and INDEPENDENCE DAY.  And
they slew the medium-budget film, and there was much wailing and gnashing
of teeth.
     You can't really blame Lucas for what has happened to American
film-making, though, because there is no way he intended for crass
commercial concerns to become so dominant.  There is no way STAR WARS
could have worked if he _had_ had such an intention.  Lost in all the ink
spilled with references to Joseph Campbell, back-brain mythopoetics and
anti-technological humanism is the fact that STAR WARS was not a great
movie.  The most surprising thing a viewer might find in the SPECIAL
EDITION has nothing to do with with the dozens of critters tossed into the
backgrounds, but rather how restless he might get waiting through the
first half.  For nearly an hour, STAR WARS is characterized by the fussy
quarrelsomeness of C-3P0 (Anthony Daniels), the intergalactic Leo
Buscaglia sermonizing of Ben Kenobi (Alec Guinness) and the laughably
petulant plea by Luke (Mark Hamill) to "go to Tashi Station and pick up
some power converters.  STAR WARS wasn't a great movie; it was, however,
an extraordinary movie-going experience.  You sat in a theater with a few
hundred other people and for two hours you were utterly transported,
because it was innocent in a way no film can ever be innocent again.  You
felt as though you were part of something joyous, a celebration of cinema
as fantasy and a celebration of good triumphing over evil.  In an era when
you can see the veins bulging on big-budget action films as they strain to
impress you, STAR WARS was effortless in its enchantment.
     That movie-going experience is what this re-release is all about.
The difference between STAR WARS on the big screen and STAR WARS on the
small screen is the difference between Mount Rushmore and a picture of
Mount Rushmore, between Wagner on a cassette deck and Wagner played by a
symphony orchestra.  If there is an element of not-inconsequential element
of nostalgia in the way crowds will flock to this re-release, that is
understandable; many will be hoping to re-capture a youthful moment when
they fell in love with movies for the first time.  STAR WARS: SPECIAL
EDITION may end up disappointing those who come to it as though on a
pilgrimage, but the dazzling editing of the climactic trench run will
certainly remind anyone who has seen what passes for a "spectacular" in
the last few years how exciting a science-fiction adventure film can be.
     There has been some consternation over the idea of Lucas fiddling
with such a cherished film, but frankly, I don't understand all the fuss.
This isn't a case of someone whose only connection with a film is
ownership of its rights deciding to colorize it; this is a director's
attempt to realize the vision he always had for his film, a fairly common
practice in an era of "Director's Cut" video and laserdisc releases.  Some
of the new additions are merely window dressing, including Han Solo's
(Harrison Ford) encounter with Jabba the Hutt; others, like a scene
between Luke and his friend Biggs (Garrick Hagon) help set up later scenes
more effectively.  But if anything Lucas has done threatens someone's
memories of a first experience of STAR WARS, I can only suggest that the
experience couldn't have been terribly profound.  In terms of the details,
this is a different STAR WARS, but it is the spirit of this story which
has moved people for twenty years.  Now they have the opportunity to come
once again -- some with their children -- and visit that galazy far, far
away.

Title
Review for Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert, The (1994)
Starring:  Terence Stamp, Hugo Weaving, Guy Pearce, Bill Hunter.
Screenplay/Director:  Stephan Elliott.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You know the times are a-changing when drag queens are to be the
subject of *two* movies in the space of one year.  We're not talking
about SOME LIKE IT HOT or TOOTSIE or MRS. DOUBTFIRE; we're talking
about genuine, larger-than-life, cattier-than-Felix drag queens.  You
might not think it the most marketable of subjects, but production is
underway on a studio project featuring Wesley Snipes, TO WONG FOO,
THANKS FOR EVERYTHING, JULIE NEWMAR.  And the thunder of that film is
being stolen by the deliciously lightweight Australian import THE
ADVENTURES OF PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT.  While it's gentle and
respectful of its characters, it's also a big, goofy musical filled
with belly laughs.
     PRISCILLA opens in Sydney, where cabaret drag performer Tick (Hugo
Weaving) receives a call from an old friend asking him to provide the
entertainment at a resort hotel in the outback.  Tick (who performs as
"Mitzi") enlists the aid of two friends for the act:  Adam (Guy
Pearce), a high-spirited young queen stage named "Felicia;" and
Bernadette (Terence Stamp), a transsexual veteran of Les Girls.
Together, they set off across the outback in a bus dubbed Priscilla,
Queen of the Desert.  However, Priscilla proves to be something less
than a royal coach, and its many breakdowns serve as preludes to a
series of culture-clash encounters between the off-beat threesome and
the considerably more conservative townspeople they meet along the
way.
     Perhaps the wisest decision made by writer-director Stephan
Elliott was not to spend too much time contriving an excuse for
Priscilla's passengers to go west.  He is concerned primarily with
getting them on their way and letting the characters carry the story,
and at that he succeeds.  The three principles are marvelous characters
spectacularly performed.  Hugo Weaving, who was so impressive in
Jocelyn Moorehouse's 1992 feature PROOF, anchors the trio as the
anxious Tick, who fears revealing to his cohorts that the "friend" he
is helping out is actually his partner in a marriage of
convenience...and the mother of his son.  He is also frequently forced
to act as referee in the squabbles between Adam and Bernadette.  Guy
Pearce plays Adam as completely carefree, a flamboyant youth who has
had little experience with confronting ugly prejudice.  Bernadette, on
the other hand, is much more experienced, and grows impatient with
Adam's giddy bitchiness.  As Bernadette, Terence Stamp delivers a
knock-out performance, summoning a uniquely genuine femininity to
accompany a light-hearted world-weariness.  This is no campy drag act
he turns in, but a sensitive and funny study of a character who has had
to deal with the singular challenge, as she describes it, of "being a
man one day and a woman the next."
     Stamp is also a treat in PRISCILLA's marvelously staged musical
numbers.  While Mitzi and Felicia perform with sass and energy,
Bernadette goes through the motions professionally but looking exactly
like she "did this *years* ago."  Costume supervisor Emily Seresin
deserves special kudos for the wild outfits which highlight the film;
particularly noteworthy is an impromptu performance of "I Will Survive"
for an audience of aboriginals (accompanied by digeridoo), and the big
show at the resort featuring numerous gaudy costume changes.
     There is one truly unfortunate element in PRISCILLA, and it really
leaves a bad taste in the mouth.  A rural gentleman named Bob (Bill
Hunter) who befriends the "girls" has a Southeast Asian mail-order
bride, and she is a horrendous shrieking stereotype.  Her character,
and accompanying performance launching ping-pong balls from a portion
of her anatomy, are truly unworthy of this film.  But if you're willing
to grit your teeth through her appearance, PRISCILLA will prove to be a
mostly delightful piece of entertainment, suprisingly wise and
touching.

Title
Review for Une liaison pornographique (1999)
AN AFFAIR OF LOVE (UNE LIAISON PORNOGRAPHIQUE)
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Nathalie Baye, Sergi Lopez.
Screenplay:  Philippe Blasband.
Producers:  Patrick Quinet, Rolf Schmid, Claude Waringo.
Director:  Frederic Fonteyne.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  77 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
      In the early scenes of AN AFFAIR OF LOVE, two characters appear in
documentary-style interview vignettes. In separate one-on-one interviews,
an off-camera voice prods an unnamed woman (Nathalie Baye) and man (Sergi
Lopez) for information about a relationship that is now clearly some time
in the past. As the interviews are cross-cut with scenes from their actual
meetings, the two voices turn into something akin to a spoken-word version
of "I Remember It Well." They met on-line, she says; they met through a
personals ad in a magazine, he says. They exchanged photos, he says; not
so, says she. Their first sexual encounter was satisfying, she claims with
a smile; a bit disappointing, he recalls. Ah, yes  they remember it well.
     The hazy recollections and unreliable perceptions could have been
played as little more than an amusing conceit, but in AN AFFAIR OF LOVE,
they form the backbone for one of the most stunningly rendered
sort-of-love stories in recent years. A few things do become more-or-less
clear as the story unfolds, despite the differing retrospective accounts. 
The man and woman initially come together to fulfill a mutual, somewhat
unusual sexual fantasy, one that is never explicitly defined. Though the
encounter is initially meant to be a one-time, purely physical event, they
agree to meet again, and again, until they contemplate a more "normal" 
sexual encounter. Eventually, each begins to feel that the relationship
has more potential, even though they do not know each other's name, or
occupation, or anything that, as the woman describes, makes up "what we
normally call our lives."
     It doesn't take a Francophone to recognize that the French title UNE
LIAISON PORNOGRAPHIQUE doesn't exactly translate to AN AFFAIR OF LOVE. 
Indeed, Fine Line Films' American title proves not only to be an obvious
bow to marketing concerns, but a patently absurd take on the development
of the relationship. What begins as a pornographic liaison does mutate,
but it does not mutate into a love affair. AN AFFAIR OF LOVE is a
meditation on what happens to people when they find themselves in a
relationship where they feel no pressure to do what they think they should
do, because the rules have been discarded from the outset. The man and
woman's growing affection builds to a climax that has been telegraphed by
the framing structure -- we know they don't end up together -- yet packs a
wallop because it's not about whether they will end up together. In fact,
the scene is brilliant because it works on two levels: as a tragedy of a
relationship that didn't have to end, and as evidence that neither one
knew the other in any substantial way.
     By all rights, AN AFFAIR OF LOVE should never have worked as anything
more than an intellectual exercise, with a little sex thrown in for spice. 
The characters are defined exclusively within the context of their 
arm's-length relationship, leaving huge chunks of their lives unexplored. 
Yet they still emerge as fascinating and complex people, thanks to a
subtle script by Philippe Blasband and two remarkable performances. Baye
and Lopez play off each other masterfully -- hinting at emotions beneath
the surface, capturing awkward moments with a sensitivity that almost
forces you to look away. Fonteyne pulls it all together with an unfailing
visual sense, and a rhythm that pulls this 77-minute film together without
an ounce of flab.
     The only time AN AFFAIR OF LOVE feels remotely strained in its
presentation involves an episode where the lovers have an encounter with
an estranged elderly couple. It's an unnecessarily obvious counterpoint to
the fantasy world in which they live, one that spells out what any viewer
should understand: that the relationship being explored has nothing to do
with the reality of a life together. Fonteyne says more when he's saying
less, as he does when he leaves his camera at a distance outside the hotel
room door when the lovers are engaged in their mysterious fantasy 
activity. It is the one moment where the two characters come together in
their story; they both respect the privacy and intimacy of the reason they
came together in the first place. The irony of Fine Line's title is that
it plays to the distorted memories of the characters who, over time, have
turned their pornographic affair into an affair of love. Ah, yes  they
remember it well.

Title
Review for My Life (1993)
Starring:  Michael Keaton, Nicole Kidman, Haing S. Ngor.
Screenplay/Director:  Bruce Joel Rubin.
     It seems clear that Bruce Joel Rubin has a death fixation.  Or
more precisely, a life after death fixation.  After the smash romantic
thriller GHOST and the suspense mystery JACOB'S LADDER, Rubin had
already staked his claim to status as Master of Metaphysical
Melodrama.  Now comes his feature directorial debut, MY LIFE, which
again ventures into issues of life and death.  The results are
extremely mixed.  When MY LIFE scores, it scores big; when it misses,
it misses big.
     MY LIFE opens with public relations man Bob Jones (Michael Keaton)
beginning a very important project.  Suffering from terminal cancer
while his wife Gail (Nicole Kidman) is pregnant with their first child,
Bob decides to make a series of videotapes so that his unborn child
will know its father.  However, as the project progresses, Bob realizes
that he may not be the man he thinks he is.  In fact, there are parts
of his childhood he can't even remember.  A visit to a Chinese faith
healer (Haing S. Ngor) leads him to examine the unresolved issues of
his past, including his stormy relationship with his parents (Michael
Constantine, Rebecca Schull) and brother (Bradley Whitford).  As he
senses his time running out, Bob struggles to face his failings and
disappointments, and to rediscover his life while he still has it.
     To his credit, Rubin avoids the glycerine-soaked excesses that
plagued GHOST.  This isn't a big-screen version of a "disease of the
week" TV-movie; it's a contemplative, almost spiritual story buoyed by
the small but crucial role of the healer played by Haing S. Ngor.  Ngor
projects a serenity which permeates the film, the effect of his
splendid scenes with Keaton lingering long after the scenes themself
end.  In fact, MY LIFE may be surprisingly over-subtle when it requires
a moment of real catharsis.  Too much of Bob's struggle is kept beneath
the surface, and as a result I was left with a truckload of questions
about who Bob Jones really was.
     By far, the best thing about MY LIFE is Michael Keaton.  Those who
remember his impressive performance in CLEAN AND SOBER know that Keaton
can be a fine dramatic actor when he has good material, and MY LIFE
provides him with some fine moments.  The best are those which play to
his cocky comic sensibility.  There is real charm to the scenes of
Bob's videotaped instructions to his yet-to-be-born son on such vital
issues as shaving, basketball and entering a room.  When it comes to
the more serious elements, Keaton doesn't have as much to work with.
MY LIFE is supposed to be about a change in Bob Jones' life, but we
don't get a clear enough picture of who he was before his illness to
make it evident that there has been a change.  Rubin ignores the basic
dramatic rule of "show, don't tell" by having another character say
that Bob "isn't exactly an example of an examined life."  That's a
quality I just don't feel I *saw*.
     MY LIFE also caught me just as I had reached my breaking point in
terms of tolerating saintly cinematic wives/girlfriends with no
discernible personalities of their own.  Nicole Kidman's Gail is a
complete blank, spending far too much of the time radiating dangerously
high levels of understanding.  I was left completely untouched by the
crucial love story because I never believed that there were two human
beings involved.  Instead, I saw one human being and one porcelain
figurine with lots of hair.  Kidman's one genuine moment, a very funny
line in the middle of Gail's labor pains, was shocking because it was
the first time Gail seemed to be made of flesh.  The fact that it's
Bob's story doesn't mean that Gail can't be well-written, and she is
not.
     In spite of my distaste for the love story, I was ready to be far
more positive in my recommendation of MY LIFE until its final fifteen
minutes.  The conclusion is too drawn out, and Rubin inexplicably has
Bob's big moment with his parents played out over the phone.  After a
solid opening, alternately entertaining and introspective, MY LIFE just
peters out.  Bruce Joel Rubin the auteur didn't have enough other
people pushing him to flesh out his characters or fill in the holes in
an otherwise affecting story.

Title
Review for It Could Happen to You (1994)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Bridget Fonda, Rosie Perez, Wendell Pierce,
Isaac Hayes, Stanley Tucci.
Screenplay:  Jane Anderson.
Director:  Andrew Bergman.
     IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU is nice.  It's about nice people who do
nice things for other nice people, and how nice things happen to them
as a result.  It's also about not-so-nice people who do not-so- nice
things, and how they are similarly rewarded.  It wears its niceness so
baldly on its sleeve that it's impossible to miss it.  Mind you, I have
nothing against niceness; heaven knows there is far too little of it
portrayed in movies these days.  But IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU is so busy
being nice that it forgets to be interesting, resulting in a watery,
flavorless little love story with a good heart.
     Based (oh-so-loosely) on a real event, IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU
tells the story of Charlie Lang (Nicolas Cage), a decent New York beat
cop married to gold-digging beautician Muriel (Rosie Perez).  One
afternoon, Charlie is without sufficient money to leave a tip for
down-on-her-luck diner waitress Yvonne Biasi (Bridget Fonda).  To make
it up to her, Charlie offers Yvonne half of whatever winnings he might
receive from the lottery ticket he is holding.  The ticket turns out to
be a $4 million winner, making Yvonne's cut $2 million.  This
development goes over not at all well with Muriel, who begins to make
life even more miserable for Charlie, and soon Charlie and Yvonne find
they have more in common than their new fortune.
     IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU was originally titled COP GIVES WAITRESS
$2M TIP, and it was then that I should have smelled trouble.  Tri-Star
clearly wanted to play up the story as a fairly tale, and from the
opening shot of New York City's skyline being revealed through removed
laundry, you know that's what you've got.  There seems to have been a
desire to make a "decent guy fights the system" comedy, something that
would inspire that much mis-used adjective "Capra-esque."  However, one
wonders whether anyone involved in IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU ever saw a
Frank Capra film.  The Capra heroes played by James Stewart, Gary
Cooper and others were not spotless, just basically good folks
struggling to do the right thing.  Nicolas Cage's Charlie, on the other
hand, is too good for sainthood, helping blind people across busy
intersections, playing stickball with neighborhood kids and intoning "a
promise is a promise" at regular intervals.  I almost wondered whether
the nice guy character was being mocked.  Bridget Fonda is nearly as
angelic, though she is given a tough background to overcome and an
endearing fatalism.  She does a lot of interesting things with her
performance, and has a standout scene where she first registers her
good fortune, dispensing free ice cream to all of her customers.  Fonda
and Cage are two likable actors, but ultimately there is not a drop of
tension in their relationship.  They're too perfect _not_ to end up
together.
     That's a real disappointment, because I expect better from Andrew
Bergman.  He has written or co-written some of the funniest and
quirkiest screenplays of the last twenty years, including BLAZING
SADDLES, THE IN-LAWS and THE FRESHMAN, and directed last year's
enjoyable HONEYMOON IN VEGAS.  He is working here with a screenplay by
Jane Anderson, who also showed a sharp wit with THE POSITIVELY TRUE
ADVENTURES OF THE ALLEGED TEXAS CHEERLEADER MURDERING MOM for HBO.
Both of them should know better.  Comedy requires some kind of edge to
get it rolling, whether it's situation or character, and IT COULD
HAPPEN TO YOU has neither.  At its best, it produces a few smiles.
     At its worst, Rosie Perez is on screen.  As the "villain" of the
film, Perez plays Muriel as an unrepentant shrew-from-hell, and it's
the kind of part where she's in the most trouble.  Her voice, somewhat
grating in its most tolerable moments, skyrockets into dog whistle
range when she browbeats Cage.  It is a performance so annoying that
even had IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU been satisfying on all other counts,
she might have spoiled the experience singlehandedly.
     There's nothing wrong with fairy tale love stories; BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST was one of the most romantic film experiences of the decade so
far.  But those animated characters were more real than anyone in IT
COULD HAPPEN TO YOU.

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
HERE ON EARTH
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Chris Klein, Leelee Sobieski, Josh Hartnett, Bruce Greenwood,
Annette O'Toole, Michael Rooker.
Screenplay:  Michael Seitzman.
Producer:  David T. Friendly.
Director:  Mark Piznarski.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Mark Piznarski's HERE ON EARTH does not take place here on Earth. It
takes place in a world of sun-dappled meadows, where golden backlighting
sets every moth into glorious relief. It takes place in a world where
lovers exchange sentiments the same shade of purple generally associated
with Barney the Dinosaur. It takes place in a world where class difference
is the ultimate impediment to happiness, where wealth is the ultimate
evil, where love means never having to say you're sorry. Welcome to the
world of HERE ON EARTH: Planet Melodrama.
     I'm not about to dismiss melodrama out of hand; if daytime drama,
professional wrestling and romance novels are any indication, people still
love conflicts writ large and lacking in moral shadings. Even TITANIC, for
all its spectacle, was essentially melodrama. But melodrama also has its
own rules, and HERE ON EARTH consistently violates them. The set-up finds
New England prep school student Kelley Morse (Chris Klein) celebrating his
impending graduation by heading into the nearby town to make trouble with
the locals. He ends up in a drag race with Jasper Arnold (Josh
Hartnett) which results in the destruction of the town diner. Kelley and
Jasper are then sentenced to spend the summer re-building the diner, which
offers plenty of time for mutual attraction to bloom between Kelley and
Jasper's longtime girlfriend Samantha Cavanaugh (Leelee Sobieski).
     There are, of course, impediments to the Kelley/Samantha coupling in
Michael Seitzman's script. Samantha's sister (Elaine Hendrix) has been
left with a child after a fling with a guy from the same prep school,
meaning the Cavanaughs are opposed. Kelley's father (Stuart Wilson) has
big plans for his son that don't include small town girls, meaning he's
opposed. And there's a twist of medical tragedy in store down the
line. The two leads therefore proceed to play their embarrassingly
scripted courtship for just the Hollywood concoction that it is. Klein
alternately pouts over his plight and reveals his longings for a more
fulfilling life; Sobieski plays the winsome heroine with Mary
Pickford-esque sidelong glances. Their relationship doesn't resemble
anything you would ever see between two actual human 18-year-olds, but
that's fine. When Sam silences Kelley's fumbled attempt at an apology with
an all-forgiving finger to the lips, you know you've been spending time in
a place where romanticism trumps reality.
     Still, there are little things that never feel right about this
world. It's a problem that the rejected boyfriend is from a
salt-of-the-earth farm family, meaning he can never play the Billy Zane
TITANIC role of scowling villain. In fact, you'd almost root for Jasper to
win out, if not for the fact that you may spend most of the film wanting
desperately to reach through the screen to comb his hair. The disapproving
Cavanaugh father (Bruce Greenwood) -- a sheriff, no less --  similarly
becomes a weeping softie. The one villain who's allowed to be a villain is
Kelley's industrialist dad, but we're cheated out of the one moment the
film seemed to have been building to: Kelley's pointed repudiation of the
life his father has planned for him. There's no moment of melodramatic
satisfaction from seeing the bad guy get a good telling-off. For a
melodrama, HERE ON EARTH seems awfully reluctant even to have a bad guy.
     I'm not sure whether I could have embraced even a fully melodramatic
HERE ON EARTH. Even in its basic premise, it's too awkward a melding of
adult tear-jerker and doe-eyed teen appeal romance. Still, there's no
question that melodrama can work when those involved are unashamed about
the fact that they're creating melodrama. That's why people cheer and boo
at wrestling matches; it's why people spend 20 years following their
favorite soap operas. That should have been why the bonding of Kelley and
Sam across opposite sides of the tracks would provide an emotionally
cathartic experience. Instead, it's a half-hearted effort in a genre where
heart is all that matters. The makers of HERE ON EARTH have made a visit
to Planet Melodrama. They just don't seem ready to live there.

Title
Review for Infinity (1996)
(First Look)
Starring:  Matthew Broderick, Patricia Arquette, Peter Reigert.
Screenplay:  Patricia Broderick.
Producers:  Matthew Broderick, Patricia Broderick, Joel Soisson, Michael
Leahy.
Director:  Matthew Broderick.
Running Time:  119 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Here I offer a bit of free, friendly advice for film-makers:  if you
are going to make a two hour long film, please don't make it feel like a
four hour long film...and for heaven's sake, don't title it INFINITY.  You
just can't feed a critic a straight line like that; I'm only human, and
it's too easy.  INFINITY is a Moebius strip of a movie experience, a film
which goes on and on and on without a single compelling situation or
character to hold your attention.  Under the rookie direction of Matthew
Broderick, INFINITY inspires an almost suffocating boredom and the
question of why he even bothered to hire an editor.
     Broderick also stars in this fact-based story as Nobel Prize-winning
physicist Richard Feynman, who is a brilliant young student in Queens, NY
when the main plot begins in 1934.  He meets Arline Greenbaum (Patricia
Arquette) at a high school party, and the pair soon become inseparable.
Their romance continues while Richard attends college, but an even greater
impediment than distance soon arises.  Arline is stricken with an illness
which eventually is diagnosed as tuberculosis, at the time an incurable
and contagious disease.  Despite the grave circumstances and against the
wishes of family, Richard and Arline marry in 1941.  That is also when
Richard is recruited to join a top-secret program in Los Alamos, New
Mexico as part of the team handed the task of developing the atomic bomb.
     On one level, INFINITY is a difficult film to hate actively, because
it clearly was made with some care.  The film is lovingly photographed by
Toyomichi Kurita and scored by Bruce Broughton, and its period detail is
meticulously re-created by production designer Bernt Capra.  That makes
INFINITY a nice film to look at, at least for a little while, until it
becomes apparent that there is not a single thing going on worth caring
about.
     The crushing flaw of INFINITY is that it is almost entirely about the
romance between Richard and Arline, and not once does a spark fly between
Broderick and Arquette.  The script (by Broderick's mother Patricia)
focuses on the intellectual nature of their relationship without paying
much attention to developing them as individuals, resulting in characters
constructed mostly of thick Queens accents and episodic eccentricity.
Arquette is more successful at giving Arline some small measure of appeal,
but she is unable to make this love affair matter.  With no other
character in the film provided even a glimmer of a personality, INFINITY
rapidly begins to sink under the weight of a painfully dull central
relationship.
     It is not Broderick's fault that the real-life circumstances of this
story have Arline dying for nearly four years, but it is definitely his
fault that I was placed in the ghoulish position of hoping she would just
get it over with and die already.  For nearly ninety minutes Arline is
alternately sick and well, and over the course of that ninety minutes we
move abstractly between Richard's personal and professional life, with
scene after scene inspiring me to throw up my hands in exasperation at the
utter lack of a point.  I counted ten scenes in INFINITY which literally
served no narrative or dramatic purpose, and countless other instances
where the judicious use of a knife on several hundred frames of film might
have made me less eager to use one on my own throat.
     Much is made of Richard's unwavering rationalism, as when he reads to
Arline from a medical book detailing what her condition might be while her
doctors insist on protecting her, and I suppose the intention is to convey
the unique nature of their love.  What it really does, however, is make
for a love story without a drop of emotion until Broderick breaks down in
the film's last scene.  At that point, I was sort of feeling like crying
myself, mourning two hours of my life which had begun to feel like
infinity.

Title
Review for Judy Berlin (1999)
     Quite a bit has happened in the year since JUDY BERLIN premiered at
the 1999 Sundance Film Festival, and won director Eric Mendelsohn the
Dramatic Competition Directing Award. One co-star, Edie Falco, has become
a household name as long-suffering mob wife Carmela Soprano on HBO's "The
Sopranos." Another co-star, Madeline Kahn, lost her battle with ovarian
cancer. Perhaps most significantly, AMERICAN BEAUTY became a critical and
popular success with its cynical take on the facade of suburban bliss. It
doesn't take long for a film's entire context to change. Could JUDY BERLIN 
avoid feeling instantly, jarringly out-of-step?
     In the case of JUDY BERLIN, such concerns probably seem silly,
since its style is already so surreal and timeless. His black-and-white
tale takes place during one eventful fall day in the Long Island town of
Babylon, during a solar eclipse.  30-year-old aspiring filmmaker David
Gold (Aaron Hornick) is back in town staying with his parents Art (Bob
Dishy), the grade school principal, and Alice (Madeline Kahn), a flighty
housewife. Art is the object of desire of teacher Sue Berlin (Barbara
Barrie), and the affections may even be requited. David, meanwhile, runs
into his old high school classmate and Sue's daughter Judy (Edie Falco),
who is ready to leave that very night for Los Angeles to pursue her dreams
of an acting career.
     If JUDY BERLIN looks and plays like a suburban spin on a Woody Allen
ensemble comedy, it shouldn't be surprising; Mendelsohn spent years as an
assistant costume designer for Allen films. Essentially it's a character
study, exploring the submerged longings of its suburban denizens that come
to the surface only when the eclipse causes time to stand still. Alice
wanders the streets, playing at exploring an alien world; a retired
teacher (Bette Henritze) in the early stages of Alzheimer's also wanders
in a search for something familiar. The veteran cast members deliver some
superb performances, particularly Kahn in a very funny yet very sad piece
of work, and Barrie as the not-well-liked teacher with an unknown inner
life. JUDY BERLIN manages to hit some effective comic notes while always
staying true to the small, very personal desires of even its peripheral
characters.
     Mendelsohn's main characters, however, fare less well. The title of
the film tells us to focus on the interaction between David and Judy as 
the thematic center, and, unfortunately, the center doesn't hold. David
exists primarily as a stand-in for the filmmaker -- the frequent, nudgy
references to the fact that we're watching a story that's going to be
turned into a film don't help matters -- and Hornick doesn't do enough
with what is there. Edie Falco, meanwhile, shows a wonderful range in a
character light years removed from Carmela Soprano. It's a very
entertaining performance as an endearing character, but Judy is more a
symbol of possible escape than a fully-realized person. While David's
mopey self-loathing may ultimately come in for affectionate mockery, that
doesn't make it any easier to latch on to him as a protagonist, or to care
about the fate of David and Judy's relationship.
     Even when he fumbles one of his sub-plots, Mendelsohn keeps JUDY
BERLIN enough on the sweet side of bittersweet that it remains appealing.
He seems to find the suburbs far from a soulless place hiding dark
secrets, but rather a place like any other where people suspect the best
moments may already have passed them by. The look (Jeffrey Seckendorf's
black-and-white cinematography) and sound (Michael Nicholas's piano and
harpsichord score) may contribute much to JUDY BERLIN's sense of
timelessness, but the story itself plays a significant role. The
characters in the film spend much of the running in place because they're
always looking behind them. How refreshing to find a film that suggests 
there's something to look forward to -- even in the suburbs.

Title
Review for Go Fish (1994)
Starring:  Guinevere Turner, V. S. Brodie, T. Wendy McMillan,
Anastasia Sharp, Migdalia Melendez.
Screenplay:  Rose Troche & Guinevere Turner.
Director:  Rose Troche.
     The problem with nearly every mainstream film dealing with
lesbians is that they have been just so *serious*.  If you believed
what you saw on the screen, you'd think that every lesbian relationship
involved a "fallen" heterosexual grappling in anguish with her sexual
identity.  Even at their best, such "love-that-dare-not-speak-its-name"
melodramas painted a picture that just didn't gibe the reality I have
seen.  What a breath of fresh air GO FISH is: a low-budget romantic
comedy finally showing lesbians having fun and leading day-to-day
lives.  Though uneven and amateurish enough to be occasionally
distracting, GO FISH is mostly a frisky and funny pleasure, playing
like a sort of WHEN SALLY MET SALLY....
     Co-scripter Guinevere Turner stars as Max, an introspective young
student who describes herself as "a carefree, single lesbo lookin' for
love."  Among those who try to help Max in her search for Ms. Right are
Max's roommate Kia (T. Wendy McMillan), a sarcastic teacher; Kia's
partner Evy (Migdalia Melendez); and gleefully promiscuous Daria
(Anastasia Sharp).  Eventually they conspire to set Max up with Daria's
roommate Ely (V. S. Brodie), a timid and plain-looking veterinary
assistant clinging to a moribund long-distance relationship.  As Max
and Ely take the tentative first steps toward a relationship, their
friends gather to analyze their progress, and to discuss other topics
near and dear to them.
     GO FISH was a labor of love and a financial nightmare for Turner
and co-scripter/director Rose Troche, so it may seem unfair to
criticize the erratic film quality and choppy editing.  However, many
of the rookie mistakes Troche makes are difficult to pass off on
economics.  Between scenes, she often inserts self-consciously artsy
snippets of flashing lights, folded hands and spinning tops, and they
just aren't in synch with the otherwise light-hearted film.  Ditto for
the lengthy dream sequence in which Daria is subjected to the scorn and
criticism of other lesbians for having sex with a man.  It was as
though Troche wasn't sure she was ever going to get a chance to make a
movie again, and thus threw every idea she had into this one, resulting
in a somewhat scattered final product.
     Troche is also at the mercy of her mostly non-professional cast,
and they in turn are at the mercy of some occasionally very sketchy
characters.  The best role belongs to Turner, an appealing presence
with self-effacing humor.  Max is the youngest and least experienced of
the principal characters, and Turner sells her insecurity.  Also solid
is T. Wendy McMillan's Kia, a veteran of the lesbian wars who acts as a
sort of mentor to Max.  She delivers shome sharp lines with a wry wit,
and anchors the scenes in which she, Evy, Daria and Daria's
amour-du-jour comment on Max and Ely's relationship.  Not so fortunate
is V. S. Brodie, who stumbles her way through a part written more
through other characters observations than through anything Ely says or
does.  While I have no problem with the idea that Max might see past
Ely's unconventional looks, I would expect there to be a more
interesting personality for her to find there.
     As underdeveloped as some of the characters might be, they still
have plenty of funny things to say.  In the film's opening scene, Kia
leads a class in speculating on what historical figures, celebrities,
and even fictional characters might have been lesbians.  The "talking
heads" scenes are particularly entertaining, chief among them a
discussion of preferred terms for the female genitalia.  One late
sequence shows Max and Ely individually describing a date to their
friends, accompanied by hilariously off-base, RASHOMON-like
interpretations of those events depicted on screen.  And in the film's
sweetest and funniest moment, Ely practically skips home after a
particularly good evening with Max.  Yet as amusing as GO FISH is, it
is not without some frank observations on what it means to be a lesbian
in the 1990's.  A pair of scenes narrated through Max's journal entries
are extremely potent, bringing across both the commonality of the need
for love and the unique concerns of these women.  GO FISH is not
without its bumps and flaws, but it is both funny enough and insightful
enough to warrant casting a line into its deep waters.

Title
Review for Brassed Off (1996)
     Writer/director Mark Herman is so concerned about sounding the
trumpet to deliver a "message" in BRASSED OFF that he almost ruins a
perfectly good character study.  The story is set in the Yorkshire town of
Grimley, where Danny (Pete Postlethwaite) prepares to lead into
competition the brass band made up of workers at the local colliery (coal
mine).  Danny seems blissfully unaware of the issue which preoccupies
every other band member, including his own son Phil (Stephen Thompkinson):
the government program of coal pit closures which is threatening to make
Grimley the latest target.  Still the band, including a lovely new arrival
named Gloria (Tara Fitzgerald), plays on, trying to make progress toward
a national competition at the Albert Hall while a union vote over the fate
of the colliery looms.
     BRASSED OFF is at its best painting a vivid portrait of life in a
northern coal town.  Long days of hard labor are punctuated by pints with
the boys and nearly wordless exchanges between husbands and wives.
Meanwhile, the battle of wills between Danny and the other band members
points out a profound gap between what the band means to each side.  For
the players, it is a social club which provides a rare opportunity to blow
off steam, demonstrated in an amusing montage of ever-more-inebriated
performances.  For Danny, the band is a symbol, an enduring tradition and
the one beautiful thing in a dark, dusty world.
     If Herman had kept his focus on this clash between pragmatism and
idealism, best exemplified by the relationship between Danny and Phil (an
exceptional performance by Stephen Thompkinson), BRASSED OFF could have
been a minor gem.  Unfortunately, Herman is determined to make sure we
leave the theater enlightened about the injustice of the pit closure
program.  Phil rails against Margaret Thatcher in a church; Danny uses the
band competition as a soapbox for the miners' cause; statistics of job
losses roll by as the film ends.  Like too many directors of films about
social issues, Herman doesn't trust our sympathy for the characters to
create all the resonance the story needs.  Add an over-dramatized but
under-developed romance between Fitzgerald and Ewan McGregor (as a young
miner) and you have a film which strays from its strengths.  The human
drama of BRASSED OFF makes for much sweeter music than strident
sermonizing.

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
THE TAO OF STEVE
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Donal Logue, Greer Goodman, Kimo Wills, Ayelet Kaznelson, David
Aaron Baker.
Screenplay:  Greer Goodman, Jenniphr Goodman and Duncan North.
Producer:  Anthony Bregman.
Director:  Jenniphr Goodman.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Yes, it's another independent film about hyperarticulate-yet-
underemployed guys in need of a lot of growing up. It's also a fairly 
funny one, following the adventures of a philosophically inclined slacker
named Dex (Donal Logue). Though he was a brilliant student in college, ten
years later Dex is overweight, often stoned, a part-time worker at a day
care center and still living in a communal house with his male pals. That
doesn't prevent him from having plenty of success at sexual conquest, a
phenomenon he attributes to his adherence to "The Tao of Steve," based on
archetypal male behavior with the opposite sex. But his philosophy is
challenged by the reappearance of an old college acquaintance named Syd
(Greer Goodman), who throws a wrench into Dex's usually simple approach to
life.
     Co-writer/director Jenniphr Goodman (sister of co-star/co-writer
Greer) does exactly what one has to do to keep the "overgrown adolescent
finds love" story fresh. First, she gets good performances out of her
actors, particularly Logue, who imbues Dex with a strange shambling
charisma. Second, she creates sparks between her two romantic leads with
appealing situations like the hike and camping trip that shows Dex to be
truly at two with nature. Finally, she crafts sharp dialogue to wrap
around the provocative central philosophy devised by co-writer Duncan
North. It's the sort of thing that could be as talked about as WHEN HARRY
MET SALLY's infamous "men and women can't be friends" notion, positing
that the surest way to a woman's heart is to treat her with indifference. 
First dates beware: This may get you into deeper discussion than you'd
like.
     The result is a love story that's as smart and entertaining as it
is utterly predictable and instantly forgettable. It's fun watching
Logue's Dex play mentor to a romantically inept young acquaintance (Kimo
Wills), but it's clear virtually from the outset that the entire purpose
of the narrative is to humble Dex. That humbling occurs during a climax
that takes contrived to a new level, a genuinely clumsly conclusion to an
otherwise generally satisfying story. It's testimony to the effectiveness
of THE TAO OF STEVE's punch lines -- instantly quote-worthy though they're
not -- that the film  overcomes its erratic pacing and limp climax. And it
probably helps to be an alum of the School of Hyperarticulate-Yet-
Underemployed Guys to appreciate the minor charms of a film that's equally
comfortable tossing off references to Kierkegaard and "The Bugaloos."

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8MM
(Columbia)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter
Stormare, Anthony Heald, Catherine Keener.
Screenplay:  Andrew Kevin Walker.
Producers:  Judy Hofflund, Gavin Polone and Joel Schumacher.
Director:  Joel Schumacher.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, violence, nudity)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I don't think I want to know what Andrew Kevin Walker dreams about.
As to Joel Schumacher's dreams, I think I can venture a pretty good guess.
Walker is the scribe responsible for the monumentally disturbing SEVEN, a
writer who seems far too fascinated with the horrifying outer limits of
human depravity; Schumacher is a pop filmmaker who has served up glossy
pseudo-character studies on vigilantism (FALLING DOWN, A TIME TO KILL) and
fetishized beefcake (the two most recent BATMAN extravaganzas).  It would
seem that the creative sensibilities of these two men couldn't be farther
apart, which is one of the reasons 8MM feels like an edgy, intriguing
missed opportunity.  Every time Walker tries to drive the narrative into
the realm of the unnerving, Schumacher drags it back into the merely
kinky.
     The premise for 8MM involves that most enduring of pornographic urban
legends, the snuff film.  Private investigator Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage)
is hired by the widow of a recently deceased billionaire industrialist
regarding one unpleasant item from his wall safe.  It's a single reel of
8mm film, a film in which a teenage girl appears to be knifed to death by
a man in a black leather hood.  Charged by his employer to find out
whether or not the film is authentic, Welles begins to delve into the
Hollywood pornography underworld with a book store clerk named Max
(Joaquin Phoenix) as his guide.  Soon he discovers that there is always
someone willing to cater to almost every sexual taste, and that there are
people in the world capable of things he never imagined.
     Cage is a great choice for a character like Tom Welles -- the
capacity for lunatic action always seems to hide just behind his placid
features -- but the character himself is something of a puzzle.  Much is
made in the opening minutes of Tom's happy marriage to his wife (Catherine
Keener) and his love for his infant daughter, which makes it a bit too
obvious that his quest for the snuff film's possible victim is really all
about his own little girl.  At times, however, it seems that Walker and
Schumacher are playing with the idea that Welles is recognizing some of
his own darker desires through his experience.  Is 8MM a story of a man
discovering the evil in society, or the evil in himself?  If that question
had been answered more effectively, 8MM might have struck a more resonant
chord.
     As it stands, it's still a pretty gripping little thriller at times.
The first hour pokes along at something of a crawl, which somehow works
more often than it doesn't, perhaps because it's indicative of Welles'
tenacity.  The supporting performances are solid, with Joaquin Phoenix
making a savvy sidekick for Welles, and Peter Stormare seething sleaze as
a porn film director.  The deliberate pacing eventually gives way to some
tense showdowns as the film builds to its climax, including a search for a
killer in which the driving sound of thrash metal music suddenly becomes
the eerie metronome of the runout groove.  8MM is rarely a bore, and often
finds the slick energy of the most effective dark action films.
     It's too bad that slickness works against 8MM nearly as often as it
works for it.  The bleak triumph of SEVEN came not primarily through
Walker's fairly straightforward serial killer script, but through director
David Fincher's brilliantly subliminal direction; the violence lurked at
the edges of the frame, where our minds put gruesome pieces together.
Joel Schumacher is a more grandiose sort of filmmaker, one who has no
problem thrusting the details of an S&M film into the dead center of the
screen.  His version of the smoky basements where the hardcore deviants
lurk is too literal, and indeed there's something about Tom Welles' entire
journey that is too literal.  The director isn't exactly trying to
titillate the audience, but he's not helping the writer's study of how one
man responds to the destruction of innocence.  It may be enough that 8MM
is just a decently constructed thriller.  It's just not a gut-rattler,
more the sort of thing you get when the director of BATMAN & ROBIN tries
to do apocalyptic menace.

Title
Review for Heavenly Creatures (1994)
Starring:  Melanie Lynskey, Kate Winslet, Sarah Peirse, Clive
Merrison, Diana Kent.
Screenplay:  George Welsh and Peter Jackson.
Director:  Peter Jackson.
     Earlier this year, I commented on thematically similar films where
the later release suffered in comparison to the first.  WYATT EARP
languished in the wake of the less reverent but far more entertaining
TOMBSTONE; BLOWN AWAY was blown away by the gleefully brainless SPEED.
Last month, I had the chance to screen an independent film called FUN,
which involved two troubled teenagers who form an intense friendship
which leads to murder.  It was not a great film, but good enough that I
wondered if my evaluation of HEAVENLY CREATURES might be influenced.
But where FUN was occasionally stagy and ponderous, HEAVENLY CREATURES
is dazzling, a perversely original psychodrama.
     HEAVENLY CREATURES opens in 1952 in Christchurch, New Zealand,
where 14-year-old Pauline (Melanie Lynskey) is a student at an all-girl
parochial school.  Sullen and withdrawn, Pauline finds a surprising
soul-mate in Juliet Hulme (Kate Winslet), a vibrant and imaginative
English girl newly arrived with her academic father (Clive Merrison)
and socialite mother (Diana Kent).  The two become inseparable friends,
creating tales together of a fantastic "fourth world" called Borovnia.
Gradually, however, Juliet's father and Pauline's mother (Sarah Peirse)
begin to believe that the two girls have formed an "unwholesome
attachment."  As the families begin efforts to keep the girls apart,
they retreat even deeper into their fantasy world, and hatch a plan to
be together forever, a plan which involves killing Pauline's mother.
     The strongest elements in FUN were the performances of the two
young lead actresses, and ironically the same elements provide the only
minor weak link in HEAVENLY CREATURES.  Melanie Lynskey is the better
of the two, playing the more complicated character, but it seems she
settles into expressing every emotion by glowering beneath her nest of
unruly dark curls; Kate Winslet is occasionally a bit much, arching her
eyebrows and punching her oh-so-proper upper crust diction.  However,
their scenes together are quite effective, and they show a natural
rapport.  Lynskey in particular comes alive beautifully, and the
intensity of their relationship never seems implausible.
     It is also illustrated with astonishing creativity by Peter
Jackson, best known for the marvelously demented DEAD ALIVE.  HEAVENLY
CREATURES begins with a sequence in which the girls, covered with
blood, run screaming through the underbrush, intercut with dream-like
black and white footage of the girls on a cruise ship.  From the first
frames, Jackson slams us into a world of chaos and delusion, and even
through light-hearted scenes there is a sense of foreboding as we await
the inevitable conclusion.  This is the real triumph of HEAVENLY
CREATURES:  although it is alternately a drama, a fantasy and a
mystery, it is an absolutely coherent whole.  Because we know where
this relationship will lead, there is an undercurrent of menace in
dark-humored sequences where Pauline visualizes revenge fantasies.  It
also presents the disturbing premise that given the right (or wrong)
circumstances, the fantasy world every adolescent creates could explode
into the real world.
     Those circumstances involve a delicate issue, one also raised by
FUN.  Since there is a sexual element to the relationship between
Pauline and Juliet, it would be possible to misinterpret the film as
suggesting that their crime, Leopold and Loeb-like, was just another
manifestation of their "deviance."  But Jackson is up to something more
subtle than that.  A key scene involving Pauline's encounter with a
psychologist, and the doctor's subsequent ominous pronouncement of the
word "homosexuality" to her mother, points out that while nothing the
girls were doing was truly harmful, it was treated as such.  In a case
of power of suggestion, the girls begin to believe that they are
mentally ill because that is the way their behavior is defined by
society.  Through both his audacious direction and an insightful
script, Peter Jackson has crafted a powerful character study that is
unlike anything you'll see this year.

Title
Review for Sunday (1997)
SUNDAY
(CFP)
Starring:  David Suchet, Lisa Harrow, Larry Pine, Jared Harris.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Nossiter and James Lasdun, from a story by Lasdun.
Producers:  Alix Madigan, Agios Katsikakis, Andrew Fierberg.
Director:  Jonathan Nossiter.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
     If Jonathan Nossiter wanted to make a documentary about the plight of
New York's homeless, he should have just gone ahead and done it.  At least
he wouldn't have constricted one of the most compelling relationships of
the year by subjugating it to a forced sense of social consciousness.
Nossiter's feature debut, the Best Dramatic Film winner at the 1997
Sundance Film Festival, ponders the nature of identity and the buried
desires of lost souls through the story of a chance meeting one Sunday in
Queens.  While walking down the street, actress Madeleine Vesey (Lisa
Harrow) hails a rumpled-looking man (David Suchet) she spies from a
distance.  She addresses him as respected film director Matthew Delacorta,
but we know that "Matthew" woke up that morning in a homeless shelter, and
that the men there know him as Oliver.  Is Oliver really Matthew
Delacorta?  Is Madeleine really who she seems to be?  Did she really
attack her estranged husband (Larry Pine) with a pair of pruning shears?
     Though SUNDAY asks plenty of questions without providing many
answers, ambiguity isn't its problem.  The real hitch is Nossiter's
inability to recognize the strength of his central relationship.  Both
Suchet and Harrow give intense, emotionally rich performances as people
taking a momentary escape from their bleak lives by clothing themselves in
attractive fictions.  Their relationship is complex and affecting, yet
Nossiter seems to believe that he needs a broader canvas than the
connection between two lonely people.  That belief gives rise to frequent
detours to peer into the way other homeless men are spending their Sunday,
as well as unsatisfying encounters with Madeleine's husband?/ex-husband?
and self-conscious cinematic trickery like unfocused point-of-view shots
when Matthew/Oliver removes his glasses.  As a love story, SUNDAY is often
beautiful and haunting.  As a film about a Serious Issue, it looks like a
film-maker's attempt to create something to sermonize about in an
acceptance speech.
KICKED IN THE HEAD
(October)
Starring:  Kevin Corrigan, Linda Fiorentino, Michael Rapaport, James
Woods, Burt Young, Lili Taylor.
Screenplay:  Matthew Harrison and Kevin Corrigan.
Producer:  Barbara DeFina.
Director:  Matthew Harrison.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, drug use)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
     First, let's clarify all the things KICKED IN THE HEAD is _not_.
It's not a whimsical, surreal urban odyssey like AFTER HOURS, despite the
perplexing executive producer participation of Martin Scorsese.  It's not
a good-natured slacker comedy, despite the presence of a hyper-reflective,
ambition-deficient protagonist.  It's not a gritty-yet-pop-culture-savvy
crime dramedy in the Tarantino mold, despite the plethora of shootouts and
one inane discussion about the PLANET OF THE APES movies.  And it's not
worth a moment of your time.
     Here's what KICKED IN THE HEAD _is_:  a gruellingly unfunny 89
minutes spent following an annoying, unsympathetic young man named
Redmond (Kevin Corrigan) on a "spiritual quest" through the Lower East
Side, which apparently consists of 1) using plenty of beer and cocaine, 2)
writing plenty of bad poetry and 3) spending plenty of time with people
who are even more annoying and unsympathetic than himself.  This is
independent film-making at its most pointless and self-indulgent,
mistaking profanity for profundity and incoherence for avant-garde.  When
a cast this talented (Linda Fiorentino, James Woods, Lili Taylor) stumbles
through a script this disastrous, you can only assume that the title of
KICKED IN THE HEAD refers to what happened to every one of them before
signing on.

Title
Review for In Love and War (1997)
(New Line)
Starring:  Sandra Bullock, Chris O'Donnell, Mackenzie Astin, Emilio
Bonucci.
Screenplay:  Allan Scott & Clancy Sigal and Anna Hamilton Phelan, based on
"Hemingway in Love and War" by Henry S. Villard and James Nagel.
Producers:  Dmitri Villard, Richard Attenborough.
Director:  Richard Attenborough.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult situations)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     IN LOVE AND WAR, a thoroughly mediocre attempt at an intimate epic,
suffers the added disadvantage of extraordinarily bad timing.  There has
already been a better film in the last couple of months about a tragic
war-time romance involving a wounded man and his care-taker (THE ENGLISH
PATIENT); there has already been a better film in the last couple of weeks
about the ill-fated real-life true love of a suicidal author (THE WHOLE
WIDE WORLD).  That is not to say that IN LOVE AND WAR would have been a
better film if it had been released a year ago.  It does mean, however,
that the points of comparison between this film and its two predecessors
make its weaknesses all the more evident.
     The setting is 1918 Italy, where morale is low in the wake of a
German/Austrian onslaught in the final months of World War I but American
troops are unable to assist due to commitment in France.  Instead, the
U.S. sends assistance to hospitals in the form of Red Cross nurses, among
them 26-year-old Agnes von Kurowsky (Sandra Bullock).  One of Agnes'
patients is a gung-ho teenager from Kansas City named Ernest Hemingway
(Chris O'Donnell), eager to see action despite a vision impairment which
has rendered him unfit for front line duty.  His journalistic trip to the
Italian trenches earns Ernie a severe leg wound, but he heals under
Agnes' care.  The cocky young Ernie falls for his nurse, and is convinced
that she loves him too in spite of competition from an Italian doctor
(Emilio Bonucci) and Ernie's own friend Harry Villard (Mackenzie Astin).
Even when they seem to be coming together, Agnes and Ernie find the war
separating them, leading to a difficult choice for Agnes.
     The first image in IN LOVE AND WAR is a weathered hand-drawn map, but
it might as well be a big neon sign announcing that director Richard
Attenborough (GANDHI, CHAPLIN) is now about to bring you an Epic with a
capital "E."  And he never lets you forget it for a moment, either,
trotting out spectacular locations, battlefield footage and a grandiose
score by George Fenton.  Unfortunately, the locations are shot flatly by
Roger Pratt, a couple of the battlefield scenes are dropped in like
sympathy-seeking mortars without a moment of set-up, and Fenton's score is
as loud and relentless as any theater's sub-woofers could withstand.
Attenborough seems so concerned with making IN LOVE AND WAR sweeping that
he ends up sweeping his characters into the background.
     Sweeping characters like this aside doesn't take a particular strong 
broom, as it turns out.  After failing to provide the grandeur of THE
ENGLISH PATIENT, IN LOVE AND WAR then can't muster the kind of convincing
characterizations which at least made THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD watchable.  
Sandra Bullock is capable of making Agnes somewhat appealing, and of 
lending a modicum of plausibility to the script's portrayal of her as the
most fought-over female creature since Helen of Troy.  Bullock pulls out
every All-American girl stop, and her kindly nurse could easily win over
frightened patient and stoic doctor alike.  As for Chris O'Donnell...well,
don't you just want to pat him on the head and send him to bed with a
glass of milk?  It is one thing that O'Donnell is trying to play Hemingway
with a youthful naivete; it is another to be playing an Ernest so earnest
that he comes off like the guy who would get wedgies in grade school.  The
age difference between Agnes and Ernie becomes the focus of the rift
between them, but it plays out even ickier than writers Allan Scott,
Clancy Sigal and Anna Hamilton Phelan intend.  You half expect "Mrs.
Robinson" to start playing on the soundtrack.
     O'Donnell is even worse trying to play the disillusioned sot
Hemingway becomes, when his raging outbursts seem more like petulant hissy
fits, but by that point no one in the audience will care much about him
anyway.  As an indication of how inconsequential the central romance 
between Agnes and Ernie is, IN LOVE AND WAR actually gains momentum
during the half an hour of screen time when the focus turns to Agnes'
relationship with Dr. Caraciolo.  The Venice locations create a glowing
romantic setting, and Bonucci turns in a nice performance as the stiffly
chivalric suitor.  Agnes and Caraciolo seem perfect for each other, and
Agnes' decision to turn him down makes sense only if we buy that the lusty
Ernie, whose mere touch of her stocking reduces her to incoherence, is the
passionate man of her dreams.  O'Donnell's Ernie is about as lusty as cub
reporter Jimmy Olsen, and IN LOVE AND WAR is reduced to its familiarity --
an epic drama with no drama, and a personal story with no personality.

Title
Review for nglagrd (1992)
In Swedish, with English subtitles
Starring:  Helena Bergstrom, Rikard Wolff, Sven Wolter.
Screenplay/Director:  Colin Nutley.
     When I think of Swedish films, comedy does not exactly spring to
mind.  The central figure is of course Ingmar Bergman, whose imagistic
and introspective works have given me a somewhat grim picture of
Swedish cinema, and of Sweden in general.  Now it appears that I must
change my perception.  The impetus for that change is HOUSE OF ANGELS,
a bright and lively comedy that takes on moral hypocrisy and
provincialism with delightful results.
     HOUSE OF ANGELS is set in a small Swedish farming village where
Erik Zander (Per Oscarsson), a reclusive landowner, has just passed
away.  Among the many citizens less than devastated by his passing is
Axel Flogfalt (Sven Wolter), a wealthy mill owner who covets the timber
on Erik's land.  He believes Erik has died without an heir, and that he
will be able to obtain the land when it goes up for public auction.
Enter Fanny (Helena Bergstrom), who arrives on a motorcycle with
leather-clad companion Zac (Rikard Wolff) and shocks the community by
announcing that she's Erik's granddaughter.  Fanny and Zac, flamboyant
Berlin cabaret performers, then take up residence on the Zander farm,
Anglagaard, much to the consternation of the town's stuffy populace.
     Writer/director Colin Nutley does a fantastic job of establishing
the hidden peccadillos of the town's citizens.  Before Erik's death, a
ghoulish Axel tells his son that he looks forward to the benefit he
stands to gain from the event.  Axel's nephew Per-Ove, who runs the
town grocery store, sits in the back room watching American porno films
between customers; his stock girl Eva is carrying on a roadside affair
with Axel's rakish son Morten.  The framework of these little sins
makes their response to Fanny's open sexuality and exuberance all the
more laughable.  Axel's uptight wife Ruth assumes that Zac must be a
drug user because of his appearance, and that the interlopers from the
big city will ruin their wholesome community.  Nutley crafts a tale
about a particular intolerance which transcends the particular and
addresses the universal foolishness of such narrow-mindedness.
     The film is at its best when it deals with the direct interactions
between Fanny and the town's citizens.  She slowly begins to win over
the more even-tempered folk, including the young priest Father Henning
and two shy elderly brothers.  The latter in particular is a hilarious
scene, as Fanny and Zac try to explain to the two perplexed men the
exact nature of their sometimes bawdy performances.  There is also an
intense but comic confrontation between Fanny and Ruth, where the
threatened matron ticks off the terrible vices Fanny will perpetrate on
the small town ("I've seen it all on TV!" she cries).  HOUSE OF ANGELS
is full of such scenes, and most of them sparkle.  Make special note of
the wonderful montage following Fanny's decision to give the town
gossips something *really* worth gossipping about.
     HOUSE OF ANGELS certainly isn't a perfect film.  Bergstrom is
lovely as Fanny, but she's not quite as fully developed a character as
she could be, especially concerning why she's so eager to stay at
Anglagaard.  The film also suffers from some choppy editing in the
final half hour, and singularly unimpressive translations in some of
the subtitles.  However, none of this should keep you away from HOUSE
OF ANGELS.  The photography of the Swedish countryside is beautiful,
and the interiors are almost as impressive.  It's also a film with a
fantastic ensemble cast; there truly is not a bad performance to be
found.  The most memorable for me:  Reine Brynolfsson as the
introverted Gottfrid, whom Fanny draws out of his shell into a warm
friendship.
     HOUSE OF ANGELS was an Academy Award nominee for Best Foreign
Language Film last year, and it appears to have been a richly deserved
honor.  It's reminiscent of Bill Forsyth's LOCAL HERO, with a slight
moralist twist.  It could take some searching to find it near you, but
it will be well worth the effort.
     On the Renshaw scale of 0 to 10 rounds of "Auld Lang Syne" (you'll
have to see it to understand):  9.

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Daniel Day-Lewis, Winona Ryder, Paul Scofield, Joan Allen,
Bruce Davison, Rob Campbell.
Screenplay:  Arthur Miller, based on his play.
Producers:  Robert A. Miller, David V. Picker.
Director:  Nicholas Hytner.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     To demonstrate my empathy with the themes of THE CRUCIBLE, I'm going
to engage in a bit of heresy of my own:  I don't think Arthur Miller's
play is particularly good.  I'm not suggesting that it is dated, as other
critics have done.  Irrational fear and extremism are alive and well in
1990s America; you only need to watch the recent documentary PARADISE LOST
for evidence.  The ideas in THE CRUCIBLE were never the issue, but those
weighty issues overwhelmed under-developed characters.  Productions of THE
CRUCIBLE have lived or died on the ability of the actors to invest the
material with feeling missing from the page, and this first
English-language film of the play is no different.  Fortunately, the cast
is very strong, and the conventions of cinema give the energy level a
much-needed boost.  Flawed as it may be, THE CRUCIBLE still has moments of
undeniable power.
     Set in 1692 in Salem, Massachusetts, THE CRUCIBLE begins with a
gathering in the woods where several young girls, led by Abigail Williams
(Winona Ryder) play at conjuring spirits.  The fun ends when they are
discovered by Reverend Parris (Bruce Davison), and the Reverend's own
daughter is frightened into a catatonic state.  To save themselves from
punishment, the girls begin accusing Salem's women of witchcraft, naming
names indiscriminately.  Abigail, however, has one specific name in mind:
Elizabeth Proctor (Joan Allen), wife of her former employer -- and lover
-- John Proctor (Daniel Day-Lewis).  As Salem becomes a town ruled by
paranoia, Judge Danforth (Paul Scofield) arrives to try the accused
witches, with only a few men like Proctor brave enough to challenge the
court.
     Miller's 1953 play is well-known as an allegory for the "red scare"
and black-listing of the 1950s, but Miller's own screen adaptation
attempts to make the story less specific to that era, while also making it
more visual.  The girls' ritual gathering, only described by other
characters in the play, is shown in graphic detail, including
blood-smeared faces and nude writhing; an incident where Abigail stabs
herself with a needle and accuses Elizabeth of hexing her is similarly
portrayed.  The scenes are not meant simply for shock value, but to
emphasize the active hypocrisy of the accusers.  They also make Abigail
less a creature of youthful spite and more a deeply disturbed young woman
caught up in the attention and admiration she receives for pointing out
the witches of Salem.  Winona Ryder does some of her best work ever in the
role, shedding the restrained quality of her previous period film
performances.  Here she lets loose like an animal -- desperate, haunted
and dangerous.
     Ryder is one part of a cast which gives its all to THE CRUCIBLE,
beginning with Paul Scofield as Danforth.  Scofield brings a commanding,
weathered presence to the role of Salem's Grand Inquisitor, and a
conviction that the judge's work is good and proper.  He also gives lines
a punch few other actors could muster; when he announces that he intends
to "touch the bottom of this swamp" of accusations and
counter-accusations, he utters the word "swamp" with a fearsome authority.
Joan Allen's steady, cool Elizabeth is just what the part calls for, and
she shows that passive-aggression is not a uniquely 20th century
phenomenon.  Surprisingly, the weak link in the cast is Daniel Day-Lewis.
Proctor is an under-written role, but there is too much self-righteous
heroism in Day-Lewis's reading.  When he delivers his final plea to avoid
a public confession, literally foaming at the mouth, he almost seems to
believe he deserves special consideration.
     Under-written characters and under-developed relationships are the
main faults of THE CRUCIBLE as a text; at times, it feels nearly as
plot-driven as a Michael Crichton novel.  The story is meant to provoke
the audience to outrage at the lives destroyed by false accusers and
complicit authority figures, but it only takes a couple of scenes to make
the point rather than the repetitive structure of the children's
accusations.  Still, there are a couple of scenes in THE CRUCIBLE which
can get any audience to hold its breath, notably a tense questioning of
Elizabeth for which there can be no correct answer.  Director Nicholas
Hytner (THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE) offers an interpretation which isn't
in the least iconoclastic, but he knows where to use George Fenton's score
or a lingering close-up to give a scene added weight.  THE CRUCIBLE is a
good (though not great) adaptation of a good (though not great) play which
still has the ability to cast its own spell.

Title
Review for Nightmare Before Christmas, The (1993)
Voices:  Danny Elfman, Chris Sarandon, Catherine O'Hara, William
Hickey, Glenn Shaddix.
Screenplay:  Caroline Thompson.
Director:  Henry Selick.
     If JURASSIC PARK proved one thing, it was this:  image *is*
everything.  What the public seems to want most from movies is
spectacle; show them something they've never seen before, and they'll
beat a path to the theater door, even if the story is fairly
simplistic.  This news should come as a great comfort to Touchstone
Pictures and Tim Burton.  THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS is a
straightforward, somewhat bland fable which would have put me to sleep
if done with live action or traditional hand-drawn animation.  However,
its stop-motion figures and incredible production design are dazzling
enough to give NIGHTMARE a delightfully timeless quality which make it
far more entertaining than it could have been.
     THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS posits the existence of separate,
inhabited towns which hold dominion over the major holidays.  In
Halloween Town, the residents are celebrating the successful completion
of another October 31st, but Pumpkin King Jack Skellington (voice of
Chris Sarandon, sung by Danny Elfman) is not so happy.  Tired of
Halloween after Halloween just like every other, Jack longs for
something different to shake him out of his ennui.  He finds it when he
stumbles onto Christmas Town, and is enchanted by what he sees.  Jack
decides to have Santa kidnapped and stage his own Christmas, despite
warnings from lovelorn rag doll Sally (Catherine O'Hara) that it will
be a disaster.
     First, the good news:  NIGHTMARE is truly unlike anything you've
ever seen before.  The look combines old Rankin/Bass Christmas
specials, Edward Gorey illustrations and the Beatles' YELLOW SUBMARINE
to create a remarkably distinctive and detailed world.  The animation
is incredibly fluid, to the extent that I began to wonder whether a
couple of characters were real humans somehow edited into the film.
Cheers also to the marvelous character design, from spindly Jack to the
lecherous Dr. Finkelstein (William Hickey) to my favorite, the
literally two-faced Mayor (Glenn Shaddix).  It was the kind of film
where I never took my eyes off the screen because I was afraid of
missing something.  Director Henry Selick avoids the pitfall of
"showing off" his toys; he keeps the camera moving, telling the story
visually with style and effectiveness, particularly Jack's graveyard
song after his Christmas coup.
     The down side of this complex and expensive animation technique is
that the story had to be packed into under 75 minutes.  There is no
time for nuance of character or well-developed motivations; the
filmmakers slam through the plot at a breakneck pace, avoiding lags in
pace but also avoiding a truly engaging story.  The biggest loser is
the romantic subplot involving Sally's unrequited love for Jack,
resolved out of nowhere.  The villainous character of Oogie Boogie also
comes up a bit short, and a slightly grumpy Santa could have been very
interesting.  The story is a fairy tale, so I don't take issue with the
simplicity of the plot.  I was just disappointed with the apparent
decision to throw everything into the visuals.
     Perhaps most disappointing is the song score by frequent Tim
Burton collaborator Danny Elfman.  Taking an operatic approach,
NIGHTMARE is almost entirely through-sung, making the songs a crucial
element of the film.  But with the exception of the lively "What's
This?" during Jack's discovery of Christmas Town, the tunes are fairly
tedious and the lyrics lacking in wit.  They seemed designed simply to
move the story forward, not to inspire humability like the best
Ashman/Menken tunes from the recent Disney films.  It's surprising
given Elfman's playful Oingo Boingo oeuvre that his songs here are so
somber and uninspired.
     Some movies are called feasts for the senses.  THE NIGHTMARE
BEFORE CHRISTMAS qualifies as a feast for the sense, singular.  While
there is very little worth listening to in the film, there is more than
enough worth looking at to compensate, particularly for those with a
slightly twisted sense of humor.  NIGHTMARE is delightfully unique,
just not a dream come true.

Title
Review for Dancer in the Dark (2000)
     DANCER IN THE DARK is a masterwork by one of the most audaciously
brilliant filmmakers working today ... or it's a huge, sick joke at the
audience's expense. Or maybe it's both. You can't really put any
motivation past Lars von Trier, a director whose fondness for rendering
his own name in block letters four times larger than the film's title
belies a certain streak of ego. This is a man who decided to write the
rules for a new aesthetic of minimalist cinema with his Dogme '95
manifesto, then proceeded to break all those rules by making a live-action
musical. It has become clear that you can predict virtually nothing about
the way von Trier will try to make a movie, except that it will inspire
extreme emotions. You may want to gasp, or cry, or smack him silly for
dragging you along on his exercises in self-indulgence.
     In DANCER IN THE DARK, von Trier takes at least three huge risks, and
the two that pay off more than make up for the one that doesn't. His story
is set in Washington state in 1964, where a Czechoslovakian emigree named
Selma Jezkova (Bjork) is working as a machinist at a factory. A single
mother raising her 12-year-old son Gene (Vladica Kostic), Selma devotes
virtually all her time and energy to making money for a very important
purpose. Gene needs an operation for a hereditary eye disorder -- the same
one that is causing Selma to go blind. Only musicals can temporarily
distract Selma from her mission -- watching one in a movie theater,
performing in one in a local theatrical production, or imagining that the
world around her is turning into one when life gets particularly grim. And
it gets plenty grim when a conflict with her troubled landlord (David
Morse) threatens Selma's money and her life.
     The grimness of Selma's life is rendered in von Trier's favored
washed-out morph of film and digital video -- Big Risk #1 -- but it's a
tactical blunder for this particular script. DANCER IN THE DARK is
fashioned as a melodrama, with developments that pit our morally pure
heroine against dastardly forces. On glossy celluloid, such an
old-fashioned narrative approach might have worked. The hand-held,
documentary-style of DANCER IN THE DARK, however, demands a level of depth
in the characters' motivations and relationships that isn't always there. 
Von Trier spends too much time on Selma's interaction with an unrequitedly
infatuated admirer (Peter Stormare) while never bothering to explore his
interest in her. That's time that could have been much better spent on the
underdeveloped relationship between Selma and Gene, which should be
central to the film. What are we to make of her obsession with his future
needs while apparently ignoring his present, including truancy? It would
have been possible to turn Selma's conflicted motivations into a
compelling plot point. When a character is left to ask Selma, "Why did you
have Gene?" you realize that von Trier has turned the son into an
abstraction, and let the mother off too easy.
     Such a gaping hole at the center should have killed DANCER IN THE
DARK where it stood. Instead, it's still often dizzying, chilling and more
engrossing than virtually any other film this year. Big Risk #2 was the
casting of Bjork as Selma, and it's hard to do justice to how
extraordinary her performance is. While her less-than-authentic Czech
accent occasionally distracts, she hits every emotional note with such
resonance that it's painful to watch her. And as painful as it is to
watch, it's equally impossible not to watch when Big Risk #3 -- the
musical production numbers -- kicks in. They're rendered as
brightly-colored interpretations of Selma's interior life, inspired by the
natural rhythms of a train's wheels, machinery and a record's run-out
groove. Undoubtedly some viewers will find it impossible to get past the
contrivance, or past Bjork's distinctive yodeling vocals. Others will be
transfixed by the image of a killer fantasizing the forgiveness of the
victim, or the most abruptly concluded musical number in film history.
     Many critics have already noted that DANCER IN THE DARK bears more
than a passing resemblance to von Trier's 1996 film BREAKING THE WAVES in
its focus on the trials of a beatific female martyr. Indeed, Selma's
sacrifice is not set up nearly so convincingly as that of Emily Watson's
Bess, which can only make DANCER seem to suffer by comparison. That
doesn't diminish what von Trier is able to accomplish this time around
with another spectacular performance and more giddy disregard for
expectations and conventions. DANCER IN THE DARK is a deeply flawed
narrative that  becomes a long sit during its third act; it's also studded
with several moments of jaw-dropping brilliance. It's the work of a
director who'll do anything to inspire a reaction. In a world of overly
sanitized cinema, it's hard to dismiss that kind of raw nerve.

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
ERIN BROCKOVICH
(Universal/Columbia)
Starring:  Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Marg Helgenberger,
Conchata Ferrell, Peter Coyote.
Screenplay:  Susannah Grant.
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg and Stacey Sher.
Director:  Steven Soderbergh.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  133 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Steven Soderbergh has fashioned one of those careers that movie
people always claim they want. He gets to make unconventional,
experimental films like KAFKA, SCHIZOPOLIS and THE LIMEY, while still
making a few bucks doing "mainstream" films like KING OF THE HILL and OUT
OF SIGHT. Yet "mainstream" truly belongs in quotes where Soderbergh is
concerned, since his approach to timeworn genres is as unconventional and
his conventionally unconventional work. Despite his popularity with the
art house set, he has found it difficult to cross over to a broader
audience, since he keeps baffling that audience by taking amiable
entertainments and putting meat on their bones. You might think you know
what to expect from a coming-of-age story or a crime caper, but did you
really expect what Soderbergh delivered in KING OF THE HILL and OUT OF
SIGHT?
     ERIN BROCKOVICH is another film -- a legal crowd-pleaser with a
tart-tongued heroine -- that looks like you should know what to expect. 
Leave it to Soderbergh to make even that kind of you-go-girl Hollywood
premise uniquely appealing. Julia Roberts stars as the real-life title
character, a twice-divorced single mother of three desperate for a job,
any job. She finds one at a small law firm headed by Ed Masry (Albert
Finney), where she bulldogs her way into a position doing filing. But Erin
stumbles onto something big when she investigates a real estate deal
pending in the California desert. It seems that families in the town of
Hinkley have been experiencing health problems at an unusual rate, and
that the local power company may be trying to hide its responsibility for
those problems.
     In most films of this kind, you would expect a combination of sassy
one-liners and courtroom theatrics. You do get some of the former --
courtesy a solid Susannah Grant script that gives Roberts plenty of
no-nonsense dialogue to bite into -- but there's a way Roberts plays a
line that keeps the film from degenerating into mundanely rabble-rousing
chick flickery. Roberts has her detractors, particularly when it comes to
her dramatic performances, yet ERIN BROCKOVICH finds her effectively
taming the glamour girl looks into a convincing character. Even when she's
snapping off one of Erin's saltier tirades against the lack of recognition
she's getting, Roberts never seems to be waiting for a laugh. She does one
of the hardest things anyone can do with a character like this: She
refuses to play Erin with a wink to the audience so we all know it's Julia
Roberts beneath the bitter exterior. She has the guts to play Erin with an
equally bitter interior.
     You also have to give Soderbergh his share of the credit for knowing
how Erin needed to be played, but it's no surprise to find him in control
of his material. In keeping with the less-than-sexy title of the film,
Soderbergh makes sure the case never overwhelms the character. While the
lawsuit against Pacific Gas & Electric makes for compelling drama, it's
not as compelling as Erin navigating the path towards self-respect. The
story features elements familiar from a hundred legal investigation dramas
in the Grisham era -- the nasty corporate monolith, gutsy underdogs,
saintly victims, etc. -- but ERIN BROCKOVICH always seems to find an
unexpected angle just when it's most necessary. When a PG&E attorney shows
up to throw some weight around, it's a youngster who squeaks out his
scripted threat in a barely-changed voice; when it's time to announce the
verdict, there's not a judge to be seen.
     ERIN BROCKOVICH does take its conventional turns, and -- not
coincidentally -- that's usually when it starts to meander. Erin's romance
with a soft-hearted biker named George (Aaron Eckhart) leads to a trite
"you care about your job more than your family" confrontation (think Sissy
Spacek's whine in JFK with a little gender role reversal), and there's one
moment of precocious sensitivity by Erin's son Matthew (Scotty 
Leavenworth)  that almost makes you want to shudder. Erin's relationship
with Masry (wonderfully played by Finney in one of his best performances
in 20 years) generates much more kick than any of her at-home
relationships, which leads to some sag during the domestic interludes. 
Still, Soderbergh and Roberts bring too much crackling originality to ERIN
BROCKOVICH for its study of character through hard work to suffer too
much. I'm not sure Steven Soderbergh's ERIN BROCKOVICH will set audiences
to applauding as they leave the theater. That would happen in another
director's version, one where the predictable doesn't have a way of
turning into the unpredictable.

Title
Review for Dazed and Confused (1993)
Starring:  Jason London, Wiley Wiggins, Rory Cochrane, Adam
Goldberg, Anthony Rapp.
Screenplay/Director:  Richard Linklater.
     I have this sneaking suspicion that the extent to which viewers
can appreciate DAZED AND CONFUSED may be limited by how readily they
recognize it as a perfect capsule of mid-70s youth culture.  It's a
clever and completely un-self-conscious portrait of pot-smoking,
beer-drinking teenagers revelling in the awareness that right now,
nothing else really matters.  As frequently as people tend to toss out
comparisons between films, I think I can safely say that what AMERICAN
GRAFFITI was to 1962, DAZED AND CONFUSED is to 1976.
     Like AMERICAN GRAFFITI, DAZED AND CONFUSED takes place entirely in
one 24-hour period, the last day of school of 1976, and follows several
students episodically.  Randy "Pink" Floyd (Jason London), the starting
quarterback, is struggling with whether or not to sign the anti-drug
pledge required by his coach.  Mitch (Wiley Wiggins) is an incoming
freshman trying to escape the traditional hazing inflicted by sadistic
seniors like O'Bannon (Ben Affleck).  Mike (Adam Goldberg), Tony
(Anthony Rapp) and Cynthia (Marissa Ribisi) are nerdy school
newspaper-types philosophizing about the pointlessness of their lives.
And Slater (Rory Cochrane) is simply on an endless search for good
weed.  Their one collective goal for the evening:  to find a good
party.
     Writer/director Richard Linklater's first feature was SLACKER, a
quirky but gimmicky look at apathetic twenty-somethings that established
his talent for creating unique and amusing characters.  In DAZED AND
CONFUSED, he takes a look at the proto-SLACKER, with delightful
results.  While many of the characters are recognizable high school
types, what I found original was that these were types I actually
recognized from high school, not from *movies* about high school.  Cool
but basically decent Randy interacts convincingly with both his jock
buddies and the inexperienced Mitch.  O'Bannon is the classic high
school jerk, arbitrarily feigning a punch at someone walking by him in
the hall.  Tony is the nice guy/geek who timidly tries to impress a
cute freshman (the appealing Christina Hinojosa).  My personal favorite
was Wooderson (Matthew McConnagher), a slimy college-ager who hangs
around with high schoolers to remain king of the hill and to pick up
high school girls.  Linklater gives them sparkling dialogue, daring to
let his characters talk like teenagers actually talk.  The one major
character failing in DAZED is the absence of any equally interesting
female characters; many could be interchangeable.  This is a male
coming-of-age film first and foremost, but it could have been more
inclusive.
     As a film without a real plot, DAZED depends on set pieces and
atmosphere.  The success of the former is hit and miss.  There's a fun
chase as several junior high schoolers run for their lives from the
hazing-happy seniors-to-be.  The hazing of the junior high girls is
lively, as is a wacky monologue by the stoned Slater about George and
Martha Washington's fondness for marijuana.  However, there's a fair
amount of dead space, and it's left to the cast of unknowns to fill
it.  They are generally personable enough to do so, particularly
Wiggins and Cochrane, but not always.
     As for atmosphere, it's dead on.  DAZED captures 1976 brilliantly,
from the bell bottoms and feathered hair to the soundtrack of early
hard rock classics to a pair of statues painted to look like members of
KISS.  The drug and alcohol use is matter-of-fact, free of
anachronistic moralizing.  The production design had to be perfect, and
it is.  Anyone who can't quite recall a time when sex was safe and far
fewer kids "just said no" should take a look just for the sake of
historical accuracy.
     It's impossible for me to determine whether those not in my age
bracket will be as enamored of DAZED AND CONFUSED as I was.  It's a
slight, loopy little film with no pretensions, and it was a page right
out of my own youth.  I don't know ... maybe you had to be there.

Title
Review for In weiter Ferne, so nah! (1993)
Starring:  Otto Sander, Horst Buccholz, Nastassja Kinski, Bruno
Ganz, Willem Dafoe, Peter Falk.
Screenplay:  Wim Wenders, Ulrich Zieger & Richard Reitiger.
Director:  Wim Wenders.
     Wim Wenders' WINGS OF DESIRE was one of my favorite films of
1988.  As corny as it might sound, I found it to be one of those rare
transcendental film experiences, a beautiful and poetic tale of love
and human wonder that left me feeling uplifted.  I was unsure of how to
approach the idea that Wenders was making a sequel to this singular
film, but I crossed my fingers and hoped for the best.  Unfortunately,
all the good will in the world was unable to salvage FARAWAY, SO
CLOSE!  Wenders seems to have been unclear as to what made WINGS OF
DESIRE special, weighing down a simple story with self-importance and a
ridiculously convoluted plot.
     FARAWAY, SO CLOSE! returns Otto Sander to the role of Cassiel, one
of many angels who drift through Berlin observing and listening in on
thoughts.  He is curious about the human experience, but reluctant to
take the plunge risked by his former companion Damiel (Bruno Ganz).
The decision is made for him when he becomes human to save the life of
a young girl.  Cassiel resolves to use his physical form to intervene
for good where he was unable to do so before, but that resolution
proves easier said than done.  He falls into despair and loneliness,
eventually coming to work for a suave black marketeer (Horst
Buchholz).  Cassiel struggles to redeem himself, all the while thwarted
by a mysterious figure named Emit Flesti (Willem Dafoe).
     Like WINGS OF DESIRE, FARAWAY, SO CLOSE! shows us the angels'
world in black and white, and opens with loosely connected scenes of
the angels smiling knowingly over human shoulders as they work and
worry.  But unless my memory fails me, those scenes go on far longer in
FARAWAY, and they become extremely tedious.  They include a cameo by
Mikhail Gorbachev, thinking important thoughts about world peace, and a
scene involving a dying man and an angel played by Nastassja Kinski
where the overlapping dialogue created a nightmare for the subtitler.
This prologue seemed to go on and on, and while it did provide
information necessary later in the story, it could have been done much
more efficiently.  There are too many characters, many of whom are
completely irrelevant to the story.
     The film's second act is by far its most effective.  The
reluctantly human Cassiel copes poorly with his new state, lacking the
love which motivated Damiel's transformation.  The marvelously
expressive Sander is great during these scenes, drifting into drunken
despondency with genuine pain.  Also intriguing is the relationship
between Cassiel and Tony Baker, the German-born/ American-raised
racketeer who takes him in.  Horst Buchholz has an oily charm as Baker,
and there's a lively cadence to his perpetual switching back and forth
between German and English.  Cassiel is most interesting when he's a
fallen angel, with Baker the little devil on his shoulder.
     Then, during the climax, it all falls apart again.  Willem Dafoe,
who as Emit Flesti ("time itself" backwards ... get it?) wanders
through the film making ominous but opaque statements like, "Time is
the absence of money," becomes thoroughly oppressive in the final half
hour.  FARAWAY, SO CLOSE! becomes a silly caper film involving stolen
arms and kidnapping.  Peter Falk, who was so good in WINGS OF DESIRE as
Damiel's guide to humanity, is simply comic relief here, although a
scene involving the distraction of two security guards is very funny.
WINGS OF DESIRE was whimsical, but never dopey, and FARAWAY has a real
problem finding its tone.
     Perhaps the most egregious sin in FARAWAY is a preachy epilogue
that seems only tangentially connected to the film we just spent two
and a half hours watching.  WINGS OF DESIRE was a kind of message film,
but the message was skillfully delivered; in the intervening five
years, Wenders seems to have had all the subtlety sucked out of him.
The moments that do work in FARAWAY, SO CLOSE! are mired in
overplotting, and there's never any flow to the story.  What's worse,
it has tainted my memories of WINGS OF DESIRE.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
     Sometimes the term "high concept" doesn't do a film justice.  Critics
are partly to blame, since we use the term perjoratively to refer to
studios' tendency to mix and match stars or previously successful film
plots to create easy-to-sell, easy-to-digest packages.  That certainly
doesn't describe THE TRUMAN SHOW, though the premise is about as high
concept as they come:  a 29-year-old man named Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey)
gradually becomes aware that his entire life has been the subject of a
carefully controlled, 24-hour-a-day documentary/soap opera called "The
Truman Show," the most popular program in television history.  No, there's
nothing easy to digest about THE TRUMAN SHOW, which is exactly what makes
it so brilliant.  Masterfully conceived and executed, as thought-provoking
as it is hilarious, THE TRUMAN SHOW is everything studio film-making
should be but almost never is.
     It would be easy enough to praise the film to the skies simply for
creating its world so seamlessly.  Truman's fictional home-town of
Seahaven is brilliantly created by production designer Dennis Gassner as a
Disneyland-clean approximation of a small Florida community.  Unique
visual perspectives capture the way thousands of cameras pry into every
moment of Truman's life, from inside his car radio to behind his bathroom 
mirror. The film scores may of its best comic hits with running gags
about product placements in the commercial-free show -- Truman's
alarmingly cheery wife Meryl (Laura Linney) bringing home a new kitchen
tool; his best friend Marlon (Noah Emmerich) showing up with a six-pack of
beer any time there's trouble; two men who consistently position Truman
in front of an advertising poster on the street every time they meet.  For
nearly 45 minutes director Peter Weir permits only isolated intrusions
from the "real world" reacions of viewers, wrapping the viewer in the
inescapable "reality" in which Truman lives.
     The emotional content behind that premise makes THE TRUMAN SHOW far
more than a clever exercise in style.  Jim Carrey's performance as Truman
is deceptively complex, because he's playing a character who often behaves
with the forced good nature of a sit-come character.  Behind that facade,
however, is a man with inner life repeatedly thwarted by the "plot" of
"The Truman Show."  His childhood dreams of exploring are re-programmed
with childhood trauma so he'll never want to leave his sound stage
community; his one true love (Natscha McElhone), the extra who tries to
tell him the truth about his life, is yanked away from him, leaving him to
reconstruct her from magazine photos.  Truman is like a child under the
thumb of a domineering parent, which adds depth to the character of
Christof (Ed Harris), the show's creator and director.  In small moments
we see Christof behaving with the concern and tenderness of a father, but
it's a twisted and controlling love.  Though he sincerely believes he has
created a better world for Truman, he can't overcome the determination of
his "son" to create his own destiny.
     Before it begins to appear that THE TRUMAN SHOW is a touch-feely
triumph of the spirit story complete with swelling strings, I should note
that Weir and writer Andrew Niccol (GATTACA) come at the material from a
subversive and satirical angle.  As much as it is about Truman himself,
THE TRUMAN SHOW is also about the phenomenon of television viewership, and
more specifically about the phenomenon of blaming the media for giving
the people what they want.  The irony in the film's conclusion, as Truman
tries to escape from his staged life, comes from the same viewers who
happily watched his confinement cheering for his freedom, seemingly
oblivious to the role they played in his plight.  THE TRUMAN SHOW
recognizes that we are a nation of voyeurs who jeer programmers for
pandering to our voyeuristic nature.  The film's most memorable moment may
be its final scene, where a heroic finale is twisted with a knowing nod to
the fact that there will always be an audience for the next "Truman Show."
If this is the stuff of high concept, then it's the kind which finally
puts the emphasis on the "high."

Title
Review for Hoop Dreams (1994)
Featuring:  William Gates, Arthur Agee.
A documentary by Steve James, Peter Gilbert and Fred Marx.
     It's pretty rare when a documentary gets a theatrical release.
It's even more rare, about as frequent as Sonny and Cher reunions, when
documentaries end up playing in multiplexes.  But sure enough, I
checked my local theater listings to discover that HOOP DREAMS was
playing not at one of the local "art houses," but at the sixteen screen
multiplex.  If it means that more people will see this exceptional
film, I'm all for it.  HOOP DREAMS is not just a film about basketball;
it is about as insightful a film about the American inner city
experience as you will find, with more drama than a dozen fiction
films.
     HOOP DREAMS opens in 1987, introducing us to two 14-year-old
basketball prospects from the schoolyards of Chicago, William Gates and
Arthur Agee.  Both are being recruited to play for St. Joseph's, a
private Catholic prep school far from their homes in the inner city, by
coach Gene Pingatore, and both decide to attend.  William, the more
talented of the two, plays immediately for the varsity, while Arthur
struggles on the freshman team.  When a tuition increase the next year
threatens both boys' ability to attend St.  Joseph's, William receives
a scholarship from a school booster, while Arthur is forced to leave
St. Joseph's and enroll in a public school.  The film then follows
William and Arthur through their senior years, examining their fortunes
on and off the court as they pursue their dream of making it to the
NBA.
     Part of the tremendous appeal of HOOP DREAMS comes from the
fascinating cast of characters to which we are introduced.  There is
Coach Pingatore, an intense disciplinarian who reduces his players to
cogs in a machine with his comment that "another one walks out the
door, another one walks in the door; that's what it's all about." There
is William's older brother Curtis, himself a former high school
basketball star who didn't make it, and who has transferred all his
dreams to William.  And there is Bo Agee, Arthur's troubled father, who
battles a drug addiction and his tendency towards violence.  Along with
William and Arthur, we follow these individuals for nearly five years,
and develop an intense interest in their lives.
     But for all its impressive scope, HOOP DREAMS would not have
worked had it only been about kids playing basketball.  In a broader
sense, HOOP DREAMS is really about a world in which young black males
believe that their only chance to get out is to succeed in athletics.
A key figure in this theme appears only briefly in person:  Isiah
Thomas, a former star at St. Joseph's who has gone on to NBA stardom.
Thomas is omnipresent, in his retired high school jersey, in press
clippings, in the comparisons made between him and William Gates.  He
becomes the idol for these two boys, but the result of their obsession
with basketball is academic troubles for both.  It is the same
obsession behind Curtis' intense desire to see William succeed as a
proxy for him, and similarly for Bo's desire to see Arthur succeed.  In
one telling scene, William tries to tell his girlfriend that his only
chance to go to college is basketball; she responds that she is going
to college herself, without any help from basketball, and raising a
daughter.  But the boys don't seem convinced that academics can be a
way out, and so they find themselves part of a money game played by
college and high school coaches alike.
     HOOP DREAMS is thought-provoking, but it is also entertaining.
There are several tense game sequences, and a run towards a possible
state championship by one of the boys in his senior year; there is the
drama of watching William attempt to recover from a potentially
career-threatening knee injury.  In one extremely satisfying scene late
in the film, a graduating William tells Coach Pingatore that he wants
to study communication "so that when someone asks me for money, I'll
know the right way to tell them no."  And there are wrenching moments
like Arthur's mother decorating his 18th birthday cake while explaining
that it's reason to celebrate because "he made it to 18, and he's
alive."
     The Academy Awards have been notorious for overlooking
documentaries which garner tremendous public acclaim.  Overlooking HOOP
DREAMS would be criminal.  It is not simply a great documentary; it is
one of the best films of any kind you will see this year.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
THE SIXTH SENSE
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams.
Screenplay:  M. Night Shyamalan.
Producers:  Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy and Barry Mendel.
Director:  M. Night Shyamalan.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
[Warning: The very nature of this review may involve plot spoilers for
viewers who have not yet seen the film.]
     Of all the benefits I have received from being a film critic, I may
value innocence the most.  It may seem an odd choice of words in a
profession more often associated with cynicism, but it applies
nonetheless.  While the onslaught of studio publicity is impossible to
avoid completely, the ability to attend press screenings serves as
something of a buffer against expectations.  It was impossible for me to
react to the BLAIR WITCH hype since I had written my review six months
before its release; I never needed to guard against becoming aware of key
CRYING GAME-esque plot points.  It was possible for my viewing experience
to remain relative untainted, subject only to pre-conceived notions for
which I could have no one but myself to blame.
     It took the release of THE SIXTH SENSE for me to realize how much
that innocence can matter.  After missing the press screening due to
scheduling conflicts, I became aware that this story -- Malcolm Crowe
(Bruce Willis), a troubled child psychologist, tries to help even more
troubled 9-year-old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) with the child's ability 
to see dead people -- contained a "twist" or "surprise" ending.  Reviews
and discussions meticulously avoided revealing the specific nature of the
ending, but by then the damage had been done.  I considered everything I
knew about the film, and made an educated guess regarding what would be
revealed in its closing moments.  Then I finally caught up with the film,
and watched with my "can I out-guess the writer" glasses on.
     Within twenty minutes, it was obvious that I had guessed correctly.
     I'm not going to suggest that it was particularly clever of me to
figure it out.  I will suggest that I probably wouldn't have been testing
my cleverness if I hadn't known there was something to be figured out.
The simple knowledge that there was a plot point to be sussed out set me
to sussing.  And I spent as much of the film nodding to myself at the
clues I recognized as I did trying to get caught up in the story.
     The nature of the film made such behavior both a blessing and a
curse.  Writer/director M. Night Shyamalan's pacing is so agonizingly
deliberate that I was delighted to have something else on which to train
my attention.  Conversely, I was able to give Bruce Willis's monotonous
performance a bit more benefit of the doubt, and admire the craft which
allowed Shyamalan's little trick to seem plausible.  The only constant to
draw me from my reverie was Osment, a sublimely effective child actor
whose performance alone is enough to recommend THE SIXTH SENSE.  Children
in jeopardy are usually a narrative cheat, but Osment's reactions to his
situation are always more compelling than Shyamalan's few moments of
thriller gimmickry.  The irony is that my connection with Cole's plight
was consistently undercut by my awareness that the film's payoff would
focus on someone else.  
     Perhaps my long-standing aversion to physician-heal-thyself
psychologist/psychiatrist characters (coincidentally sparked by another
Willis film, the ghastly COLOR OF NIGHT) turned me off to Malcolm as an
equal player in the story.  Perhaps the supernaturally comforting closing
shot reminded me too much of GHOST.  Perhaps the big emotional moment for
Toni Collette (as Cole's mother) felt like a cheat because her character
hadn't been developed at all.  Or perhaps I never bought the entire arc of
Malcolm's story from the outset.  It's hard for me to know whether it was
the film itself or my constant view of its wires which left me
unimpressed.  
     The success of THE SIXTH SENSE suggests that it has struck an
emotional chord in many viewers.  For me, the only chords it could strike
were technical.  There was a not-particularly-inspired gag often used by
TITANIC detractors during its theatrical run, something along the lines of
"what's the point, you know the boat's going to sink."  Most of the time,
it's even true.  Next time, I hope I don't go into a film knowing whether
or not the boat is going to sink.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
ANALYZE THIS
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Joe Viterelli, Lisa Kudrow, Chazz
Palminteri.
Screenplay:  Peter Tolan and Harold Ramis and Kenneth Lonergan.
Producers:  Paula Weinstein and Jane Rosenthal.
Director:  Harold Ramis.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  106 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The very concept behind "high concept" comedy is that the premise
sells itself.  A potential viewer can see one poster or one 30-second
commercial and understand instantly all the wacky comic possibilities:
Schwarzenegger and DeVito as twins, Eddie Murphy as the nutty professor,
Robin Williams as an iconoclastic medical student.  The work is half done,
it seems, as soon as the stars sign a contract.  The reason so many "high
concept" films are so mediocre is that no one bothers to do the other half
of the work, leaving a situation comedy that's entirely situation.
     There was reason to hope for a bit more from ANALYZE THIS, since
director Harold Ramis also directed and co-wrote the decade's best high
concept comedy, GROUNDHOG DAY.  Ramis' set-up this time around involves a
New York mob boss named Paul Vitti (Robert DeNiro) who is having some
unfamiliar experiences:  shortness of breath, crying jags, difficulty --
ahem -- performing.  In short, Vitti's got stress.  To help with the
problem, he visits psychiatrist Ben Sobol (Billy Crystal), and instantly
becomes convinced that the doctor is a genius.  Suddenly the mild-mannered
doctor is expected to be at Vitti's service 24 hours a day, a severe
inconvenience as Ben prepares to get married to his fiancee (Lisa Kudrow).
     As a pitch, it probably sounded hilarious; with DeNiro and Crystal in
the lead roles, it probably seemed like a can't-miss mismatched tandem.
Instead, ANALYZE THIS is primarily a series of botched opportunities.  The
most glaring gaffe is the casting of Crystal as Sobol, though at first
glance he might appear to be ideal for the uptight therapist.  Early in
the film we learn that Ben is professionally dissatisfied, sick of his
whining patients and left in the shadow of his best-selling pop therapist
father (Bill Macy).  Not only does this bit of character background prove
utterly pointless in the long run, it emphasizes that Ben could have been
an interesting charcter if played by an actual actor.  Crystal simply
can't avoid turning his every scene into shtick, making a classic deadpan
straight-man part -- something perfect for, say, DeNiro's MIDNIGHT RUN
partner Charles Grodin -- into something silly and clownish.
     And the parade of bad decisions only begins there.  The remarkably
talented Lisa Kudrow, though given third billing, is wasted in what
amounts to the "girlfriend part" for a handful of scenes; the rival
gangster played by Chazz Palminteri, which should have provided a nice
counterpoint to the frazzled Vitti, barely registers as a character.
Perhaps most distracting is a constantly shifting tone that makes ANALYZE
THIS a candidate for its own multiple-therapy session.  While scenes of
slapstick and comic misunderstanding are colliding with violent shootouts
and emotional breakdowns, there's never the feeling that Ramis is aiming
for an edgy, dark comedy -- it's just a high concept comedy into which
other elements keep intruding.  There's no narrative momentum to ANALYZE
THIS, no sense of character consequence to keep it from turning into a
repetitive series of sketch comedy scenes.
     There's at least one thing really right with ANALYZE THIS, and that's
DeNiro.  As many times as he's gone to the wiseguy well in his career --
MEAN STREETS, THE GODFATHER PART II, GOODFELLAS, THE UNTOUCHABLES, etc. --
he always seems to find a new twist to keep it fresh.  It's fun watching
him nod to his past when he comments on a GODFATHER-inspired dream Ben
has, it's fun watching him work with the amusing Joe Viterelli as Vitti's
main muscele man, and it's fun watching him show the comic chops he too
rarely has a chance to employ.  Unfortunately, he's wasting his
performance on a movie that doesn't know what to do with its actors, its
premise -- one-upped by the current HBO series "The Sopranos" -- or its
character development.  ANALYZE THIS is a smaller scale example of what
happens to so many summer blockbusters:  it's a ready-made marketing
campaign to which a film has been attached almost as an afterthought.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
     There are plenty of strange, ironic and otherwise inexplicable things
about Hollywood filmmaking in the 1990s, but among the more puzzling is
the way it treats "star power."  In the glory days of the studio system,
Hollywood packaged stars together in whatever material was available at
the time, always conscious of the fact that audiences would come out to
see certain actors do little more than model wardrobe.  The game has
changed today, but only in the marketing.  Plenty of films exist primarily
to be glossy star packages, but the studios treat that fact as a dirty
little secret.  In these post-modern, indie-hip cinematic times of ours,
it has become unfashionable to admit that sometimes we just like to see
attractive people doing attractive things.
     That's the only explanation for THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR, a star
package so overwhelmingly glossy you may need to shield your eyes from the
glare.  Pierce Brosnan (who, not coincidentally, also produced the film)
stars as the title character, an impossibly wealthy New York mergers and
acquisitions magnate with few worlds left to conquer.  Always on the
lookout for a new thrill, Crown decides to dabble in art theft, arranging
an elaborate decoy so he can snatch a seminal Impressionist masterpiece
from the Metropolitan Museum of Art.  Hot on his trail comes Catherine
Banning (Rene Russo), a sort of mercenary insurance investigator
determined to find the thief.  When she decides Crown is her man, she
begins a cat-and-mouse game in which the only question is who will seduce
whom first.
     THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR follows in the fine tradition of the original
1968 version, which itself existed largely as a star vehicle for Steve
McQueen and Faye Dunaway.  The scenery, from the nightspots of the
Manhattan jet set to the tropical islands to which that set jets, is
lovingly photographed.  Director John McTiernan steps back from DIE
HARD-style pacing to establish a moderate, almost jazzy tempo for the
too-cool characters and situations.  The stars, meanwhile, spend nearly
two hours looking fabulous.  Brosnan, who probably emerged from the womb
in a freshly pressed tuxedo, squints in a manly fashion; Russo, attempting
to do for women's underwear what Clark Gable did for T-shirts, does the
little black dress thing with slinky appeal.  They banter, they undress
each other with their eyes, they undress each other with their hands.
Teflon should only be this slick.
     Plenty of viewers will undoubtedly find themselves carried away by
this fantasia for beautiful people.  I might even have been among them if
THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR hadn't grown so angst-y and redundant.  Throughout
the film, we see snippets of Crown visiting a therapist (Dunaway, in the
obligatory cameo-from-the-original), working out his commitment and trust
issues.  It's an early signal that the film is going to play the "sure,
they're beautiful people, but they've got feelings too" card.  It's
entertaining enough to watch as Crown and Banning circle each other, each
one thinking he or she is the manipulator rather than the manipulatee.
Things get considerably more awkward as Banning waffles in her feelings
for Crown with every alternate scene.  Russo plays the final half hour
with such overwrought gravity that you'd think her decision whether or not
to turn Crown in made her Hamlet to his Polonius. 
     I find myself in an awkward position as I criticize THE THOMAS CROWN
AFFAIR, because ultimately I fault it for trying to work in some subtext.
Plenty of films could use a healthy injection of subtext, mind you -- or
the vaugest hint of a text, even -- but this film isn't one of them.  It
fairly screams out to be treated as a caper, with Crown and Banning 
spending their time trying to out-think each other rather than out-emote
each other.  THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR appears to be old-school melodrama, 
the tale of a woman who can't help falling for a guy she knows is bad for
her, and somehow hopes to convert through the intensity of her love.
There's just too much earnestness to the way they play it.  By trying to
play a 1940s story with 1990s emotional realism, the filmmakers miss the
fantasy we're looking for when we watch two movie stars together in a
movie that, ultimately, is about two movie stars together.

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
     ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION isn't just a film _about_ two
eras; it's a film trapped _between_ two eras.  First-time feature film
director David Mirkin is a veteran executive producer of TV's "The
Simpsons," and there are times when ROMY AND MICHELE aims for a similar
vein of absurdism and satire.  At other times, it is nearly as formulaic
and synthetic as the 1980s youth comedies spawned by the films of John
Hughes.  ROMY AND MICHELE is a film with plenty of enjoyable bits and
pieces, but it may actually hit its '80s nostalgia target a bit too well.
It's a light-hearted lark until it turns into THE BREAKFAST CLUB'S HIGH
SCHOOL REUNION.
     Our heroines are Romy White (Mira Sorvino) and Michele Weinberger
(Lisa Kudrow), two best friends living together in Los Angeles.  They are
happy with their lives of club-hopping and watching PRETTY WOMAN together,
despite the fact that neither one of them has a significant other and only
Romy has a job -- as a cashier.  As their ten year reunion for Tuscon's
Sagebrush High School approaches, however, Romy and Michele begin to worry
that these vital statistics might make them look like...well, losers.
Determined to attend the reunion and impress the "A" group who scorned
them in high school, Romy and Michele decide to change their images and
tell a success story which stretches the truth _just_ a bit.
Unfortunately, one classmate knows their real story:  Heather Mooney
(Janeane Garofolo), embittered one-time social nobody turned wealthy
inventor of the fast-burning cigarette.
     For a while, it seems that ROMY AND MICHELE is going for a CLUELESS
sort of ditzy-hip vibe, with Sorvino and Kudrow sporting garish fashions
by CLUELESS designer Mona May.  May's costumes may by the Most Valuable
Player in ROMY AND MICHELE, providing reliable laughs every time we see
the stars in a new pair of day-glo platform shoes or a new sausage-casing
dress.  Sorvino and Kudrow give satisfying performances, with Kudrow
straying little from her Phoebe characterization from "Friends," but
screenwriter Robin Schiff doesn't give them many good lines to work with.
With few exceptions, the big laughs Sorvino and Kudrow draw are ones they 
earn through sheer exuberance; even the fifth or sixth time Michele
responds to one of Romy's observations with a gasp of "Me too!" is funny
because Kudrow sells each one like the first time it has ever occurred to
her that she and Romy have a lot in common.
     The sluggish stretches in ROMY AND MICHELE come when Schiff and
Mirkin take long breaks either for exposition flashbacks or fantasy
sequences which aren't nearly as amusing as the scenes between the adult
Romy and Michele. Worse yet, the exposition serves primarily to set up the
morals to the story, and ROMY AND MICHELE spends far too much time serving
up more than the Recommended Daily Allowance of reminders to "be
yourself." The comedy becomes terribly predictable at this point, with the
last fifteen minutes of ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION turning
into a succession of cues for us cheer the revenge of the nerds and silly
moments of petty vengeance.  In a way, the later stages of the film serve
mostly as a depressing reminder of the main reasons people go to high
school reunions:  those who were unpopular but became successful get a
chance for a symbolic smack in the face to those who tormented them; those
who were popular get a chance to re-live memories of faded glory which may
have eluded them ever since.  
     ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION provides some solid belly
laughs, but its overly-sincere observations about the high school social
order rapidly become frustrating.  With its soundtrack full of mid 80s
early MTV "classics," ROMY AND MICHELE is clearly aimed at those who are
ready to do some reminiscing about their high school years, but instead of
laughing at the absurdity of it all, Mirkin and Schiff provide what they
must think is a necessary catharsis.  Romy and Michele are entertaining
characters, but they're in the wrong movie; their obliviousness is more
appealing than their self-awareness.  While Janeane Garofolo provides a
necessary dose of ironic distance, Sorvino and Kudrow are obliged to
immerse themselves in a very retro sort of crowd-pleaser.  Individual
moments are satisfying in ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION, but it
doesn't trust its comic creations to carry the film without Important
Messages.  With its reminders of how tough we _all_ had it, regardless of
our place on the teenage social ladder, all it really needs is the 
strident refrain of Simple Minds' "Don't You Forget About Me" to make the
cinematic flashback complete.

Title
Review for Little Women (1994)
Starring:  Winona Ryder, Gabriel Byrne, Trini Alvarado,
           Christian Bale, Kirsten Dunst, Claire Danes,
           Samantha Mathis, Susan Sarandon.
Screenplay:  Robin Swicord.
Director:  Gillian Armstrong.
     It would be a tremendous disservice to think of LITTLE WOMEN as a
picture post card with a plot.  Sure, it is lovingly photographed, rich
in atmosphere and steeped in period detail.  But does Louisa May
Alcott's saga of 19th century adolescence have anything to say in
1994?  Is it really *about* anything?  The answer is a resounding yes.
It's about family, love, and the struggle of young women to find their
voice.  As brought to life by a magnificent cast and directed with
restraint by Gillian Armstrong, LITTLE WOMEN is sweet, glorious and
relevant.
     Set in Civil War-era Massachusetts, LITTLE WOMEN is the story of
the March family:  aspiring writer Jo (Winona Ryder); social Meg (Trini
Alvarado); shy, frail Beth (Claire Danes); and romantic Amy (Kirsten
Dunst, later Samantha Mathis).  Living with their mother (Susan
Sarandon) while their father is off fighting the war, the Marches
struggle with matters financial and personal.  Jo befriends a wealthy
young man (Christian Bale), and Meg is courted by a teacher (Eric
Stoltz).  Eventually, Jo finds herself in New York to pursue her craft,
where she meets Friedrick Baehr (Gabriel Byrne), a German scholar who
sees potential in her that even she herself is unable to recognize.
     Director Armstrong, who addressed the subject of women struggling
in a man's world in MY BRILLIANT CAREER, has done a splendid job with
this latest version of the oft-filmed story.  She never attempts to
inject inappropriate action into the narrative, and keeps her actors
quiet and naturalistic.  She is also assisted by a wonderful technical
crew.  Cinematographer Geoffrey Simpson captures snow-covered
landscapes and glowing fall colors with grace, and production designer
Jan Roelfs fills the screen with lovely interiors.  The crowning touch
is Thomas Newman's beautiful score, which perfectly complements the
beautiful images Armstrong provides.
     The primary reason the screen glows, however, is a remarkable cast
which features the most talented young actresses in the business.  Jo
is the showcase role, and Winona Ryder gives her most complete
performance yet in taking it on; she is full of ambition, joy, and
self-doubt.  Physically, she's quite wrong for the part (it's hard to
believe anyone would consider Ryder's hair her "one beauty," even
without makeup), but she's so impressive emotionally that her looks can
be forgiven.  Trini Alvarado is an effervescent Meg, and Kirsten Dunst,
fresh from her triumph in INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE, is the perfect
image-conscious Amy.  Claire Danes, from TV's critically-praised by
largely unwatched "My So-Called Life," may be the best of the bunch.
Beth's role is small, but Danes injects phenomenal emotion into every
one of her scenes, and her large, sad eyes guarantee that many eyes in
the audience will be damp at certain moments.  As a group (and
including Susan Sarandon as the progressive matriarch), they are so
uniformly good that they seem to keep making each other better.
     What may be most impressive about this LITTLE WOMEN, adapted by
Robin Swicord, is how it seems as though it might have been written
yesterday.  There is no anachronism in Alcott's Transcendentalist
proto-feminism, though upon first glance it might appear so.  These
little women struggle with all the issues involved in becoming grown
women, from the mundane (Meg's concern about the dress she wears to a
society function) to the profound (coping with the difficulties of
love).  Most of all, they struggle to assert themselves as individuals
in a world which still questions their motives for wanting to be
individuals.  Jo is frustrated in her first attempts at publishing her
work because she is attempting to something and someone else; her
realization that her own experience is valid, and that she can touch
others through its expression, is a revelation.
     I saw LITTLE WOMEN in a theater where perhaps one third of the
audience consisted of girls under sixteen.  LITTLE WOMEN may be a story
to which they are most attuned, but it is a delight for anyone who
appreciates genuine emotion, insight, and beautiful filmmaking.

Title
Review for Summer House, The (1992) (TV)
Starring:  Jeanne Moreau, Lena Headey, Joan Plowright, Julie Walters,
           David Threlfall.
Screenplay:  Martin Sherman.
Director:  Waris Hussein.
     In retrospect, my responses to THE SUMMER HOUSE seem very
confusing.  I did laugh at this lightweight British comedy; in fact, I
laughed quite a lot.  At the same time, I found myself wondering why I
wasn't enjoying it more.  THE SUMMER HOUSE is full of quotable
one-liners, spirited performances and good intentions.  It also never
quite adds up to a satisfying film.  At just under 80 minutes, THE
SUMMER HOUSE leaves some characters sketched in only the broadest of
strokes, and burdens the humor with an unnecessarily dark and
cumbersome story structure.
     Based on the writings of Alice Thomas Ellis, THE SUMMER HOUSE
tells the story of Margaret (Lena Headey), a young Croydon woman whose
marriage to Syl Monro (David Threlfall) is rapidly approaching.  The
small problem in this scenario:  Margaret not only doesn't love Syl,
she doesn't even like him.  Coming off a tragic relationship abroad,
Margaret is cornered into the engagement by her well-meaning but
old-fashioned mother Monica (Julie Walters), and believes there's no
hope for backing out.  Enter Lili (Jeanne Moreau), an old friend of
Monica's visiting for the wedding.  The vibrant and uninhibited Lili
becomes Margaret's confidante, and together with Syl's mother (Joan
Plowright) resolves to see to it that the marriage never takes place.
     Nearly everything that works in THE SUMMER HOUSE is thanks to
Moreau and Plowright.  Yes, they are given good lines by screenwriter
Martin Sherman (the stage play BENT), but the real success is in the
interpretation.  Moreau is mischievous and full of energy, bordering on
over-the-top but just managing to keep the reins on Lili.  She is given
most of the sharpest dialogue, and she uses it to paint a picture of a
woman moving into her later years with a continued lust for life, but
one who never comes off as an arrested adolescent.  Plowright's Mrs.
Monro is generally more subdued, lamenting that "in some cultures, the
elderly throw themselves off ice floes when they're no longer of any
use; unfortunately, there are no ice floes in Croydon."  She's really
quite a lonely and unhappy woman before a drinking binge with Lili
allows her to rediscover a sense of fun, and a purpose in preventing
the disastrous marriage.  These two fine actresses are extremely
entertaining, and THE SUMMER HOUSE might be considered worth seeing
simply for their performances.
     The characters surrounding them aren't quite so worthy of
attention.  Although ostensibly the centerpiece of the story, Margaret
is really very poorly defined.  It's never entirely clear what part the
factors of her mother, her ill-fated Egyptian romance and her desire to
become a nun respectively play in her actions and decisions.  Lena
Headey is a fresh face, but for the most part that face is a frown, and
she never develops beyond her melancholy.  Even more caricatured is
Syl, a womanizing oaf nearing middle age while still living with his
mother.  David Threlfall, who resembles Monty Python's Eric Idle while
playing one of his unctuous game show host characters, really hasn't
got much to do but leer and be slightly off-putting, and his character
makes the situation much more ridiculous than it needs to be.  Even
Julie Walters, a very good actress, is wasted in the role of Margaret's
mother.  There was clearly a great deal of time spent giving these
characters funny things to say, but not nearly as much making them
real.
     Even more distracting than the absence of real characters is the
absence of a coherent plot.  THE SUMMER HOUSE is comprised largely of
snippets of witty conversation, funny in their own right but never
moving towards anything.  The details of Margaret's affair are revealed
in distracting flashbacks, and the entire issue of the marriage seems
sometimes to be in the way of the characters quipping.  There are also
some disturbing undercurrents--intimations of child abuse, an
unexplained violent death--which seem grossly out of place and entirely
unnecessary.  Ultimately, I can give THE SUMMER HOUSE a mild
recommendation because of the laughs it provides, but I was
disappointed by the unrealized potential for something a bit more
human.

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
WONDER BOYS
(Paramount)
Starring:  Michael Douglas, Tobey Maguire, Frances McDormand, Robert
Downey Jr., Katie Holmes.
Screenplay:  Steve Kloves, based on the novel by Michael Chabon.
Producers:  Scott Rudin and Curtis Hanson.
Director:  Curtis Hanson.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Wildly flawed though it may be, WONDER BOYS has one thing going for
it you just can't take away: a dead dog. Call me a sick puppy if you must
-- in a cinematic environment where you can litter a landscape with human
corpses but God forbid the plucky pooch doesn't make it to the final reel
intact, it's refreshing to find a film with the nerve to off Fido. You
learn something about a film-maker's willingness to take you somewhere
different via these small touches, and they're the kind of small touches
WONDER BOYS sends spilling all over the screen. An inexperienced police
officer leaves his squad car in neutral and watches it begin rolling down
the street. A dead ringer for James Brown chases our protagonist's car,
jumping butt-first onto the hood. A pregnant waitress named Oola wears a
jacket worn by Marilyn Monroe on the day of her wedding to Joe DiMaggio. 
And so on.
     If there had been something more cohesive at the center of WONDER
BOYS, it could have been one of those minor classics of tics and quirks
like THE FRESHMAN. Instead, it's a rambling, shambling, often endearing
mess of a movie about a Pittsburgh English professor named Grady Tripp
(Michael Douglas). The author of a much-praised novel, Tripp has spent
seven years working on the epic follow-up, going through nearly as many
wives as reams of paper in the process. As the university begins its
annual literary conference, Tripp contends with plenty of troubles. His
latest wife has just left him, his long-time lover and university
chancellor Sara (Frances McDormand) is pregnant with his child and his
agent Terry Crabtree (Robert Downey Jr.) is pressuring him for the novel. 
On top of it all, Tripp has to play chaperone to James Leer (Tobey
Maguire), Tripp's most gifted writing student but also his most messed-up.
     The aforementioned oddball touches probably give you a good sense for
WONDER BOYS' unconventional tone, but the film's unconventionality
actually goes a bit beyond that. Director Curtis Hanson (L.A. 
CONFIDENTIAL) and screenwriter Steve Kloves (AWOL from the big screen
since FLESH AND BONE in 1993) give the story a pacing that can best be
described as unhurried. It's almost as though the filmmakers treat 
everything as though it's seen through the eyes of Tripp, whose fondness
for the ganja cannot be overstated. Douglas, who has never been shy about
taking on characters with an unpleasant side, gives a good-natured
performance as a guy who becomes ever-more-dilapidated over the course of
the film. It's an odd sort of comedy that's based on watching a man fall
apart while he slowly figures out he needs to pull himself together.
     All those moments in such a leisurely, unpretentious package should
have added up to first-class fun, but somehow WONDER BOYS never quite gets
there. More to the point, it doesn't leave you with the impression that
first-class fun was the object in the first place. The story keeps
flitting back to Tripp's indecision regarding whether to attempt a
reconciliation with his wife or commit to Sara, eventually reaching a
resolution that involves Tripp's final choice. Suddenly you're left with
the sensation that WONDER BOYS was really about a 50-year-old adolescent
just learning how to grow up, which leaves you wondering why development
of Tripp's character was so haphazzard. It's one thing to enjoy a casual
story about the exploits of a casual character. It's a bit more
frustrating when you realize something serious was supposed to come out of
it.
     It's particularly frustrating when nothing about the first 90 minutes
of the film suggests any of the characters were meant to be taken
seriously. That's not to say it's not enjoyable to spend time with them;
Downey, McDormand and Maguire all craft convincing characters. There's
just not enough weight to WONDER BOYS for it to support a moral to the
story. The relationship between Tripp and Leer is resolved to abruptly,
the relationship between Tripp and his affectionate student tenant (Katie
Holmes) isn't developed at all and the Tripp/Sara connection always feels
too nebulous for its ultimate resolution to matter. It's possible to spend
most of WONDER BOYS grinning at its nonchalance, its goofiness and its
small pleasures. Once you reach the end, you may be wishing that a film
with the nerve to kill the dog also had the nerve to resist the tidy
happily-ever-after of the man who learns What Really Matters.

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
Starring:  Denzel Washington, Meg Ryan, Lou Diamond Phillips, Michael
Moriarty, Matt Damon, Scott Glenn.
Screenplay:  Patrick Sheane Duncan.
Director:  Edward Zwick.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Akira Kurosawa's classic film RASHOMON may be the definitive
cinematic text for film critics, because no film may work better at
keeping us honest.  The story of an assault seen through the eyes of four
different individuals is about the subjectivity of reality, how perception
creates "truth," and every time I think about RASHOMON it makes me
structure my arguments with care, and with an eye to my own subjectivity.
I was thinking about RASHOMON quite a bit as I watched COURAGE UNDER FIRE,
and not just because it is about conflicting accounts of a single event.
Throughout the film, I found my perspective shifting, my opinion rising
and falling to the point where I realized that I was responding to COURAGE
UNDER FIRE in pieces, and not as a whole.
     That response was at least in part the result of the kind of film
COURAGE UNDER FIRE is, the kind of ambitious, sprawling drama which
director Edward Zwick (GLORY, LEGENDS OF THE FALL) has favored since his
television days as co-creator of "thirtysomething."  It is the story of
Lt. Col. Nat Serling (Denzel Washington), a tank commander in the Gulf War
who, in the middle of a confusing night battle, gives an order to fire
which results in the destruction of a friendly tank, and the death of a
close friend.  Serling is re-assigned to the Pentagon, where he is given
the task of investigating a posthumous candidate for the Medal of Honor --
Capt. Karen Walden (Meg Ryan), the first woman ever nominated for the
award.  The story is that helicopter pilot Walden led a rescue mission
which saved several lives, but that story is an inconsistent one.
Serling's interviews with Walden's crew lead to more questions than
answers in a quest for an evasive truth.
     Reaction #1:  Edward Zwick is turning into a marvelous director of
battle scenes.  In GLORY, LEGENDS, and now in COURAGE UNDER FIRE, he
captures the feel of war with a chaotic poetry, vistas of destruction
which are nevertheless spectacular to behold.  Perhaps more impressive,
Zwick has accomplished something that the news was never able to
accomplish, namely to drive home the fact that the Gulf War was not a
video game or a casual police activity like rousting a wino off a park
bench with a baton.  It was a war, and COURAGE UNDER FIRE does justice to
the sacrifices of its participants.
     Reaction #2:  Patrick Sheane Duncan over-loaded his screenplay.  For
a very long time, it is not clear what COURAGE UNDER FIRE is really about.
Is it a war-time tale of the terrors of the trenches?  Is it a domestic
drama focusing on Serling's profound guilt over his actions in the Gulf
and his inability to re-connect with his family?  Is it an attack on the
inability of the military, and by extension the nation, to own up to its
mistakes?  Is it a sort of mystery, where the real story of Walden's
actions will provide the payoff?  It takes forever for Duncan to clarify
what all of these stories have to do with one another, but by then they
don't provide the layers of emotional resonance he was aiming for; mainly,
they provide confusion.  There are too many conflicts in COURAGE UNDER
FIRE, blunting the impact of the one which should have stirred the
audience.
     Reaction #3:  Meg Ryan really does have some dramatic chops.  In
previous serious efforts like WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN and RESTORATION, I
found it difficult to buy Ryan in a role which strayed from her quirky
comic ingenues.  COURAGE UNDER FIRE is an even greater challenge, because
she isn't playing only one Karen Walden; she is playing Karen Walden as
she is described in each individual soldier's story.  She appears only in
flashback, and her character develops only as Serling learns more about
her, but she is nevertheless a powerful presence in the film.
     Reaction #4:  Denzel Washington has his limits.  Washington is a
tremendous actor, and he does some excellent work in COURAGE UNDER FIRE,
but there are moments when the intelligence and confidence he almost
always projects just don't seem appropriate.  Serling has moments of real
despair and confusion, and Washington doesn't always bring those qualities
across.
     Reaction #5:  COURAGE UNDER FIRE comes through with an emotional
conclusion, and features some great supporting performances (particularly
Matt Damon as the medic in Walden's crew).  It is the kind of film which
satisfies even as it leaves you suspecting that the scope should have been
narrowed.  COURAGE UNDER FIRE is a film which looks better from the back
than the front, and a bit thick around the middle -- it's a different
experience from different angles. 

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
CRADLE WILL ROCK 
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Hank Azaria, Emily Watson, John Turturro, Angus Macfayden, Bill
Murray, Joan Cusack, Cherry Jones, Cary Elwes, John Cusack, Vanessa
Redgrave, Philip Baker Hall, Ruben Blades, Susan Sarandon, Jamey Sheridan.
Screenplay:  Tim Robbins.
Producers:  Jon Kilik, Lydia Dean Pilcher and Tim Robbins.
Director:  Tim Robbins.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  132 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     CRADLE WILL ROCK is a tapestry of American social activism in the
1930s ... and a fairly tattered one, at that. Beginning in the fall of
1936, Tim Robbins' fact-based drama introduces us to the Federal Theatre
Project, a W.P.A. sub-division dedicated to employing America's artists
for the low-cost entertainment of America's Depression-era masses. Among
the works funded by the project is "The Cradle Will Rock," a pro-union
musical written by Marc Blitzstein (Hank Azaria) and staged by the
ever-feuding tandem of producer John Houseman (Cary Elwes) and director
Orson Welles (Angus Macfayden). According to Congressman Martin Dies
(Harris Yulin), it's also too typical of the left-leaning tendencies of
the arts community. When Congress abruptly declares a moratorium on all
Federal Theatre Project activities, the F.T.P.'s director Hallie Flanagan
(Cherry Jones) attempts to set things straight politically. Meanwhile,
Welles and company decide on a more direct course of action.
     The F.T.P. controversy and the staging of "The Cradle Will Rock" is
the central story of CRADLE WILL ROCK, but it's far from the only one.
Sub-plots follow "Cradle" cast members like Aldo Silvano (John Turturro),
who turns his back on his pro-Fascist Italy family, and Olive Stanton
(Emily  Watson), a homeless aspiring singer. There are glimpses into the
glittering lives of the industrialists whose efforts supported Italy and
Germany prior to the war, including Nelson Rockefeller (John Cusack) and
steel magnate Grey Mathers (Philip Baker Hall). There is a tale of
Rockefeller's battle with artist Diego Rivera (Ruben Blades) over the
mural Rivera has been commissioned to create in the new Rockefeller
Center. And there are stories of anti-Communist whistle-blowers like
W.P.A. clerk Hazel Huffman (Joan Cusack) and ventriloquist Tommy Crickshaw
(Bill Murray).
     If that seems like a lot to digest, it is. Robbins' sprawling
narrative attempts to approach the era's growing class unrest from every
possible angle, and in so doing can't quite do justice to any of them. 
Olive and Aldo are walking representations of the virtuous poor more than
they are actual characters; their counterparts in Mathers and William
Randolph Hearst (John Carpenter) are cackling industrialists who sit
around counting their money (quite literally, in one scene). Characters
with the potential to develop into something intriguing and complex --
like Margherita Sarfatti (Susan Sarandon), a Jewish propagandist for
Mussolini -- barely get enough screen time for you to remember who they
are. In a cinematic season where epic running times are epidemic, CRADLE
WILL ROCK clocks in at a meager-by-comparison 132 minutes, not nearly
enough time to render all its stories fully.
     It's a shame, too, because CRADLE WILL ROCK often shows flashes of
the compelling film that might have been. Robbins has real visual flair as
a director, including a great scene-setting opening Steadicam shot and
Blitzstein's sleep-deprived creation of "Cradle" (accompanied by
hallucinatory inspirations for its staging and commentary from his muse
Bertolt Brecht. Vanessa Redgrave has a juicy role as Mathers' "socially
conscious" wife, who gets a rebellious thrill out of watching a "Negro 
production of 'Macbeth,'" or helping Welles' pirate performance of 
"Cradle." And there's the theater group, with Macfayden chewing scenery as
the egotistical Welles and Elwes his effective foil as Houseman. Robbins
says in the press notes that he originally set out to do a film just about
the staging of "Cradle," before other storylines presented themselves. You
can't help but wish he had stayed more focused.
     In this era of fuming over the National Endowment for the Arts and
its support of "questionable" works, CRADLE WILL ROCK's themes are
certainly still timely. Robbins' sympathies are clearly with the social
activists, but, as he did in DEAD MAN WALKING, he shows a willingness to
explore the other side with some semblance of an open mind (if earnest,
misguided namer of names Hazel falls into that category). The problem with
CRADLE WILL ROCK isn't politics, though, but a reach exceeding Robbins'
grasp. He has so little time to spend exploring any of his stories that he
never delves into questions of what an artist sacrifices when he accepts
patronage, or examines the irony of "The Cradle Will Rock" being sabotaged
as much by the entertainers' unions as by the government. As an overview
history lesson, CRADLE WILL ROCK has much to recommend it. As a film, it's
too cursory a glance at too complex an issue.

Title
Review for One (2000)
     I can't imagine a thoughtful movie lover watching ONE without
realizing that director Tony Barbieri -- a first-time filmmaker -- is in
complete command of visual storytelling. He does things veteran directors
by the score would shun out of simple fear, though they are likely the
best choices for the moment. He embraces a distinctive rhythm, and lets
his camera say things his characters can't say. This is neither a
flash-for-flash's-sake technical show-off, nor a man content to point his
lens at people while they exchange glib dialogue. ONE is a coming-out
party for a director to watch.
     I'd love to report that Barbieri's eye and his narrative restraint 
make ONE a must-see film, but it's possible to take narrative restraint to
an extreme. Barbieri also co-wrote the story of two childhood friends
facing turning points in their lives. Charlie O'Connell (Jason Cairns,
Barbieri's co-scripter) has just been paroled from a sentence for
assisting in his grandfather's suicide; Nick Razca (Kane Picoy), a
one-time sure-thing baseball prospect, is living with his parents and
working as a garbage collector. Charlie comes to stay with Nick while he
looks for a job, but the two friends seem to have different plans for
their lives. While Charlie returns to school and begins a relationship
with a woman named Sara (Autumn Macintosh), Nick deals with his own
feelings about his failed baseball career and the feelings of his father
(Paul Herman) on the same subject.
     The first thing anyone is likely to notice about ONE is that it
doesn't look or move like a typical film. Barbieri tells the story of
these lingering characters in lingering takes, with performances pitched
at a level of quiet resignation. His preferred composition places his
camera outside a doorway, with only one of the two characters involved in
the scene visible at any time. It's a device he uses perhaps to excess,
but he captures effectively the tension between people occupying the same
room while living in different worlds. Barbieri even makes the subtly
audacious choice in one scene to slowly blur the characters in a scene,
pulling the focus to an object in the foreground so gradually you may just
think your eyes are playing tricks on you. At virtually every moment, I
was fascinated by the prospect of what Barbieri might do next.
     The narrative itself, unfortunately, is not nearly so fascinating. 
It's not that the characters are not compelling; Barbieri and Cairns have
crafted a pair of enigmatic, lived-in roles in Charlie and Nick. ONE
simply suffers from a near-crippling case of "the muteds." Virtually every
emotion and every confrontation isn't just writ small, it's writ to the
point that you need a microscope to see it. Barbieri may have been aiming
for a style that feels real, but he seems scared to death of anything that
could be perceived as an emotional high point. He observes and observes
and observes -- skillfully, to be sure, but from such a distance that the
characters threaten to disappear at any moment. In his zeal to make ONE
feel real, Barbieri doesn't allow it to feel at all.
     Even with such a mega-subdued story, ONE is still strangely
watchable. The naturalistic performances are good; the arc of the two main
characters consistently interesting. But it's really about Barbieri's
knack for using his camera to create a mood. There are many skills that
make up a great director: facility with actors, pacing, and yes, setting
up the right shot for the right moment. In ONE, Barbieri makes it clear
that he needs little help with the latter. I can't wait for the film he
makes when he masters the other two.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
NEVER BEEN KISSED
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Leelee
Sobieski, Jeremy Jordan, Molly Shannon, John C. Reilly.
Screenplay:  Abby Kohn & Marc Silverstein.
Producers:  Sandy Isaac and Nancy Juvonen.
Director:  Raja Gosnell.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm willing to forgive NEVER BEEN KISSED many of its failings
because, for all practical purposes, it's a fantasy.  I can over look the
irony of a film about an adult returning to interact with teenagers which
portray teens the same inane way adults usually think of them.  I can let
it slide that the tone is terminally bubbly when a touch of venom might
have helped.  I can even shrug my shoulders at the notion that Drew
Barrymore was ever a spat-upon teen wretch.  Sometimes a romantic comedy
can get away with being ridiculous as it strives to pull us into its wish
fulfillment.  What it can't get away with is being lazy or being miscast,
the two blunders that insure NEVER BEEN KISSED never had a chance.
     Our high-concept premise finds 25-year-old Chicago Sun-Times copy
editor Josie Geller (Barrymore) offered her first real reporting
assignment:  going undercover as a high school student.  The assignment
brings mixed emotions for Josie, a brainy high school outcast still
smarting from her adolescent ostracism.  As she begins her quest for a
story, Josie finds herself drawn back into the world of the "smart kids"
at South Glen South High School, including her new friend Aldys (Leelee
Sobieski).  That's before her editor (John C. Reilly) demands that Josie
get in with the in crowd, and before Josie's arrested adolescent
23-year-old brother Rob (David Arquette) also re-enrolls and helps turn
the one-time "Josie Grossie" into a potential prom queen.
     NEVER BEEN KISSED does a serviceable job of telling Josie's story,
exploring how a woman comes to terms with the person she was and is.  If
only the script had shown as much dilligence with the other elements.
Arquette's character is potentially even more interesting than Barrymore's
-- a jock who peaked at 18 trying to re-live his glory days -- but it's
generally watered-down and ignored.  The romantic angle between Josie and
her English teacher (Michael Vartan) is half-heartedly developed, muddles
the entire point of the story -- are we supposed to believe that Josie was
incapable of finding true love before re-creating her traumatic youth? --
and builds to a spectacularly clumsy conclusion.  Most depressing of all
is a ghastly device which finds Josie wearing a miniature camera,
contributing nothing more to the story than pointless cutaways to Josie's
co-workers gaping or cringing in embarrassment.
     There's plenty to gape and cringe at as Barrymore plays Josie.
You've got to admire how gamely Barrymore subjects herself to humiliating
situations, but she's all wrong for the lead role in her first feature as
executive producer.  Even the marketing people at Fox realize that she's
most appealing as a sweet object of desire, making the central image in
the film's publicity a photo of Barrymore smiling coquettishly with knee
drawn up to her chest.  As a star carrying this film, she looks out of her
depth.  It's slightly embarrassing watching her play the professional
Josie as a tightly-coiffed fussbudget correcting everyone's grammar and
usage; as implausible as she may be as a high school senior, she proves
even more implausible as a grown-up.
     You always want to like a film as good-natured as NEVER BEEN KISSED,
even though it wants so much to be liked.  There simply isn't a nuance to
the material that director Raja Gosnell manages to capture, not a moment
of sincere emotion, nothing that doesn't look like it wouldn't exist if
not for other movies about kids in high school.  When the script manages
to work in a wise observation -- like the idea that one popular person in
high school can dictate who's cool and who's not -- it feels like someone
tripped over it accidentally.  NEVER BEEN KISSED is most certainly a
fantasy for anyone who ever felt like the quintessential high school
outsider, but the film-makers are living in a fantasy world if they think
that's all they need to deliver.

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
(Dimension)
Starring:  Neve Campbell, Skeet Ulrich, Courteney Cox, David Arquette,
Drew Barrymore, Matthew Lillard, Rose McGowan, Jamie Kennedy.
Screenplay:  Kevin Williamson.
Producers:  Cary Woods, Cathy Konrad.
Director:  Wes Craven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the late 70s and early 80s, theater screens were overrun by a film
genre which had primarily teenage audiences filling the seats and
sociologists shaking their heads.  It was the golden age -- if that isn't
a gross misapplication of the term -- of the slasher movie, where
cutlery-wielding crazies turned every possible day on the calendar
(HALLOWEEN, FRIDAY THE 13TH, PROM NIGHT, MOTHER'S DAY, MY BLOODY
VALENTINE) into a stomach-churning ordeal.  These films usually differed
only in the manner of the violent killings, leading to a numbing
predictability deserving only of parody.  Wes Craven's SCREAM wants to
have some fun with the conventions of the slasher movie, but not at the
expense of providing a few scares of its own.  That presents problems as
well as opportunities, as the self-aware script sometimes diffuses the
tension Craven can create as a director.
     In SCREAM, the students at Woodsboro High are facing more profound
problems than the usual homework and bad skin.  Two students have been
murdered -- stalked and disemboweled by a lunatic -- and everyone is on
edge, particularly Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell).  It is nearing the
first anniversary of the day Sidney's mother was raped and murdered, and
when the masked killer comes after Sidney, she begins to wonder if the two
events are related.  Tabloid TV reporter Gail Weathers (Courteney Cox)
wonders, too, and she becomes determined to find out the connection
between Sidney and the murders.  As students gather for a party, including
Sidney, her boyfriend Billy (Skeet Ulrich) and best friend Tatum (Rose
McGowan), the reporter stakes out the scene, waiting for the inevitable
bloodbath.
     As SCREAM begins, it looks like it is going to be a fairly
conventional horror film, if an unusually gripping one.  A 12-minute
prologue finds Drew Barrymore terrorized over the phone by the killer,
quizzed on horror movie trivia to save her life.  Most of the familiar
tropes of the slasher movie are in place -- the absentee parents, the
improbably massive house with plenty of glass, the ever-alarming ringing
phone -- but the sequence is still scary stuff, with Barrymore providing
an effective and convincing portrait of mounting panic.  Though much of
SCREAM becomes a joke at the expense of monotonously violent horror films,
Craven is not about to spit in the face of the genre which made his
career.  Horror films in general are not the target in SCREAM -- horror
films with no style or imagination are, and Craven provides both
throughout the film, though nowhere as effectively as the opening.
     What happens between the scares is what gives SCREAM its knowing
edge.  Kevin Williamson's script is loaded with references to horror films
-- it seems that half a dozen are aimed at Craven alone -- and loaded with
characters who have seen other horror films.  Many of those references are
spelled out quite literally, and they are the least interesting.  When one
character explains the "rules" of the slasher film, including the "sex
equals death" paradigm, it seems as though Williamson believes he is the
first person to have noticed them.  Some of the most subversive humor is
the least obvious, however.  One young woman is unable to escape the
killer through a doggie door because -- like all horror film ingenues --
her breasts are nearly as large as her head; another running gag finds the
masked killer repeatedly knocked around like one of the Three Stooges.
SCREAM also turns into something of a whodunnit, a rarity among slasher
films, and Williamson and Craven trot out plenty of suspects:  moody
boyfriend Billy (Ulrich, looking more like Johnny Depp than Depp himself),
Billy's wired friend Stu (Matthew Lillard), a repressed video clerk (Jamie
Kennedy), the mild-mannered deputy (David Arquette), the school principal
(Henry Winkler!) and even Sidney's father.  SCREAM plays with expectations
effectively, making the guessing game part of the in-joke.
     The guessing ends in a climax which, while certainly surprising,
isn't particularly effective.  It is also excessively drawn out, as writer
and director seem to engage in an ideological battle over whether it is
going to be the climax to a horror film or a commentary on the climaxes of
horror films.  In the end it is both, which is to say that it is neither.
Some of the gags are quite funny, but the suspense all but vanishes in the
final fifteen minutes as the characters talk their way through a
comparison of this finale to the traditional finale.  The script for
SCREAM is not clever enough to provide a consistently witty thriller; it
is sometimes witty and sometimes thrilling, but never both.  That alone
makes SCREAM stand out from its genre cousins, though, as Wes Craven
reminds us that terror can be fun, and not simply a grueling march
through gore-spattered holidays.

Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
MEN WITH GUNS
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Federico Jose Luppi, Damian Delgado, Dan Rivera Gonzalez,
Damian Alcazar, Mandy Patinkin, Kathryn Grody.
Screenplay:  John Sayles.
Producers:  R. Paul Miller and Maggiel Renzi.
Director:  John Sayles.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If the term "independent film" means anything in an era when Disney
owns Miramax, it means the work of John Sayles.  Nothing Sayles has done
through nearly twenty years of film-making has been done the easy way, or
the predictable way.  Just when it looked like he was "going studio" after
EIGHT MEN OUT, he made the sprawling and ambitious CITY OF HOPE; the
intimate adult drama PASSION FISH was followed by the lyrical family
fantasy THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH.  So it only stands to reason that Sayles
would capitalize on the critically-acclaimed, Oscar-nominated LONE STAR by
making his next film a tale of Latin American politics told almost
entirely in Spanish.
     MEN WITH GUNS is classic John Sayles, which is to say that it will
reward most fully the viewer willing to think about it for a while
afterwards.  The principal protagonist is an elderly, recently widowed
doctor named Humberto Fuentes (Federico Jose Luppi) who works and lives a
comfortable life in the capital of an unnamed Latin American country.  His
mind turned to thoughts of his legacy with the passing of his wife,
Fuentes decides to take his vacation in the interior jungles, planning to
visit former medical students who had gone to work with the native Indian
communities.  What he discovers is a world far-removed from his own, where
government troops and rebel guerrillas carry on a war which as claimed
many of the doctors as casualties.
     This discovery initially baffles Fuentes, who can't make sense of why
doctors would be a threat to anyone.  It is the mad "logic" of this kind
of war which becomes one of Sayles main themes in MEN WITH GUNS.  To the
rebels, the educated doctors are threats because they have been trained
with the financial assistance of the government; to the government, they
are threats because they could actually get the Indians thinking about
their plight.  If the doctors aid wounded government soldiers, they are
killed by the guerrillas; if they _don't_ assist the government soldiers,
their lives are forfeit as well.  The natives can't even tell the
difference between the two battling factions.  To them, they are all just
"men with guns" who aribtrarily turn the world upside down because of the
power they hold at their fingertips.
     Fuentes' journey through the jungles becomes a road to realizing all
that has been going on, all of the suffering he conveniently had never
noticed.  Sayles develops this notion of accepting responsibility for
one's actions -- or lack of action -- as Fuentes picks up a number of
passengers along his way.  One is a former government soldier (Damian
Alcazar) haunted by the violence to which he had been a party; another is
a former priest (Damian Delgado) who loses his faith when he abandons his
village to save his own life.  He even takes a poke at Americans' blissful
ignorance of the world in the characters of two adventurous tourists
(Mandy Patinkin and Kathryn Grody), while simultaneously suggesting the
Americans know a bit more about Fuentes' country than the doctor himself.
With his typical novelistic style, Sayles richly develops his characters
into souls seeking redemption, doing their small part to be part of the
solution where they had once been part of the problem.
     Like many of Sayles' films, MEN WITH GUNS stumbles only because
Sayles never met a two hour plus running time he didn't like.  The side
plots, including the inclusion of a streetwise youngster and a traumatized
woman in Fuentes' traveling party, don't bear the same kind of fruit as
the intertwined stories in LONE STAR.  Often, they simply feel like
padding in a singularly sedate war story.  Still, Sayles working at less
than the height of his powers is still a more provocative story-teller --
and an ever-more-mature visual film-maker -- than the vast majority of his
contemporaries.  He is willing to talk to his audiences rather than
shout at them, to allow his films to sneak up on you with their thoughtful
confidence.  In 1998, that above all else makes John Sayles a truly
independent film-maker.

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
DICK
(Columbia)
Starring:  Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Dave Foley, Bruce
McCulloch, Will Ferrell, Saul Rubinek, Jim Breuer, Harry Shearer.
Screenplay:  Andrew Fleming and Sheryl Longin. 
Producer:  Gale Anne Hurd.
Director:  Andrew Fleming.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, drug use, adult themes, adult humor)
Running Time:  94 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     This may be a first in my six years as a film critic:  I'm going to
give the bulk of the credit for a film's success to the casting director.
The film is DICK, a political/historical satire with a sporadically
amusing script and competent enough direction -- in short, the stuff of
fairly average entertainment.  If DICK pushes over the edge of
average-ness, it's because the cast dives into the material with such
gusto that the film finds sparks of inspired comedy.  Casting director Pam
Dixon Mickelson has stocked DICK with such a wealth of talent that it's
fun just watching them stroll into the shot.
     The premise is silly high-concept stuff, centered around two high
school best friends in Washington D.C. circa 1972 -- simple-minded Arlene
Lorenzo (Michelle Williams) and even more simple-minded Betsy Jobs
(Kirsten Dunst).  Through exaggerated circumstances, the girls become
witnesses to the break-in at the Watergate Hotel, though they have no idea
what they've seen.  Bob Haldeman (Dave Foley), however, isn't so sure, and
thinks it would be a good idea to keep an eye on the girls to determine
what they know.  Thus Arlene and Betsy find themselves "official
dog-walkers" for President Nixon (Dan Hedaya) himself, welcomed into the
inner circle at the White House.  As the Watergate scandal unfolds, the
girls find themselves involved in virtually every key event, while
generally remaining blissfully unaware that they're making history.
     The gag is pretty thin to begin with, and it's not even particularly
original.  DICK 's insistence on plopping the two teens into every pivotal
moment of the second Nixon administration turns it into a distaff FORREST
GUMP -- some marijuana-laced brownies lead to fruitful arms-limitation
talks with Brezhnev; a recorded message from the girls turns into an
18-1/2 minute gap; a well-placed scolding leads to the resignation of
John Dean (Jim Breuer); their encounters with Woodward (Will Ferrell) and
Bernstein (Bruce McCulloch) turn them into "Deep Throat."  It's all good
for a few knowing chuckles, but once you tune into the pattern, you can
see virtually every joke coming from several minutes away.
     What you can't necessarily see coming is the appeal of the
performances.  The key players in the administration are all played with
zest by a wonderful comic cast -- Hedaya as a tragically unhip Nixon,
Harry Shearer as a paranoid G. Gordon Liddy, Breuer as the guilt-stricken
John Dean, Saul Rubinek as an insecure Henry Kissinger.  More entertaining
still are Ferrell and McCulloch as Woodward and Bernstein, playing the two
reporters as feuding glory hounds with a relationship somewhere between
sibling rivals and closeted lovers.  And in the middle of this who's who
of sketch comedy alumni, Michelle Williams and Kirsten Dunst have
tremendous fun with their ditzy characters.  Dunst may be the more
accomplished actress of the two, but it's Williams who gets the juicier
part of a teen who develops a secret crush on Nixon.  There's nothing
quite as incongruously funny as Arlene's fantasy of a scowling Dick riding
across a beach on a white stallion.
     It would have been nice if Andrew Fleming and Sheryl Longin's script
had found more scenes to match that one for sheer goofiness value.  Too
often it gets a bit lazy, opting for yet another historical coulda-been or
one of many comic uses of the name "Dick."  DICK hits a few dead spots,
but whenever it starts to lag it gets a jolt from the energetic cast.
Remember the name Pam Dixon Mickelson if you happen to be casting a comedy
any time soon.  It's nice to have someone who can gather an all-star team
for the comedic equivalent of slow-pitch softball.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?
(Touchstone)
Starring:  George Clooney, John Turturro, Tim Blake Nelson, Charles
Durning, John Goodman, Holly Hunter, Michael Badalucco.
Screenplay:  Joel Coen and Ethan Coen, based on "The Odyssey" by Homer.
Producer:  Ethan Coen.
Director:  Joel Coen.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the opening credits of O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?, Joel and Ethan
Coen announce that the film we are about to see is "based on 'The Odyssey'
by Homer." They do so with the same straight-facedness they employed when
announcing that FARGO was "a true story," and they are equally full of
crap this time around. True, O BROTHER features a character named Ulysses
Everett McGill (George Clooney) trying to get home to his wife Penny
(Holly Hunter). And yes, along the way he encounters a blind prophet, a
one-eyed beast and a trio of sirens that tries to lure him to his doom. He
also winds up in the company of a Mississippi bluesman who claims to have
sold his soul to the devil at a crossroads, and a bank-robbing gangster
named George "Baby-Face" Nelson. Funny, but I don't remember them turning
up in my Western Civilizations reading list.
     If you really want a sense of what the Coens are after in O BROTHER,
WHERE ART THOU?, it helps to know the origin of the title. In Preston
Sturges' SULLIVAN'S TRAVELS, a Depression-era filmmaker popular for his
frivolous comedies decides to hit the road in America to research an
important, significant film story -- a story he plans to call O BROTHER,
WHERE ART THOU? Ultimately, he discovers that people love frivolous
comedies, and that there's no shame in creating them. Forget epics of the
common man; make them laugh, and you've got them right where you want
them, and right where they want to be.
     I'm not sure I could make an argument for the Coens' O BROTHER, WHERE
ART THOU? being flawless film-making. It is, however, the most utterly
demented, unashamedly un-important and purely entertaining film experience
I've had all year. The central plot finds Clooney's McGill fleeing a
Depression-era Mississippi chain gang with fellow convicts Pete (John
Turturro) and Delmar (Tim Blake Nelson). They're heading for $1.2 million
McGill has hidden from a pre-incarceration heist, money that's days away
from being sent to the bottom of a lake by a dam project. But that journey
to the treasure takes many turns, during which the three fortune-tossed
men join Nelson for a bank job, become inadvertent recording stars and
wind up in the middle of a floundering re-election bid by Governor Pappy
O'Daniel (Charles Durning).
     Essentially, there's nothing to O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? but a
string of comic misadventures. Coen brothers characters don't often occupy
a particularly moral universe, so there's not really a lesson or point to
any of it. Manic-depressive gangster Nelson takes his Tommy gun to a herd
of cows. The governor's campaign team laments their opponent's clever use
of a midget as a representative of "the little man" he stands for. McGill
shows nearly as much interest in finding his preferred brand of pommade as
he does in finding his loot. It's an exercise in free-form narrative
cinema, held together by the Coens' distinctive whip-smart dialogue and
their gift for putting the right face on every role.
     And it's constantly, gut-bustingly hilarious. Viewers who have been
lukewarm to previous Coen projects aren't likely to become converts this
time around, but if you're in tune with their warped sensibilities, you're
in for a treat. O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? is the kind of film you'll
spend most of the time watching with your mouth open, either laughing out
loud or in dumbfounded amazement at what they're able to put on a screen.
And few things are as dumbfoundingly amazing as George Clooney's
loose-limbed comic performance, the kind of work that forces you to
re-think an actor's versatility. From his know-it-all soliloquies to his
performance of the bluegrass standard "Man of Constant Sorrow," Clooney
takes every bizarre situation and runs with it as far as the Coens will
let him. In a cast full of great comics and Coen film veterans (Turturro,
Durning, Hunter, John Goodman), Clooney steals the show.
     It happens to be a joyous show he's stealing. Somewhere creeping
around the edges of O BROTHER is a commentary on our need for religion and
mythology even in an "age of reason," with its combination of Greek legend
and American folk tales. It would be ridiculous, however, to argue that
this is the Coens' personal "Odyssey." It dips and swerves, hits its lulls
then tears back into remarkably goofy set pieces. There's no important
message here, no contemporary re-working of an ancient classic. This,
folks, is film-making that aims for nothing more profound than the funny
bone. This, folks, in all its glory, is frivolous comedy.

Title
Review for Kissed (1996)
(Goldwyn)
Starring:  Molly Parker, Peter Outerbridge, Jay Brazeau.
Screenplay:  Lynne Stopkewich and Angus Fraser, based on the short story
by Barbara Gowdy.
Producers:  Dean English and Lynne Stopkewich.
Director:  Lynne Stopkewich.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (sexual situations, nudity, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  78 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     What is it about Canada which gets film-makers thinking about sex,
death and car washes?  Canada's David Cronenberg has already delivered one
exploration of the bond between carnality and mortality in 1997, the
much-talked-about CRASH, and now countrywoman Lynne Stopkewich has
presented us with KISSED.  Molly Parker stars in KISSED as Sandra Larson,
a young woman who knows from an early age that she has a profound need to
connect with the moment when life turns to death.  She acts on that
obsession by becoming an apprentice at a funeral home, where she has sex
with the dead bodies in a ritual which brings her closer to the power of
the hereafter.  The problems begin when a medical student named Matt
(Peter Outerbridge) falls hard for Sandra, and finds it difficult to
compete with her other lovers.
     It's difficult at first to get past the unpleasantness of the subject
matter in KISSED, especially when we are treated to scenes of the young
Sandra (Natasha Morley) rubbing a dead sparrow all over herself.
Cronenberg faced the same intellectual road block with CRASH, but the
difference is that Stopkewich actually seems interested in helping the
audience to understand her protagonist's obsession.  Her narration is
surprisingly effective at explaining the reasons for and the impact of
Sandra's actions, and Molly Parker plays Sandra as a decent, focused young
woman who understands how her necrophilia is viewed by others.  Stopkewich
doesn't want us to stare at Sandra like a car wreck; she wants to put us
inside the car with her (including, like CRASH, in a car wash, which
must be the Canadian equivalent of Lover's Lane), as well as inside her
head.
     One of the more intriguing ironies of KISSED involves Matt, who has a
difficult time dealing with the other men in Sandra's life.  Stopkewich
gives Matt an enigmatic history -- he's a medical student who is taking
time off for an unexplained reason -- and Outerbridge gives a painful
conviction to his growing frustration with his inability to satisfy
Sandra.  It is Matt whose obsession becomes dangerous, whose relatively
common desire for a woman he can't fully have is played as the real 
instability in the film.  Sandra has come to terms with her unique needs,
and it is to Stopkewich's credit that Sandra is portrayed as someone with
compassion rather than as a twisted fiend.  The arc of the story may be
fairly predictable, but that story is skillfully constructed to make the
fate of the characters matter.  There is an unexpected warmth to KISSED.
Being Canadian doesn't mean you have to turn sex -- even sex with a corpse
-- into something cold and emotionless.

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
WAG THE DOG
(New Line)
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Andrea
Martin, Craig T. Nelson, Woody Harrelson.
Screenplay:  Hilary Henkin and David Mamet, based on the novel "American
Hero" by Larry Beinhart.
Producers:  Jane Rosenthal, Barry Levinson and Robert DeNiro.
Director:  Barry Levinson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Here's how I know I'm watching a truly brilliant piece of
socio-political satire:  even as I'm laughing, I'm not sure whether I
shouldn't actually be cringing in fear for my country.  DR. STRANGELOVE
inspired that kind of reaction, as did NETWORK and moments in M*A*S*H and
BEING THERE.  There have been several attempts in recent years to capture
the insanity of government by media mandate -- Tim Robbin's BOB ROBERTS,
Robert Altman's HBO series "Tanner '88", Michael Moore's CANADIAN BACON --
but none has come close to reaching the savage heights of WAG THE DOG.
Working with a magnificent script by Hilary Henkin and David Mamet,
director Barry Levinson creates the kind of film which leaves you
teary-eyed from laughter and slack-jawed in astonishment at its dark
audacity.
     The premise of WAG THE DOG feels torn from today's scandal-filled
headlines.  The American President (whose face is never actually shown),
facing a re-election vote in a matter of weeks, is hit with accusations
that he molested a young girl.  Instantly, the spin machine goes into
motion, as Presidential advisor Winifred Ames (Anne Heche) brings in
political fixer Conrad Breen (Robert DeNiro).  Breen knows that
President's only chance is a distracted electorate, so he decides to
manufacture an even bigger story than the allegations:  a war with
Albania, for reasons to be determined later.  The job of creating public
perception is handed to Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman),
who forms a team to generate every necessary image and emotion.  Thus
begins a countdown to election day, with the only goal to keep the
American people looking the other way.
     WAG THE DOG rolls out the hilarious situations with such punishing
frequency that it's virtually impossible to select highlights.  The "We
Are the World"-style anthem created by the team's composer (Willie Nelson)
drips with pop-bombast jingoism; a studio shoot of an actress (Kirsten
Dunst) playing the part of an Albanian refugee turns a piece of fiction
into an icon; a commercial by the President's opponent (Craig T. Nelson)
makes use of Maurice Chevalier's "Thank Heaven for Little Girls" to jab
the President's scandals.  Some of the most subtle but scathing barbs
target the media, who lap up the images provided by the President's people
far too readily, riding the wave rather than bucking the tide.  Like all
the finest satire, WAG THE DOG is just absurd enough to be hilarious, and
just plausible enough to be alarming.
     The truly impressive thing about Henkin and Mamet's script is that it
finds time amid all the comic pot-shots to create a genuinely fascinating
character in Stanley Motss.  A well-tanned big shot modeled after
no-one-in-particular (Robert Evans?  Don Simpson?), Motss dives into his
assignment with show biz gusto and bluster, regaling all around him with
war stories of previous productions and a dismissive "This is nothing" to
accompany every crisis.  Hoffman plays Motss as an insecure mogul
determined to achieve the recognition he feels has been unfairly denied
him, even though Breen continues to insist that this particular story can
never become one of his war stories.  It's easily Hoffman's best
performance in over a decade:  sly, funny, angry, self-absorbed,
infuriating and absolutely delightful.
     Though WAG THE DOG focuses almost entirely on the actions of the
President's shadow cabinet, it's not exactly an indictment of political
dirty tricks.  If anything, the real villains in WAG THE DOG are the
American people -- not just for accepting the phony war, but for making it
necessary in the first place.  The script strongly suggests that the
accusations made against the President are false, but the facts of the
matter are instantly irrelevant.  An accusation of wrong-doing becomes the
same as wrong-doing in the popular consciousness, making the manipulations
of the President's team as ironic as they are necessary:  the only way
they can battle a lie is to create a bigger lie.  WAG THE DOG is a
dazzling, thought-provoking entertainment which alternately tickles you
and slaps you in the face, providing a warning that it's easy to keep
making fools out of us if we keep making it so easy.

Title
Review for Two Family House (2000)
TWO FAMILY HOUSE
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Michael Rispoli, Kelly Macdonald, Katherine Narducci, Kevin
Conway, Matt Servitto.
Screenplay:  Raymond DeFelitta.
Producers:  Anne Harrison and Alan Klingenstein.
Director:  Raymond DeFelitta.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Sentimentalized stories of the 1950s have become so commonplace in
film that it's incredibly refreshing to find one that doesn't whitewash
the darker side of the happy days. Raymond DeFelitta's TWO FAMILY HOUSE is
in some ways a familiar feel-good story, but it gives its good feeling an
unexpected edge. The story's protagonist is Buddy Visalo (Michael 
Rispoli), a World War II veteran living in a predominantly Italian Staten
Island neighborhood in 1956. Buddy once had dreams of being a singer, but
those dreams were overwhelmed by his wife Estelle's (Katherine Narducci) 
desire for a normal life. While Buddy works in a local factory, he still
strives for something more, and jumps at the chance to purchase a run-down
two story house that he and Estelle can occupy upstairs while turning the
downstairs into a tavern. Unfortunately, the upstairs is already occupied
by Jim O'Neary (Kevin Conway) and his pregnant wife Mary (Kelly 
Macdonald), who are in no hurry to leave and have an obscure tenancy law
on their side.
     For a while, TWO FAMILY HOUSE looks like it might turn into a broad
comedy, with the Italians and Irish clashing loudly and perhaps
farcically. Then, on the day Buddy is prepared to throw the O'Nearys out,
Mary gives birth to an unexpectedly -- ahem -- dark-hued child, and Jim
abandons her. The somewhat guilty Buddy puts Mary and her child up in a
nearby apartment, and the two begin spending time together while Estelle
continues to scoff at Buddy's attempts at entrepreneurship. In fact, she's
scoffing at even more than that, as are Buddy's friends in a slightly
different way. What is ridiculous to them is the idea of anyone moving too
far beyond the proscribed ethnic, cultural and even geographic boundaries. 
Buddy's willingness to extend a hand to Mary, just like his desire to
pursue a career dream, suggests that the boundaries are a bit blurry. And
the idea of blurry boundaries makes everyone around Buddy more than
slightly uncomfortable.
     Even without its subtext, TWO FAMILY HOUSE is a funny, well-acted and
tremendously appealing drama -- so appealing that it might even be
perceived as fantastically generous to its protagonist. Rispoli delivers a
nicely nuanced performance as Buddy, a teddy bear of a guy trying to move
forward rather than look back in bitterness at missed opportunities or
failures. DeFelitta's brand of nostalgia includes the recognition that
most of his characters are racists; they toss around slurs with the casual
understanding that in their homogenous world, there's "us" and "them." It
would be easy to interpret Buddy's open-mindedness as anachronism, but
DeFelitta doesn't make him the good guy just because he helps the girl
with the black baby, nor are Estelle and Buddy's friends obvious villains
just because they use the "n-word." TWO FAMILY HOUSE builds its characters
by building a complete understanding of the world around them.
     DeFelitta does go a bit overboard in his use of voice-over narration
(told by Mary's son from a distance of forty years), and the film does
drag as it moves past the 90 minute mark. It occupies that treacherous
middle ground between comedy and drama where a film can either feel too
frivolous or not frivolous enough. Fortunately, DeFelitta understands how
to make his film about more than its obvious premise without resorting to
overly-weighty symbolism. Culture clashes tend to be represented on screen
either in strident sociology lectures or fish-out-of-water yuk-fests. TWO
FAMILY HOUSE explores melting pot growing pains in the context of a simple
story about a simple man. It's an achievement that's not nearly as simple
as it looks.

Title
Review for Sprung (1997)
(Trimark)
Starring:  Tisha Campbell, Rusty Cundieff, Paula Jai Parker, Joe Torry.
Screenplay:  Rusty Cundieff and Darin Scott.
Producer:  Darin Scott.
Director:  Rusty Cundieff.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Rusty Cundieff is on his way to establishing a new film-making
record:  Most Genres Covered by a Director in a Career.  In 1993, Cundieff
made his debut with a clever mock-documentary satire of the rap music
scene called FEAR OF A BLACK HAT.  Then, in 1995, he turned his attention
to anthology horror for the darkly comic TALES FROM THE HOOD.  The two
films established Cundieff as a distinctive voice among young
African-American film-makers, a writer/director unwilling to settle into
limited notions of what "black films" could be about.  With SPRUNG, it
appears that Cundieff has decided that he's not willing to wait until the
next film to change genres -- he'll change genres right in the middle of a
film.  Unfortunately, it's more of a collision than a fusion, with both
halves getting dented in the process.
     Cundieff, who also co-wrote SPRUNG, stars as Montel, a single man
preparing for a night of girl-hunting with his buddy Clyde (Toe Torry).
They end up at a party, where Clyde puts the moves on Adina (Paula Jai
Parker), a gold-digger whom Clyde convinces that he has cash money to
spare.  The con gets Adina into Clyde's bed, but she is not happy when she
discovers that she has been played.  Montel, meanwhile, has spent the
night talking with Adina's friend Brandy (Tisha Campbell).  That
conversation eventually grows into a relationship, which does not sit well
with Clyde and Adina.  Disgusted by the idea that they may have to spend
time around each other just because their friends are a couple, Clyde and
Adina decide they have only one choice:  to join forces for the mutually
beneficial purpose of breaking up Montel and Brandy.
     For over half an hour, SPRUNG bears a startling resemblance to
another 1997 film about middle-class African-Americans lookin' for a
little somethin':  BOOTY CALL.  Both films begin with the main characters
preparing for their night out, both films make couples out of the
respective pairs' "good" and "bad" boys and girls, and both include plenty
of wild happenings inappropriate for younger viewers.  SPRUNG may be a bit
more focused thanks to a more condensed time frame, but the familiarity
is inescapable.  In some cases, like a hilarious moment based on facial
expressions of pleasure, that familiarity is welcome.  In others, like the
depressingly predictable appearance of a mincing gay stereotype for a
cheap laugh, it is entirely unwelcome.
     Of course, BOOTY CALL was out too recently for Cundieff to be guilty
of intentionally stealing BOOTY.  The same situation applies when SPRUNG
suddenly takes a radical shift in tone to resemble a different 1997 film
about middle-class African-Americans lookin' for a different kind of
somethin':  LOVE JONES.  As the relationship between Montel and Brandy
turns into a combination of soft-focus montage and tasteful 
black-and-white photography, SPRUNG becomes an attempt at a straight-up
love story which generally falls flat.  Montel and Brandy aren't exactly
characters -- they're just nice people who exist primarily to give the
colorful Clyde an Adina targets for their mischief.  Though Cundieff
doesn't abandon the broad comedy entirely, he cuts back radically enough
that you realize the broad comedy was the best thing SPRUNG had going for
it.  As a love story, it's pretty limp stuff.
     SPRUNG also shows that Cundieff still prefers not to stray far from
the satirical ground of FEAR OF A BLACK HAT and TALES FROM THE HOOD.
Cundieff employs his pop culture sensibility for pokes at a variety of
targets, including THE TERMINATOR and WHEN HARRY MET SALLY.  When working
with the boundaries of a specific genre's conventions, Cundieff knows just
where to step to get a laugh.  SPRUNG just isn't tightly structured enough
to allow him to show his stuff.  It also requires him to create
three-dimensional characters for the first time, a task at which he
doesn't seem particularly adept; he's more comfortable with the ridiculous
than with the sublime.  There will be other opportunities for the young
and talented Cundieff to master the more subtle skills of film-making,
however.  After all, he still has to do a historical epic, a violent caper
film and an intimate family drama.

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
WHAT LIES BENEATH
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Michelle Pfeiffer, Harrison Ford, Diana Scarwid, James Remar,
Joe Morton, Amber Valletta.
Screenplay:  Clark Gregg.
Producers:  Robert Zemeckis, Jack Rapke and Steve Starkey.
Director:  Robert Zemeckis.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A word of sympathy, first, for WHAT LIES BENEATH's director Robert
Zemeckis: It's probably not his fault that DreamWorks has been marketing
the film with one of the most appallingly wrong-headed trailer and
advertising campaigns I've ever seen. My critic colleagues and I often
respond to certain overly-expository trailers with the comment, "Well, I
don't have to see the movie now." Never has that been more true than in
the case of WHAT LIES BENEATH. If you've seen the theatrical trailer for
the film -- or virtually any of the commercials or plot summary blurbs,
for that matter -- you've been cheated. WHAT LIES BENEATH is one half
creepy, effective suspense thriller and one half predictable, over-wrought
suspense thriller ... and the creepy, effective half is utterly destroyed
by too much foreknowledge.
     If you have the good fortune to enter WHAT LIES BENEATH without that
foreknowledge, you'll be introduced to Norman (Harrison Ford) and Claire
Spencer (Michelle Pfeiffer), a married couple in a newly empty nest after
sending their only child off to college. Norman, a noted genetic 
researcher, at least has is work to keep him busy; Claire was once a
gifted cellist, but gave up her career for family and is now left to
putter about their over-sized Vermont home. And with all that time on her
hands, she starts to notice things. Their next-door neighbors seem prone
to violent arguments, and she sees strange comings and goings in the
night. Soon, there are also some alarming events in the house itself.
Doors open by themselves, pictures fall from the shelves ... and Claire
becomes convinced that a dead woman is trying to contact her.
     You will find no reference herein to a later turn of plot that
dominates advertising for the film. There may be someone out there who
could be thoroughly caught up in Zemeckis' knowing homage to Hitchcock
(most specifically REAR WINDOW), with its instantly loaded atmosphere of
menace and a notable absence of underscore that makes many scenes even
more unsettling. Unlike that hypothetical someone, however, I knew what
was coming. I knew the developments that would dominate the second half
of the film, and their relationship to the events in the first half of the
film. I realized that my time was being wasted on a set-up that had been
blasted into irrelevance by some marketing wizard with an itchy trigger
finger, the sort of cinematic thickhead who would have looked at PSYCHO in
1960 and said, "Hey, let's put that girl getting stabbed in the shower in
the trailer -- that's good stuff." And I grew angrier, and angrier, and
angrier.
     I grew angrier still when I saw the frantic mess that DreamWorks had
seen fit to promote so hard. It's bad enough that the potentially eerie
ghost story of WHAT LIES BENEATH's first act turns into run-of-the-mill
run-from-the-killer movie. Worse yet is the way the film's conclusion is
drawn out to such an agonizing degree that the approximately 2,647
individual shock scenes -- each one accompanied by a burst of Alan
Silvestri's strings, of course -- become numbing in their every-60-seconds
predictability. The final 25 minutes of WHAT LIES BENEATH eventually
degenerate into such an absurd parody of scary movie climaxes I kept
waiting for a Wayans brother to appear and exclaim, "Whazzup?!?"
     I won't deny that much of WHAT LIES BENEATH works on a purely
visceral level -- I jumped a few times, I was tense a few more times, and
so on. There's also one great sequence near the end involving a threat of
slow drowning that works on almost every possible level. It's the kind of
sequence that makes it hard to hate a film, even when the people selling
the film show such open contempt for the audience. And really, there's no
other way to describe what DreamWorks has done. Their marketing department
has decided, "Our job is to get the people into the theater; we don't care
if we've ruined the experience of actually watching the film in the
process." I don't think WHAT LIES BENEATH would have been a particularly
good film even without that disastrous decision -- there's far too much
laughable dead weight down the stretch -- but it would have been a much
more watchable one. Critics are often accused of being too hard on films
because of expectations based on how much we know about them ahead of
time. At least this time we're going to have plenty of company.

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
     HOME FRIES opens with the bucolic, folksy feel of a girl-appeal
comedy-drama.  Sassy young Sally (Drew Barrymore), drive-thru cashier at a
small town BurgerMatic, is visited by Henry Lever (Chris Ellis).  Sally is
eight months pregnant; married Henry is the father, though he never
revealed his marriage to Sally during their affair.  As Sally explains to
her customer exactly why he can no longer have it his way, you might
suspect that HOME FRIES will follow our plucky, unconventional heroine on
her search for independence and true love through the world of greasy
dining -- HOME FRIED GREEN TOMATOES, or something of the sort.
     Be prepared to dismiss such notions quickly, as Henry leaves their
encounter...only to be pursued by an ominous black helicopter through the
woods until he has a heart attack.  Thus begins a darkly twisted, truly
unexpected comic concoction from a decade-old script by "X-Files" producer
Vince Gilligan (who clearly has a thing for black helicopters).  It seems
that the copter was piloted by brothers Dorian (Luke Wilson) and Angus
(Jake Busey), two Air National Guardsmen who also happen to be Henry's
stepsons.  At the insistence of their maniacal mother (Catherine O'Hara),
they've scared philandering stepdad to death, with the as-yet-unknown
object of Henry's affections next on their list.  The first order of
business, however, is finding out who was on the same frequency as the
copter's radio during their ambush, leading Dorian to an undercover
assignment at a certain BurgerMatic, and a tentative relationship with a
certain drive-thru cashier.
     The kind of quirky humor HOME FRIES deals out can easily become
oppressive if not directed with a sure hand.  First-time feature director
Dean Parisot seems to know just how to drop the peculiar into a scene
without pointing at it for you and slapping your knee.  A sensitive moment
in which Dorian presents Sally a gift for her baby -- a toy helicopter he
describes as "non-toxic, I think" -- is set against a grease fire in the
BurgerMatic kitchen.  Henry's wake features Zamfir's pan flute rendition
of "You Light Up My Life."  And the sequence of most profound bonding
between our two young lovers occurs at a natural childbirth class where
the instructor tells her students "you didn't get into this with your legs
closed, and you won't get out of it that way."
     It's all consistently off-beat in a way that's more often refreshing
than just plain weird, but it also comes with an undercurrent of
sincerity.  Luke Wilson -- deadpan in an "aw shucks"-appealing kind of way
-- does a nice job with Dorian's ambivalence over his bizarre family
dynamics and his attraction to Sally's sweet (relative) normalcy.  In
fact, the search for a "normal" family comes to play a significant role in
the proceedings.  Dorian and Angus still share bunk beds in their
childhood room, frozen in the time they were abandoned by their father;
Sally's father (Lanny Flaherty) is an alcoholic in and out of the good
graces of her mother (Shelley Duvall).  There's something almost touching
to the convoluted family tree Dorian describes for Sally's baby, since it
comes with the hope that the next generation will somehow be less screwed
up than the last.
     It's too bad that HOME FRIES concludes with an overwrought
helicopter-car chase that feels ridiculously out of place.  It's also too
bad that Drew Barrymore can't make Sally more interesting as the object of
everyone's love or hate, her character slipping in and out of focus like
her generically Southern accent.  Ultimately, the story isn't even really
about her.  If anyone is the true protagonist, it's Dorian in his search
for affection outside a dysfunctional family where mom spews crocodile
tears at her husband's death and big brother pumps carbon monoxide into
the trailer of an unsuspecting woman.  Not exactly the stuff of a folksy,
girl-appeal comedy-drama, is it?

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
RED PLANET
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Val Kilmer, Carrie-Anne Moss, Tom Sizemore, Benjamin Bratt,
Simon Baker, Terence Stamp.
Screenplay:  Chuck Pfarrer and Jonathan Lemkin.
Producers:  Mark Canton, Bruce Berman and Jorge Saralegui.
Director:  Antony Hoffman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes, brief nudity, profanity)
Running Time:  106 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some genre films tease you with the prospect that they can be
something more substantial before degenerating into stupidity and cliche. 
RED PLANET at least does viewers the courtesy of not wasting their time
with such futile hopes. In the opening minutes, Mars Mission Commander
Bowman (Carrie-Anne Moss) provides a voice-over neatly summarizing the
premise before launching into capsule characterizations of her crewmates. 
That co-pilot Santen (Benjamin Bratt), he sure is a hot-head, which
undoubtedly will play a significant role in his ultimate fate. And that
scientist Burchenal (Tom Sizemore), he sure has an ego, which undoubtedly
will create some sort of character tension down the road.
     Dim-wittedness in Hollywood action films is only to be expected at
this point in cinema history. Vaguely pretentious dim-wittedness is pretty
inexcusable. RED PLANET sends a six-person crew to Mars in 2057 to find
out what has happened to oxygen-producing algae sent by earth scientists
as part of a colonization plan. You see, earth has become nearly
uninhabitable due to environmental degradation, and our only hope of
survival is creating a survivable atmosphere elsewhere, but something has
gone screwy because oxygen readings have suddenly dropped. The mission
team is ready to investigate when a freak radiation burst damages their
vessel, forcing an emergency evacuation of all personnel but Bowman. The
landing vehicle is damaged on impact, leaving the surviving crew members
-- including dashing chief engineer Gallagher (Val Kilmer) -- to figure
out a way to get back home.
     At certain points in RED PLANET, you can't help but wonder why anyone
wasted time on a back story at all. Though the very survival of the human
race is theoretically at stake, the film seems interested in that point
only to the extent that it can be included in press notes, in absurd
declarations like, "It's a smart movie that posits the question, what if
man fails to do the things necessary to live on earth?" In fact, RED
PLANET resolutely refuses to deal with anything beyond the basic goals of
its characters to find a way back to earth. Why does no one in the
stranded party refer to being thirsty or hungry after going without food
and water for more than a day? How would the people on earth be responding
to the apparent failure of this crucial mission? What exactly was the
reason that no one could detect any oxygen, when it turns out there's a
whole lot of it around? And why flirt with the notion that there's some
intelligence bent on thwarting the terraforming effort, only to make the
real villain of the piece the crew's resident malfunctioning evil robot?
     Silly questions, of course, since RED PLANET is kind enough to alert
you so quickly to its minimalist intentions. The characters spout dialogue
that alternates between inane exposition and pointless 
self-characterization. "I'm a scientist, but I'm really interested in
philosophy," says philosophically-interested scientist Chantilas (Terence
Stamp), though not in so many words. "We're sexually attracted to one
another, so I hope neither one of us dies," say Bowman and Gallagher,
though not in so many words. "I sure wish it didn't take 40 minutes for
you to answer," says Bowman after sending a radio message to earth,
actually in so many words, just to let us know the writers knew at least
one science fact. It's a wonderful irony in RED PLANET that it places so
much weight on the fate of these six characters, only to make them utterly
weightless as actual characters.
     At odd intervals, something happens to slap the film out of its
oxygen-deprived stupor. Most of them involve Moss, whose strong presence
occasionally tricks you into thinking the film is better than it is. One
involves a great shot of the Mars lander taking a tumble for which it
certainly wasn't designed. And, sadly, many others involve the pleasure of
watching one or another of the annoying characters meet an untimely
demise. As directed by rookie feature director Antony Hoffman, this is a
lame special effects-driven action film that can't even be bothered to
provide a handful of visceral thrills. Lacking big-time action excitement,
competent story-telling or any desire to prevent you from walking out
scratching deep trenches into your head, RED PLANET is simply a
planet-sized waste of time. But at least it only wastes a few minutes of
your time before making that obvious.

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
JESUS' SON
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Billy Crudup, Samantha Morton, Denis Leary, Jack Black, Holly
Hunter.
Screenplay:  Elizabeth Cuthrell, David Urrutia and Oren Moverman, based on
the book by Denis Johnson.
Producers:  Elizabeth Cuthrell, Lydia Dean Pilcher and David Urrutia.
Director:  Alison Maclean.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, profanity, brief nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     JESUS' SON is a film about addiction -- only it's not, really. The
way we're used to seeing films about addiction, there's a message, a
lesson, an agenda. Drugs are bad, the effects of drugs on users and their
immediate circle of acquaintances are worse, and our hero would be a
perfectly happy and productive member of society if not for that thing he
wouldn't just say no to. These tend to be films in which the ostensible
messed-up protagonist isn't really the center of the film. It's the needle
that's the center of the film, or the bottle, or the rolled-up $100 bill. 
Addiction isn't just the theme; it's the star.
     So let's re-phrase that introduction: JESUS' SON is a film about FH
(Billy Crudup) -- short for F***head -- a man who eventually becomes an
addict. He's no angel even before his addiction, however, a loner who
stumbles one day in the early 1970s into a party where he meets Michelle
(Samantha Morton). It's Michelle who eventually introduces him to the
wonderful world of heroin, and the two find themselves in a tumultuous
relationship over the space of a few years. Along the way, FH has himself
some crazy misadventures: helping a drunken pal (Denis Leary) tear up a
house for scrap wire; sharing emergency room ordeals with a pill-popping
orderly (Jack Black); and so on. Then Michelle leaves him, setting him
down the difficult road to sobriety.
     Actually, Michelle has already left him when JESUS' SON begins, which
is typical of the frisky, zig-zagging approach taken in adapting Denis
Johnson's collection of short stories. FH narrates his story with all the
straight-ahead narrative lucidity you'd expect of a perpetually stoned
guy; he riccochets back and forth in time, picking up one thread of the 
story in the middle of another story when he recalls something he's
forgotten to tell us. Director Alison Maclean and her trio of writers give
JESUS' SON a playfulness that's entertaining even as it never shies away
from the darkest sides of addiction. In one scene, a romantic song plays
while the camera tracks slowly toward a motel room bed, to reveal not a
lovers' embrace, but FH helping Michelle fix; in another, a split screen
reveals the alternate fates of two characters who have both taken the same
bad drugs. It's a film with the wonderfully scrambled logic of drug use
itself.
     But in case you missed the caveat, this is not exactly a film about
addiction. Billy Crudup gives a magnetic performance as FH, a peripatetic 
loser who has been given that derogatory nickname even before he ever
picks up a needle. In fact, his mutually self-destructive relationship
with Michelle is portrayed as a strangely stabilizing influence in his
fragmented life. Crudup finds a cohesiveness to FH's character through the
episodic film, and even manages to keep up with Jack Black's
scene-stealing orderly in the film's most hilarious segments. JESUS' SON
works not because the individual scenes are so effective (though they
are) or because the portrayal of addiction is so grimly affecting (because
it is not), but because FH is a great anchor for a film that heads in so
many different directions.
     Perhaps inevitably, JESUS' SON eventually turns to the subject of
FH's attempts to get straight, and it's a bit depressing that the film
loses so much steam once drugs are no longer involved. The individual
moments -- FH's fascination with a Menonite woman, a conversation with an
aging fellow patient in rehab (Dennis Hopper), a relationship with a
member of his support group (Holly Hunter) -- feel more isolated, and it
begins to appear that there's no end in sight. Perhaps the come-down is
relative after such a wonderful first hour; perhaps there's nothing for an
episodic film to do but find a somewhat arbitrary place to stop. Even the
sluggish conclusion can't diminish the surprising, darkly comic experience
of JESUS' SON, however. Even once FH is clean, there are still problems
for him to deal with. How refreshing to see addiction take a back seat to
the addict, to see the needle in its appropriate place as supporting
player.

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Al Pacino, Johnny Depp, Michael Madsen, Bruno Kirby, Anne
Heche.
Screenplay:  Paul Attanasio, based on the book by Joseph D. Pistone.
Producers:  Mark Johnson, Barry Levinson, Louis DiGiaimo, Gail Matrux.
Director:  Mike Newell.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, brief nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At first glance, Lefty Ruggiero (Al Pacino) seems like a dozen movie
mobsters you have seen before, like a dozen movie mobsters Pacino has
played before.  He struts, he poses and he boasts in his first meeting
with jeweler Donnie Brasco (Johnny Depp); when Donnie appears ready to end
that meeting, Lefty announces "You don't walk away from Lefty...Lefty
walks away from you."  Don't judge Lefty, or DONNIE BRASCO, by that first
impression, though Lefty himself might have preferred it.  The fact is
that Lefty is a loser:  a thirty year mob veteran still working as a minor
lieutenant in Brooklyn, a compulsive gambler in debt to his own people, a
father with an addict for a son.  In his own mind, however, Lefty is a
winner because he is a wiseguy.  When Lefty takes Donnie under his wing as
a protege, he revels in describing the details of how a wiseguy talks, how
he dresses, how he carries his money and himself.  He fetishizes those
details, because his only sense of self-respect comes from being part of
that world, and he instantly takes to Donnie because Donnie seems to be
the only person who gives him any respect.
     Unfortunately for Lefty, he has picked the wrong protege.  Donnie
Brasco is actually FBI agent Joseph Pistone, working deep undercover to
gather evidence against the mob.  DONNIE BRASCO is based on a memoir by
the real-life Pistone, who spent six years collecting information which
would lead to hundreds of arrests and convictions.  He also spent those
years largely separated from his family and becoming ever more wrapped
up in the world he was supposed to be helping to bring down, and DONNIE
BRASCO spends a fair amount of time on how his work affected his personal
life.  We see his wife Maggie (Anne Heche) coping with raising their three
daughters alone, and arguments over how much Joseph/Donnie's personality
has changed.  As the time nears to draw the net around Donnie's crew, his
superiors in the FBI begin to worry that he has begun to think of his mob
life as his real life.
     As it turns out, the domestic drama in DONNIE BRASCO is actually the
least interesting aspect of the film.  Anne Heche is stuck with the
thankless "long-suffering wife" role, with predictable lines in
predictable scenes; it's hard to imagine anyone giving an interesting spin
to a line like "You're becoming like them."  Depp's performance is solid
and under-stated, a welcome shift from his string of saintly eccentrics.
Unfortunately, Joseph is already immersed in his undercover persona when
we first meet him, making it difficult to understand how much he is
supposed to have changed and why Maggie is still putting up with him.
     The reason those scenes are most frustrating, though, is that Lefty
is so much more fascinating a character than Joseph/Donnie.  Al Pacino has
often been prone to bigger-is-better style of acting, but in DONNIE BRASCO
he harnesses that impulse to turn in his best performance in at least
fifteen years.  There is a wonderful sequence during the second half of
the film in which Lefty and Donnie head down to Miami to investigate an
opportunity running a night club.  Lefty sees the club as his big chance
to strike out and accomplish something on his own, and he sets up a
meeting with Miami's local boss to get the necessary permission.  When the
Miami boss shows up for the meeting, however, he is accompanied by Lefty's
own boss Sonny Black (Michael Madsen), who has decided to take charge of
the enterprise himself.  As we watch Lefty fold in on himself in
disappointment -- compounded by the fact that he believes Donnie has
stabbed him in the back to earn Sonny's favor -- it is impossible not to
feel sympathy for him.  What makes the situation even more pathetic is
that the club is a front for yet another FBI undercover man, making
Lefty's lost dream an illusion from the start.  Pacino's performance is
sweet, crude, funny and haunted, and gives DONNIE BRASCO an unexpected
emotional pull.
     Lefty's hard life is made all the more tragic by the way organized
crime is portrayed.  Under the direction of Mike Newell (FOUR WEDDINGS AND
A FUNERAL), DONNIE BRASCO doesn't crackle with the same energy as films
set in this world made by Scorsese or DePalma, but it is a different
impression of mob life Newell and gifted screenwriter Paul Attanasio (QUIZ
SHOW) are after.  Where other films have made mob life seem terribly
attractive and glamorous, DONNIE BRASCO shows it as petty and tedious.
Sonny Black's crew is always looking for a decent new idea while making do
with hijacking trucks full of razor blades and breaking open sawed-off
parking meters, and their scramble to make the weekly payment to the big
boss makes them just as desperate as salesmen trying to meet a quota.
There is nothing Shakespearean about the power struggles in DONNIE BRASCO.
They are more like inter-office bickering gone haywire, and the rare (but
extremely graphic) moments of violence leave everyone's hands dirty.  The
beauty of Attanasio's script -- and Pacino's performance -- are that they
make Lefty's dedication to his role as lowest man in the lowest crew
something touching.  What begins as the story of a troubled undercover man
is someone else's story by the conclusion:  the story of the Willy Loman
of wiseguys.

Title
Review for Floundering (1994)
Starring:  James LeGros, Nelson Lyon.
Screenwriter/Director:  Peter McCarthy.
     John Boyz (James LeGros) is FLOUNDERING.  In the days immediately
following the Rodney King verdict riots, Los Angeles resident John is
unemployed, plagued by insomnia and filled with an overwhelming sense
of despair.  And that's the good news.  In the course of one day, John
finds his meager savings confiscated by the IRS, his unemployment
benefits cut off, his girlfriend in bed with another man and his strung
out brother in need of a $3000 detox program.  Teetering on the edge of
sanity, John finds himself on a comic odyssey dominated by the spectre
of class revolution and the visage of fascistic Police Chief Merryl
Fence (Nelson Lyon).
     This is the first directorial effort by Peter McCarthy, producer
of such films as REPO MAN and TAPEHEADS, and those credits should tell
you all you need to know about the style and tone of FLOUNDERING.  It's
a hilariously surreal examination of urban paranoia and hopelessness,
filled with oddball characters, goofy stream-of-consciousness narrative
and instantly quotable lines.  FLOUNDERING is told through a voiceover
narration by John, but it's not so much about John as it is about the
chaotic world around him.  John is only the tour guide, but his
observations are wonderfully off-the-wall:
     On the destruction in South Central L.A.:  "Maybe we should leave
it as a reminder...then [Peter] Ueberroth will turn it into a riot
theme park."
     On romance:  "True love is the ultimate fiction...if you ever walk
into a room and find yourself instantly attracted to someone, get out
of that room as fast as you can."
     On a sign in a bakery that reads, "Please don't feed the homeless
beggars:"  "Who the h*** should you feed?"
     McCarthy's script is rich with such moments.  Unfortunately, it's
also rich with heavy-handed left-wing moralizing which could easily
turn off those with differing points of view.  Characters representing
"The System," like Chief Fence and John's teacher- turned-corporate
bigwig friend Doug, are essentially cardboard cutouts used to mouth
opposing dogma.  It's therefore very fortunate that so many of the
other minor roles are so funny.  Many of them are played by "name"
actors in cameos, like John Cusack as a philosophical party-goer, Steve
Buscemi as a friend of John's angry about child slavery rings, and
Ethan Hawke as John's paranoid brother.  In the middle of it all is
James LeGros as John, who adapts an appropriately blank Young Everyman
quality.  He's a guy with a good heart who finds himself overwhelmed by
the apparent injustices in his world and his feelings of powerlessness
to do anything about it.  The snapshots taken by his mental camera
provide a bitingly satirical collage of urban life, but surprisingly
McCarthy doesn't opt for utter cynicism.  Instead, he manages to
balance black-humored sarcasm and social commentary with an ultimately
optimistic message of personal responsibility.  For those who enjoy
their comedy with an edge and don't mind the occasional preaching,
there's a real winner to be found in FLOUNDERING.
     Besides, how can you not love a film that ends with two
guitarists, one black and one white, singing a marvelously off-key duet
of "(What's So Funny 'Bout) Peace, Love and Understanding?"

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
THE NEGOTIATOR
(Warner Bros./New Regency)
Starring:  Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey, David Morse, Ron Rifkin, J. T.
Walsh, John Spencer, Paul Giamatti, Siobhan Fallon.
Screenplay:  James DeMonaco and Kevin Fox.
Producers:  Arnon Milchan and David Hoberman.
Director:  F. Gary Gray.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  137 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Sometimes it's obvious that a film isn't about the plot, it's about
the names above the title.  COCKTAIL was no more a coming-of-age story
than it was a geopolitical thriller; it was about Tom Cruise smiling and
mixing drinks.  UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL was about as interested in
journalistic ethics as the National Enquirer; it was really about Robert
Redford and Michelle Pfeiffer sharing soft-focus love scenes.  And could
you differentiate between any two non-TERMINATOR Schwarzenegger action
films with a gun to your head?  For better or for worse -- more often the
latter, contemporary Hollywood films often sell personalities rather than
stories.
     If you watched commercials or previews for THE NEGOTIATOR closely
enough, you'd realize that Warner Bros. isn't selling us a story about a
veteran Chicago hostage negotiator named Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson)
who takes hostages in a police building after he's framed for insurance
fraud and the murder of his partner (Paul Guilfoyle).  It's not about the
cool negotiator named Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey) whom Roman demands as
his police liaison.  No, THE NEGOTIATOR is about a showdown between
Jackson and Spacey, two actors whose intensity and burning intelligence
make them magnetically watchable.  Even with theatrical trailers awash in
spraying bullets and shattering glass, you expect that the real warfare
will be psychological, a chess match as much between Jackson and Spacey as
between the characters they play.
     If THE NEGOTIATOR had delivered on that promise, it would have been
one of those rare exceptions where a "personality plot" would have been
the right choice.  You just know it's headed in the wrong direction when
it becomes clear how much time will be spent figuring out who's behind the
police conspiracy to set up Roman.  Is it internal affairs inspector
Niebaum (the late J. T. Walsh)?  Grandfatherly Commander Frost (Ron
Rifkin)?  Hard-nosed Commander Beck (David Morse)?  Mission chief Travis
(John Spencer)?  Will the mysterious informant turn up?  Will computer
files tell all?
     Who cares?  For all the sound and fury surrounding both the
conspiracy and the attempts to take Roman by force, THE NEGOTIATOR is
built on the clash of two characters who win not by shooting faster, but
by thinking faster, by turning words into their most effective weapons.
Jackson and Spacey take the two similar roles and turn them into distinct
individuals so deftly that the slices of family life provided as
back-story seem embarrassingly clumsy by contrast.  In Jackson's hands,
Roman is less a super-cop on a quest for justice than he is an arrogant
super-star who can't believe he's being treated like an ordinary citizen.
The flicker of instability which makes it possible to believe he'd kill
contrasts perfectly with the icy resolve of Spacey's Sabian.  When those
two characters lock wits and eyes, each struggling to size the other up
and determine whether he's an ally or an adversary, THE NEGOTIATOR is
compelling stuff.
     Those moments just don't come nearly often enough.  Spacey doesn't
make his first appearance until nearly 45 minutes have passed, leaving
plenty of time for the film to detour onto well-worn action-suspense
avenues.  Though Paul Giamatti (fast becoming the most recognizable
unknown actor in movies) provides solid comic relief as a con artist among
Roman's hostages, even the one-liners further emphasize that this drama
really isn't anything special.  It could have been and should have been
more than another DIE HARD clone, more than an over-long mystery where you
begin to feel you should leave as soon as you figure out the real bad guy.
THE NEGOTIATOR should have played to the strength of its cast, with more
scenes of Roman reducing his colleagues to blubbering bowls of putting, or
Sabian taking control of a room with the force of his confidence.  It's a
disappointing reverse-tease:  with two great stars to show off, it has the
nerve to go and offer us a plot.

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
Starring:  John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Willis, Uma Thurman,
           Ving Rhames, Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Harvey Keitel.
Screenplay/Director:  Quentin Tarantino.
     According to all evidence, PULP FICTION is going to be one of
those movies that turns people into incarnations of Beavis and
Butthead; either it "sucks" or it "kicks ass," apparently with no
tenable middle ground.  This of course is the natural course of things
for films as unique as PULP FICTION.  The same thing happened with
NATURAL BORN KILLERS already this year, as proponents and detractors
exchanged ad hominem volleys.  Quentin Tarantino's stunning sophomore
effort deserves better.  It is the kind of film, imperfect though it
may be, which should inspire discussion about how exciting the medium
can be.  There are more moments in this one film which awed me to
silence than in every other 1994 release combined, and while its faults
may not allow it to stand as the year's best film, it's certainly
close.
     PULP FICTION is divided into segments telling interlocking tales
about a group of shady characters.  Vincent Vega (John Travolta) and
Jules Winfield (Samuel L. Jackson) are enforcers for crime boss
Marsellus Wallace (Ving Rhames).  Vincent is asked by Marsellus to take
care of his wife Mia (Uma Thurman) while he is out of town, leading to
an adventurous night out.  Marsellus, meanwhile, is arranging for boxer
Butch Coolidge (Bruce Willis) to throw a fight, which Butch doesn't do
when he figures he can clean up by winning.  Then, in an
out-of-sequence flashback, Vincent and Jules deal with an inadvertent
killing, and a pair of madly in love robbers (Tim Roth and Amanda
Plummer) in a diner.
     This is what must be said about PULP FICTION: few films in the
last fifteen years have left me so charged with the pure gonzo thrill
of movie-making.  Has there been a more erotically charged conversation
than that between Vincent and Mia at a gaudy 50's-style burger joint?
Has the flushing of a toilet ever caused such a combination of laughter
and suspense.  And has any scene caused an entire audience to squirm
quite so violently as a spectacular moment involving an overdose victim
and a six inch hypodermic needle?  Quentin Tarantino refuses to let any
moment just sit there; relationships between characters crackle with
intensity, and darkly comic punch lines are spit out like bullets.  I
left PULP FICTION feeling as though I had not simply watched a movie,
but *experienced* one.  I was exhausted.
     However, it would be a mistake to suggest that there is nothing to
PULP FICTION but its visceral impact.  Tarantino does not place his
characters in a universe of amoral anarchy; as RESERVOIR DOGS first
indicated, he is fascinated with loyalty and moments of improbable
selflessness.  Two such moments provide the moral backbone of PULP
FICTION.  In one, Bruce Willis' Butch makes a decision which could cost
him his life--even if he is successful--all to save another human being
from torture.  In the other, Samuel L. Jackson's Jules undergoes a sort
of conversion, and in the course of explaining his actions gives one of
the most stunning speeches in recent memory.  Both are showcases for
career performances.  Willis is better than his previous work had ever
so much as hinted at, while Jackson delivers what is quite simply the
best performance in an American film this year.  It is at these moments
when PULP FICTION, for all its frantic energy, reveals its real
message:  even in a world this violent, salvation is possible.
     The only real problem with PULP FICTION is a significant lag
between the marvelous middle segment and Jackson's tour-de-force
monologue.  It consists of the appearance of a low-key fixer named
Winston Wolf (Harvey Keitel) who helps Vincent and Jules clean up after
their car gets unexpectedly messy, and it never really develops the
momentum that the Travolta/Thurman and Willis/Rhames segments do.  But
Tarantino brackets that lull with such sheer cinematic glory, that the
sour taste doesn't linger.  PULP FICTION is violent, profane and filled
with addicts, racists and killers.  At the same time, it may be one of
the most moral stories the big screen has seen in years.  That
Tarantino was able to pull off that little maneuver says as much about
his talent as a dozen Palmes d'Or.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
REINDEER GAMES
(Dimension)
Starring:  Ben Affleck, Gary Sinise, Charlize Theron, Clarence Williams
III, Danny Trejo, Donal Logue, James Frain, Dennis Farina.
Screenplay:  Ehren Kruger.
Producers:  Marty Katz, Bob Weinstein and Chris Moore.
Director:  John Frankenheimer.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I did not out-guess the first released film from an Ehren Kruger
script, ARLINGTON ROAD. Nor did I out-guess the second released film from
an Ehren Kruger script, SCREAM 3. Kruger has shown himself to be
particularly fascinated with labyrinthine plot developments, the kind of
stuff that's supposed to leave an audience thinking, "Ooooooh, I didn't
see that coming." In ARLINGTON ROAD, however, you _could_ have seen it
coming. The twist _was_ the story, brilliantly re-casting the entire film
as a retrospective experience. SCREAM 3 twisted because it had to, and you
got the sense that any one of a dozen possible endings would have seemed
just as plausible. REINDEER GAMES would be round three, perhaps proving
which of Kruger's first two scripts was the exception, and which was the
rule.
     Once again, I did not out-guess Kruger. And, as with SCREAM 3, it
didn't really matter. REINDEER GAMES stars Ben Affleck as Rudy Duncan, a
convicted car thief nearing the end of his sentence in a Michigan prison.
When his cellmate Nick (James Frain) is stabbed during a riot the day
before their scheduled release, Rudy sees an opportunity to hook up with
the gorgeous pen pal named Ashley (Charlize Theron) with whom Nick has
been corresponding. Posing as the pen pal Ashley has never seen, Rudy gets
a wild night with Ashley. Then things get much wilder when Ashley's
psychotic brother Gabriel (Gary Sinise) shows up. He believes "Nick" has
insider information about a reservation casino where he used to work, and
which Gabriel and his colleagues plan to hold up. A reluctant Rudy
therefore finds himself forced to mastermind a heist in a place he has
never been.
     Admittedly, it's sort of a nifty premise. The road to much cinematic
garbage has also been littered with nifty premises. REINDEER GAMES may not
be garbage, but there's also nothing that builds a sense of identification
with the film's ostensible hero. Affleck is a pleasant enough performer,
and he's certainly built like an action star, but there's something he
lacks as a screen actor. Despite the fact that most of his roles to date
have required him to lose his temper, there never seems to be an edge to
Affleck's performances. There's nothing behind his words; when he yells,
he's yelling lines of dialogue. Any attempts the film makes to dig into
who Rudy is, or why he does what he does, feel pointless. As the film's
central character, Affleck is just occupying space.
     Of course, genre films like REINDEER GAMES often don't ask more of
its characters. This one hits a few high notes along the way when Kruger
just decides to tell an action-filled story. He's got a great director for
that kind of work in John Frankenheimer, who knows how to make the most of
dialogue-free mayhem. He's got a top-notch villain in Gary Sinise (though
you could argue that his characterization doesn't make much sense once all
the pieces of the plot fall into place). And he's got Charlize Theron,
who's as easy on the eyes as anyone working in film (and, if I'm any
judge, destined to be considered like Michelle Pfeiffer as an extremely
talented actress once people can get past how breathtakingly gorgeous she
is). The casino heist itself is appropriately frantic, and plenty of
Kruger's small script moments along the way are slick enough to keep a
viewer interested.
     Then come the double-crosses, triple-crosses and quadruple-crosses so
fast and so frequent that another one is upon you before you can remember 
the prefix for the next "-uple" you're up to. There's no question that the
events in the final half-hour of REINDEER GAMES prove surprising, in the
sense that the average viewer probably won't expect them. It's also true
that they don't matter in the slightest except as a sort of false
cleverness. Not only are they arbitrary -- I dare anyone to watch the film
a second time and spot a single clue that points in the right direction --
but they're insulting in a film that then goes on to make the denouement 
an act of supreme stupidity (hint: try not to leave a trail to your
whereabouts if you're leaving the scene of a crime). For a simple genre
story, REINDEER GAMES ties itself up in far too many unnecessary knots. 
Kruger has shown himself to be smarter than your average screenwriter. 
He has also shown that he can be too interested in proving it.

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
THE 13th WARRIOR
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Antonio Banderas, Vladimir Kulich, Dennis Storhoi, Omar Sharif,
Diane Venora.
Screenplay:  William Wisher and Warren Lewis, based on "Eaters of the
Dead" by Michael Crichton.
Producers:  John McTiernan, Michael Crichton and Ned Dowd.
Director:  John McTiernan.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, adult themes)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     From the Department of Token Praise:  Give John McTiernan and Michael
Crichton some credit for an action film in which the hero is an Arab.
After years of Middle Eastern fanatics as Hollywood's favorite post-Cold
War villains, THE 13th WARRIOR features as its protagonist Ahmed Ibn
Fahdlan (Antonio Banderas, looking somber and pensive in heavy eye liner),
a diplomat and poet in 10th century Baghdad.  Banished to an unpleasant
nomadic ambassadorship after a dalliance with a powerful man's wife, Ibn
Fahdlan happens upon a group of Norsemen who have recently lost their
king.  When another king sends word that help is needed against a hideous
foe, the heir apparent Buliwyf (Vladimir Kulich) leads a band of thirteen
warriors -- including the reluctant Ibn Fahdlan -- to defeat the ghoulish
Wendol, who eat those they slay.
     All right, so the Arab hero is played by a Spaniard -- Hollywood
needs to crawl before it can stagger in a remotely straight line.  The
problem with THE 13th WARRIOR isn't its multicultural sensitivity, but the
unlikely context in which that subtext is placed.  At its core, the film
is the kind of swords-and-shields romp little seen since the early '80s
heyday of Schwarzenegger as CONAN THE BARBARIAN and Singer as THE
BEASTMASTER.  There are dimly lit battles, inhuman foes, tankards of ale
and much bonding between brothers-in-arms.  That the bonding occurs
between rambunctious polytheistic Nordic guys and a devout Muslim gives
the narrative a funky anachronistic flavor -- "Dungeons and Dragons" for
the "why can't we all just get along" '90s.
     There's nothing automatically off-putting about watching men
exchanging prayers in the first millennium -- it's not as though the 20th
century introduced the concept of tolerance.  It just happens to be the
most obvious example of THE 13th WARRIOR's insistence on attending to
subplots and subtext when it hasn't provided the basic framework for an
adventure.  Ibn Fahdlan's Norse comrades are so interchangeable and
lacking in personality that the press notes identify them both by name and
by some trait that might jog the memory -- "Helfdane (Fat)," "Ragnar
(Dour)," and so on.  The Wendol remain shadowy and indistinct, never
developing into truly threatening villains despite the gasps that
accompany the mention of their name.  Meanwhile, there's time spent on a
blink-and-you'll-miss-it romantic interlude for Ibn Fahdlan, and a bit of
Norse political intrigue which exists largely to provide one character a
chance to scowl and flip his fur cloak dramatically every time he appears
on screen.  Thank heavens for the occasional anarchic battle scene to
remind us that this is in fact an adventure film.
     Those battle scenes certainly serve their visceral purpose, perhaps
enough so to please the blood 'n' guts crowd.  It's just that the whole
mess is often too busy to get down to business.  In an early scene, Ibn
Fahdlan and his travelling companion Melchisidek (Omar Sharif) meet with
the Norsemen for the first time.  While Buliwyf speaks in Norwegian, one
of his men (Dennis Storhoi) translates into Latin for Melchisidek, who
then translates into Arabic (which we hear as English) for Ibn Fahdlan.
On the one hand, it's sort of a nice touch, emphasizing the culture clash
with which Ibn Fahdlan must contend; on the other hand, it makes the scene
such a jumble of cuts and translations that it grows dizzying.  McTiernan
has toyed with a pseudo-profound action film, and wound up with only a
pseudo-action film, another noble effort to file in the Department of
Token Praise.

Title
Review for Kama Sutra: A Tale of Love (1996)
(Trimark)
Starring:  Indira Varma, Sarita Choudhury, Naveen Andrews, Ramon Tikaram,
Rekha.
Screenplay:  Mira Nair and Helena Kriel.
Producers:  Mira Nair and Lydia Dean Pilcher.
Director:  Mira Nair.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is a frequent lament of critics that movies today seem to be
churned out on conveyor belts, each new release looking and sounding just
like the one which preceded it.  Rare is the film to appear on American
screens which shows audiences a completely different world, a world like
the 16th century Indian kingdom which is the setting for KAMA SUTRA: A
TALE OF LOVE.  In this case, however, I think I understand _why_ we have
never seen this world before:  apparently, it was the Cradle of
Monotony.  KAMA SUTRA is a ridiculously tedious study of Indian power
politics in which writer/director Mira Nair manages to take exotic
locations, torture and plenty of sex and weave them into an uninvolving
bore.
     KAMA SUTRA is the tale of a friendship between two young women in
India -- Tara (Sarita Choudhury), a high caste princess, and a servant
named Maya (Indira Varma).  Maya's beauty and sensuality inspire great
envy in Tara, but it is Tara who is taken in marriage by the powerful
prince Raj Singh (Naveen Andrews).  An angry Maya seduces Raj Singh on his
wedding day, and finds herself exiled when her actions are discovered.
Maya is then taken in by a sculptor named Jai Kumar (Ramon Tikaram), and
the two begin an affair which Jai finds hard to reconcile with his
artistic life.  When Maya is rejected by Jai, she decides to train with
Rasa Devi (Rekha) to become a concubine, and eventually finds herself once
again entangled with Tara and Raj Singh in a struggle for power in the
palace.
     For about ten minutes, the glorious production design of Mark
Friedberg and the cinematography of Declan Quinn might allow you to
forgive the plodding pace.  Relish those minutes as you would relish water
in the desert.  KAMA SUTRA rolls along like a block of granite, moving
from scene to scene with a wearying lack of grace.  Nearly every character
is one-dimensional, and that one dimension tends to be sullen and
unlikeable; Indira Varma at least has a certain fresh appeal, but the
script turns her into a Disney cartoon heroine trying to find something
more from life (though I don't imagine Uncle Walt would approve of that
"something" being life in a harem).  The relationships and conflicts
between the characters don't provide much more worth caring about,
displaying the kind of melodrama which would make Aaron Spelling blush.  
As KAMA SUTRA wanders into its second hour, you may find yourself at your
watch every five minutes and feeling as though it were moving backwards.
     You'd think that a film named after an ancient book of sexual wisdom
at least might generate some heat, and unfortunately you would be sadly
mistaken.  There is a fair amount of skin in KAMA SUTRA, and a few lengthy
sex scenes, but without any real passion or connection developed between
the characters Nair's direction makes those scenes look like the soft-core
porn of a Playboy instructional video.  Even those scenes don't make sex
seem as abstract and impersonal as the occasional snippets of Kama Sutran
erotic philosophy dispensed by Rasa Devi.  Overseeing the kind of classes
which would definitely get her in hot water with any P.T.A. in this
country, Rasa Devi holds forth on the mystical nature of sexuality like a
cross between Dr. Ruth and Yoda, except slightly taller.  If someone from
another culture were to learn from KAMA SUTRA, it is that a droning
lecture on sex can be just as soporific as a droning lecture on any other
subject.
     The most distressing thing about KAMA SUTRA is what a conventional
story it turns out to be, its unique setting notwithstanding.  Peel away
the fuzzy-focus scenes of toe kissing and back scratching and you have a
predictable romantic four-some complicated by class, like a Jane Austen
novel with saris.  Nair and co-scripter Helena Kriel seem so desperate to
make KAMA SUTRA seem like a metaphor for something that they toss in a
military sub-plot about intrigue to overthrow Raj Singh which gives the
film an overtone of RICHARD III; there is even a hunchback prince as a
particular reminder.  Perhaps the libidinous, opium-smoking Raj Singh is
meant to represent the corrupting influence of lust untempered by love,
which may at least provide a whisper of a message in keeping with the Kama
Sutra.  It's still not nearly enough to make KAMA SUTRA worth two hours of
your life, even with the opportunity in the final moments to see a man
executed by being stepped on by an elephant.  If this is what passes for
showing us new worlds in the movies, sign me up for another year of
National Geographic.

Title
Review for Quick and the Dead, The (1995)
     Something happens when innovative, independent directors "go
Hollywood," and it's not usually a good something.  Some directors
are ready-made for the pressures and compromises involved in working
with big stars and big budgets; others are so clearly out of their
element that you can see them straining against the strictures of
studio projects.  Sam Raimi, director of the goofy and off-beat EVIL
DEAD films, was hand-picked by Sharon Stone to helm THE QUICK AND
THE DEAD, and it looks like he had some interesting ideas about how
to turn it inot a cock-eyed parody of spaghetti westerns.  Instead,
it's not played with enough of a wink, and it becomes an extremely
repetitive story muddled by tone shifts and unnecessary sub-plots.
     In THE QUICK AND THE DEAD, Sharon Stone rides into the tiny
Western town of Redemption as a Woman With No Name who later turns
out to be named Ellen.  The occasion is the annual quick-draw
contest organized by John Herod (Gene Hackman), a wealthy gunman who
rules the town with an iron fist.  Also among the entrants are the
cocky Kid (Leonardo DiCaprio), who has something to prove to Herod,
and Cort (Russell Crowe), a former riding partner of Herod's who
wants to make a new start but finds it denied to him.  As the
contest progresses and pretenders fall by the wayside, Ellen
prepares for a showdown with Herod which will end a twenty year
nightmare and bring redemption to Redemption.
     As THE QUICK AND THE DEAD opens, it appears that Raimi was
ready and able to turn it into a light-hearted and knowing homage.
Smoking a hand-rolled cigarette, wearing a wide-brimmed sombrero and
sporting a serape over her shoulder, Stone enters Redemption at high
noon looking like nothing so much as Clint Eastwood with a sex
change.  She runs into the obligatory collection of greasy
gunfighters with gold teeth, and dispatches them with a well-aimed
quip.  A few of the early gunfights are handled with typical Raimi
panache, including liberal use of the trackback/zoom in camera
movement utilized by Hitchcock and Spielberg most notably.
Everywhere there are glimpses of Raimi's twisted sense of humor,
nowhere more so than in a gunfight which ends with the loser staring
down at his shadow and noticing a hole in it.
     But that's all we get in THE QUICK AND THE DEAD -- glimpses.
Where Raimi wants self-awareness, screenwriter Simon Moore delivers
a fairly standard Western revenge saga.  The story has potential,
and particularly when a flashback reveals the source of Ellen's
grief there is evidence of some compelling psychological background.
There are also too many distracting side stories along the way, and
that is where Moore blunders and finds his story bogging way, way
down.  The simmering animosity between Ellen and Herod works, most
effectively in a tense confrontation at a dinner table; the rivalry
between the Kid and Herod doesn't.  The relationship between Cort
and Herod might have been exploited better, but for the most part
Cort is playing a part culled entirely from Eastwood's penitent
gunslingers in PALE RIDER and UNFORGIVEN.
     And this is the real knock on THE QUICK AND THE DEAD:  without
a real focus on Raimi's satirical sensibilities and acrobatic camera
tricks, it's just a less-than-mediocre knock-off of Eastwood's
oeuvre.  Gene Hackman is a marvelous villain, oozing despicable
charm, but his presence only magnifies the comparisons to
UNFORGIVEN, and when he exposes a boastful gunman (Lance Henriksen)
as a fraud, it sounds exactly like his debunking of English Bob's
self-aggrandizing tales in that earlier film.  Sharon Stone is
surprisingly effective as the haunted vengeance-seeker, but
ultimately she too is lost in a story that doesn't really seem to
have a sense of purpose.  THE QUICK AND THE DEAD boasts some fine
cinematography by Dante Spinotti and a wonderfully dilapidated
production design, and they could have been used in the service of a
nice piece of parody.  Unfortunately, Raimi couldn't or wouldn't let
the throttle out, and THE QUICK AND THE DEAD stalls when it's played
far too straight.

Title
Review for Surviving Picasso (1996)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Natascha McElhone, Julianne Moore.
Screenplay:  Ruth Prawer Jhabvala.
Producers:  Ismail Merchant, David L. Wolper.
Director:  James Ivory.
MPAA Rating:  R (brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm not sure what it is that inspired the highly respected Merchant
Ivory production team to turn from fiction to biography, but I wish they
would drop it already.  For years, director James Ivory, producer Ismail
Merchant and screenwriter Ruth Prawer Jhabvala turned out exceptionally
well-crafted adaptations of novels commonly held to be too difficult to
film:  A ROOM WITH A VIEW, HOWARDS END, THE REMAINS OF THE DAY.  Then last
year they made JEFFERSON IN PARIS, a study of Thomas Jefferson in which
Nick Nolte looked as bored in the title role as the audience must have
been watching him.  SURVIVING PICASSO is not nearly as paralyzingly dull,
but it demonstrates once again that real people seem to elude Ivory and
company.
     Frequent Merchant Ivory collaborator Anthony Hopkins stars as
celebrated artist Pablo Picasso, who is a living legend in his 60s when
the film opens in occupied Paris in 1943.  Picasso is all too aware of his
own celebrity, and uses it to seduce impressionable young women like
aspiring artist Francoise Gilot (Natascha McElhone).  Francoise becomes
his lover and the mother of two of his children, despite knowledge of the
previous lovers Picasso has taken in and abandoned like Marie-Therese
(Susannah Harker) and Dora (Julianne Moore), to say nothing of his wife
Olga (Jane Lapotaire).  Francoise believes it will be different with her,
but eventually discovers that Picasso uses far more than he loves.
     SURVIVING PICASSO is a particularly frustrating piece of work because
you can see what it is Ivory was trying to do.  Francoise is introduced
early as a strong-willed woman who risks the wrath of her domineering
father (Bob Peck) when she decides to pursue her artistic career, setting
up a conflict between Francoise and Picasso in which he has greater
difficulty reducing her to yet another of his weeping conquests.
McElhone, a newcomer with piercing eyes, brings out the intelligence in
Francoise, but she becomes a distressingly passive character, even more so
when she becomes a narrator for flashbacks.  Her unique personality has
little chance to emerge, and even seems to be contradicted directly by a
voice-over near the end in which Francoise notes that Picasso "made me
strong."  It is a baffling conclusion, since she seems infinitely stronger
before their relationship begins.
     Picasso himself is similarly enigmatic, played by Anthony Hopkins as
an egomanical bon vivant, turning his fame into a method for making people
feel insignificant, and honored merely to be in his presence.  Ivory and
Jhabvala do a fine job of showing us the effect of Picasso's behavior on
those around him, but they are much less effective at showing us the man
himself.  It does not help that we are never able to see Picasso's own
work to reflect his personality (his estate did not allow them to be
used), making his art little more than a footnote to SURVIVING PICASSO.
The film-makers remain distant, showing us bits and pieces of Picasso's
life, like a speech to a Communist Party conference, without connecting
them to the man he became.  We are never allowed inside the passionate
artist; Hopkins is technically proficient, wandering accent
notwithstanding, but his is a role which seems designed to be observed
rather than understood.
     You can always count on a Merchant Ivory film to look splendid, and
there is superb work once again from cinematographer Tony Pierce-Roberts
and production designer Lucianna Arrighi.  It is a beautiful environment
they have created for this story, but the characters in that environment
are disappointing.  There are several moments in SURVIVING PICASSO which
inspire a curiosity about this fascinating man, notably his rivalry
with contemporary Henri Matisse (Joss Ackland), but there is always the
nagging sense, as there was in JEFFERSON IN PARIS, that Ivory doesn't
really have a point of view.  His biographies are safe, almost documentary
detailings of events in an individual's life which do not add up to a
story.  Picasso and Jefferson were both fascinating historical figures
with private and public lives full of contradictions, and they should have
made for great drama.  Ivory simply seems too respectful of his subjects,
content to lay out events like they might appear in a history text without
much in the way of interpretation.  The irony is that he has been able to
take far more internalized fictional characters, like THE REMAINS OF THE
DAY's James Stevens, and make them extraordinarily vivid.  He has not
shown the same facility with bringing life to characters who actually
lived.

Title
Review for Tin Cup (1996)
     Ron Shelton appears to understand two things better than any other
contemporary film-maker:  sports, and Kevin Costner.  Put a sports movie
in the hands of almost any other director, and you get the feeling that
they're just biding their time until the big climactic game/fight/match;
put Kevin Costner in the hands of almost any other director, and you find
the thin-voiced actor placed in the uncomfortable position of playing
commanding and heroic.  When the two men joined forced previously, for
1988's BULL DURHAM, the result was one of the best and funniest sports
films ever, and probably Costner's best performance ever.  That casually
charming Costner is re-born in TIN CUP, yet another superior Shelton
sports film overflowing with pleasures.
     Costner plays Roy "Tin Cup" McAvoy, a one-time college golf star now
reduced to operating a run-down driving range in the west Texas town of
Salome.  He also gives lessons, and one of his students is Dr. Molly
Griswold (Rene Russo), a therapist newly arrived in Salome who immediately
captures Roy's fancy.  Unfortunately, Molly is already involved with David
Simms (Don Johnson), a tour pro who used to be Ray's college team-mate and
now is his rival.  Roy is determined to win Molly over by playing in the
U. S. Open, but first he needs to overcome the quality which sunk his
professional prospects, his insistence on going for the impossible shot
rather than playing the percentages.  For that he will require someone to
help him with his "head game," and the only therapist in town happens to
be Molly.
     There are a lot of Kevin Costner bashers out there -- I have been
known to be one of them -- who have forgotten that he became a star in
films like BULL DURHAM and FIELD OF DREAMS which allowed him to be warm,
funny and approachable.  That is too bad, but it happened because Costner
himself and plenty of other directors forgot, too.  They keep trying to
turn him into an icon -- witness ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THIEVES, JFK, WYATT
EARP and WATERWORLD -- and he generally winds up looking sour and 
constipated throughout.  TIN CUP is a reminder of Costner at his best,
boyishly handsome and with an equally boyish temperament, and he has so
much effortless fun playing Roy that it is nearly impossible not to have
fun with him.  He is like a Little League player who never out-grew Little
League, always swinging for the fences and always eager to please.
Costner manages to make immaturity incredibly endearing.
     Shelton has given Costner a great character to work with, and has
fashioned a great story around that character.  BULL DURHAM was so
authentic in its detail about minor league baseball that it was easy to
overlook the fact that Shelton made a film that wasn't just about
baseball.  It was about playing a game because you loved it so much you
couldn't imagine doing anything else, and the frustration of seeing a
player with less love (Tim Robbins' Nuke LaLoosh) have so much more
talent.  This time, Costner gets to play the equivalent of Nuke, a player
with "a million dollar arm and a fifty cent head," in a story that is not
just about golf.  Roy's problem is that he understands all too well that
fans don't watch professional sports to see the steady hitter, the guy who
runs the precise receiving route, or the guy who can make all his free
throws; they watch to see the home run hitter, the flashy runner, or the
360 degree dunk.  Roy could never be the steady player because he is too
obsessed with creating that moment of glory, and it is both an
acknowledgment and a subversion of the way sports movies are supposed to
end when Roy finally gets that moment of glory.
     That is what makes a Ron Shelton sports movie better than anyone
else's sports movies:  he has a better understanding of the way fans and
players think.  He also knows how to create scenes which sing with
unexpected wit.  Roy is always willing to take a bet on an improbable
shot, and some of TIN CUP's best moments involve those bets, including one
in which Roy uses a bag of garden tools to play.  Shelton also gives his
actors subtly eccentric characters to play, with tremendous results.  Rene
Russo is sexy and off-center as Molly, Don Johnson is a perfect arrogant
foil, and Cheech Marin does superb supporting work as Roy's friend and
caddy Romeo.  Only the leisurely, golf-like pace of TIN CUP proves
troubling -- at 135 minutes, it has a few too many dead spots, and a
rather unnecessary tangent involving Roy's stripper ex-girlfriend.  But by
the time TIN CUP ends, those moments will have been forgotten.  You'll be
thinking about how smartly and cleverly Ron Shelton can write a sports
film, how good Kevin Costner can be in them, and how many sports might be
left on which they can collaborate.

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
     How whimsical and amusing does a film need to be before it ceases to
matter that it lacks a center -- not just that its center is slight, but
that it has no center whatsoever? Such a question plagued me at the end of
SAVING GRACE, a comedy with that uniquely British quirky appeal. It was a
pleasant enough experience for most of its running time, but what in the
world was the point? There are certain kinds of comedies that can get away
with a complete lack of an identifiably human character arc. This doesn't
seem like it should be one of them. How does one reconcile 90 minutes of
grins with the nagging impression that the script was in some ways
terribly sloppy?
     Perhaps the best course of action is simply to roll with it. It's
fairly easy to roll along with the story of Grace Trevethyn (Brenda
Blethyn), a recent widow and amateur horticulturist whose husband
apparently committed suicide. A possible reason for his action soon
becomes apparent to Grace: He has left a mountain of debt from failed
business ventures, and nothing but the Trevethyn's Cornish seaside manor
to pay it off. Faced with homelessness, Grace turns to risky fund-raising
venture. After using her greenhouse to revive the failing marijuana plants
of her groundskeeper Matthew (Craig Ferguson, who also co-wrote the 
script), Grace figures she can erase the debt by turning her home into a
hemp plantation. Grace and Matthew team up, trying to keep a low profile
in a small town before facing the even more daunting challenge of finding
a dealer to buy their crop.
     From the outset, SAVING GRACE seems to have nearly every element in
place for a wonderfully entertaining piece of middle-brow humor. Blethyn
anchors the film with a performance that's more restrained than recent
outings like LITTLE VOICE, effectively playing incongruous moments like
her attempts to sell her product on the streets of London while dressed
like the Queen Mum. There are well-crafted supporting characters like the
town's pot-head doctor (Martin Clunes) and edgy conspiracy theorist Harvey
(Tristan Sturrock), and a strong sense of place from the wild Cornish 
coast. Perhaps most refreshing, there's an unapologetic quality to the
film's just-say-yes story line. This is not the place to look for a strong
message condemning Grace's illegal activities; it's more the place to look
for scenes of elderly ladies making tea from some special leaves they find
in Grace's greenhouse.
     It's all quite a bit of silly fun for those with no moral objections,
until SAVING GRACE winds to its conclusion and it becomes evident that
there's something missing -- namely, a third act. It could have been about
Grace coming to terms with her late husband's secret life -- including an
affair with a chic Londoner (Diana Quick) -- or about a sheltered woman
forced to confront the real world. It could even have been about Matthew's
quest for responsibility under pressure from his girlfriend (Valerie 
Edmond), with Grace serving more as a colorful supporting character
herself than as the protagonist. But SAVING GRACE doesn't bother with
developing its characters. Grace doesn't appear to grow or learn much of
anything, and Matthew's change of heart is tacked on almost as an
afterthought. There's no sense of consequence anchoring anything that goes
on in SAVING GRACE, like the unemployed FULL MONTY crew's search for a
renewed sense of their manhood. It all begins to seem like little more
than an excuse on which to hang a bunch of jokes about giggle fits.
     That hole in the third act is filled by an odd visit to a roguish
French drug dealer (Tcheky Karyo), and by a postscript twist that comes
out of absolutely nowhere. It would feel like a complete violation of
Grace's character, if not for the fact that Grace's character isn't
developed carefully enough for there to be that much violation. Such
carelessness should be enough to sink a frothy enterprise like SAVING
GRACE, but somehow it doesn't quite. Too many of the quirks work, and too
many of the giggle fits inspire similar reactions from the audience. It's
no masterwork of comic craftsmanship, but it does the job of taking you
somewhere goofy and free of responsibility even though you know it's not
particularly good for you. And maybe that's a fitting quality for a film
about unapologetic pot smokers. Ninety minutes of grins sounds about
right.

Title
Review for Big Night (1996)
(Samuel Goldwyn/Rysher)
Starring:  Stanley Tucci, Tony Shalhoub, Ian Holm, Minnie Driver, Isabella
Rossellini.
Screenplay:  Stanley Tucci, Joseph Tropiano.
Producer:  Jonathan Filley.
Director:  Stanley Tucci, Campbell Scott.
Running Time:  108 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It probably says as much about me as it does about BIG NIGHT that I
consider it a remarkably insightful film about the state of contemporary
film-making.  Yes, BIG NIGHT is about food, and it is about the
relationship between two brothers, and it is about what it means to
participate in the American dream as well.  However, I think BIG NIGHT is
something particularly special for anyone who loves movies because of what
they can be.  It is a warm, engaging and extremely funny film which
manages not simply to describe the battle between art and commerce, but to
win it on behalf of the former.
     BIG NIGHT takes place in a Jersey shore town of the 1950s, where
brothers Primo (Tony Shalhoub) and Secondo Pilaggi (Stanley Tucci) run an
Italian restaurant called the Paradise.  Business is anything but
heavenly, though, as master chef Primo's insistence upon creating daring
traditional cuisine has not created the booming clientele enjoyed by the
Americanized bistro across the street, run by Pascal (Ian Holm).  Two
years of poor receipts have placed the Paradise on the brink of
foreclosure, but Pascal offers Primo a last chance.  Pascal suggests
inviting band leader Louie Prima, a personal friend, to dine at the
Paradise and create a media event which will boost business.  With nothing
to lose, Primo and Secondo throw everything they have left into one big
night, a sumptuous dinner which will either make them or break them.
     Stanley Tucci co-wrote (with his cousin Joseph Tropiano) and
co-directed with actor Campbell Scott) BIG NIGHT in addition to starring
in it, and he has created one of the year's most delightful character
studies.  His own character of Secondo is the film's central figure, but
all three main characters are superbly written and acted.  Tony Shalhoub
(TV's "Wings") is hilarious as Primo, whose passion for his cooking leads
to fits of pique over the "Philistines" who cannot appreciate his work,
but who has difficulty showing that passion to the florist (Allison
Janney) he secretly pines for.  Ian Holm has a tasty, showy role as the
unapologetically assimilated Pascal, who runs his restaurant like a
circus; Holm's accent is hit-and-miss, but his truly unprintable favorite
epithet for Secondo actually gets funnier every time he uses it.  Between
them is Secondo, with Tucci doing solid, subtle work as an immigrant
trying to navigate the treacherous course between tradition and
assimilation without committing fully to either one, but tending towards
his vision of the American dream.  His mockery of Primo's more broken
English begins as good-natured, but gradually it becomes indicative of
Secondo's frustration with his brother's steadfast refusal to compromise.
     It is this conflict which makes BIG NIGHT such a potent metaphor for
cinema in the 1990s.  Primo is an artist unwilling to compromise even if
it means alienating potential customers; Pascal is the capitalist who
believes that "if a guy wants a steak, you give him a steak."  Secondo
wants to have it both ways, to be the artist and the capitalist, but when
push comes to shove he finds himself more willing to compromise on the
art.  What BIG NIGHT ultimately argues is that somewhere along the line,
you have to choose between doing the work you know will make you proud and
doing the work you know will make you rich.  There is room for both, Tucci
suggests, but the greatest satisfaction comes from people loving the best
you had to give them.
     But whether you see BIG NIGHT as a simple tale of brotherly conflict
and fine dining or as a meditation on art as a consumer product, you
should see BIG NIGHT, because film-making simply doesn't get much more
satisfying.  Tucci, Scott and company have put together a banquet of
finely drawn characters, smart dialogue and assured direction, culminating
in an elaborate meal which might inspire you to the same conclusion which
leads one character to utter one of the year's best punch lines.  It also
ends with a wordless single take in which resolution is achieved with such
grace, simplicity and emotion that you could find yourself smiling all the
way out the door.  Primo states his believe in one scene that great food
is what "brings us closest to God," but that could be true of any true
work of art.  With BIG NIGHT, Stanley Tucci and a host of gifted
contributors have served up a small piece of Paradise.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
THE GREEN MILE
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Tom Hanks, David Morse, Michael Clarke Duncan, James Cromwell,
Bonnie Hunt, Michael Jeter, Doug Hutchison, Sam Rockwell.
Screenplay:  Frank Darabont, based on the serial novel by Stephen King.
Producers:  David Valdes and Frank Darabont.
Director:  Frank Darabont.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  183 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In a way, you've got to admire Frank Darabont's chutzpah. After
pulling off an acclaimed, remarkably assured film-making debut with THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION in 1994, Darabont could have named his next project,
at any time he wanted. Instead, he waited five years, then selected as his
next project another Stephen King adaptation. Another Stephen King period
piece adaptation. Another Stephen King period piece adaptation set in a
prison. As if a successful rookie director didn't face enough of a
challenge from high expectations, Darabont practically threw audiences and
critics a dare: "Go ahead -- say 'It's no SHAWSHANK.'"
     His incredibly nervy choice almost works ... almost. Set primarily in
1935, THE GREEN MILE tells the story of Paul Edgecombe (Tom Hanks), a
guard on a Louisiana death row cell block with the titular designation. 
The latest arrival is John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan), a hulk of a man
convicted of murdering two little girls found in his arms. Edgecombe is
surprised to discover that Coffey is gentle and quiet, but he's even more
surprised when Coffey begins exhibiting unique empathetic abilitites. As
life on the Mile continues, Edgecombe begins noticing even more unusual
things about John Coffey, leading him to suspect there's more to the man
than meets the eye.
     You're sure to see plenty of gripes about THE GREEN MILE that focus
on its three-hour-plus running time. It's a common and understandable
complaint in a year when 150+ minute running times are becoming standard
in "prestige films." However, the problem with THE GREEN MILE isn't simply
that it's long, but the way that it is long. Darabont's meticulous
attention to relating every event in the novel borders on fetishistic,
including encounters (like the one that permits a reunion between Hanks
and GUMP cast-mate Gary Sinise) that serve too little narrative purpose. 
THE GREEN MILE is never a bore during its three hours; indeed, it
consistently keeps you watching. This just isn't a story that builds to
anything compelling enough to warrant such epic length. Darabont's
adaptation doesn't show enough screenwriting creativity in transferring
the story to a cinematic context. Too often, it feels like a methodical
transcription.
     Darabont does have a way with actors, and that carries THE GREEN MILE
a long way. Michael Clarke Duncan is a shy and sympathetic Coffey, his
occasional moments of childlike wonder an effective balance against his
moments of anguish. There are two wonderfully wicked villains in sadistic,
nepotistically-advantaged guard Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchison) and
maniacal inmate "Wild Bill" Wharton (Sam Rockwell). And any film with
Bonnie Hunt is doing something right. There is, unfortunately, a hole at
the center, and that hole is named Tom Hanks. In THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION,
the soulfulness of Morgan Freeman's performance grounded the film whenever
Darabont got too operatic. That quality is missing from Hanks. Though his
character also isn't as complex as Red, his performance at times feels too
mannered. I kept imagining David Morse -- who plays Edgecombe's right-hand
man "Brutal" Howell -- in the lead role, and suspecting THE GREEN MILE
would have been a better film with Morse's dramatic presence. Watching
Hanks emoting with a Sothern accent just kept reminding me of Forrest
Gump.
     With Edgecombe serving as a less-than-engrossing narrator, it's too
easy to notice the aforementioned operatic qualities: tearful goodbyes, 
battles between good and evil, more exploding light bulbs than I've seen
since THE NATURAL. There is no denying that THE GREEN MILE is a
well-crafted film, and that Coffey becomes an extremely affecting
character. It just takes a long time to get there, a long time that could
have been shortened in a more efficient screenplay. Darabont is a talented
director, and a pretty good writer. He's also earned the right to be less
slavishly devoted to his source material. While we wait for his next
effort -- and I don't think there are any more Stephen King prison stories
sitting around waiting to be made -- we can only applaud him for taking a
unique risk. And we can say, with a tinge of regret, "It's no SHAWSHANK."

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
COP LAND
(Miramax)
Starring:  Sylvester Stallone, Harvey Keitel, Ray Liotta, Robert DeNiro,
Michael Rapaport, Annabella Sciorra, Robert Patrick, Peter Berg.
Screenplay:  James Mangold.
Producers:  Cary Woods, Cathy Konrad and Ezra Swerdlow.
Director:  James Mangold.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, brief nudity)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At the age of 50, Sylvester Stallone made a bold career move.  After
spending more than a decade making mega-millions for carrying flimsy films
on his broad shoulders, Stallone realized that he wasn't getting any
younger.  So he lobbied writer/director James Mangold for the lead role in
COP LAND, Mangold's gritty drama about a small New Jersey town populated
almost entirely by corrupt New York City cops.  He gained almost thirty
pounds for his role as affable Sheriff Freddy Heflin, and worked for
bargain basement wages.  He joined a cast of heavyweights like Robert
DeNiro and Harvey Keitel which would push him to his creative limits.  At
the age of 50, Sylvester Stallone decided to take up acting.
     In one sense, it was a brilliant decision.  Freddy Heflin is easily
Stallone's best role since the one Stallone wrote for himself 20 years ago
-- one Rocky Balboa -- and Stallone does some wonderful work with it.  His
heavy-lidded gaze and crooked half-smile are ideal for Heflin, a
good-natured figurehead sheriff whose job is to wear a badge and stay out
of the way of the locals.  It's the only law enforcement job Freddy can
get thanks to a hearing loss suffered as a teenager while rescuing a
drowning girl, and he feels resigned to accepting it for what it is.  That
is before Internal Affairs officer Moe Tilden (DeNiro), investigating the
mysterious "death" of a young cop (Michael Rapaport) involved in a
suspicious shooting, pricks Freddy's pride by pointing out all the graft
going on under his nose.  With minimal theatrics, Stallone shows us a man
who never wanted anything more than to be a cop finally deciding to be one
of the good guys.
     With such solid potential in that story -- and such a talented cast
of co-stars -- I'm sure the last thing Stallone expected was that he would
have to carry COP LAND the same way he carried his formula action films.
Yet that is exactly what he has to do, because Mangold has written only
one real character in COP LAND, and provided only one real conflict.  He
introduces no complexity into the issue of cops on the take, reducing the
characters played by Keitel and Robert Patrick to one-dimensional
villains.  Crucial relationships are woefully underdeveloped, notably that
between Stallone and Annabella Sciorra (as the girl Freddy once saved, now
grown and married to one of the dirty cops).  Even DeNiro gets little to
work with and does even less with it, playing the short-fused I.A. man
like every short-fused movie cop cliche rolled into one.  Only Ray Liotta,
as a coke-addicted cop trying to go straight, offers any genuine support
to Stallone.  Every event not directly related to Freddy feels trite and
perfunctory; every scene is given the most obvious spin.
     Actors make choices like the one Stallone made with COP LAND because
they believe that the film is going to get noticed, that it could do for
them what PULP FICTION did for John Travolta and Bruce Willis.  Stallone
deserves to get noticed for his work in COP LAND, work which reminds us
that Stallone became a star because he brought humanity to a sympathetic
underdog.  Whether COP LAND will get noticed is another matter.  James
Mangold went searching for an urban epic in COP LAND, but he didn't find
one.  He just found one great character.  It's the kind of character
people revise their career plans for, the kind of role which can make a
movie star want to be an actor.

Title
Review for Wrongfully Accused (1998)
WRONGFULLY ACCUSED
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Leslie Nielsen, Richard Crenna, Melinda McGraw, Kelly LeBrock,
Aaron Pearl, Michael York.
Screenplay:  Pat Proft.
Producers:  Pat Proft, James G. Robinson and Bernd Eichinger.
Director:  Pat Proft.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual innuendo, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Leslie Nielsen _is_ Leslie Nielsen" reads a tongue-in-cheek opening
credit that opens WRONGFULLY ACCUSED, and no irony could be more bitter.
Once upon a time Nielsen was a B-movie dramatic actor who re-invented
himself as a deadpan comedian thanks to the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker team,
who cast him in AIRPLANE! and their television series "Police Squad!"
Those successes led to three NAKED GUN films based on "Police Squad!",
which in turn led to SPY HARD and MR. MAGOO.  The one-time serious actor
who used to play straight man so successfully against absurdist parody
turned into a self-parody, mugging ever more shamelessly as he became
typecast as the prat-falling dope.
     You can expect more of the same -- Leslie Nielsen once again _as_
Leslie Nielsen -- in WRONGFULLY ACCUSED, the latest in a seemingly endless
string of films this summer from ZAZ alumni.  This one, written and
directed by HOT SHOTS! and NAKED GUN co-scribe Pat Proft, casts Nielsen as
Ryan Harrison, internationally renowned "Lord of the Violin."  Seduced by
a slinky temptress (Kelly LeBrock), Harrison ends up accused of the murder
of millionaire Hibbing Goodhue (Michael York, looking like a Madame
Tussaud figure of himself).  He escapes, he runs, he's pursued by a
single-minded law-enforcement agent (Richard Crenna), he searches for a
one-armed, one-legged, one-eyed man (Aaron Pearl), yada yada yada.
     I don't know whether the strained comedy of WRONGFULLY ACCUSED would
have seemed any fresher if it hadn't come hard on the heels of MAFIA! and
BASEKETBALL, but it certainly doesn't help.  Proft tries to keep the gags
coming fast enough to obscure the tedium -- perhaps believing he can
convince an audience that a hundred lame jokes add up to one decent one --
but the gags are worse than uninspired.  They're uninspired and redundant,
the kind of stuff that makes you suspect Proft and Jim Abrahams were
sitting in a room together as they were hashing out this film and MAFIA!,
respectively.  How else to explain the fact that both films include a shot
of a man leaving a lipstick print from a kiss, and a computer generated
tongue emerging from someone's ear, and shots at Michael Flatley?
     Those re-cycled gags are enough to make WRONGFULLY ACCUSED feel
ridiculously tired.  Nielsen's performance merely compounds the misery.
He has become such a flashing red light for self-defeating satire that he
simply can't play the role he once played:  the slack-faced observer of
anarchy. Directors have decided it's easier to get the audience to laugh
at Nielsen than it is to write anything funny to which he can react...or,
more appropriately, _not_ react.  WRONGFULLY ACCUSED features Nielsen at
his least appealing, throwing out rolled eyes, grimaces and misguided
reaction takes by the truckload.  Instead of providing an incongruous
presence that contributes to the humor, he becomes a vaguely pathetic
aging class clown.
     I realize that subtlety has never been the forte of genre parody, but
there are scattered moments when WRONGFULLY ACCUSED appears to have a
decent idea that's not head-smackingly obvious.  The best laugh, one I'm
sure was unintentional, comes from the 30-second cameo by Sandra Bernhard
which belies her prominent featuring in the credits.  It seems like a
clever jab at Julianne Moore's cutting-room-floor performance in THE
FUGITIVE, especially when Nielsen refers to getting information from
Bernhard's character in a scene we never see.  It's probably too much to
expect that level of insider satire to be sustained, especially when it's
so much easier to have Nielsen bang his head on a low bridge while
standing on the bow of the Titanic.  That's about the level of humor you
can expect when a film's number one comedic weapon is Leslie Nielsen _as_
Leslie Nielsen.

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
TWO GIRLS AND A GUY
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Robert Downey Jr., Heather Graham, Natasha Gregson Wagner.
Screenplay:  James Toback.
Producers:  Edward R. Pressman and Chris Hanley.
Director:  James Toback.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There's an inherent problem with the concept of group therapy as
drama, one which is pounded home by James Toback's three-character set
piece TWO GIRLS AND A GUY.  It opens with two women -- Carla (Heather
Graham) and Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner) -- discovering while waiting
outside a New York loft that they're waiting for the same boyfriend, a
wannabe actor named Blake Allen (Robert Downey Jr.).  Outraged at his
duplicity, Carla and Lou both sneak into Blake's loft so that they can
confront him.  What follows is an extended exchange of profanities,
accusations and excuses, with Blake gradually stripped of his comfortable
protective coating of lies.
     It should have been a bracing, enthralling experience watching
Blake's deceptions -- and his very self-created identify -- crumble piece
by piece.  Toback, unfortunately, doesn't let the audience in on the
process of figuring this guy out.  Instead, every possible bit of sub-text
is turned into blunt, frequently awkward text.  When Lou hears "You Don't
Know Me" playing on Blake's stereo, she notes that "it's no wonder that's
his favorite song;" when Blake makes repeated calls to his never-seen and
supposedly ill mother, the Oedipal theme spills into a soliloquy from
"Hamlet" with a jab by Carla at Blake's obsession with Mom.  Dialogue
becomes a steady stream of diagnosis, a "you need everyone to love you"
bouncing off of an "I think you want to believe that."  There's even a
poster of seminal menage-a-trois film JULES ET JIM on Blake's wall to
offer Insight by Conspicuous Set Decoration.  Everyone and everything on
screen screams at Blake exactly what his problem is, giving us barely a
moment to consider what _we_ think Blake's problem is.
     That's a near-criminal waste of the complexity and intensity Downey
pours into his performance.  There are clear parallels between this
character -- a charming, self-deluding actor -- and Downey's own
much-publicized inner demons, parallels of which Toback was clearly aware
when he wrote the script with Downey in mind.  The film's two most
riveting scenes find Blake alone with those demons.  In the first, he
adopts a cheesy swagger as he rehearses for an upcoming gig in the
Catskills; later, he disintegrates in disgust as he confronts himself in
the mirror.  As effective as Downey is at Blake's rapid-fire
rationalizations and table-turning, he's staggeringly good when he is
alone:  naked and isolated, using his reflection for an audience because
he always has to be performing for somebody.
     Sadly, this isn't a one-man show.  Graham is solid as the more
sensible Carla, delighting in making Blake squirm or working him into a
lather in the film's controversial extended sexual encounter.  Wagner
improves as the film progresses, but her opening lines are delivered with
such plastic spunkiness that it's hard to avoid loathing her on sight.
Both actresses, however, are victims of a script which never lets them
become characters in their own right.  They're along to toss around
psycho-analysis, to back Blake into a literal and emotional corner and
force him to grasp reality.  It's baffling that after so much wailing and
gnashing of teeth, Toback's resolution seems to be that Blake isn't really
such a bad guy -- that he's not all that different from anybody else, that
relationships are all about deception anyway so let's give poor Blake a
break.  I'd conclude that Blake's story is much more interesting if he is
an entirely unique sort of sexual animal, but Toback was generous enough
to draw my conclusions for me.  Given Downey's troubled history, it's sad
to see Blake given such a simplistic Freudian out for his behavior.
Apparently, Mommy didn't love him enough.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
STARSHIP TROOPERS
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake Busey, Neil
Patrick Harris, Michael Ironside, Clancy Brown, Patrick Muldoon.
Screenplay:  Ed Neumeier, based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein.
Producers:  Alan Marshall and Jon Davison.
Director:  Paul Verhoeven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  129 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Devotees of Robert A. Heinlein, be forewarned:  Paul Verhoeven's
STARSHIP TROOPERS is less an adaptation of Heinlein's novel than it is a
literary satire.  The author's jingo-all-the-way militarism and his
tendency to create plastic characters with plastic conflicts had me
expecting a soulless, faceless parade of carnage from the film version.
And I suppose that's exactly what Verhoeven delivers, with sometimes
hilarious results.  Heinlein's basic motifs are so faithfully rendered
that their flaws become a source of amusement, while their strengths
become the stuff of high-energy entertainment.
     Outlining the plot of STARSHIP TROOPERS is a fairly silly endeavor,
since it's basically a Big Bug Hunt...ALIENS in broad daylight.  Sometime
in the future, humanity is threatened by giant, malevolent insects which
have evolved into twenty-foot-tall action figures (arachnids with
super-impaling spikes, beetles that spew forth lava, dragonflies with
guillotine legs).  Among those who sign on to save the earth are a group
of high school classmates from Buenos Aires:  conflicted rich kid Johnny
Rico (Casper Van Dien); his math whiz girlfriend Carmen (Denise Richards);
Dizzy (Dina Meyer), who secretly carries a torch for Johnny; and Carl
(Neil Patrick "Doogie Howser" Harris), who not-so-secretly carries a torch
for Dizzy, and also has a talent for speaking telepathically to ferrets.
While Carmen heads for flight school and Carl joins military intelligence,
Johnny and Dizzy become mobile infantry, their various battles
intertwining with romantic sub-plots out of a third season episode from
"Beverly Hills 90210."
     So if STARSHIP TROOPERS is another movie where one-dimensional
characters wade through trite situations on their way to killing a bunch
of aliens, what makes it any better than, say, INDEPENDENCE DAY, a movie
where one-dimensional characters waded through trite situations on their
way to killing a bunch of slightly different aliens?  For one thing, you
sense that the film-makers are aware of the pulp nonsense they have as
source material.  The very absence of major stars in the cast feels
thematically appropriate, not just fiscally prudent.  If STARSHIP TROOPERS
had been turned into a TV-movie, Aaron Spelling would have produced it.
It's a story which requires emoting, not acting; it's a prime time soap
opera with big guns, played for all the dopey melodrama it's worth.
     The no-name cast also plays into Verhoeven's treatment of Heinlein's
most controversial conceit.  In this society, we learn, one can only be a
full citizen after completing some sort of federal service, military for
most.  Verhoeven pays the notion plenty of lip service, then proceeds to
skewer it with brilliant mock recruitment ads (named after the World War 
II-era "Why We Fight" series) in which youngsters are
indoctrinated into the joys of firearms, or the pleasures of stomping
cockroaches.  These characters really are just "fresh meat for the
grinder," as one character puts it, which makes their lack of familiarity
all the more fitting.  It's not that STARSHIP TROOPERS is anti-military,
because it never treats the true horror of war as anything but a great
big, violent video game.  In fact, the characters are living the
propaganda (particularly Johnny, who receives so many field promotions he
may not remember his own rank by the time the film ends).  Verhoeven is
actually having it both ways -- he's making fun of gung-ho boosterism even
as he fires his fresh-faced recruits into battle on a gung-ho booster
rocket of visual effects.
     If that makes STARSHIP TROOPERS hypocritical, at least it's
enthusiastically staged hypocrisy.  There may not be a person worth
caring about in the whole film, but it moves like nobody's business.
Verhoeven stages some thrilling action sequences, sending swarms of bugs
after the anonymous grunts then having various body parts strewn about the
screen like landscaping.  It is that rare special effects blockbuster
which demonstrates a sense of pacing to match its budget; I was caught up
in the action enough
of the time that I wasn't perpetually groaning over the absence of real
human beings.  I wish I could find it in myself to work up more
outrage over the callous way humans are dispatched in STARSHIP TROOPERS,
but it didn't work out that way.  That would be punishing Verhoeven for
getting to the heart of his material.

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Cop III (1994)
Starring:  Eddie Murphy, Judge Reinhold, Hector Elizondo, Timothy
Carhart, Theresa Randle, Bronson Pinchot.
Screenplay:  Steven E. de Souza.
Director:  John Landis.
     It's hard to believe that it's been ten years since the original
BEVERLY HILLS COP turned Eddie Murphy into the biggest star in
Hollywood, for two very different reasons.  On the one hand, it doesn't
seem like that long since I saw it in a theater for the first time.  On
the other hand, it seems like twice that long since Murphy has had a
hit.  It certainly must seem like an eternity to Murphy; he is proved
consistently unable in the last few years to recapture the COP audience
without returning to Beverly Hills.  So at something of a crossroads in
his career, he again dons the Detroit Lions jacket for BEVERLY HILLS
COP III.  And what a lifeless outing it is--slow, unfunny and lacking
even Murphy's cocky charm.
     COP III opens back in Detroit, where Axel Foley is in the process
of leading a raid on a stolen car chop shop.  The raid goes sour when
big guns turn out to be on the scene, and in the ensuing battle Axel's
boss is killed.  The killer's trail, naturally, leads back to
California, where Axel enlists the aid of old friend Billy Rosewood
(Judge Reinhold) and newcomer Det. Flint (Hector Elizondo).  Their
investigation leads to the WonderWorld amusement park, whose chief of
security Ellis DeWald (Timothy Carhart) is behind the dirty dealings.
Unfortunately, no one believes Axel except a park technician (Theresa
Randle) and WonderWorld patriarch Uncle Dave (Alan Young), leaving Axel
more or less alone to figure out what's rotten at WonderWorld.
     Give Steven E. de Souza credit for not deciding simply to rehash
BEVERLY HILLS COP.  COP III is more of a pure action film, which makes
it exactly the wrong kind of film for John Landis to direct.  Landis'
sense of pacing has always been suspect to say the least, tending
towards manic spurts interrupted by long, surrealistic comic passages,
and that package is on display here.  For no apparent reason, Landis
interrupts his establishing sequence in the chop shop to bring us a
production number featuring two corpulent gentlemen performing "Come
See About Me."  Later, in the middle of a chase, Axel stops to join a
group of costumed characters in a stage show.  COP III is filled with
decisions like these which bring the film to a grinding halt.  Bronson
Pinchot's scene-stealing Serge from COP I returns as a personal
security-device peddler in a scene which takes far too long to
introduce a single plot element.  Ditto for the scene in which we sit
through an entire park attraction, because we know it's going to show
up later.  There is no economy to the screenwriting or the direction,
and Landis has simply gotten too predictable in his shot selection.  In
one scene in a restaurant bar, I anticipated the conclusion of the
scene two minutes before it happened.
     It's also extremely unfortunate that in addition to abandoning the
COP I formula, de Souza has also decided to abandon the characters.  He
seems to have forgotten completely about Billy Rosewood's fascination
with big guns from COP II, missing a wonderful opportunity.  He also
seems to have forgotten that Axel is supposed to be smart; how else to
explain running from park security into a ride from which escape is not
extremely likely.  Perhaps to set up an action sequence.  Murphy gets
to fire a lot of bullets, but gets painfully few opportunities to show
that Axel's greatest weapon is his wits.
     Of course, it would have been difficult for any wit to come
through when Murphy sleepwalks through his performance.  Perhaps he
senses what the audience does, that a thirty-something Axel Foley isn't
nearly as interesting as a twenty-something Axel Foley.  What made COP
I click was Murphy as the streetwise loose cannon, aggravating uptight
veteran Taggart even while he was teaching him.  Now, Axel _is_ the
veteran, going about his business methodically and rarely thinking on
his feet.  There is some good action to be found in BEVERLY HILLS COP
III, particularly a rescue on a runaway park ride, and one very funny
sequence involving a multi-faceted gun.  But there is none of the
irreverent edge that made the young Murphy so appealing.  Maybe that's
what depressed me most about COP III:  considering the possibility that
we might never see that Eddie Murphy again.

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
WHAT WOMEN WANT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Mel Gibson, Helen Hunt, Marisa Tomei, Mark Feuerstein, Ashley
Johnson, Alan Alda.
Screenplay:  Josh Goldsmith & Cathy Yuspa.
Producers:  Matt Williams, Susan Cartsonis, Gina Matthews, Bruce Davey and
Nancy Meyers.
Director:  Nancy Meyers.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  126 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Over twenty years into a ridiculously successful film career, Mel
Gibson chose 2000 to do a pure comedy for the first time  and it seems
terribly unfair that he appears so good at it. Gibson has always had
tremendous charm on screen, and his light touch provided most of the best
moments in the LETHAL WEAPON series, but he has shied away from roles that
showcased those elements of his personality. In WHAT WOMEN WANT, he never
once picks up a gun of any kind. He picks up a hairdryer, and he still
kills. Mel Gibson delivers a wonderfully entertaining comic performance in
WHAT WOMEN WANT, the kind of performance that should make for classic
comedy.
     We'll forgive Gibson on grounds of inexperience for not choosing the
sort of script that could show off his newfound comic chops. WHAT WOMEN
WANT, a film that could have been GROUNDHOG DAY brilliant, comes out
merely adequate thanks to a script that's about two re-writes away from
being ready. Gibson stars as Nick Marshall, a divorced Chicago advertising
executive, man's man and career chauvinist. Nick expects to be promoted to
creative director, but his boss (Alan Alda) instead opts to bring in Darcy
Maguire (Helen Hunt) to provide the sensitivity to women's concerns Nick
clearly lacks. Then a twist of fate -- and an electric shock -- endows
Nick with the ability to hear women's thoughts. It's a gift Nick fears at
first, until he realizes he can use it to his advantage in any number of
ways, including undermining Darcy.
     WHAT WOMEN WANT is a gimmick movie, which can easily turn into an
empty marketing-friendly concept without some competent execution. In Mel
Gibson, they have a more than competent star to execute that gimmick. Mel
knocks out every twist of character and goofy situation he's handed, from
the swagger of the opening scenes to his broader physical gags to his
quiet moments with Hunt. He sells the humor in a macho guy both playing
sensitive and actually becoming sensitive. It's not jaw-dropping film
acting by any means, but it's so deft with the fluffy material that you'd
think he'd been doing it all his life.
     I wish the same could be said of the writers. At over two hours, WHAT
WOMEN WANT is a textbook example of a film with no sense of its story's
essential elements. There's a lengthy, unnecessary prologue
psychoanalyzing Nick's relationship with his Vegas showgirl mother;
there's a lengthy scene of Nick dancing in his apartment to Frank Sinatra;
there's an encounter between Nick and a therapist that exists only for the
sake of a distracting cameo. Supporting characters pack the fringes of
every frame, giving Nick sub-plots with a suicidal co-worker, his teenage
daughter (Ashley Johnson), and a high-strung coffee shop cashier (Marisa
Tomei). There's hardly a scene in WHAT WOMEN WANT that doesn't feel like
it should either be a minute shorter or absent altogether. Instead of
making all the necessary plot and character points efficiently the first
time, screenwriters Josh Goldsmith and Cathy Yuspa opt to make the same
point multiple times, just so we don't miss it.
     There are definitely some worthwhile individual moments to make up
for the sloppy structure. Some of them are pure script moments, like the
internal monologue Nick hears while trying to show off his sexual prowess.
Others are combinations of script and performance, like Gibson's drunken
experimentation with a number of women's products. And many of them are
purely showcases for the actors -- including Hunt, who tames her patrician
chilliness and delivers her most engaging big screen comic performance.
This is really a star vehicle, though, and if it provides any enjoyment,
it's from the pleasure of watching a macho man have so much fun doing
something he's never done before. Give credit to director Nancy Meyers for
finding this performance in Mel Gibson. Give credit to Mel Gibson for
finding this performance in himself. And next time, let's hope we can give
him credit for picking better material.

Title
Review for Eve's Bayou (1997)
     I wanted to like EVE'S BAYOU even more than I did, for many of the
same reasons I suspect some critics have been overly effusive in their
praise.  After all, here was a film with an African-American cast in which
race was largely irrelevant to the story.  Here was a film directed by an
African-American woman, adding some much-needed pigment and estrogen to a
club even more conspicuously male than it is conspicuously white.  Here
was a first time film-maker, and a pretty decent one at that, adding the
"excitement of discovery" factor.  And here was a film which was actually
_about_ something.
     Kasi Lemmons' writing and directing debut certainly deserves better
than to be singled out for the race either of Lemmons or her cast.  It's a
contemplative period piece set in the Louisiana bayou of the 1960s, where
the upper-middle class Batiste family lives on the same land several 
generations have lived before.  Father Louis (Samuel L. Jackson), a genial
physician, services the community in many ways, some of them in opposition
to his marital vows; mother Roz (Lynn Whitfield) tries to ignore Louis's
indiscretions while caring for their three children.  It becomes difficult
for 10-year-old Eve (Jurnee Smollett) and her teenage sister Cicely
(Meagan Good) to ignore them, however, especially when Eve catches her
father in the act with one of his mistresses.  As Eve becomes more and
more aware of Louis's darker side, she begins to contemplate dark acts
which could change the family forever.
     Far from being a simple domestic drama, EVE'S BAYOU delves into the
complex subjects of memory and perception.  Events are constantly being
revisited and re-evaluated, in scenes crafted by Lemmons with a seductive
ambiguity.  In the film's finest moment, Eve's Aunt Mozelle (Debbi Morgan)
recalls a painful moment as a reflection in a mirror, moving from observer
to participant in a few short steps.  A psychic counselor haunted by the
untimely death of three husbands, Mozelle also becomes the focal point for
a subtle juxtaposition of past and future.  Though able to see the future
clearly enough, Mozelle finds herself able to interpret the past only as
the product of a "curse."  It's a lyrical and thought-provoking film
Lemmons has fashioned, in which the interpretation of events becomes ever
more challenging.
     Lemmons does such a fine job of introducing ideas and creating images
that the more fundamental failings of EVE'S BAYOU become all the more
disappointing.  The narrative grabs at bits and pieces of atmosphere --
period art direction, voodoo curses, French dialects -- without ever
really settling into a convincing sense of place.  Plot threads like
Mozelle's romance with a drifter artist (Lemmons' husband Vondie Curtis
Hall) are forced into five minute chunks, leaving the story feeling
slightly fragmented.  As for the much-lauded acting...well, Morgan is
certainly solid as the solemn Mozelle.  Other performances are far more
sporadic, from a nondescript Lynn Whitfield to a bug-eyed Diahann Carroll
as a cackling voodoo priestess.
     Make no mistake, EVE'S BAYOU is a good film:  deeply felt,
consistently intriguing and often visually striking.  It's also a
wonderful thing that a female African-American first-time film-maker has
done such impressive work.  Even adding those things together doesn't make
EVE'S BAYOU a great film, however.  Certainly I'll be looking forward to
Lemmon's next project, when that raw talent as a director and passion as a
story-teller join forces with a bit more focus and discipline.  Then it
might be time to start talking about Lemmons as an A-list director,
irrespective of race, or gender, or how many films she has made.

Title
Review for Ruby in Paradise (1993)
Starring:  Ashley Judd, Todd Field, Bentley Mitchum, Dorothy Lyman.
Screenwriter/Director:  Victor Nunez.
     Truth be told, I should disqualify myself from reviewing RUBY IN
PARADISE.  You see, I have a certain bias:  I've fallen helplessly,
hopelessly, desperately in love with Ashley Judd.  As Ruby Lee Gissing,
the central character in writer/director Victor Nunez's low-key
character study, Judd delivers a phenomenally appealing performance,
capturing a young woman's struggle to make her life better with
frankness and intelligence.
     As RUBY IN PARADISE opens, Ruby is on the road, fleeing her
Tennessee home for something, anything, better.  She finds herself in
Panama City, Florida, a summer resort town now nearly shut down with
the coming of fall.  Still, Ruby manages to find a job at a local
souvenir store run by pragmatic Mildred Chambers (Dorothy Lyman).
From there, Ruby begins to explore her new world, including a brief
fling with Mrs. Chambers' playboy son Ricky (Bentley Mitchum).  Soon
she begins a more meaningful relationship with Mike (Todd Field), an
intelligent but cynical biker who works in a plant nursery.  As Ruby
begins to settle into a routine much like the one from which she ran,
she begins to examine why it was she moved, what she is looking for,
and how, in the words of best friend Rochelle (Allison Dean), "to
survive with your soul intact."
     RUBY IN PARADISE is not an easy film to get wrapped up in.  It
moves very slowly, and virtually nothing substantive happens from a
plotting standpoint.  RUBY is an internal story in an external medium,
and will not be for everyone.  But that internal story is one rarely
examined, the story of a young woman on a journey of self-discovery,
and Victor Nunez handles it with gentle insight.  While Ruby is not an
eloquent or well-educated woman, there is nothing simple about her.
She is filled with complex and conflicting emotions and attitudes--a
basic morality colliding with her rejection of her religious
upbringing, a hope that life can be better coupled with a certain
cynicism.  The voice-over narration of Ruby's diary entries provide
sharp snapshots of her inner life.  So much is conveyed in Ruby's
description of her first night with Mike:  "And yes, we got it on, all
tender and romantic."  Ruby Lee Gissing is one of the best written
female characters to grace the screen this year.
     Oh yes, and there's this Ashley Judd person.  Her portrayal of
Ruby is nothing short of stunning, a heartbreaking yet ultimately
affirming take on one woman's strength of spirit.  As RUBY IN PARADISE
opens, Judd adopts the look of a newborn, an openness to the new
opportunities available to her combined with the fear of being thrust
into an unfamiliar world.  It is this look that makes a winner of
Ruby's first encounter with Ricky, looking at him curiously through
shelves and over the counter at the souvenir store despite Rochelle's
warnings about him; it is this look that lends poignancy to a scene in
which Ruby takes a deep smell of her quilt as she goes to sleep,
remembering a more familiar place.  Later, as Ruby's new life becomes
more of a struggle, Judd keeps carrying herself straighter and
straighter in defiance.  At her center is a fierce determination, her
refusal to surrender in the face of challenge etched into every
movement.  Her pride in her own resourcefulness is captured in a
comment to Rochelle:  "I managed to get out without getting pregnant or
beat up; that's something."  This is a beautiful job by a natural young
actress who commands the camera's attention.
     If RUBY IN PARADISE fails to be fully satisfying, it's because
Nunez doesn't surround Ruby with characters one-tenth as interesting as
she is.  Ricky is so slimy and transparent that he inspired hoots from
most of the audience, and Bentley Mitchum is not subtle enough an actor
to underplay the easiest mannerisms to overplay.  Todd Field handles
Mike a bit better, but Mike also is too much of a "type" instead of a
person.  "Mama's Family" and "All My Children" veteran Dorothy Lyman
could have been much more interesting as Ruby's surrogate mother, but
she's too cold in her early scenes and maintains a certain aloofness
throughout.  I was much more interested in tangential characters like
the simple young girl who lives next door to Ruby.  It's too bad Nunez
couldn't have invested as much in the featured players.
     RUBY IN PARADISE does drift somewhat, and its two hour running
time is a bit much.  Still, it's amazing what one great character and
one great performance can do for a slow-moving story, and Ashley Judd's
Ruby is worth the price of admission all by herself.

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
BICENTENNIAL MAN
(Touchstone/Columbia)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Embeth Davidtz, Sam Neill, Oliver Platt, Hallie
Kate Eisenberg, Kiersten Warren, Wendy Crewson.
Screenplay:  Nicholas Kazan, based on the short story by Isaac Asimov and
the novel _The Positronic Man_ by Isaac Asimov and Robert Silverberg.
Producers:  Wolfgang Petersen, Gail Katz, Neal Miller, Lawrence Mark,
Chris Columbus, Mark Radcliffe and Michael Barnathan.
Director:  Chris Columbus.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  132 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     And so Robin Williams' career has come full circle. Twenty years ago,
his celebrity was insured when he played an innocent to the ways of
humanity, drawing sit-com laughs from his literalist misunderstanding of
idioms and his awkward attempts at humor, before ending the story with a
speech to tell us everything he has learned. In BICENTENNIAL MAN,
Williams plays an innocent to the ways of humanity, drawing sit-com laughs
from his literalist misunderstanding of idioms and ... well, you get the
idea. After two decades of box office success and an Academy Award, it
has come to this: Robin Williams is playing Mork again.
     I'm sure Williams would not see things that way. He would doubtless
inform us that his is a complex and challenging character, a domestic
robot called Andrew serving the Martin family of Northern California. He
would explain that the relationships were rich -- the mentor/student
connection between Andrew and Martin patriarch Richard (Sam Neill); the
gentle affection between Andrew and the Martin's youngest daughter, whom
he calls Little Miss (Hallie Kate Eisenberg); the more profound affection
between Andrew and the grown up Little Miss (Embeth Davidtz). He would
describe a robust character arc, in which Andrew comes to exhibit
creativity and feeling, and begins a life-long quest to become more human.
He might even acknowledge the comic relief value of Oliver Platt as 
eccentric robotics scientist Rupert Burns, and Kiersten Warren as the
perky female robot Galatea.
     All of that might have been true in some incarnation of the story,
based on two short stories by Isaac Asimov, the father of the
robot-in-existential crisis concept. This incarnation, however, is
directed by Chris Columbus, whose contributions to deep-thinking Western
cinema include HOME ALONE, HOME ALONE 2 and NINE MONTHS. He's an
unapologetic crowd-pleaser as a director, but a crowd-pleaser in the most
irritating of ways. His is a style that favors low-brow gags and gee-whiz
pacing, then feigns depth by wrapping things up with sentimental
message-mongering (and, in this particular case, three -- count them,
_three_ -- death bed scenes). BICENTENNIAL MAN doesn't even manage the
gee-whiz pacing; after a moderately promising start, the film drifts into
two hours of Andrew growing ever more pensive about his place in the
world. 
     Such pensiveness is likely meant to allow Robin Williams an uplifting
acting showcase (at least once Andrew sheds his metal casing for Williams'
human face). Williams has seemed inordinately fond of uplifting acting
showcases lately, eschewing straight-ahead comedy for roles like PATCH
ADAMS, WHAT DREAMS MAY COME and JAKOB THE LIAR. Unfortunately, he's not
doing himself any favors in his choices of material, heading for parts
that allow him to do plenty of emoting between gags. There's no gravity to
Williams' performance as Andrew, none of the conflicted pain of a being
coming to terms with its own consciousness and its isolation in the world.
That's because he's being directed by Chris Columbus, for whom gravity is
just the thing that keeps his films from floating away entirely. When
BICENTENNIAL MAN sticks to light comedy, it's not half bad. When it takes
its epic scope too seriously, it's more than half bad.
     BICENTENNIAL MAN does boast solid work from its supporting cast of
Davidtz, Neill and particularly Platt (for my money, now the most reliable
comic actor in film). The technical credits are top-notch, with one wild
scene in which Platt molds artificial flesh into Williams' face. There's
even the chance to consider possible metaphors in Andrew's desire to be
legally recognized as a human to marry the woman he loves (advocacy for
"non-traditional" marriage?). There's also plenty of opportunity to watch
the film grow ponderous in the long stretches between laughs, and to
consider how stale Robin Williams' once-promising career has become. The
man who stepped lightly from broad comedy to DEAD POETS SOCIETY and THE
FISHER KING has spent the last year in reverse. BICENTENNIAL MAN's few
simple pleasures can't make up for its shallow philosophizing -- or the
sense that, for Robin Williams, everything old is nanoo again.

Title
Review for Impostors, The (1998)
THE IMPOSTORS
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Stanley Tucci, Oliver Platt, Alfred Molina, Tony Shalhoub,
Campbell Scott, Lili Taylor, Steve Buscemi, Hope Davis.
Screenplay:  Stanley Tucci.
Producers:  Beth Alexander and Stanley Tucci.
Director:  Stanley Tucci.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It has long been one of my most closely-held dramatic axioms that
there is no middle ground when it comes to the execution of farce.  Either
a writer and director get it, or they don't.  If they get it, the result
is exhilarating comic brilliance.  If they don't get it, the result is
nearly unendurable.  And never, I believed, could the twain meet.
     Another false dichotomy bites the dust.  Writer/director Stanley
Tucci's THE IMPOSTORS is old-fashioned farce that floats along amusingly,
yet only occasionally hits the high notes that turn chuckles into
gut-busters.  Tucci and Oliver Platt star as a pair of struggling 1930s
actors named Arthur and Maurice who, through a tortuous series of events,
end up as inadvertent stowaways on the luxury liner U.S.S.
Intercontinental.  They've been pursued and accused of assault by
egomaniacal thespian Jeremy Burtom (Alfred Molina) -- who also turns out
to be a passenger on the ship -- but Burtom becomes the least of their
worries.  A pair of con artists (Richard Jenkins and Allison Janney) plot
to seduce and kill two wealthy passengers, the first mate (Tony Shalhoub)
plots to blow up the ship as a political statement, and an ambiguously
sexual tennis pro (Billy Connolly) plots to make Maurice his "savage gypsy
lover."
     It's a classic screwball farce set-up, which Tucci cleverly chooses
to place in the classic screwball farce era of the 1930s.  Opening with a
great bit of pantomime accompanying the opening credits, Tucci establishes
Arthur and Maurice as protagonists in the mold of the classic silent film
comedians -- lovable losers, not above a bit of duplicity if it suits
their purposes, yet ultimately heroic (and, in particular, chivalric).
The pre-shipboard scenes, though little more than isolated comedy
sketches, do a nice job of showing the chemistry between the two.  By the
time the Intercontinental hits the open sea, Tucci and Platt's starving,
utterly sincere artistes have generated plenty of good will.
     I was ready for THE IMPOSTORS to soar once Arthur and Maurice began
dashing from stateroom to stateroom; instead, it levels off at a pleasant
cruising altitude.  Tucci populates the ship with plenty of goofy
characters -- a fascistic head steward (Campbell Scott), a suicidal
entertainer incongruously named Happy (Steve Buscemi), a wallflower
heiress (Hope Davis), a deposed monarch-in-hiding (Isabella Rossellini) --
clearly intended to make Arthur and Maurice look like the sane ones in a
sea of chaos.  Yet he doesn't allow these characters to function in scenes
that build comic momentum.  Tucci's gags are mostly of the hit-and-run
variety.  While there are a few admittedly hilarious ones, they seem
like wasted opportunities to do what great farce does best:  have each
comic moment draw from the previous comic moment, and lead into the next
comic moment, in a hysterically unstoppable domino effect.
     Those missed opportunities are most evident when Tucci _does_ allow a
scene to build momentum.  In one brilliantly unpredictable moment, Maurice
hides under the bed while foreign radical Shalhoub radios his superiors,
the sub-title translations for Shalhoub's dialogue becoming an
ever-more-bizarre bit of business.  In a later scene, a tracking shot
through the ship's dance floor eventually catches Rossellini, who quickly
hides her face from the camera.  Such fourth wall-breaking captures farce
at its anything-for-a-laugh finest.  More often, Tucci goes for the gentle
touch which worked so well in BIG NIGHT.  As frisky and unpretentious a
comedy as THE IMPOSTORS is, it traffics in an unnecessarily restrained
level of lunacy.  Tucci's spin on MONKEY BUSINESS has plenty of funny
business, but it doesn't let anarchy reign quite as often as it should.
It's that rarest of comedic animals:  the merely-good farce.

Title
Review for Very Brady Sequel, A (1996)
Starring:  Shelley Long, Gary Cole, Tim Matheson, Christopher Daniel
Barnes, Christine Taylor, Jennifer Elise Cox, Paul Sutera, Jesse Lee,
Olivia Hack.
Screenplay:  Harry Elfont, Deborah Kaplan, James Berg, Stan Zimmerman.
Director:  Arlene Sanford.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Seventy-nine weeks -- count them, seventy-nine -- is all that
separates the release of A VERY BRADY SEQUEL from THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE,
in what has to rank as one of the fastest sequel turnarounds in film
history.  Even taking into account the fact that the Brady house sets and
Alice's uniform were already available, that's a tidy 18 months for
writing the script, pre-production, shooting and post-production.  You
might expect a rather perfunctory piece of film-making given those
circumstances, and you would find it.  A VERY BRADY SEQUEL has some cute
moments, but it is lacking the sense of direction which made THE BRADY
BUNCH MOVIE such a guilty pleasure.
     The sequel finds all the BRADY cast members (except for David Graf as
Sam the butcher) exactly where we left them at the end of the last movie,
happily stuck in the 1970s while the world around them spins a quarter
century faster.  All seems typically groovy for Mike (Gary Cole), Carol
(Shelley Long) and the clan until they receive a visit from a man who says
he is Roy Martin (Tim Matheson)...Carol's first husband, a globe-trotting
archaeologist lost and presumed dead many years earlier.  This throws the
household into turmoil.  Carol and Mike are confused over how to deal with
this news, Greg (Christopher Daniel Barnes) and Marcia (Christine Taylor)
are confused over feelings about each other, and Jan (Jennifer Elise
Cox)...well, as usual, she's just confused.  But all of them should be
more concerned about Roy, who primarily seems concerned about the
whereabouts of a horse statue which could be worth a fortune.
     THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE arrived in the middle of a slew of T.V.-to-film
re-treads, so it was easy to overlook the fact that there was actually a
point to it besides gratuitous nostalgia.  Even as the film made
referrence to "classic" Brady plots, it also provided the wonderful
conceit of sealing the Bradys in a bubble of obliviousness while time had
marched on for everyone else, and it made for a genuinely entertaining
remembrance of a simpler time with simpler problems.  A VERY BRADY SEQUEL
misses the boat on both counts.  There isn't nearly enough juxtaposition
between the Bradys and the modern world; most of the film seems to take
place in the Brady house, with only a sarcastic Matheson to react.  There
is one funny bit in which Mike speaks to a police detective ("Homicide's"
Richard Belzer) in a police station where everything around him is filmed
in the unsteady hand-held style of modern crime dramas, while Mike himself
is an island of stable serenity.  Too often, however, the Bradys end up
interacting just with each other, repeating 70s catch phrases and
mimicking their television counterparts.
     As for the echoes of the original series, the most memorable were
already used in the first film.  We do get a detailed re-creation of Jan's
imaginary boyfriend George Glass, and token references to other episodes
like the Hawaiian vacation shows (don't be fooled by ads which make it
look like the entire film is set in Hawaii; the Bradys don't hit the
islands until about twenty minutes remain), but A VERY BRADY SEQUEL
doesn't provide the same warmth of familiarity.  Instead, it spends a lot
of time playing with sexual tension between Greg and Marcia as the
realization that they aren't _really_ related puts interesting ideas in
their heads.  There are a few solid laughs in that sub-plot, but
unfortunately it underlines an over-reliance on sexual double-entendre of
a staggering obviousness.  I suppose a limited time frame to work on a
script can make you leap for the easy gag.
     Still, A VERY BRADY SEQUEL does have the same superb cast to draw on,
and they make for a film which seems more creative than it actually is.
Jennifer Elise Cox again has the showcase role of neglected middle child
Jan, and dumping her psychotic "inner voice" makes her desperation for
attention a bit more fun.  Gary Cole is also priceless -- it's hard to
imagine a more convincingly earnest square, or someone else delivering a
line like, "So what are your plans now that you're alive?" as though it
almost made sense.  A VERY BRADY SEQUEL is occasionally cute, directed
competently by Arlene Sanford, but it's rarely clever.  Someone had an
idea in mind when they made the first film, and that's true of the sequel
as well.  It's just that the idea this time was closer to, "Let's get this
thing out there while the kids still look like kids."

Title
Review for Kull the Conqueror (1997)
KULL THE CONQUEROR
(Universal)
Starring:  Kevin Sorbo, Tia Carrere, Karina Lombard, Thomas Ian Griffith,
Litefoot.
Screenplay:  Charles Edward Pogue, based on characters created by Robert
E. Howard.
Producer:  Raffaella DeLaurentiis.
Director:  John Nicolella.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I was feeling a bit under-prepared as I walked into KULL THE
CONQUEROR.  After all, I had never seen a minute of the syndicated series
"Hercules: The Legendary Journies," and consequently I was completely
unfamiliar with the work of Kevin Sorbo.  What sort of action hero would
this fellow be?  Did he have the stuff to make it on the big screen?  What
sort of appeal could he bring to a creation of Robert E. Howard, who also
created that _other_ barbarian, a surly chap named Conan?
     Well, Sorbo's got the goods, all right, and he shows them off in the
surprisingly high-spirited KULL THE CONQUEROR.  He plays the title
character, a barbarian warrior whose attempt to join the royal guard of
the kingdom of Valusia is rebuffed by the nasty captain Taligaro (Thomas
Ian Griffith).  Instead, Kull ends up with an even better job in Valusia:
as the king lies dying from a wound Kull has inflicted, the monarch names
his murderer as his successor.  This wee departure from the rules of
succession makes Kull rather unpopular with some who would see themselves
on the throne, including Taligaro himself and a demon sorceress named
Akivasha (Tia Carrere) who sees to it that she becomes Kull's queen.  Only
a fortune-telling slave girl (Karina Lombard) and a benevolent holy man
(Litefoot) can help save Kull's life and his crown.
     Standard sword-and-sorcery stuff, to be sure, but for a while KULL
provides enough satisfying spins to the material to keep you grinning.
Director John Nicolella adds some amusing bits of business, like the
triumphant and newly-crowned Kull receiving discreet advice from his
protocol minister to hold his scepter in the other hand.  He also gets a
lot of mileage out of the year's prime contender for Incongruous Casting
Choice of 1997, Harvey Fierstein as an old pirate pal of Kull's.
Fierstein chews up every goofy line he's got, including the most obscure
-- and crudest -- sexual double-entendre in Charles Edward Pogue's script.
     Most of all there is Kevin Sorbo, he of the prominent and prominently
featured pectoral muscles.  Sorbo leaps into the role with enthusiastic
good humor, deciding he's going to find the pleasure in playing the hero.
It would have been easy to play KULL as camp, to keep winking at the
audience to make sure we understood he's really in on the joke.  Rather
than making fun of the genre, Sorbo opts for finding the fun _in_ the
genre.  The result is the kind of energetic action which evokes Richard
Lester's Musketeer films, with Sorbo providing considerably more than mere
pecs appeal.
     KULL THE CONQUEROR appears to have so much going for it early on that
the final half hour comes as a crashing disappointment.  All the energy
leaks out of the film, the pacing abruptly drops to a crawl, and the
appealing riff on creaky fantasy motifs gives way to creaky fantasy
motifs.  Every line of dialogue becomes a piece of exposition, explaining
everything twice so that even the most obtuse viewer might be able to keep 
up.  Chances are they may not want to, though, not with the narrative
reduced to resolving a second-rate "Dungeons and Dragons" scenario.
Sorbo's efforts deserve better; he gives KULL the charismatic spark a good
adventure needs.  Now it's time to catch up on the Sorbo oeuvre.  Anyone
know when the season premiere of "Hercules" might be?

Title
Review for Mr. Death: The Rise and Fall of Fred A. Leuchter, Jr. (1999)
MR. DEATH: THE RISE AND FALL OF FRED A. LEUCHTER, JR.
(Lions Gate)
Featuring:  Fred A. Leuchter Jr., Robert Jan van Pelt, Ernst Zundel, James
Roth.
Producers:  Michael Williams, David Collins, Dorothy Aufiero and Errol
Morris.
Director:  Errol Morris.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, mild profanity)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     We're going to have to create a new designation for Errol Morris,
because "documentary filmmaker" just doesn't seem to cut it. Yes, Morris'
subjects have all been real-life people in films like THE THIN BLUE LINE,
A BRIEF HISTORY OF TIME and FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL. He has also
opted to up the ante for what a non-fiction film can be, staging visually
compelling vignettes or using re-creations to impose his artistic vision
on the story he's trying to tell. It's no wonder Morris' films have
consistently been overlooked by the more tradition-bound documentarians of
the Motion Picture Academy. Call him a maker of non-fiction films if you
must ... or simply a director.
     With MR. DEATH: THE RISE AND FALL OF FRED A. LEUCHTER, JR., Errol
Morris has given us another reason to toss out the term "documentary
filmmaker" -- as striking as the film is, it sometimes feels a bit thin on
background detail. Morris' latest subject is another man with a unique
obsessive interest: Fred A. Leuchter, Jr., a Massachusetts-based execution
technology enthusiast. After becoming aware of the horrendous quality of
most capital punishment equipment, Leuchter became an expert in designing
more effectvie and humane electric chairs, lethal injection machines and
gas chambers for states' prison systems. His expertise in this field led
him down a life-changing road when he was asked to be a witness in the
defense of Ernst Zundel, a revisionist historian charged in Canada with
disseminating propaganda denying the truth of the Holocaust. After
visiting the ruins of the Nazi camps at Auschwitz, Birkenau and Majdanek,
Leuchter concludes that they could not have included gas chambers. While
his "Leuchter Report" was not admitted at the trial, it has become one of
the most widely disseminated pieces of "evidence" for those who claim
there was no Holocaust.
     Leuchter's involvement in the 1988 Zundel trial begins a downward
spiral in his career, as states terminate contracts and Holocaust
remembrance groups assail the science in his report (chemist James Roth,
who performed the "Leuchter Report" tests, supports the contention that
Leuchter's tests were miserably designed). While activists argue that
Leuchter's work for revisionist groups marks him an anti-Semite, Morris
paints a slightly different picture. Leuchter becomes a vivid character in
the film, a "mouse of a man" (in Zundel's words) with a Boston Brahmin
accent and an unshakeable conviction that he is right. He comes off as a
unique sort of egotist, a man so used to playing God in his manufacture of
instruments of death that infallibility becomes part of his self-image.
     It would be a helpful bit of information in the formation of that
picture for us to know that Leuchter's academic background had nothing to
do with engineering or chemistry, but was in fact in history. Though
Leuchter does discuss a move by the state of Massachusetts to prosecute
him as an unlicensed engineer late in the film, his background would seem
to be much more important than the casual inclusion Morris gives it. In
fact, MR. DEATH leaves much about Leuchter only peripherally explored: his
relationship with his wife of only a few months (who speaks but does not
appear on screen); his reactions to the fame/infamy inspired by the
"Leuchter Report;" his strangely superstitious response to a mysterious
image in a photo of one of his electric chairs. Morris lets Leuchter talk
about himself for a very long time, but he doesn't probe. In this case,
the approach leaves holes in the story.
     That doesn't make MR. DEATH a failure as a film. Indeed, a
less-than-perfect Errol Morris documentary is still infinitely more
watchable than most conventional documentaries. Some viewers may find his
stylized renderings of his subject -- Leuchter the coffee addict
reflected in a cup of coffee; Leuchter filmed between flashing electrodes
like a modern Dr. Frankenstein -- distracting or inappropriate. Others
will find them part of Morris' ongoing reinvention of the form. It is
surprising, however, that this may be the first Morris' documentary that's
more interesting as a cinematic experience than it is as a learning
experience. As a documentarian, Morris is a singular artist. In Fred
Leuchter, he's left an enigmatic unfinished portrait.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
BLADE
(New Line)
Starring:  Wesley Snipes, Stephen Dorff, Kris Kristofferson, N'Bushe
Wright, Donal Logue.
Screenplay:  David S. Goyer, based on the character published by Marvel
Comics.
Producers:  Peter Frankfurt, Wesley Snipes and Robert Engelman.
Director:  Stephen Norrington.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     BLADE is a comic book adaptation, which in recent years has meant you
could expect one of two approaches:  brooding and violent (THE CROW,
SPAWN) or gaudy and hyper-kinetic (BATMAN AND ROBIN, THE MASK, TANK GIRL).
BLADE is no exception...sort of.  Instead of choosing one familiar path or
the other, the makers of BLADE have chosen both -- it's brooding, gaudy,
violent _and_ hyper-kinetic.  The surprising good news is that it comes
impressively close to succeeding at both.  The bad news is that means it
doesn't entirely succeed at either one.
     The premise alone is intriguing enough to give it a fair shot.  In a
prologue set thirty years ago, we see a woman dying from a vampire attack
just as she gives birth to a son.  Flash forward to the present day, where
that son has grown up to be Blade (Wesley Snipes), a hybrid with all the
strength of a vampire but none of the weaknesses -- he can walk in
daylight with impunity, eat a pizza with extra garlic, and so on.  That
makes him ideally suited for his vocation as vampire hunter, which he and
his weapons guru/mentor Whistler (Kris Kristofferson) carry out with
extreme prejudice.  His latest challenge is a young upstart named Deacon
Frost (Stephen Dorff, the poor man's Kevin Bacon), who plans to unleash
some sort of vampiric armageddon upon humanity unless Blade can cut him
down to size first.
     All right, the latter portion doesn't qualify as any sort of
intriguing.  It's more in that gaudy and hyper-kinetic category, a
climactic conclusion to two hours of punishing, extremely sanguine action.
It's also extremely effective action, directed by former special effects
make-up artist Stephen Norrington at the kind of blistering pace generally
associated with Jackie Chan films.  Make no mistake, BLADE _moves_, with
dynamic fight sequences and a parade of gruesome special effects --
exploding vampire heads, disintegrating vampire bodies, vampire skeletons
crawling out of their skins.  With Snipes anchoring the action as the
chiseled anti-hero, BLADE's frenzied, over-the-top battles offer plenty of
visceral thrills.
     Of course, it has to pause every once in a while for exposition,
which usually is where films of this kind collapse into a puddle of
stupidity.  BLADE, on the other hand, teases with provocative concepts
that ultimately go nowhere.  The tormented hero is nothing new in the
modern "graphic novel" comic book milieu, but BLADE adds the notion of our
protagonist as (in Deacon's words) a vampire Uncle Tom, trying to pass
himself off as human because he's uncomfortable with his vampire lineage.
There are more hints of vampires as a persecuted minority in scenes of a
vampire council discussing how they have struck bargains with humans for
their mutual survival.  When the militant Deacon rejects the assimilation
tactics of his elders in favor of "vampire power," it could have been the
basis for more complex themes than you'd ever expect from a comic book
thriller.  Is Blade, for all his righteous wrath, merely engaging in a
sort of "ethnic cleansing?"  Could Deacon just be firing up a "we're here,
we're vampires, get used to it" civil rights movement?
     Interesting questions, if anyone had bothered to ask them.
Unfortunately, the politics of vampirism quickly gives way to simple,
rapid-fire good guy vs. bad guy stuff.  There's a token pseudo-romantic
interest (N'Bushe Wright), a thick-headed henchman (Donal Logue), and a
villain whose only distinguishing characteristic is his villainy.  BLADE
keeps setting you up to expect that the sub-text is going to matter
somehow, then always bails out for another round of spinning back-kicks
and shotgun blasts.  I suppose you could take a glass-half-full view and
applaud both the quality of the action and the mere attempt to give depth
to the viscera.  There's just too much viscera, and not enough depth, to
take that attempt seriously.  It's an exciting under-achiever -- to
brooding to be pure gaudy fun, to gaudy to let its brooding go anywhere
interesting.

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
     In the bowels of a Thai prison, two American girls learn about the
horrors of bad judgment -- the hard way.  Alice Marano (Claire Danes) and
Darlene Davis (Kate Beckinsale), two high school grads from suburban Ohio,
had only intended their trip to Thailand as a final pre-college fling.
That was before Australian seducer Nick Parks (Daniel Lapaine) played them
for suckers and set them up as heroin smugglers.  Now, in the first year
of a 33-year sentence, Alice and Darlene are beginning to discover what
damnation really means.  It means vaguely drab pixie haircuts, heavily
filtered sunlight streaming into an exercise yard, and a non-stop
soundtrack from some techno-Thai concept of Lilith Fair.  Truly, this is
hell on earth.
     Jonathan Kaplan's BROKEDOWN PALACE is one of those gritty "issue"
dramas that stabs itself in the heart by assuming the audience's
sensibilities can only handle so much grit.  The opening half hour works
well enough, following the two friends on their early youthful adventures
and establishing the basic framework of their relationship.  Alice, the
instigator, makes all the daring choices; Darlene, the good-girl follower,
plays along with her best pal's caprices.  Danes doesn't go overboard with
her character, keeping Alice's devilish streak within the realm of
rebellious plausibility, while Beckinsale struggles a bit more with
Darlene's naivete.  When Nick enters the picture, submerged jealousies
begin to surface, establishing how easily a life-long friendship can be
strained.  It may not be particularly inspired story-telling, but it's
solid enough.
     Then the girls become inmates, and the whole thing falls apart.  The
theme of BROKEDOWN PALACE may not be "look at the squalor of Thai
prisons," but it shouldn't have been "look how attractive a Thai prison
can be with the right cinematography."  Kaplan shoots bridge sequences as
elaborate music videos, turning his actresses into cute models instead of
tormented characters.  Meanwhile, the various government officials who
sneer and smirk their way through the film -- including Kay Tong Lim as a
corrupt Thai detective and Lou Diamond Phillips (in a gruesomely bad
performance) as a nonchalant U.S. embassy flunkie -- provide the tidy
villainy we require.  With a script by first-time screenwriter David Arata
that forgets sub-plots and provides simplistic outrage, BROKEDOWN PALACE
proves itself to be fairly lazy film-making.  It pre-digests its story
into over-wrought melodrama.
     There's a hint of promise when Bill Pullman enters the story as
Yankee Hank, an expatriate American attorney with that typically
expatriate American sense of me-first-ism.  It's fairly obvious from the
get-go that his character arc will be straight out of CASABLANCA -- a 
jaded pseudo-Rick Blaine who gives up his own financial interest for the
greater good -- but Pullman is an interesting enough actor to pull it off.
Unfortunately, his story also pulls us away from the two central
characters.  Though in a way that's a good thing -- the fewer scenes spent
in the meticulously unpleasant prison, the better -- it's also a
distraction from Alice's theoretically central conversion to selfless
friend.  
     Comparisons between BROKEDOWN PALACE and last year's RETURN TO
PARADISE are inevitable -- both are tales of Americans languishing abroad,
seasoned with self-sacrifice for the sake of a friend.  But as uneven as
RETURN TO PARADISE was, it approached every similar point with more
provocative shades of gray.  Instead of RETURN TO PARADISE's two casual
acquaintances, the friends are best buddies from the cradle, making the
choice considerably less complicated; instead of making the protagonist
convincingly selfish from the outset, it makes her a misunderstood wild
child.  Kaplan and Arata want desperately for the plight of their
characters to matter, but the final hour is too irretrievably phony to
provide an emotional pull.  Viewers who find this sort of morality play
uplifting may find their hearts swelling at the conclusion.  I found mine
sinking as BROKEDOWN PALACE closed on the beatific smile of an actress,
placed center stage while a well-placed beam of sunlight captured her
soaring spirit in an MTV prison.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
ANTZ
(DreamWorks)
Voices:  Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Sylvester Stallone,
Jennifer Lopez, Christopher Walken, Anne Bancroft.
Screenplay:  Todd Alcott and Chris Weitz & Paul Weitz.
Producers:  Brad Lewis, Aron Warner and Patty Wooton.
Directors:  Eric Darnell and Tim Johnson.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, violent situations)
Running Time:  83 minutes.
     So DreamWorks' ANTZ gets to be first out of the gate in the
Computer-Animated Insect Sweepstakes, beating Disney/Pixar's A BUG'S LIFE
to the screen by a good two months.  The folks at DreamWorks probably felt
that meant they could set the standard and avoid comparisons, but that's
not entirely true.  Disney's 1995 TOY STORY became the first, best
standard-bearer, a wonderfully witty adventure which established that no
amount of visual virtuosity could push aside the power of a great script.
There was little doubt that three years of technological innovation would
make ANTZ more spectacular to look at.  The question was whether these
anthropomorphized insects would be asked to carry a story that felt like
twenty times their body weight.
     It looks like the film-makers behind ANTZ learned the right lessons
from TOY STORY.  ANTZ may not be in TOY STORY's league when it comes to
charm and ingenuity, but it's a clever and appealing piece of work in its
own right.  The oddly spelled title actually refers to the story's
protagonist, a lowly and unfulfilled worker ant called Z (Woody Allen).
Trapped in the ant colony's rigid caste system, Z longs to find his own
destiny, which might even include romancing the unapproachable Princess
Bala (Sharon Stone).  In order to catch Bala's eye, Z switches places with
his soldier ant pal Weaver (Sylvester Stallone), unwittingly setting off a
social revolution.  Even more unwittingly, he discovers that head soldier
General Mandible (Gene Hackman) has sinister plans for the colony.
     The goofy socio-political overtones of Z's struggle for individuality
are good for a few chuckles, though it's not entirely clear from one
moment to the next what the "message" is.  Sometimes it's a treatise on
the triumph of personal will over stultifying conformity (nowhere more
humorously than in a bar scene where line dancing becomes metaphorical
fascism).  At other times, the needs of the many are shown to outweigh the
needs of the few.  And that's not the only place where the story feels
less than cohesive.  Sub-plots abound, many of which fill time without
moving the story anywhere.  The ideas for individual scenes play much more
effectively in the moment than they do upon reflection, where they don't
feel completely unified.
     Then again, it's hard not to be caught up in the moment while
watching ANTZ.  The visuals are nothing short of spectacular, in terms of
both scale and individual detail.  When thousands of ants form a wrecking
ball or a column to serve a unified purpose, thousands of individual limbs
and antennae waving, the effect is dazzling.  There are also some
effectively creepy images of a war between ants and acid-spewing termites
(the kind which might spook youngsters).  Perhaps even more breath-taking
are the facial expressions created for the characters.  The movements and
reactions are so complete that every ant becomes real on the screen.  With
so much attention lavished on giving the characters personality, ANTZ
never feels merely showy, as impressive as it is from start to finish.
     Not that the animators were solely responsible for giving the
characters personality.  ANTZ boasts an impressive cast of voice talent,
from Hackman as the eugenically-inclined dictator-in-waiting to 
Christopher Walken as he morally ambivalent henchman, from Stallone deftly
playing good-natured lug to Dan Aykroyd and Jane Curtin as a pair of
WASP-ish wasps named Chip and Muffy.  But the star of the show is Woody
Allen, bringing his inimitable, anxiety-ridden nebbishness to Z.  Some of
his lines are pure vintage Woody (on whether he "laughs in the face of
Death":  "Actually, I generally...make sarcastic remarks behind Death's
back"), which makes it even more of an incongruous pleasure thinking of
him as a romantic action hero.  His voice performance is one of several
reasons ANTZ is plenty of fun, if often in an inside-jokey, over the head
of kids kind of way.  As a story it's uneven, but it still satisfies; it
may not be TOY STORY, but few things are.  And it has succeeded at setting
a reasonably high bar for the next computer-generated bug film to jump
over with all six legs.

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
PERMANENT MIDNIGHT
(Artisan)
Starring:  Ben Stiller, Elizabeth Hurley, Maria Bello, Owen Wilson, Peter
Greene.
Screenplay:  David Veloz, based on the memoir by Jerry Stahl.
Producers:  Jane Hamsher and Don Murphy.
Director:  David Veloz.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, sexual situations, profanity, brief nudity)
Running Time:  87 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the last few minutes of PERMANENT MIDNIGHT, writer/director David
Veloz introduces a jarring element of irony to what had been a fairly
straightforward dark night of the soul drama.  It's the true story of
Jerry Stahl (Ben Stiller), a successful television writer during the 1980s
for such programs as "ALF" and "thirtysomething" who bottomed out as the
result of heroin and cocaine addiction.  The film's coda shows
Stiller-as-Stahl, having written his confessional autobiography, appearing
on a series of television talk shows to promote the book and bare his
soul.  In one of the film's best lines, Stahl explains in voice-over that
the most humiliating thing he ever did as the result of his addiction was
"appearing on 'Maury'."
     A good gag, but also a pretty self-serving one.  In an era when
celebrity mea culpas are just another part of the public relations
landscape, a film like PERMANENT MIDNIGHT has to work extra hard to
function as an honest cautionary tale rather than a plea to love me, feel
sorry for me, let me back into your hearts.  The film makes sure we know
about Stahl's troubled family life, including two suicidal parents, which
already suggests that Stahl and/or writer/director David Veloz is pointing
fingers outward as much as inward.  That five minute montage of chat show
appearances, however, acts almost as a slap in the face.  Watching the
character pitch his book -- which, of course, became the movie we're
watching -- takes every harrowing moment which preceded and makes it cheap
and exploitative.  Instead of learning from his experience, we learn that
a really good salesman can turn his tragedy into dollars.
     That's truly a shame, because Stahl's story is given a harrowing
conviction by Ben Stiller's performance.  Though best known as a comic in
films like the hit THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, Stiller is a versatile
performer who makes heroin addiction about as ugly as we've ever seen it.
It's funny yet pathetic watching Stahl trying with a ridiculous lack of
success to disguise his stupors as artistic eccentricity; even other
self-absorbed Hollywood types instantly recognize that he's utterly
useless.  What's fascinating about Stiller's performance is that there's
never a moment when his character appears to be functional as an addict.
He disappears instantly into a world of excuses and frantic searches for
his next high.
     Unfortunately, there's nothing besides Stiller's performance to make
us care about PERMANENT MIDNIGHT.  The two romantic angles which are
supposed to give resonance to the story -- Stahl's marriage to a mid-level
television executive (Elizabeth Hurley) and his post-rehab infatuation
with fellow recovering addict Kitty (Maria Bello) -- are both undercut by
the circumstances of their relationships.  The marriage, though it
produces a child, is primarily a way for his British wife to get a green
card, and the romance with Kitty serves primarily as a device for Stahl to
tell his story in flashback.  There's not much at stake as we watch Stahl
disintegrate, nor is there a particular reason to care if he's earned his
second chance at love.  He's just another cleaned-up Hollywood junk-head
with a tale to tell, probably one of a thousand.  The last five minutes of
PERMANENT MIDNIGHT are as ill-conceived as any five minutes of film this
year, because they make it look like Stahl is just a different kind of
self-absorbed now.  You're left with the uncomfortable feeling that for
him, addiction is just a marketing hook.

Title
Review for S.L.C. Punk! (1999)
     James Merendino's SLC PUNK! has something deep and insightful to say
about the nature of youthful rebellion.  Sort of.  Maybe.  I think.  It's
sort of hard to tell through all the bombast of Merendino's hyperactive
period piece, which tries to be a sort of nostalgic BREAKFAST CLUB for the
Dead Kennedys set but misses the point entirely.  It's one thing to make a
film about teens grousing over the sell-outs of adulthood and the trials
of coping with societal expectations, and target it at the teens
themselves; it's quite another to make such a film and target it at those
who've already been through that melodramatic wringer.  The simple
enjoyment that might have come from the time and the tunes instead turns
into a 90 minute wait for the characters to get a clue.
     Our tour guide through SLC PUNK! is Stevo (Matthew Lillard), who --
along with his best friend Heroin Bob (Michael Goorjian) -- is one of the
few true punks in the capital of conservative Utah during the conservative
Reagan era circa 1985.  The tour consists largely of an anthropological
dig through Stevo and Bob's twisted clique, which includes an
independently wealthy and extremely paranoid drug dealer (Til Schweiger),
the lads' respective ladyfriends (Jennifer Lien and Annabeth Gish), and an
acid casualty (Devon Sawa).  Along the way we learn about the various
sub-categories of Salt Lake City youth, the influence of Stevo's 60s
radical-turned-yuppie father (Christopher McDonald), and where to go for
real beer when you need it.
     Like many an independent comedy, SLC PUNK! has enough frantic energy
to guarantee at least a few belly laughs -- notably during Stevo's spin
through a party describing the various sub-plots in action, and a scene
showing our protagonists as pre-punk, "Dungeons and Dragons"-obsessed
middle-schoolers.  Also like many an independent comedy, it often has
nothing _but_ frantic energy.  For every decent gag or clever insight, you
can count on at least two or three self-indulgent uses of direct address
to the camera in which Stevo rails about religious oppression or the
plague of poseurs (i.e., those who son the garb without walking the walk).
Scenes which I'm assuming should come off as either amusing or
wise-beyond-his-years instead come off as merely damp; if spittle were
diamonds, Matthew Lillard's performance would surely be a piece of comic
jewelry fit for a princess.  Once again, a film-maker's attempt to connect
with the audience through narration becomes a lazy failure.
     SLC PUNK! tries to score its major profundity points when Stevo is
hit by the bombshell that rebellious youth are just conformists of a
different kind.  Well, you can file that one under "d" for "duh;" Stevo's
revelation is one with which any audience member over the age of 25 will
already be quite familiar.  It's that kind of pseudo-wisdom that makes SLC
PUNK! far more tiresome than a film built around devotion to the Ramones
should have been.  When tragedy strikes one of the film's significant
characters late in the film, and Merendino tries to play it as a genuine
tragedy, you realize he hasn't remotely earned an emotional response.  SLC
PUNK! blasts through its set pieces with little film-making prowess, then
expects to tie it all together by having Stevo blubber away at misspent
youth.  Poseurs, indeed.

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
MY FAVORITE MARTIAN
(Disney)
Starring:  Christopher Lloyd, Jeff Daniels, Elizabeth Hurley, Daryl
Hannah, Wallace Shawn, Christine Ebersole, Michael Lerner, Ray Walston.
Screenplay:  Sherri Stoner & Deanna Oliver.
Producers:  Robert Shapiro & Jerry Leider and Mark Toberoff.
Director:  Donald Petrie.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult humor)
Running Time:  93 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Suggestive references to "balls" and "nuts."  To breasts.  To giving
"the finger."  To getting into someone's pants.  To catching one's
genitalia in one's zipper.  To contraception.  To virginity.  Two
references to urination.  A flatulence gag.  A couple of belches.  And a
toilet's-eye-view of a fat guy's rear end as he bemoans eating that last
burrito.  
     Welcome, friends, to the Wonderful World of Disney.
     In MY FAVORITE MARTIAN, we discover that there is intelligent life in
our solar system, and that absolutely none of it was involved in making
this film.  Continuing its impressive string of stupid and vulgar live
action films, Disney this time recycles the 1960s television series which
starred Bill Bixby and Ray Walston.  Jeff Daniels stars here as Tim
O'Hara, a somewhat socially inept television news producer; Christopher
Lloyd is a Martian who crash-lands and poses as Tim's Uncle Martin while
trying to repair his ship.  Along the way there are plenty of crazy
misunderstandings and near-discoveries, including the suspicion by Tim's
faithful camerawoman Lizzie (Daryl Hannah) that he has the hots for her,
and the attempt by ambitious reporter Brace Channing (Elizabeth Hurley) to
break the story of a close encounter.
     Not surprisingly, MY FAVORITE MARTIAN essentially consists of a
series of scenes which present the opportunity to show off special
effects.  Martin is able to appear in human form through the use of a
special gum, which also has unique effects on humans.  He has a sentient,
wise-cracking spacesuit called Zoot (uncredited voice by "Seinfeld's"
Wayne Knight) which does kooky things like pitching woo to a dress.  He
uses a "molecular condenser" to shrink objects like his space ship and
Tim's Plymouth (don't even bother with scientific curiosities like why a
"molecular condenser" also changes the weight of the object).  When
Martin gets upset, his body parts fall off.  And viewers who enjoy that
sort of thing -- and don't have trouble with the ridiculous notion of
Daryl Hannah as a wallflower -- will giggle blithely along.
     Trouble is, most of those will be kids.  Yes, MY FAVORITE MARTIAN
sports a PG rating, which clearly states that "some material may not be
suitable for children," but let's get serious here.  Disney has turned the
company name into a license to print money for "family entertainment,"
which used to mean something a parent wouldn't be embarrassed to take a
kid to see.  Take a look at that list in the first paragraph above and you
decide.  This is filmmaking not for children, but for idiots of all ages,
pandering with a sense of impunity because they haven't exactly gone broke
in the last couple of years by doing so.  In a late scene, when Tim is
admonished that humans should do something "about the oceans...and
afternoon talk shows," the hypocrisy of this film holding _anything_ up to
ridicule for its stupidity or offensiveness nearly burst a large vein in
my forehead.  How sad to see appealing comic performers like Lloyd
(regurgitating bits from BACK TO THE FUTURE) and Wallace Shawn (as nasty
government scientist Dr. Elliot Coleye...e. coli, get it?) floundering in
a mess like this.  How much sadder still that people will pay to see it.
     There are maybe two harmless visual gags that work in MY FAVORITE
MARTIAN, and perhaps that many examples of real wit in the script.  I
liked the fact that Martin's molecular condenser makes a sound remarkably
similar to R2-D2 when he's shot by the Jawas in STAR WARS; the absurd
parallel to E.T.'s revival also made me chuckle.  Mostly I sat in stony,
angry silence as this aggressively brainless film dribbled towards a
sequel-ready conclusion, tallying up the ways it treated viewers like
pre-schoolers who laugh hysterically when they shout "doody-head" at each
other.  Remember that list next time you trust Disney's name to mean
anything but mass-market infantilism.

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Jennifer Aniston, Paul Rudd, John Pankow, Allison Janney, Alan
Alda, Nigel Hawthorne, Amo Gulinello, Tim Daly, Steve Zahn.
Screenplay:  Wendy Wasserstein, based on the novel by Stephen McCauley.
Producer:  Laurence Mark.
Director:  Nicholas Hytner.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As I sat watching THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION, all I could think was:
here is a romantic comedy for everyone who applauded when MY BEST FRIEND'S
WEDDING ended with Julia Roberts dancing with Ruppert Everett.  I'm not
about to delve into the sociology or psychology of friendships between
women and gay male pals, but apparently it has achieved a status as part
of the urban American zeitgeist.  Still...a mainstream romantic comedy
about two people whose primary similarity is that they're both attracted
to men?
     I have to give THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION credit for tackling the
subject at all.  I just can't give it much credit for tackling the subject
effectively.  The principal characters are a pair of community-minded New
Yorkers, social worker Nina (Jennifer Aniston) and school teacher George
(Paul Rudd).  When George is dumped by his long-time boyfriend (Tim Daly),
he takes a room with Nina, a woman he met just days earlier at a party.
George's presence complicates Nina's relationship with her boyfriend Vince
(John Pankow), but things get even more complicated when Nina discovers
that she is pregnant.  Though she decides she wants to keep the baby, she
wants a better father than Vince for her child.  What she wants, she
decides, is George.
     Why she decides she wants George is another question entirely.  In
fact, why Nina wants anything is up for debate.  There is no character
there, nothing which gives us clue why she does what she does, or what it
is in her life that makes George such an appealing alternative to Vince.
The perky Aniston can do adorable and wistful in her sleep...and in this
case, she might as well have been.  Though Rudd fills in a few blanks with
a pleasant, appropriately confused performance -- working wonders with the
well-handled moment in which he actually responds to Nina's physical
attentions -- George and Nina's friendship never feels genuine.  It's just
a plot device set up so two attractive people can get into wacky and
farcical situations.
     Actually, not all that wacky and farcical at all, as it turns out.
Between Nicholas Hytner's direction and Wendy Wasserstein's script, THE
OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION almost never feels like a comedy.  The story is too
serious by half, full of tearful or angry confrontations and sincere
speeches, with the pregnancy sub-plot a terribly ill-advised decision.
Hytner, meanwhile, can never create a consistent comic rhythm to buoy the
narrative.  Every edit feels jarring, slamming scenes one into the other
rather than letting them build to humorous high points.  Wasserstein metes
out the giggles between the most gratuitous uses of the "f"-word since the
last romantic comedy starring a "Friends" cast member (KISSING A FOOL),
with everyone involved taking the issues too seriously to bother making
them funny.
     All the emphasis on longing and misapplied affection at least
provides a nice role for Nigel Hawthorne, who worked with Hytner on THE
MADNESS OF KING GEORGE.  As a theater critic unrequitedly infatuated with
a young actor (Amo Gulinello), Hawthorne actually makes the film's themes
momentarily poignant as he ponders facing his later years alone.  Yet even
that bright spot further emphasizes THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION as a
romantic comedy which isn't particularly romantic or particulalry comedic.
It's really a half-hearted stab at teasing the same social conventions
CHASING AMY successfully trampled all over.  After all the soul searching
about the lines between friendship, love and sex, it comes to the safe
conclusion that like likes like.  And just to be even safer, it throws a
bone to everyone who came to see the female protagonist dancing at a
wedding with her gay male pal.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
SHANGHAI NOON
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Jackie Chan, Owen Wilson, Lucy Liu, Brandon Merrill, Roger
Yuan, Xander Berkeley.
Screenplay:  Alfred Gough & Miles Millar.
Producers:  Roger Birnbaum, Gary Barber and Jonathan Glickman.
Director:  Tom Dey.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Jackie Chan in another buddy action-comedy -- now there's something I
didn't think I ever needed to see again. Sure, the formula proved
extremely successful in 1998's $141 million hit RUSH HOUR. It also meant
Jackie Chan fans had to endure the human audio torture device that is
Chris Tucker, and that studios would persist in their foolish perception
that American audiences might not embrace a film with Chan as its solo
star. SHANGHAI NOON looked like a disaster waiting to happen -- formula
piled upon formula, cheap gag piled upon cheap gag, Jackie Chan in another
buddy action-comedy.
     The next time an international action star comes calling on
Hollywood, and needs a buddy action-comedy partner, I hope they pick Owen
Wilson again. The quirky actor does something few actors have the ability
to do: He can make you forget you're watching a formula film. SHANGHAI
NOON opens in 1881, where independent-minded Chinese princess Pei Pei
(Lucy Liu) wants to escape the Forbidden City and her arranged marriage. 
Unfortunately, she chooses as her escort to America a duplicitous
translator, who turns Pei Pei over as a hostage to disgraced former
Imperial Guard Lo Fong (Roger Yuan). Enter Chon Wang (Chan), a lower-tier
Imperial Guard who accompanies a mission to recover the princess. On a
train crossing Nevada, Chon Wang and company are accosted by a gang of
thieves headed by Roy O'Bannon (Wilson). O'Bannon and Chon begin at odds,
but eventually become riding partners (though O'Bannon's goal is more
likely the solid gold ransom than the princess' safe return).
     As was the case in RUSH HOUR, Chan's ability to hold up his end of
the buddy partnership is never in question. There is something so
instantly and immensely likable about Chan that it's almost unfair that
he's also so physically gifted. His stunt work is again in top form in
SHANGHAI NOON, finding more creative props for Chan to use as weapons
against his foes: saplings, moose horns, horseshoes, a railroad log car,
etc. Director Tom Dey and editor Richard Chew don't do Chan's work optimum
justice -- too many sequences are chopped up when it has proved infinitely
smarter over the years to let the camera sit still and watch Chan at work
-- but they still possess that unique capacity to dazzle. A movie fight
sequence is usually an obligatory piece of action business; a Jackie Chan
fight sequence is the reason you never want to leave your seat during the
action.
     And Owen Wilson is the reason you never want to leave your seat
during the exposition. His O'Bannon is a great, goofy comic creation, a
big talker whose primary reason for being in the outlaw game appears to be
impressing women. Any number of actors probably could have pulled off that
characterization, but it's far more difficult to give it the strangely
off-hand charm Wilson provides. His performance cashes in on the
incongruity of his surfer-casual line readings, but it never depends on
that incongruity. There's just something unexpectedly funny about the way
Wilson handles even the most mundane, predictable moments. I spent half of
RUSH HOUR pleading for Chris Tucker to get off the screen so I could enjoy
Jackie Chan. No such problems in SHANGHAI NOON -- I felt a silly grin
plastered across my face no matter which actor was being showcased.
     If the raw material of SHANGHAI NOON had been stronger, it could have
been a truly inspired comedy. Writers Alfred Gough and Miles Millar pump
some clever lines into the script, but it's still a bit too dependent on
making fun of the names Pei Pei and Chon Wang (or rib-nudgingly naming one
nasty cowboy Van Cleef). Then there are the lumbering plot development
scenes, including references to Chinese railroad labor that seems included
primarily for a sense of anachronistic moral superiority. In fact, the
entire premise feels like a grand distraction from the appeal of the two
stars, whose work individually and as a team blows the material away. I'm
not sure what sort of setting might have served them better, and it almost
feels like quibbling to wonder. Chan and Wilson simply make SHANGHAI NOON
loads of fun. It's the sort of buddy action-comedy that wipes some of the
stigma away from the term.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
OUT OF SIGHT
(Universal)
Starring:  George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Steve
Zahn, Albert Brooks, Dennis Farina, Isaiah Washington, Catherine Keener.
Screenplay:  Scott Frank, based on the novel by Elmore Leonard.
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher.
Director:  Steven Soderbergh.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     No previous adaptation of an Elmore Leonard novel -- and there have
been a couple of pretty good ones recently in GET SHORTY and JACKIE BROWN
-- has captured the author's unique flavor as effectively as OUT OF SIGHT.
Though Leonard usually writes about criminal characters, he doesn't
exactly write crime novels; though his stories are often quite funny, he
doesn't exactly write comic novels; though his narratives always come
together in a way that makes sense, he doesn't exactly let tight plotting
get in the way of an amusing tangent.  Leonard is his own literary animal:
sometimes sordid, sometimes smirking, always sly.
     You'll find every one of those contradictions and then some in OUT OF
SIGHT, a marvelously meandering caper with rhythms all its own.  The story
focuses on the aftermath of the Florida prison escape of career bank
robber Jack Foley (George Clooney).  In the wrong place at the right time
is U. S. marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), who ends up sharing a
cramped trunk ride with Jack when his friend Buddy (Ving Rhames)
commandeers Karen's car for the escape.  Surprisingly, the ride proves
intriguing to both parties.  Karen manages to free herself and gets on the
case of re-apprehending Jack, though she isn't sure whether she wants him
for business or pleasure.  Jack, meanwhile, prepares for his next big
score, though he isn't sure whether he's more interested in scoring cash
or Karen.
     OUT OF SIGHT certainly works best as a quirky comedy, with
screenwriter Scott Frank (who also adapted GET SHORTY) providing great
material for a superb supporting cast.  Steve Zahn steals every one of his
scenes as Jack and Buddy's perpetually stoned accomplice Glenn, channeling
Crispin Glover with considerably more appealing goofiness.  Also on hand
are Albert Brooks as the white collar crook whose home is our heroes' next
target, Don Cheadle as edgy partner-in-crime Maurice "Snoopy" Miller, and
Dennis Farina as Karen's protective father.  There are even a couple of
sharp unbilled cameos, including Michael Keaton reprising his JACKIE BROWN
character and a final-scene appearance by another veteran of a previous
Leonard adaptation.  Good scripts make even mediocre actors look better;
Frank's script in the hands of these actors is a hilarious gem.
     But OUT OF SIGHT isn't just a comedy.  It's also a love story, if a
very odd one.  The relationship between Jack and Karen is the heart of the
film, a dangerous set-up since the two characters share exactly two scenes
for all practical purposes.  Both scenes, however, are perfectly executed:
the trunk-trapped initial conversation (photographed by Elliot Davis in
seductive tail-light red), and a meeting in a hotel bar which fluidly
shifts to a closer encounter.  Clooney has never looked more comfortable
or charismatic on the big screen, nor has Lopez, for that matter.  With a
clever nod to the fast-attraction nature of film romances (in a reference
to the Redford-Dunaway thriller THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR), OUT OF SIGHT
gets maximum mileage out of the pairing of its stars in a believable
fast-attraction film romance.
     There are also plenty of crime caper elements mixed in with the
comedy and romance, including no small amount of bloodshed, but even then
the film seems entirely cohesive.  Credit director Steven Soderbergh with
crafting a distinctive, unifying look and feel from Frank's deftly
back-tracking script.  Most frequently he employs an abrupt freeze-framing
device, usually to mark transitions between scenes and locations.  In
Soderbergh's capable hands the freeze-frames never feel gimmicky, instead
playing as chapter stops on Leonard's snappy punch lines.  There's nothing
particularly deep or intensely memorable about OUT OF SIGHT -- indeed, the
pace flags a bit at times as it tries to keep up with all its characters 
-- but it's the kind of film that punches holes in the notion that
"entertaining" and "smart" are mutually exclusive adjectives for a summer
film.  This is pure pulp pleasure, the cinematic equivalent of great beach
reading... and what better way is there to describe the work of Elmore
Leonard?

Title
Review for When We Were Kings (1996)
(Gramercy)
A documentary by Leon Gast.
Producers:  Taylor Hackford, Leon Gast, David Sonenberg.
MPAA Rating:  Not Rated (brief nudity, profanity, boxing violence)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Twenty years removed from the events it chronicles, WHEN WE WERE
KINGS takes on an ironic resonance.  Leon Gast's documentary account of
the 1974 heavyweight championship fight between Muhammad Ali and George
Foreman in Kinshasa, Zaire ("The Rumble in the Jungle") offers a vision of
the two combatants worlds removed from the way we see them today:  the
brash, flashy Ali has become the frail man who lit the Olympic flame in
Atlanta, while the intimidating, taciturn Foreman has become a
self-deprecating teddy bear in commercials and sit-coms.  A study of two
figures from the glory days of boxing is only part of what WHEN WE WERE
KINGS tries to deliver, however, and it is only the chance to see Ali at
his verbal and physical finest which grips you while much of the film
drifts off on tangents.
     Part of Gast's focus in WHEN WE WERE KINGS involves the extraordinary
nature of the event itself.  Then-fledgling promoter Don King not only
managed to get $5 million for each fighter; he turned the fight into an
occasion for an all-out festival of Afro-centrism, bringing black American
performers like James Brown, B. B. King and the Spinners to Zaire for a
concert.  Ali, whose confrontational politics and conviction for draft
evasion had enraged mainstream Americans, was thrilled to be fighting in a
black country where he was viewed as a great hero.  Foreman, meanwhile,
could not understand why he was treated like the villain, or worse,
ignored entirely.  In fact, the few locals who greeted his plane were
surprised to discover that the heavyweight champion was black himself.
     Gast frequently moves back and forth between preparation for the
fight itself and peripheral events, but this technique ends up muddling
WHEN WE WERE KINGS about as often as it enriches it.  The musical clips
inserted throughout the film do little to build a mood, and there is a
randomness to their inclusion which makes it unclear where they fit
chronologically (especially considering the five week delay between the
originally-scheduled fight date and the actual fight caused by a sparring
injury to Foreman's eye).  That kind of incompleteness is common in WHEN
WE WERE KINGS, as Gast introduces a situation then fails to follow up on
it.  An air conditioning failure at the musicians' hotel has everyone in a
tizzy, but we never hear about it again; the anecdotes involving extreme
measures taken by Zaire's dictator Mobutu Sese Seko to clean up the
country for foreign press are interesting, but Gast doesn't tell us how
the delay affected those efforts.
     It also doesn't help that Gast can't quite decide whether WHEN WE
WERE KINGS is a piece of social history or a piece of sports history.  The
back story for the fight is fascinating, with the past-his-prime Ali
facing the younger, stronger Foreman no one believed he could beat, and
commentary by sports journalists Norman Mailer and George Plimpton
provides solid background for the context of the fight in the careers of
the two combatants.  Yet Gast appears to deal with the actual fight as a
necessary evil, or as padding to fill out a documentary about something
else which was struggling to make feature length.  It is indicative of how
little he understands the most important single aspect of the fight --
Ali's "Rope-a-Dope" tactic which allowed him to tire out Foreman, and
eventually knock him out in the 8th round -- that there is never a moment
in which anyone analyzes who developed the strategy, or why Ali went to it
only after a first round attempt at right hand leads was unsuccessful.
     WHEN WE WERE KINGS might be a few different documentaries crammed
into one film, but it still delights whenever Muhammad Ali is center
stage.  More than anything else, Gast wants the film to act as a memorial
to the charismatic Ali who never failed to provide a quote or a headline.
The portrait that emerges captures Ali at his cocky, trash-talking,
rhyme-spinning finest, but it also shows the deeply committed Muslim who
viewed his trip to Zaire as a kind of pilgrimage.  Ali in 1974 was one of
the world's greatest entertainers, love him or hate him, and WHEN WE WERE
KINGS offers another chance to see him when he was a king.  Leon Gast
should have known Ali was the best thing he had going for him, but often
it seems that the real fight in WHEN WE WERE KINGS is between Gast and his
material.

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
     Period adventures have been around as long as the movies.
Throughout that time, and especially into modern efforts, such films
have rarely navigated successfully between the twin perils of the
genre:  tedious hero-worship on the one hand, grade-B schlock on the
other.  Rare is the film that manages to be both exciting and
intelligent, both compelling as character-based drama and a good
old-fashioned good guys vs. bad guys tale.  ROB ROY does manage
both, and then some.  Though the film's love story doesn't quite
click, the main story is wonderfully acted and exhilarating to
watch.
     Liam Neeson stars as the title character, 18th century Scotsman
Robert Roy MacGregor.  A caretaker for the lands of the Marquis of
Montrose (John Hurt), MacGregor is also the de facto leader of his
impoverished clan.  Determined to make a better life for himself,
his wife Mary (Jessica Lange) and his entire clan, MacGregor borrows
1,000 pounds from Montrose to buy cattle and turn a significant
profit.  But Montrose's accountant Killearn (Brian Cox) and devious
housegest Archibald Cunningham (Tim Roth) conspire to steal the
money, leaving MacGregor with a massive and unpayable debt.  When
Montrose offers to erase the debt in exchange for MacGregor
tarnishing the reputation of Montrose's rival lord, MacGregor
refuses, leading to a war of honor between Englishmen and Scotsmen,
and between MacGregor and Cunningham in particular.
     The plot of ROB ROY is a fairly dense one, including a healthy
dose of post-Restoration English political machinations which might
leave many viewers wondering why being accused of being a "Jacobite"
would be such a big deal.  These instances are rare enough, however,
not to be distracting.  Perhaps one reason is that in its structure
and tone, ROB ROY has the archetypal appeal of a Shakespeare play,
with the political elements serving only to set up conflicts, not to
define them.  The characters' relationships are laid out in classic
dramatic terms:  Cunningham, a bastard who plays the role of
courtier, hates his benefactor Montrose even as he envies his
position; MacGregor has a virtue (devotion to the concept of honor)
which also becomes the source of his misery.  Alan Sharp's
screenplay makes sure that even though the characters have mythic
dimensions, they do not remain one-dimensional.
     That's the academic end.  ROB ROY is also just a fine piece of
movie-making, beginning with the superb direction of Michael
Caton-Jones.  His opening shot is the perfect introduction to an
epic, a breathtaking view of the highlands into which the characters
slowly wander and draw closer.  The pacing lags here and there, and
the more brutal elements of the story are occasionally excessive,
but those are exceptions in an otherwise top-notch job, particularly
a pair of magnificently staged duels.  Special note should also go
to Carter Burwell, who provides a stirring Celtic-themed score.
     For my money though, ROB ROY works fundamentally because its
villains--all three of them--are fantastic.  As fine a job as
Liam Neeson does with MacGregor, his character is essentially a
legend, a striking figure but fairly static.  Tim Roth, on the other
hand, is a showy delight as Cunningham, the fop with a serious
sadistic streak, and he takes it to the limit.  John Hurt's Montrose
is a cold-eyed political back-stabber, and expert manipulator of any
situation to his benefit.  The best of the three might be Brian Cox,
best unknown as the "other" Hannibal Lecter in 1986's MANHUNTER.  He
is frighteningly vile, and the scene in which he turns a threat from
Jessica Lange's Mary back on her is one of the film's best.
     As for Lange, she may be the weak link.  Her acting style has
never been one of my favorites, and sometimes her emotions feel
forced.  ROB ROY tries to build the love story between Rob and Mary
into one of the central elements, but the conflict between Rob and
the Englishmen is always more interesting.  Nevertheless, all the
elements combine into an extremely satisfying whole.  ROB ROY is not
for the squeamish, with its swordplay and a lengthy rape scene, nor
is it for those looking strictly for a lusty romp.  It is a story
about characters as much as it is about battles, and it succeeds as
both.

Title
Review for Waking the Dead (1999)
WAKING THE DEAD
(USA Films)
Starring:  Billy Crudup, Jennifer Connelly, Hal Holbrook, Molly Parker,
Janet McTeer, Paul Hipp.
Screenplay:  Robert Dillon, based upon the novel by Scott Spencer.
Producers:  Keith Gordon, Stuart Kleinman and Linda Reisman.
Director:  Keith Gordon.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity, adult themes, brief
drug use)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
[WARNING: Elements of this review may be considered spoilers. Proceed at
your own risk.]
     On the off chance that the rest of the film hadn't already irritated
you or bored you to distraction -- and trust me, it will do one or the
other -- Keith Gordon's WAKING THE DEAD offers a special treat during its
climactic scene. It's the scene to which the whole film has been building,
a scene in which our hero Fielding Pierce (Billy Crudup) encounters his
long-lost love Sarah Williams (Jennifer Connelly) -- maybe. Nine years
earlier, in 1974, the tense but passionate relationship between social
activist Sarah and would-be politician Fielding ended when a car bomb
killed Sarah and two Chilean dissidents. Now, with his dreams of reaching
Congress nearly come to fruition, Fielding is seeing Sarah everywhere, and
has become convinced that she is still alive. Thus is the stage set for a
confrontation between them that takes place ... in a Congressional office
building.
     The wrongness of that setting may not strike you immediately, until
you consider the context. WAKING THE DEAD's brooding character study
attaches itself to one crucial question: Is Sarah really alive, having
stepped out of the way of Fielding's ambition the only way she knew how,
or is Fielding hallucinating her as the manifestation of his fear that
political aspirations are costing him his soul? The effectiveness of their
final encounter hinges on uncertainty over the answer to that question. So
rather than have them meet in a bedroom, or a park, or a church, or
virtually any-freaking-where else, they meet in a Congressional office
building. Where Sarah -- her life theoretically in danger if anyone finds
out she's really alive, if in fact she's really alive -- just wanders into
a Congressman's office. Without any identification. In the middle of the
night. Any guesses as to whether a real, living person would have pulled
off that tidy little stunt?
     It's a truly logic-numbing moment, but it's indicative of why WAKING
THE DEAD is such a catatonic failure. A tale of obsessive love-cum-
insanity based on a novel by Scott Spencer (who also penned ENDLESS LOVE,
and seems inordinately fascinated by obsessive love-cum-insanity), WAKING
THE DEAD revels in its atmosphere of all-encompassing mourning. Gordon
lays on the brooding score, the lingering close-ups and the ominous
fades-to-white, apparently intent on creating a Phil Spector-like Wall of
Despair. As a tone piece, it's beyond reproach; if you don't clue in to
how WAKING THE DEAD is supposed to make you feel, you've probably fallen
asleep.
     Not that anyone could blame you. WAKING THE DEAD may do a splendid
job of manufacturing gloom, but it's incapable of giving you any reason to
care about its characters. Crudup and Connelly are steady, competent
actors, but there's nothing they can do to make the relationship between
Fielding and Sarah as transcendently life-changing as we must believe it
was. Gordon has no idea how to give their ideological sparring any of the
passion present when two people who love each other begin to realize they
just can't coexist. In fact, Gordon shows almost no understanding for how
to play his most critical emotional moments. When Fielding breaks down and
confesses his delusions to his political inner circle, Gordon cuts away
before there's a chance to see anyone reacting; when Fielding breaks down
in front of his family, Gordon lingers on the tortured monologue so long
there's nothing left to do but marvel at Crudup's inhuman cheekbones.
     Gordon's litany of miscalculations adds up to a film that clearly
wasn't constructed to build characters. Every supporting character is an
afterthought -- wasting Janet McTeer, as Fielding's sister, should warrant
some sort of fine -- but that doesn't explain why even the main characters
are afterthoughts. In an ironic late piece of dialogue, Sarah warns
Fielding to view her as a complete person, "not an image, not an idea." 
Images and ideas are all Gordon and company have in WAKING THE DEAD; 
there's not a complete person to be found in this scattershot narrative. 
There is plenty of atmospheric intensity, though, plenty of bodies wracked
with sobs and plenty of evocative lighting and/or iconography. And there's
a final confrontation that effectively evokes surreality. It's effective
because there's nothing to ground it -- or anything else in WAKING THE
DEAD -- in the reality of human experience. Certainly not the reality of
wandering into a Congressional office. Without any identification. In the
middle of the night.

Title
Review for Ace Ventura: Pet Detective (1994)
Starring:  Jim Carrey, Courteney Cox, Sean Young, Udo Kier, Dan Marino.
Screenplay:  Jack Bernstein, Tom Shadyac & Jim Carrey.
Director:  Tom Shadyac.
     As many individual elements as I might analyze with any given
film, my gut reaction almost always comes down to one crucial issue:
did the film do what it was trying to do?  If it was a thriller, did it
keep me in suspense?  If it was a romance, did I respond emotionally?
And if it was a comedy, did I laugh?  Of all the film types, comedy is
perhaps the most difficult to analyze; either it works, or it doesn't.
Which brings me to this confession: I laughed at ACE VENTURA: PET
DETECTIVE.  God help me, I laughed quite a bit.  Comedian Jim Carrey's
unique persona won me over in spite of a great deal of stupidity and
some sluggish pacing.
     Jim Carrey is Ace Ventura, a private eye who specializes in
finding lost pets.  As the only one there is at what he does, it is Ace
who gets the call for the biggest case of his career:  finding the
Miami Dolphins' kidnapped mascot, Snowflake.  With the help of Dolphins
publicist Melissa Robinson (Courteney Cox), Ace begins investigating
suspects like wealthy marine life collector Ron Camp (Udo Kier),
eventually turning his focus towards someone connected to the Dolphins
organization.  In his way stands the Miami police, headed by combative
Lt. Lois Einhorn (Sean Young), as Ace tries to crack the case before
the Super Bowl.
     Vanity projects are a dime a dozen these days, but they all apply
a very similar logic, namely that if you let the star do what he or
she does best, and if that star's audience is large enough, you'll have
a success.  I'm not sure whether the latter condition is true of
Carrey, but it is true that he's allowed to do what he does best.  It
has been a long time since I've seen a physical comedian who looks as
comfortable on screen as Carrey.  His elastic features recall early
Jerry Lewis, while his spindly frame and geeky self- confidence show
traces of Pee-Wee Herman.  When the comedy is purely physical, the
laughs are really big.  The opening sequence features Ace disguised as
a parcel deliveryman gleefully shattering the contents of his package
to simulate a shipping mishap.  My favorite bit involved Ace sneaking
out of a bathroom window to snoop around Camp's mansion, taking an
elaborate and artificially treacherous route towards a door he could
have walked to in seconds.  ACE VENTURA boasts some of the most amusing
slapstick in recent years this side of the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker
films.
     It's considerably more erratic in its success when it comes to
verbal gags.  No scatological subject goes unexamined in ACE VENTURA;
Carrey even utilizes his own posterior as a ventriloquist's dummy.  In
fact, ACE VENTURA is almost self-congratulatory in its political
incorrectness, using homophobia and sexism as punch lines.  The film
drags between visual set pieces, rescued only by Carrey's goofy
delivery.  Part of the problem is that screenwriters Carrey, Tom
Shadyac and Jack Bernstein frequently seem unclear as to when enough is
enough.  Ace's trademark mocking cackle, borrowed from Carrey's Fire
Marshall Bill character from "In Living Color," is funny once but not
three times.  A more telling example involves the theme song from THE
CRYING GAME, used perfectly once but then used again so that it just
seems derivative.  Finally, one piece of advice for filmmakers:  if you
must use Dan Marino for a cameo, please don't give him too many lines.
An Isotoner glove commercial is about all I can take.
     There would seem to be little point to commenting on the
supporting players in ACE VENTURA, since for all practical purposes
they serve as scenery with SAG cards.  However, I would be remiss in
not mentioning Sean Young, who appears to have resigned herself to
doing parodies of her reputation as a real-life psycho.  She has a fun,
over-the-top part much like her role in FATAL INSTINCT, but wisely she
avoids trying to steal scenes from Carrey.  It just wouldn't work.  In
ACE VENTURA, Jim Carrey establishes himself as a first-rate screen
clown, one I hope to see again.

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT
(Columbia)
Starring:  Ethan Embry, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Seth Green, Lauren Ambrose,
Charlie Korsmo, Peter Facinelli, Jenna Elfman.
Screenplay:  Deborah Kaplan and Harry Elfont.
Producers:  Jenno Topping and Betty Thomas.
Directors:  Deborah Kaplan and Harry Elfont.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  96 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Deborah Kaplan and Harry Elfont have commented that one of the
reasons they made CAN'T HARDLY WAIT was that "nobody was making those good
John Hughes teen comedies any more."  That's probably why CAN'T HARDLY
WAIT feels so much like a Greatest Hits compilation, peppered with
recognizable elements from the entire Hughes oeuvre of the mid-80s and a
dozen other teen comedies of the last 25 years for good measure.  The
events center around a huge party on the last day of high school, where
characters of every social stratum congregate [DAZED AND CONFUSED].
Nondescript nice guy Preston (Ethan Embry) hopes to make a connection at
the party with popular, seemingly unattainable Amanda (Jennifer Love
Hewitt), whom he has long adored from afar [SAY ANYTHING], before he
leaves for college the next day [AMERICAN GRAFFITI].  Preston has a girl
as a best pal, tomboyish and anti-social Denise (Lauren Ambrose) [SOME
KIND OF WONDERFUL].  Meanwhile, geeky William (Charlie Korsmo) and his two
even geekier cohorts [SIXTEEN CANDLES] hope to use their superior minds to
get back at Amanda's jock ex-boyfriend Mike (Peter Facinelli) and his
buddies [REVENGE OF THE NERDS], until geek and jock find a chance to bond
over their shared insecurities [THE BREAKFAST CLUB].
     That's one hefty dose of deja-vu, enough to overwhelm most films this
slight.  Fortunately, Kaplan and Elfont prove as adept at entertaining as
they are at reminiscing.  CAN'T HARDLY WAIT may be familiar and
predictable, but it's never out-and-out dumb, and at times it's
surprisingly funny.  The appealing cast features solid work from Lauren
Ambrose as vulnerable wiseacre Denise and Seth Green as a tries-too-hard
homeboy with whom she ends up locked in a bathroom.  Consistently goofy
scenes spring up out of nowhere, from the karaoke performance of "Paradise
City" which turns a drunken William into a sex symbol, to the arc of a
high school band's career from inception to breakup to reunion without
ever actually playing a song.  Some of the forced whimsy does fall flat
(notably Jenna Elfman's cameo as an "angel" offering advice to the
lovelorn Preston), and Kaplan and Elfont probably toss a few too many pop
culture references on the fire.  For once, however, the problems in a teen
comedy spring from over-writing rather than under-writing.
     If there's one noteworthy hole in CAN'T HARDLY WAIT, it's the central
plot of Preston's pursuit of Amanda.  Ethan Embry is pleasant enough in an
unrequited puppy-dog way, but this is the kind of role John Cusack defined
a decade ago; you root for Preston not because his entire demeanor sells
his longing, but because the machinations of the plot point you in that
direction.  Similarly, Jennifer Love Hewitt provides a merely-adequate
object of desire, her performance doing little to emphasize that Preston
could be more interested in what she has inside than what she has outside.
Of all the plot threads running through CAN'T HARDLY WAIT, theirs is by
far the least interesting, though it's the one inevitably destined to
provide the happy ending.
     Still, it's hard not to find charms in a teen comedy that's lively,
moderately intelligent and effective in its portrayal of high school
social dynamics.  It also features a wonderfully eclectic soundtrack which
runs the gamut from Guns 'N' Roses to Smashmouth, from Third Eye Blind to
Run-DMC, from Parliament to the title tune by the Replacements.  CAN'T
HARDLY WAIT even manages to include a bit of social commentary in its
adolescent craziness, promoting environmental awareness, safe sex and
responsible drinking and driving behavior.  Sure, the latter is emphasized
when party attendees drop their car keys into a bowl, which is yet another
detail swiped from SAY ANYTHING.  CAN'T HARDLY WAIT shows off its
antecedents unabashedly, and still comes up with something satisfying on
its own level.  Looks like John Hughes didn't have to worry about telling
a generation of movie-goers "Don't You Forget About Me."

Title
Review for Reality Bites (1994)
     In print and television interviews, everyone associated with
REALITY BITES has been trying desperately to convince potential viewers
that it's not a "Generation X" movie, but just a simple romantic
comedy.
     REALITY BITES follows SLACKER; SINGLES; and BODIES, REST & MOTION
in the sweepstakes to most accurately capture the 20-something
zeitgeist, but I found it more reminiscent of star Winona Ryder's
breakthrough film HEATHERS.  While REALITY BITES does include some very
funny moments and finely observed insight, it also tends to reduce its
central characters to a collection of kitschy bon mots.
     Ryder stars in REALITY BITES as Lelaina Pierce, a recent college
grad living in Houston.  Lelaina, an aspiring filmmaker, works as an
intern at a local morning talk show while filming a documentary about
herself and her closest friends:  acerbic roommate Vickie (Janeane
Garofolo), a clerk at the Gap; cynical grunge musician Troy (Ethan
Hawke); and in-the-closet gay Sammy (Steve Zahn).  Tensions begin when
Troy loses his job and moves in with Lelaina and Vickie, then heighten
when Lelaina begins dating Michael (Ben Stiller), an executive for
MTV-clone In Your Face TV.  Their relationship forces Troy to deal with
his feelings for Lelaina, and about responsibility in general.
Meanwhile, Vicke faces an HIV test, and Sammy considers coming out to
his parents.
     REALITY BITES is strongest on the level of details and the number
of individual laughs of recognition they provide.  I will admit to
participating in a group sing-along of "Conjunction Junction" like
these characters, and to playing games based on sit-com episodes.
Screenwriter Helen Childress, all of 23 years old, realizes that the
common thread binding her chronological peers is 1970s schlock culture,
and the disillusionment born of watching their parents conspicuously
credit consume them out of a bright future.  Vickie is perhaps the most
recognizable type to me; I know a few people who cover their walls with
old music posters and beg for you to turn up bad power pop songs with
memories of junior high school dances.  More so than SINGLES, REALITY
BITES identifies the sense of ideological drift that characterizes
Americans in their mid-20s, but without the moody self-importance of
BODIES, REST & MOTION.
     This is not to say that Childress doesn't also give in to easy
stereotypes.  Every parent in REALITY BITES is characterized by a
cartoonish materialism, and becomes an easy target for blame.  Lelaina
never develops a distinct personality, instead becoming a
representation of the job traumas of the generation.  The romantic
triangle doesn't have quite the impact it could have had because as
attractive as Ryder is, she doesn't seem nearly as interesting as, say,
Vickie.  Troy is an even more problematic character, a first class
self-absorbed jerk who philosophizes in bastardized advertising
jingles.  The transformation Childress tries to foist off on us is far
too contrived, and she seems too willing to let Troy's attitude stand
as an acceptable response to the world he perceives.  Fortunately, they
are somewhat balanced by two delightful supporting performances.  Comic
Janeane Garofolo (TV's THE LARRY SANDERS SHOW) is hysterical as Vickie,
displaying a natural timing which makes the most mundane lines funny.
Director Ben Stiller is charming as Lelaina's perpetually flustered
suitor, and should be congratulated for risking the hesitating delivery
which makes his character appear very real.
     I have to note that I was extremely disappointed by the ending of
REALITY BITES, but that may say more about me than about the film.
While there are numerous character stumbles, overall I felt the tone
was on target, and I laughed a lot.  REALITY BITES off a bit more than
it can chew, but it all goes down eventually.

Title
Review for Love Jones (1997)
(New Line)
Starring:  Larenz Tate, Nia Long, Isaiah Washington, Bill Bellamy, Khalil
Kain, Bernadette L. Clark, Lisa Nicole Carson.
Screenplay:  Theodore Witcher.
Producers:  Nick Wechsler and Jeremiah Samuels.
Director:  Theodore Witcher.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, brief nudity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
    Theodore Witcher's LOVE JONES won the Audience Award at the 1997
Sundance Film Festival, which lately seems to be more of a general message
on the state of cinema than a comment on a specific film.  Last year's
winner, THE SPITFIRE GRILL, was a maudlin contraption which was laudable
for being a thoroughly decent redemption story.  In the case of LOVE
JONES, the Audience Award may have been sending a similar message about
what they'd like to see more of.  African-Americans in the movies have
been either clowns, criminals or police captains so often in recent years
that LOVE JONES -- a low-key comedy-drama about educated black artists --
was bound to strike a responsive chord.  I can't help but wonder whether
the Sundance audience was rewarding LOVE JONES itself or the idea of a
film _like_ LOVE JONES.  Make no mistake, Witcher's sophisticated romantic
tale is exceptionally well-crafted and includes some appealing moments,
but the script is sometimes lazy and not particularly interesting.  It's a
film with better intentions than
results.
     LOVE JONES is set in Chicago, where aspiring photographer Nina
Mosley (Nia Long) has just broken up with her fiance.  Nina resolves to
avoid falling in love, but she doesn't count on meeting aspiring poet
Darius Lovehall (Larenz Tate) at a jazz-and-poetry club.  Though Nina
initially resists Darius' advances, she eventually agrees to a date...which
doesn't end until the next morning.  Nina and Darius are soon involved in
a sexual relationship which both parties insist is nothing serious, but
all their friends are skeptical.  The skepticism proves warranted when
Nina's ex-fiance Marvin (Khalil Kain) decides he wants her back, and both
Nina and Darius are unsure how to react.  It is only when each suspects
the other of being unfaithful to their non-exclusive relationship that
they confront what their real feelings might be.
     At its core, LOVE JONES is a spin on WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, a slick
romantic comedy about smart people over-thinking their relationships,
turning those relationships over and over with their friends, and trying
to walk the fine line between friend and lover.  It is fairly incidental
to the story that these characters happen to be African-Americans, yet
that doesn't mean that the film is color-blind, or that the characters
talk like they just walked out of Eton.  The scenes between Darius and his
friends -- Savon (Isaiah Washington), Hollywood (Bill Bellamy) and Sheila
(Bernadette L. Clark) -- have a low-key energy, sparked by the wit of
their ritualized insults.  The dialogue feels natural and authentic, and
the performances are characterized by a convincing sense of familiarity
which makes them even stronger collectively than individually.
     If LOVE JONES had been a film about these characters just sitting
around talking, I probably would have enjoyed it much more.  The problem
is that the plot _is_ essentially a re-hash of WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, with
relationships not nearly as compelling or funny.  Darryl Jones contributes
a wonderfully jazzy score, but that score infuses LOVE JONES with a
languid pace, the effect of which is to make you as nonchalant about the
fate of Darius and Nina's romance as they seem to be themselves.  There is
plenty of chemistry between Larenz Tate and Nia Long; there's just not
enough drama.  The entire arc of their relationship is drawn up in
well-worn tropes:  the meeting in a bar, the reluctant coupling, the
jealously and conflict, even a mad rush by one lover to stop the other
from leaving on a train.  Even when Darius finally breaks down and
confesses his love for Nina, there isn't a sense that there was anything
at stake for these two.  Their relationship seems just fine "just kickin'
it."
     That casual quality sometimes seeps into Witcher's plotting.  Threads
of sub-plots drift through LOVE JONES at regular intervals, and Witcher
never seems interested in explaining them in any detail.  Savon
experiences marital difficulties, but we don't know anything about his
wife and even less about their relationship; Nina has a brief fling with
Hollywood, but we don't know why he seems so deliberately antagonistic
towards Darius.  The large supporting cast consists of faces and voices
which don't develop into full-fledged people.  They are more like
background notes in a tone poem.
     LOVE JONES is the kind of film I would like to encourage, but I find
it hard to recommend it enthusiastically.  It's respectable, it's
admirable, it's smooth and smart and professional.  It's just not
particularly enjoyable.  Audiences have been jonesing for characters like
those in LOVE JONES, but they may be able to work up no more than a like
jones for this film.

Title
Review for I'll Do Anything (1994)
Starring:  Nick Nolte, Albert Brooks, Whittni Wright, Joely
Richardson, Julie Kavner, Tracey Ullman.
Screenplay/Director:  James L. Brooks.
     I wish I hadn't known so much about I'LL DO ANYTHING.  I wish I
hadn't known that it was written as a musical, and that the songs had
been edited out after disastrous test screenings.  I wish I hadn't
found myself trying to guess where the songs would have gone, or
wondering what might have been different.  Then maybe, just maybe, I
would have enjoyed it even more than I did.  As aware as I was of its
bumps, I was still mostly delighted by I'LL DO ANYTHING, and the reason
why can be summed up in two words:  Whittni Wright.
     I'LL DO ANYTHING stars Nick Nolte as Matt Hobbs, a talented but
struggling actor who never seems to have the "it" anyone is looking
for.  At a particularly down time in his career, he finds himself with
an added responsibility:  his 6-year-old daughter Jeannie (Whittni
Wright), taken away from his ex-wife (Tracey Ullman) when she is sent
to prison.  Juggling Jeannie and his career becomes even trickier when
he begins working for producer Burke Adler (Albert Brooks), and finds
himself pushed for the lead in a remake of "Mr. Deeds Goes to Town" by
a supportive development executive (Joely Richardson).  Meanwhile,
Jeannie is offered a part on a sit-com, and Adler works on a
relationship with a pathologically honest audience researcher (Julie
Kavner).
     The fact is that I'LL DO ANYTHING shouldn't have worked at all.
It's impossible not to play "Spot the Song Setup" (Nolte's number while
he paces his apartment as Jeannie stays with a babysitter for the first
time?  Kavner's watching Brooks schmooze in a posh restaurant?), or to
notice some particularly choppy editing.  The Hollywood satire element
never really hits stride, because it doesn't hit hard enough and
because THE PLAYER already did it better.  Ullman's character sports an
appalling Georgia accent, and the six year time shifts don't allow for
any rhyme or reason to her eventual, rather tenuous emotional state or
why she spoils Jeannie so terribly.  There are plenty of holes in I'LL
DO ANYTHING, and a few more might have spelled disaster.
     Consequently, I consider it fortunate that I fell in love with
Whittni Wright the moment she appeared on screen.  Wright is a
magnificent Jeannie, reducing Matt to a whimper of "I have absolutely
no idea what to do when she throws a spectacular temper tantrum on a
plane.  Unlike so many young performers, she never struck me as overly
precious or self-aware, just winningly adorable.  Stripped of its angle
as a big industry send-up, I'LL DO ANYTHING becomes a story of people
trying to get their priorities straight in a business where every
instinct tells you to sell out those priorities, and Matt's
relationship with Jeannie becomes the focal point of that struggle.  As
many times as "parent learns responsibility" stories have been done, I
was still completely charmed by this one.  Nolte and Wright are great
together, and I found myself smiling almost every minute they were on
screen together.
     As he has done in his previous films, TERMS OF ENDEARMENT and
BROADCAST NEWS, James L. Brooks fills the screen with quirky characters
and clever dialogue.  Joely Richardson is lovely and appealing as
Cathy, the development exec who wants to take a stand but can't quite
work up the nerve, and she uses her splayed-leg sitting position to
give Cathy an aura of perpetual insecurity.  Albert Brooks is good but
underused as the cocky big-budget producer, and Julie Kavner gets off
some of the best lines as the voice of honesty.  It's too bad the
relationships between those characters are generally so sketchy, gutted
of some of their emotion byt the removal of the production numbers.
Still, the one relationship that really mattered worked so well that I
was tremendously forgiving.  I'LL DO ANYTHING may not be the smoothest
of rides, but Nolte and Wright did such a fine job of winning my heart
that I was more than willing to take that ride with them.

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
Director:  Ron Howard.
Screenplay:  Richard Price and Alexander Ignon.
Director of Photography:  Piotr Sobocinski.
Producers:  Brian Grazer, Scott Rudin, B. Kipling Hagopian.
Starring:  Mel Gibson, Rene Russo, Gary Sinise, Delroy Lindo, Lili Taylor,
Brawley Nolte, Liev Schreiber.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
      I should note before anything else that RANSOM is not a spectacular,
classic piece of film-making, but simply a very well-crafted
action/suspense thriller.  It is only because so many of its genre
contemporaries have been so lackluster that RANSOM begins to look like a
jewel, because RANSOM is a textbook example of the little things which so
many bad to mediocre suspense thrillers could do to become better by
orders of magnitude.  In fact, the conventional wisdom in Hollywood --
borne out by the success of TWISTER, THE ROCK and INDEPENDENCE DAY as
recent examples -- is that suspense is actually counter-productive because
the establishment of suspense takes time, valuable minutes which will not
involve a 10 megaton explosion or a flying computer-generated cow.  RANSOM
is consistently tense because it is patient, patient enough to set up
characters and situations in a way which really pays off.
     Mel Gibson stars as Tom Mullen, a multimillionaire airline magnate
living a charmed life in a New York penthouse with wife Kate (Rene Russo)
and son Sean (Brawley Nolte).  That life is shattered one day when Sean
disappears, abducted by a group of kidnapers who demand $2 million for
his release.  Tom tries to play by the kidnapers' rules, but when the FBI
team headed by Agent Lonnie Hawkins (Delroy Lindo) makes a botched attempt
at a rescue operation, Tom concludes that they have no intention of
letting Sean go alive.  Desperate to even the odds, Tom takes drastic and
risky action to put the kidnapers on the defensive, the result of which
can only be either complete victory or the worst kind of defeat.
     RANSOM begins with the radical premise that its characters actually
matter, and uses that premise to build a story which matters from moment
to moment.  Mullen is far from a shining knight as our protagonist, but
rather a hard-nosed and occasionally unscrupulous businessman whose
rebellious stand against the kidnapers is perhaps as much a result of
guilt as logic.  The kidnapers themselves (Lili Taylor, Liev Schreiber and
Donnie Wahlberg among them) have distinct personalities, and the clashes
between those personalities show the cracks in their united front early
on; Gary Sinise, as Jimmy Shaker, the mastermind of the operation, is so
deeply embittered by his impression that the wealthy get away with murder
that he probably believes his actions are thoroughly justified.  These are
not spectacularly complex characters -- Rene Russo's Kate is actually
something of a disappointment as the wife who does little but sob -- but
they are real people, and they are directed by Ron Howard in scenes which
allow you inside their heads at critical, decisive moments.
     Howard also has the ability to take moments which in other hands
might have been quickly dispatched plot points and make them compelling.
The story would have progressed without the lengthy sequence in which Tom
and Kate realize that Sean is missing, but the tension and mounting dread
in Howard's direction are palpable.  Similarly, we could have gotten from
point A to point B without showing Jimmy's reaction to Tom's gambit, but
the growing realization that his plan is falling apart is spelled out on
his face.  Even minor details like the first notification from the
kidnapers -- a jittery video file sent to the Mullens via email -- is
given a spark which elicits a gasp from the audience.
     RANSOM does have its obligatory moments of action and violence, but
Howard refuses to treat those sequences as the purpose for his movie.
There is a driving tension and a natural rhythm to the structure of RANSOM
which doesn't make it feel like the director and screenwriters are trying
to exhaust you with set pieces.  Although there are flashy moments in
RANSOM, notably a telephone confrontation between Jimmy and Tom which is
edited to whiplash perfection, it is notable in its lack of devotion to
flash; it is that rare action thriller where you anticipate the moment the
characters _start_ talking instead of the moment they _stop_.  Gibson and
Sinise are both in fine form, and their battle of wills moves RANSOM like
a living motor.  RANSOM may cop out on giving us a climax which addresses
the more unsavory aspects of Tom's character, but it deserves recognition
as an example of professionalism in film-making, of what is possible when
someone seems to give a damn.  Too many thrillers swing for the fences
every time up, and end up striking out most of the time.  RANSOM is more
like a fundamentally sound contact hitter, banging out single after single
along with the occasional well-placed extra-base hit.

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
Starring:  John Turturro, Rob Morrow, Ralph Fiennes, David Paymer,
           Paul Scofield, Hank Azaria.
Screenplay:  Paul Attanasio.
Director:  Robert Redford.
     There is a certain irony to the involvement of Robert Redford in
the making of QUIZ SHOW.  Much like QUIZ SHOW's anti-hero Charles Van
Doren, Redford became a star based on nothing so much as his golden boy
good looks and charm.  There is perhaps even more irony in the selling
of QUIZ SHOW as a story about a loss of American innocence, since it
may be the ultimate debunking of the myth of the Eisenhower-era
American dream.  Brilliantly written and directed, it is a tale of how
television sold us what we wanted to believe about our country, and a
frighteningly contemporary examination of the cult of image.
     QUIZ SHOW opens in 1958, when prime time game shows like
"Twenty-One" were ruling the airwaves.  Herbert Stempel (John Turturro)
is the reigning champion, but only because the show is rigged to keep
the winners winning.  When Stempel's ratings wane, producer Dan Enright
(David Paymer) has him take a dive, and brings in Charles Van Doren
(Ralph Fiennes) to replace him.  Van Doren, an attractive upper-class
intellectual, becomes a national sensation; Stempel, meanwhile, becomes
bitter over his ouster from the champion's throne.  When Congressional
investigator Richard Goodwin (Rob Morrow) begins looking into the quiz
shows, Stempel tells all, leading to a series of Congressional
hearings.
     QUIZ SHOW opens with a visually arresting sequence which perfectly
establishes the foundation for Redford and screenwriter Paul
Attanasio.  In a series of dream-like dissolves, Goodwin looks over a
beautiful new Chrysler he knows he can't afford, while the salesman
makes his pitch.  Here he becomes a stand-in for everyone who was duped
by "Twenty-One," wanting too much to believe the fantasy.  As he
conducts his investigation, Goodwin befriends Van Doren, and begins to
travel in Van Doren's privileged world, revelling in his assimilation
until his wife accuses him of being "the Jewish Uncle Tom."  What
Goodwin learns, as the head of "Twenty-One" sponsor Geritol (slyly
portrayed by Martin Scorsese) explains, is that the viewers "watch to
see the money."  It's all about the dream, a dream of equal opportunity
that doesn't exist on the quiz show's carefully controlled,
demographically attractive selection of champions.  Morrow's subtle
performance as Goodwin shows how even a man who was "first in his class
at Harvard" (as he constantly reminds everyone) could be taken in.
     Morrow's is just one of a half-dozen performances in QUIZ SHOW
which will draw Academy Award consideration.  John Turturro turns in a
savage portrayal of Herbie Stempel, a life-long social outcast who sees
his removal from the spotlight as a personal betrayal, yet still finds
himself caught up in Van Doren's fall from grace.  Ralph Fiennes'
enigmatic Van Doren could have been flat and passive, but he becomes a
sheltered and overgrown child in Fiennes' capable hands, desperate for
approval and a fame independent from his literary family.  Veteran
actor Paul Scofield is dynamic as Mark Van Doren, whose mere commanding
presence does as much to explain the younger Van Doren's motivations as
Fiennes' performance; their scenes together are spectacular.  David
Paymer is also noteworthy as the slick and savvy Enright.  Only Hank
Azaria, as Enright's too- dense-for-words assistant, comes off a bit
overplayed.
     For my money, however, the true star of QUIZ SHOW is Paul
Attanasio, whose screenplay is certainly the finest of the year.  Every
characterization is full and rounded; every scene is a perfect
development of theme.  The dialogue is filled with crisp, subtle and
quotable lines.  In one perfect moment, Charles Van Doren's indignant
insistence to Enright that "I am a professor at Columbia," is followed
by a studio gopher who announces, "The professor's needed in makeup."
It's a brilliant encapsulation of how Van Doren had been taken over by
his own image, emphasized later in a masterful scene at his
Congressional testimony.  QUIZ SHOW is yet another example of what is
possible when a script is this good, the direction is perfectly
complementary, and the acting is first-rate.  The film to beat as
1994's best picture has arrived.

Title
Review for Hollow Reed (1996)
     I have come up with a definition -- admittedly arbitrary -- for 
"TV-movie" as it tends to be used in a derogatory fashion.  Melodrama
certainly plays a part in that definition, but it is more symptom than
disease.  The real problem with TV-movies is that they tend to be about
issues, not about people.  Melodrama results from a story about a 
situation; drama results from a story about people responding to a
situation.
     HOLLOW REED has been garnering some comparisons to TV-movies which 
are only half fair.  The story concerns that TV-movie standby the custody
battle, with a few provocative twists.  Young Oliver Wyatt (Sam Bould)
lives with his mother Hannah (Joely Richardson) and Hannah's new boyfriend
Frank (Jason Flemyng); Oliver's father Martyn (Martin Donovan) lives with
his gay lover Tom (Ian Hart).  One day Oliver shows up at Martyn's door
with injuries the boy claims came in a schoolyard fight, and later turns
up with a broken wrist supposedly slammed in a car door.  Martyn begins to
suspect that the cause of the injuries may be Frank, and sues for custody
when Hannah is unresponsive to his concerns.  Thus begins a legal battle
which will expose the biases in the system and force a family to confront
its own biases.
     HOLLOW REED really covers two issues, then:  domestic violence, and
attitudes about homosexuality both institutional and personal.  On the
first front, cries of "TV-movie" amount to utter nonsense.  Director
Angela Pope has crafted a splendid domestic drama which includes many
wrenching scenes of people coping with personal turmoil.  Sam Bould's
performance as Oliver is the centerpiece of that story, a quiet and
reflective piece of work which allows the audience to feel his fear,
confusion and isolation.  Oliver's perspective is everywhere, from furtive
glances through window blinds to the boy's use of a radio-controlled car
fitted with a rear-view mirror to observe things from a distance.  Pope
also includes a marvelous reconciliation scene between Hannah and Frank
which captures a dysfunctional relationship to chilling perfection.  As
long as HOLLOW REED is focused on the dynamics of Hannah, Frank and
Oliver, it is truly exceptional.
     There is, however, another issue with which to grapple, and the
grappling is frequently clumsy.  Martin Donovan, the laconic protagonist
of Hal Hartley's TRUST, SIMPLE MEN and FLIRT, here plays another laconic
protagonist.  In Hartley's films, Donovan's mannered delivery works with
the surreal situations; in HOLLOW REED, Donovan is like a mugging victim
who mutters "Stop, thief."  There is a passion missing from his
interactions with every character in the film which blunts the impact of
his relationship with his son _and_ his relationship with Tom (a more
effective but under-developed Ian Hart).  Pope tries to make up for that
lack of spark by providing a big court-room scene where HOLLOW REED begins
to feel exactly like a TV-movie.  The testimony is treated like a therapy
session where the characters' deep dark feelings are exposed, turning the
climax into a lecture.  Like the least effective TV-movies, HOLLOW REED
starts to feel like it is exists to arouse your indignation rather than to
involve you emotionally.
     If HOLLOW REED is ultimately worthwhile viewing, it is because there
is much more right with the domestic violence story-line than there is
wrong with the gay rights story-line.  Still, the way Pope and writer Paula
Milne approach each issue shows that a timely topic does not a TV-movie
make.  HOLLOW REED is a sensitive study of a particular family responding
in a very personal way to child abuse; it is also a study of Homosexuality
in Society in capital letters.  It's only the latter that you'd probably
see on Fox starring one of the cast members of "Melrose Place."

Title
Review for How Stella Got Her Groove Back (1998)
HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Angela Bassett, Taye Diggs, Whoopi Goldberg, Regina King.
Screenplay:  Terry McMillan and Ron Bass, based on the novel by McMillan.
Producer:  Deborah Schindler.
Director:  Kevin Rodney Sullivan.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, nudity)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A lesson in short-term benefit vs. long-term detriment, courtesy of
screenwriters Ron Bass and Terry McMillan:  in the course of adapting
McMillan's novel HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK, the pair make a decision
which gives the first half a real kick, then kicks the second half into
oblivion.  The heroine of the title is Stella Payne (Angela Bassett), a
40-year-old San Francisco investment banker with a gorgeous house, an
11-year-old son (Michael J. Pagan), an ex-husband and no man in her life.
Itching for a change of pace while her son is visiting his father, Stella
calls up her New York-based best pal Delilah (Whoopi Goldberg) and
suggests a week-long vacation in Jamaica.  Stella expects little more than
an uncomplicated island holiday, but instead finds complications galore
when she falls for 20-year-old Winston Shakespeare (Taye Diggs), and he in
turn falls for her.
     The significant change involves Stella's companion on her Jamaican
adventure.  In McMillan's novel, Delilah does not join Stella on her trip;
in fact, Stella's life-long best friend is nearly two years dead.  Adding
Delilah to the mix certainly adds some spice to the second-chance romance
story line, particularly with Goldberg in the role.  Sure, Goldberg is
doing little more than an extended funky-sassy Miss Thang riff, but she's
always fun to watch, timing her salacious or sarcastic comments
impeccably.  Initially, it looks like a brilliant idea to give the staid
Stella a free-spirited foil.  Instead of the novel's hyper-introspective
first person narrative, STELLA on screen offers a bit more interplay, and
a bit more fun.
     So much for the short-term benefit.  The problem, as it turns out, is
that Delilah is phased out of the story fairly early on, leaving an energy
vacuum for Regina King (as Stella's hopelessly irresponsible sister) to
fill with only moderate success.  We're left with Stella fussing and
fretting over the age difference between her and Winston, and we're left
with a lot more questions regarding why Stella does what she does.
Delilah's absence in the novel becomes part of Stella's loneliness,
helping explain both her initial attraction to anyone who would fill the
void, and her doubts over how serious the relationship could possibly be.
As talented and forceful an actor as Angela Bassett can be, she plays
Stella with too much exuberant confidence.  Delilah's influence is
pervasive as the relationship blossoms; the bump-n-grind Stella we see in
Jamaica appears to have far too much groove still in her to need getting
any of it back.
     The combination of unfocused motivations and little comic relief
proves fatal in the film's final 45 minutes, when it becomes a genuine
butt-numbing ordeal.  The story simply has nowhere left to go but around
in circles:  there's some relationship talk, a bit of romance, tense
moments, and more relationship talk, all of it surrounding a relationship
with not nearly enough chemistry to be involving.  Newcomer Taye Diggs,
doing a barely serviceable Jamaican accent, has all the boyish charm the
role needs with about a tenth of the mature-beyond-his-years wisdom it
requires.  That leaves a whole lot of grating will-they-or-won't-they
vacillation over a pairing that, on screen, doesn't make much sense.  
     Bass and McMillan seemed to realize that the very internalized
nature of HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK required something different to
work as a film.  The big change they made had it heading in the right
direction, but it only emphasized how truly un-cinematic the rest of the
story could be.  Whoopi Goldberg may chew up the lovely island scenery,
but at least she presents something worth holding your attention for an
hour or so.  She also makes the rest of the film look like it's about a
different kind of groove:  the run-out groove.

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
(Columbia)
Starring:  Jennifer Lopez, Ice Cube, Jon Voight, Eric Stoltz, Jonathan
Hyde, Owen Wilson, Kari Wuhrer, Vincent Castellanos.
Screenplay:  Hans Bauer and Jim Cash & Jack Epps Jr.
Producers:  Verna Harrah, Leonard Rabinowitz and Carole Little.
Director:  Luis Llosa.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If you have never had the opportunity to read the press notes for a
Hollywood film, you are missing an art form with more inspired comedy than
most of what they put on the screen.  I'm not saying the humor is
intentional.  Take ANACONDA, for instance, about which co-star Kari Wuhrer
opines in the press notes:  "There is a subtle message in this
film...(about) messing around with what is the most awesome, incredible
power on the planet:  the Amazon Jungle."  You only wish you could see her
try to say that with a straight face, to see what _really_ good acting is.
There are plenty of words one could use to describe ANACONDA, but "subtle"
ain't one of them.  B-movies don't get much B-movie-er than this one,
which doesn't mean it's a bad film.  On its own level -- thanks to some
hilariously ghoulish special effects -- it's actually something of a
guilty pleasure.
     The story begins with a documentary film crew preparing for a trip
down the Amazon River.  Anthropologist Steven Cale (Eric Stoltz) is
searching for a legendary but never-documented native tribe, and brings
along a crew of five people -- director Terri Flores (Jennifer Lopez),
cameraman Danny Rich (Ice Cube), sound engineer Gary Dixon (Owen Wilson),
production manager Denise Kalberg (Kari Wuhrer) and narrator Warren
Westridge (Jonathan Hyde) -- to record that search.  But the journey takes
an unexpected turn when the crew finds a man named Paul Sarone (Jon
Voight) stranded on a grounded boat, and agree to take him along.  What
the crew doesn't know is that Sarone has his own agenda for the trip,
which involves tracking down a legendary 40-foot anaconda with a big
appetite and an even bigger attitude.
     I offer a warning here that some of the following information might
be considered spoilers, assuming you have been hermetically sealed away
from pop culture and have never seen a suspense film.  ANACONDA doesn't
work very hard to buck the conventions of the genre; in fact, it seems to
revel in them.  As one might expect, characters die.  As one might also
expect, they generally die in inverse order of their placement in the
credits.  ANACONDA even steals a page from 1980s slasher films by giving a
monster a taste for those with questionable moral fiber.  Smoke a joint?
Dead.  Have premarital sex (or even _think_ about having it)?  Dead.
Shoot a monkey? Dead.  The script serves up stock characters like the
pompous prima donna Westridge and the villainous poacher Sarone with a
giddy disregard for anything but plot, plot and more plot.
     Not that the plot makes much sense (beginning with why the narrator
is along on the shoot in the first place), or even moves very briskly for
a suspense thriller.  Director Luis Llosa (THE SPECIALIST) often can't
seem to decide whether ANACONDA is about the conflict with the snake or
the conflict with Sarone, and it proves to be a mistake to focus on the
shipboard clashes when it means the characters are going to have to talk
for any length of time.  Owen Wilson (BOTTLE ROCKET), a dead ringer for
Dennis Hopper, creates a sense of APOCALYPSE NOW deja vu when he starts
talking about Sarone like he was Col. Kurtz; vapid Kari Wuhrer pronounces
the word "satiated" like someone reading it off the page for the first
time without knowing what it means.  Voight, whose perpetual sneer and
absurd Paraguayan accent make Pacino's performance in SCARFACE look
positively subdued, goes madly over the top and looks like he's the only
person having any fun.  At least Eric Stoltz had the good sense to grab
his check and spend half the film in a coma.
     So why, then, is ANACONDA more fun than glorified B-movies like
TWISTER or INDEPENDENCE DAY?  Because it never pretends to be anything
more, and because it includes the kind of scenes a good monster movie
needs:  moments which leave you laughing even as you are going "eeewwwww."
Sometimes a film only needs one really memorable scene to leave you
feeling a goofy sense of satisfaction.  ANACONDA boasts at least three,
including a shot from inside the snake's digestive system (the
Ana-colon-cam?) and it doesn't even matter that the computer-generated
snake is nobody's idea of state-of-the-art visual effects work.  A B-movie
shouldn't be out to impress you.  ANACONDA is simplistic, and could have
used more of its monster, but it delivers.  I'll look for my "subtle
messages" in movies that aren't about 40-foot-long killer snakes.

Title
Review for Unhook the Stars (1996)
     It has been too long since we have seen Gena Rowlands on screen, but
it takes only a few minutes of UNHOOK THE STARS to recall how good she can
be.  Rowlands plays Mildred Hawkes, a widow and career housewife whom we
meet delivering newspapers during the extended shot which plays beneath
the opening credits.  The route, we learn, belongs to her sullen and
rebellious daughter Annie (Moira Kelly), and Mildred mutters to herself as
she delivers the papers that this will be the last time she covers for
Annie.  We know instantly, of course, that this isn't true.  Mildred's
life is organized around doing things for others, and even when Annie
moves out of the house in an act of defiance Mildred continues the paper
route because it is something to give structure to her day.  She is a
woman living in an empty nest who almost doesn't know how to be anything
but a wife or a mother.
     Mothers tend to get very shabby treatment in the movies, portrayed as
perpetual nags or otherwise treated as comic relief, but Rowlands'
performance as Mildred is beautifully balanced and convincing.  If UNHOOK
THE STARS had focused entirely on Mildred, it might have been a great
film.  Instead, director and co-writer Nick Cassavetes (Rowlands' son with
the late director John Cassavetes) splits his story between two
characters:  Mildred, and her foul-mouthed, troubled neighbor Monica
Warren (Marisa Tomei).  Early in the film, Monica kicks out her abusive
husband (David Thornton), and asks Mildred -- whom she had never met
before -- to watch her 6-year-old son J. J. (Jake Lloyd) while she works
split shifts as a waitress.  Mildred is only too happy to have another
child to teach, and watching the relationship between the two is an
absolute delight as Mildred dusts off her somewhat old-fashioned parenting
methods and begins to feel useful again.
     Unfortunately, UNHOOK THE STARS gets side-tracked whenever Tomei's
Monica is the center of attention.  In a film which is otherwise low-key
and observant, Tomei starts to crank up the adorable loud-mouth routine to
MY COUSIN VINNY levels.  A scene in which Monica is a guest for
Thanksgiving dinner -- much to the consternation of Mildred's
straight-laced son Ethan (David Sherrill) -- plays like something from a
much broader fish-out-of-water comedy, and drags on for an awfully long
time.  Tomei's performance isn't a bad one; it's just a good one in a
different kind of movie.  Her character exists mostly to provide the
laughs, and whether or not Monica and her estranged husband reconcile is
only interesting because it affects Mildred.  Cassavetes makes the mistake
of treating that issue as one in which we have an equal emotional
investment.
     There is a similar awkwardness to a sub-plot which finds Mildred in a
romantic flirtation with one of Monica's drinking buddies, a
French-Canadian truck driver named Big Tommy (Gerard Depardieu).  Big
Tommy's passes are rather absurd, and not simply because Mildred is a much
older woman.  Those scenes mark the only occasions where Mildred is
treated as slightly pathetic, a lonely old lady getting drunk and finding
the attentions of a younger man equally intoxicating.  That romance
ultimately has little to do with Mildred's development through UNHOOK THE
STARS, but Cassavetes doesn't quite seem to realize what a great character
he has in Mildred, and what a unique arc her story takes without the
distractions of a wacky neighbor or a romantic interest.
     That is more of a testimony to how good UNHOOK THE STARS is when
Rowlands is center stage than it is to a lack of quality the rest of the
time.  The script takes Mildred on a subtle but intriguing side-track when
Ethan and his wife invite her to move with them to San Francisco, an
invitation which Mildred declines.  She believes that her choice is an
example of her willingness at last to let go of her children, but it is
only because she has J. J. to take care of that she feels prepared to do
so.  When that relationship appears to be pulled out from under her as
well, Mildred is forced to acknowledge that she has merely substituted a
new person whose happiness is more important to her than her own.
Rowlands is sensational as she tries to cope with a life strictly for
herself, and UNHOOK THE STARS is a beautiful character study when we are
allowed to watch.  You only wish you could have watched without the
supporting characters jumping up and obscuring your view quite so often.

Title
Review for Outbreak (1995)
Starring:  Dustin Hoffman, Rene Russo, Morgan Freeman, Cuba Gooding Jr.,
           Kevin Spacey, Donald Sutherland.
Screenplay:  Laurence Dworet and Robert Roy Pool.
Director:  Wolfgang Petersen.
     You've got to love it when Hollywood producers find themselves
scrambling to be the first out of the blocks with an idea.  As has
already occurred in recent years with Robin Hood and Wyatt Earp
projects, there was a race last year between two studios to get
killer virus films into production.  A project based on the current
best seller THE HOT ZONE was originally set with Robert Redford
and Jodie Foster starring, but script troubles caused the deal to
fall apart.  That left OUTBREAK alone to cash in on the virus fever
generated by THE HOT ZONE, and it's likely to be a big hit.
Though its conventional action climax doesn't fulfill the promise of
a gripping first hour, it's still a satisfying popcorn thriller.
     Dustin Hoffman stars as Sam Daniels, an Army scientist
specializing in epidemeology.  When he is sent to investigate a
plague in Zaire, he discovers a highly communicable virus with a
100% mortality rate.  His attempts to warn his boss General Billy
Ford (Morgan Freeman) go mostly unheeded, until a monkey carrying
the virus is smuggled out of Africa and finds ints way into a small
Northern California town.  As the disease spreads rapidly through
the population and the town is quarantined, Daniels goes to work
with his team of experts:  ex-wife Robby Keough (Rene Russo);
veteran bug-hunter Casey (Kevin Spacey); and the cocky but untested
Salt (Cuba Gooding Jr.).  Unfortunately, the military has its own
interests to protect, and that means that one way or another, no one
is getting out of town alive.
     The first half of OUTBREAK, which actually deals with the
spread of the disease, is as tense an hour as I have spent at the
movies in a long time.  Director Wolfgang Petersen makes some great
decisions filming scenes like a tour through the Army's medical
facility, which moves ominously from labs studying relatively
benign viruses to those studying the bad boys.  There is also a
wickedly funny moment when an infected man sneezes in a movie
theater, and we watch particles flying through the air into other
people's mouths.  As long as the focus is on the progress of the
epidemic, and on the attempts by Hoffman's team to trace the path of
the infection, OUTBREAK is a taut and often nerve-wracking
experience.
     What eventually becomes clear is that Petersen's direction is
orders of magnitude better than the script from which he is working.
The battle-of-wills, love-hate relationship between Hoffman and
Russo is forced and unnecessary, as well as ripped off from THE
ABYSS.  The attempts at humor are frequently limp, the performances
(except those by Space and Gooding) perfunctory and the characters
of the standard, one-dimensional action film variety.  And those
aren't the only elements that warrant comparison to standard action
films, as the conclusion becomes not a down-to-the-wire hunt for a
cure in the lab, but a down-to-the-wire helicopter chase, or rather
several down-to-the-wire helicopter chases.  The sequences are
exciting and well-filmed, but they don't belong in this movie any
more than a U-boat battle would have belonged in SCHINDLER'S LIST.
     I have a personal beef with OUTBREAK as well, namely that it
relies so much on government conspiracy theories.  The prospect of a
deadly disease wreaking havoc is powerful enough without resorting
to paranoia-mongering, and I have yet to see much evidence that any
really big secret can be kept in the talk show age, let alone for
thirty years as is the case in OUTBREAK.  Frankly, it's sloppy
plotting, and indicative of OUTBREAK's roots as part of a race to be
first rather than best.  For one hour, OUTBREAK keeps the tension
high, but Petersen could have done much more with a script just a
re-write or two more polished.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
MULAN
(Disney)
Voices:  Ming-Na Wen, B. D. Wong, Eddie Murphy, Miguel Ferrer, Soon-Tek
Oh, James Hong, Pat Morita, Harvey Fierstein.
Screenplay:  Rita Hsiao, Christopher Sanders, Philip LaZebnik, Raymond
Singer & Eugenia Bostwick-Singer.
Producer:  Pam Coats.
Directors:  Barry Cook and Tony Bancroft.
MPAA Rating:  G (mild cartoon violence)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Perhaps, for the first time in a decade, the pressure is off.  Ever
since THE LITTLE MERMAID re-vitalized Disney's animation efforts in 1989,
the studio's annual animated feature has been one of the year's most
scrutinized releases.  After steadily increasing grosses from BEAUTY AND
THE BEAST and ALADDIN, the stakes were raised even higher when THE LION
KING became a $300 million blockbuster.  Then came POCAHONTAS, THE 
HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME and HERCULES, which made "only" $350 million
between them, leading wags to wonder whether the Mouse had lost its touch.
They'd gotten too "politically correct," came the analysis, or too dark.
They'd strayed from the successful formulas which had filled the seats
with youngsters and sent tie-in products scurrying off the shelves.
     Now that no one expects $300 million every time out of the gate,
maybe Disney will get the credit it is due for pushing the limits of 
animated film-making.  MULAN defies convention yet again, bypassing the
well-trodden ground of Western literature and mythology to tell a
2,000-year-old tale from Chinese legend.  The title character (Ming-Na
Wen) is a less-than-demure young girl who seems destined for an uncertain
place in Imperial Chinese society when she fails the tests of the local
matchmaker (Miriam Margolyes). Then the empire is threatened by an
invading Hun army led by Shan-Yu (Miguel Ferrer), leading the emperor (Pat
Morita) to call on every family to provide one male for military service.
With her aging, lame father Fa Zhou (Soon-Tek Oh) as the only male family
member, Mulan decides to honor her family in a different way by disguising
herself as a man and joining the army.  Accompanied by a disgraced,
redemption-hungry dragon guardian named Mushu (Eddie Murphy), Mulan sets
out to find her destiny in battle, and perhaps fall for her commanding
officer Li Shang (B. D. Wong) along the way.
     The "YENTL goes to China" plot line is basic Disney stuff on a 
certain level -- yearning young protagonist, societal restrictions,
complicated romance, lessons in personal growth and tolerance of
individuality all around.  It's a bit surprising then to find the set-up
as drawn-out as it is in MULAN.  Though there's a bit of comic relief in
the bumbling encounter with the matchmaker, the first half hour is largely
devoted to character development and motivation -- good things on general
principle, of course, but over-indulged here to contribute to an extremely
slow start.  It doesn't help that the early songs by David Zippel and
Matthew Wilder -- yes, the same Matthew Wilder of "Break My Stride" fame
-- are the kind of uninspired post-Howard Ashman ditties which make you
wish someone could get over the Broadway musical paradigm for animated
features.  That opening 25-minute stretch is plenty earnest, but it's
hardly confidence-inspiring.
     When MULAN finally does hit its own stride, beginning with the
visually striking sequence in which Mulan leaves home, it's a solid and
energetic piece of work.  The script incorporates comic relief into its
redemption story much better than POCAHONTAS or HUNCHBACK wedged in its
token gags, providing a fine showcase for Eddie Murphy's fast-talking
dragon and Harvey Fierstein's entertainingly incongruous voicing of a
he-man soldier.  The musical numbers also pick up steam in the second half
of the film, perhaps not providing break-out hummable hits but at least
setting a firm musical tone.  Mostly, however, the film becomes a dazzling
adventure, highlighted by a spectacular battle sequence between Huns and
Chinese soldiers in a snowy mountain pass.  By the time the sharply-paced
climactic confrontation rolls around, with its balanced doses of humor and
suspense, you may have forgotten MULAN's less-than-stellar start.
    I suppose what gives MULAN an added kick are the touches which stray
from familiar Disney patterns.  Notably, the villainous Shan-Yu remains in
the background for most of the film as a mysterious genuine threat -- no
comic sidekicks, no songs, no glib one-liners.  That leaves more time to
develop Mulan's resourcefulness, creating a smart and savvy heroine who
happens to be an Asian woman, a rarity not just in animated films but in
films of any kind.  This may not be the kind of cuddly, inviting film of
which stuffed animal sales and video buying binges are made; indeed, it
may be over the head of kids much younger than 7 or 8.  Fact is, it
doesn't exactly warrant that ubiquitous Disney label of "masterpiece."
Sometimes you're going to take a few false steps when you make a choice
not merely to follow the old steps.

Title
Review for Mr. Wonderful (1993)
Starring:  Matt Dillon, Annabella Sciorra, Mary-Louise Parker,
           William Hurt.
Screenplay:  Amy Schor & Vicki Polon.
Director:  Anthony Minghella.
     Sometimes, it's all about state of mind.  Either you're ready to
enjoy a certain kind of movie, or you're not.  I can envision a
different set of circumstances under which I might have walked away
from MR. WONDERFUL with eyes rolling and a groan of "Puh-leez."  But I
didn't.  Instead, I found it to be a warm and charming lightweight
romance, full of appealing performances and well-directed moments of
tiny heartbreak.
     MR. WONDERFUL is the story of divorced couple New York couple Gus
and Lee DiMarco.  Gus (Matt Dillon) is a nice-but-simple Con Edison
worker; Lee (Annabella Sciorra) has left him in an attempt to break
free of "the neighborhood" and get a college education.  Gus has since
hooked up with Rita (Mary-Louise Parker), a nurse who wants to move in
with Gus, while Lee is seeing Tom (William Hurt), her married English
professor.  Gus wants to go in with his buddies on reopening a local
bowling alley, but can't afford it thanks to the cost of his alimony
payments.  The buddies suggest that Gus try to find Lee a husband so
that he can be freed of his financial obligations.  A reluctant Gus
than sets Lee up with a series of acquaintances, all the while
wondering whether or not he might really be her Mr. Wonderful.
     Nothing about that premise screams originality.  Feuding exes who
still carry a torch have been fodder for most daytime and nighttime
soaps for ever.  The relative success of MR. WONDERFUL is attributable
almost entirely to the cast.  Dillon is an extremely likable lug;
Sciorra has the tense charm of a woman just discovering herself.  Their
scenes together work to perfection because they manage to be thoroughly
convincing as two people who have know each other, as Lee notes,
"practically since I was born."  They shift naturally between civil
conversation and petty bickering, creating a genuine sense of history
between them, and it's extremely entertaining to watch.  Particularly
affecting is a scene where Gus and Lee prepare to go out to dinner by
lowering the roof on Gus's convertible, performing a multi-step ritual
without thinking until Lee bigins to cry with the memory of better
times.  It was the frequency of moments like that one which ultimately
won me over to caring about these characters.  Equally delightful is
Mary-Louise Parker, who gives her underdeveloped role as Gus's nervous
girlfriend a beautiful soul.  Parker has one of the most expressive
mouths in films, and she uses it to show more different shades of
emotion than she has lines.  I also enjoyed David Barry Gray, who has
an endearing puppy-dog energy about him as Gus's best friend Pope.
     This is not to say that all of the characters worked all the
time.  I was quickly distracted by William Hurt's twitchy professor,
who doesn't seem to have an identifiable personality.  Vincent
D'Onofrio only gets three scenes to develop what ends up being a rather
important character, and consequently seems to try a bit too hard to
make Dominic angelic.  And yes, Dillon does have some overplayed
moments, making Gus's "hidden emotions" far too obvious for anyone with
half a brain, or even a notochord.  Compare his reactions to Parker's
at a hospital fundraiser where Lee appears with another man, just as an
example of what not to do.
     Director Anthony Minghella, who gave us the low-key supernatural
romance TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY, seems to have a knack for finding slices
of real emotion without resorting to schmaltz.  I was genuinely touched
by a small moment involving a woman waiting for a blind date from a
personals ad, as well as a brief conversation between Rita and Lee.
However, these same moments also made me wonder whether MR. WONDERFUL
had missed an opportunity to be a more wide-ranging examination of
everyone's search for a Mr. or Mr.  Wonderful, and what people are
willing to do or give up for that chance.  As it stands, the focus on
the specific still held my attention.  MR. WONDERFUL is no work of art,
but it's gentle and affirming and it caught me on a good day.  Kindly
check in your cynicism at the door.

Title
Review for Mother's Boys (1993)
Starring:  Jamie Lee Curtis, Peter Gallagher, Joanne Whalley-Kilmer,
           Luke Edwards, Vanessa Redgrave.
Screenplay:  Barry Schneider & Richard Hawley.
Director:  Yves Simoneau.
     Hey, Mr. Development Executive, have I got a pitch for you.  Think
THE GOOD SON meets FATAL ATTRACTION, with an Oedipus complex.  Now
here's the casting twist:  Jamie Lee Curtis, scream queen ingenue of
late 70s/early 80s horror films as the *villain*.  Give it a French
director and some moody photography to make it look more respectable,
and voila!  You've got a bona fide hit on your hands, right?
     Well, probably not.  MOTHER'S BOYS occupies that unfortunate
middle ground between teen scarefest and pop phenom psychothriller,
inevitably limiting its audience.  It also swings wildly from the
subtly creepy to the just-plain-dumb.
     Kes Madigan (Luke Edwards) is a boy with problems.  Never quite
recovered from the sudden abandonment of his mother three years before,
Kes struggles with his feelings about her and about the new
relationship between his father Robert (Peter Gallagher) and girlfriend
Callie (Joanne Whalley-Kilmer).  Then, just as suddenly as she left Kes
and his two brothers, Jude Madigan (Curtis) returns, and she wants her
family back.  Robert will have none of it, but Jude is more than
determined--she's sociopathic.  As she plays on Kes' emotions, she
slowly turns him to her side, and to a plot to eliminate Jude's
competition by any means necessary.
     MOTHER'S BOYS is one of those movies where it's easy to spend a
lot of time picking apart flaws in logic, if logic is something you
expect from your thrillers.  For instance, it is exceedingly difficult
to figure out how Callie, who says that she is 28 years old, has
managed to become an assistant principal at an elite private school at
27; you figure she'd need at least one advanced degree and, oh, maybe a
few years teaching first.  I suppose it would have been too
stereotypical for Callie to be *just* a teacher.  There is a greater
stretch in credibility when Robert allows Kes to spend a weekend with
Jude after Jude cuts herself with broken glass and accuses Callie.
We're supposed to buy that Robert is concerned about the upcoming
custody battle, but at that moment any father would be more concerned
about leaving his son with a lunatic.  Then there are silly details
like the Band-Aid which is supposed to cover the cut on Jude's
forehead, and "cliche alert" problems like the use of not one, not two,
but *three* nightmare sequences.  The script is sloppy in its attempt
to explain Jude's pathology, and the character development is virtually
non-existent.
     Yet for all that, MOTHER'S BOYS still almost won me over on style
points alone.  From the eye-catching opening credits to the climax,
director Yves Simoneau gives the production a smoky, dreamlike
atmosphere which maintains tension throughout.  The story is thankfully
short on gothic excess, and I was pleasantly surprised by the twist to
Jude's plan.  Jamie Lee Curtis is generally well- directed, veering
into the overblown only rarely.  She plays a particularly tricky scene,
where Jude and Kes share a moment in the bathroom, right at the edge of
comfort, where it belongs.  Finally, it leaves Kes at a point of
uncertainty, a rarity in films of any kind.  While it may not have done
much for my brain, MOTHER'S BOYS did get my skin crawling.
     What disappointed me about MOTHER'S BOYS was that I thought it
made the wrong choices about Jude.  As I see it there were two
options:  to have Jude ingratiate herself back into the family
psychologically, or to push her way in by force.  Once the choice was
made to go in the latter direction, MOTHER'S BOYS committed itself to
being a thriller, and ultimately it's not that scary.  How much more
interesting it would have been to watch Jude turn all three boys
against Callie, be more subtle in her seduction of Robert, or make
Callie want to leave.  By skimping on the psychology, the makers of
MOTHER'S BOYS turned out a mediocre thriller in a very handsome
package.

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
(Orion)
Starring:  Peter Fonda, Patricia Richardson, Christine Dunford, Jessica
Biel, Vanessa Zima, Steven Flynn, Dewey Weber, Tom Wood.
Screenplay:  Victor Nunez.
Producers:  Sam Gowan, Peter Saraf.
Director:  Victor Nunez.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Twenty-eight years ago, Peter Fonda became a counter-culture icon in
EASY RIDER.  If you can name two other Peter Fonda films since then, you
have my deepest sympathies; it probably means you sat through delights
like WANDA NEVADA.  Anyone who remembers Peter Fonda on film probably
remembers him as Captain America, which is why it's so startling to see
him in ULEE'S GOLD.  The broad forehead, the determined chin and the stoic
demeanor are all eerily reminiscent of another film Fonda.  At some point
during the past three decades, Captain America turned into Tom Joad.
     It's not just in his physical appearance that Peter resembles Papa
Henry.  In ULEE'S GOLD, Peter Fonda gives the kind of intense and
introspective performance which characterized his father's best work.  He
plays Ulysses "Ulee" Jackson, a Florida beekeeper trying to hold together
the tattered remnants of his family.  With his son Jimmy (Tom Wood) in
prison and Jimmy's wife Helen (Christine Dunford) run off to parts
unknown, Ulee cares for his two granddaughters (Jessica Biel and Vanessa
Zima) and keeps to himself.  That is before a call from Jimmy informs Ulee
that Helen is in the company of Jimmy's old running buddies Eddie (Steven
Flynn) and Ferris (Dewey Weber), and possibly in trouble.
     At first, Helen's predicament does not move Ulee in the least.  One
of the riskier steps writer/director Victor Nunez takes is making Ulee
fairly unlikeable at the outset, and not unlikeable in that fussy,
irrascible but ultimately good-hearted Hollywood way.  Wartime experiences
in Vietnam, the death of his wife and the problems of Jimmy and Helen have
left Ulee scarred and emotionally repressed; even worse, they have left
him bitter and judgmental towards those he considers responsible for their
own tragedies, like Jimmy and Helen.  He no longer knows how to reach out
to help others, or how to accept help when someone like his kindly 
neighbor Connie ("Home Improvement's" Patricia Richardson) reaches out to
him.
     Like Nunez's 1993 gem RUBY IN PARADISE, ULEE'S GOLD is about a
journey of self-discovery, not exactly a high-concept premise.  Nunez's
particular gift as both a writer and a director is the ability to convey
the struggles of troubled souls without resorting to melodramatic
situations or hyperbolic speeches.  The most spectacular thing about Peter
Fonda's performance is exactly that it is so unspectacular, a textbook
study of dramatic economy.  We understand his survivor guilt in one weary
line to his granddaughter about how he made it out of Vietnam ("Your
grandpa was tricky"); we see the comfort he takes in his solitary labor as
extended sequences follow him through the harvesting of the tupelo honey.
This stubborn, driven, hard-working man is not entirely pleasant to be
around, but he's fascinating and thoroughly human.  Even when the plot
takes a turn into crime drama with the search for money from a long-ago
holdup, Nunez and Fonda don't take the plot or the character into
steely-eyed reluctant heroism.  The action in Fonda's lined face is more
compelling than a shootout in the swamps.
     ULEE'S GOLD is exactly the kind of film some people get suspicious
about when the critics go ga-ga, primarily because it is the kind of film
critics are _expected_ to go ga-ga over.  As a casually-paced,
character-driven drama in the middle of summer, it certainly stands out in
a crowd, but it is not a flawless masterpiece.  Nunez has a tendency to
devote almost all his creative energy to his main character, leaving his
supporting players far less to work with.  There are moments when ULEE'S
GOLD starts to wander, when the languid character interactions are merely
slow instead of meaningful.  Still, one fascinating, carefully-constructed
character is one more than almost any other film of the last few months
has taken the time to give us.  In a way, that makes ULEE'S GOLD just as
rebellious a film as EASY RIDER was in its time.  Maybe there's still a
streak of Captain America in Peter Fonda after all.

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
SUMMER OF SAM
(Touchstone)
Starring:  John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Michael Badalucco.
Screenplay:  Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli and Spike Lee.
Producers:  Jon Kilik and Spike Lee.
Director:  Spike Lee.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, drug use,
violence)
Running Time:  136 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I see Spike Lee working.  I have a pretty good idea what he was up to
with SUMMER OF SAM.  This would his a saga of a more dangerous New York
circa 1977, when the Big Apple was more famous for muggings than for
musicals.  It would be a tale of how paranoia can amplify the xenophobia
that already exists in so many people.  It would be a story of one very
specific demon -- "Son of Sam" serial killer David Berkowitz (Michael
Badalucco) -- which also explored the demons many of us keep hidden just
beneath the surface.  It would be an examination of the uncomfortable link
between the criminal and the tabloid media that exploited him.  It would
be both ambitious and intimate, both a period piece and a piece of who we
still are.  It would be an Important Film.
     I see Spike Lee working, and I saw SUMMER OF SAM working...up to a
point.  His account (co-written with Victor Colicchio and Micheal
Imperioli) of New York's hot, hellish summer of '77 focuses on two Bronx
neighborhood buddies and their relationships.  Vinny (John Leguizamo) is a
hairdresser with trouble remaining faithful in his marriage to Dionna
(Mira Sorvino); Ritchie (Adrien Brody) is a would-be punk rocker who has
moved to the Village and taken up with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), a
neighborhood girl with a "reputation."  Though they now live in different
worlds -- Vinny's a little bit Studio 54, Ritchie's a little bit CBGB's --
they remain friends.  That friendship becomes dangerous as the summer
heats up, fear of the .44-caliber killer intensifies, and the guys in the
neighborhood begin making their own personal lists of suspects, including
Ritchie.
     For a while, the stories of Lee's two main characters are promising
enough that SUMMER OF SAM keeps you watching.  Vinny begins to
disintegrate after a close encounter with the killer leaves him torn
between a desire to reform and his inability to control his libido.
Ritchie, meanwhile, uses dancing and turning tricks at a gay club to
support his drug habit and budding career, his external outsider image
hiding an even more outsider lifestyle.  Leguizamo is particularly strong
in his role (will someone _please_ put this guy's talent to good use?),
but both characters work in juxtaposition to the Son of Sam -- they're
anti-social people who happen to functionally anti-socials.  Though the
period production design comes and goes, there's still a strong sense of
this particular time and place in New York.  We see 1977 as a more intense
period in the life of the city, when the thin connecting thread of rooting
for the Yankees was always ready to snap into violence.
     There are lots of big issues moving through SUMMER OF SAM, and Lee is
ready to make sure we always know it.  As talented a visual stylist as he
can be, Spike Lee is also a film-maker who often doesn't know when to stop
himself.  He gets infatuated with distorted perspectives, or finds some
way to cram in his favored "character moving on the camera track" shot, or
edits not one but two montages to the accompaniment of songs by The Who.
Lee even opens with an extended crane shot that serves as a big flashing
red light that the director wants TOUCH OF EVIL/BOOGIE NIGHTS respect for
his project.  It's often invigorating, but it's also an attempt to cover
for a story that lets some sub-plots drag on forever (Vinny and Dionna's
ho-hum marital woes) while letting others disappear just when they seem
interesting (Anthony LaPaglia as a detective with mob ties in his
background).  Lee may be talented, but his pure id approach to directing
leads to some baffling decisions.
     No decision in SUMMER OF SAM is more baffling -- or more harmful to
the film -- than Lee's portrayal of Berkowitz himself.  It was a risky
enough maneuver introducing Berkowitz as a character at all rather than
leaving him as a bogeyman haunting the periphery of the film; it was even
riskier to show him freaking out in his apartment.  But Lee goes past the
point of no return when he actually shows a big black dog telling
Berkowitz to kill in John Turturro's voice, lips moving like he was a
refugee from BABE.  That scene turns a killer's demented rampage into
absurdist comedy, making you wonder what the hell Lee was thinking.
Clearly he had ideas spilling out of himself as he prepared for SUMMER OF
SAM, a million different stories he wanted to tell in this one story about
the naked city.  At times it gels into a gripping film.  At other times,
you can see Lee working...and you can see him working far too hard.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
PLEASANTVILLE
(New Line)
Starring:  Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, William H. Macy,
Jeff Daniels, J. T. Walsh, Don Knotts.
Screenplay:  Gary Ross.
Producers:  Gary Ross, Jon Kilik, Robert J. Degus and Steven Soderbergh.
Director:  Gary Ross.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In PLEASANTVILLE U.S.A., it's always 72 degrees and sunny.  Every
house has a white picket fence, and a mom at home who has dinner on the
table at 6:00 sharp.  The hometown high school basketball team has never
lost a game -- in fact, it has never missed a basket.  Teenage lovebirds
never go any farther than holding hands, and only then after they've been
"pinned."  The world and its values are completely black-and-white --
particularly white in the case of the population demographics.  In
PLEASANTVILLE everything is always perfect, it's always 1958, and nothing
ever changes.
     The one minor problem with Pleasantville is that it doesn't exist,
nor has it ever existed.  It's the world of an innocuous 1950s family
sit-com, played in perpetual reruns on a cable nostalgia network.  That
doesn't prevent it from being extremely attractive to David (Tobey
Maguire), a high school senior living in a single-parent home and a 1990s
world of AIDS, economic uncertainty and warnings of impending
environmental collapse.  For David, Pleasantville is an escape, but he
never expects to be physically transported, along with his wild-child twin
sister Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), into the world of the sit-com itself.
There they take on the roles of Bud and Mary Sue, the wholesome offspring
of wholesome parents George (William H. Macy) and Betty (Joan Allen) in a
wholesome town where the road comes right back to where you started.
     It's a great high-concept premise which could have worked strictly as
a fish-out-of-water comedy.  Jennifer is overwhelmed by the massive
breakfast prepared by Betty, complete with ham steak and drenched in
syrup; the basketball team captain responds with blank stares to
Jennifer's sexual advances; the local fire department exists solely to
rescue cats from trees.  While Jennifer does her best to turn
Pleasantville upside-down with her contemporary ways, David does his best
to minimize the damage and preserve the simple world he has come to love.
Screenwriter Gary Ross (BIG, DAVE) continues to show a flair for high
concepts with a human touch in his directorial debut, generating laughs
from the clash of Eisenhower-era and Clinton-era mores, as well as from
characters awakening to the fact that seeking fulfillment may mean an end
to their static bliss.
     But PLEASANTVILLE isn't merely a whimsical lark.  As he exposes his
characters to experiences they'd never even considered, Ross turns the
film into a pointed examination of what we really mean when we talk about
"traditional family values."  The sudden emergence of teenage rebellion
and nascent feminism send townspeople into a panicked search for any way
to ensure stability, driven by Pleasantville mayor Big Bob (the late J. T.
Walsh, playing a marvelous amalgam of conservative platitude-spitters).
PLEASANTVILLE digs into the barely-concealed anxiety and xenophobia at the
heart of so much political retro-think, yet that's not even the film's
most daring idea.  Ross has the guts to take on the notion of original sin
itself, suggesting that the very passion and curiosity which lead to
upheaval in paradise are also what make us most alive and most human,
giving color to an otherwise monochromatic existence.
     It's unfortunate that Ross gets a bit too self-congratulatory about
his social satire, particularly in the final half-hour.  As tensions build
in Pleasantville, the battle becomes a clash between those characters
still in black-and-white and those whose new, life-changing experiences
have left them "colored" -- and that may be the _least_ consistently
underlined point.  Ross starts repeating himself, weighing down the
previously light tone and drifting away from solid dramatic anchors like
Joan Allen's housewife on a journey of self-discovery.  PLEASANTVILLE is a
funny and thoughtful film, the kind that works best before it starts
tattooing The Moral of the Story across your backbrain.  It's plenty
entertaining just watching the mythology of the "good old days" laid bare,
exposed as a comforting fiction far removed from a world where coping with
change is more productive than demonizing it.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
MEET JOE BLACK
(Universal)
Starring:  Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Claire Forlani, Marcia Gay Harden,
Jake Weber, Jeffrey Tambor.
Screenplay:  Ron Osborn & Jeff Reno and Kevin Wade and Bo Goldman.
Producer:  Martin Brest.
Director:  Martin Brest.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  179 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Death (Brad Pitt), in the nattily-attired, bleach-blond human form of 
Joe Black, is ready for a holiday.  Having spent eternity in the isolation
of his never-ending task, the Reaper has decided he wants to sample mortal
pleasures, with aging communications tycoon Bill Parrish (Anthony Hopkins)
as his somewhat reluctant guide.  You may feel that Death has made up for
plenty of lost time by the time MEET JOE BLACK finally winds its way to a
conclusion -- not because his love of Parrish's daughter Susan (Claire
Forlani) is so transforming, but because the three hours of the film begin
to feel something like eternity.  In his attempt to make an epic of the
human experience, director Martin Brest has overburdened a simple story
with an entire film's worth of pregnant pauses, portentous glances and
flabby plotting.
     The real shame is that there's two hours of solid material trying to
escape from this lengthy remake of DEATH TAKES A HOLIDAY.  The
relationship between Susan and Joe is given a neat twist at the start as
the emotionally confused Susan meets and falls for the guy whose body
Death takes (in one of the most startling screen deaths you'll see).
Hopkins, meanwhile, does nice work as the businessman taking stock of his
legacy, drawing on the understated physical acting which has always marked
his best performances.  Brest finds both comedy and creepiness in the
early stages of Joe and Parrish's interaction, with the mogul's mysterious
new confidante inspiring curiosity among his family and business
associates, as well as confusion over the gentleman's unusual affinity for
peanut butter.
     Between every shred of interesting material, however, there are
several patience-threatening minutes.  It's astonishing to note that two
editors are credited on MEET JOE BLACK, since virtually nothing seems to
have been left on the cutting room floor.  The scene in which Forlani and
Pitt make their lingering departure from one another at the coffee shop
could qualify as a short subject; it takes so long for them to undress one
another when they finally make love you suspect they're sizing each other
for wardrobe.  Superfluous sub-plots drag the film down, including one
which requires Pitt to adopt an embarrassing West Indian accent.  Even the
entire storyline involving an attempted coup by Parrish's top lieutenant
(Jake Weber, oozing yuppie sleaze) seems to exist for the sole purpose of
one big punch line at the 160 minute mark.
     That consistent lack of narrative economy ultimately dooms MEET JOE
BLACK in spite of its strengths.  Pitt brings a surprising undercurrent of
menace to the role of Joe Black, while still finding the humanity Death
discovers.  There are also some supporting moments which do work quite
well, including Marcia Gay Harden as Parrish's oldest daughter making a
heartbreaking admission of love for her father.  MEET JOE BLACK is a truly
gorgeous film, with Emmanuel Lubezki providing luminous photography of
Dante Ferretti's production design.  It's also a case of ever-diminishing
returns, with so many emotional confrontations and false endings you may
forget whom you were supposed to care about.
     1998 has already seen one film about an immortal who risks life on
earth for love, the Nicolas Cage/Meg Ryan vehicle CITY OF ANGELS.  That
film was smart enough to treat the story as grand melodrama -- a weepy
transcendental tragedy rather than an Oscar-season Message Movie.  MEET
JOE BLACK sprinkles its moments of insight so intermittently throughout
its three hours that they start to get lost.  Life on earth certainly
could have seemed more vibrant, and less like an endurance test.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
THE MOD SQUAD
(MGM)
Starring:  Claire Danes, Giovanni Ribisi, Omar Epps, Dennis Farina, Josh
Brolin, Richard Jenkins, Michael Lerner.
Screenplay:  Buddy Ruskin, Stephen Kay, Kate Lanier and Scott Silver.
Producers:  Ben Myron, Alan Riche and Tony Ludwig.
Director:  Scott Silver.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, nudity, sexual situations, drug use)
Running Time:  94 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     An opening title in THE MOD SQUAD conscientiously defines "mod" for
the viewing audience, then goes the extra mile of defining "squad" as
well.  It's your first clue that the target audience is that
ultra-desirable -- and, apparently, lexically-challenged -- youth
demographic, rather than primarily baby boomers familiar with the
1968-1972 television series.  Not surprisingly, THE MOD SQUAD is a loud
and generally stupid action film with a dose of teen-angst melodrama.
Impressively, it even compounds the misery with a ridiculously convoluted
plot.
     The basic set-up, like that of the series, involves three troubled
young people (back in the day, they'd be called "juvenile delinquents")
recruited by L.A.P.D. Capt. Adam Greer (Dennis Farina) to be a unique
undercover trio.  Faced with the alternatives of prison or police work,
Julie Barnes (Claire Danes), Pete Cochran (Giovanni Ribisi) and Linc Hayes
(Omar Epps) are assigned to "get into places nobody else can."  One of the
places they still seem adapt at getting into is trouble, trouble which
gets particularly nasty when Greer turns up dead and implicated in drug
trafficking.  For no really good reason other than a continuation of the
film, the "Mod Squad" begins its own investigation, uncovering a
conspiracy which would baffle "X-Files" creator Chris Carter.
     You might think that a dense, multi-layered plot would indicate faith
in audience intelligence, but you'd be very mistaken indeed.  THE MOD
SQUAD uses its innumerable narrative threads like shiny objects to
distract an infant, never really caring whether they make for a more
interesting or engaging story.  Julie spends most of the film getting
re-involved with an old flame (Josh Brolin), while Pete and Linc track
down leads in a plot line that runs mostly parallel.  Meanwhile, Pete has
a sensitive moment with his estranged parents, a goofy drug dealer
(Michael Lerner) dances with Linc to "My Favorite Things," Pete and Julie
almost kinda sorta get together, and Linc's car is the object of
ever-wackier damage at Pete's hand.  It doesn't even matter that many of
the sub-plots drift together by the film's conclusion; its Short Attention
Span Theater mentality makes it not at all worth the effort to keep up.
     It's also a dim-witted and trite action film that has the nerve to
wink ironically at its place in the pantheon of dim-witted and trite
action films.  Pete (given an off-kilter sensibility by Ribisi, one of the
few reasons to keep watching) comments incredulously late in the film
about "dirty cops, drug deals...I can't believe this actually happens.  I
feel like I should be saying 'I'm getting too old for this sh*t.'"  Cute
gag, only THE MOD SQUAD hasn't earned that level of self-deprecation.
It's the kind of film where a guy spills his guts to someone who has
chased him down yelling "I'm a cop!" despite the absence of any badge or
weapon.  It's the kind of film where the villains spell out their plans in
more detail than James Bond baddies.  And it's the kind of film that truly
defines gratuitious sex, violence and profanity.  A bad movie can't be a
commentary on the state of bad movie-making.
     The strange thing is that much of that formulaic foolishness could
have worked if THE MOD SQUAD had been played straighter as an homage to
formulaic early-70s cop dramas.  The only time the film is at all
diverting is when B. C. Smith's funky retro-score plays under a dimly lit
chase scene, giving it that faux-gritty vibe.  Director Scott Silver
simply can't maintain that energy, not when he's wasting time on choppy
music video editing of his characters' tender personal moments.  THE MOD
SQUAD is busy and headache-inducing, and rarely even manages to channel
that into viscerally effective action.  It's just another lousy piece of
brand name recycling, so clearly pitched at a dumbed-down audience it's
surprising that, when taking the time to define the film's title, they
risked spotting us the "the."

Title
Review for Shadow, The (1994)
Starring:  Alec Baldwin, John Lone, Penelope Ann Miller.
Screenplay:  David Koepp.
Director:  Russell Mulcahy.
     When it comes to action hero chic in the 90's, bleak is
beautiful.  BATMAN, of course, set the course with its Gothic Gotham
and tortured Dark Knight, and later films such as THE CROW have
attempted to capture the same moody atmosphere.  The latest challenger
for that murky throne is THE SHADOW, based on the radio character of
the 1930's and 1940's ... well, not much of a challenger, actually.
THE SHADOW is the kind of film that makes others in the genre look
better by comparison.  Warts and all, BATMAN and THE CROW were at least
consistent in their tone; THE SHADOW is messy, convoluted and plodding,
the work of a director without an ounce of vision.
     Alec Baldwin stars as Lamont Cranston, who as the film opens is a
brutal warlord in China.  After an encounter with a mysterious holy
man, Cranston renounces his evil ways, returning to New York with the
power to cloud men's minds and a new alter-ego--The Shadow.  While he
is successful dealing with petty hoods, Cranston discovers a bigger
threat on the horizon.  That threat is Shiwan Khan (John Lone), only
living descendent of Genghis Khan and a man with powers similar to The
Shadow's.  When Khan manipulates a government scientist (Ian McKellen)
to achieve his aims, the scientist's daughter Margo (Penelope Ann
Miller) joins The Shadow's team of operatives in an attempt to save New
York from the world's first atomic bomb.
     Director Russell Mulcahy's last film was the execrable Kim
Basinger exercise THE REAL McCOY, and if THE SHADOW proves anything it
is that Mulcahy hasn't learned much about pacing since then.  For an
adventure film, THE SHADOW moves like a truck through mud.  There is
promise through the film's opening fifteen minutes, as Mulcahy takes
advantage of some nifty special effects to make The Shadow's first
showdown with bad guys brisk and effective.  Then, just as quickly, THE
SHADOW slams into a wall (or maybe one of the many laughably bad matte
paintings which fill the film).  There is no tension or excitement to
any of The Shadow's confrontations with Shiwan Khan or his henchmen,
and the dialogue is lacking in any real wit.  When we see that
screenwriter David Koepp (JURASSIC PARK) has set the climactic scene
between The Shadow and Khan in a hall of mirrors, we see how truly
lacking in creativity was any aspect of THE SHADOW's production.
     It also appears that Koepp and Mulcahy couldn't agree as to
whether they were making a dark tone-y picture a la BATMAN or a more
traditional comic book adventure closer to THE ROCKETEER.  Like Batman,
The Shadow is a character with a dark side, and Koepp seems to want to
keep that dark side in focus.  But then, just when the tone seems
clear, Mulcahy will whip out an egregious crane shot or, in one of the
most pointless exercises in whiz-bang photography in recent memory,
follow a message through miles of pneumatic tubing.  Perhaps one of the
reasons THE SHADOW feels so stagnant is that writer and director are
pulling so hard from opposite ends that it ends up going nowhere.
     That confusion wastes the fine casting of Alec Baldwin in the
title role.  With his low, intense rasp, Baldwin has the perfect voice,
and his piercing eyes glow behind The Shadow's scarf.  Unfortunately,
he gets virtually no supporting help.  John Lone is much too low-key as
Khan, and doesn't seem to realize what a villain has to be in a film
like THE SHADOW, namely charismatic.  Penelope Ann Miller is once again
nothing but eye candy, perhaps the only actress on the planet who makes
Kim Basinger look talented.  Tim Curry literally froths at the mouth as
one of Khan's toadies, and poor Ian McKellen slums through his stock
absent-minded professor part.  When it comes right down to it, very
little in THE SHADOW works, because no one involved seemed to have
anything interesting to say or present visually.  Here's hoping that
Universal's marketing department doesn't have the power to cloud too
many minds into spending money on this one.

Title
Review for Metroland (1997)
     There are few central dramatic conflicts trickier to pull off -- or
more potentially annoying -- than a mid-life crisis.  The protagonist can
easyily become unsympathetic, his introspection little more than
self-indulgence.  It's rare to find a character with the potential to turn
a family man's grass-is-always-greener musings into something compelling,
but that's exactly what we find in Chris Lloyd (Christian Bale), the
central figure in METROLAND.  What a shame that potential isn't remotely
realized.  METROLAND is a character study with huge chunks of context
missing, a surface-level gloss on the clash between youthful idealism and
adult responsibility.
     The story opens in 1977, where advertising man Chris is living with
his wife Marion (Emily Watson) and infant daughter in the London suburb of
Eastwood, a bedroom community dubbed "Metroland" for its dependence on
rail commuters.  Chris feels a vague discontent with his domestic life, a
discontent that becomes more palpable with a visit from his childhood
friend Toni (Lee Ross).  An itinerant would-be writer still living free
and easy, Toni inspires Chris to reflect on the path that led to his own
domesticity.  In flashback we see Chris first as a rebellious teen in
1963, then as an aspiring photographer living in Paris five years later.
There he has a sexual affair with a French woman named Annick (Elsa
Zylberstein), an affair that haunts him with thoughts of a life that might
have been
     Plenty of things about Chris are intriguing conceptually.  As a
youth, and again as an adult, he is convinced by Toni that life in this
"bourgeois" world is pathetic, a shabby substitute for a life of art and
random affairs.  What Chris finds hard to accept is that Metroland is
actually the world he prefers.  He drifts from Annick to Marion because he
feels disconnected from the life he craves, then he drifts from Marion
because he thinks he has sold out the bold dreams of his youth, even
though he was never entirely committed to them.  As mid-life crisis
material goes, this is pretty unique stuff:  a man who strays not so much
because he's unhappy with what he has, but because he figures he's
_supposed_ to be unhappy.
     Don't make the mistake of assuming director Philip Saville and
screenwriter Adrian Hodges will flesh out those ideas.  For all its
flashing back, METROLAND never portrays Chris interacting with his family
as a youth to provide background for his feelings about suburbia.  It
never spends enough time developing the friendship with Toni that will
color Chris' entire life.  It never explores Toni's character in any
depth, relying on third-party psychoanalysis to explain his motivations.
There's a consistent superficiality to METROLAND, a refusal to give the
characters a depth that makes plot developments -- like a late revelation
regarding Marion -- feel anything but arbitrary and exploitative.
     There's some nice atmosphere to METROLAND, particularly from Mark
Knopfler's silky score and an effective period look, but it doesn't come
close to making up for the narrative shortcomings.  It doesn't help that
Seville uses inefficient techniques like cross-cutting with 1977 Chris'
pondering face throughout the 1968 flashbacks, or that Christian Bale's
performance is most notable for his perpetual petulant pout.  It's a film
in which the only clarity comes from its most obvious observations. 
METROLAND is a missed opportunity to give thematic weight to a mid-life
crisis, leaving yet another story of a horny husband trying to be 21
again.

Title
Review for Little Vampire, The (2000)
THE LITTLE VAMPIRE
(New Line)
Starring:  Jonathan Lipnicki, Rollo Weeks, Richard E. Grant, Jim Carter,
Alice Krige, Pamela Gidley, Tommy Hinkley, John Wood.
Screenplay:  Karey Kirkpatrick and Larry Wilson, based on the series of
books by Angela Sommer-Bodenburg.
Producer:  Richard Claus.
Director:  Uli Edel.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, mild profanity, violence)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE LITTLE VAMPIRE falls squarely in the center of the "family film" 
continuum -- a place few family films tend to occupy. On one end, we find
those films that appeal to viewers of all ages with imagination and a lack
of pandering (TOY STORY, E.T., BEAUTY AND THE BEAST). On the other end, we
find those films that appeal either to marketing concerns (POKEMON, MIGHTY
MORPHIN POWER RANGERS) or toilet humor (most live-action Disney films of
the last decade). True mediocrity in family filmmaking is quite a rarity,
which makes THE LITTLE VAMPIRE an intriguing pop culture curiosity: It's a
simple and whimsical tale that keeps flirting with inappropriateness.
     One-time JERRY MAGUIRE moppet Jonathan Lipnicki stars as Tony
Thompson, an 8-year-old dragged by his parents (Tommy Hinkley and Pamela
Gidley) from San Diego to Scotland for his dad's assignment designing a
new golf course. As though bullying by his xenophobic schoolmates and
being a Chargers fan were not horrifying enough, Tony discovers that his
new hometown is filthy with vampires. Fortunately, they're a kinder,
gentler vampire family that prefers to dine on bovine blood, and actually
wishes to be rid of its curse. Among them is Rudolph (Rollo Weeks), a
309-year-old in the form of a 9-year-old who becomes Tony's pal. He also
enlists Tony's help to find a lost artifact that can help the vampires
regain their humanity -- provided nasty vampire-hunter Rookery (Jim
Carter) doesn't find it first and use it to destroy them.
     Based on a popular series of children's books, THE LITTLE VAMPIRE
comes complete with many of the standard set-ups of the family classics. 
Like the protagonists in E.T., THE IRON GIANT and A LITTLE PRINCESS, Tony
is an isolated only child looking for a friend who finds that friend in an
unexpected place. There are the expected scenes of Tony and his new
vampire buddy getting back at his tormentors, as well as plenty of shots
of the spiky-haired Lipnicki (who hasn't quite outgrown his cuteness yet) 
yelling "Wow!" and/or "Cool!" while being borne aloft by Rudolph. Jim
Carter, in his Tex Cobb-circa-RAISING ARIZONA wardrobe, makes for a good
nasty-comic villain, and the script (co-written by CHICKEN RUN and JAMES
AND THE GIANT PEACH scribe Karey Kirkpatrick) includes at least a few
clever lines like, "It's not easy for a father to hear, but your son is a
blood-sucking fiend." Much of it is silly, but there's also a dark side
that many of the better children's tales have always had.
     There's also a perplexing dose of questionable content. The entire
concept of vampirism could be troubling enough for some children, but THE
LITTLE VAMPIRE adds to it a strange sub-plot involving Rudolph's younger
sister Anna (Anna Popplewell) and her crush on Tony. You see, Anna is a
307-year-old in a 7-year-old's body, making her advances slightly more
sophisticated than giggles and goo-goo eyes. In fact, in one scene she
sits on Tony's bed and -- in her best Lauren Bacall come-hither tones --
asks Tony, "You know how to whistle, don't you?" Though it's likely to go
right over the heads of the very young, there's something icky about using
a lascivious pre-pubescent as a punch line -- even ickier than the giant
pasture patty dropped from the sky by a flying vampire cow during the
film's "Far Side"-meets-John Hughes climax.
     It's not terribly surprising to find THE LITTLE VAMPIRE straying from
the kid-friendly straight-and-narrow, considering it was directed by Uli
Edel, the man behind such innocent entertainments as LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN
and Madonna's 1993 sex stinker BODY OF EVIDENCE. Edel's pacing is fairly
sluggish for a children's film, and the rest of it is a bit too bland for
parents to get excited about. Yet there's still some fun adventure here,
and it's not all designed to get its viewers to buy action figures. It's
hard to know quite how enthusiastic to be about a family film that's
occasionally pitched at the wrong crowd, but at least isn't stupid or
actively offensive most of the time. And that, unfortunately, is a sad
statement on "family" filmmaking in 2000: Simple mediocrity is starting to
look pretty good.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
VARSITY BLUES
(Paramount)
Starring:  James Van Der Beek, Jon Voight, Ron Lester, Paul Walker, Eliel
Swinton, Scott Caan, Amy Smart, Ali Larter.
Screenplay:  W. Peter Iliff.
Producers:  Tova Laiter, Mike Tollin and Brian Robbins.
Director:  Mike Robbins.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It would be trite to compare West Texas high school football to a
religion.  It would also be inaccurate -- religious faithful generally
demonstrate some sense of proportion.  A cult would be more analagous,
with thousands of people connecting their happiness to the achievements of
mere mortals to whom greater powers are ascribed.  Or perhaps rudimentary
tribal warfare is more appropriate.  Or even basic psychological child
abuse.  In short, the singular phenomenon that is West Texas high school
football is the stuff of which great American stories could be made.
     Or, VARSITY BLUES could be made.  This glossy youth melodrama stars
"Dawson's Creek" poster boy James Van Der Beek as Jonathan "Mox" Moxon, a
bookish senior backup quarterback for the West Canaan (TX) Coyotes.  Mox
plays football because it's what you're expected to do in West Canaan, but
he's content to remain in the shadow of his best friend, star quarterback
Lance Harbor (Paul Walker), while waiting for admission to Brown
University.  Then a season-ending knee injury sidelines Lance, forcing the
capable and creative Mox into the spotlight -- and into the line of fire
of autocratic, revered and feared Coyote coach Bud Kilmer (Jon Voight).
     The bulk of the film involves Mox's response to the adulation his new
role as star brings him -- will Mox be true to himself and his girlfriend
Julie (Amy Smart), or will he be seduced by fame, football, and head
cheerleader Darcy (Ali Larter)?  As the exceedingly pleasant Van Der Beek
plays him, there's never much question at all.  Mox is a Boy Scout whose
only lapse in judgment occurs in an effort at another good deed, bringing
Lance out to a strip club to cheer him up.  He's a broad strokes hero like
Kilmer -- who's not only a martinet, but a racist just for good measure --
is a broad strokes villain.  At least a couple of the supporting 
characters (notably Scott Caan as the team wild man and Ron Lester as a
massive lineman) show sparks of life.  Dramatically, Mox is a flatline.
     That inconsequential plot progression wastes plenty of potentially
compelling conflict.  Mox's father (Thomas Duffy), himself a former
Coyote, is proud of his straight-A student son for the first time when Mox
becomes a football star, yet that relationship is played only for laughs
or speeches.  The emotional center of VARSITY BLUES should have been the
pressure and twisted values that make high school kids believe nothing
they ever do will be as valuable, a sentiment expressed in Kilmer's pep
talk that the big game is "48 minutes for the next 48 years of your
lives."  Though director Brian Robbins (making a dramatic leap from GOOD
BURGER) nails the atmosphere of abandoned Friday night streets, W. Peter
Iliff's script uses it mostly as scenery for a typical teen soap opera.
It's as though they went to the Amish country, then decided to make
"Dawson's Creek - The Movie."
     Of course, the intended audience for VARSITY BLUES is the same as the
audience for "Dawson's Creek":  high school students themselves, little
interested in studies of small town sociology.  It's worth noting that
Robbins and Ilif include at least a few insightful scenes -- including one
player's rage against how much he's always hated the game -- between the
obligatory T&A and party-hearty scenes.  This isn't THE LAST PICTURE SHOW
we're talking about, nor was it ever likely to be, but it could have aimed
for something slightly more ambitious than a climax where all that matters
is whether the Coyotes can win the big game.  That's not just uninspired
-- given the setting, it's painfully ironic.

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
     If you've ever seen or read an interview with Vincent Gallo, it's
probably obvious why he decided to make his own movie:  other people seem
to irritate him to distraction.  The man who called Leonardo DiCaprio a
"good-looking girl" and referred to talent agents as "a bunch of creepy
crawlers" isn't exactly playing the mutual glad-handing game that leads to
a mainstream film career.  So rather than make a film with all the folks
he holds in such contempt, Gallo decided to do it all himself.  Already a
successful painter, musician and actor, Gallo decided to add a few new
hyphens with BUFFALO '66:  director, screenwriter, film score composer,
costume designer.  Wearing that many hats should qualify him as some sort
of rack.
     Fortunately, Gallo has the head and the talent to pull it off for the
most part.  A visually provocative if occasionally under-developed
character study, BUFFALO '66 tells the story of Billy Brown (Gallo), a
lifetime loser from Buffalo, NY.  Billy has just completed a five-year
prison stretch for a crime he didn't commit, forced to take a fall for his
bookie (Mickey Rourke) when he can't pay off a losing bet on the 1990
Bills-New York Giants Super Bowl.  Upon his return to the outside world,
two pieces of business drive Billy.  First, he needs to convince his
parents that he has been on a secret government assignment all this time,
as well as happily married.  To the latter end he kidnaps a dancer named
Layla (Christina Ricci), and forces her to pose as he bride.  His second
goal is killing the man he holds responsible for his incarceration:  Scott
Wood, the Bills placekicker whose missed last-second field goal cost the
team the game, and Billy five years of freedom.
     The premise sounds like the set-up for farce or black comedy, but
BUFFALO '66 is actually a sharply-observed character study.  Gallo's Billy
is a portrait in emotional immaturity, his child-like name indicative of
his inability to act like an adult.  The kidnapping of Layla is prompted
by his desperate need for the approval of his disinterested parents
(well-played by Anjelica Huston and Ben Gazzara); his mocking relationship
with is best friend (Kevin Corrigan) is like the friendship of two
8-year-olds.  Most significantly, his reactions to Layla betray an
8-year-old's view of girls.  His idea of a romantic relationship is bereft
of affection; when the pair sit down in an automatic photo booth to take a
picture, Billy cringes at Layla's touch as though she has cooties,
insisting on a solemn representation of a love "spanning time."
     Gallo is superb in front of the camera, but he's just as impressive
behind it.  Typically, actors-turned-directors point their camera at the
actors and let them do their thing.  There's nothing typical about Gallo,
however.  His direction tends towards the showy, but the show always
reaches for a specific emotion.  A spinning dining room table conversation
involving the fragmented family of Billy, Layla and his parents keeps
shifting perspective, never showing all four characters in the same shot
at the same time.  Later, Billy's father jumps into the spotlight
(literally) as he shows off his shattered dreams of being a crooner.
Gallo's boldest decision depicts a violent scene in a series of still-life
tableaux, freeze-framed blood spilling through the air like something in a
horrific wax museum.  With the instincts of a visual artist, Gallo makes
BUFFALO '66 undeniably visual.
     It's only as a screenwriter that Gallo comes up wanting.  As complex
and well-developed as Billy may be, Layla is that sketchy.  The talented
Ricci tries to invest some real humanity in the character, but too often
she's little more than a powder blue baby-doll fantasy.  Her character
seems to exist for one reason only:  because Billy will need the Love of a
Good Woman to redeem him.  That choice only makes sense if BUFFALO '66 is
an elaborate surrealist fable, which would negate much of the compelling
pathos in Billy's character.  Still, it's hard not to notice how much more
Gallo does right with BUFFALO '66.  He may have stretched his diverse
talents thin, but he proved he could do it his way. Lucky thing for Gallo,
since that appears to be the only way he wants to do it.

Title
Review for McHale's Navy (1997)
McHALE'S NAVY
(Universal)
Starring:  Tom Arnold, Tim Curry, David Alan Grier, Dean Stockwell, Debra
Messing, Bruce Campbell, Brian Haley, French Stewart.
Screenplay:  Peter Crabbe.
Producers:  Sid, Bill and Jon Scheinberg.
Director:  Bryan Spicer.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes)
     Here's the good news:  Tom Arnold may never, _ever_ be allowed to
make a movie again after McHALE'S NAVY.  Here's the bad news:  everything
else.  McHALE follows SGT. BILKO and DOWN PERISCOPE as the best arguments
yet for military down-sizing, trotting out the same tired cliches --
unorthodox heroes, inept commanding officers, officious little weasels
getting trampled by the zany crew -- which haven't been funny
since...well, ever.  Arnold plays Quinton McHale, the lovable oaf of a
retired naval officer who bootlegs, but also donates to hospitals and poor
kids, so we know he's really a stand-up guy; Tim Curry plays his
arch-enemy, who bares his teeth so much that his dentist should get a
screen credit.  Curry wants to do something-or-other involving a military
satellite, and it's up to McHale's crew to prevent it, or at least wander 
around for a while getting into trouble until the something-or-other
doesn't happen.  If you last the whole 105 minutes, you will experience a
few explosions, a bar fight, the visage of Ernest Borgnine looking as
though it were already preserved in formaldehyde, kids in peril, pigs
in peril, and the criminal waste of Bruce Campbell's eccentric talents.
You should also get some sort of pension; you may be having flashbacks of
this one for years.
FOLLOW ME HOME
(New Millenia)
Starring:  Benjamin Bratt, Jesse Borrego, Steve Reevis, Calvin Levels,
Alfre Woodard.
Screenplay:  Peter Bratt.
Producers:  Alan Renshaw, Irene Romero, Peter Bratt, Benjamin Bratt.
Director:  Peter Bratt.
MPAA Rating:  Not Rated (could be R for profanity, violence, drug use and
adult themes)
     There's just no way around it:  FOLLOW ME HOME is a really, really,
really, really -- there just aren't enough "reallys" to do it justice --
bizarre film experience.  The story concerns four mural artists -- Tudee
(Jesse Borrego), Abel (Benjamin Bratt), Freddy (Steve Reevis) and Kaz
(Calvin Revels) -- who set out from California on a guerrilla mission to
paint a mural on the White House depicting the history of people of color
in America.  Along the way, they pick up a woman (Alfre Woodard) with a
secret, and encounter a group of history enthusiasts with a desire to
return to a very white version of America.  It's not entirely appropriate
to think of FOLLOW ME HOME as a failed experiment, because it's not
exactly a failure.  There are some impressive performances, particularly
by Benjamin Bratt as the wild and troubled Abel, and writer/director Peter
Bratt constantly keeps the audience off-balance with a surreal, dream-like
atmosphere and characters who are never as predictable as you think they
might be.  But FOLLOW ME HOME is ambitious to a fault, attempting to
tackle every racial, ethnic and gender stereotype in existence in one
film.  The result is a film which has as its only focus the fact that it
is iconoclastic, 200 years of history given a whirlwind revisionist spin
in 102 minutes.  When the climax involves a group chant of The Sugar Hill
Gang's "Rapper's Delight," it's hard not to wonder if Bratt has been
spinning so hard that he's gotten too dizzy to recognize absurdity.
FOLLOW ME HOME is an admirable project, sometimes intriguing but just as
deeply confused and fragmented as the America Peter Bratt is trying to
portray.

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
PRACTICAL MAGIC
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Sandra Bullock, Nicole Kidman, Dianne Wiest, Stockard Channing,
Aidan Quinn, Goran Visjnic.
Screenplay:  Robin Swicord, Akiva Goldsman and Adam Brooks, based on the
novel by Alice Hoffman.
Producer:  Denise DiNovi.
Director:  Griffin Dunne.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     PRACTICAL MAGIC cast a sort of spell over me, but I don't think it's
the kind a film-maker might have intended.  Rather than enchantment, it
produced a Spell of Befuddlement.  It's not so much a movie as it is a big
bubbling cauldron of confusion into which a mess of ingredients have been
tossed.  Among the items included in this concoction:
     1) A cup of THELMA & LOUISE.  The story focuses on a pair of sisters
(genetic, not just philosophical) named Sally (Sandra Bullock) and Gillian
(Nicole Kidman) Owens, who come from a long line of witchcraft
practitioners including the maiden aunts (Stockard Channing and Dianne
Wiest) who raised them.  Part of that legacy involves a curse on the men
in their lives, leading Sally into a tragic longing for true love and
Gillian to a pursuit of loveless affairs.  The whispers of THELMA & LOUISE
come when the two sisters kill an abusive lout (Goran Visnjic) while his
is in the process of assaulting Gillian.  The women then try to hide from
the repercussions of their deed, even as good-hearted cop Gary Hallet
(Aidan Quinn) tries to help them.  It's an obvious hook for a female
empowerment fable, one that plays female viewers for every whoop and cheer
it can wrest out of them, but it doesn't quite mix with other ingredients
like...
     2) A dash of THE FRIGHTENERS.  You see, Sally and Gillian don't just
kill the abusive lout once.  They kill him accidentally, cast a spell to
bring him back to life, then kill him a gain when the zombie-fied lout is
even more loutish than before.  The catch is that his restless soul is
still hanging about the sisters' picturesque New England home, appearing
occasionally to inhabit Gillian's body or attempt to hear out Gary's
heart.  Though the scenes of supernatural nastiness are sporadic, they're
nonetheless jarring.  As the Owens women attempt a climactic exorcism of
sorts -- joined by a bunch of townswomen who had until that point loathed
the sisters, but decided to help out because, darn it, that's just what
women do for one another -- you may wonder who took your saucy romantic
comedy and dipped it in THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK.  That's assuming you
still care by that point, given...
     3) A smidgen of HOPE FLOATS.  Sandra Bullock now appears to be in her
pensive, sorrowful single mother phase, and it doesn't suit her.  In the
midst of the magical hijinks surrounding her, Bullock plays her mourning
far too straight, as though the film were a deeply observational
relationsihp drama.  She should have taken a hint from her co-stars, all
of whom appear to be having a heck of a lot more fun.  Kidman is flashy,
fiery and sexy as the naughty sister, playing town tramp with plenty of
gusto; Channing and Wiest are both matronly and devilish as the eccentric
aunts.  Bullock, meanwhile, puts on her horn-rims from LOVE POTION NO. 9
and frumps about when she should be providing the stable, sympathetic
figure the story needs.  And it could have been a strange delight thanks
to...
     4) The eye of Griffin Dunne.  Actor-turned-director Dunne has a
unique, dark comic sensibility behind the camera, evidenced by his ability
to turn a tale of two obsessive stalkers (ADDICTED TO LOVE) into an
entertaining romantic comedy.  Here he offers a few of his cock-eyed
touches, including a midnight tequila party and Gillian's surreal
time-lapsed drive home, but there's no focus to the story.  It's a comedy
that gets too serious, a crowd-pleaser that turns too bizarre, and a
romantic love story that suddenly turns into a sisterly love story.  It's
certainly never a bore, not with Kidman throwing off sparks and so many
shifts in tone.  It also never comes together as anything more than the
sum of its disparate parts.  I'm not sure what the recipe for PRACTICAL
MAGIC was supposed to create, but it adds up to a casserole of clashing
flavors, a supernatural stew with the power to create a fog of
ambivalence.

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
THE CELEBRATION (FESTEN)
(October)
Starring:  Ulrich Thomsen, Henning Moritzen, Thomas Bo Larsen, Paprika
Steen, Birthe Neumann, Trine Dyrholm, Helle Dolleris, Gbatokai Dakinah.
Screenplay:  Thomas Vinterberg and Mogens Rukov.
Producer:  Birgitte Hald.
Director:  Thomas Vinterberg.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be R for adult themes, nudity and profanity)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
In English and Danish with English subtitles.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE CELEBRATION's Klingenfeldt clan is one of those families that
proves Tolstoy's assertion about unhappy families being unhappy in their
own unique ways.  More to the point, it's a family that makes you feel
better about your own unhappy family.  Eldest son Christian (Ulrich
Thomsen) wallows in depression over his twin sister's recent death;
brother Michael (Thomas Bo Larsen) is still in hot water over his
alcohol-fueled scene at the last family gathering; sister Helene (Paprika
Steen) creates a stir by bringing black boyfriend Gbatokai (Gbatokai
Dakinah) to meet her less-than-politically correct relatives.  Throwing
these people together for a weekend on a country estate celebrating father
Helge's (Henning Moritzen) 60th birthday would be enough to insure plenty
of recrimination to go around.
     That's the kind of character truth "Dogma '95" -- a manifesto for a
return to bare bones filmmaking created by several leading Danish
directors -- was supposed to engender.  Yet at times THE CELEBRATION feels
forced and artificial, merely in a different way than the forced and
artifical genre films implicitly criticized by Dogma '95.  The gathering 
in the story eventually comes to focus on the removal of a jurassic-sized
skeleton from the family closet, and the reactions of all the family
members to what has been revealed.  Some of those reactions ring jarringly
true, like Michael's attempt to return himself to his father's good graces
by removing the cause of the trouble.  Others feel silly, like the
machinations of the family cook to help air the dirty laundry.  But good
or bad, all the reactions spring from a bombshell rather than the typical
exchanges of small artillery that make for most family tension.
     It all seems terribly unnecessary considering how perceptively
Vinterberg and co-scripter Mogens Rukov capture the more mundane animosity
and foolishness of family gatherings.  When grandfather rises to tell the
same slightly risque joke for the second time in the evening, all and
sundry indulge him, chuckling and applauding just as merrily as the first.
Michael treats his wife Mette (Helle Dolleris) with such a basic contempt
that he leaves to walk a mile with the children when he picks up Christian
in their small car.  Helene's mother (Birthe Neumann) "mistakes" Gbatokai
for Helene's previous boyfriend, a Latino, with a casual and oblivious
racism.  Vinterberg and his exceptional cast -- Thomas Bo Larsen is
particularly good as the younger son overflowing with toxic anger -- find
moments of greatness in these simple conflicts.  They're the sort of
things all families contend with, the things that make people want to take
blood relations and make them bloody relations.
     Indeed, Vinterberg's point may have been that the more extreme
example of family crisis that supercedes the others is more common than
we'd like to believe.  If so, it still feels like an authenticity that
draws too much attention to itself.  Curiously, the same could be said for
the rigid film-making prescriptions of the Dogma '95.  The hand-held
camerawork, washed-out video-to-film cinematography, location shooting and
absence of underscore music were intended to subsume "auteurism" in favor
of story, but they simply become an auteurism of a different sort.  As
effectively as the location serves to intensify the claustrophobia of a
family forced to confront its demons, the look and sound of THE
CELEBRATION -- or lack thereof -- just make you aware of how different
this film looks and sounds than other films, exactly when the familiarity
of the situations should come into focus.
     Some might argue the same was true of the most notable previous Dogma
'95 effort, Lars Von Trier's BREAKING THE WAVES.  Yet in that film, the
style supported the instability of the main character's world;
thematically, the look was of a piece with the story.  In THE CELEBRATION,
that same look works far less effectively, because it feels like an
exercise rather than a choice.  When Vinterberg nails the truth of basic
family interaction, it's easy to overlook that exercise.  Later, when a
dramatic plot point takes over, it starts to seem that too much has been
imposed on these characters from without -- a bad dogma starts to run over
all its great karma.

Title
Review for cole de la chair, L' (1998)
THE SCHOOL OF FLESH (L'ECOLE DE LA CHAIR)
(Stratosphere)
Starring:  Isabelle Huppert, Vincent Martinez, Vincent Lindon, Marthe
Keller.
Screenplay:  Jacques Fieschi, based on the novel by Yukio Mishima.
Producer:  Fabienne Vonier.
Director:  Benoit Jacquot.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Film stories of improbable obsession are always tricky because
they're so...well, so improbable.  In a novel, it's easier to delve into
tangled psychology through interior monologue or prose -- to understand,
for instance, why a middle-aged man destroys his life for a teenager
called Lolita.  There is also the secondary problem of giving a face to
the object of desire, creating the possibility that the obsession just
won't make any sense.  A film about irrational passions has to immerse a
viewer in that irrationality, even as it gives you some small sense that
the irrationality is based on something understandable.
     Benoit Jacqot's THE SCHOOL OF FLESH (L'ECOLE DE LA CHAIR) struggles
in both respects.  It's the story of Dominique (Isabelle Huppert), an
unmarried Paris fashion executive at a point in her life when her career
is the focus of her life.  That changes one night when she spies a
bartender named Quentin (Vincent Martinez) at a local nightspot, and
becomes fascinated with him.  Though Quentin's transvestite co-worker 
Chris (Vincent Lindon) warns Dominique that Quentin is a hustler --
indiscriminate of gender -- Dominique still invites him to dinner, and
eventually to bed.  Soon Dominique has made Quentin a "kept man," sharing
her apartment and money with him even though he continues to lead his
previous life.  Their relationship twists and turns into something neither
one can quite identify, though both need it desperately.
     Exactly why they need it is not entirely clear.  The script, based on
a novel by Japanese author Yukio Mishima (THE SAILOR WHO FELL FROM GRACE
WITH THE SEA), does a decent job of painting Quentin as a troubled man who
uses his body for his personal gain, then shows disdain for anyone who
wants him for that body.  Dominique is a more perplexing case.  Isabelle
Huppert effectively conveys a confident woman slowly becoming a paranoid
mess, following Quentin on his rounds through the city.  Jacquot's
direction, however, keeps us too distanced from Dominique's obsession for
it to make sense as anything more profound than a middle-aged fling.
Though the narrative toys with the provocative notion that the childless 
Dominique is acting out a maternal fantasy as much as a sexual one, the
script is too timid to attack that subtext.  THE SCHOOL OF FLESH's
academic detachment makes it difficult to feel her pain, whatever it might
be.
     It's even more difficult to understand why Vincent Martinez is the
man who turns her world upside down.  THE SCHOOL OF FLESH is not the first
film to assert an unlikely man's attractiveness to women -- the entire
Woody Allen oeuvre comes to mind -- but that doesn't make it any easier to
accept this particular example.  Though Martinez certainly isn't ugly,
it's unlikely he'd be anyone's paradigm of masculine beauty; he most
closely resembles a slightly more swarthy Joaquin Phoenix.  Still,
everyone in the film is smitten with Quentin:  Dominique, Chris, a
distinguised attorney (Francois Berleand), an impressionable teenage girl
(Roxane Mesquida).  Quentin's animal magnetism is central to THE SCHOOL OF
FLESH's premise, yet I didn't notice enough magnetism to erase a computer
disk.
     THE SCHOOL OF FLESH still manages to be somewhat engaging, simply
because the relationship dynamics are effectively portrayed.  It's rather
touching watching Quentin try to make Dominique admit she'd discard him if
he were ugly; it's amusing watching Dominique struggle to balance her
desire for Quentin with her embarrassment to be with him in public
settings.  Both central characters are intriguing enough to follow, but
it's hard to watch them both degrade themselves when it's not clear enough
why they're doing it.  Obsession makes for great drama if the "why" is as
important as the "what."  THE SCHOOL OF FLESH leaves you wondering "why,"
as well as "why him."

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
     It's difficult to explain how 85 minutes of effortless charm could be
neutralized by one scene without giving away the ending of WAKING NED
DEVINE.  As a film critic I almost always champion films that take
narrative risks, avoiding the plague of the obvious.  WAKING NED DEVINE
takes just such a risk, but the result feels like a particularly nasty
bait-and-switch.  Where many films err with gratuitous sentimentality,
this one errs with a gratuitous lack of sentimentality.
     The most frustrating thing is that so much of it is so entertaining.
Set in the coastal Irish hamlet of Tulaigh Mhor, it centers on Jackie
O'Shea (Ian Bannen) and Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly), two elderly
friends among the town's 52 inhabitants.  One morning, Jackie makes the
connection from a newspaper headline that a winning lottery ticket was
purchased in Tulaigh Mhor, meaning one of the other 50 townspeople is now
very wealthy -- and very desirable as a friend.  After narrowing down the
field of contenders, Jackie realizes the winner must be fisherman Ned
Devine.  Unfortunately, Ned is in no position to claim his prize, having
dropped dead from shock while watching the numbers announced on 
television.
     Thus begins a sparkling bit of farce as Jackie, Michael and
eventually the entire town conspire to share in the late Ned's good
fortune.  When lottery offical Jim Kelly (Brendan F. Dempsey) arrives from
Dublin to verify the winner, Michael is forced into the unfamiliar role of
actor, posing as Ned so the $6 million pound jackpot won't go without a
claimant.  Both lead actors are splendid -- Bannen the gleeful mastermind
behind the plan, and Kelly the flustered star of his show.  The sequence
in which Jackie and Michael try to set up the deception, caught off-guard
by Mr. Kelly's early arrival, shows director Kirk Jones to have a rare
sort of comic timing.  Farce rarely works on film the way it works on a
stage, but WAKING NED DEVINE fires on every cylinder -- game actors in a
great comic situation guided by a talented director.
     There's also a major sub-plot in WAKING NED DEVINE, a romantic
triangle of sorts between single mother Maggie (Susan Lynch), gentle
but foul-smelling pig farmer Finn (James Nesbitt) and self-satisfied
ladies' man Pat Mulligan (Matthew Devitt).  Initially, the whole business
seems to be little more than a distraction, an excuse for gags about odor
and fruity soaps.  Gradually, however, it begins to take shape as the
ideal set-up for the story's lesson.  Finn loves his work as a pig farmer,
but Maggie will only marry him if he gives it up.  Will the lottery
windfall in which he'll share change Finn into a more suitable husband,
yet a less satisfied man?  How will riches change all the citizens of
Tulaigh Mhor?
     And it is here, friends, that WAKING NED DEVINE takes its left turn
into black comedy and bleak morality.  Plenty of viewers will walk away
from WAKING NED DEVINE believing they have seen a feel-good film with a
happy ending, but it is an entirely contrary reaction which blunted my
enthusiasm.  I laughed and laughed and laughed through much of the film.
Then I gasped.  Then I fumed.  WAKING NED DEVINE sheds its sympathy and
its sense of good humor for what, in retrospect, feels like a cheap shock
and a toast to situational ethics.  85 minutes of effortless charm counts
for a lot.  If only one scene didn't make it count for so much less.

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
     Everything about Jackie Chan's OPERATION CONDOR seems to scream out
"James Bond wanna-be." The American ad campaign for the film places Jackie
in a heroic pose in front of Spandex-clad, gun-toting babes, a pre-opening
credits sequence sets the stage with a few impressive stunts, and the
opening credits themselves are full of silhouette images.  The plot,
meanwhile, concerns flirtations with a female associate, narrow escapes,
nefarious traps, exotic locations and one wheelchair-bound arch-villain.
Anything sound familiar?
     Imagine, now, that in the course of mimicking one of the most iconic
adventure series of the last thirty years, someone managed to improve on
it.  When the creative force behind the result is Jackie Chan, it's not a
tremendous stretch of the imagination.  OPERATION CONDOR is simply the
most ridiculously entertaining action film to grace American screens this
year, a dazzling combination of energetic comedy and virtuoso stunt work
which shames the multi-million dollar detritus offered this summer by
Hollywood studios.  
     OPERATION CONDOR, a 1990 Hong Kong release originally titled ARMOUR
OF GOD II, casts Jackie as a secret agent/soldier of fortune named,
creatively enough, Jackie.  Jackie's mission, should he choose to accept
it, is to help the United Nations recover a fortune in stolen gold hidden
in the Sahara by Nazis near the end of World War II.  Along for the ride
are Ada (Carol Chang), an expert in desert geography, and Sasha (Eva Cobo
de Garcia), the granddaughter of the Nazi officer who originally hid the
gold.  Making life difficult for Jackie and company are a variety of
bad-tempered mercenaries, including a pair of inept Arabs and the
aforementioned wheelchair-bound arch-villain, all of whom have their own
designs on the gold.
     And none of it really matters in the least, except to the extent that
it provides a set-up for action sequences.  That structure doesn't
distinguish it much from most late-model Bond films, or from the majority
of late-model action films of any make.  What does distinguish OPERATION
CONDOR is the action it delivers -- not just big, loud and expensive
action but inventive, thrilling and beautifully choreographed action.  A
Jackie Chan fight sequence can do something absolutely extraordinary in
the jaded age of the blockbuster:  it makes action seem original.  You may
spend half of OPERATION CONDOR's running time -- particularly the
spectacular wind tunnel finale -- wearing the goofy expression of someone
who can't believe he just saw that.
     You may spend the other half enjoying the presence of Chan himself,
though the Bond analogy certainly breaks down at this point.  Chan is a
lot of things on screen, but suave ain't one of them.  You get the feeling
you'd be more likely to see him in a cardigan and slippers than in an
Armani tuxedo; he's like Mr. Rogers if he could do a spinning back kick.
(My apologies, Fred, if you _can_ do a spinning back kick.)  Yet it is
exactly that polite, boyish charm which makes Chan such a great action
hero.  He's in on the absurd joke of action films, but not in the raised
eyebrow, quip-spewing way which passes for wit in other genre entries.
Chan is willing simply to laugh at himself, at the idea of a vulnerable
nice guy who defeats his opponents with grace and style rather than with
an Uzi.  One of OPERATION CONDOR's best gags has Jackie trying to avoid
being noticed by Sasha while sneaking through her house, when Sasha
sneezes.  For a split-second, we see Jackie fight the instinctively
gentlemanly reaction which could blow his cover:  he _almost_ says "Bless
you."
     There are a few clumsy transitions in OPERATION CONDOR, many the
result of editing which trimmed almost twenty minutes from the original
cut of ARMOUR OF GOD II, as well as predictably stiff supporting
performances and grossly caricatured accents in the dubbed voices.  Big
deal.  OPERATION CONDOR is _fun_, fun in a way which should make people
embarrassed for using the same word to describe CON AIR or THE LOST WORLD.
If I were Pierce Brosnan, I'd be looking over my shoulder right about now.

Title
Review for Hunchback of Notre Dame, The (1996)
(Disney)
Voices:  Tom Hulce, Demi Moore, Kevin Kline, Tony Jay, Jason Alexander,
Charles Kimbrough, Mary Wickes.
Screenplay: Tab Murphy, Irene Mecchi, Bob Tzudiker, Nomi White, Jonathan
Roberts.
Producer:  Don Hahn.
Directors:  Kirk Wise and Gary Trousdale.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As I sat in my car twenty minutes after the conclusion of THE
HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME, tears still welling up in my eyes, I though about
what made me respond to Disney's recent animated hits, even flawed
efforts like POCAHONTAS.  It was not simply animation to which I was
responding, since animated films like BALTO had left me unmoved, and I
like to believe that Disney's ubiquitous marketing had no influence.  I
thought about the moments in films like BEAUTY AND THE BEAST and THE
LITTLE MERMAID which had filled me with the pure joy of film artistry, and
I realized the connection:  music.  THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME is dark,
enchanting, visually spectacular and richer in thematic depth than 99% of
the live action films I see, but I know that it was the power of grand
opera which pushed me over the edge.
     Based on Victor Hugo's 1831 classic, THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME
tells of Quasimodo (voice of Tom Hulce), the deformed bellringer living in
the tower of Paris' Notre Dame Cathedral.  Raised since infancy by the
cruel Minister of Justice Claude Frollo (Tony Jay), Quasimodo lives a
lonely existence with only the stone gargoyles of the cathedral as his
friends:  Victor (Charles Kimbrough), Hugo (Jason Alexander) and Laverne
(Mary Wickes).  But on the Festival of Fools, Quasimodo decides to venture
into the streets, where he is rescued from an uncaring crowd by the
beautiful gypsy Esmeralda (Demi Moore).  Quasimodo becomes enchanted with
Esmeralda, but a furious Frollo, who considers gypsies evil, demands that
she be arrested and punished.  When Frollo's Captain of the Guard Phoebus
(Kevin Kline) decides to help Esmeralda, Quasimodo finds him a rival for
Esmeralda's affections, but an ally in the struggle to save her from
Frollo's wrath.
     There is no question that computer technology is allowing Disney
animators an ever-increasing freedom, and the opportunity to create some
astonishing images.  There are scenes involving thousands of "extras"
which are simply extraordinary, and a swooping shot as Quasimodo comes to
Esmeralda's rescue which is breath-taking.  Still, the conventional
character animation might be even better.  It seems almost unfair to
single out one star, but I will:  Kathy Zielinski, the character
supervisor for Frollo.  She has designed one of Disney's most complicated
villains ever, a tormented and hateful zealot with a mouth so cruel and
subtly expressive that he makes you want to shudder every time he smiles.
With superb voice work by Tony Jay, Frollo becomes a brilliant
characterization.  If an animator ever deserved credit for a Best
Supporting Actor performance, this might be the case.
     Frollo's tortured soul (revealed in a creepy and very un-Disney-like
song called "Hellfire") is just one of many rather adult subjects which
gives HUNCHBACK a surprising resonance.  Frollo's relationship with
Quasimodo is that of an abusive parent who tears down his child's
self-esteem, then makes him feel grateful because he still takes care of
the child.  Quasimodo's cowering respect for Frollo is heart-breaking,
rendered poignantly by Tom Hulce.  HUNCHBACK also tackles prejudice and
religious hypocrisy, with Esmeralda's entreaty "God Help the Outcasts"
observing that Jesus was "once an outcast too."  There is certainly a fair
amount of comic relief, mostly provided by the gargoyles and the lively
number "A Guy Like You," but if HUNCHBACK is at all a film for children,
it is one which exposes them to issues their parents should be prepared to
discuss.
     The messages in HUNCHBACK are powerful, and they are skillfully
handled, but there is something that happens when they are set to music.
The songs by Alan Menken and Steven Schwartz are not particularly
memorable by Disney standards, nothing you will be humming for days
afterwards like "Be Our Guest" or "Under the Sea," but they are evocative.
A heartfelt sentiment which is sung rather than spoken draws its emotion
from a different place.  Hollywood seems to believe that no one wants to
see a musical in 1996, and that Disney's films are aberrations because
they are animated.  I'm not convinced that the real issue isn't choice of
material.  Disney selects timeless tales, and a timeless tale in song is a
powerful thing.
     There are certainly more than a few similarities between THE
HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME and BEAUTY AND THE BEAST (also directed by Kirk
Wise and Gary Trousdale); if it had been live action, I'd have sworn that
they re-used some of the same sets in the opening number.  BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST is a better film, a classic, and yet there I was, twenty minutes
after the conclusion of HUNCHBACK, tears still welling up in my eyes,
emotionally invested in the life of an animated character.  And though the
songs may not have been on my lips, I know they were in my heart.

Title
Review for Down in the Delta (1998)
     DOWN IN THE DELTA, a paean to the importance of family ties, stays
such a course of earnestness and muted conflict that it's hard to work up
much emotion about the people involved.  The story opens in Chicago, where
Loretta Sinclair (Alfre Woodard) is responding to the challenges of
unemployment and single parenthood -- including an autistic daughter --
with alcohol and drugs.  Recognizing a disaster in the making, Loretta's
mother (Mary Alice) threatens Loretta with the loss of her kids if she
doesn't take son Thomas (Mpho Koaho) and daughter Tracy (Kulani Hansen)
to spend the summer at the Sinclair family's Mississippi homestead.  There
Loretta meets her Uncle Earl (Al Freeman Jr.), a restaurateur caring for
his Alzheimer's-stricken wife Annie (the late Esther Rolle) and committed
to holding the Sinclairs together.
     The first act of DOWN IN THE DELTA gets it off to a rocky start,
presenting the inner city background with all the urgency of a generic
studio back-lot.  Young men hang around cars looking surly, while second
unit footage passes buildings that might as well have "The Projects"
stamped across them.  It's important to the film's themes that the city
feel chaotic, a fragmented collection of people from fragmented homes, but
it feels false right down to the crack-house apartment where Loretta goes
to get high; even the always-reliable Woodard appears adrift in some
mediocre TV-drama episode.  Director Maya Angelou almost seems afraid of
getting her hands dirty, as though the story's more uplifting message will
be sullied by showing inner city life at its worst.
     DOWN IN THE DELTA gets much stronger when the setting shifts south,
and not just because the location feels more genuine.  Al Freeman Jr.
radiates patriarchal gravity and moral strength as Uncle Earl, his keen 
eyes providing an added intelligence to every word of wisdom from his
lips.  He serves as the example of committed family responsibility --
attending to his ill wife where Loretta's husband ran out on his ill
daughter, teaching young Thomas about Sinclair ancestors so he'll
understand the power of familial love.  Screenwriter Myron Goble
occasionally pushes too hard on these themes, stumbling over the vague
estrangement of Earl's son Will (Wesley Snipes), but Freeman is always
there to bring them back into focus.  You never doubt for a moment that
Earl is the kind of man who can straighten out the lives of others not by
lecturing to them, but by showing them the right way.
     DOWN IN THE DELTA is the kind of film you'll probably walk out of
with a good feeling, even though you may not necessarily have enjoyed it 
all that much.  The key dramatic points prove to be exceedingly tame
stuff, adding to the impression that the film is just cruising along on
the momentum of its good intentions.  Usually films of this kind struggle
by becoming too strident; this one struggles by being not nearly strident
enough.  Freeman alone makes this film worth watching, guiding both
viewers and other characters to an understanding of what can be 
accomplished through a sense of shared responsibility.  Still, it should
have been easier to be more supportive of a film with as many valuable
things to say.  DOWN IN THE DELTA's soft-spoken drama is more likely to
move you to respectful nods than to social action.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
     One of the things you've gotta love about Hollywood marketing people
is their occasional bouts with irony deficiency.  If you trusted
television advertisements for HOLY MAN, you'd probably suspect that it was
a raucous Eddie Murphy comedy where the star spends most of the film
mocking and deflating uptight media types.  That's because Touchstone
Pictures' marketing department knew it'd have one hellacious time trying
to sell HOLY MAN for what it really is:  a somber, sincere
satire-cum-cautionary tale in which Eddie Murphy, despite his lead
billing, generally plays second fiddle to Jeff Goldblum.
     The wonderful, awful irony comes from the "message" of HOLY MAN.
Goldblum plays Ricky Hayman, the programming director for Miami-based Good
Buy Shopping Network.  Faced with lagging sales at the network and
mounting personal debt, Ricky realizes he has to do something to turn
things around fast.  Fate intervenes when Ricky and colleague Kate Newell
(Kelly Preston) nearly run over an apparently homeless man calling himself
"G" (Murphy).  A few plot contrivances later, G wanders onto the Good Buy
set and on the air, becoming an instant phenomenon by lending his New Age
philosophizing to the hawking of chainsaws and electronic beauty aids.  As
G's success reinvigorates Ricky's career, Ricky begins to wonder whether
it's more important to be honest with people than to use any means
available to sell to them.
     Pretty good gag, huh?  Only the joke will be on viewers who expect to
have their funny bones tickled, but instead get a nearly two-hour lecture
on the evils of consumerism.  And what an achingly strident lecture at
that, with Goldblum twitching and furrowing his brow every few seconds to
make sure we understand he's in the middle of a Jerry Maguire-sized crisis
of conscience, caught between Preston as the angel on one shoulder and
Robert Loggia as the devilish network boss on the other.  Murphy,
meanwhile, gets a few devilish moments of his own -- you know, the ones in
the commercials -- but essentially spends the film's running time smiling
beatifically and waxing profound on the importance of love and connection
with the earth.  It's all very well-intentioned, and deadly dull.
     The sad part is that HOLY MAN could have been an effective piece of
satire.  The script by Tom Schulman presents G as a latter-day Howard
Beale or Chance the Gardener unknowingly tapping into some zeitgeist
malaise.  Unfortunately, if you're going to go for NETWORK or BEING
THERE-style stabs at modern media, you need someone a bit more cutting
edge at the helm than Stephen Herek (THE MIGHTY DUCKS, MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS,
101 DALMATIANS), Disney's crowd-pleaser-in-residence.  Herek wraps
everything in a warm-n-fuzzy package guaranteed not to offend, a pointless
perspective for a social satire.  Even the few token pokes at
infomercialism, including cameo pitch-meisters like Morgan Fairchild,
Betty White and Soupy Sales, are too feather-light to amount to much.
Wasting a chance to savage as ripe a target as home shopping should be a
criminal offense.
     It's similarly criminal wasting the presence of Eddie Murphy.  I
understand Murphy's recent move toward kinder, gentler, family-friendly
roles, since there are only so many ways to play the wise-cracking rebel
with the honking laugh.  The problem isn't his performance in HOLY MAN,
which is quite adequate for the minimal work he's actually required to do.
The problem is that no matter how hard Murphy tries to be a "versatile
actor," he's going to be in trouble with audiences if marketing geniuses
keep suckering his fans into watching a Murphy they don't really care to
see.  I'm glad Murphy felt strongly enough about HOLY MAN's message of
integrity to take a chance playing against type, but he could have picked
a less tedious vehicle.  It's even worse when Touchstone makes him look
like a certain Pot referring to a certain Kettle's ebony shading.

Title
Review for Chamber, The (1996)
Director:  James Foley.
Screenplay:  William Goldman, Chris Reese.
Producers:  John Davis, Brian Grazer, Ron Howard.
Starring:  Chris O'Donnell, Gene Hackman, Faye Dunaway, Lela Rochon,
Robert Prosky.
     In the adaptation of John Grisham's THE CHAMBER, Gene Hackman plays
Sam Cayhall, a dyed-in-the-wool, Confederate-flag-waving Klansman on death
row after being convicted of a 1967 racially-motivated bombing which left
two children dead.  His grandson Adam Hall (Chris O'Donnell), a Chicago
attorney, has arrived in Mississippi in an attempt to pull off a
last-minute appeal even though prospects appear dim.  As the film nears
its climax, Sam makes the long walk to the death watch cell past other
prisoners, and one by one we see and hear them wishing Sam well.  This
includes several black prisoners, one of whom offers Sam a peace sign.
     I may be no expert in the brotherhood of death row, but I'm going to
go out on a limb and suggest that there may be no love lost between black
inmates and an inmate who uses a certain "n" word with unapologetic
frequency.  Yet THE CHAMBER depends on such warm fuzziness when it comes
to matters of race, because its thinking is equally fuzzy.  Sam Cayhall
may be Klan, the script suggests, but he's good people; after all, he
tells his black guard (erstwhile pro baseball and football star Bo
Jackson) that he doesn't mean it personally when he refers to "your
people," and writes a letter to the mother of the boys who died in the
explosion.  More to the point, as Adam contends in his appeal, Sam had no
choice but to be a racist because of how he was raised.  It is one of THE
CHAMBER's many bits of convenient ignorance that Adam makes his plea with
absolute earnestness, despite the fact that his own father suffered and
struggled not to turn out like Sam.
     Of course, it may be that Chris O'Donnell knew no other way to make
that speech, because earnestness is the only emotional pitch in which he
seems capable of performing.  THE CHAMBER may toss around ideas about
racism, the politics of criminal justice and corruption in high places --
all pet peeves of Grisham's, if his oeuvre is any indication -- but
ultimately it really comes down to the face-offs between Hackman and
O'Donnell, and man oh man but O'Donnell is wrestling out of his weight
class.  There may be no more inconsequential actor in American films than
Chris O'Donnell, a pretty boy who makes you want to re-evaluate Keanu
Reeves as a multi-shaded thespian.  Watching O'Donnell try to drag an
inner life out of Adam Hall is like watching a puppy try to play Macbeth.
     Then there is Gene Hackman, an actor with the ability to make you sit
through nonsense like this just for the chance to watch him do his thing.
In many of his early scenes he is simply marvelous, tearing into Adam with
the practiced disdain of a man who has spent his life figuring out why
everyone else is responsible for his own misery.  His best moment comes in
a scene where he describes to Adam the death of another inmate in the gas
chamber, the horror of his likely fate sinking in with every word.  It is
a really little more than a piece of anti-death penalty propaganda, but
Hackman sells it with such conservation of emotion that it doesn't feel as
obvious as it should.  He makes that speech a statement about the feelings
of his character, which is the mark of a superior actor:  the words he
speaks are his.
     It is a shame then that Sam is obliged to turn into just the
grandfatherly sort he mocked Adam for believing him to be.  Films about
condemned killers have been all the rage lately, but THE CHAMBER is
both the most weightless and the most subtly offensive of them all,
because it is so disingenuous in its portrayal of Sam.  As the film
progresses, it seems that we are supposed to feel sorry for Sam, a man
raised on racism who has been set up to take the fall for a crime in which
he may not have been the key participant.  At the same time, we are aware
that he murdered the father of one of his son's friends, a black man, in
cold blood.  The fact that we are expected to root for Sam to get his
appeal because he may not have committed the _particular_ murder for which
he was convicted is enough to make you shiver when you think of Sam's line
that the Klan "should have stuck to the niggers."  THE CHAMBER is a film
which poses at social consciousness, then casts a black actress (Lela
Rochon) in the female lead only to strip the character of her romantic
relationship with Adam.  Gene Hackman is interested only in making Sam
Cayhall human; THE CHAMBER wants to make him lovable, to use racism as an
incendiary plot device then shrug it off as Sam makes his last long walk,
ready to do everything but shout "Power to the people!"

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
(Universal)
Starring:  Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Kara Unger,
Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, Clancy Brown.
Screenplay:  Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on _The Sixtheenth
Round_ by Rubin "Hurricane" Carter and _Lazarus and the Hurricane_ by Sam
Chaiton and Terry Swinton.
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein, John Ketcham and Norman Jewison.
Director:  Norman Jewison.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  146 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are times when I'm watching a film and I just know it has
fallen victim the demon Expectations. Audiences expect certain things from
certain kind of films -- they expect love stories to end with a kiss, they
expect horror films to end with a jolt, they expect action films to end
with a big chase and/or a big explosion. The ebb and flow of traditional
narrative becomes part of the way people watch movies, and film-makers
know this. The familiarity is comforting; it makes it easy for people to
keep up. Scripts are structured not exactly to give the people what they
want, but to give them what they know -- which, for all practical
purposes, is the same thing.
     THE HURRICANE is a drama that follows a legal proceding, and it gives
the audience what they expect by ending with a verdict. It's also a
disappointing resolution for a story that's actually about so much more
than guilt or innocence. The subject is real-life boxer Rubin "Hurricane" 
Carter (Denzel Washington), a middleweight contender whose hard life takes
its hardest turn when he is convicted in a robbery/murder case and
sentenced to life in prison. Carter never stops insisting on his
innocence, however, and eventually turns his story into an autobiography
called _The Sixteenth Round_. That book finds its way into the hands of
Lesra (Vicellous Reon Shannon), an African-American teen learning at last
to read with the help of three Canadian social activist/guardians: Lisa
(Deborah Kara Unger), Terry (John Hannah) and Sam (Liev Schreiber). When
Lesra becomes convinced Carter has been wrongly accused, he enlists the
aid of "The Canadians" to free "The Hurricane" after nearly 20 years in
prison.
     The heart and soul of THE HURRICANE comes from the relationship
between Carter and Lesra, a relationship that begins as a pen pal
correspondence and climaxes with an emotional prison visit between the
two. Once THE HURRICANE finds that hook, it truly begins to soar. The
biographical background material, which had felt somewhat labored, starts
to flesh out a portrait of Carter's background of distrust of any force
outside himself. Denzel Washington, after a number of roles in which his
commanding presence was lost on mediocre material, turns Carter into a
character with a fascinating arc. After growing inward for years as a
defense mechanism, Carter finds himself in the dangerous position of
growing to care once again about life in the outside world. Watching him
overcome his initial suspicion of the Canadians' motives is intriguing;
watching him begin to collapse under the burden of hope is engrossing.
     That dynamic -- the tense relationships between Carter and those who
sought to help him, and how he responds to their efforts -- is what THE
HURRICANE is really about. Unfortunately, the script begins taking the
story into predictable, uninspired directions. The Canadians encounter
road blocks from reluctant would-be witnesses; they're harrassed by the
racist police detective (Dan Hedaya) who originally engineered the
frame-up. The investigation consistently suffers from a sense of
manufactured drama, as well as from the complete absence of character
development for the three Canadians (they've been compressed from nine
real-life individuals, so we can be thankful for small favors). It's
obvious we're heading for a showdown before the bench, and a series of
impassioned speeches about justice. And frankly, I didn't really care,
because I knew every minute spent on the details of the case was a minute
not spent exploring Carter as a character.
     There is far too much to like about Washington's performance -- and,
to give credit where it's due, about newcomer Shannon's performance as
well -- for THE HURRICANE not to be ultimately satisfying. The agonizing
sequence that finds Carter slowly losing his mind in solitary confinement
is a particular triumph; no other film has ever made the loneliness of
one's own thoughts seem like such a punishment. THE HURRICANE simply loses
focus on its strengths at times, wandering into familiar territory for its
emotional catharsis. In a sense, Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon deserve
kudos for finding a compelling perspective in fusing their two source
materials. It's hard not to wish that the film hadn't been more willing
to let the audience find that perspective as well.

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
SHAFT (2000)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Samuel L. Jackson, Christian Bale, Jeffrey Wright, Vanessa
Williams, Toni Collette, Busta Rhymes.
Screenplay:  Richard Price and John Singleton & Shane Salerno, based on
the novel by Ernest Tidyman.
Producers:  Scott Rudin and John Singleton.
Director:  John Singleton.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The promotional material for John Singleton's new film includes the
following copy: "Samuel L. Jackson. SHAFT. Any questions?" Assuming the
question isn't rhetorical, I'd like to pose one: Exactly why is this film
called SHAFT, anyway? The original 1971 "blaxploitation" film may look
rough and ridiculously dated to contemporary eyes -- it's hard to take
seriously any film in which the word "whitey" plays such a prominent role
-- but it was a fairly revolutionary portrayal of an African-American
anti-hero as tough, sexual and beholden to absolutely no one. The presence
of Isaac Hayes' famous theme song may tell you this is SHAFT, but is this
story the one described in those famous lyrics?
     "Who's the black private dick ..." Not this John Shaft (Samuel
L. Jackson), who is a New York police detective when the film begins,
investigating the death of a young black man outside a bar. The prime
suspect is Walter Wade Jr. (Christian Bale), who walks thanks to his rich
father's connections and spends two years hiding out in Switzerland.
Shaft is ready for him when he finally returns, but getting a conviction
will mean finding witness Diane Palmieri (Toni Collette), who has chosen
to disappear. When Wade is released on bail yet again, Shaft quits the
force and goes vigilante, attempting to locate Diane before Wade can have
her killed by drug lord Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright). And maybe his
private dick Uncle John (Richard Roundtree) can lend some support.
     " ... who's a sex machine to all the chicks ..." The 1971 original 
was an audacious film in its low-budget way, including a scene in which
Shaft (Roundtree) has sex with a white woman. It's depressing to realize
that mainstream Hollywood continues to be as timid as it ever was in
portraying the sexuality of black men. Aside from a stylized montage over
the opening credits, Jackson's Shaft is practically asexual. Where 
Roundtree's Shaft defied every easy presumption about him -- he was just
as disdainful of low-life brothers as he was of low-life honkies --
Jackson's Shaft makes use of his street connections to bring down a rich
white guy, with no visible personal life getting in the way. 
     "Who's the cat who won't cop out when there's danger all about ..." 
There's plenty of danger all about in SHAFT, with two extremely effective
villains. Bale may be radiating the same arrogant, upscale sleaze he
brought to AMERICAN PSYCHO, but he sure has nailed it. Wade is an easy
reptile to root against, as is Jeffrey Wright's intense Peoples. Some
viewers may find his performance the most outrageous Latino crime boss
parody since Pacino tore up his Cuban accent in SCARFACE. I found
something compelling and creepy about Peoples, from his manic
self-mutilation to his casual con artistry. Between the two of them, Bale
and Wright could have been the anchors of a better-than-average cop
thriller, one that didn't have a title immediately creating a different
set of expectations.
     "They say that he's a bad mutha ..." No question, Samuel L. Jackson
can be a bad mutha. His glare is as menacing as anyone's in film today,
easily making him the toughest guy to intimidate in any room. In fact,
there's so much emphasis on making him tough in a mad-as-hell way that
Jackson never captures Shaft's toughness in an I-don't-have-anything-to-
prove-to-anyone way. Throughout the film, it becomes ever more clear that
Singleton has either misunderstood what made John Shaft such an important
screen character or found himself unable to convey that same essence. He
also found himself unable to build a story that means anything, resorting
to a climax that may be intended as a triumph over the system but
ultimately renders the previous 90 minutes of action utterly pointless. 
     I can't deny that I might have felt much more positively about SHAFT
if it hadn't set itself up for comparison to an iconic film. There are
some solidly entertaining moments here, perhaps enough to satisfy viewers
with little or no awareness of the history behind the title. But there's
that title before the film, a title that just feels wrong for what follows
it on the screen.
     "Shut your mouth ..." They're just not talkin' about Shaft. And I
can't dig it.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDtv
(Universal)
Starring:  Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen
DeGeneres, Rob Reiner, Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau, Elizabeth Hurley.
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandell.
Producers:  Brian Grazer.
Director:  Ron Howard.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You'd think that the makers of EDtv could take comfort in critic
Roger Ebert's dictum that "a movie isn't about what it's about, it's _how_
it's about what it's about."  The film is, after all, facing the daunting
task of following THE TRUMAN SHOW, a brilliant satire on the cult of
personality and loss of privacy in the mass media age.  EDtv, the
filmmakers could argue, is about some of those same themes in a different
way.  This one is about why people choose to be famous, and what they give
up along the way.  Sure, like THE TRUMAN SHOW it's about a man's life
turned into 24-hour entertainment, but director Ron Howard could still
make the claim that EDtv is unique.
     And he'd be right, for all the worst possible reasons.  EDtv is a
shallow and jokey rendering of its subject, a toothless satire that fades
before the last punchline.  The titular protagonist is Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), an under-motivated and under-employed 31-year-old video
store clerk who auditions for a cable network's radical new broadcasting
concept.  True-TV's program director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres)
wants to turn a man's life into a live, un-edited "reality" program, and
good-looking Everyman Ed is her choice.  Amazingly, "EDtv" the show
becomes a must-see hit, particularly when Ed becomes romantically involved
with Shari (Jenna Elfman), the girlfriend of his brother Ray (Woody
Harrelson).  Will fame and fortune keep Ed from the chance for true love,
corrupting his values the way we all know media can?
     Hard to say, since we're not exactly to privvy to what Ed's values
were in the first place.  As played with drawling nonchalance by Matthew
McConaughey, Ed is nearly bereft of an identifiable personality.  The
closest Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel's script comes to defining Ed is
suggesting that he's basically a lazy simpleton who figures he can hit the
big time by becoming a celebrity without doing any actual work.  Trouble
is, that kind of personality wouldn't instantly endear Ed either to his
televsion audience or to us, so instead he's made a nice-guy rascal who
scratches himself jes' like reg'lar folks.  In short, he's a bore, as the
subject of a television show and the subject of a feature film.
     Even with a lackluster leading man, EDtv might have worked if there
had been any spark to its satire.  How very bizarre to watch it instead
morph into a kind of a meta-commentary on its own mass media
sentibilities.  As "EDtv" becomes a phenomenon, we watch a parade of
celebrities offer cameo commentary on Ed-mania:  Ariana Huffington, George
Plimpton, filmmaker Michael Moore, Jay Leno, Bill Maher, etc.  EDtv often
aims to score points simply by trotting out famous faces, then finds no
irony in a film about fame-for-fame's-sake which includes zingers from
RuPaul.  Even the endless series of advertisements on "EDtv" feels more
self-serving than sardonic; aside from the clever use of a Trojans ad
during one of Ed's romantic trysts, they feel like someone trying to have
his product placement cake and eat it too.
     EDtv still manages to be sporadically amusing, thanks largely to the
gag-meister sit-com style of Ganz and Mandel.  Martin Landau turns in a
sharp supporting performance as Ed's wheelchair-bound stepfather, and
Howard comes up with a couple of nicely-observed touches like the viewing
parties that pop up around Ed's first on-air sex.  In general, though, Ron
Howard is a sentimentalist with about as much edginess as a Teletubbie.
He's more interested in making EDtv a fairly generic romanctic comedy than
in digging into the reasons behind Americans' video voyeurism, or
examining how, in a post-modernist twist, our awareness of "reality"
television has made reality just as staged as drama.  In the end, EDtv
really is about the subject of mass media in its own way.  It's about how
much easier it is to let the viewers feel good than it is to tell them
what they need to hear.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2
(Paramount)
Starring:  Tom Cruise, Dougray Scott, Thandie Newton, Ving Rhames, Richard
Roxburgh, John Polson, Brendan Gleeson, Rade Sherbedgia.
Screenplay:  Robert Towne, from a story by Ronald D. Moore and Brannon
Braga.
Producers:  Tom Cruise and Paula Wagner.
Director:  John Woo.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If I didn't know any better, I'd swear Tom Cruise was trying to steal
a franchise out from under Pierce Brosnan. Take a look at MISSION: 
IMPOSSIBLE 2 for a moment, and see if the elements don't sound familiar: 
A government agent on a dangerous mission. A villain with a dastardly
plot. A beautiful romantic interest. International locations. Stunts,
action sequences and high-tech gadgetry a-plenty. The James Bond series
may be healthier than ever after the $125 million success of THE WORLD IS
NOT ENOUGH, but that doesn't mean a new kid on the block might not be
interested at taking a poke at 007's 35-year stranglehold on
espionage-as-big-budget-entertainment. Add a phenomenally talented action
director like John Woo to the mix, and maybe its time to ask Q for a
little Cruise control on the old Aston-Martin. Right?
     Not at all, as it turns out. MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 finds Cruise's
Impossible Mission Force agent Ethan Hunt called on to recover a valuable
package nabbed by renegade IMF operative Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott). To
help suss out Ambrose's plan, Hunt recruits Nyah Hall (Thandie Newton), a
professional thief who also happens to be Ambrose's ex-mistress. They
discover that the package contains the antidote to an Ebola-like super-flu
virus called Chimera,  developed by a nasty pharmaceutical company to
build demand for a cure. Re-teamed with computer expert Luther Stickell
(Ving Rhames), Hunt has only days before Ambrose threatens the world with
the plague of the 21st century.
     John Woo's last film was 1997's FACE/OFF, the latest in a long line
of films (A BETTER TOMORROW, THE KILLER) that showed the director's gift
for mixing outrageous action sequences with strong character content. 
Don't expect any such complexities from MISSION:  IMPOSSIBLE 2. Robert
Towne's script tries to provide an anchor in Hunt's relationship with
Nyah, but it materializes so instantaneously that it's impossible to give
it any weight or consequence. Dougray Scott, meanwhile, is an effectively
nasty villain, but I'll be damned if I could figure out the history
between him and Hunt that's supposed to give their tete-a-tete more sock. 
Anthony Hopkins turns up for a couple of uncredited scenes as Hunt's
vaguely menacing new superior, then disappears without any further
acknowledgement of his vague menace. And Cruise's Hunt is a great big
super-heroic enigma, just a guy who shoots and kicks and rides a pretty
mean motorcycle. Every time Woo slows things down for a moment of dramatic
significance, it's just a longer time to dwell on the fact that there
really isn't any dramatic signficance.
     And unfortunately, he slows things down for about three-quarters of
the film. MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 still could have been a great ride with
plenty of that trademark Woo action, and it gets off to a rousing start
with a sequence showcasing Hunt doing a little recreational rock-climing. 
Then the film shudders to a stop, and doesn't hit the gas again for over
an hour. Once it does get going again, it doesn't really stop until the
closing credits -- there are whiz-bang car chases, two-guns-a-blazing John
Woo shooting matches, slow-mo slugfests and bombs going off like the whole
movie was timed to the end of the "1812 Overture." It's great stuff, even
if some of the devices are a bit too familiar from Woo's other films, but
by the time it finally rolls around it's almost too late. An action film
with this much exposition better make the exposition worth our while, or
the audience will just end up wondering why it was wasting valuable action
time.
     The original 1996 MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE was nobody's idea of classic
cinema, but it did have that undeniably nerve-wracking computer room
break-in sequence to go with its high-energy finale. MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2
nods to that highlight in yet another break-in sequence, along with a nice
gag about Hunt's preferred operational style. I had hoped for more than
homage to a mediocre blockbuster from John Woo -- something with its own
show-stopping set pieces and a compelling story to boot. But ultimately,
there's no financial point to cooking up brilliant storytelling for a
franchise, because people will come no matter what the film is "about." 
That's why Brosnan, MGM and the estate of Ian Fleming can rest easy that
there will always be a market for their films, the Tom Cruises of the
world be hanged. There's enough furiously paced Woo action in the final
forty minutes to keep MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 from crashing and  burning; 
there's just not enough to make it anything special, nor enough depth to
the story to fill in the blanks between chases. Anyone who's followed
Woo's career knows he's better than this material, but maybe there's only
so much even a gifted film-maker can do with a product that's first and
foremost about a brand name. The name on the director's chair can only get
in the way.

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
GIRL, INTERRUPTED
(Columbia)
Starring:  Winona Ryder, Angelina Jolie, Whoopi Goldberg, Clea Duvall,
Brittany Murphy, Jared Leto, Jeffrey Tambor, Vanessa Redgrave.
Screenplay:  James Mangold, based on the memoir by Susanna Kaysen.
Producers:  Douglas Wick and Cathy Konrad.
Director:  James Mangold.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's time now for another chapter from Scott's Book of Cinematic Pet
Peeves. Our subject today is something I refer to as Characterization Via
Accusation. It's that annoying thing some films do in which characters'
psychological back-story is revealed not through the actions of those
characters, but through the things other characters say about them in the
middle of dramatic confrontations. It's the kind of lazy writing that can
wound even a film like AMERICAN BEAUTY, as when Ricky Fitts tells Angela
"you're ugly and you're boring ... and you know it." Film is a medium of
showing, not telling. A script full of probing psychoanalytical dialogue
is a script unable --or unwilling -- to show viewers what the characters
are all about.
     Susanna Kaysen's memoir GIRL, INTERRUPTED found the writer exploring
her 18 month experience in a psychiatric hospital with a journalistic
distance, as though she were describing the experience of another person. 
That's a restraint James Mangold's adaptation could have used a lot more
of. The film version shows us Susanna (Winona Ryder) as she is evaluated
after a possible suicide attempt as an 18-year-old in 1968. Susanna
eventually commits herself voluntarily to Claymoore Psychiatric Hospital,
where she finds herself in the company of some uniquely troubled young
women. Her roommate Georgina (Clea DuVall) is a pathological liar; Daisy
(Brittany Murphy) will only eat her father's deli chicken. And Lisa
(Angelina Jolie) ... well, Lisa's just a good old-fashioned sociopath. 
Through her experience, Susanna begins to question who she is, and how
easy it can be to be defined by others -- or even by yourself -- as crazy.
     The question of whether or not Susanna ever belonged at Claymoore was
central to the book, in chapters exploring how quickly she was diagnosed
with the vaguely-defined condition of "borderline personality disorder." 
Mangold takes the subject just a bit farther, flashing back to Susanna's
life as a morose, directionless teenager in an upper class family. The
time period itself plays a role as well, especially when symptoms of her
condition like "rebelliousness" and "sexual promiscuity" were symptoms for
a majority of her peer group in the late 1960s. GIRL, INTERRUPTED becomes
something of a coming-of-age story in which Susanna begins to realize that
her own "insanity" is an affectation compared to the much more profound
problems of her Claymoore cohort. As one nurse (Whoopi Goldberg) tells
her, her psychiatric problem may simply be that she's a "lazy,
self-indulgent little girl."
     The problem is that the nurse has to tell her -- and, by extension,
us. That's also only one of half a dozen or so scenes in which characters
begin dissecting the others by revealing their deep, dark secrets. Lisa
taunts Daisy about her relationship with her father; Susanna screams at
Lisa about her own problems; a psychiatrist (Vanessa Redgrave) tells
Susanna about why she uses the word "ambivalent." GIRL, INTERRUPTED
becomes a film all about cathartic movie moments, including a
happy-go-lucky, CUCKOO'S NEST-like outing and a chase through tunnels
beneath the hospital (a chase through tunnels?!?). Whatever points Kaysen
and Mangold might have been trying to make about the fine line between
sanity and insanity -- or about how those lines may be defined differently
for women -- are lost in tearful breakdowns and manufactured drama.
     It would be remiss of me not to mention Angelina Jolie's performance
as Lisa, the wild child who serves as the ward's alpha female. It would be
remiss not because Jolie's performance is exceptional -- showy, flashy and
fun, perhaps, though not exceptional -- but because it's a movie
performance of a real-life character. Everything in GIRL, INTERRUPTED
seems designed to be satisfying as entertainment, not to be true to
Susanna Kaysen's life or her unique perspective on that life. It's a movie
that feels always and forever like a movie. That means punch lines and
crescendos; it means Winona Ryder shouting a story better told in quieter
tones; it means one of the worst false beards in film history on Jared
Leto as Susanna's boyfriend. And it means everyone telling everyone else
how crazy they are or aren't, every character's story an open book ... or,
in this case, an open script.

Title
Review for Tigger Movie, The (2000)
     Disney has been responsible for plenty of icons of childhood over the
past 60 years, but if my son's wardrobe and stuffed animal collection are
any indication, no libretto has been kinder to Uncle Walt's Place over the
years than the works of A. A. Milne. Edward Bear (d.b.a. Winnie the Pooh) 
and friends have made Disney a mint in licensing fees, TV programs and the
like, with Pooh's roly-poly visage become the very image of cuddly
innocence. Kids adore these characters beyond measure, as befits
characters based on a real child's own beloved playthings.
     THE TIGGER MOVIE is by no stretch of the imagination an embarrassing
chapter in Disney's relationship with the Pooh gang; indeed, it's light
and generally pleasant. It just seems a shame for these characters to be
wasted on filler between Disney's _real_ animated films. The story finds
the titular bouncy, pouncy fellow (voiced by Jim Cummings) struggling a
bit with the fact that, as the song says about Tiggers, "(he's) the only
one." Convinced that there must be a Tigger family out there somewhere,
Tigger begins a search through the Hundred Acre Wood for his family tree
accompanied by a helpful Roo (Nikita Hopkins). When no family is found,
Pooh (also voiced by Cummings) and company try to help out, but a letter
they write from "Tigger's family" only ends up complicating matters
further.
     The talent involved in the creation of THE TIGGER MOVIE offered
plenty of hope that it could be plenty entertaining. Many longtime
voice participants in the Pooh universe, including original Piglet John
Fiedler, lend their gifts to the story, providing a sense of continuity
from earlier stories. Even more promising was the participation of veteran
Disney songwriters Richard and Robert Sherman, the legendary brother
tandem behind hummable hits like "The Bear Necessities," "Everybody Wants
to Be a Cat," "Supercalifragilisticexpialidocious" and even the original
"The Wonderful Thing About Tiggers." This was not the sort of interest
you'd expect to find in a cheap knock-off.
    And THE TIGGER MOVIE isn't a cheap knock-off. It just never feels
particularly inspired, or particularly true to Milne's amiable tales. The
story is simple enough, a lesson in the love one can find in a family
that doesn't necessarily involve genetic similarity or legal sanction (one
can almost hear the reactionary letters being prepared at Disney's
insouciance regarding the national security importance of the nuclear
family). Yet that's the sort of lesson-mongering one would never associate
with Pooh and company. One also wouldn't expect a story that needed to be
spiced up with a climactic avalanche to give it a sense of drama. One
certainly wouldn't expect that the Shermans' song contributions would be
such a lackluster lot, with even the most obvious effort to create a
catchy standard -- the pop culture-filled production number "Round My
Family Tree" -- falling short. For a Disney film, it sure feels a lot more
like one of the more half-hearted attempts to mimic a Disney film.
     In all fairness, it should be clear that THE TIGGER MOVIE seemed to
delight it's target audience of kindergarteners. There are even some
enjoyable moments to delight those of us who are slightly older kids,
including the perfectly pitched pessimism of Eeyore (Peter Cullen) and
Tigger's colorful way with a malaprop. It's a cute film in its way, but
there are those of us who expect more from Disney when some of its most
beloved characters are plopped into a new film. The bar is set a little
bit higher, because it's too easy to fall back on the audience's good will
towards those characters without insuring the vehicle is as tuneful,
playful and easy-going as Pooh-bear himself. THE TIGGER MOVIE isn't
bad. It just doesn't feel particularly deserving of its stars. Call me a 
sentimentalist, but I like to think of Pooh as more than just a marketable
brand-name.

Title
Review for Walking and Talking (1996)
Starring:  Catherine Keener, Anne Heche, Liev Schreiber, Todd Field, Kevin
Corrigan.
Screenplay:  Nicole Holofcener.
Director:  Nicole Holofcener.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     WALKING AND TALKING is the kind of film men generally see only if
dragged by their wives or girlfriends.  They react much the same way a
male character in WALKING AND TALKING does when he refers to the acoustic
guitar tunes preferred by his fiancee as "vagina music;" by that
definition, this would certainly be a "vagina film."  With recent flops
like NOW AND THEN and MOONLIGHT AND VALENTINO giving films about female
friendships a rather bad name, it might be easy to dismiss WALKING AND
TALKING sight unseen.  But for what it's worth, writer/director Nicole
Holofcener puts a Woody Allen spin on the genre, making her debut feature
a quirky neurotic comedy in which appealing performances help counteract
a lack of substance.
     Two life-long best friends are at the center of WALKING AND TALKING:
Laura (Anne Heche), a therapist-in-training; and Amelia (Catherine
Keener), a newspaper classified ads editor.  Now rounding the corner from
twentysomething to thirtysomething, the two women face very different
relationship troubles.  Laura has just gotten engaged to Frank (Todd
Field), but suddenly begins to notice very little flaw in his personality,
and to be attracted to other men.  Amelia, meanwhile, seems to scare off
every man she is involved with, and goes out with a scruffy video store
clerk (Kevin Corrigan) because he seems unlikely to dump her.  Through it
all, Laura and Amelia find it ever more difficult to remain close, as
growing older means walking and talking with others as well as with each
other.
     WALKING AND TALKING seems to have two major themes working at the
same time.  On the one hand, it is about the romantic relationship of our
two heroines, and it provides some clever and amusing insights.  Both
Laura and Amelia are living the life the other one seems to want -- Laura
cuts off Amelia's description of a first sexual encounter with someone,
knowing she'll never have such an encounter again, and Amelia just wants
every man to be The One.  Holofcener makes her characters sexual beings
without having it be part of the joke that a woman is a sexual being, the
way it happens in many films written by men, and there is an impressive
ease to the way in which she portrays men and women who are comfortable
with each other.  One such scene finds Laura and Frank beginning a casual
shoving match in an elevator which turns into a playful war, and it is
typical of the economy with which Holofcener establishes the dynamics of
her characters' relationships.
     Surprisingly, the one relationship which doesn't always come across
is the one which is the basis for WALKING AND TALKING's other main theme,
the friendship of Laura and Amelia.  There are plenty of signifiers which
show us how significant this friendship is -- an opening scene of Laura
and Amelia as pre-teens reading "The Joy of Sex," the illness of the cat
they shared when they were roommates -- but the signifiers don't take the
place of effective scenes between them.  It is true that the problem
between the two is that they don't spend much time together any more, but
we don't get enough opportunities to see their friendship at its best so
that we can feel a sense of loss over their friendship at its worst.
     WALKING AND TALKING is not exactly meaty fare in either of its two
main themes, but what sells the film is its frisky tone and a cast which
downplays the angst.  Catherine Keener (who was the insecure ingenue in
LIVING IN OBLIVION) is a delight as Amelia, and keeps her borderline
obsessiveness from becoming either pathetic or disturbing.  It's a funny
and sad performance as a woman having difficulty differentiating between
needing and needy.  She also has two great co-stars to play off in Kevin
Corrigan as Bill, the quiet video store clerk with an excessive fondness
for horror films, and Liev Schrieber as Amelia's ex-boyfriend-now-friend
Andy.  Keener has an ability to connect with other actors, to really seem
to be listening, and that makes for some priceless interactions.  Anne
Heche is a weaker link in a weaker role; her Laura's predicaments never
seem as urgent to her or to us.
     Nicole Holofcener's script might be a bit talky, but the talk is
sharp and the talkers even sharper.  Forget labels like "chick film."
This one talks the talk _and_ walks the walk.

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
     Perspective is a curious matter.  Take the question of the Vietnam
War, for example.  The conventional wisdom runs that the United States
lost the conflict when troops were withdrawn before the fall of Saigon.
For those of you laboring under the misapprehension that that was the end
of the story, Tony Bui's THREE SEASONS shows us a modern-day Saigon in the
full bloom of capitalism; in the ideological long run, you might say the
war was won after all.  Sometimes, a thing is entirely how you look at it
rather than the thing itself.  Even in the mind, style can triumph over
substance.
     There is an abundance of style on display in THREE SEASONS, enough to
cloak its lapses in substance.  The narrative consists of four largely
independent stories of life in modern Saigon.  In one, a young woman named
Kien An (Nguyen Ngoc Hiep) goes to work at a lotus farm, and becomes
intrigued with the reasons behind the reclusiveness of her employer (Tran
Manh Cuong).  Another finds cyclo-cab driver Hai (Don Duong) becoming
infatuated with local prostitute Lan (Zoe Bui), and intent on serving as
her knight in shining armor.  The third involves a street urchin and
trinket seller named Woody (Nguyen Huu Duoc) on a quest for the suitcase
full of goods he lost in a bar.  Meanwhile, American Vietnam War veteran
James Hager (Harvey Keitel) searches for the daughter he left behind.
     Visually, THREE SEASONS is a remarkably assured piece of film-making,
using the contrasts of ancient, war-time and modern Vietnam to perfection.
In the picturesque countryside, delicate wooden bridges share the
landscape with neon advertising signs; in the city, the war's terrible
legacy has been turned into an opportunity for a theme bar (characters in
the film frequent the "Apocalypse Now Cafe").  Cinematographer Lisa
Rinzler captures flower-showered streets and lotus gardens with a warm
glow, helping make THREE SEASONS an often enchanting tone poem on the
conflicts inherent in introducing the contemporary into the conventional.
     As a narrative, it's considerably more inconsistent, as one might
expect from the multiple independent story-lines.  By far the most
effective is the tale of cyclo driver Hai, given the strongest emotional
and thematic pull by Don Duong's exceptional performance.  At its core his
is a tried-and-true hooker with a heart of gold story, yet something in
Duong's manner makes the cliche more resonant, his attempts to "save" Lan
more ennobling than predictable.  Each of the other tales has its moments,
but they come more sporadically.  Keitel's American perspective feels
particularly intrusive, almost like a sop to American audiences; what's
more, it adds a title-confounding fourth story to the three seasons.
Though THREE SEASONS rarely inspires seat-shifting, it's never as engaging
as it is when the focus is on Hai.
     Still, the stories do ultimately come together as tales of healing,
of reconciling Vietnam's troubled past with its challenging present and
future.  As the first American production shot in Vietnam since the war,
it's also an often-compelling cultural document.  There's little doubt
that THREE SEASONS feels somehow more "significant" because it is so
gracefully and beautifully composed, but that's hardly a cause for
consternation.  If it pushes plenty of the right aesthetic buttons, that
only proves that glamour can change one's perspective, as it clearly has
in a post-war Saigon where Coke adds life.

Title
Review for Fly Away Home (1996)
     You will not find many family films which radiate the fundamental
warmth and decency that FLY AWAY HOME does, and somehow that makes it more
disappointing that it is not a better film.  It is a story with an
agreeably casual demeanor, positive messages to spare, and virtually
nothing which could give offense (except for a pair of gratuitous
profanities included in a calculated effort to avoid a "G" rating).  Yet
FLY AWAY HOME rarely manages to make the leap from agreeable to genuinely
involving.  In an era where most films seem to be striving to deafen you,
FLY AWAY HOME is a film so soft-spoken it may cause a run on the theater's
assisted listening devices.
     Based on a true story, FLY AWAY HOME tells of 13-year-old Amy Alden
(Anna Paquin), a child of divorce who returns to live in Ontario with her
father Tom (Jeff Daniels) after the death of her mother.  The two have
trouble re-connecting after a decade apart, leaving Amy rather lonely.
She finds unexpected companionship after she discovers a goose nest
orphaned after a tractor plows through, and she cares for the eggs until
they hatch.  The result is a dozen goslings who imprint on Amy, believing
her to be their mother.  The problem is that the geese will need someone
to teach them their southward migration route, leading artist and inventor
Tom to consider a unique solution:  teach Amy to fly an ultra-light
aircraft so that she can guide her geese to their winter home in North
Carolina.
     I don't think that anyone will argue that the first half of FLY AWAY
HOME is not simply lovely.  Director Carroll Ballard (THE BLACK STALLION)
inspires confidence in where he is likely to take us with a a credit
sequence in which the car accident which claims the life of Amy's mother
(after this film and BOGUS in consecutive weeks, will any child be willing
to let his mother drive again?) is given a mournful weight.  The sparkling
cinematography, by the gifted Caleb Deschanel, and Mark Isham's
multi-faceted score contribute to the charming scenes of Amy bonding with
her flock, and clever low-angle shots make them more comical.
     As sweet and unassuming as those scenes are, it soon becomes clear
that there isn't much going on beneath the surface of FLY AWAY HOME.  On
the one hand, it is refreshing that we are not beaten over the head with
the metaphorical significance of Amy's attachment to her avian orphans, or
with weepy professions of father-daughter love after the obligatory period
of estrangement.  On the other hand, Robert Rodat and Vince McKewen don't
give their characters enough substance, and the nominal family drama of
FLY AWAY home is muted by the absence of enough early scenes showing us
Amy's difficulty adjusting to her new circumstances.  Amy tells us that
school was terrible, but we don't see her experiencing any troubles; Tom
pays little attention to her, but we don't see how that affects her.  Jeff
Daniels, Dana Delany (as Tom's girlfriend) and Terry Kinney (as Tom's
brother) all do perfectly nice work, but the characters lack spark, and
the story lacks the drama to accommodate their one-dimensional benevolence.
It is almost as though Anna Paquin, still possessing the spooky detachment
of THE PIANO even with the nose ring she sports in the film's second half,
infects the entire production with her preternatural serenity.
     The first half of the film does include a nominal villain, a fish and
game warden (Jeremy Ratchford) who is made into a nastier character than
he needed to be when he threatens the geese with pinioning; the second
half tries to make up for the lack of conflict by including a handful of
potential heavies, including sport hunters, real estate developers, and
even the U. S. military.  There are some fanciful moments during that
flight, including Amy's late-night surprise at a military airfield, but
other episodes serve little purpose, and the film drags a bit as it
approaches its conclusion.  None of this is likely to matter tremendously
to young viewers, who will enjoy the adorable geese, and their parents,
who will welcome the fundamental warmth and decency which they haven't
seen nearly enough of.  I just couldn't help wishing that FLY AWAY HOME,
although it was based on a true story, had been pitched a bit less like a
matter-of-fact documentary and allowed the conflict between Amy and Tom to
matter a bit more.  On the one occasion where Amy actually raises her
voice, it is quite startling.  Perhaps a few more voices could have been
raised.

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
THREE TO TANGO
(Warner Bros./Village Roadshow)
Starring:  Matthew Perry, Neve Campbell, Dylan McDermott, Oliver Platt.
Screenplay:  Rodney Vaccaro and Aline Brosh McKenna.
Producers:  Bobby Newmyer, Jeffrey Silver and Bettina Sofia Viviano.
Director:  Damon Santostefano.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  99 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If I had to pick a "Friends" cast member to star in a feature film --
not contribute, mind you, but star -- I'd pick Matthew Perry.  That may
seem a fairly faint praise, since -- Courtney Cox's contribution to two
SCREAM ensembles notwithstanding -- the six small screen compadres haven't
exactly burned up the big screen.  Each has his or her appeal, but Perry
is more well-suited to carrying a mainstream comedy.  He's got charm, he's
got comic timing ... he's got most of what you need to give an audience
good-natured entertainment.
     He does not, however, have the right stuff for a variation on
TOOTSIE, especially one as ineffectual as THREE TO TANGO.  That's the
essence of this romantic comedy that casts Perry as Chicago architect
Oscar Novak.  Oscar and his business partner Peter (Oliver Platt) are up
for a huge contract, a cultural center financed by tycoon Charles Newman
(Dylan McDermott).  When Charles asks Oscar to keep tabs on his mistress
Amy (Neve Campbell), Oscar quickly agrees, believing his assistance may
give an edge to his firm.  He doesn't realize until it's too late that
Charles only gave him the assignment because he believes Oscar is
gay.  That complication only gets more complicated when Oscar, obliged to
keep playing the part, starts to fall for Amy, who also believes he's gay.
     THREE TO TANGO is framed, like TOOTSIE, as the story of a man who
learns something about himself by pretending to be something he's
not.  There are the expected farcical elements -- the amused reactions of
those who really know Oscar; the awkward and unwanted attentions of a
would-be suitor; a confusing night in bed with the woman friend --
delivered in a functionally chuckle-inspiring manner.  And maybe THREE TO
TANGO could have had a little spark, if there were actually anything for
Oscar to learn.  At the outset, he's a chronically nervous sweetheart with
relationship hard luck -- effective for creating a sympathetic
protagonist, but useless on a narrative level.  Imagine Oscar as a
womanizing homophobe forced to pose as a gay man, and think of how much
more robust a farce it could have been.
     Of course, such an angle is too potentially alienating for Hollywood,
in addition to being all wrong for Matthew Perry.  Misconceptions about
Chandler's sexual orientation were a running gag on "Friends" for years,
which would make Perry seem perfect for the role.  Indeed, he does a great
frustration take, and his winning smile makes it easy to root for him to
get the girl.  Perry is almost warm and engaging enough to make THREE TO
TANGO watchable through the sheer appeal of his personality, but he's
still entirely wrong for the part.  Actually, he's right for the part as
written, which is pleasant and non-threatening.  It's the part that's
wrong for the movie.  The anger and bitterness of Dustin Hoffman's Michael
Dorsey gave TOOTSIE its trans-gender kick.  Because niceness is always
Oscar's defining quality, THREE TO TANGO never had a chance at being
anything but sporadically nice.
     And it's only sporadically nice, since Perry gets little help from
his castmates.  Platt is quickly becoming cinema's most reliable second
banana, but he doesn't get much to work with.  McDermott plays a
generically icy corporate shark, and he has even less to work with.  Then
there's Neve Campbell, whose appeal frankly baffles me.  As the
free-spirited artist and object of Oscar's affections, she's all affected,
unconvincing effervescence.  There's a superficial topicality to the
film's themes, but it's really the sort of pure froth that lives or dies
on the basis of its romantic pairing.  If you're able to smile along with
Oscar and Amy's sit-complicated courtship, more power to you.  I could
only smile along with Perry, whose self-deprecating nice guy screen
presence deserves a much better vehicle -- preferably one where it makes
sense for the protagonist to be a self-deprecating nice guy.

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
      Rowan Atkinson is the most gifted and versatile comic performer in
the English-speaking world, and I only qualify the statement that much for
fear of appearing more cosmopolitan than I am.  No one is as equally deft
at delivering withering insults (see the various incarnations of his
"Black Adder" character) and performing priceless, wordless physical
comedy (see the television episodes of "Mr. Bean").  As both a jokester
and a classic clown, he is unrivaled.  That most Americans know him best
-- if at all -- as FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL's malapropping priest is a
problem in serious need of correction.
     I'm not sure the film version of BEAN is going to do it.  Atkinson's
Mr. Bean is a marvelous comic creation -- a gangly, goggle-eyed maladroit
with the mischievous self-absorption of an adolescent and the one-size-too
small brown suit to match.  In the vignettes which comprise Bean's
television adventures (seen in America on HBO and public television), plot
is never permitted to intrude on the pursuit of a hilarious bit of
pantomime.  Launched from a simple situation into wild flights of humor,
Bean's actions _are_ the plot of a "Mr. Bean" episode.
     BEAN the movie makes the critical error of jamming Bean into the same
tired, conventional premise which as served as the vehicle for a hundred
unconventional comedians.  To wit:  Bean, an inept employee at London's
National Gallery, is shipped to the States by superiors who are only too
glad to be rid of him.  David Langley (Peter MacNicol), the curator of a
prestigious Los Angeles gallery, is expecting a brilliant scholar to
preside over the unveiling of "Whistler's Mother."  He is not expecting
the man who promptly begins wrecking his home, his family life and his
job.  Can you say "fish out of water?"
     Atkinson deserves better.  When he's allowed to do his thing, he is a
genius.  There are a few brilliant Bean moments in BEAN:  the opening
sequence which finds him shaving every exposed surface on his head; a
super-charged ride on an amusement park motion simulator; Bean pushing a
draped painting through a hallway as though it were a gurney.  The
situations set up by Richard Curtis and Robin Driscoll aren't really the
problem in BEAN.  It's director Mel Smith who misses the point that "Mr.
Bean" isn't about other people reacting to Bean's absurd antics; it's
about Bean responding to his own absurd antics.  MacNicol, Harris Yulin
and the rest of the supporting players are asked to play straight men to
Atkinson, who doesn't need them.  He's a one-man comedy team.
     In one sense, I'm being a bit more harsh than BEAN deserves, because
it's still more entertaining than most Hollywood comedies.  Atkinson is
too energetic a performer to allow BEAN to drift into unwatchability,
making for a film which will provide audiences with plenty of satisfying
laughs.  But I can't help cringing at all the miscalculations that went
into BEAN, most notably the sentimental message which becomes
unnecessarily obtrusive.  After speaking fewer than a dozen words through
most of the film, Bean cuts loose with a heart-felt speech which proves he
has learned a valuable lesson on his trip to America.  Mr. Bean growing as
a character?  Stuff and nonsense.  I'd much rather that the makers of BEAN
learned the lesson and produce a BEAN film deserving of the name, one
which doesn't suffer from forced attempts at creating a feature length
narrative.  Let Bean wreak his merry havoc.  Let his beloved Teddy have
more than a token cameo appearance.  Let Rowan Atkinson show the world
that he's one of the funniest men alive.  Everyone will be happier when he
does.

Title
Review for Grace of My Heart (1996)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Illeana Douglas, John Turturro, Matt Dillon, Eric Stoltz, Bruce
Davison, Patsy Kensit, Jennifer Leigh Warren.
Screenplay:  Allison Anders.
Producers:  Ruth Charny, Daniel Hassid.
Director:  Allison Anders.
Running Time:  115 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations, drug use)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I have this idea that what happened to GRACE OF MY HEART -- a good
movie which flirts with being a great one -- is that Allison Anders wrote
herself into a corner.  She created a story based in part on a pattern of
behavior, resulting in a structure which becomes repetitious; she has also
made a period piece filled with thinly disguised counterparts for music
industry figures of the 50s and 60s, resulting in a guessing game which
becomes distracting.  GRACE OF MY HEART has a superb character study at
its core, made even more appealing by the top-notch work of Illeana
Douglas, and that makes it a disappointment that Allison Anders has
surrounded that character with so many elements which draw attention away
from her.
     GRACE OF MY HEART opens in 1958, where Edna Buxton (Douglas), a
well-heeled young woman from Philadelphia, dreams of being a singer and
songwriter.  She thinks that she is headed for the big time after winning
a talent contest, but she finds the going tough in New York until she is
offered an opportunity by producer Joel Milner (John Turturro) to write
singles for other artists.  Though she wants to sing her own material, she
agrees to Joel's terms as a way into the industry, and even to his
suggestion that she change her name to Denise Waverly.  The newly
christened Denise begins to churn out the hits in the legendary Brill
Building, and soon gets involved with another one of Joel's writers,
Howard Caszatt (Eric Stoltz).  The relationship is as uneven as her
professional success, however, and Denise finds herself on a decade long
journey of discovery culminating in a marriage to surf music legend Jay
Phillips (Matt Dillon).
     On one level, GRACE OF MY HEART operates simply as a travelogue
through an era in American popular music, and there are some extremely
entertaining moments integrated into that travelogue.  Denise clearly is
modeled after Carol King, and it is interesting to note that her inability
to break in initially as a singer was based largely on the prevailing
notion that female vocalists were "out."  There is also a hilarious bit
involving Bridget Fonda as a Lesley Gore-type singer whose unconventional
lifestyle inspires Denise and her partner Cheryl (Patsy Kensit) to write
her a song about a "secret love;" the songs -- originals by Los Lobos,
David Baerwald and Elvis Costello, among others -- are generally true to
the period, making for a rich background of sound.  Yet there are moments
when the setting and the inspired-by characters feel forced.  Anders draws
too much attention to supporting players by asking you to chuckle at what
she is able to suggest about Gore, Phil Spector and others without
actually saying so, and it becomes a tail which wags the dog.
     That is particularly true where Matt Dillon's character is concerned,
a disturbed genius a la Beach Boy Brian Wilson.  Dillon's performance is
too sleepy to be involving even as Jay becomes more and more paranoid and
depressed, and we are left to watch him play the way Wilson might have
been without understanding why we should care.  It is a long,
patience-testing episode, and it is particularly frustrating coming at the
tail end of a string of relationship episodes in which Denise falls hard
for a guy who turns out to be more trouble than he is worth.
     Still, I was generally willing to indulge Anders, because I could see
where it all was leading.  She introduces Edna as a child of an extremely
traditional upbringing, with a mother (Christina Pickles) who is more
concerned that her daughter look and sound respectable at the talent
contest than that she express herself.  GRACE OF MY HEART is a film about
the struggle for a woman to find her own voice after being conditioned to
believe that it is more important for her to subsume her own desires and
talent to the desires of the men in her life.  It is sometimes aggravating
to watch Edna/Denise make the same mistake over and over, but that is
exactly the problem she is forced to come to terms with and it pays off in
impassioned moments when she finally does let her own feelings soar
(notably in her songs, with vocal provided by Kristen Vigard).  Illeana
Douglas is fantastic as a woman who is both strong and weak, and her
unique looks somehow make her even more believable as someone forced to
linger in the background longer than her talent warrants.  I wanted to
stick with her through her story, and it remained worth the effort even
after Anders gets sidetracked.  GRACE OF MY HEART is a film with built-in
flaws, but they can be overlooked for a chance to watch a woman find the
grace in her own heart.

Title
Review for Castle, The (1997/I)
     THE CASTLE is the kind of comedy that never could have been made in
Hollywood.  Scratch that -- it could have been made in Hollywood, but it
would have been a disaster.  The use of a voice-over narrator would have
turned into a crutch instead of a source of inspired brilliance.  The
working class characters might have been either salt-of-the-earth or
grotesque, but never the perfect blend of both.  The tale of a little guy
fighting the system would have been wrapped up by a wildly cheering
courtroom gallery, instead of a delightfully profane two-word summation.
And the neat and tidy 82-minute running time would have been bloated by
another 15 or 20 minutes.  Thank the gods of cinema that THE CASTLE was
made in Australia, where director/co-screenwriter Rob Sitch has turned the
1997 Aussie smash into the brightest, most raucous comedy to hit America
in 1999.
     The protagonist of THE CASTLE is Darryl Kerrigan (Michael Caton), tow
truck driver and proud owner of a house at 3 Highview Crescent on the
outskirts of Melbourne with his wife Sal (Anne Tenney) and sons Steve
(Anthony Simcoe) and Dale (Stephen Curry).  It matters little to Darryl
that the house is built on landfill next to the airport -- it's his home,
his pride and joy, his castle.  He's appalled to discover that the
government plans a forced relocation of the Kerrigans and their neighbors
to make way for an airport expansion.  Darryl, however, isn't going to
give up his castle without a fight, and launches a challenge -- legal and
otherwise -- that goes all the way to the Australian Supreme Court.
     It's no small task to laugh _with_ a collection of characters and
laugh _at_ them at the same time, but that's exactly what Sitch and his
three co-writers have accomplished.  In America, the Kerrigans would be
referred to as "white trash" -- dog pens in the back yard, a huge aerial
antenna on the roof, unsightly additions cobbled together when time
permits, a son (Wayne Hope) in jail.  Sitch turns the smiling bad taste of
the Kerrigans into perfectly-pitched comedy.  Making ideal use of Stephen
Curry's flat narration as Dale, the film-makers show us a family of simple
people who think they're living a life of royalty where beer steins are
high art and a meat loaf is a meal fit for a king.
     Yet it is exactly that skewed perspective that makes THE CASTLE so
endearing even as it sends you rolling on the floor with laughter.
Michael Caton's pitch-perfect performance as Darryl is a portrait of
brighter-side-looking that re-defines the term.  There's a beautiful
sincerity to the way he looks with awe on the combination hose/scrub brush
created by "idea man" Steve, to his love for the family's pre-fabricated
vacation home at a less-than-picturesque lake, to his simple speech at his
daughter's wedding.  It's a performance so warm that anyone who might look
condescendingly at the Kerrigans should feel ashamed.  A man's love for
what he has -- rather than envy of what he doesn't have -- has rarely felt
this genuine.
      Of course THE CASTLE is also a David vs. Goliath story, pitting
Darryl against the Big Corporation assisted first by a small-time attorney
(Tiriel Mora), then by a veteran barrister (Charles "Bud" Tingwell) moved
by Darryl's plight.  Yet the film is never really about that battle in the
way that you'd expect.  There are some marvelous comic moments as Darryl
takes on his adversaries, but the richness of THE CASTLE comes from the
fact that his victory is one of perspective even before a verdict is read.
Sure, in some ways it's a one-joke film, and perhaps some viewers will
grow weary of that one joke.  It just happens to be a joke told with the
kind of skill we just don't see very often.  An audience trained what to
expect from comedies by Hollywood will find expectations in this Down
Under comedy turned -- most appropriately -- upside-down.

Title
Review for My Fellow Americans (1996)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Jack Lemmon, James Garner, Dan Aykroyd, John Heard, Wilford
Brimley, Everett McGill.
Screenplay:  E. Jack Kaplan & Richard Chapman and Peter Tolan.
Producer:  Jon Peters.
Director:  Peter Segal.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     MY FELLOW AMERICANS is a buddy comedy.  It is a bickering buddy
comedy.  It is a bickering-buddies-on-the-road comedy.  In short, MY
FELLOW AMERICANS has about as generic a basic premise as there is in
Hollywood.  So how does it end up so improbably entertaining?  Because
when it comes to film-making, story isn't even half the story -- execution
is king.  MY FELLOW AMERICANS uses the familiar plot as a starting point,
adds a script with just enough lively turns, and casts two consummate
professionals in the lead roles.  The result is a simple but engaging
studio comedy, energized by the wonderful pairing of Jack Lemmon and James
Garner.
     Lemmon plays Russell Kramer, a one-term Republican president now
spending his retirement giving speeches at corporate luncheons and writing
cookbooks; Garner plays Matt Douglas, Kramer's Democratic successor and
long-time adversary.  Three years after losing to Kramer's one-time V.P.
Bill Haney (Dan Aykroyd), Douglas finds himself with another shot when a
scandal prepares to break involving a kickback to the Kramer-Haney
administration.  The party's support awaits Douglas if he can get evidence
to nail his old foe, but Kramer is equally keen to prove he knew nothing
about the deal.  Both men discover that the plot is thicker than they
realized when a key witness turns up dead, and a helicopter they were
supposed to be on blows up over North Carolina.  With no one they can
trust but each other, the two ex-presidents make their way towards
Kramer's presidential library in Ohio for evidence implicating Haney and
find that only a bi-partisan effort will get them there alive.
     You're going to see a lot of critics referring to MY FELLOW AMERICANS
as GRUMPY OLD PRESIDENTS, and it's not just because Jack Lemmon is on
board that comparisons to the GRUMPY OLD... films are appropriate.  The
most notable similarity is that MY FELLOW AMERICANS also bases much of its
humor on the notion that senior citizens spewing forth profanities are
intrinsically hilarious; no fewer than nineteen separate expletives season
the dialogue of Lemmon and Garner.  It is an unfortunate decision, if for
no other reason than that it is unnecessary.  Political rivals should have
more personalized gibes at their disposal, and indeed the script features
a few nice zingers aimed at the stereotypes of each party.  It would have
been nice to see more -- and more pointed -- barbs, particularly like
those aimed at Haney's dim-witted vice-president (John Heard), whose
mispronunciation of a single word may provide the film's biggest laugh.
     Insult humor only goes as far as the slingers of the insults, though,
and MY FELLOW AMERICANS rises well above its material simply because
Lemmon and Garner bring out the best in each other.  Lemmon's Kramer is
the more complete character, a politician who so desperately needs
approval that he has become an over-eager joke.  While Kramer is the guy
you can be sure promised everything to everybody, Garner's Douglas is the
charismatic charmer who probably didn't have to.  Garner has long been one
of the best actors around at playing the put-upon grouch, and it is a
delight simply to see him in a leading role on the big screen again.  When
he growls out a withering one-liner in his gravelly baritone, it is
delivered with unteachable timing, and Lemmon matches him with his best
Felix Unger disdain.  The two are both perfectly matched and perfectly
mis-matched; there is something about their veteran interaction which
makes the most mundane situations sing with comic confidence.
     Director Peter Segal (who put Chris Farley and David Spade through
similar buddy-bonding paces in TOMMY BOY) keeps the pace at a brisk clip,
which counters some uninspired situations, like a journey on a University
of North Carolina rooters train which provides little more than something
to jump off.  There isn't much Segal can do with the sentimental angle in
the script, as the ex-presidents' encounter with an average American
family leads them to ask the "Duh"-inspiring question of whether 
politicians may be out of touch with their constituents.  All these
problems MY FELLOW AMERICANS has, yet I laughed harder than I had any
reason to expect.  Handed the sow's ear of a standard buddy-caper script,
Jack Lemmon and James Garner were able to turn it into a purse...perhaps
not silk, but surprisingly smooth nonetheless.

Title
Review for Feeling Minnesota (1996)
Starring:  Keanu Reeves, Vincent D'Onofrio, Cameron Diaz, Dan Aykroyd,
Delroy Lindo.
Screenplay:  Steven Baigelman.
Director:  Steven Baigelman.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I can't recall a previous film experience where the fairly good time
I was having turned as sour as quickly as it did during FEELING MINNESOTA.
For forty minutes or so, I was lured into a loopy if occasionally
over-wrought romantic comedy, and I was even giving Keanu Reeves the
benefit of the doubt.  Then, rather suddenly, I was clubbed over the head
with a nasty bit of violence; shortly thereafter, I was whacked in the gut
by another.  FEELING MINNESOTA is a film that made me feel violated, as
though I had trusted writer-director Steven Baigelman to bring me a cool
glass of water and instead he threw acid in my face.
     FEELING MINNESOTA tells the story of a topless dancer named Freddie
(Cameron Diaz) who finds herself in deep trouble when her boss Red (Delroy
Lindo) suspects her of stealing from him.  Red's punishment is to force
Freddie to marry his bookkeeper, Sam Clayton (Vincent D'Onofrio), who is
far from the man of Freddie's dreams.  Enter Jjaks (Keanu Reeves), Sam's
estranged younger brother, who arrives at the wedding just in time to
catch Freddie's eye and have sex with her in the bathroom.  United in
their mutual attraction and their mutual loathing of Sam, Jjaks and
Freddie take off together, but Sam isn't ready to let them go without a
fight.  Freddie, meanwhile, isn't ready to let Sam's money go without a
fight, and thus begins a series of violent confrontations.
     There is both style and substance to the beginning of FEELING
MINNESOTA, as Baigelman opens with an effective montage showing Jjaks and
Sam's intense sibling rivalry as boys, and their mother (Tuesday Weld)
sending Jjaks away to live with his father.  It does a great job of
setting up Jjaks' unstable life, a life which has landed him in trouble
for petty crimes and always trying to please his family; Reeves' wounded
look is just right for Jjaks.  The wedding sequence includes a number of
nice moments, most notably the aforementioned bathroom scene in which a
simple question is given a very funny spin.  Most important, Baigelman
begins to establish the connection between Freddie and Jjaks with humor
and economy, as in a scene where they both spontaneously begin singing
along to the Replacements' "I Will Dare" on the car radio.  You would have
every reason to expect that relationships -- both familial and romantic --
would be the focal point of FEELING MINNESOTA.  Unfortunately, you would
be dead wrong.
     I suppose I should have expected daisies and valentines after an
early scene in which Red threatens Freddie as she tries to avoid the
wedding, but I certainly didn't expect what I got.  What I got was yet
another in a long line of recent films trying to ride the Tarantino wave
by mixing gags and brutality, or rather creating gags about brutality.
Suddenly, the story of romantic entanglements and family conflict becomes
a story about a corpse, and everything which had come before degenerates
so completely that virtually nothing is recognizable.  The sibling rivalry
not only becomes little more than an excuse for one round of beatings
after another, but there is no consistency to the characterizations.
Vincent D'Onofrio turns in a manic performance as Sam, whose jealousy,
competitiveness and apparent sense of inferiority seem far more in keeping
with what we know about Jjaks, while Reeves turns into a framed hero too
reminiscent of CHAIN REACTION, and both of them spend most of the second
half of the film screaming and covered in blood.
     There are films which have managed to employ a radical shift in tone
successfully (Jonathan Demme's SOMETHING WILD and Neil Jordan's THE CRYING
GAME come to mind), but they didn't try to draw an audience with the
promise of relatively innocuous entertainment.  I don't want to dismiss
Baigelman's successes out of hand -- he gets a fun performance out of Dan
Aykroyd as a crooked cop, and some well-crafted comic moments -- and it is
not his fault that Fine Line has chosen to promote FEELING MINNESOTA as a
light-hearted caper.  It _is_ his fault that he violates his own
characters for the sake of shock value, and that he can't make his two
halves into a whole.  FEELING MINNESOTA left me feeling used, and there's
not much funny about that.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
Starring:  Kurt Russell, James Spader, Jaye Davidson.
Screenplay:  Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich.
Director:  Roland Emmerich.
     STARGATE is a movie from out of a time warp, and I'm not just
talking about the plot.  The late 70s and early 80s were the heyday of
grand scale science fiction/fantasy epics, both on the big screen and
the small screen, produced to cash in on the success of the STAR WARS
trilogy.  STARGATE feels a lot like many of those films:  overblown,
underwritten, yet still moderately entertaining.  Perhaps it was the
sense of nostalgia it inspired in me, but STARGATE offered just enough
to keep me interested, despite all of its bombast and unfulfilled
promise.
     STARGATE opens in Egypt in 1928, where an archaeological team
discovers a massive artifact.  Flash forward to the present, where the
military is studying the object, and brings in radical young
Egyptologist Dr. Daniel Jackson (James Spader) to help decipher its
hieroglyphs.  He is successful, and discovers that the artifact is a
gateway to a distant star system.  An advance team of soldiers is sent
to find out what's on the other side of the stargate, let by Col. Jack
O'Neil (Kurt Russell) and including Dr. Jackson.  There they discover a
thriving civilization of what appear to be humans, living much as they
would have lived in the Egypt of the pharaohs.  They also discover that
the world is ruled by a being called Ra (Jaye Davidson), who appears to
be anything but benevolent.
     For the first half hour, STARGATE seems to be pretty comfortably
on the right track, with a solid premise.  Spader in particular is
quite appealing, playing the perfect slightly dazed academic; the early
scenes in which he shows up the military scientists are low-key and
quite a lot of fun.  In fact, for all its $50 million scale, Spader may
be the best thing STARGATE has going for it.  Unfortunately, he makes
Kurt Russell look like a large piece of plywood by comparison.  Playing
a man shattered by the death of his young son, Russell is supposed to
be taciturn and all business; instead, he's just a huge dullard without
a scrap of personality, and it's impossible to care anything about
him.  As such he fits right in with the rest of the advance team, an
interchangeable collection of macho grunts.
     Once we get to the other side of the stargate, things are still
wildly uneven, and we're not even talking about those plausibility
questions that plague most science fiction fare.  The real issue is
that as good as STARGATE looks, it's awfully slow-moving.  The sets and
costume design are impressive, and even the desert sandscapes have a
certain beauty to them.  But STARGATE falls victim to its attempts at
creating a fully-realized alternative civilization.  It's a nice touch
that they don't speak the "miracle English" common to alien
civilizations, but it makes the soldiers' interactions with them
extremely tedious.  The fascination of some of the younger ones with
the human aliens is believable, but a scene involving one of them
reacting to Kurt Russell's lighter as magic is as old as the hills.
It's as though director and co-scripter Roland Emmerich paid so much
attention to cultural detail that he missed the big picture--providing
a truly engaging story.
     The climax of STARGATE is a major improvement, full of energy and
creativity.  It's a shame that Jaye Davidson's Ra is such a boring
villain, gliding along through the ship making imperious pronouncements
in a voice bearing a frightening similarity to that of Jabba the Hut.
There is really very little in Ra's role except ordering guards around,
so the threat isn't nearly as threatening as it might be.  The bottom
line, though, is that even as I was thinking about how ridiculous some
of the resolutions were (including final decisions made by both
Russell's and Spader's characters), I realized that I had enjoyed
myself.  And for a matinee price, I generally don't ask for much more.

Title
Review for Home of Our Own, A (1993)
     If you want big emotions, you want Steven Spielberg; if it's
understated sentimentality you're looking for, you call Tony Bill.
From 1980's MY BODYGUARD through the recent UNTAMED HEART, Bill has
demonstrated a skill with emotional stories that steer clear of maudlin
excess.  As one who enjoys feeling without feeling manipulated, I find
that a pretty neat trick.  A HOME OF OUR OWN is an extremely appealing
low-key family drama, driven by Kathy Bates' rock-solid lead
performance, which adds to Bill's growing resume of restrained
character pieces.
     Bates plays Frances Lacey, a hard-working widow trying to raise
six children alone in 1962.  After losing a job in a potato chip plant,
Frances decides to move the family from Los Angeles, much to the dismay
of oldest son Shane (Edward Furlong).  They set out with no specific
destination and virtually no money, winding up in rural Idaho.  There
she spots an unfinished house owned by Mr. Moon (Soon-Teck Oh) and
manages to barter chores for the opportunity to live in and repair it.
She takes a job at a local bowling alley, and slowly but surely begins
working towards her dream of settling her family into a life with some
kind of future in a home of their own.
     A HOME OF OUR OWN plays a lot like an impoverished "Wonder Years,"
with its 1960s setting and wry retrospective narration, but unlike that
series the voice-over is rarely intrusive and doesn't draw the focus
away from Frances.  As played by Kathy Bates, Frances is the heart and
soul of the family and the film, a woman so determined to make it on
her own terms that she occasionally loses sight of what's best for her
children.  Bates is near perfect, a presence that commands respect; one
is hard-pressed to think of another actor who would be as convincing as
a sane mother of six.  Her slightly weathered features convey years of
struggle, but she maintains an earthy good humor and a relentless
optimism borne of necessity.
     That Kathy Bates gives a great performance can't be considered
much of a surprise.  What is a pleasant surprise is A HOME OF OUR OWN's
realistic portrayal of family life in hardship.  With the exception of
Edward Furlong, the Lacey children are played by first-time actors, and
they are quite natural.  Scenes are filled with petty squabbles, but
beneath them all is a kind of solidarity which never seems
mock-heroic.  There is a level of love and mutual respect in the
interaction which frankly threw me.  It's not often that a movie does
an American family this kind of justice.
     Like most of Tony Bill's work, A HOME OF OUR OWN is best when it's
quietly observant.  There are a few "Big Confrontations," and they seem
forced, primarily due to Furlong's histrionics.  Young actors tend to
get into a lot of trouble when they're asked to yell, or to deliver
lines like, "You care more about the house than you do about us," and
this is no exception.  The film also trips when it spends too much time
away from Kathy Bates, such as a tacked-on sequence involving Furlong's
first date.  I was a bit disappointed in the inspirational finale,
which loses some of the integrity points that HOME had accrued.  It's
the small family moments, particularly the car trip to Idaho and a
visit to a church thrift store, which really won me over.
     I shouldn't forget the nice performance of Soon-Teck Oh as "Mr.
Moon" Munimura, the lonely gardener who finds a new family in the
Laceys.  I wish the filmmakers had done less with Furlong's character
and more with his, the one through whom we can see the family's
struggle with somewhat objective eyes.  "Wholesome" is a word that
usually inspires derision, but I couldn't be more complimentary when I
say that A HOME OF OUR OWN is a wholesome, subtly emotional film,
well-acted and skillfully directed.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
MAN ON THE MOON
(Universal)
Starring:  Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti, Jerry
Lawler.
Screenplay:  Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski.
Producers:  Danny De Vito, Michael Shamberg and Stacey Sher.
Director:  Milos Forman.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the first moments of MAN ON THE MOON'S splendidly inventive
prologue, Jim Carrey says, "Hello ... I am Andy." And for two hours, he
is. There is no way to describe Carrey's performance as Andy Kaufman in
Milos Forman's bio-pic except to say that Carrey inhabits Kaufman. When he
plays Kaufman's squeaky-voiced immigrant character, which will become
"Taxi's" Latka, he's pitch perfect; when he dives into one of Kaufman's
deliberately provocative stage routines, he captures a mind of lunatic
inventiveness at work. Carrey's work may be the best, most effective
extended impression in film history.
     The astonishing thing about MAN ON THE MOON is how entertaining it is
despite the fact that there's very little to it but Carrey's extended
impression. After a brief glimpse of Kaufman's childhood in Long Island,
MAN ON THE MOON dives into his early days as a stand-up comedy performer
who befuddles and aggravates his audiences as often as he makes them
laugh. He is undeniably unique, however, a fact that grabs the attention
of super-agent George Shapiro (Danny DeVito). Shapiro sees stardom in
Kaufman, stardom Kaufman himself claims he wants. There's just the small
matter of Kaufman's insistence on pushing himself, his act and his
audience farther than they've ever gone before. Even as "Taxi" makes him
famous, his stunts -- including an open-ended challenge to beat any woman
in wrestling -- make him harder and harder for many people to take.
     Hard to take, perhaps, but impossible to ignore. It's also impossible
to deny that MAN ON THE MOON owes most of its entertainment value to
Kaufman himself, since the film's biggest laughts come from re-creations
of Kaufman's outrageous performances. We see his faux-nervous "Saturday
Night Live" lip-synch to the "Mighty Mouse" theme; we see his running feud
with wrestler Jerry Lawler (playing himself) that pre-sages the popularity
of professional wrestling as scripted antagonism; and we see plenty of
Kaufman's doppleganger, abrasive Vegas lounge singer Tony Clifton. When a
college audience demands "Latka!," Kaufman responds with a reading in its
entirety of _The Great Gatsby_. Watching Carrey-as-Kaufman reach for the
edges without anything resembling a net is exhilarating. Kaufman's
routines still have the ability to inspire gasping laughter.
     The only question remaining -- and the one for which MAN ON THE MOON
has no answer -- is who Andy Kaufman really was, and what he really was
trying to accomplish in his career. The script by Scott Alexander and
Larry Karaszewski casts a similar rosy glow over its subject as their
scripts for ED WOOD and THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, making the film more
of an homage to driven eccentricity than piercing character study. It may
be true, as Kaufman's girlfriend Lynne (Courtney Love) says to him in one
scene, that "there is no real you," but that doesn't make the absence of 
insight any less disapppointing. While MAN ON THE MOON's performance set
pieces are dazzling, in a sense they never end. It's a portrait of an
entire life lived as performance art, when you keep hoping for at least a
glimpse behind the curtain.
     There are moments during the film's final half hour, when Kaufman is
coping with cancer -- and with the boy-who-cried-wolf repercussions as his
friends and family doubt that he is really sick -- that we begin to see a
self-aware Andy. In one of the film's best moments, a trip to a Philippine
"psychic surgery" clinic becomes an ironic revelation that attempts to
delude others can go too far. With just a few more moments like that, MAN
ON THE MOON might have been a classic film biography. Maybe ultimately
it's just a showpiece -- for Kaufman's decades-ahead-of-his-time genius,
and for Carrey's dynamic rendering of that genius. Maybe it's just a grand
illusion without an easily-understood human being behind it. And maybe, in
a story about the life of Andy Kaufman, that's perfectly appropriate.

Title
Review for 101 Dalmatians (1996)
(Disney)
Starring:  Glenn Close, Jeff Daniels, Joely Richardson, Hugh Laurie, Mark
Williams, Joan Plowright.
Screenplay:  John Hughes, based on the novel by Dodie Smith.
Producers:  John Hughes and Ricardo Mestres.
Director:  Stephen Herek.
MPAA Rating:  G (cartoon violence).
Running Time:  103 minutes, plus 7 minute short in some theaters.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
    Resolved:  Trained dogs are cute, and puppies scampering about are
even cuter.  If you would take the con position in an Oxford-style debate
on this point, then the live-action remake of Disney's 101 DALMATIANS is
not going to be your cup of kibble.  101 DALMATIANS was made not simply
with an awareness of the usefulness of cute animals in the making of a
family film; it seems to have been constructed around that awareness.
There is such a crass calculation to the use of its canine stars as
bringers of innocent grins that the dogs don't even counteract the
brain-damaging slapstick which is John Hughes's stock-in-trade.  Somehow,
they make it worse.  Delivered for the holiday season in a big glossy bow,
101 DALMATIANS is a spectacularly packaged box of foul-smelling air.
     The story begins with two dalmatians and their owners living
blissfully unaware of each other in London.  Roger Dearly (Jeff Daniels),
an American software designer who has made a pilgrimage to that noted
video game mecca of London, shares a flat with his male dalmatian Pongo;
fashion designer Anita Campbell-Green (Joely Richardson) has a female
named Perdy.  When Pongo and Perdy fall in puppy love, their humans are
brought together, and soon both pairs form couples.  The result of the
dalmatian infatuation is a litter of puppies, which comes as wonderful
news to Anita's fur-obsessed boss Cruella DeVil (Glenn Close), who intends
to turn dalmatian fur into a beautiful coat.  Cruella sets her henchmen
Jasper (Hugh Laurie) and Horace (Mark Williams) to the task of dog-napping
Pongo and Perdy's fifteen puppies, and those fifteen join another 84
puppies already captured.  It is up to a slew of resourceful animals to
reunite puppies with parents and thwart Cruella's dastardly plans.
     The 1961 animated version of 101 DALMATIANS was far from the best of
Disney's self-proclaimed "masterpieces," but it had a low-key charm even
in the bumblings of Horace and Jasper.  Now the material has been
entrusted to writer-producer John Hughes, whose basic film-making
philosophy is "If more is better, and even more is even better, then
please-make-it-stop too much is just right."  Roger and Anita's initial
meeting is punctuated not by one careening chase sequence and bicycle
wreck into a pond, but two; Horace and Jasper don't just fall through
rotted floors and into freezing water, but also electrocute their gonads
on a high-voltage fence.  Even the magnificent, maleficent Cruella is not
safe from the onslaught of indignities, falling first into a vat of
molasses and then into a pile of manure.  It is a sign of Hughes's love
affair with "America's Funniest Home Videos" humor that he replaces the
original's most memorable suspense sequence -- the puppies' attempt to
slip past Cruella disguised as black labradors -- and replaces it with a
scene in a barn which ends with a pig landing on Cruella's chest.
     Glenn Close has obvious fun as Cruella, playing her as an imperious
drag queen, but I'm mystified by raves for her performance.  There is no
doubt that Close can be scary -- she scared a generation of married men
into zipping up their pants in FATAL ATTRACTION -- but there is no
malevolence in her characterization of Cruella.  Disney's great villains
were real threats, and they didn't take pratfalls; Cruella has Horace and
Jasper so that _they_ can be the comic relief while she spooks the little
ones.  John Hughes and hack-for-hire Stephen Herek aren't comfortable with
genuine villainy, so they have Cruella join her goons as dim-witted
victims of HOME ALONE 3 mayhem.  Close cuts a fine figure in Cruella's
outrageous outfits and commanding some impressive sets, and she is about
as intimidating as RuPaul.
     Then there are those adorable puppies.  There is no point arguing
that kids and many adults won't enjoy the frolicking dalmatians, because
they will.  There are a few marvelously trained animals in 101 DALMATIANS,
and they provide some amusing moments.  You could also get the same
reaction out of most kids if you sat them down in front of a home movie of
puppies playing, or an old episode of "Those Amazing Animals," or even a
Westminster Dog Show on ESPN2, because reaction to the dogs in 101
DALMATIANS is not based on any kind of plot requiring individual  
personality for the animal characters.  Though the same kind of
animatronic critters used in BABE are used in 101 DALMATIANS, the animals
don't talk here.  Not only does that make for some confusing narrative
(one scene found several kids around me perplexed as to why Lucky was
still in danger), but it makes the canine cast of 101 DALMATIANS little
more than a big spotted blur.  A certain kind of manipulative drama has
long been called a "tear-jerker," and 101 DALMATIANS is the family film
equivalent.  It's an "awww-jeker," trotting out the adorable little
puppies and having them yap at you until you begin to consider turning
them into a coat yourself.

Title
Review for Fear of a Black Hat (1993)
Starring:  Rusty Cundieff, Larry B. Scott, Mark Christopher
Lawrence, Kasi Lemmons.
Screenplay/Director:  Rusty Cundieff.
     Film reviewers, myself included, often obsess over originality.
Everything is derivative, we lament; everything is recycled.  Then,
periodically, I am reminded that given the choice between an original
film and a good one, I would much prefer the latter.  FEAR OF A BLACK
HAT has been referred to as THIS IS SPINAL RAP on more than one
occasion, and it is true that there is more than a passing similarity
between the two.  All right, there is a remarkable similarity.  But
ultimately, only one thing really matters: FEAR OF A BLACK HAT is
very, *very* funny, probably the funniest film of the year so far.
     FEAR OF A BLACK HAT is set up as a documentary being made by a
doctoral student (Kasi Lemmons) as her sociology thesis project.  Her
subject is on-the-rise rap gangsta rap group N.W.H. (Niggaz With Hats),
whose members are rappers Ice Cold (Rusty Cundieff) and Tasty Taste
(Larry B. Scott) and DJ Tone Def (Mark Christopher Lawrence).  The
documentary chronicles clashes between N.W.H. and their record company
over their controversial songs and videos, including their breakout hit
"Guerrillas in the Midst."  But inevitably egos and women conspire to
form a rift between the members, and each explores new avenues as a
solo artist.  Can N.W.H. patch up their differences and stage a big
comeback?
     In terms of plot structure, it often seems that writer/
director/star Rusty Cundieff decided simply to "colorize" SPINAL TAP.
It is not simply the framing device which is borrowed, but a multitude
of specific details: gigs with somewhat insulting billing on the
marquis; internal squabbles triggered by a domineering girlfriend;
Tap's series of ill-fated drummers replaced by N.W.H.'s series of
ill-fated managers.  Yet with all these borrowed elements, there are a
couple of other things Cundieff might have been well-served to
duplicate.  One is keeping the framing structure consistent.
Frequently the camera work breaks out of the verite style for shots a
single-camera documentary really couldn't be filming.  The other is
keeping the performances as deadpan as possible.  Kasi Lemmons in
particular dreadfully overplays her part, and Howie Gold is a cliche as
Manager #5.  If FEAR OF A BLACK HAT tends to stumble, it's when it
veers into campiness.
     Even then, there are some huge laughs to be had in BLACK HAT.
While some of the objects of satire are unnecessarily heavy-handed
(white rapper Vanilla Sherbet; Slammer, formerly known as M.C.
Slammer), others are dead on.  Tone Def's solo project is a hilarious
bit modeled after P.M. Dawn, and the rivalry between N.W.H. and other
rappers over who has the longest rap sheet sets up a great
confrontation at a grade school presentation.  But Cundieff is perhaps
most adept at skewering rap's self-important politics through Ice
Cold's wonderfully improbable explanations of how songs such as "Booty
Juice" actually contain an important social message.  Even the misogyny
in rap culture is nailed perfectly in a single line, perhaps the film's
funniest (be sure to stay through the credits or you'll miss it).  Also
worth noting are the numerous song parodies by Cundieff and John
Bautista, which range from the sublime (Tone Def's "I'm Just a Human
Being") to the obnoxious ("Come and Pet the P.U.S.S.Y.").
     There are a lot of great details in FEAR OF A BLACK HAT (my
favorite being Tasty Taste's massive bowling-trophy-on-a-chain
necklace), which makes it frustrating that Cundieff often plays up the
broader bits.  An obligatory scene in which Ice Cold is pulled over and
hassled by a rent-a-cop is dragged out far too long, and a parody of
NEW JACK CITY seems only to serve as a way to take a jab at black
filmmakers ("Jike Spingleton" is the director).  Still, I laughed
harder and more often at FEAR OF A BLACK HAT than at any other movie in
quite some time.  Make sure you're in the house when N.W.H. comes to
your town.

Title
Review for Whole Wide World, The (1996)
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Vincent D'Onofrio, Renee Zellweger, Ann Wedgeworth, Harve
Presnell.
Screenplay:  Michael Scott Myers, based on the memoir by Novalyne Price
Ellis.
Producers:  Kevin Reidy, Carl-Jan Colpeurt, Vincent D'Onofrio, Dan
Ireland.
Director:  Dan Ireland.
MPAA Rating:  PG (plentiful mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Bio-pics have been a Hollywood staple about as long as there has been
a Hollywood, but recently an entire sub-genre seems to have popped up
based on the tragic romances of real-life figures.  Beethoven in IMMORTAL
BELOVED, Dora Carrington in CARRINGTON, C. S. Lewis in SHADOWLANDS,
Picasso in SURVIVING PICASSO and Richard Feynman in INFINITY all have been
given solemn film treatments which play the "tortured/emotionally
repressed artist" card for all they are worth.  Some of these films worked
and some did not, but many of them inspired the question of whether we
would care all that much about the people involved if one or both of them
were not famous.  THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD is a polite, well-acted drama which
covers the same ground several times over in an hour and forty-five
minutes.
     THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD opens in west Texas in 1933, where a young
student and part-time school teacher named Novalyne Price (Renee
Zellweger) meets Robert E. "Bob" Howard (Vincent D'Onofrio), a friend of
her then-boyfriend.  Bob is a successful writer of adventure tales for
pulp magazines -- many featuring a creation named Conan the Barbarian --
and Novalyne's own aspirations toward being a writer lead her to turn to
Bob for advice.  The two become friends and frequent companions, but Bob
has difficulty returning Novalyne's affections as he focuses on his
writing and caring for his sickly mother (Ann Wedgeworth).  Over the
course of two years, Novalyne and Bob share an evolving relationship in
which Novalyne is one of the only people allowed inside Bob's tangled
emotions.
     THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD manages to stay fairly involving for much of its
running time largely thanks to the strong performances of the two leads.
Vincent D'Onofrio makes Bob Howard a complicated mix of Texas bluster and
buried pain, a fellow who lacks the emotional vocabulary to respond to
Novalyne's feelings.  Director Dan Ireland captures him vividly as he
describes Conan's world to Novalyne, and in his verbal accompaniment to
his own composition; Howard's fantasy world becomes his great escape from
his own life.  Renee Zellweger does nice work with a tough part, a woman
who is attracted to the teller of tall tales then finds herself unable to
"civilize" him.  She walks a fine line between anachronistic liberation
and discomfiting masochism, yet generally finds the right note of earnest
frustration.  Together Zellweger and D'Onofrio make an intriguing pair, a
couple of kindred spirits who nevertheless are quite obviously wrong for
each other.
     Therein lies THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD's fundamental flaw as a romantic
drama:  it is never really possible to root for the protagonists to end up
together.  Michael Scott Myers' script is based on an autobiographical
memoir by Novalyne Price Ellis, who clearly was deeply affected by her
friendship with Bob Howard.  As honestly felt as it might be, however, her
story lacks a narrative push.  Novalyne and Bob spend a lot of time
together, argue over philosophical differences, then make up; this process
occurs once then repeats three or four times.  The interaction between the
two is pleasantly interesting, but it isn't enough to sustain a story in
which neither character ends up changing very much.  The sad fact is that
the story might have been simply Novalyne's attempt to work through some
guilt issues (Howard committed suicide in 1935), and THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD
is affectionate without being compelling.  When Novalyne pronounces late
in the film that she was happy to have known Bob Howard, you don't doubt
her sincerity.  You just wonder why that sentiment warranted a feature
film.
     The only time THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD flirts with truly intriguing
material is when it focuses on Bob's relationship with his mother, played
with pallid possessiveness by Ann Wedgeworth.  There is an intense Oedipal
sub-text to Bob's obsessive need to care for his mother, and a scene in
which he changes her sweat-soaked nightgown after a feverish night is both
subtle and daring.  There is so much more going on in that relationship
than in the one between Bob and Novalyne that you wish Ireland or Myers
had recognized it.  But this is Novalyne's story, so she is always front
and center, static though she might be.  Don't expect a love story in THE
WHOLE WIDE WORLD.  At most it is a "like" story, and might have been
ignored politely if one of the two likers had not created Conan the
Barbarian.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
FIGHT CLUB
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Brad Pitt, Edward Norton, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat Loaf.
Screenplay:  Jim Uhls, based on the novel by Chuck Palahniuk.
Producers:  Art Linson, Cean Chaffin and Ross Grayson Bell.
Director:  David Fincher.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, profanity, sexual situations, nudity)
Running Time:  139 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In this Year of Our Lord 1999, when all things millennial are hotter
than the coming Apocalyptic purges, I give you David Fincher -- official
filmmaker of the dark night of our collective 21st century soul.  SEVEN
was one of the decade's most chilling visions of societal madness made
flesh; THE GAME turned existential crisis into engrossing suspense.  No
one in popular culture seems to understand our demons better.  No one more
effectively shows the deceptive ease with which our stable world can be
yanked out from under us.
     In his adaptation of Chuck Palahniuk's savagely brilliant novel FIGHT
CLUB, Fincher delves once again into the bowels of our uber-psyche --
quite literally in the propulsive, Dust Brothers-scored opening credits
sequence -- and announces that a lot of us are walking very close to the
edge.  Our narrator (Edward Norton) is not unnamed without cause.  He's an
anonymous man driven to compulsive designer-label shopping and chronic
insomnia by a dehumanizing job (he investigates malfunctions for an auto
manufacturer, deciding whether a recall will be more expensive than paying
out-of-court personal injury settlements), a man who attends illness
support groups for cathartic release he can find nowhere else.  Then he
meets Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), a man with a vision.  After an evening of
bonding during which they gleefully beat each other up, Tyler and the
narrator begin Fight Club, an underground organization where ordinary men
release their inner beasts through bare-knuckle brawls, and ... well, the
first rule of Fight Club is you do not talk about Fight Club.
     It might surprise a lot of people to discover that FIGHT CLUB is
actually a comedy.  Certainly it's not a comedy in the BIG DADDY or MICKEY
BLUE EYES sense, and not just because this one is actually funny.  It's a
comedy like A CLOCKWORK ORANGE was a comedy, a social satire so caustic
you laugh with a sharp intake of breath.  Norton's wonderfully dry
narration includes dozens of scathing punch lines, many of them drawn
directly from Palahniuk's text.  Some of FIGHT CLUB's conceits are
outrageously inspired, like guerrilla theater projectionist Tyler splicing
single frames of pornography into family films, or the creation of
boutique soap from liposuctioned human fat ("We were selling rich ladies
their own asses back to them at $20 a bar").  As performed by Norton, a
perfectly manic Pitt and Helena Bonham Carter (the emotional burn-out who
becomes Tyler's lover), FIGHT CLUB is startlingly hilarious.
     And it had to be; there's no other way to tell a story like FIGHT
CLUB without wallowing in didacticism.  Many critics and social
conservatives have already offered up kill-the-messenger diatribes against
the film's brutality and anarchist sub-plots, yet another depressing
reminder that some people need their messages delivered to them in solemn
"isn't this a very, very bad thing" tones.  At its heart, FIGHT CLUB is a
warning about the percolating discontent that has exploded into
well-publicized acts of violence in this country.  It also peeks into the
capacity for violent action we may not even realize we possess, the
testosterone id bubbling beneath the veneer of civilization.  As Tyler
becomes a messiah for his disaffected devotees, FIGHT CLUB shows just how
quickly fascism can materialize when the rabble are roused.  If the
approach to those subjects had ever become overtly preachy, FIGHT CLUB
would have become a glossy social science dissertation -- a big screen
version of Susan Faludi's emasculated-American-male study "Stiffed."
Instead, FIGHT CLUB taps into something primal, then takes it into the
realm of the absurd -- subliminal penises, liposuction soap and all.
     Weaving it all together is Fincher, as distinctive and unconventional
a filmmaker as any working in mainstream theatrical films.  FIGHT CLUB is
a kinetic work with plenty of visual flourishes and jolting sound design,
yet it never feels like an all-out sensory pummeling -- it's the film
Oliver Stone probably wanted NATURAL BORN KILLERS to be, but lacked the
subtlety to pull of.  The film only sags during a late surge of
exposition, a necessary evil that still feels awkward.  When Fincher is
allowed to plunge into FIGHT CLUB's dizzying array of themes and subtexts,
the result is as provocatively entertaining a film as you could hope for.
If the violence unnerves -- or becomes even more unnerving when
accompanied by vicious wit -- that's only because it should.  FIGHT CLUB
keeps you off balance, its incendiary vision leavened by the unexpected
humor.  This time around, David Fincher gets to whistle in the dark night
of our collective 21st century soul.

Title
Review for What Happened Was... (1994)
Starring:  Karen Sillas, Tom Noonan.
Screenplay/Director:  Tom Noonan.
     Don't be fooled by the marketing campaign into believing that WHAT
HAPPENED WAS... is a light-hearted, quirky romantic romp about a
date-from-hell.  It most decidedly is not.  It is a dark, disturbing
and almost painfully honest character study which will have many
viewers shifting uncomfortably in their chairs.  The sensational
performances of Karen Sillas and Tom Noonan should have added up to a
sensational film, but they don't quite.  In adapting his two person
stage play, Noonan manages both to under-direct and to over-direct,
sacrificing much of the story's potential entertainment value for a
more serious tone which simply doesn't ring quite as true.
     WHAT HAPPENED WAS... is the story of an evening shared by two
co-workers in a New York law firm who at first glance appear to have
little in common.  Jackie (Sillas) is a plain-spoken "executive
assistant" from a working class background; Michael (Noonan) is a
Harvard-educated paralegal with a dry and caustic sense of humor.
Jackie has invited Michael to dinner at her apartment, and the two
proceed to engage in the typical first date small talk.  However, each
begins to discover that there is more to the other than meets the eye,
and as the evening progresses there come a series of revelations which
make this first date anything but casual.
     The first half of WHAT HAPPENED WAS..., which establishes the
characters through the mundane, is by far its most effective.  We meet
Jackie as she frantically prepares both herself and her apartment for
her guest, and her anxiety continues until several glasses of wine
loosen her up.  Every note in Sillas' performance is dead on:  her
piecemeal serving of dinner, realizing halfway through that she has
forgotten the salad; her oft-repeated question to Michael of "That's a
joke, right?" as she fears--justifiably--that he is having fun at
her expense; her over-eager mantra of "cool" in response to his
achievements.  It's a beautiful and sensitive performance, and Jackie's
genuineness provides a perfect counterpoint to Michael's intellectual
reserve, as he tries to maintain the upper hand through sarcasm without
even knowing it.  It soon becomes clear that Jackie is far more
perceptive than Michael, and as the power dynamic shifts, Michael
crumbles.  The development of this shift through the dinner is
fascinating, if almost too understated.
     However, Noonan is not content to deliver a sort of MY DINNER DATE
WITH ANDRE, and it is when the script takes an abrupt left turn into
psychodrama that the film falters.  It begins with Jackie reading to
Michael a children's story she has written, a grim fairy tale about
incest and matricide, with Michael becoming progressively more
distraught by the tale.  Noonan simply takes the scene too far;
children's voices whisper in the background, the camera shoots through
the windows of a dollhouse, and Sillas is lit with flickering candles
like a voodoo priestess.  The self-conscious arsty-ness of Noonan's
direction takes a serious scene and makes it almost a self-parody.
Michael's big breakdown is also played far too broadly.  There is a
falseness to his confession, and WHAT HAPPENED WAS... eventually begins
too feel extremely scripted, losing the pinpoint honesty which had been
its strength.
     Noonan clearly wanted to tell a story of broken people finding
each other, of barriers being torn down, and of the secrets that keep
people isolated and lonely.  The problem with WHAT HAPPENED WAS... is
that it is much more interesting when its observations about human
interaction are inspiring nervous laughter than when they are supposed
to be inspiring serious contemplation.  Stories based on big emotional
confrontations between characters are tricky to transfer from the stage
to the screen.  WHAT HAPPENED WAS...  Noonan only got it half right.

Title
Review for Naked Gun 33 1/3: The Final Insult (1994)
Starring:  Leslie Nielsen, Priscilla Presley, Fred Ward, George Kennedy,
           O. J. Simpson.
Screenplay:  David Zucker, Pat Proft and Robert LoCash.
Director:  Peter Segal.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'd like to say a word at this time about the proliferation of
genre parody/spoofs in the last year: stop.  In twelve months we've
seen at least half a dozen such films (LOADED WEAPON 1, FATAL INSTINCT,
ROBIN HOOD: MEN IN TIGHTS, etc.), with roughly that many laughs between
them.  It is saddest of all to see the masters of the form, the former
partners in the Zucker Abrahams Zucker comic triumvirate, among the
perpetrators of slipshod product.  Last year's HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX was
a tolerable but limp effort; still, it shines next to NAKED GUN
33-1/3.  The third installment in the series is only sporadically
amusing, and often crosses the pop culture cannibalism scale from
parody into self-parody.
     Leslie Nielsen returns as Frank Drebin, formerly a lieutenant for
L.A.'s Police Squad but recently retired after his marriage to
sweetheart Jane Spencer (Priscilla Presley).  There are tensions in the
Drebin household, however, as Jane yearns for a child and Frank itches
to return to police work.  Frank gets his chance when Capt. Hocken
(George Kennedy) and Det. Nordberg (O. J. Simpson) ask him to go
undercover in prison.  His mission: to ingratiate himself with
incarcerated bomber Rocco (Fred Ward) and find out the target of a
planned terrorist attack.  While Frank goes to work in the Stateville
Prison, Jane takes off to find herself, and must decide whether or not
to stand by her man.
     The first ten minutes of NAKED GUN 33-1/3 offers some promise.
The opening sequence targets the train station steps sequence from
THE UNTOUCHABLES, and it features some solid belly laughs thanks to
a careful setup.  There are also a couple of winning moments in the
traditional opening credits featuring a roof's-eye view from a
moving police car, particularly a nod to the Death Star trench run
from STAR WARS.  Unfortunately, that's where NAKED GUN 33-1/3 hits the
runout groove.  In a ZAZ film, whether or not it works ultimately comes
down to how many of the gags work, and there are painfully few good
gags here.
     Part of the problem can be attributed to director Peter Segal.
Much of the enjoyment from earlier ZAZ efforts came from watching the
backgrounds, picking up jokes on the fringes of the frame.  In NAKED
GUN 33-1/3, jokes that in those earlier films would have been
background jokes practically have a spotlight set on them, such as the
wall-mounted clothing of notable lawmen in the Police Squad station
(one of the lawmen is J. Edgar Hoover ... you fill in the gag).  Even
though all three ZAZ boys are in the credits in some capacity (David
Zucker as writer, Jerry as producer and Jim Abrahams as executive
producer), their eye is missing in Segal's direction.  While none of
their films were afraid to go for groaners, the difference is that they
didn't underline them.
     Many of the films NAKED GUN 33-1/3 chooses to parody seem ripe for
the picking, but the execution stumbles.  Jane's departure with friend
Louise in a green Oldsmobile convertible seems to offer a great deal of
promise, but the expected THELMA & LOUSIE parody offers surprising
little payoff.  Ditto for the now (seemingly) obligatory CRYING GAME
reference, and an overlong sequence set in the prison.  Time after time
it looks like something worthwhile is coming along, and time after time
the jokes just fall flat.
     There is one other crucial factor worth noting in NAKED GUN
33-1/3, and that is the performance of Leslie Nielsen.  When he made
AIRPLANE!, Nielsen was a career B-movie actor known for dramatic heavy
roles, and he deadpanned his part perfectly.  Now, however, after
AIRPLANE!, the series POLICE SQUAD! and three NAKED GUN films, Nielsen
appears to be aping himself.  Instead of playing Drebin as the
oblivious stiff he had been before, he mugs and double-takes his way
through the film, having learned far too many bad lessons from his
horrendous Dollar Rent-A-Car spots.  Similarly, Fred Ward brings none
of the qualities Ricardo Montalban and Robert Goulet brought to the
first two films.  Rather than playing against the laughs, all the
performers seem to be playing with them, and much of the goofiness is
lost.
     NAKED GUN 33-1/3 is doing well at the box office.  It's too bad.
I was hoping we could avoid NAKED GUN .44: MAGNUM FARCE.

Title
Review for Velvet Goldmine (1998)
     The pieces are familiar, but they don't quite fit together.  A
reporter tries to uncover the secrets behind a mysterious celebrity,
interviewing his ex-wife at a night club.  Extended, surrealistic,
dialogue-free musical interludes are used to advance character and set
tone.  Campy dialogue, gaudy costumes and ambiguous sexuality flourish.
Speculative romantic connections are established between roman-a-clef
versions of pop music stars, accompanied by effectively pseudo-period new
songs.  It's CITIZEN KANE meets PINK FLOYD THE WALL, THE ROCKY HORROR
PICTURE SHOW meets GRACE OF MY HEART.  And that's saying nothing of the
suggestion that Oscar Wilde, the father of flamboyance, was an alien
progeny.
     Welcome to the evocative, provocative world of writer/director Todd
Haynes, the man who used Barbie dolls to tell the story of Karen Carpenter
in the little-seen underground film SUPERSTAR, and who fashioned a
sublime, complex cautionary tale about environmental and psychological
collapse in SAFE.  In VELVET GOLDMINE, a fictionalized account of the
early 70s glam rock scene, Haynes takes a somewhat appropriate style over
substance approach.  The center of the story is the rise and fall of Ziggy
Stardust...I mean, Brian Slade (Jonathan Rhys Meyers), an androgynous
music sensation who created a musical alter-ego called Maxwell Demon and
bears no resemblance to any real music stars, living or David...I mean
dead.  Along the way Slade meets Curt Wild (Ewan McGregor), an American
proto-punk whose onstage theatrics influence Slade to transform from
singer to full-fledged performance artist.
     The relationship between Slade and Wild -- actually a romantic
triangle including Slade's wife Mandy (Toni Collette) -- is only one piece
of the collage of decadence Haynes patches together.  VELVET GOLDMINE is
less a narrative than it is a long-form music video, intriguing images 
full of manufactured outrageousness (including the bizarre Oscar Wilde
prologue).  As such, it certainly re-creates its era effectively.  The
music, the mood and the theatricality are all pure glam; Rhys Meyers looks
perfectly the part as pop creation already beginning to eat itself.  But
Haynes piles stylish surface on top of stylish surface in VELVET GOLDMINE
until it never quite gets at the heart of anything -- not the artists, not
the appeal of glam, not even whether the scene was about social change or
filthy lucre.  
     It certainly comes awfully close on occasion.  More compelling than
the actual story of Brian Slade is the film's framing story, which finds
reporter Arthur Stewart (Christian Bale) trying to track down Slade in
1984, ten years after a stunt in which Slade staged his own mid-concert
assassination.  It turns out that Arthur was in attendance at that
concert, and that Slade and Wild were key figures in his youth.  In one
wonderfully cross-cut sequence, Arthur's sexual awakening is connected to
the sexual excesses of Slade's entourage, suggesting that even in their
self-absorption the glam rockers -- often tormented as children for their
sexual individuality -- succeeded at expanding boundaries for other youth.
Yet even this storyline spins into an absurd, pointless conspiracy-mystery
which Arthur could have put together only by actually viewing footage from
the film we're watching.
     That's the kind of infatuation with his own film-making that Haynes
displays in VELVET GOLDMINE.  Because it's always visually engrossing, it
keeps holding out the hope that it's going somewhere substantial.
Instead, it offers the cinematic equivalent of hip-hop sampling, turning
into a montage of visual and musical cues from other pieces of popular
cinema; Haynes even cribs from SUPERSTAR with a romantic scene between two
dolls.  If glam was somehow about the fine line between profound and
shallow, Haynes has hit the mark dead on.  This is one deliberately
confounding spectacle.

Title
Review for Stuart Saves His Family (1995)
Starring:  Al Franken, Laura San Giacomo, Vincent D'Onofrio,
           Harris Yulin, Shirley Knight, Lesley Boone.
Screenplay:  Al Franken.
Director:  Harold Ramis.
     Lorne Michaels must die.  It is really as simple as that.  Yes,
he bought himself a temporary reprieve with the dumb-but-still-
funny TOMMY BOY, but Michaels has foisted so much horrible product
on American television and film audiences in the last five years
that such a minor success was the artistic equivalent of Charles
Manson buying a few boxes of Girl Scout cookies.  We can only find
evidence of a benevolent God in the fact that HANS & FRANZ THE MOVIE
and COFFEE TALK THE MOVIE were scrapped in development (that is not
a joke).  Unfortunately, STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY slipped out before
Paramount stopped handing Michaels blank checks.  Not only is this
latest "Saturday Night Live" character spinoff incoherent and
unfunny, its basic idea and tone are just appallingly wrong-headed.
     Al Franken stars as Stuart Smalley, caring nurturer and host of
the public access cable program "Daily Affirmation."  That is before
the program is cancelled, leading Stuart into a shame spiral which
causes concern among his cadre of 12-step sponsors led by Julia
(Laura San Giacomo).  To make matters worse, the death of a beloved
aunt forces Stuart to confront his singularly dysfunctional
immediate family:  his alcoholic father (Harris Yulin); co-dependent
enabler mother (Shirley Knight); pot-smoking unemployed brother
(Vincent D'Onofrio); over-eater and thrice-divorced sister (Lesley
Boone).  As family strife commences over trouble with the aunt's
inheritance, Stuart tries to be the peace-maker, while also trying
to revive his show on another cable network.
     To state the obvious about the recent spate of SNL-"inspired"
features, the five-minute sketches on which STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY
is based weren't all that funny to begin with.  They had their
moments, primarily because Al Franken is one of the few performers
associated with SNL in the last decade who doesn't appear to have
had all his subtlety surgically removed; indeed, his sing-song
delivery is good for the film's few laughs.  But where on earth was
he going to come up with a 90-minute concept for a movie?  The
answer is that he didn't.  Instead, he took two 45-minute concepts
and fused them together into a disastrous whole.  One plot, in which
Stuart attempts to take his Illinois public access show to the big
time (shades of WAYNE'S WORLD, anyone?), is supposed to be the funny
part.  It is not, with the exception of a cameo by Julia (IT'S PAT)
Sweeney as a timid receptionist who becomes a guest on "Daily
Affirmation."  Mostly, it's just deadly slow.
     What is _unintentionally_ funny about STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY
is the movie-of-the-week melodrama of the Smalley family segments.
Although there are a few flashbacks to Stuart's youth which are
played strictly for laughs (unsuccessfully), the majority of the
interactions are intended to be poignant or serious.  This decision
is baffling, because Franken appears to have forgotten the premise
behind the "Daily Affirmation" sketches.  They were parodies of the
touchy-feely self-help movement, deriving most of their humor from
goofy over-reliance on new age mantras like Stuart's ubiquitous "and
that's ... okay."  But STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY is practically a love
letter to self-help, and the problems within the family are treated
with a ridiculous earnestness.  The schizoid combination of
humorless comedy and misplaced sentimentality (including a score by
the ever-more-saccharine Marc Shaiman) makes for a truly
uncomfortable ride.
     It is clear that Al Franken had two basic choices when it came
to making a STUART movie:  keep Stuart a caricature in an episodic
story, or make him more real in an actual narrative.  He managed
somehow to get Harold Ramis (GROUNDHOG DAY) to direct, so he went
for the human, feel-good angle.  Big mistake.
     I said Franken had two basic choices.  Make that three:  he
could have chosen not to do the movie at all.  _That_ would have
been the smart choice.

Title
Review for Backbeat (1993)
Starring:  Sheryl Lee, Stephen Dorff, Ian Hart, Gary Bakewell.
Screenplay:  Iain Softley, Stephen Ward & Michael Thomas.
Director:  Iain Softley.
     In the original edition of Trivial Pursuit, there is a question
which reads simply, "Who replaced Pete Best?"  From the phrasing of
that question, it would appear that at least one change from the
original lineup of The Beatles is assumed to be part of the popular
consciousness.  That probably is not the case for the true story behind
BACKBEAT, which dramatizes the pre-Fab days when they were in fact a
fivesome.  It is an intriguing and atmospheric study of a complicated
romantic triangle, but it lacks solid performances across the board to
back up Ian Hart's dynamic work as John Lennon.
     BACKBEAT opens in 1960, as Liverpool mates John Lennon (Hart) and
Stu Sutcliffe (Stephen Dorff) prepare to take their band The Beatles to
bigger and better things, which includes moving to Hamburg to take
advantage of the thriving club scene.  Stu is more interested in his
painting, but he joins John, Paul (Gary Bakewell), George (Chris
O'Neill) and Pete (Scot Williams) in Germany to follow up strippers in
darkened pubs.  There Stu meets Astrid Kirchherr (Sheryl Lee), a
bohemian photographer who introduces him to another side of Hamburg.
As they become closer, tensions rise within the band.  Paul questions
Stu's talent and dedication, and John seems jealous ... although of whom
is not entirely clear.
     Director and co-writer Iain Softley has a unique perspective from
which to tell the story of The Beatles' rise from ragged cover band to
international icons, so BACKBEAT never becomes simply an "early years"
bio-pic.  It does boast some clever music numbers which highlight the
band's frustration with their seedy environs, and an exciting sense of
place.  However, it's primarily the story of two friends divided by
their different passions, and the woman who brings those passions into
focus.  This theme is highlighted in one of the film's best sequences,
when Stu plays hooky from a recording session to spend the day with
Astrid, as Softley cross-cuts between the ever rowdier session and
Stu's idyllic encounter.  Both parties are exactly where they want to
be, and much of the conflict in BACKBEAT comes from John's frustration
that for Stu, The Beatles are not that place.
     Still, BACKBEAT could have been much, much stronger with some
better acting in two of the three lead performances.  It's certainly
not the fault of Ian Hart, who has cornered the market on playing a
homoeroticized Lennon after this film and 1991's THE HOURS AND TIMES.
He seethes as a young man filled with anger and confusion and
determination which can only find an acceptable outlet on stage.
Whereas in most films a line like, "We're going to be too big for our
own bloody good" would come off as silly historical revisionism, it
seems plausible coming from Hart's cynical visionary.  His brilliance
is emphasized, unfortunately, by the blandness of co-stars Stephen
Dorff and Sheryl Lee.  Dorff's Stu is always a bit too low-key, even
when he's doing his painting, so as a dramatic character he never
becomes all that interesting.  Lee is appropriately mysterious, but her
vampish persona goes overboard on occasion.  She doesn't inject enough
life into her performance to make it clear why everyone seems so
fascinated by her.  And sadly, Americans Dorff and Lee are both saddled
with uncomfortable accents.  BACKBEAT needs to feed off the conflict in
this central triangle, but there's not enough spark to their
interaction, and the film often plays like THE COMMITMENTS on
quaaludes.
     As long as the music is playing, BACKBEAT is quite good.  The rest
of The Beatles are played by great physical matches, particularly Gary
Bakewell as a dead ringer for the young Paul.  The songs are performed
by an all-star band (including REM's Mike Mills, Soul Asylum's David
Pirner and Nirvana's Dave Grohl) with an unrehearsed edge, and the
appeal of the energetic Beatles is obvious.  If only more of that
energy could have carried off stage.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
Starring:  Jean-Claude Van Damme, Ron Silver, Mia Sara.
Screenplay:  Mark Verheiden.
Director:  Peter Hyams.
     A muscular action hero with a thick accent stars in a science
fiction film about traveling into the past to change the future.  No,
I'm not talking about THE TERMINATOR, although I suspect the similarity
is more than coincidental.  Jean-Claude Van Damme has labored through
several virtually indistinguishable testosterone fests without
discovering his breakout hit, so TIMECOP must have seemed like the
perfect opportunity.  And it will probably do what it was intended to
do, expanding Van Damme's audience the way THE TERMINATOR expanded
Arnold Schwarzenegger's.  It's an energetic film that doesn't skimp on
the action, but it suffers from an over-convoluted storyline that
pushes the logic meter *way* into the red zone.
     Van Damme plays Max Walker, a Washington D.C. cop who is assigned
to a unique detail--the Time Enforcement Commission, instituted to
prevent abuses of the newly realized technology of time travel.  In
2004, Walker learns that a series of time travel "thefts" is connected
to the presidential campaign of Aaron McComb (Ron Silver), the U.S.
senator whose committee oversees the T.E.C.  As Walker follows McComb
through time, he finds himself presented with a time-altering
temptation of his own--preventing the death of his wife Melissa (Mia
Sara) in 1994.
     Volumes could be written about the slapdash and ultimately
self-contradictory treatment screenwriter Mark Verheiden (who also
co-created the comic book on which the film is based) gives to time
travel; sometimes it simply seems that he's making things up as he goes
along.  However, those are not the issues which hamper TIMECOP most.
There is more fundamental foolishness, like what exactly the T.E.C. has
been doing for ten years when it soon becomes clear that there is only
one other time machine in existence besides that which they use
themselves.  Either there has been an inordinate number of rogue
Timecops, or there was a spectacular level of stupidity involved in not
destroying the other machine.  Of course, this is a government agency
we are dealing with.  One also wonders why assassins from the future
can't be slightly less obtrusive than extras from THE ROAD WARRIOR.
     TIMECOP also stumbles with the inclusion of a female partner for
Walker, an internal affairs officer named Fielding (Gloria Reuben).
She is treated almost as an afterthought, an obligatory woman to occupy
the space between Mia Sara's scenes.  While Reuben is good working with
sketchy material, the character appears too late and disappears too
soon to leave any kind of impact on the story.  Everything about the
Fielding character feels contrived, sloppy and, worst of all,
completely unnecessary.
     The good news is that TIMECOP tends to work when everyone shuts up
and starts fighting.  Director Peter Hyams went a little nuts in the
editing room, making some of Van Damme's fight scenes look like they
were lit with a strobe, but they are mostly creative and well-
choreographed; only the final showdown drags on a bit.  The special
effects are sharp, and the computer-generated snap-back look to the
characters' movements through time is inventive and well-handled.  The
production values are generally impressive, and action fans will not be
too disappointed.
     The real pleasant surprise of TIMECOP turns out to be the acting
of Jean-Claude Van Damme.  Yes, that's right, I said acting.  Though
still sometimes difficult to understand through his Belgian accent, Van
Damme is an appealing performer who looks comfortable on screen,
something Steven Seagal has yet to accomplish.  TIMECOP isn't exactly a
demanding film for an actor, but Van Damme shows that he can provide
texture, something a bit more substantive than roundhouse kicks.  He
also gets to work off a suitably nasty villain in Ron Silver, who is
perfectly cast, and has a nice chemistry with the too-little-seen Mia
Sara.  It's too bad TIMECOP often feels bloated and preposterous,
because there's a bit of heart lurking beneath the hardware.  It's just
a bit too uneven to take advantage of its strengths.

Title
Review for Kingpin (1996)
(MGM)
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Randy Quaid, Vanessa Angel, Bill Murray.
Screenplay:  Barry Fanaro, Mort Nathan.
Producers:  Brad Krevoy, Steve Stabler, Bradley Thomas.
Directors:  Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Have you ever had an 11-year-old try to tell you a joke?  If so, you
will probably recognize a couple of typical qualities.  First, the
enthusiasm of the joke-teller far exceeds his mastery of the basic
principles of comic timing; second, the joke is almost certainly one
you've heard before, and probably one you told when you were 11.  Peter
and Bobby Farrelly (DUMB AND DUMBER) are still those 11-year-olds at
heart, and their sense of humor seems to have matured only marginally.  If
you laugh at their films, it is probably for the same reasons you might
laugh at the 11-year-old's joke:  their eagerness to amuse is endearing,
or there's a bit of the 11-year-old in you as well.  KINGPIN is often
disgusting, but that is usually when it is at its funniest.  It is also
often slow, and that is when it is an effort to get through.
     Woody Harrelson stars as Roy Munson, who was Iowa's State Bowling
Champion in 1979.  That year, as a rookie pro, he makes the mistake of
beating hot-shot Ernie "Big Ern" McCracken (Bill Murray), who turns out to
be a very sore loser.  McCracken sets Roy up during an attempted con, and
when Roy is found out the angry victims shove his bowling hand into the
ball return.  Seventeen years later, Roy is an alcoholic with a hook for a
right hand, but he sees a shot at returning to the big time when he spots
Ishmael Boorg (Randy Quaid) at the local bowling alley.  Roy offers to
train Ishmael for a $1 million pro tournament, but Ishmael happens to be a
devout Amish, with no interest in such things.  It is only when the Boorg
family farm is threatened by debt that Ishmael agrees to hit the road with
Roy, and misadventures ensue.
     KINGPIN is a film which tends toward the parody style of the
Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker (AIRPLANE!) films, with obvious homages to THE
NATURAL, THE COLOR OF MONEY, THE GRADUATE and INDECENT PROPOSAL among
others.  The operative word here is "obvious."  If obviousness were water,
KINGPIN would be the Pacific Ocean, giving each gag plenty of lead-up time
so you can anticipate the punch line and spend a moment groaning as it is
underlined for you.  When KINGPIN isn't obvious, it's sick.  Having
covered diarrhea, mucus and urine in DUMB AND DUMBER, the Farrellys move
right along their Bodily Emissions Hit Parade to vomit and semen.  And
when KINGPIN isn't sick, it's repetitious.  There are more individual
injuries to male genitalia in this film than in an entire season of
"America's Funniest Home Videos." 
     The thing about KINGPIN is that even when it is obvious, sick and/or
repetitious, it is still often very funny.  I will be very frank about
this:  it is funny in about as base a way as it is possible to be funny,
in a way that will be just plain unfunny to many people, or funny in a way
that might make you embarrassed to admit you found it funny.  It is funny
in that adolescent way that can't help but snicker at gags about hardened
nipples, farmers and sheep, or oral sex with a painfully unattractive
woman.  There are a few moments of inspiration in KINGPIN, particularly a
hilarious turn by Bill Murray as Roy's obnoxious rival which harkens back
to his smirking glory days, but this really isn't a film meant to operate
on an inspired level.  It is the kind of leering, slobbering, juvenile
comedy Mel Brooks is still trying to make, but appears to have forgotten
how to make, and it sneaks past your sense of indignation, into the most
primitive part of your backbrain, and gets you laughing.
     That said, KINGPIN still isn't particularly satisfying, mostly
because it makes the mistake of trying to create an actual dramatic
subtext.  At some point, the Farrellys and screenwriters Barry Fanaro and
Mort Nathan stop trying to parody THE COLOR OF MONEY and start trying to
_be_ THE COLOR OF MONEY, with Vanessa Angel as a streetwise lady playing
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio to Quaid's Tom Cruise and Harrelson's Paul
Newman.  Harrelson is left in the uncomfortable position of playing a
grotesquerie one minute and an ostensibly sympathetic loser the next, and
he isn't nimble enough to pull it off.  KINGPIN really crawls during its
final half hour as the Farrellys play up the redemption story, proving
once again that a scattershot comedy of this kind really has to pull in at
around 90 minutes.  Then again, lack of timing is just one more way the
Farrellys are like 11-year-old joke-tellers.  If you are over 21, KINGPIN
will probably be an erratic ride at best.  But if you are able to identify
with the 11-year-old in you, hold on to your sides.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
     During one fifteen minute sequence in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, I was
reminded of what a masterful director of suspense Brian DePalma can be
when he is on his game.  In that sequence, government undercover operative
Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise) is attempting to break into a CIA computer
facility to steal information which will help him clear his name after he
is suspected of being a double-agent, with the assistance of a team of
other disavowed agents (Ving Rhames, Emmanuelle Beart and Jean Reno).
That facility, however, is filthy with security systems:  laser sensors,
heat sensors, pressure sensors, sound sensors.  As Cruise attempts to
download files and get out of the booby-trapped room safely, DePalma
creates the kind of suspense that most directors of action only dream
about -- you're wondering not only _if_ Cruise will be caught, but which
alarm will go off first.  The CIA set piece is crisply edited, and set up
and executed with skill and flair.  For those fifteen minutes, DePalma is
a genius again, and MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is all you could ask a summer
adventure-thriller to be.
     This had to come as a dream assignment for DePalma, whose career has
been a virtual relief map of peaks (THE UNTOUCHABLES) and valleys (THE
BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES).  It's telling that you won't see DePalma's name
anywhere in the advertising campaign for MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE -- he's
obviously not considered much of a selling point -- but it's the kind of
job that can put a guy back on the A-list.  What a shame that with the
exception of those furiously tense fifteen minutes, DePalma seems to be
spending most of his time on damage control.  The film is full of cockeyed
angles, extreme close-ups, flashbacks and slow-motion, as DePalma tries to
create the illusion that somewhere buried in all the busy detail of plot,
something is actually at stake in MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE.
     Just to demonstrate that I understand the point of MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE, I will observe that it is a premise, a property, a franchise,
an identifiable name to be exploited.  It is an espionage thriller which
comes conveniently after GOLDENEYE has demonstrated that there is still a
market for espionage thrillers, and it is yet another escapist
entertainment like TWISTER which treats story and character as luxury
items not afforded by budgets in the neighborhood of $70 million (a very
comfortable neighborhood).  The problem is that MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE
carries on as though the story _is_ supposed to matter -- that we're
supposed to care enough about Ethan Hunt as a character to want to see him
succeed in his quest to vindicate himself, that we're supposed to
understand there is a personal, mentor-like relationship between Hunt and
his team leader Jim Phelps (Jon Voight), that we're supposed to identify
any personal qualities in any of the individuals who comprise Hunt's IMF
teams.  There are scenes throughout the film which suggest that we're
supposed to find the relationships between people relevant in some way,
and instead I found myself scratching my head and wondering where,
precisely, I was supposed to have picked up that information.
     Even DePalma makes several puzzling choices during the film,
including an ill-advised sequence which shows us through flashback that
Hunt knows someone is lying to him, making a scene which comes later
thoroughly anti-climactic.  Still, he seems most of the time to be trying
his best with a script by David Koepp and Robert Towne (and which featured
story assistance from Steven Zaillian) which is both simplistic in premise
and ridiculously convoluted and confusing in the execution.  There is one
extremely well-handled and unexpected development quite early in the film,
and it offers the hope that MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is going to avoid the
predictability bug.  However, at its heart MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is about
one real question -- who is the real traitor -- and I found myself waiting
for the inevitable revelation through a morass of ridiculous leaps of
logic.
     MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE's two other action set pieces will certainly have
their fans, and there are moments of excitement and cleverness in both of
them.  But I found the opening sequence brutally edited, and if you've
seen any trailers or commercials for the film (and how could you miss
them), you've seen the best moment in the big high-speed train finale.
No, there is only one real reason to see MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, and that is
those fifteen precious minutes when you are reminded that a scene without
special effects can be gripping because it was put together by a superb
craftsman, a director who can momentarily make you forget about a sloppy
script, and make you care about the fate of cardboard cutouts.  

Title
Review for One Fine Day (1996)
     Just in case you think the term "soccer mom" was nothing but a
convenient demographic catch-phrase for the 1996 presidential election,
ONE FINE DAY presents Michelle Pfeiffer as an in-the-flesh soccer mom, and
her life is every bit as complicated as we have been led to believe.  In
between frying the bacon up in a pan and bringing it home, she has to deal
with child care dilemmas, unsympathetic co-workers and sleep deprivation.
It's one frantic day, all right, one that is equally frantic for "soccer
dad" George Clooney, and it begins to turn ONE FINE DAY into a
soci-political spin on PLANES, TRAINS AND AUTOMOBILES.  Unfortunately,
this is supposed to be a romantic comedy, and the romance is dropped into
this unfocused piece of work like an afterthought.
     Pfeiffer plays Melanie Parker, a divorced architect with a 6-year-old
son named Sammy (Alex D. Linz) and a very tight schedule ahead of her.
She is also responsible for bringing Sammy's classmate Maggie Taylor (Mae
Whitman) to school, and the schedule becomes even tighter when Maggie does
not show up on time.  That is because Maggie's mother has left her with
ex-husband Jack Taylor (Clooney), a cocky investigative reporter with a
somewhat cavalier attitude about parenting.  When both kids miss the bus
to a field trip, Jack and Melanie are stuck with their children though
both have little time to spare.  Out of sheer desperation, the pair end up
helping each other out with the kids, despite an apparent antagonism.
That antagonism begins to change into something else throughout the day,
as Jack and Melanie are forced to re-consider their priorities.
     If the idea of ONE FINE DAY is simply to show us how tough single
parents have it, then I suppose it does its job.  Both Jack and Melanie
lose and re-find the children with some regularity, both are forced to
make compromises and both find that working through their own relationship
issues is the last thing they have time for.  ONE FINE DAY is basically a
string of crises of varying magnitude, and while a few are amusing, the
cumulative effect inspires more anxiety than chuckles.  Sammy is a
particularly distressing case, a boy in desperate need of attention who
drives his mother to tears with his inability to stay in one place and
cause no damage.  With inserts of clocks consistently reminding us of
impending deadlines, ONE FINE DAY delivers the nerve-wracking realism of
impossible demands without leavening it with enough humor.
     It also delivers very little romance, and that's a shame, because
Pfeiffer and Clooney click in the few moments they actually share the
screen.  There is a pat quality to the contemporary urban
battle-of-the-sexes banter -- think WHEN HARRY MET SALLY AT THE DAY CARE
CENTER -- but neither star cranks up the sniping to an aggravating livel.
Clooney may not have the best comic timing (or hairdresser) in the world,
but he has an affable charm as the irresponsible Jack, and Pfeiffer's
attempts to maintain her dignity while wearing a dinosaur T-shirt to a
business meeting are equally winning.  In the film's final fifteen
minutes, when Melanie and Jack finally get a chance to take a breath,
there is a casual sexiness which finally seems in keeping with Natalie
Merchant's torchy rendering of the Carole King/Gerry Goffin title song
which opens the film.  By the time you get there, however, you may be
nearly as exhausted as Melanie and Jack.
     Director Michael Hoffman (SOAPDISH, RESTORATION) has made some
interesting films with a lot going on in them, but ONE FINE DAY is a case
where he just wasn't able to tame the script (by Terrel Seltzer and Ellen
Simon).  Somewhere in there is an energetic little modern romance, but it
gets buried under the side tracks of Melanie and Jack's respective
occupational dilemmas, to the point where a press conference where Jack
nails a corrupt politician is set up as the film's climax.  You may be
startled when you realize that there is still a lot of ONE FINE DAY left
to go, time for it to deliver at last the relationship it teased you with  
in trailers, posters, and ninety minutes of running time.  By that point
it has become clear that, like its protagonists, ONE FINE DAY is too busy
for something as mundane as a relationship when there are jobs to do, kids
to watch and, yes, soccer games to attend.

Title
Review for Microcosmos: Le peuple de l'herbe (1996)
     Kristin Scott Thomas's narration occupies only about ninety seconds
of the dazzling documentary MICROCOSMOS, which made it even easier to hear
every comment in an audience composed largely of families with young
children.  Ordinarily, the prospect of an afternoon spent with a crowd of
garrulous youngsters might send me screaming for an IV drip of Valium, but
the 75 minutes I spent in MICROCOSMOS may have been the most uplifting 75
minutes I've spent in a theater in years.  Here were 9- and 10-year-olds
asking questions about insects, enraptured by the natural world,
chattering excitedly in the lobby afterwards about their favorite scenes.
It was one of those rare occasions when a film left me a bit more
optimistic about our collective future as inquisitive beings.
     MICROCOSMOS is the result of nearly twenty years invested by
film-makers Claude Nuridsany and Marie Perennou in creating the
technology, researching their subject and actual filming which would
provide a never-before-seen perspective into the insect world.  Their
marvelous miniature camera work allows them to present a documentary which
is structured as a "day in the life" of the universe beneath your feet,
from a butterfly "waking up" in its chrysalis to an evening alive with
sound.  In between, they confront the big subjects which face all God's
creatures:  birth, sex, work, death and natural disasters.
     It is a simple enough concept (though the process was anything but
simple), but what makes MICROCOSMOS so consistently enthralling is the
ability of Nuridsany and Perennou to find stories in their tiny subjects,
stories which give them a personality.  The quest for food is presented
with protective ants attacking a ladybug which has happened across their
feeding ground; the quest for water finds caterpillars moving across
parched ground like a fuzzy caravan, and ants gathered around a watering
hole.  Mating is not shown in clinical detail with a dry narrative
description -- instead, two snails meet, caress and embrace in a strangely
beautiful moment set to a soaring aria.  In perhaps the film's most
memorable sequence, a sacred scarab beetle rolls a small ball of dung
until he is halted by a briar jutting out of the ground.  Over the course
of three minutes, that beetle becomes Sisyphus moving his stone, and its
success sends up a round of applause.
     The ability of that sequence to turn a beetle into a hero
demonstrates that Nuridsany and Perennou have a talent most feature
film-makers only dream about.  Most of us have seen nature footage of
birds or amphibians which made the insects the insects upon which they
snacked insignificant bit players in the food chain.  MICROCOSMOS is like
a novel based on another novel's supporting characters, turning sub-plots
into life stories.  You find yourself vaguely sympathetic when a bird
lands and begins feeding at an anthill, each peck reverberating like a
massive footstep.  One exceptional shot captures the bird's eye through
the entrance to the ants' tunnels like an ogre peeping through a keyhole
at his prey; another represents the bird as a monstrous shadow.  The
film-makers want to show you parts of our world you may have taken for
granted, and to show you in a way which grabs you as a narrative as much
as an entomology lesson.
     In fact, the only time MICROCOSMOS sags is when it does resemble
conventional nature footage.  It is interesting watching a spider
speed-wrap a grasshopper caught in its web, but it is a purely
intellectual interest; the same is true of a spider which constructs a
kind of underwater diving bell for itself.  These are moments which might
make you go "hmmm," but they don't fascinate you like a battle between
stag beetles which seems to personalize the combatants.  Yet one of the
best moments in the stag beetle sequence is a seemingly throwaway scene of
another, smaller insect being tossed to the ground during the titanic
struggle like a nameless patron in a Western bar room brawl.  It seems
that even within this world there are supporting characters, and the
wonderful thing about MICROCOSMOS is that you find yourself waiting for
Nuridsany and Perennou to follow the unfortunate fellow on his own
adventure, to the delight of children and adults alike.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
     Our collective existential/millennial/Y2K-bug angst now has been
channelled officially into one cinematic premise:  the line between
reality and virtual reality is growing too thin for comfort, and
cyberspace is intruding on our personal space.  No fewer than three 1999
releases are set to spook us with our infatuation with jacked-in
sensation:  eXistenZ, THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR, and the first entry, THE
MATRIX.  Though the marketing campaign (and official web site) teases us
with the cryptic question "what is The Matrix?", it wouldn't be giving
anything away to say that it's something you'll be seeing a lot of over
the next few months.
     We'll all be fortunate if what we see is as kinetically entertaining
as THE MATRIX.  The story begins as mild-mannered software engineer Thomas
Anderson (Keanu Reeves) -- alias hacker-for-hire Neo -- begins to suspect
that something is strange in his world.  He has been contacted by a
mysterious woman named Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss) on behalf of infamous
hacker Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne), and has become the target of shadowy
agents led by Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving).  His very concept of reality
bending around him, Neo meets with Morpheus to learn an astonishing truth:
nothing in his experience is what it appears to be, and Neo himself may be
the key to saving all humanity.
     If that description seems a bit coy, it's only because part of the
fun in the first half of THE MATRIX is allowing its bizarre cosmology to
unfold.  On the surface it bears a resemblance to 1998's psycho-dystopia
DARK CITY, but writer/directors Andy and Larry Wachowski (BOUND) avoid the
murky pretentiousness that turned DARK CITY into art direction in search
of a movie.  Though there's plenty of exposition required to explain
what's going on in THE MATRIX, the Wachowskis manage to do it with a wink
and a smile, investing the expository segments with wit and imagination.
The film's first hour is somewhat slow going, yet even while waiting for
it to gain momentum there's a certain confidence that it will.
     And boy, does it ever.  The action sequences in THE MATRIX are some
of the best in a long time, combining wicked visual effects (familiar to
those who've seen any Gap commercials lately) with creative choreography.
Fully aware that they're dealing physics of their own invention, the
Wachowskis let loose with both barrels, sending THE MATRIX over-the-top
and into the realm of video game excess.  Amazingly, it almost never feels
like a video-game movie, thanks mostly to the Wachowskis' sure-handed
pacing but also to some ingenious casting.  They take advantage of Keanu
Reeves for all the pretty-boy befuddlement he's worth, even having some
fun with his less-than-brilliant image; Hugo Weaving's clinically
enunciated diction helps turn Agent Smith into a perfect icy antagonist.
THE MATRIX is a blast, but it's never a dumb blast.  Where else would you
find a hero adding "Drunken Boxing" to his fighting repertoire?
     There are plenty of places where it feels like THE MATRIX could have
been tidied up a bit -- a lengthy chase here, a pointless romantic angle
there, a conversation about why everything tastes like chicken over there
-- to bring the running time down below two hours.  It's the kind of movie
that will turn off plenty of viewers, either because of its violence, its
convoluted story or its pokiness in getting to the good stuff.  Others
will see THE MATRIX as the kind of film that makes use of action and
special effects instead of being used by them, the kind of film that takes
that extra moment to turn its big showdown into a classic spaghetti
Western confrontation.  If virtual reality is the flavor of the month,
plug me in to something like THE MATRIX, and give me a world where the
adventure is worth two hours of my time.

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
Starring:  John Travolta, Kyra Sedgwick, Forest Whitaker, Robert Duvall.
Screenplay:  Gerald DiPego.
Director:  Jon Turtletaub.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
Opens Wednesday, July 3 in wide release.
     Jon Turtletaub has a quality as a director which seems to be fairly
uncommon lately:  patience.  He had surprise successes with his last two
films, 1993's COOL RUNNINGS and last year's WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING, and
generally those successes were attributed to the Disney underdog formula
and Sandra Bullock's rising star, respectively.  While those factors
certainly played a significant role, I also believe that audiences
appreciated a style which told simple stories simply.  Turtletaub's
direction gave you the impression that he felt he was doing his job best
if he stood back, allowed his narrative to unfold, and didn't draw
attention to himself.  That is a refreshing perspective in an era of music
video auteurs, but apparently it also can be taken a bit too far.
PHENOMENON finds Turtletaub bringing his leisurely manner to a story
which, somewhere along the line, needed a bit more energy.
     PHENOMENON stars John Travolta as George Malley, a simple auto
mechanic in the small Northern California town of Harmon.  On his 37th
birthday, as he is leaving a party at a bar, George receives a rather
unexpected gift:  a flash of light from the sky which literally knocks him
off his feet.  When he rouses himself, he finds that he is a changed man.
He devours book at the rate of three a day, begins experiments in
agriculture and engineering and finds he is able to move objects with a
thought.  The town doctor (Robert Duvall) is unable to explain the
phenomenon, and George's abilities begin to inspire fear and concern in
the people of Harmon.  Only George's best friend Nate (Forest Whitaker)
and a woman named Lace (Kyra Sedgwick) seem able to accept the amazing
abilities which have made George a threat in the eyes of many.
     I had feared that PHENOMENON would be yet another tiresome spin on
"benevolent stranger among us" tales like E.T., STARMAN and last year's
odious POWDER.  The latter was an example of the worst kind, the kind of
film whose sole purpose seems to be to make us feel better about ourselves
for being so much more understanding than the oppressive, narrow-minded
cowards in the film.  There are whispers of that theme in PHENOMENON, but
screenwriter Gerald DiPego's story is much more focused on George's
reaction to the changes in himself than on the reaction of others to those
changes.  John Travolta turns in a strong, textured performance as George,
a man whose mind has become so active that it risks overwhelming him.  He
is like a man who has awakened one morning to find that he now thinks in a
different language; every attempt to communicate with the people who once
were his friends becomes a frustrating ordeal.
     The moments when PHENOMENON does begin to feel like a "benevolent
stranger" film are rare, but they are also rather telling.  There are evil
government types in PHENOMENON who want to study George or use him to
gather foreign intelligence, there is an evil doctor (Richard Kiley) who
wants to cut up George's brain while he is still using it, and there is a
scene where a mob starts to turn on George, but Turtletaub only makes a
nodding acknowledgment of these conventions.  The villainous Feds and
scientists are only bit players, not really serving to drive the
narrative, and the "mob" is more like a rather insistent group of
autograph-seekers.  Turtletaub seems uncomfortable with such dramatic
devices, and his sense of restraint is admirable.  The problem is that he
and DiPego really don't provide much in place of those devices to generate
conflict.
     A love story between George and Lace eventually occupies a lot of
time, and it is carefully developed, with Sedgwick playing an abandoned
mother of two trying to recover her faith in men.  It's a perfectly sweet
romance, but it underscores the lack of passion in PHENOMENON; the big
moment between George and Lace has her washing and cutting his hair.  A
film like PHENOMENON demands more moments of catharsis, opportunities to
feel deeply for the plight of the hero.  Turtletaub banks on the rosy glow
of Phedon Papamichael's cinematography, Thomas Newman's jaunty score and
the fine performances of his cast (including a lovably eccentric Forest
Whitaker) to generate the good will needed to carry PHENOMENON across the
finish line.  They carry it remarkably far, but as PHENOMENON neared the
two hour mark, I began to wish Turtletaub had gone for a bit less serenity
and a bit more urgency.

Title
Review for Heaven & Earth (1993)
Starring:  Hiep Thi Le, Tommy Lee Jones, Joan Chen, Haing S. Ngor.
Screenplay/Director:  Oliver Stone.
     The problem with Oliver Stone, in my humble opinion, has always
been that he just doesn't know when to shut up.  I have long been a
detractor of Stone's, but that opinion hasn't been a result of his
visual style; each of his films can boast at least one moment of real
flair.  Unfortunately, Stone's tendency towards the pedantic often
obscures those elements of his films which do work.  HEAVEN AND EARTH,
Stone's third foray into the Vietnam War, is much the same.  Every once
in a while, when he lets his camera do the talking, you can see the
potential for greatness, but the talky, over-narrated script blunts the
film's power.
     HEAVEN AND EARTH spans thirty years in the life of Le Ly (Hiep Thi
Le), a Vietnamese farm girl from the small village of Ky La.  She grows
up during the French occupation, then watches as the Viet Cong begins
to win the support of the people, including two of her brothers.  The
fighting is encouraged by Le Ly's fiery Mama (Joan Chen), but meets
with the disapproval of introspective Papa (Haing S. Ngor).  Conflicts
with both the V.C. and the South Vietnamese government soon force Le Ly
and her mother into Saigon, where different hardships await.  She
finally seems to find happiness with an American Marine (Tommy Lee
Jones), but as she begins life in America she discovers that for
herself and many others, the war is still not over.
     Visually, there are several sequences worthy of an Oliver Stone
highlight reel.  Cinematographer Robert Richardson's opening shots of
Ky La are rich and beautiful, including a particularly striking image
of an orange-robed Buddhist monk walking through tall green grass.
There is an intense sequence involving Le Ly's torture at the hands of
the Southern government which had the entire audience gasping and
squirming.  Perhaps most notable is the whimsical portrayal of Le Ly's
first encounters with American consumer culture, including a
slow-motion walk to an overstuffed refrigerator and the preparation of
a dinner entirely from frozen and canned foods.  Stone has a keen
directorial eye, and HEAVEN AND EARTH is usually interesting to watch.
     Would that Stone's ear were so keen.  HEAVEN AND EARTH's primary
responsibility is to pull the viewer into Le Ly's suffering, but that
never really happened for me.  The main reason for this failure is
Stone's decision to use--and over-use--narration by Le Ly.  There is
very little in the narration which could not have been demonstrated
visually, and it acts as a distancing mechanism, providing a
retrospective voice which doesn't allow the trials of a teenage girl to
seem like they're happening to a teenage girl.  It's sloppy
screenwriting on Stone's part, and all the more disappointing because
he's so much better at showing than he is at telling.  Where we should
be focusing on harrowing images, instead we get speeches.
     Newcomer Hiep Thi Le has to carry the two and a half hour film,
and essentially she's up to the task.  As with most novices, her
biggest problems are with scenes requiring big emotions, but those
problems are not distracting.  Le displays Le Ly's strength and
determination admirably, as well as her conviction that karma from a
past life is responsible for her current troubles.  Joan Chen is
extremely effective as Le Ly's mother, and Haing S. Ngor turns in his
second strong performance of the year (after MY LIFE) as Papa.
Conchata Ferrell is also notable in a scene-stealing turn as Le Ly's
gabby American sister-in-law.  However, the one disappointing
supporting performance is turned in by Tommy Lee Jones.  His Sgt.
Butler is only sketchily developed, appearing late in the film and
never developing fully enough to make his later actions
understandable.  Still, Stone is a fine director of actors, and his
cast is basically strong.
     Stone's intention with HEAVEN AND EARTH was clearly to show us
that as much as we in America think we suffered as a result of the
Vietnam War, Vietnam suffered more.  There are glimpses of that
suffering, but it should have been a much easier point to bring
across.  Le Ly experiences more suffering than most lifetimes, but it
never seemed quite real.  Elements of HEAVEN AND EARTH carry undeniable
impact, but when it was money time he should have descended from his
soapbox and let his camera do the talking.

Title
Review for Loss of Sexual Innocence, The (1999)
THE LOSS OF SEXUAL INNOCENCE
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Julian Sands, Saffron Burrows, Stefano Dionisi, Kelly
Macdonald, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers, Hanne Klintoe, Femi Ogumbanjo.
Screenplay:  Mike Figgis.
Producers:  Mike Figgis and Annie Stewart.
Director:  Mike Figgis.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Is THE LOSS OF SEXUAL INNOCENCE, Mike Figgis' experimental non-linear
tone poem, pretentious?  Of course it is -- you've got to have a healthy
streak of pretentiousness in you to break free from conventional narrative
structure and make something so distinct that it's occasionally
confounding.  Perhaps a better question is whether THE LOSS OF SEXUAL
INNOCENCE is nothing _but_ pretentious.  Even more so than in most films,
the answer to that question will be an eye-of-the-beholder proposition.
Some will see little more than insufferable, gratuitous, iconoclastic
noodling.  Others will see a film that grips you with many of its images
even as it keeps you at an artistic arm's length.
     Though there is no structured "story" to THE LOSS OF SEXUAL
INNOCENCE, there is a focal point in the character of Nic, seen at various
formative stages of his life.  As an adolescent (Jonathan Rhys-Meyers), he
has his first fumbling sexual experiences; as an adult (Julian Sands), he
struggles with a marriage to a wife (Kelly Macdonald) as full of doubts as
he is.  Much of the film deals with Nic's work as an ethnographic
film-maker, working with a crew in a remote African location, while
another sub-plot spins us off into the world of twins (Saffron Burrows)
separated at birth.  And serving as a bridge between all these episodes is
an impressionistic rendering of the Eden story, following the experiences
of Adam (Femi Ogumbanjo) and Eve (Hanne Klintoe).
     What may appear from that description to be a fragmented film
actually feels surprisingly cohesive.  Figgis maintains a consistent tone
for his various images, creating a collection of cinematic short stories
as thematically connected as Hemingway's _A Moveable Feast_.  The piano
music of Schumann and Chopin trades places with Figgis' own compositions,
accentuating some magical cinematography by Benoit Delhomme.  If you allow
yourself to get lost in THE LOSS OF SEXUAL INNOCENCE, and avoid succumbing
to the temptation to figure out what everything "means," it can wash over
your resistance to its unconventionality.  Some of the individual stories,
like a chance meeting between the twins, pack an emotional wallop; some of
the individual visions, like a golden landscape that dissolves into the
ripples of a water reflection, are breathtakingly unforgettable.
     And, to be frank, some of it is just plain weird.  In one sequence,
we are shown the dreams of Nic and his wife.  Instead of giving us a view
of an inner life, the scenes play out like a parody of dream images, full
of dissonant music and shifting realities like a years-too-late outtake
from "Twin Peaks."  Most baffling and annoying to some will be the Garden
of Eden sequences, which conspicuously match a transluscently Nordic Eve
with a strikingly black Adam, both of whom are fully nude in every scene.
There's nothing particularly revelatory about Figgis' account of the Fall
but his interracial First Parents, nothing visually compelling in his
unblinking staredown with innocence personified.  By the time the tale
closes with an absurd vision of paparazzi chasing the now-fallen pair
outside the gates of Paradise, it all starts to look more like a Calvin
Klein ad than a cinematic experiment.
     That's the level on which THE LOSS OF SEXUAL INNOCENCE is bound to
set to itching those who can't stand it when their art looks this
in-your-face art-y.  There are times when Figgis' efforts grow wearying in
their lack of basic resonance with the viewer's experiences.  There are
also times when he hits the nail spectacularly on the head, and times when
the film works on an almost symphonic level.  Mike Figgis wants to use the
cinema the way only cinema can be used, and without question he does so.
The extent to which this mixed bag of mourning and memory succeeds is a
matter for _extremely_ subjective analysis.

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK (1998)
(United Artists)
Starring:  Leonardo DiCaprio, John Malkovich, Jeremy Irons, Gabriel Byrne,
Gerard Depardieu, Anne Parillaud.
Screenplay:  Randall Wallace, based on the novel by Alexandre Dumas.
Producers:  Randall Wallace and Russell Smith.
Director:  Randall Wallace.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  124 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the depths of Paris' infamous Bastille, circa 1662, five figures
stand.  One man is the reason the other four have gathered:  he is
Phillippe (Leonardo DiCaprio) -- the long-imprisoned twin brother of King
Louis XIV (also DiCaprio) -- rescued by these benefactors to replace his
despotic sibling on the throne.  The four other men are figures of legend:
retired Musketeers Aramis (Jeremy Irons), Athos (John Malkovich) and
Pothos (Gerard Depardieu), reunited with their old comrade D'Artagnan
(Gabriel Byrne).  As they prepare to face the King's guard, armaments and
odds heavily against them, the figures cross their swords and utter one of
literature's best-known oaths of allegiance:  "One for all, all for one."
     It is the moment most of the audience -- the non-teenage-female,
DiCaprio-swooning portion -- has been waiting for.  It is a moment
guaranteed to inspire pseudo-spontaneous applause and whoops of
approval...assuming the audience hasn't drifted into a heavy slumber.  For
around 100 minutes, Randall Wallace's rendition of THE MAN IN THE IRON
MASK wanders through attractive sets in search of a consistent tone,
thematic coherence or even a real point.  Is it a lavish, lusty period
romp in the spirit of Richard Lester's 1970s MUSKETEERS films?  Is it a
moody Dickensian pot-boiler of a mysterious parentage and uncertain
motivations?  Is it a showcase for Tiger Beat poster-boy-du-jour DiCaprio?
Is it _ever_ going to get down to the business of Musketeers buckling a
few swashes?  Wallace effectively combined vengeance, romance and
adventure in his script for BRAVEHEART, but in his first film behind the
camera he never seems clear how to unite all the elements he introduces.
THE MAN IN THE IRON MASK sputters and hesitates like the work of a nervous
rookie who just keeps throwing stuff at the screen in the vain hope that,
eventually, something's gotta stick.
     The uninvolving and ponderous first hour and a half leaves a viewer
plenty of time to scratch at minor annoyances until they become major
annoyances.  Meticulously smudged rabble rouse themselves for a minor riot
for exactly one scene, perhaps to distract momentarily from the impression
that this is an epic with a cast of tens.  Half the cast speaks with
French accents (all genuine, courtesy Depardieu, Anne Parillaud and
plasticine ingenue Judith Godreche), while the other half appears to have
wandered in from Malibu, or London, or Dublin.  Given the chance to bite
into Louis XIV's nastiness with relish, DiCaprio instead gives him a
tiresome Method twist which suggests he just wants to be loved.  And who
is Peter Sarsgaard (playing the son of Aramis), and has anyone ever done a
more frighteningly dead-on impression of John Malkovich?
     All might have been forgiven if only Wallace had played the Musketeer
trump card for all it was worth.  He's got viewers right where he wants
them with such iconic characters at his disposal; the good will is as
palpable as it is at a James Bond film, where the mere utterance of a
trademark phrase generates a ripple of excitement.  There's just no good
excuse to waste that kind of good will on one or two rounds of lackluster
swordplay.  Dumas wrote wonderful pulp; Wallace tries to turn that pulp
into something it's not, only he's not exactly sure what that is.  THE MAN
IN THE IRON MASK is a big muddled mess of an adventure yarn, satisfying
only for those interested in going to watch DiCaprio in regal finery
looking his prettiest.  Others will find a waste of stellar cast and
classic story which never gets a handle on what the film should have been
about for the average viewer:  a chance to cheer for the crossed swords of
re-born legends just a bit earlier than 100 minutes after the lights go
down.

Title
Review for Airheads (1994)
Starring:  Brendan Fraser, Steve Buscemi, Adam Sandler, Joe
Mantegna, Michael McKean, Michael Richards, Chris Farley.
Screenplay:  Rich Wilkes.
Director:  Michael Lehmann.
     It can now be considered official: HEATHERS was a fluke.
Director Michael Lehmann's 1989 debut has become a cult classic, an
acidic satire of contemporary teen culture with a surreal edge, perhaps
most famous for launching Winona Ryder and Christian Slater on the road
to stardom.  But since then, Lehmann has helmed the
practically-straight-to-video clunker MEET THE APPLEGATES and the
nigh-legendary bomb HUDSON HAWK.  After a couple of years licking his
wounds and doing TV work (including THE LARRY SANDERS SHOW), Lehmann
has returned to the big screen with an inept would-be rock and roll
comedy, AIRHEADS.  Only a loopy performance by Adam Sandler and a
slightly more energetic final twenty minutes save it from complete
disaster.
     AIRHEADS stars Brendan Fraser as Chazz, a struggling musician who
undergoes a daily ritual of being thrown out of record company offices
for trying to smuggle in the demo tape for his band The Lone Rangers.
One day, he comes up with a more creative way to get noticed, and he
and fellow Lone Rangers Rex (Steve Buscemi) and Pip (Adam Sandler)
sneak into a radio station to get the demo on the air.  When reason
fails, the band takes the station hostage with water guns, including a
sarcastic d.j. (Joe Mantegna) and the obnoxious program director
(Michael McKean).  The attempt to get the demo played becomes a comedy
of errors, all played out live over the airwaves to a growing army of
fans.
     In its appealing trailers, AIRHEADS looked like it was going to be
a smart comedy about stupid people.  Consider yourself warned: this is
another case where every funny line is in the trailer.  The main
problem with AIRHEADS turns out to be that it's a stupid comedy about
people who aren't stupid enough.  Adam Sandler is perfect; his
thick-as-a-brick reading of Pip is far and away the best thing about
AIRHEADS, good for some genuinely inspired comedy.  Fraser, however, is
playing a basically average guy, and Buscemi comes off as flat-out
intellectual.  AIRHEADS had the potential for a lot of laughs coming
from the reaction of reasonably normal hostages and police to
impossibly stupid band members.  Unfortunately, some of the hostages
and most of the police officers are more idiotic than The Lone
Rangers.  The result is a bunch of jokes based on lame confrontations
between the band members and a militant black d.j., McKean's fatuous
corporate type and each other, consisting almost entirely of
third-grade insults focusing on bodily functions and sexual
preference.  The characters in AIRHEADS simply never interact in a way
that's remotely interesting or funny.  Even the strange supporting cast
(including "Seinfeld's" Michael Richards as an accountant sneaking
through the radio station's ventilation system) and a few creative
cameos (including a voice-only spot by a pair of well-known rock
critics) land with a thud.
     While the character-based comedy fails, AIRHEADS might have had a
chance if it had actually been about something, if it had had a point
of view or and attitude about *anything*.  It's not a parody of
corporate music, or corporate radio, or heavy metal youth culture, or
even other hostage-based movies like DOG DAY AFTERNOON.  There are a
few clever moments near the end which take shots at the cult of
personality surrounding crimes-in-progress (all too familiar in the
wake of the roadside cheering section in the O. J. Simpson chase), but
they come so late that they seem almost incidental.  Actually, AIRHEADS
might be viewed cynically as about one very specific thing:  selling a
tie-in soundtrack album.
     In a crowd scene near the film's conclusion, there is a glimpse of
the Michael Lehmann of HEATHERS.  After Chazz is forced to make an
embarrassing confession, a number of kids in the crowd outside the
radio station make their own embarrassing confessions in a show of
solidarity.  It's the kind of whacked-out moment that made HEATHERS
unique, and there are a couple more like it that briefly give AIRHEADS
a bit of juice.  Sadly, they are stretched out over a 90 minute movie.

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
     I envy Forest Whitaker, because he's one man who doesn't have to hear
that accusation most men hear when it comes to "women's films":  that he
"just doesn't get it."  Black women seemed to think he got it when he made
the surprise hit WAITING TO EXHALE, and Whitaker himself seemed to think
he could continue getting it when he chose HOPE FLOATS as his follow-up
project.  Women and men, mothers and daughters, girls and their
girlfriends...yep, Whitaker has thrown his y chromosome into the fray with
a blissful disregard for the conventional wisdom that men can't do justice
to the trials of women.
     I'm sure someone somewhere will accuse me of "just not getting" HOPE
FLOATS.  What I really didn't get was how Whitaker could take a fairly
simple story and make it so ragged and unfocused.  It opens promisingly
enough, with a clever sequence in which a devastated Birdee Pruitt (Sandra
Bullock) learns on a nationally televised daytime talk show that her
husband Bill (Michael Pare) is having an affair with her best friend (an
unbilled Rosanna Arquette).  Birdee promptly packs up her things and her
young daughter Bernice (Mae Whitman) and drives from Chicago back to her
hometown of Smithville, Texas where her mother (Gena Rowlands) still lives
and where all her high school classmates still remember her as the
cheerleader and homecoming queen who seemed to have it all.
     HOPE FLOATS might have worked if it had explored its unique premise
for all its dramatic and comedic possibilities.  Surrounding an
emotionally wounded housewife with people who knew her as a teen beauty
queen -- and who most likely harbor a secret delight at her failure --
would be a fascinating way to to watch her grow up and come to terms with
the unreasonable expectations of her youth.  Instead, HOPE FLOATS
relegates that context to a few isolates snippets, opting instead to focus
on plastic relationship dynamics.  Harry Connick Jr. plays the role of the
nice guy with such obvious puppy dog likeabilty that there's never a
moment's tension in the romance between him and Bullock.  The
mother-daughter relationship between Bullock and Rowlands is similarly
tepid, despite a pleasant performance by Rowlands in the role of
conspicuous eccentric (she practices home taxidermy).  The film never
feels like anyone knows exactly where it should go, what we should be
learning about Birdee, and why her story should matter to us at all.
     Part of the problem -- perhaps a very large part -- is the casting of
Bullock in the lead role.  Bullock is a charming actress with a killer
smile, but she doesn't appear to have the faintest idea how to play this
character.  So what she does is smile, and smile constantly, in every
possible context to display every possible emotion.  She smiles radiantly
while dancing with Connick; she smiles pleasantly while accepting the
barbs of her former classmates; she smiles ruefully when she turns down
Connick's request for a date; she smiles drunkenly at a bar.  It makes
a certain sense that the one-time Miss Congeniality would be an inveterate
smiler, but her smile is used as substitute for characterization, as
though it won't matter that we don't understand her at all as long as we
find her so darned nice.
     This generally scattered approach to the material carries through
Whitaker's direction -- in cross-cutting which blunts emotional impact, in 
abrupt changes of focus, in an over-dependence on Caleb Deschanel's silky
cinematography.  The best result of his lack of focus is the amount of
time spent following Bernice and her cousin Travis (LEAVE IT TO BEAVER's
Cameron Finley), the nearly-abandoned son of Birdee's flighty would-be
actress sister.  Both young actors are wonderful, Whitman coping with
taunting classmates and the absence of her father, Travis living in a
perpetual fantasy world dressed up as a frog or a cowboy or a dog.  Their
story -- the story of how absentee parents affect children's lives -- is
infinitely more involving than Birdee's rather mundane and inevitable trip
to "finding herself" (i.e. hooking up with a nice guy).  Sure there are
a few sniffles and chuckles along the way, but nothing nearly as potent as
Bernice howling in pain as her father leaves her behind.  Maybe Forest
Whitaker will end up demonstrating a knack for "getting" the stories of
children.  As for whether he "gets" women's stories...well, maybe he'll
have to face that accusation after all.

Title
Review for Legends of the Fall (1994)
Starring:  Brad Pitt, Aidan Quinn, Julia Ormond, Henry Thomas,
Anthony Hopkins.
Screenplay:  Susan Shilliday and Bill Wittliff.
Director:  Edward Zwick.
     LEGENDS OF THE FALL is a big, dumb bassett hound of a movie.
It stares at you with big sad eyes, slobbers all over you and
practically begs you to like it.  It's muddled, bombastic, and often
gets by purely on style points, yet for some reason, inexplicably,
it also manages to be occasionally entertaining.  I could spend days
listing all the things that are wrong with LEGENDS OF THE FALL, and
still I'd be left with the fact that something worked.  And perhaps
that something comes down to two words: Brad Pitt.  Radiating the
kind of charisma that screen actors just don't seem to have any
more, he single-handedly makes LEGENDS OF THE FALL watchable.
     Set in turn-of-the-century Montana, LEGENDS OF THE FALL is the
story of the Ludlow family, whose patriarch (Anthony Hopkins) is a
career soldier who moves the family when he retires in disgust over
the government's policy towards Indians.  The main action begins in
1914, when youngest son Samuel (Henry Thomas) brings his fiancee
Susannah (Julia Ormond) home to meet the family.  Her introduction
into the family proves extremely unsettling, as oldest son Alfred
(Aidan Quinn) falls for her, while she finds herself drawn to wild
middle son Tristan (Brad Pitt).  Soon all three brothers head off to
fight in the first World War, where a tragedy claims one of the
brothers, sending the other two into a life-long battle with
Susannah in the middle.
     For about half an hour, LEGENDS OF THE FALL is more than simply
passable; it's a grand, beautifully filmed family drama with
tremendous potential.  All the performances are perfectly tuned, the
interactions between the brothers are convincing and the story is
well-paced.  Then the brothers are off to Europe, and the story
veers off-track, and never fully recovers.  A film which had been
moving along at a confident and leisurely pace suddenly goes into a
dead sprint that seems to get faster and faster, until by the end I
felt quite relieved that it was over.  Along the way, we get detours
into a globe-spanning guilt-quest undertaken by Tristan, a scrap
with bootlegging Irish gangsters and not one, not two, but _three_
funerals.  When combined with the framing of the story as a kind of
Native American legend, complete with a mystical brotherhood between
Tristan and a bear, it almost becomes comic.
     Fortunately, the film's technical credits are spectacular.
Director Edward Zwick scored a successful screen melodrama with
GLORY, and he appears to use many of the same tricks in LEGENDS.  In
fact, the war scenes here might easily have been the same scenes
from GLORY with different uniforms added by computer.  But John
Toll's photography of the Canadian locations (substituting for
Montana) is wonderful, and one shot of Susannah reading a letter as
she walks among tall trees is a thing of beauty.  The score is by
James Horner, and as usual he lays the strings on thick as syrup,
but it works in LEGENDS.  As the narrative becomes more and more
stream of consciousness, the look and sound of LEGENDS OF THE FALL
actually seem to improve.
     For all that, the best thing that Zwick puts on the screen is
Pitt.  Freed from the suffocating gloom of Louis in INTERVIEW WITH
THE VAMPIRE, Pitt commands the screen from his first appearance.  He
is asked to slog through several melodramatic moments in LEGENDS OF
THE FALL, but his dark intensity keeps them from being as overblown
as they might have been, and he may be as convincing a crier as any
male actor in many years.  The problem is that for long stretches,
he disappears from the narrative entirely, while other members of
the Ludlow family and Susannah take center stage.  When that
happens, LEGENDS OF THE FALL comes perilously close to putting the
audience to sleep.  Then Zwick comes through with an exceptional
final fifteen minutes, including a retribution montage which might
strike some as a bit too reminiscent of the GODFATHER films yet
works in its own right.  LEGENDS OF THE FALL is by no stretch of the
imagination great filmmaking, and occasionally it's flat-out silly.
However, when you put an ascending star in an old-fashioned Western
epic, anything is possible.  And for LEGENDS OF THE FALL, it's just
enough.

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
     About forty minutes into STEPMOM, I came to a numbing realization...
well, two actually.  The first was that I knew exactly where this domestic
drama was headed and could predict scenes and confrontations far down the
road.  The second was that I knew we were still 90 minutes away from the
closing credits.  As the film ever-so-slowly unfolded, I began to realize
what five credited screenwriters can buy you:  perhaps the most
inefficient screenplay of the year.
     There's some promising human drama in the premise, which begins with
conflict in an extended family.  Photographer Isabel Kelly (Julia
Roberts), living with divorced attorney Luke Harrison (Ed Harris), is
struggling to gain the acceptance of Luke's daughter Anna (Jena Malone)
and son Ben (Liam Aiken).  Making the task even harder is Luke's ex-wife
Jackie (Susan Sarandon), who undercuts Isabel at every turn and rails at
her every parenting miscue.  What Isabel doesn't know is that Jackie is
battling an even tougher adversary than a potential stepmother for her
children:  cancer.  As she confronts her mortality, Jackie also confronts
her fears of being replaced in her children's hearts.
     That's an interesting enough twist on the complicated emotions and
allegiances of extended family interactions, one that could have made a
tidy feature weeper.  Unfortunately, absolutely nothing about STEPMOM 
could be called tidy.  If a situation or relationship calls for a scene to
establish it, STEPMOM provides two or three.  Isabel bonds with Anna over
an art project (one of the film's few truly affecting moments), then bonds
with her over a musical number; everyone panics over Ben when he
disappears in a park, then panics over Ben when he falls off a jungle gym.
STEPMOM appears to have no faith that we'll understand the significance of
a character's actions unless those actions are underlined, making it both
insulting and redundant.  Every turn of character is so deliberately
structured, you might suspect that every subsequent screenwriter came in
just to add another half dozen scenes, and no one threw anything out.
     STEPMOM's narrative unwieldiness also makes it extremely hard to
connect with any of the many plot lines.  Isabel struggles with balancing
career and her new family, Jackie struggles with balancing her health and
her family, Anna struggles with how she should respond to the new woman in
her father's life, and Ben (played by Liam Aiken with the kind of fulsome
adorableness that gives child actors a bad name) struggles to find new
things to giggle at.  Ed Harris, meanwhile, struggles just to find a few
minutes of screen time.  With all the complexities involved in these 
family dynamics, dear old dad remains a complete enigma.  "You're a great
dad," Jackie tells Luke in once scene; "I just never gave you the chance
to realize it."  That sentiment will probably apply to the entire
audience, which may forget there's a father anywhere to be found.  For a
film about getting your priorities straight, STEPMOM sure doesn't.
     Of course, it's understood that this is to be a showcase for the two
lead actresses, and we shouldn't begrudge them a showcase when lead
actresses generally get the treatment Harris gets here.  Roberts and
Sarandon are both quite good in their roles, Sarandon in particular
bringing a wonderful steely maternalism.  They're just stuck in the kind
of film which has become director Chris Columbus' specialty:  cheap comic
relief which gives way to Big Messages of understanding.  STEPMOM is a big
emotional mess of a movie, one which grows increasingly irritating as
karaoke production numbers and one tearful goodbye after another chew up
minutes of screen time.  Good actors deserve better than a script that --
strangely enough -- looks like pieces of the work of five different
writers stitched together to form a movie.

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
(Disney)
Voices:  Tate Donovan, James Woods, Danny DeVito, Susan Egan, Rip Torn,
Joshua Keaton, Bobcat Goldthwait, Matt Frewer.
Screenplay:  Ron Clements & John Musker, Bob Shaw & Donald McEnery and
Irene Mecchi.
Producers:  Alice Dewey and Ron Clements & John Musker.
Directors:  Ron Clements & John Musker.
MPAA Rating:  G.
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Over the past few years, while most studio event films were growing
bigger, louder and dumber, the folks at Disney were doing something
terribly underhanded with their animated features.  Like cereal makers
injecting twelve essential vitamins and minerals into our Frosted Sugar
Bombs, they were slipping competent story-telling into our entertainment.
In films like POCAHONTAS, TOY STORY and THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME, the
Mouse gave our unsuspecting children reason to expect thematic depth,
complex villains and appealing heroes even while they were being amused
and dazzled.
     It's all terribly insidious, this raising of expectations, and not
just for audiences.  Expectations in the Disney boardroom were raised by
the $530 million in domestic grosses racked up by ALADDIN and THE LION
KING, making the mere $140 million for POCAHONTAS and $100 million for
HUNCHBACK look like chump change.  Perhaps, Uncle Walt's successors may
have concluded, audiences would rather eat a salad when they want their
twelve essential vitamins and minerals.
     All this being prologue to the observation that HERCULES, a frisky
and energetic offering from directors John Musker and Ron Clements (who
helped revive the moribund Disney animation empire with the frisky and
energetic THE LITTLE MERMAID and ALADDIN), is merely a pleasant way to
spend a Saturday afternoon.  It's a typically Disney-loose version of the
Greek myth of Hercules (right down to giving him the Roman name rather
than the Greek Heracles) in which the young hero (Tate Donovan) must prove
his mettle by foiling the evil plans of Hades (James Woods), lord of the
underworld.  Assistance comes in the form of a hero-training satyr named
Phil (Danny DeVito); trouble comes in the form of a tough-talking woman
named Meg (Susan Egan) who may or may not be on Herc's side; comic relief
comes in the form of Hades' two inept assistants, Pain (Bobcat Goldthwait)
and Panic (Matt Frewer).
     No trouble so far...in fact, there's quite a bit to recommend
HERCULES.  British cartoonist Gerald Scarfe, who acted as production
designer, gives HERCULES a distinct look full of sharp angles and stylized
characterizations which separates it from other recent Disney efforts.
There are a couple of very catchy tunes by Disney stalwart Alan Menken and
new lyricist David Zippel, including a wonderful Brill Building-style love
song called "I Won't Say."  Musker and Clements also trot out the kind of
pop culture references which worked so well in ALADDIN, including quotes
of THE KARATE KID, MIDNIGHT COWBOY and THE SEVEN YEAR ITCH as well as some
deft satire of over-saturated merchandising.
     If HERCULES had come up with a heart to match its art, it might have
been deserving of that "masterpiece" label Disney affixes indiscriminately
to its animated features.  It starts out with promise, presenting the
adolescent Hercules (voiced by Joshua Keaton and perfectly rendered as a
gawky jumble of massive hands and feet) as the quintessential teen-age
outsider.  The arc of his character takes him, as one song title describes
it, from "Zero to Hero," but the screenwriting team isn't interested in
digging into how he deals with his fame, or how he is chastened by his
failures.  It's not exactly a redemption story, not exactly a quest story,
and not exactly a love story.  It is, quite simply, a cartoon.
     The fact that there's anything remotely dismissive about that term
shows how far Disney has raised the bar on animated film-making.  Even
HERCULES, which comes up short in defining its hero, delivers complex
supporting characters like Meg (a superb vocal performance by Susan Egan)
with real emotions.  After recent Disney triumphs, however, we know that
more is possible.  Children will probably be more delighted by HERCULES
than by the darker HUNCHBACK, and adults will probably enjoy James Woods'
oily wheeler-dealer manner as Hades (we all knew that the devil was really
an agent).  HERCULES is one of the better entertainments of the summer, a
big tasty bowl of Frosted Sugar Bombs.  If you want your vitamins this
time, you'll have to order a side salad with that.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
MYSTERY MEN
(Universal)
Starring:  Ben Stiller, William H. Macy, Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo,
Paul Reubens, Kel Mitchell, Wes Studi, Geoffrey Rush, Greg Kinnear.
Screenplay:  Neil Cuthbert, based on characters created by Bob Burden.
Producers:  Lawrence Gordon, Lloyd Levin and Mike Richardson.
Director:  Kinka Usher.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, mild profanity, adult humor)
Running Time:  117 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Of all the reasons to be frustrated by a film, I'll take the one
MYSTERY MEN provides:  it's just too clever and original for its own
damned good.  The super-hero action film has become such a predictable
package of action sequences, limp quips and bland characterizations that
it was screaming for a satirical treament.  To fill this need, along comes
MYSTERY MEN, spinning out a dozen different ways to turn the genre on its
ear...which turns out to be at least a half-dozen too many.  As busily
directed by television commercial auteur Kinka Usher, MYSTERY MEN rarely
sits still long enough for any one of its sharp ideas to turn into
inspired comedy.
     The concept, based on characters appearing in Dark Horse comics,
offers plenty of potential.  In Champion City, a teeming BLADE
RUNNER-esque metropolis, we meet three would-be warriors for justice: Mr.
Furious (Ben Stiller), The Shoveler (William H. Macy) and the 
fork-wielding Blue Raja (Hank Azaria).  Unfortunately, the trio is way
down in the super-hero pecking order from the dashing Captain Amazing
(Greg Kinnear), and even Captain Amazing can't find a good fight because
he's dispatched evil-doers so efficiently.  When Captain Amazing engineers
the release of arch-villain Cassanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush) from a
mental institution, he finds himself unexpectedly captured by his nemesis.
With Captain Amazing out of commission, it's left to Mr. Furious and his
crew to bring together a team of heroes with more ambition than
super-fire-power, including The Bowler (Janeane Garofolo), master of
flatulence The Spleen (Paul Reubens), Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell) and the
"terribly mysterious" Sphinx (Wes Studi).
     MYSTERY MEN works best from the outset by turning its super-heroes
into analogs for contemporary athletes.  Career minor-leaguers like The
Shoveler, a married suburban father of three, wonder whether they'll get a
shot at the big time; Captain Amazing and his publicist (Ricky Jay) find
themselves generally more preoccupied with maintaining corporate
sponsorship deals than with crime-fighting.  The simple moments in which
the heroes-in-waiting cope with workaday life are sparked by the
wonderfully off-beat cast -- Azaria's Blue Raja as a mama's boy who 
practices his witty one-liners in his room; Stiller's Mr. Furious trying
to strike the right super-hero image to impress a diner waitress (Claire
Forlani).  Every so often, MYSTERY MEN nails the absurdity of its premise
so well that the comedy is blissfully perfect.
     It's just not often enough.  As the film winds its way through two
hours, its comic highlights are nearly matched by the unexplored
sub-plots.  Lost in the shuffle of too many characters are the team's two
over-eager tag-alongs, the geeky Spleen and earnest Invisible Boy (whose
"powers" may be nothing more than a major case of teenage existential
angst).  Neil Cuthbert's script spends too much time on The Sphinx's
initially amusing Yoda-like training, and too little on Kinnear's
splendidly smug Captain Amazing.  Rush's Cassanova Frankenstein hardly
gets a moment to develop a distinct personality, treating his Teutonic
accent as sufficient evidence of his villainy.  And director Usher takes
the swooping full-screen close-ups from his Taco Bell chihuahua and "Got
Milk?" ads, and uses them to distracting excess.  MYSTERY MEN wants to
make every possible gag about super-heroes in one film, but it's off on
the next set-up before you get a chance to appreciate the last punch line.
     Thankfully, there are just enough quirky pleasures in MYSTERY MEN to
counteract its hyperactivity.  Some bits of dialogue are priceless,
including The Shoveler's stubborn insistence that millionaire Lance Hunt
couldn't be Captain Amazing's alter-ego ("Lance Hunt wears glasses,
Captain Amazing doesn't").  The team's first joint assault on Cassanova's
limo is a goofy low-tech triumph over the bad guys, followed by a round of
drinks at a bar like a city league softball team.  A cast like Stiller,
Garofalo, Macy and Azaria guarantees more oddball enjoyment than most
films could deliver, but they could have been part of a cult classic.
It's ironic that a parody of summer movie overkill is guilty of some of
the same sins.  You can't swing for the fences every time, especially if
you're a minor leaguer trying to make it to "The Show."  Sometimes, you've
gotta take one for the team.

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
     Albert Brooks has always been a filmmaker who couldn't resist a great
high concept.  In his debut feature REAL LIFE, he parodied the pioneering
PBS documentary "An American Family;" in LOST IN AMERICA, he sent a yuppie
couple on an ill-fated attempt to drop out of society; in DEFENDING YOUR
LIFE, he imagined the afterlife as a spiritual courtroom; and in MOTHER,
he moved back in with Mom to figure out his relationship troubles.  An
inspired, outrageous situation has provided Brooks with the spark to show
his characters -- notably himself -- coming to terms with themselves and
finding a little dignity.  His concepts fueled the gags, but he never
forgot to tell a story.
     In THE MUSE, Brooks makes a mistake he's never made before:  he
starts with a situation comedy, then never moves beyond the situation.
Brooks stars as Stephen Phillips, a successful Hollywood screenwriter at a
career crossroads.  Dumped from a studio deal for writing scripts with no
"edge," a depressed Stephen seeks counsel from his friend and fellow
writer Jack (Jeff Bridges).  Jack offers Stephen access to what he claims
is the secret of his own success:  an actual, straight-out-of-mythology
muse named Sarah (Sharon Stone).  Though initially incredulous, Stephen
finds that his collaborations with Sarah are firing his creative juices.
Unfortunately, he also finds Sarah's services much in demand, including
from his own wife Laura (Andie MacDowell), who finds herself inspired to
pursue her own creative dreams.
     THE MUSE seems to have been born as yet another Hollywood satire,
poking fun at the insecurities of movie folk and ther fascination with the
latest insta-cure for what ails them personally or professionally.
Brooks, uses the opportunity to toss in cameos by other filmmakers who
have been Sarah's "clients" (James Cameron thanks her for TITANIC; Martin
Scorsese proposes a remake of RAGING BULL, "but with a really thin guy"),
which are good for a couple of smiles.  The insider gags, unfortunately,
are about the only ones that work.  More often, THE MUSE is a comedy in
search of something, _anything_ funny to say.  Sharon Stone's finicky diva
is an idea that never quite takes off, and the supporting players often
look vaguely bored with their lines.  Even Brooks' usually reliable
persona can't jump-start the film, because it doesn't turn into a
sympathetic character.  He's just an annoyed privileged guy whose
annoyance at his slightly lessened privilege makes him just plain
annoying.
     Brooks' lack of a character is part of the over-riding problem with
THE MUSE: a lack of anything substantial past the thin premise.  The film
occasionally looks like it could be leading Stephen towards a little
growing up, whether about his career neuroses or his retro-breadwinner 
agitation at Laura's growing financial success as a cookie-maker.  There's
even the faint hope that Brooks could be offering a light-hearted look at
the shove people require just to believe in their own talents.  Then the
film ends, and it becomes evident that there's not a shred of actual story
to THE MUSE.  There's no improved mutual understanding in the Phillips'
relationship, no one grows, no one learns a thing -- there's not even the
satisfaction of Sarah explaining her own turns of character.  The whole
thing just fades to black, leaving a shallow collection of industry jokes
in its wake.
     There are a few decent laughs to be found in Brooks' validation of
William Goldman's line about how "nobody knows anything" in Hollywood.
Mark Feuerstein has a nicely understated role as a tactless studio
executive, and Steven Wright appears briefly as the nepotistically-
advantaged Stan Spielberg.  But much of the acidic humor leaves a sour
aftertaste once it's clear that it's all little more than a chance for
Brooks to vent.  His character spends much of the film in search of a
third act for his screenplay, which is ironic when you consider that THE
MUSE is in desperate need of a third act of its own.  It's even more
ironic that in the middle of a Hollywood satire, the protagonist's
brilliant script -- the one he's inspired to write after being told he has
"lost [his] edge" -- is a wacky high-concept vehicle for Jim Carrey.  If
the lesson Brooks wants us to learn is that a writer's goal in life should
be coming up with yet another mass-market yuk-fest, then maybe he's the
one who has lost his edge.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
AMERICAN PIE
(Universal)
Starring:  Jason Biggs, Chris Klein, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Tara Reid, Eddie
Kaye Thomas, Natasha Lyonne, Mena Suvari, Seann W. Scott, Alyson Hannigan,
Shannon Elizabeth, Eugene Levy.
Screenplay:  Adam Herz.
Producers:  Chris Weitz, Warren Zide, Craig Perry and Chris Moore.
Director:  Paul Weitz.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  96 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Ah, for those carefree days when a sniggering teen sex comedy could
be a sniggering teen sex comedy.  The time was the early 80s, when films
like PORKY'S, LOSIN' IT and THE LAST AMERICAN VIRGIN celebrated the
adolescent male in all his sex-obsessed glory.  That was pre-AIDS, when no
one thought twice about mining the blinding surge of hormones for all the
low-brow humor it was worth.  In 1999, apparently, you need to be more
socially responsible in your portrayals of high school horn-dogs.  Leering
and debauchery are permitted only if you note the foolishness of leering
and debauchery.
     It's that one hypocritical miscalculation that spoils much of the
puerile fun of AMERICAN PIE.  The premise is teen sex comedy at its most
fundamental: four seniors at a suburban Michigan high school, virgins all,
make a pact to do the deed by prom night.  Jim (Jason Biggs), utterly
inept in his sexual explorations, finds himself sharing intimate moments
with his dad (a brilliantly cast Eugene Levy) more often than any girl.
Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) is involved with Vicky (Tara Reid), but finds
potential consummation complicated by the "l-word."  Oz (Chris Klein), a
jock who wants to be more sensitive, joins the choir to get closer to
Heather (Mena Suvari).  And mature-beyond-his-years Finch (Eddie Kaye
Thomas) prefers having the worldly Jessica (Natasha Lyonne) spread rumors
about his manly prowess.
     Naturally, all of their tentative fumblings lead to humiliating,
disgusting -- and sometimes very funny -- situations.  Jim is caught by
his parents in compromising positions with a tube sock and a warm apple
pie.  Party animal Stifler (Seann W. Scott, marvelously epitomizing teen
jerk-dom) consumes a beer featuring a mystery ingredient.  Finch falls
victim to a laxative-laced mochachino.  And unlucky Jim becomes an
Internet star in a web-cast display of over-enthusiastic libido.  The
belly laughs are crude and far between, interrupted too often by the bland
romance between Oz and Heather, but the outrageous situations and
appealing cast maintain a high energy level.  As unapologetic raunchiness,
it's fairly effective.
     Then, without warning, AMERICAN PIE turns into apologetic
raunchiness.  As the film draws to a close, Jim lets loose with a speech
about how tired he is of the emphasis on sex, which "isn't really that
important."  It's a jaw-dropping display of chutzpah from a film that has
just spent 90 minutes yanking laughs from its audience with the idea that
sex isn't everything, it's the only thing.  The commentary rings even more
hollow when AMERICAN PIE ends with a four-way, er, climax in which our
protagonists all find themselves scoring anyway.  And after that, the film
tries once again to get message-y on us by having the four friends share a
carbonated toast to the notion that the simple pleasures of high school
friendship are more valuable than sex.  It's enough to make you gag on
your laxative-laced mochachino.
     There is a place, of course, for films that cast a more thoughtful,
skeptical eye on the caprices of youthful sexuality.  Those films may be
even more necessary now than ever.  AMERICAN PIE, however, shouldn't have
tried to be one of them, because there's also a place for a throwback to
a time when you weren't expected to feel guity about your guffaws.
Screenwriter Adam Herz and director Paul Weitz play the disingenuous game
Don Rickles plays when he closes his act with an admonition that "we're
all just one big family of Man" -- this after spending 90 minutes joking
about tightwad Jews and Chinese drivers.  If you're going to be naughty,
at least have the nerve to stand by your naughtiness when it's funny.
Herz and Weitz want to have their AMERICAN PIE and eat it too.

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
THE LOVE LETTER
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Kate Capshaw, Tom Everett Scott, Tom Selleck, Ellen DeGeneres,
Julianne Nicholson, Blythe Danner, Geraldine McEwan.
Screenplay:  Maria Maggenti, based on the novel by Cathleen Schine.
Producers:  Sarah Pilsbury, Midge Sanford and Kate Capshaw.
Director:  Peter Ho-sun Chan.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     To your list of absolute cinematic oxymorons -- you know, like "Pauly
Shore comedy" or "Keanu Reeves performance" -- please add the following:
"bittersweet farce."  That's the disastrous combination served up by THE
LOVE LETTER, a film that fairly screams for a more frivolous treatment.
The basic set-up is pure farce, with bookstore proprietor and recent
divorcee Helen MacFarquahar (Kate Capshaw) of picturesque Loblolly by the
Sea, Massachusetts discovering a beautifully poetic love letter between
the cushions of a couch in her shop.  Both the the writer and the
addressee are anonymous, leading Helen to wonder if it might be for her.
Her suspicions become stronger when her young summer employee Johnny (Tom
Everett Scott) begins flirting with her, little realizing that Johnny has
spotted the letter and believes, in turn, that it is from Helen to him.
     Thus begins a tale which initially appears headed towards a wild
sequence of misunderstandings, as Helen's co-worker Janet (Ellen
DeGeneres) also spies the letter and suspects it to be to her from hunky
fireman George (Tom Selleck).  That might have been a clever, breezy
entertainment, something considerably less labored than the mess delivered
by screenwriter Maria Maggenti (from Cathleen Schine's novel) and director
Peter Ho-sun Chan.  Their tale is intended, I suppose, to be a touching
tale of a middle-aged woman trying to re-discover romance, a sensitively
portrayed May-December relationship mixed with the star-crossed
interactions of Helen and high school classmate George (who, it turns out,
has carried a torch from afar for lo these twenty years).  We should
understand the way the letter affects Helen, the way it closes one door in
her life and opens her up to the opportunities she has missed and the
opportunities still to come.
     If Maggenti and Chan had offered some characters remotely resembling
three-dimensional people, it might even have worked.  THE LOVE LETTER
makes no effort whatsoever to explain Johnny's interest in Helen, spends
about thirty seconds establishing Janet as little more than comic relief
before creating a blink-and-you'll-miss-it sub-plot regarding her jealousy
of Helen, and wraps up with an out-of-left-field relationship between two
characters about whom we know virtually nothing.  Key relationships (like
that between Helen and her absentee mother, played by Blythe Danner)
materialize out of thin air, and supporting characters (like Helen's
grandmother, played by TITANIC's Gloria Stuart) serve no purpose.  Even
Capshaw's Helen, the film's center, is an enigma.  For a film that
apparently wants you to care who ends up with whom, THE LOVE LETTER gives
you none of the tools to do so.  It's a whodunnit with no clues.
     Somehow, in the middle of this clumsy confection, one genuinely
interesting character appears.  As Jennifer, another employee of Helen's
who dotes on unrequitedly on Johnny, Julianne Nicholson is wonderfully
sweet and achingly self-conscious.  Masking her insecurities behind her
college course sociological analysis, she makes for a great character in a
story of how romantic happiness can be thwarted both from without and
within.  The troublie is, she's the only character in the film who belongs
in such a story.  Everyone else plays the kind of functional, cardboard
role you'd expect to find in...well, a farce about a love letter of
unknown authorship changing hands indiscriminately.  There's not a solid
laugh to be found in this pretty to look at but ill-conceived romantic
comedy, except at the idea that someone thought a bittersweet farce could
work.

Title
Review for Six Degrees of Separation (1993)
Starring:  Stockard Channing, Will Smith, Donald Sutherland.
Screenplay:  John Guare.
Director:  Fred Schepisi.
     There are few greater cinematic challenges than adapting a stage
play for the screen.  The two media are so different -- one primarily
of words, the other of images -- that some plays just don't lend
themselves to a film rendering.  For every AMADEUS, a play which was
opened up into a grand period drams, there is one A FEW GOOD MEN, too
talky and stagy to succeed fully.  That is the problem I fear many
viewers could have with SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION.  Thematically, John
Guare's play is quite rich, as it is in character.  However, its
rapid-fire dialogue and exaggerated acting will strike those unfamiliar
with live theater as too stylized and unrealistic.
     SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION unfolds primarily through flashbacks, as
wealthy Manhattan art dealer Flanders Kitteredge (Donald Sutherland)
and his wife Ouisa (Stockard Channing) describe a unique encounter to
friends.  One evening, a young man appears at their door, apparently
the victim of a mugging.  The fellow (Will Smith) claims to be Paul
Poitier, son of actor Sidney Poitier, as well as a friend of the
Kitteredge's children at Harvard.  He dazzles the Kitteredges for the
evening, but they soon discover there is more to Paul than the story he
has told.  They learn that he has had a similar encounter with a doctor
and another couple, each also beginning with an apparent mugging.
Gruadually, as they investigate the connection between their incidents,
Ouisa begins to wonder about connections in general, and to examine her
life.
     The characters at the heart of SIX DEGREES are marvelously
intricate, tying together an examination of the vagaries of fortune.
On one side is Flanders Kitteredge, a high roller whose gambles on art
deals leave him perpetually one step away from poverty, and
consequently obsessed with the trappings of wealth.  On the other side
is Paul, forced to the margins of society for the threefold sin of
being poor, black and gay, and wanting to do more than just look in
from the outside.  In the middle is Ouisa, who realizes the fragile
links between every human being.  "Every person on this planet is
connected to every other person by a chain of six people," she tells
her daughter, "six degrees of separation," and in her consciousness of
this chain she reaches out to Paul.  Where this theme could have come
off as a liberal social manifesto, SIX DEGREES treads lightly, making
the obsession of the Kitteredges and their cronies with finding the man
who had duped them comic but clear in its message: their world is
threatened if just *anyone* can appear to be one of them.
     The snag in SIX DEGREES is that even with its clever editing, even
with its location photography, it still feels far too much like a stage
play.  Don't misunderstand, I love live theater.  It is just that
acting styles and narrative choices which work when a performance is in
real time by actual size human beings one hundred feet away don't work
when those same human beings are twenty feet high.  Scenes involving
college-age children berating their wealthy parents come off as
ridiculously overacted, with staccato epithets overwhelming each
other.  Will Smith's genteel Paul Poitier persona seems too forced and
phony for anyone to accept, even the star-struck Kitteredges, and the
problem is that he's giving a big, broad performance much better suited
to the stage.  As a result, although I was intrigued with what SIX
DEGREES had to say, the staginess of the production didn't allow me to
get caught up in it.
     To be fair, not all of the performances have that quality.  Donald
Sutherland does an extremely sharp reading of Flanders, never
permitting him to appear stupid, which it would have been exceedingly
easy to do.  His sense of outrage grows as his facade crumbles, and he
conveys that tension with subtlety and style.  Stockard Channing, who
played Ouisa on Broadway for three years, clearly knows her character
inside out, and her telephone conversation with Paul late in the film
is fantastic work.  SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION provides some very funny
human comedy in an extremely well-constructed story.  It's also a story
which works much better on stage.

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  John Hurt, Jason Priestley, Fiona Loewi, Maury Chaykin.
Screenplay:  Richard Kwietniowski, based on the novel by Gilber Adair.
Producer:  Steve Clark-Hall.
Director:  Richard Kwietniowski.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In one scene from LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND, protagonist Giles
De'Ath (John Hurt) articulates the film's theme fairly blatantly.  A
widowed British author who studiously avoids all things modern -- or, more
precisely, all things _period_ -- De'Ath has recently had a completely
inadvertent life-changing experience.  Intending to see the latest E.M.
Forster adaptation at the local cinema, he wanders instead into "Hotpants
College II."  Just as he is preparing to walk out of the teen sex romp in
disgust, De'Ath spies one of the film's secondary characters, played by
actor Ronnie Bostock (Jason Priestley).  Immediately De'Ath becomes
obsessed with the young star, collecting photos, reading fan magazine
articles and even purchasing a VCR to watch other Bostock gems like "Tex
Mex" and "Skid Marks."  It is this infatuation which prompts De'Ath to
remark to his agent about "the discovery of beauty where no one ever
thought to look for it.
     I'm sure that message was not meant specifically for film critics,
but it's a shoe which may fit anyway.  Much of the humor in the first half
of LOVE AND DEATH -- and this is, it should be clear, a very sharp comedy
-- comes from De'Ath's embarassment over the object of his interest.  He
locks his clippings away in a drawer out of sight of his housekeeper; he
goes to see "Hotpants College II" a second time yet can't bring himself to
utter the title to the box office attendant.  The whole business seems
even more shameful to a man of letters who should know better than to
watch a film described in a critical summary as having "no redeeming
qualities whatsoever."  Ronnie Bostock, in the popular parlance, is a
"guilty pleasure."
     It's the whole idea of a "guilty pleasure" which LOVE AND DEATH takes
to task.  Though it doesn't take a literary scholar to realize that
"Hotpants College II" isn't E. M. Forster, it isn't E. M. Forster who
pulls De'Ath from his self-imposed exile from the world.  When he launches
into a tangent on film acting at a lecture, he may simply be swooning over
Ronnie, but he is also attacking a subject with a passion.  As perfectly
geared towards satire as the phony films-within-a-film may be (complete
with familiar grainy photography and credits like "A Huck Murphy Film"),
you're forced to move past mocking giggles to acknowledging the genuinely
intense response De'Ath feels.
     The credit for that belongs largely to John Hurt, who gives a career
performance.  It's a role which must be perfectly pitched to be
sympathetic, because De'Ath is, to be frank, a celebrity stalker.  His
eventual encounter with Ronnie, in which he builds the middling thespian
into "a young Olivier," could have come off as the manipulative lies of a
man trying to seduce the object of his obsession.  Hurt makes De'Ath
absolutely sincere, even if he is the only one who could possibly see
greatness in Ronnie.  In LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND, a man finds
greatness in a place he never thought to look, in "Hotpants College II."
There's a lesson in there for those who too quickly dismiss the passionate
response of others towards an artistic work, especially when they don't
share the passion.  Such epiphanies are too rare to restrict to the places
we're _supposed_ to find epiphanies.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
GATTACA
(Columbia)
Starring:  Ethan Hawke, Uma Thurman, Alan Arkin, Jude Law, Loren Dean.
Screenplay:  Andrew Niccol.
Producers:  Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg and Stacey Sher.
Director:  Andrew Niccol.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     GATTACA arrives with the kind of "torn from today's headlines"
premise which should guarantee a provocative story.  Studies suggesting
genetic predispositions for certain medical conditions and stories of
cloned animals have generated the uneasy feeling that ethics are trailing
science by too wide a margin.  On the heels of those stories comes a film
about a near-future where genetic determinism has turned America into a
de facto caste system.  A blood test at birth brands every individual with
an incontrovertible marking post of his or her potential; those whose base
pairs don't line up quite right (a chance of developing diabetes, perhaps)
are relegated to the fringes of society.  Parents genetically engineer
offspring rather than risking a "faith birth," because spinning the
ribonucleic roulette wheel could have Junior designated a janitor before
the umbilicus is cut.
     Into that world steps Vincent Freeman (Ethan Hawke), a "faith birth"
doomed from the start with myopia and a weak heart.  Vincent, however,
isn't willing to play by the rules, not when his dream is to enter the
space program headquartered at Gattaca.  Enter a black marketeer (Tony
Shalhoub) whose business is helping the genetically disadvantaged.
Vincent is introduced to Jerome Morrow (Jude Law), a stellar genetic
specimen who, inconveniently, was rendered parplegic in an auto accident.
Thus Vincent and Jerome become a team -- Vincent providing a healthy body
for Jerome's identity, and Jerome providing the necessary bodily fluids to
validate that identity.  There is only one small problem, or rather
several million of them:  any hair, any cell, any trace of Vincent could
betray his true identity as an "invalid."
     Writer/director Andrew Niccol does an exceptional job of guiding the
feel of this brave new world, from Jan Roelfs' sterile production design
to Michael Nyman's restrained score, creating an intriguing backdrop for
the exploration of how people deal with externally imposed limitations.
The concept works; Niccol's execution of that concept often doesn't.
GATTACA ends up reading much better than it plays, though it doesn't play
terribly.  It's simply an intellectualized film experience, one which
attempts to make its point in overly hushed tones.
     In principle, that's a noble goal, particularly when some film-makers
(who shall remain Oliver Stone) prefer to beat their messages into the
back of your head.  But GATTACA is framed as a suspense film and a murder
mystery -- the unknown "invalid" called Vincent Freeman becomes a suspect
when his hair is found where "Jerome Freeman's" boss has been killed --
and Niccol doesn't have a handle on creating the requisite tension.  As
many times as Vincent is almost discovered in GATTACA, the film rarely
gets you caught up in his personal predicament.  The subject matter is
ready-made for inspiring passionate feeling, discomfort or outrage
directed at a social order so contrary to our notions of personal
responsibility and freedom.  It's not enough for Niccol to give viewers
something to nod their heads at in agreement.  He should be working
harder to make them angry.
     It's a particularly frustrating approach because GATTACA is
unimpeachable on so many other levels.  The performances are rock solid,
the production values impeccable, and the script well-stocked with
supporting characters who have a chance to learn about themselves through
Vincent's determination.  It just doesn't _move_; it's a philosophy lesson
more than a gripping narrative.  GATTACA is well-crafted enough that it
could very well leave you thinking.  If it left you _feeling_ nearly as
much, it might be deserving of its own headlines.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
     Nicolas Cage comes up with an ingenious survival mechanism for his
role in the wink-and-a-concussive-nudge bombast-o-rama CON AIR.  The
opening credits sequence introduces us to Cage as Cameron Poe, a Gulf War
veteran convicted of manslaughter and serving eight years in prison after
an ill-fated bar-room brawl.  The prison scenes are accompanied by
voice-overs in which Poe, in a languid Southern drawl, describes prison
life to his wife back home and offers simple homilies for the daughter he
has never met.  If the scene gives you a tickle of familiarity, it
probably should.  Cage appears to realize that CON AIR is going to be
utterly dim-witted and ridiculous, and that he's going to have to do
something to keep himself entertained.  And thus he slips into a familiar,
surreal role as his own commentary on the proceedings -- Cage plays
Cameron Poe as a buffed-up version of RAISING ARIZONA's H. I. McDonnough.
     Cage should have known what he was getting himself into.  He got a
paycheck from Jerry Bruckheimer last year for THE ROCK, and if there's one
thing you can count on from a Bruckheimer production (even without his
late partner Don Simpson), it's that you can count on seeing everything
you saw in the _last_ Bruckheimer production.  The critical difference
between THE ROCK and CON AIR is Cage's performance.  In THE ROCK, Cage
appeared to be having the time of his life jumping into the action fray
for the first time.  That sense of discovery has been replaced by a wry
self-awareness.  While the plot of CON AIR finds Poe a parolee on board a
hijacked prison transport plane whose goal is just to get home, Cage's
goal is different but just as simple:  to get out of the film with some
measure of dignity intact.
     Audiences, too, should know what they're getting themselves into with
a Bruckheimer production.  In fact, the marketing people are counting on
it.  No one who loathed THE ROCK for its swear-grunt-blast repetitiveness
will be converted by CON AIR; no one who loved THE ROCK for exactly the
same reasons will be dissuaded.  Director Simon West (yet another TV
commercial auteur plucked by Bruckheimer from the advertising equivalent
of the Schwab's soda fountain) delivers exactly the kind of
adrenaline/testosterone cocktail which could launch an endocrinology
lecture (it's perversely appropriate that one sympathetic con spends most
of the flight nearing a diabetic coma; like insulin, CON AIR does the
work of a gland).  What he doesn't deliver is a moment of suspense.  A
Bruckheimer film has no use for Hitchcock's notion that showing you the
bomb under the desk creates a more interesting scene than just blowing up
the desk; a really, _really_ big desk and a really, _really_ big bomb will
serve the purpose nicely.
     If either West or Bruckheimer were interested in genuine tension,
they might have done something with CON AIR's creepiest set-up.  At a
desert stop for the plane-load of convicts, serial killer Garland Greene
(Steve Buscemi) wanders of into a trailer park where he meets a little
girl having a tea party in a drained swimming pool.  Their tete-a-tete is
eerie and menacing, providing a welcome shift in tone and giving Buscemi a
chance to stand out in a cast with too many villains (Danny Trejo, Ving
Rhames and a characteristically reptilian John Malkovich among them).  In
fact, CON AIR usually opts for too much of something when the tiniest
measure of restraint would have been an improvement -- too many 
characters, too much editing, too many dopey punch lines, too much of the
cheap, ugly appeals to machismo which characterize too many Bruckheimer
efforts.
     It is that kind of exhausting excess to which Cage is responding with
his detached performance.  While Malkovich goes for the outrageous and
John Cusack (as a U. S. Marshal) goes for earnest, Cage looks like he just
wants to go to sleep.  His recycled RAISING ARIZONA performance is a means
of escape, his chase after a stuffed bunny a continuation of his pursuit
of that big box of Huggies.  It doesn't bode well for Cage's appearance in
FACE/OFF later this month; perhaps he already realizes that all he can do
in action films is more of the same over and over.  There's a word for
people like you, Nicolas.  That word is called recidivist...repeat
offender.

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
     Long before its release, Fox's ANASTASIA was greeted with some
strangely familiar skeptical remarks.  "The execution of the Romanovs?"
scoffed the wags. "Not exactly the stuff for an animated film, is it?"
Similar words greeted Disney's POCAHONTAS a couple of years ago, and that
film went on to take a criticaly pasting for not being enough "fun."
Journalists and studios have formed an odd tag-team perpetuating the
notion that an animated film with adult subject matter is just a waste of
time between the Happy Meal characters.  While television has produced
smart animation for grown-ups like "The Simpsons," "King of the Hill,"
"Dr. Katz" and "South Park," adult-themed animated features have been
treated as though they were violating the social order.  It's like folks
don't like their cartoons gettin' uppity.
     ANASTASIA is not, I repeat, _not_ a great film for kids.  It is,
however, a visually rich and extremely well-constructed story which shows
a little nerve.  It begins in 1916 Russia, where the mad monk Rasputin
(voice of Christopher Lloyd) places a curse on the ruling Romanov family.
All are killed in the ensuing domestic upheaval except the Dowager Empress
(Angela Lansbury), who escapes to Paris, and young Anastasia (Kirsten
Dunst), who is lost in the chaos.  Flash forward ten years, to 18-year-old
Anya (Meg Ryan) leaving the orphanage where she grew up with no memories
of her life before she arrived.  Her only clue to a family is an inscribed
necklace leading her to Paris, so she joins up with a pair of other
travelers, the con men Dmitri (John Cusack) and Vlad (Kelsey Grammer).
The two plan to deliver a phony Anastasia to the exiled Empress in Paris,
but little do they know that they have the real thing on their hands.
Little also do they know that Rasputin intends to return from the dead to
finish off the last of the Romanovs.
     At its least inventive, ANASTASIA attempts merely to follow the
successful Disney plan for animated features.  There is a cute puppy named
Pooka, a wise-cracking bat cohort for Rasputin named Bartok (hilariously
voiced by "Simpsons" cast member Hank Azaria), the Disney-patented
affection for monarchy (accompanying a few swipes at Communism along the
way), and songs by Lynn Ahrens and Stephen Flaherty including the 
now-standard heroine's theme, a villain song, and a splashy production
number.  Least effective of all is Rasputin, who spends most of the film
grumbling in the underworld while his decomposing body falls apart around
him.  Most of the comic relief shows up during Rasputin's scenes, yet they
also hinder the narrative.  The villain doesn't contribute to ANASTASIA's
most interesting elements; he's around because, darn it, you've _got_ to
have a villain around in an animated film.
     That assumption is based on the "kids first" paradigm, one which
ANASTASIA doesn't follow most of the time.  The characterizations of Anya
and Dmitri are effective without being over-wrought; their developing
relationship is sketched out in smart, subtle scenes.  The character
animation seems somehow richer than most of Disney's recent efforts,
giving the characters more life (Anya's unconventional features are worth
extra attention).  Yet ANASTASIA may be most intriguing because, unlike
Disney's features, it feels like a genuine _musical_, not simply a film
with songs attached.  Don Bluth and Gary Goldman put on a real show, with
eye-catching choreography, characters who sell their songs with gusto,
and a Prokofiev-influenced David Newman score full of grandeur.  When
ANASTASIA breaks into song, it's like you're watching an ambitious stage
production.
     It also comes with an unusual but dynamic animation style which
combines conventional hand-drawn characters with computer-generated
backgrounds.  Though the juxtapositions don't always work, the effect is
stunning when they do.  ANASTASIA also serves up a few genuinely creepy
images, the kinds you'd associate with Ralph Bakshi more than with Uncle
Walt.  Though Disney has managed to make a couple of films as satisfying
for parents as they were for their children (BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, for
certain), no recent Disney film has felt quite as mature as ANASTASIA.
Fox, quite predictably, is still marketing ANASTASIA as a family film, and
there's not exactly anything which would be considered objectionable.  It
just seems a shame that ANASTASIA _had_ to become a children's film when
this material could have been turned into a spectacular drama unencumbered
by cute puppies or talking bats.  It's time for someone to take a look at
the ratings for television's animation for grown-ups and take a chance.
Come on, we can handle it.  After all, we're not kids any more.

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
G.I. JANE
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Demi Moore, Viggo Mortensen, Anne Bancroft.
Screenplay:  Danielle Alexandra and David Twohy.
Producers:  Ridley Scott, Demi Moore, Roger Birnbaum and Suzanne Todd.
Director:  Ridley Scott.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A certain reactionary element has already decided, sight unseen, that
G.I. JANE must be a piece of hardcore feminist propaganda.  After all,
here's the film-maker behind THELMA & LOUISE directing the story of a
female naval lieutenant named Jordan O'Neil (Demi Moore) who tries to
break into the heretofore all-male Navy SEALs.  Imagine their chagrin when
they realize that Ridley Scott has pulled a fast one on them.  G.I. JANE
is actually a gruntin', sweatin', shootin' and fightin' guy movie with a
message as politically incorrect as they come.  Anyone who goes to G.I.
JANE expecting to cheer for a woman succeeding in a male dominated
environment on her own terms is in for a rude awakening.  This is the
story of a woman who succeeds in a male dominated environment by turning
into a man.
     No, I'm not referring to Ms. Moore's much-publicized shaven pate, nor
to the cigar-smoking, take-no-b.s. real-life persona she brings to every
one of her projects.  Such masculinisms may not hurt G.I. JANE's he-man
quotient, but they don't define it either.  The pivotal transgender moment
occurs two-thirds of the way through the film, as Lt. O'Neil nears the end
of her SEAL training.  During a war game exercise, O'Neil's team is
captured and subjected to P.O.W. treatment.  That treatment includes an
extended sequence during which the Master Chief (Viggo Mortensen)
physically and psychologically abuses O'Neil, and in fact prepares to rape
her.  Just when we think O'Neil is beaten, she rouses herself and -- ahem
-- suggests that the Master Chief "suck my [anatomical feature usually
associated with the male of the species]."  Suddenly, with the rousing
cheers of her comrades ringing in her ears, she is an outsider no longer.
She is one of the boys, metaphorical genitalia and all, ready to trade
whisky shots and lusty cries of "Hoo-yah."
     It's the perfect climax to a film which continues the morphing of
Ridley Scott and his brother Tony into a single two-headed film-making
organism dedicated to celebrating manly men at their manliest.  Ridley
once had a sense of style, something Tony could never claim, but that
style has all but vanished in recent duds like 1492: CONQUEST OF PARADISE
and WHITE SQUALL.  In G.I. JANE, Ridley spends most of the film pointing
his camera at men (and Moore) straining their way through the rigors
of SEAL boot camp while drill instructors shout insults at them.  It's a
tired device in movies about soldiers -- after FULL METAL JACKET, the
initiation ritual has been done as well as anyone is ever going to do
it -- which runs on and on until you may be ready yourself to ring the
bell which allows the recruits to bail out.  G.I. JANE is a one-note film
just waiting for the inevitable moment when Lt. O'Neil makes her profane
statement that the best woman for the job is a man.
     I noted that that scene is the perfect climax for G.I. JANE, but in
truth it only _should have been_ the climax.  The film actually rambles on
for another half-hour, allowing O'Neil to butt heads with a duplicitous
senator (Anne Bancroft, in a wonderfully oily performance full of
matter-of-fact sleaze) before butting heads with Libyan soldiers in her
first real mission.  That mission is necessary, of course, as a real test
of O'Neil's mettle, so that she can earn the much-desired respect of the
Master Chief who beat her insensible and sexually assaulted her.  Sure
Jordan O'Neil makes it through the program.  It's the way she makes it
through which could have plenty of viewers cringing.  When G.I. JANE isn't
monotonous or ridiculous (turning O'Neil's personal training into an
excuse for sweaty T&A close-ups), it's just plain insulting.  There's no
danger or eroticism to the scene where the Master Chief interrupts O'Neil
while she's taking a shower.  After all, she doesn't have anything he
hasn't seen before in the men's shower.  Hoo-yah.

Title
Review for "Titus" (2000)
TITUS
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Jessica Lange, Alan Cumming, Angus Macfayden,
Laura Fraser, Colm Feore, Harry Lennix, Matthew Rhys, Jonathan
Rhys-Meyers, James Frain, Osheen Jones.
Screenplay:  Julie Taymor, based on TITUS ANDRONICUS by William
Shakespeare.
Producers:  Conchita Airoldi, Julie Taymor and Jody Patton.
Director:  Julie Taymor.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  162 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm not saying that there's absolutely nothing Julie Taymor isn't
willing to try in her feature film debut TITUS, but at some point during
the production I'm fairly certain I saw a kitchen sink fly through the
frame. It came somewhere between the Roman soldiers marching in
traditional costume and political rivals riding in motorcades, between the
swing band playing at an emperor's wedding feast and the swing of a camera
around a freeze-frame tableau of death a la THE MATRIX. There's no telling
from one minute to the next where or when we are, or what cinematic device
will make a cameo appearance. Virtually from the first frame, TITUS
unfolds as over two and a half hours of blood, bombast and auteurial
audacity.
     I'm having a hard time putting my finger on exactly why TITUS
actually left me marginally impressed instead of bored by the director's
"hey, check out what I can do" style. Sure, it's Shakespeare; it's also
the play T. S. Eliot called "one of the stupidest and most uninspired
plays ever written." The main narrative follows the tragedies that befall
a successful Roman general named Titus Andronicus (Anthony Hopkins) after
his return from a campaign against the Goths. Though the people want Titus
to become emperor after the death of the latest Caesar, the warrior
instead supports the late emperor's eldest son Saturninus (Alan Cumming). 
Big mistake. Soon Saturninus is married to Tamora (Jessica Lange), a Goth
queen with a grudge against Titus, and Titus' family begins meeting with
cruel fates -- many of them orchestrated by Tamora's Moorish lover Aaron
(Harry Lennix).
     TITUS' odd prologue finds a young boy (Osheen Jones) in a
contemporary kitchen playing violently with his toys before being spirited
away to the locations of the play. Initially, I suspected that Taymor was
preparing to put together an attack on the glorification and sanitization
of violence, with the boy as silent observer to the story's many murders,
sacrifices, dismemberments and throat-slashings. Indeed, the acts of
violence and vengeance are many and frequent, but the sub-text of the boy
as observer eventually vanishes as he is abruptly absorbed into the
narrative as Titus' grandson. Without a sense that there's some sort of
cultural lesson to be taken away from the gruesome events, they simply
become gruesome events. I'd never read TITUS ANDRONICUS nor seen any
production before this one, and I can't say I'm terribly eager to see it
again. T. S. Eliot wasn't being very hyperbolic in his assessment.
     Yet while TITUS is far from a gripping story, it's still a pretty
decent piece of theater. Taymor's roots are on Broadway (she directed the
stage production of THE LION KING), but that doesn't mean she can't make
use of a camera. At times, TITUS almost seems to be the work of a director
who isn't sure if she'll ever get the chance to make a film again, so she
leaves everything she's got on the screen. There are a couple of shots
that ended up lodged in my head -- a horrifying vision of Titus' daughter
Lavinia (Laura Fraser) discovered by Titus' brother Marcus (Colm Feore) 
after she has been raped and mutilated, and a truck carrying some grisly
artifacts of the Andronici's conflict with the emperor. Dante Ferretti's
production design and Elliot Goldenthal's score must have driven each man
mad, so many variations does Taymor ask of them. It's hard to imagine so
grim a tale given more energy through sheer force of a director's
imagination.
     It would be a cruel misuse of the word "entertaining" to say that
TITUS qualifies. It's well-acted enough -- Cumming in particular is a
delight as the foppish Saturninus -- but not a showcase for master
thespianism. In fact, Anthony Hopkins' best moment may be a ghoulish
reference to his renown as cinema's most famous cannibal. I didn't enjoy
all that much of TITUS, but I found myself admiring Taymor's choices even
when I didn't understand them, or even agree with them. Simply put, TITUS
is a display of film-making nerve -- the spectacle of a novice movie
director deciding to pick Shakespeare for her first work, and one of
Shakespeare's least respected works at that, then molding it into
something consistently watchable. Taymor gets her hands dirty the hard way
... and, fortunately for her, there's a kitchen sink lying around to wash
them in.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
BIG DADDY
(Columbia)
Starring: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Dylan Sprouse, Cole Sprouse,
Josh Mostel, Rob Schneider, Leslie Mann, Jon Stewart.
Screenplay: Steve Franks and Tim Herlihy & Adam Sandler.
Producers: Sid Ganis and Jack Giarraputo.
Director: Dennis Dugan.
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time: 91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As alleged harbingers of the apocalypse go, Adam Sandler hardly seems
worth the consternation.  Sure, he's a comedian with a routine based
primarily on silly voices, screaming, and the broadest of broad humor.
He's also just the latest in a long tradition of anarchic adolescent
doofus humor, a tradition with forebears like the Three Stooges, Jerry
Lewis, Robin Williams and Jim Carrey.  A clown doing poo-poo jokes can
still be a pretty entertaining clown, which Sandler has done with sporadic
effectiveness in his previous films.
     In BIG DADDY, Sandler wants to be one of those laughing on the
outside, crying on the inside clowns, and plugs himself into a
sentimental, irritatingly generic high concept comedy.  Sandler plays
Sonny Koufax, a 32-year-old law school graduate who has decided that
laying around living off a big personal injury settlement is better than
practicing law.  His irresponsibility is beginning to wear on his
long-time girlfriend (Kristy Swanson), leading Sonny to contemplate a life
change.  The opportunity comes when 5-year-old Julian (Dylan and Cole
Sprouse), the heretofore unknown son of Sonny's roommate Kevin (Jon
Stewart) shows up at the door.  With Kevin on a business trip in China,
Sonny decides to become Julian's surrogate father, a job he quickly
realizes his more difficult than he anticipated.
     And therein the laughs ensue, at least every once in a while.
Sonny's laissez-faire parenting style produces plenty of scenes in which
Julian urinates in some public place, wears outrageous clothes, or repeats
profanities in his cuter-than-cute widdle boy voice.  Some are funny, some
are groan-worthy, and some just feel a little icky as a troubled child is
turned into a prop.  It's easier to latch on to the funny, however, when
Sandler is the irresponsible id-beast we all know and love -- screaming
out his dismay over missing McDonald's breakfast, eating cereal in front
of the television, slapping newspapers over Julian's wet bed like the boy
was a puppy.  Sandler as a long-lost Stooge, a la THE WATERBOY, is where
his mischievous personality works best.
     Sandler as a would-be actor, expanding his range with touching
personal relationships and gentle romantic banter, is a huge
miscalculation.  His previous attempt at broadening his audience, last
year's THE WEDDING SINGER, was successful because it remained rooted in
silliness and never got excessively mawkish.  BIG DADDY is the very
epitome of mawkishness, full of cutesy-pie chats with love interest Joey
Lauren Adams and sad-eyed father/son moments, all set to Teddy
Castellucci's syrupy string score.  Worse yet, it's a film into which any
one of several dozen actors could have been plugged with no change.  It's
a film in which the gags are just impediments to the protagonist learning
his Important Life Lesson.  Sandler, with his smirky grin and schoolyard
hostility, always looks like he'd rather be learning how to play a
Nintendo game.
     There are a few nice comic touches in BIG DADDY, from Steve Buscemi's
turn as an oddball homeless guy to a perfect faux-Barney kiddie video.
There are also plenty of irritating touches, like Rob Schneider's
indiscriminately Middle Eastern delivery guy and the
pound-it-into-the-ground references to Hooters.  BIG DADDY is the sort of
film where it becomes easy to pick on lazy inconsistencies like a
televised NHL game announced as "crucial to the standings" despite the
fact that the film takes place in October, the first month of the NHL
season.  If Sandler worried about keeping us laughing, and understood
he's more fun to watch when he is a child than when he has one, there
wouldn't be enough time to get bogged down in the cheap emotions or sloppy
writing.  Maybe some day he'll realize how much better off he is in the
HAPPY GILMOREs of his career, when the French get around to labeling him
a comic genius.

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
     By the time Dennis Quaid, the ostensible star of SWITCHBACK, makes
his first appearance at about the 22-minute mark, you may find yourself
wondering why he bothered.  After all, writer/director Jeb Stuart has
already set up a fairly promising pair of parallel story lines.  The first
finds Amarillo, Texas sheriff Buck Olmstead (R. Lee Ermey) facing a
hotly-contested election battle just as a brutal double homicide is
discovered at a motel in his jurisdiction.  As Olmstead begins his
investigation, we also meet the two men who come to be our prime suspects.
Lane Dixon (Jared Leto) is an enigmatic young hitchhiker; Bob Goodall
(Danny Glover) is the jovial motorist who offers Lane a ride from Texas to
his Utah destination.  All the necessary conflicts seem to be in place --
the internal struggle of Olmstead over the clash between good politics and
good police work, and the external struggle as one of the two travelers
eventually becomes villain to the other's protagonist.
     But then Quaid shows up as grimly determined FBI agent Frank
LaCrosse.  LaCrosse is certain that the Amarillo murders are the work of a
serial killer he has been tracking for nearly two years.  He's not
supposed to be tracking him any more -- according to the Bureau, they've
got their man -- but LaCrosse has a very important reason for believing
otherwise.  Two months earlier, LaCrosse's own son was kidnapped by the
killer, and the boy has yet to turn up anywhere.  LaCrosse knows his
killer's work, and he knows that the man is still out there somewhere
trying to continue their game.
     It wouldn't be fair to reduce everything that's wrong with SWITCHBACK
to Quaid's presence, but it's a pretty good place to start.  There's a
reason LaCrosse feels like an intruder in the narrative instead of its
vital center:  as a dramatic actor, Dennis Quaid possesses exactly one
facial expression and one vocal intonation.  We can tell LaCrosse is
determined because his face is a perpetual tight-jawed, sourpuss pucker;
we can tell he's grim because every word comes out in an Eastwood-esque
rasp.  A more flexible performer might have given weight to the character,
pulling the audience into his haunted intensity, making SWITCHBACK _his_
film.  Quaid merely looks annoyed and slightly constipated.  It's tough to
become emotionally invested in a character's turmoil when it looks like
all he really needs is a big bowl of bran flakes.
     Even without Quaid, it doesn't appear that SWITCHBACK would have
stayed on course.  The early scenes between Leto and Glover have a lively
energy, building our curiosity over which man -- the taciturn kid or his
gregarious benefactor -- is the real threat.  Unfortunately, Stuart tips
his hand far too early in the game, both through the pitch of the
individual performances and the facts he chooses to reveal.  Once the
mystery of the killer's identity is dispatched, the interaction between
Leto and Glover becomes stale and predictable.
     In fact, "stale and predictable" describes the direction that
SWITCHBACK takes in general, falling back on far-too-common Hollywood
devices like cats jumping out of nowhere, a climactic fistfight on board a
freight train, and edgy law enforcement agents.  It's too bad Stuart
wasn't willing to spend more time with Sheriff Olmstead, far and away the
most interesting and appealing character in the film.  Played with
atypical restraint by R. Lee Ermey, he's a wonderful, unconventional hero
who seems genuinely comfortable accepting the consequences of acting on
his convictions.  A film focusing on the Olmstead would have signaled a
film-maker willing to take a few risks with his casting and story-telling.
Instead, Stuart places his trust in a "name" star who can't carry the
material.  Maybe next time he'll throw away that one crucial page in
the script, the one where the grimly determined FBI agent wanders onto the
scene to muck up a perfectly good story.

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
MYSTERY, ALASKA
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Russell Crowe, Hank Azaria, Mary McCormack, Burt Reynolds, Colm
Meaney, Ron Eldard, Maury Chaykin, Ryan Northcott, Scott Grimes, Michael
Buie, Lolita Davidovich, Kevin Durand.
Screenplay:  David E. Kelley and Sean O'Byrne.
Producers:  David E. Kelley and Howard Baldwin.
Director:  Jay Roach.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In MYSTERY, ALASKA, local sheriff John Biebe (Russell Crowe) contends
with feelings of inadequacy.  Writer Charlie Danner (Hank Azaria), an
expatriate resident, wants to be loved by the people he left behind.
Stern Judge Burns (Burt Reynolds) has difficulty connecting with his son
Birdie (Scott Grimes).  Mayor Scott Pitcher (Colm Meaney) and his wife
(Lolita Davidovich) face marital strife.  Studly local teen Stevie Weeks 
(Ryan Northcott) and his girlfriend Marla (Rachel Wilson) contemplate a
sexual relationship.  A grocer (Michael Buie) is charged with shooting a
potential chain-store competitor's representative (Michael McKean) in the
foot.  A promiscuous man (Ron Eldard) gets a comeuppance.  A corpulent
attorney (Maury Chaykin) makes the biggest court speech of his lifetime.
     After two obscenely bloated hours of MYSTERY, ALASKA, the question
may no longer be how David E. Kelley ("The Practice," "Ally McBeal,"
"Chicago Hope," "Snoops") can be so prolific, but why he doesn't know when
to quit.  Ostensibly, the film is the story of a tiny Alaskan hamlet with
a tradition of great skaters participating in a ritualistic Saturday
afternoon hockey game against one another.  When Danner writes a "Sports
Illustrated" cover story on Mystery, the NHL decides to send the New York
Rangers for a goodwill exhibition game against the scrappy underdogs.  The
set-up is extremely promising, gradually revealing the importance of
hockey and the "Saturday game" to the residents of Mystery.  With Carter
Burwell's typically splendid score adding to the mystery of Mystery,
there's hope that Kelley and director Jay Roach will combine an amusing
little sociology lesson about small-town pride with the ever-appealing
scrappy underdog story.
     They then proceed to heap so much extra baggage on the story that it
never has a chance of getting off the ground.  It's one thing to spend
time on Biebe's story, in which his emasculating ouster from the Saturday
game runs parallel with his jealousy of local celebrity Danner -- who also
happens to be the old flame of Biebe's wife Donna (Mary McCormack).
There's even an excuse, however feeble, for Marla's awkward attempts to
make sure Steve won't leave her for an easier catch.  The rest of the
half-dozen or so plot threads in MYSTERY, ALASKA are just plain
inexcusable.  The first hour of the film is a grinding ordeal, so
fragmented and unfocused that it's easy to forget what it's all supposed
to be leading up to.  
     In the final half-hour, when the film finally gets around to the
hockey game, MYSTERY, ALASKA generates at least a little energy.  The
Rangers are a fairly anonymous opponent -- too much time is wasted on
tangents to create a worthy adversary -- but Roach directs the game scenes
with plenty of verve.  Then even the game begins to over-stay its welcome,
losing momentum by the minute.  Any potential for a rousing conclusion is
lost in memories of the preceding two hours, with its two typically
bombastic Kelley courtroom scenes, tedious pacing and undisciplined
script.  MYSTERY, ALASKA is a film that inspires slack-jawed frustration,
leaving a viewer scrambling for a reason why this simple concept went so
horribly wrong.  The answer may be just as simple: perhaps Kelley grew
bored with something as mundane as a single film, and decided to turn it
into a rambling two hour pilot for yet another television series.  

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
OCTOBER SKY
(Universal)
Starring:  Jake Gyllenhaal, Chris Cooper, Chris Owen, William Lee Scott,
Chad Lindberg, Natalie Canerday, Laura Dern.
Screenplay:  Lewis Colick, based on the memoir "Rocket Boys" by Homer
Hickam Jr.
Producers:  Charles Gordon and Larry Franco.
Director:  Joe Johnston.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     OCTOBER SKY is a tough sort of film to get people to look at clearly.
Touted in its marketing campaign as "inspirational" and "triumphant" --
usually code words for "sentimental" and "heavy-handed" -- it could easily
lead more cynical movie-goers to dismiss it sight unseen as mawkish
foolishness.  Others, of a more feel-good nature, will think they have
seen a great film simply because, well, it makes them feel good.  It's
hard for both potential sets of viewers to get a handle on why OCTOBER SKY
works -- it avoids most of the traps the former group fears, while
delivering the satisfying emotional resonance the latter group desires.
     Set in 1957, OCTOBER SKY tells the true story of Homer Hickam (Jake
Gyllenhaal), a 17-year-old high school junior in the mining town of
Coalwood, West Virginia.  Lacking the football skills of his older brother
Jim (Scott Miles), which has been the only way out for most Coalwood
youth, Homer seems destined to work in the coal mines like his father John
(Chris Cooper).  That's until the extraordinary event of October 1957 --
the launch of the Soviet rocket Sputnik -- inspires Homer to work on his
own rocket.  Recruiting classmates Quentin (Chris Owen), Roy Lee (William
Lee Scott) and O'Dell (Chad Lindberg) to assist him, Homer sets out to
create a rocket that will land him in the National Science Fair.
Unfortunately, Homer's primary detractor is an important one:  his father,
who believes Homer's quest is a fool's errand.
     This, of course, is the cue to begin your typical triumph of the
spirit, winning-against-the-odds, kids-wiser-than-their parents
crowd-pleaser.  In some ways, the elements in OCTOBER SKY are quite 
typical:  a determined young hero, societal obstacles, a big climax at a
competitive event.  Yet there are enough ways OCTOBER SKY is _not_ typical
to make it surprisingly effective.  Director Joe Johnston, best known for
special effects-driven films like JUMANJI and THE ROCKETEER, lends energy
and humor to the montage of failed initial attempts at rocket flight.  The
production creates a complete, convincing picture of its small-town world,
treating its characters with a clear-eyed realization that they're neither
simple hicks nor salt-of-the-earth country folk.  And there's something
fundamentally, unconventionally appealing about a film where teenagers are
obsessed with an intellectual pursuit, a film where the protagonist proves
his innocence of a suspected crime by using a mathematical formula.
     It is also unconventionally appealing to see a father-son
relationship treated with such sensitivity and intelligence.  Certainly it
helps that an actor as subtly gifted as Chris Cooper is playing John
Hickam.  Too many actors would have made him a gruff thick-head who
converts to understanding just in time for a big hug; Cooper makes John's
stubbornness both caring and slightly dismissive of a boy acting smarter
than his own pa.  Jake Gyllenhaal is equally enjoyable as Homer, making
his fascination with rocket science an expression of his desire to explore
the universe beyond Coalwood.  The interactions between John and Homer
form OCTOBER SKY's emotional backbone, and nearly every one of them is
pitched at a level of conflict which seems honest rather than
movie-conflict shrill.
     There are a number of occasions when OCTOBER SKY does begin to feel
like its more convention-bound cousins.  There is an obligatory romantic
sub-plot for Homer which appears and disappears so quickly that there
hardly seems to be a point; an illness experienced by Homer's favorite
teacher (Laura Dern), while historically accurate, further bogs down the
narrative.  The last half-hour of OCTOBER SKY is not nearly as well-paced
as the first hour, dragging out Homer's journey to the National Science
Fair, but that doesn't detract from the film's many pleasures.  OCTOBER
SKY is inspirational, and it is triumphant; it's also smart, well-written,
and well-acted.  This one shows that feel-good movies don't also have to
be feel-dumb movies.

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Brad Pitt, David Thewlis, B. D. Wong, Jamyang Wangchuk.
Screenplay:  Becky Johnston, based on the memoir by Heinrich Harrer.
Producers:  Jean-Jacques Annaud, John H. Williams and Iain Smith.
Director:  Jean-Jacques Annaud.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  137 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If you accept Hollywood's version of things, history -- particularly
the uglier parts of history -- is what happens while white people are
watching.  It's not terribly surprising, since studios generally balk at
anything remotely depressing; fears can be allayed if an established
Anglo actor anchors such projects.  So we end up with revolution in South
America through the eyes of James Woods in SALVADOR, the plight of Native
Americans as seen by Kevin Costner in DANCES WITH WOLVES, upheaval in
Burma as it affects Patricia Arquette in BEYOND RANGOON...not one of them
a terrible film, but each one compromised by the sense that we couldn't be
trusted to identify with a dark face.  In fact, these stories aren't even
about the culture involved.  They're "the story of one man's/woman's
awakening set against the backdrop of..."
     ...in this case, Tibet.  SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET is the story of
Heinrich Harrer (Brad Pitt), an arrogant Austrian mountaineer who leaves
his preganat wife at home on the eve of World War II to scale the
Himalayan peak of Nanga Parbat.  Unfortunately, the expedition meets an
abrupt end when the climbers are taken as prisoners of war by the British
when war is officially declared.  Eventually Heinrich escapes along with
fellow Austrian Peter Aufschneiter (David Thewlis), and the two men try to
make their way from India through Tibet to Axis-friendly China.  In Tibet
they find an isolated, alien culture which only gradually comes to accept
them.  Particularly accepting is the 14-year-old Dalai Lama himself
(Jamyang Wangchuk), who becomes fascinated with Heinrich's knowledge of
the outside world and makes him a trusted advisor.  Heinrich, in turn,
becomes devoted to the young spiritual leader, joining the Tibetan people
in facing the threat which comes after the Communist victory in China.
     There is a lot to like about individual moments, technical skill and
overall atmosphere in SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET.  An early mountain-climbing
sequence is tense and restrained, the location photography is spectacular,
and the performances of Thewlis and Wangchuk (enchanting as the wise yet
playful Dalai Lama) are solid and appealing.  The relationship between
Heinrich and the Dalai Lama is the most effective element in the film,
smartly rendered by Becky Johnston's script.  It takes a while for SEVEN
YEARS to reach that relationship, but it's well-developed once it becomes
the film's focus.
     It's often hard to see that focus, however, because SEVEN YEARS IN
TIBET is an epic which feels like it's rushing frantically from place to
place.  There's a lot of ground to cover in Harrer's story, probably more
than 135 minutes can cover, but that's all we get.  The Nanga Parbat
expedition abruptly crashes into the POW camp sequences, which crash into
a montage of wandering through the mountains, which collides with a
capture by bandits, which trickles into the first arrival in Lhasa.
Months pass in the space between voice-overs, leaving gaps in the
development of the story's force.  Rather than finding the solid narrative
through-line and sticking with it, the script hunts and pecks for dramatic
events over a decade of time.
     Of course, SEVEN YEARS' narrative through-line is the emotional and
spiritual growth of Harrer, so it's hard to say whether that would have
been an improvement.  It's not that Pitt does a bad job as Harrer, though
his Austrian accent wanders from here to there.  In fact, he does a fine
job of making Harrer more than just a cocky rascal; he's thoroughly
self-absorbed to the point of needing a good spanking.  But Pitt could
give the performance of a lifetime, and we'd still be left with a film
which doesn't seem to have its priorities straight.  It's true that even a
sweeping story needs a protagonist to give broad-scale suffering a human
face, but that face doesn't have to be topped by a head of blond hair. 
If SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET had not attempted to be more than the biography of
an interesting man, I might have enjoyed it much more.  Instead, its
attempts to be a "message" film end up delivering the wrong messages. 
While the Chinese conquest of Tibet warrants about five minutes of screen
time in SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET, Harrer's project building a movie theater
for the Dalai Lama gets twice that.  It's ironic, in a way:  even within
the film, the media of the West threaten to overwhelm another culture.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
ALMOST FAMOUS
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Billy Crudup, Kate Hudson, Patrick Fugit, Frances McDormand,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jason Lee.
Screenplay:  Cameron Crowe.
Producers:  Cameron Crowe and Ian Bryce.
Director:  Cameron Crowe.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  124 minutes.
     Cameron Crowe's ALMOST FAMOUS -- the writer/director's first film
since 1996's JERRY MAGUIRE -- tallies up its first simple yet thoroughly
inspired moment just seconds into the film, during the opening credits. In
a cute conceit connected to the story's protagonist, a 15-year-old
aspiring music journalist, we see a hand scrawling out the cast on a
yellow pad with a pencil. Among those names is "Frances McDormand," which
the writer initially spells "Francis" before quickly erasing the error and
flicking away the powdered rubber. Not a line of dialogue had been spoken,
and already I was hooked. To crib a line from Crowe's last film, ALMOST
FAMOUS had me at hello.
     Crowe has helmed only four films in his career -- SAY ANYTHING,
SINGLES, JERRY MAGUIRE and now ALMOST FAMOUS -- but I'm tempted to call
him America's most effortlessly gifted film-maker. He scores again with
his semi-autobiographical tale of William Miller (newcomer Patrick Fugit),
a precociously talented San Diego youth with dreams of writing for
national rock and roll magazines circa 1973. His enthusiasm lands him an
assignment for Rolling Stone to write about up-and-coming rock band
Stillwater, led by guitarist Russell Hammond (Billy Crudup) and singer
Jeff Bebe (Jason Lee). Against the better judgment of his over-protective
mother (McDormand), William heads out on a cross-country tour with
Stillwater. There he learns about "band-aids" like Penny Lane (Kate
Hudson) who lend inspiration to their favorite musicians, and about the
sex and drugs side of sex, drugs and rock 'n' roll. He also learns that
it's hard to be a journalist while you also a 15-year-old kid who wants
nothing more than to be thought cool by the members of a rock band.
     There's nothing particularly profound about a coming-of-age story
with a rock 'n' roll backdrop, nor does there need to be. Crowe isn't a
"statement" kind of guy, and it doesn't seem to hurt his films in the
least. ALMOST FAMOUS simply drops us into the world of rock in the early
'70s, and lets us observe through William's wide eyes. And it's a
splendidly rendered world, from the acerbic observations on the death of
rock 'n' roll from William's mentor, Creem magazine editor Lester Bangs
(Philip Seymour Hoffman), to the hotel room parties full of the requisite
mood-altering substances. Like Crowe's other films, this one seems to
amble along in no particular hurry to get anywhere, giving the characters
lots of room to maneuver, yet never feels unfocused or uninvolving. 
Occasionally the loose structure gets in the way, as it does when Crowe
fails to provide enough foundation for Stillwater's burgeoning popularity
either through their music or through their performances. Far more often,
the moment-to-moment experience is too enjoyable for anyone to notice.
     In large part, that moment-to-moment pleasure comes from Crowe's
uncanny ability to direct actors. As he has in his previous films, he puts
together a solid cast and makes magic. McDormand, though she remains a
too-mannered performer at times, is still entertaining as William's
intense mother; Fugit is likeable and innocent in a way that's never 
bland; Hoffman is yet again is so good you just want to throttle Hollywood
for not allowing him to be a star. And then there's the luminous Kate
Hudson (and "luminous" is not entirely metaphorical; she should hire John
Toll to photograph her for the rest of her life). Like William, Penny only
fools herself into thinking it's ever about the music; though she creates
herself as a sort of muse, she's just looking to fill an empty space with
rock 'n' roll's mythology of freedom. Penny is the story's anchor, and
Hudson's facial expressions are so perfect they're heartbreaking.
     As deftly as Crowe handles his story, there are still occasional
missteps. A broadly played scene during a bumpy flight on the band's
private jet veers into silliness, and Crowe never takes a moment to give a
personality to Russell's neglected girlfriend (Liz Stauber). Those tics
and a few others like it might have been more damaging in another film,
made by another film-maker, but ALMOST FAMOUS just seems to absorb its
flaws and roll on. There's something almost hypnotic about the grace with
which Cameron Crowe puts a film together, something that produces winner
after winner. It's not a life-changing experience, not a clockwork plot or
a joke-a-minute script. It's just the pleasure of watching a director who
can suck you in with the brush of an eraser.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
eXistenZ
(Dimension)
Starring:  Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jude Law, Ian Holm, Willem Dafoe.
Screenplay:  David Cronenberg.
Producers:  Robert Lantos, Andras Hamori and David Cronenberg.
Director:  David Cronenberg.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     David Cronenberg's eXistenZ may be as thematically dense a film as
we'll see all year.  It touches on the nature of reality, and the ways we
seek to escape it and embrace it at the same time.  It addresses issues of
violence in the media, as well as the nature of constructing a work of
fiction.  It's a cautionary tale, and a caution against excessive caution.
It's a social satire, and even a self-satire.  It's also, ultimately, a
sinkhole for narrative and characterization.  Cronenberg has created an
emotionally weightless intellectual exercise that's fun to parse but
little fun to watch.
     eXistenZ begins with what amounts to a preview screening for a new
cutting edge virtual reality game called eXistenZ, designed by reclusive
gaming genius Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh).  Before she can begin
the first demonstration, however, Allegra is the target of an
assassination attempt by a radical anti-virtual reality terrorist.
Accompanied by Ted Pikul (Jude Law), the game company's marketing intern,
as her impromptu bodyguard, Allegra heads into the countryside to see if
her eXistenZ prototype game module -- damaged in the assassination attempt
-- can be saved.  The only way to test that, of course, is to play the
game, leading Allegra and Ted to discover a world almost too similar to
the "real world" to tell the difference.
     If you know your Cronenberg (VIDEODROME, THE FLY, CRASH) at all, you
know that you're entering a decidedly freaky realm.  The world of eXistenZ
includes pseudo-organic game pods that plug into the users' spines through
a "bio-port" and a big umbilical cord; it features a pistol made of flesh
and bone that fires human teeth (all the better to escape detection).
Those who got off on the head-trippy kinkiness of CRASH will find
themselves quite comfortable with a film in which characters get frisky
with the holes in each other's backs, and where a meal in a Chinese
restaurant consists of mutant amphibians sucked right off the skeleton.
     Those same viewers may also find themselves wrapped up in
deconstructing Cronenberg's various messages.  The design of the game pods
-- which none-too-subtly resemble a compilation of erogenous zones --
turns into a poke at the masturbatory nature of video games, while
Allegra's writhing response to "plugging in" adds drug addiction to the
metaphorical layering.  The story treats us to characters who commit
violence in the real world while thinking they're still in a game world
-- a creepy, timely commentary on the influence of pop culture violence --
then takes a swipe at the actions of the neo-Luddite anti-game faction.
Perhaps most amusingly, eXistenZ plays with how characters behave in a
fictional world, extending by implication to the plot-advancing
conventions in film itself.  There's enough sub-text in eXistenZ to keep a
viewer well-occupied for its 97 minutes.
     If only Cronenberg had bothered to bring along any actual text to
flesh out that subtext.  eXistenZ plays out like a scholarly analysis of
itself, a cinematic Cliff's Notes for a novel that doesn't actually exist.
Leigh and Law are as purely functional in their roles as their characters
are in their game-roles, and while Cronenberg may find that little
meta-joke amusing, for a viewer it's merely distracting.  By the time the
plot of eXistenZ starts folding in on itself (leading to a revelation
that's not at all revelatory if you've been paying attention), you may
find yourself wondering why you should care about any of it.  Cronenberg
is as stylistically distinctive a film-maker as we have in this
cookie-cutter era, but he's locked himself into a rut of message-filled
visions with no human connection.  eXistenZ plays out like a hallucinatory
letter to the editor.

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)

Title
Review for Safe Passage (1994)
Starring:  Susan Sarandon, Sam Shepard, Robert Sean Leonard, Nick
Stahl, Sean Astin, Marcia Gay Harden, Jason London.
Screenplay:  Deena Goldstone.
Director:  Robert Allan Ackerman.
     Films like SAFE PASSAGE have been a television staple for
years.  They're about families in crisis facing pent-up resentments,
steely matriarchs and ineffectual (or absent) patriarchs, and lots
and *lots* of crying.  Every once in a while, one will sneak its way
onto the big screen, usually on the cachet of a big-name star or
director (a la ORDINARY PEOPLE), and occasionally a great
performance (like Kathy Bates in 1993's A HOME OF OUR OWN) can turn
tired material into something special.  Susan Sarandon is a big name
who turns in a great performance in SAFE PASSAGE, but even she can't
save this mess.  There are simply too many interchangeably troubled
characters wandering around shouting at each other.
     Sarandon stars as Mag Singer, a middle-aged mother of seven
sons separated from her husband Patrick (Sam Shepard).  Mag has a
premonition that one of her sons is in danger, a premonition that
may come true when an explosion destroys a Middle Eastern Marine
barracks where son Percival is stationed.  As she awaits word on
whether or not Percival is among the casualties, Mag is joined by
the rest of her family, including oldest son Alfred (Robert Sean
Leonard) and his divorced girlfriend (Marcia Gay Harden), son Izzy
(Sean Astin) and Patrick, who is experiencing periodic attacks of
blindness.  The waiting leads to conflict, as Mag and Philip re-hash
old differences, and Mag ponders all the mistakes she made raising
her sons.
     You might begin to realize what is wrong with SAFE PASSAGE if
you note that the preceding summary only names three of the seven
sons.  And except for the remarkably well-adjusted twins, every one
of them is working through some sort of neurosis or involved in the
storyline in some way.  Alfred is too rigid and uptight; Gideon
(Jason London) is a track star convinced that beating Percival in a
race led to Percival enlisting; youngest son Simon (Nick Stahl, from
THE MAN WITHOUT A FACE) is a twitchy kid with Jello-stiffened
dreadlocks.  There are simply too many characters bouncing around in
SAFE PASSAGE, and director Robert Allan Ackerman often seems like
one of the reporters who appears at the singer house running after a
quote.  With writer Deena Goldstone, he has created characters who
are little more than sound bites, and none of their problems seem to
matter all that much.
     With this lack of focus comes the sense that no one making this
movie really knew what it was supposed to be about.  Is it about
Mag's lack of fulfillment which leads to her separation, and her
attempt to become a social worker?  Is it about her relationships
with her sons and her guilt over her failings?  Is it about any of
the individual sons' resentment over Patrick's insistence on them
pushing themselves?  It's about all of these things, and it's about
none of them.  SAFE PASSAGE is filled with little snippets of
development which run into infuriating dead ends, but there isn't
really a point.  Mag seems to be developing a friendship with
Alfred's shy girlfriend, one which might establish a kind of
parallel to her parenting, but it's only a footnote.  Patrick's
vision problems seem to exist only to give Sean Astin's Izzy
something to worry about, and Simon is confused, but no more
confused than I was as I tried to figure out exactly why he even
needed to be part of the story.  SAFE PASSAGE simply needed about
four fewer sons and a real identity for those that were included.
     It does have Susan Sarandon, though, and she makes up for a
multitude of failings.  She has the guts to take Mag just to the
edge of being crazy, showing us how easy it is to become crazy
raising seven sons and living with an immature husband.  She has a
couple of wonderful scenes in which her near-obsessive concern for
her sons' well-being goes a bit too far, including a very funny
flashback in which she carries Percival off the field after he is
injured in a youth football game.  But as good as she is, she isn't
given a handle on who Mag is, at least not one which can carry the
film past its scattershot characterizations.  A movie like SAFE
PASSAGE, in which nothing really happens, depends on the development
of strong characters to carry it through.  SAFE PASSAGE is simply a
collection of Character McNuggets.

Title
Review for Client, The (1994)
Starring:  Susan Sarandon, Brad Renfro, Tommy Lee Jones, Anthony
LaPaglia, Mary-Louise Parker.
Screenplay:  Akiva Goldsman and Robert Getchell.
Director:  Joel Schumacher.
     The film adaptation of John Grisham's THE CLIENT is in a unique
position.  Commercially, there are probably great expectations; THE
FIRM and THE PELICAN BRIEF combined to gross over $200 million at the
box office last year.  Artistically, on the other hand, the
expectations are probably much lower, again based on the previous
Grisham adaptations.  Grisham on the screen is like Grisham on the
page:  glossy, undemanding, straight-ahead potboilers, perfect for mass
consumption.  But surprisingly, THE CLIENT is slightly more than that.
Even if the whole does not quite equal the sum of its more impressive
parts, THE CLIENT edges out THE FIRM as the best of the three Grisham
films.
     THE CLIENT is the story of eleven-year-old Mark Sway (Brad
Renfro), a poor Tennessee youth who is in the wrong place at the wrong
time one day.  While out in the woods with his younger brother, Mark
stumbles upon a suicidal Mafia lawyer, who spills some dark secrets to
Mark before he kills himself.  The incident leaves the younger brother
traumatized into a catatonic state, and leaves Mark as the only
witness.  This makes him valuable to publicity-hungry New Orleans
district attorney Roy Foltrigg (Tommy Lee Jones), and dangerous to
Barry "The Blade" Moldano (Anthony LaPaglia), who stands to lose the
most from Mark's knowledge.  Convinced he needs help, Mark turns to
Reggie Love (Susan Sarandon), a lawyer looking for a second chance, and
who becomes Mark's only hope.
     THE CLIENT, like THE FIRM, benefits most from a wealth of solid
performances.  Susan Sarandon carries herself with the tension of
someone who knows she has made a lot of mistakes and can't afford to
make any more; Tommy Lee Jones does an oilier take on his Sam Gerard
from THE FUGITIVE, with a dash more Southern bluster.  The scenes in
which Sarandon and Jones tangle are masterful, sparks of raw
intelligence flying between the two gifted performers, making it
regrettable that there aren't more.  Newcomer Brad Renfro actually has
far more screen time than either of his big-name co-stars, and he is
occasionally very good, particularly when showing a bit of an edge.
He's less successful when asked to deliver emotion-filled speeches,
like his description of the custody battle between his parents.  The
best performance, however, might be that of Mary- Louise Parker as
Mark's mother.  In many ways it is a better written part than any of
the three leads, rich and complex, and Parker is wonderful in a
scene-stealing supporting role similar to Holly Hunter and David
Strathairn in THE FIRM.
     There is so much good acting going on in THE CLIENT (aside from
Anthony LaPaglia, whose cartoonish Mafioso does everything but grab his
crotch) that it's easy to overlook what a hum-drum thriller it is.
This isn't true of the first half hour, where director Joel Schumacher
keeps the tension notched up high.  The encounter between Mark and the
babbling attorney, intercut with the reactions of the ever more
frightened brother, is extremely effective, and the low-angle
perspective on Mark's confrontation with an obnoxious police officer
creates a heightened paranoia.  Then, as Grisham plots tend to do, THE
CLIENT's sputters out like a released balloon.  The climactic showdown
is abrupt, silly and very unsatisfying, an appropriate wrap-up to a
sluggish second hour.  It almost seems as though Schumacher realized
that the suspense elements were the least interesting, and did only
what was necessary for resolution.
     In fact, THE CLIENT is much more effective as a character study
than it is as a thriller.  The relationship between Mark and Reggie is
intriguing, as Mark realizes he needs to trust someone and Reggie tries
to exorcise the demons of an alcoholism which drove away her children.
But that relationship is a bit rushed, and while both THE FIRM and THE
PELICAN BRIEF overstayed their welcome, THE CLIENT might have benefited
from an additional ten or fifteen minutes of character development.  It
might have made the maudlin closing scene between Reggie and Mark more
tolerable.  Still, THE CLIENT's first- rate cast carries it through its
many lulls.  Provided you aren't heading to see THE CLIENT expecting a
pulse-pounding thriller, its possible you could be in for a pleasant
surprise.

Title
Review for Nutty Professor, The (1996)
Starring:  Eddie Murphy, Jada Pinkett, Larry Miller, James Coburn, Dave
Chappelle.
Screenplay:  David Sheffield, Barry W. Blaustein, Tom Shadyac, Steve
Oedekerk.
Director:  Tom Shadyac.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If you ask most movie stars whether a given project is a "comeback,"
they would probably insist that they were never away.  In the case of
Eddie Murphy, that's actually pretty close to the truth.  _You_ may not
have seen HARLEM NIGHTS, or THE DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN, or BOOMERANG, or
even BEVERLY HILLS COP III, but someone did -- over $300 million worth of
someones, in fact.  So no, Eddie Murphy never went anywhere; it was only
his ability to make people laugh which took a long vacation.  I was
beginning to wonder whether there was any of the old spark left in Murphy,
and then along comes THE NUTTY PROFESSOR.  he still might have trouble
identifying a decent script, but his talent is in full flower, including
an unexpectedly broad acting range.
     Murphy plays Sherman Klump, a brilliant chemistry professor with a
bit of a weight problem -- about 400 lbs. worth.  His weight has resulted
in clashes with the university's dean (Larry Miller) and has made him
rather unlucky in love.  When the department's new graduate student Carla
Purdy (Jada Pinkett) captures Sherman's fancy, he resorts to testing his
latest experiment, a formula for reducing weight at a genetic level, on
himself.  The result is a startling transformation of Sherman Klump into
Buddy Love, a lean, mean testosterone machine who is every bit the party
animal Sherman never was.  The problems begin when Buddy reverts to
Sherman at the most inconvenient times, and gets worse when Buddy's
personality begins to become dominant, threatening to take over Sherman's
life for good.
     The lion's share of the pleasures in THE NUTTY PROFESSOR are pure
Eddie Murphy, but not necessarily Eddie Murphy the way you are accustomed
to seeing him.  True, he does take on multiple roles behind Rick Baker's
incredible makeup, including a Richard Simmons-styled fitness guru and
several members of the Klump family, much as he did in COMING TO AMERICA.
There are some big laughs in those family dinner scenes, particularly an
extraordinarily embarrassing dinner with Carla in attendance, although the
flatulence gags are piled on a bit thick.  But Murphy is not coasting on
his street-wise motor-mouth persona here, the persona which often seemed
to be the only reason for dud projects like THE GOLDEN CHILD or THE
DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN to exist.  If anything, THE NUTTY PROFESSOR is a
chance to poke fun at that persona through the hyper-slick Buddy Love.
Buddy is the arrogant, self-absorbed misogynist everyone probably believes
Murphy really is, and he knows enough to tweak that image for all he's
worth.
     The real surprise is watching Murphy sink his teeth into a real
character, and do some real acting.  Klump is not a sad-sack or a
grotesquerie, like his counterpart in the Jerry Lewis original; he is a
sensitive soul who tries to laugh along when he knows others are laughing
at him, until that laughter becomes a humiliation at the hands of an
obnoxious "Def Comedy Jam"-type stand-up comic (hilariously played by Dave
Chappelle).  At the same time, Klump shows a streak of the repressed sex
god, grooving to Teddy Pendergrass after Carla agrees to go out with him.
Murphy brings out that side as something endearing, and makes his shy,
self-effacing manner terrifically appealing.  I never thought I would see
the day when Eddie Murphy would play a character who inspired sympathy,
but watching Klump disintegrate before a barrage of the comedian's barbs
is genuinely poignant.
     Murphy is so good that it's too bad he doesn't have better material
to work with, or a more supportive supporting cast.  The exceptions to
both rules come in the wonderful nightclub scenes, the second of which
finds a caustic Buddy turning the tables on the same comic who tore
Sherman to shreds.  For the most part, the script is all set-up with few
truly inspired comic situations, relying on absurdist dream sequences and
special effects for the big gags.  There are moments when Buddy Love is on
screen that you are waiting for Murphy to run to the extreme, and ACE
VENTURA director Tom Shadyac just seems to be waiting for him to do
something wacky.  The script doesn't really give him the best
opportunities, though, and he is playing off undeserving foils in Jada
Pinkett and an uncomfortably edgy Larry Miller.  Murphy is trying to show
what he can do here, and he is given material like the overly obvious
homily at the film's conclusion which doesn't show trust in his abilities
to convey emotion without spelling it all out.  Those abilities turn out
to be what makes THE NUTTY PROFESSOR so much fun.  Welcome back, Eddie,
even if you never went away.

Title
Review for We're Back! A Dinosaur's Story (1993)
Voices:  John Goodman, Joey Shea, Yeardley Smith, Kenneth Mars,
Walter Cronkite.
Screenplay:  John Patrick Shanley.
Directors:  Dick Zondag & Ralph Zondag.
     For the first time in several years, Disney does not have a new
animated release for the holidays, as The House the Mouse Built instead
readies THE LION KING for summer 1994.  Into that void steps WE'RE
BACK! A DINOSAUR'S STORY, hoping to rake up some of the family
entertainment dollars now available for the taking.  If I didn't know
how long animation takes to produce, I'd swear Universal had thrown it
together in a few months just for that purpose.  WE'RE BACK is sadly
uninspired kiddie fare, perhaps moderately diverting for elementary
schoolers but likely to be a tedious 70 minutes for their parents.
     WE'RE BACK is the story of four dinosaurs subjected to a unique
experiment by time-traveling scientist Captain NewEyes (voice of Walter
Cronkite).  Rex the Tyrannosaurus rex (John Goodman), Elsa the
pterodactyl (Felicity Kendal), Woog the triceratops (Rene Levant) and
Dweeb the apatosaurus (Charles Fleischer) are all given an
intelligence-enhancing grain and invited to the future to fulfill the
wishes of children who want to see a real dinosaur.  They agree, and
find themselves in modern day New York where they meet two lonely
kids:  cocky Louie (Joey Shea) and poor-little-rich-girl Cecilia
(Yeardley Smith).  They also meet Captain NewEyes' evil brother
Professor ScrewEyes (Kenneth Mars), whose scary circus threatens both
children and dinosaurs.
     From a story standpoint, WE'RE BACK is a mess.  It seems to
have no idea what it wants to be--fast paced adventure, goofy comedy,
dark mood piece--so it throws a little bit of everything into the stew
in the hope that something will work.  But the chase sequences are only
interesting thanks to gut-churning computer effects, the comedy is limp
and the scarier segments, which are the best, come far too late.  There
is even an attempt at a musical production number, a lively enough
James Horner-Thomas Dolby composition called "Roll Back the Rock," but
it strains so hard to be charming that it's an effort to watch.  The
schizophrenic tone is not necessarily a problem for a 7-year-old
attention span, but the lack of continuity gave me a headache.
     Visually, the film fares only slightly better.  The prehistoric
setting is appropriately gloomy, but we only see it for about a
minute.  Most of the film takes place in a New York colored in oranges
and golds, and it's just not at all interesting to look at.  Professor
ScrewEyes' circus is dark and creepy, but it is a real missed
opportunity.  Directors Dick and Ralph Zondag could have gone for a
real PINOCCHIO-style funhouse of frights, but they just let the circus
sit there full of unexplored potential.  They manage to pull out one
truly arresting image, involving a flock of crows, but the film is
almost over by that time.  Nothing in WE'RE BACK captures the eye or
the imagination.
     Perhaps the fatal flaw in WE'RE BACK is a collection of characters
which might almost scrape together a personality between them.  Disney
built its empire on carefully created and memorably performed
characters, but screenwriter John Patrick Shanley turns in as bland a
bunch as I can imagine.  John Goodman does a half-hearted Bing Crosby
impression as the affable Rex, Charles Fleischer simply recycles Roger
Rabbit as Dweeb, and Felicity Kendal and Rene Levant are each thrown a
token character trait as the other dinosaurs.  Walter Cronkite and
Julia Child seem to be present only for the novelty of doing trademark
lines to animation, and Jay Leno is genuinely annoying as Captain
NewEyes' alien sidekick.  The kids are not bad, nicely performed by
Joey Shea and "The Simpsons'" Yeardley Smith, but the only real fun
comes from Martin Short as a frustrated clown in the scary circus.  His
antics are as random as everything else, but at least they were funny.
     As if the slipshod Disney knockoffs (the contract signing from THE
LITTLE MERMAID, zoom-ins on the wide-eyed heroine) weren't bad enough,
WE'RE BACK gives in to insipid moralizing.  Uncle Walt had more respect
for kids than that.  It's too bad when parents' only matinee options
are as monotonous as WE'RE BACK.  Better to rent FREE WILLY again.

Title
Review for Mother Night (1996)
Starring:  Nick Nolte, Sheryl Lee, Alan Arkin, John Goodman, Bernard
Behrens, Kirstin Dunst.
Screenplay:  Robert B. Weide, based on the novel by Kurt Vonnegut.
Producers: Keith Gordon, Robert B. Weide.
Director:  Keith Gordon.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Having read most of Kurt Vonnegut's novels before viewing MOTHER
NIGHT, I predicted to myself that it was the most likely of Vonnegut's
works to make a successful transition to the screen.  Much of the Vonnegut
canon has struck me as singularly unfilmable -- including one which _was_
filmed, SLAUGHTERHOUSE-FIVE -- but MOTHER NIGHT's narrative was a
relatively straightforward one, and its themes equally direct.  In a
sense, director Keith Gordon's MOTHER NIGHT has proved me correct; in
another sense, it has proved me dreadfully wrong.  Thought well-crafted
and moderately compelling in its own right, MOTHER NIGHT loses a lot with
the absence of Vonnegut's ironic voice.  Where the novel was a sly social
comedy, the film strives almost for Greek tragedy.
     Nick Nolte stars as Howard W. Campbell Jr., an American-born
playwright living in Berlin in the 1930s with his actress-wife Helga Noth
(Sheryl Lee).  Campbell's way with words brings him to the attention of
Third Reich officials, who recruit him to create a weekly radio program of
Nazi propaganda.  He is also recruited by Frank Wirtanen (John Goodman),
an American agent who asks Campbell to act as a double-agent and broadcast
coded Nazi secrets during his program.  Campbell agrees, even though the
Americans insist they will never acknowledge him, a circumstance which
places him in an uncomfortable situation when the Nazis lose the war.
Campbell begins an anonymous life in New York City, but even his
friendship with neighbor George Kraft (Alan Arkin) makes it difficult for
him to live without Helga and with the growing realization that he may
have been more villain than hero.
     The title of MOTHER NIGHT comes from a line in Goethe's "Faust" about
the interdependence of Good and Evil, and it is that gray area which the
film explores in the character of Howard W. Campbell Jr.  Gordon frames
the film, like the novel, as a flashback, with black-and-white segments of
Campbell awaiting trial in Israel and preparing his memoirs, so there is a
built-in sense of impending justice.  Nick Nolte contributes to that
feeling with one of his best performances in years as a man whose history
begins to weigh him down, and who learns the hard way that it is
impossible to remain apolitical when politics turns to war.  It is a
finely constructed narrative which holds the focus on one of Vonnegut's
key lines:  "We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful what we
pretend to be."
     There is a difference, however, between retaining lines and retaining
the tone of those lines, and that is where Robert B. Weide's script
becomes a disappointment.  Though MOTHER NIGHT deals with heavy subject
matter -- conscience, personal identity, the Holocaust -- Vonnegut never
resorted to heaviness to tell the story.  The kind of detached irony which
is Vonnegut's stock in trade is tough to convey cinematically, and Gordon
steers instead into the twin extremes of overly straight drama (as in the
scene where Campbell watches an old newsreel of himself with growing
horror) or broad comedy (the portrayal of a collection of hate-mongers who
idolize Campbell).  There are certainly moments where Gordon hits just the
right note, like the opening shot of an Israeli flag underscored by Bing
Crosby's rendition of "White Christmas," or the off-handed comment by
fellow prisoner Adolph Eichmann (the disembodied voice of Henry Gibson)
when Campbell accuses him of the murder of of six million Jews -- "I can
spare a few of them for you."  Too often, however, the earnestness becomes
burdensome.
     It is an example of Gordon and Weide's traditional filmic
story-telling that they try to turn certain twists of identity or plot
developments into grand surprises, when Vonnegut reveals them casually
through Campbell's narration long before the events occur chronologically.
MOTHER NIGHT may be one of his most traditionally plotted novels, but it
still isn't about the plot...it's about a perspective and an idea.  Gordon
has not made a bad film; it is well-acted and keeps you interested from
moment to moment.  He simply wants Campbell's moment of truth to come like
a thunderbolt, rather than the way Vonnegut prefers to deliver it:  as a
single finger tapping you ever so lightly on the shoulder.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
PAYBACK
(Paramount)
Starring:  Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, Deborah
Kara Unger, William Devane, Bill Duke, Lucy Liu, Kris Kristofferson.
Screenplay:  Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes, based on the novel "The
Hunter" by Richard Stark.
Producer:  Bruce Davey.
Director:  Brian Helgeland.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, torture, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Get ready to root for the bad guy" trumpets the tag line for
PAYBACK, and for once the marketing people are on to something.  Lots of
action films go the anti-hero route, offering protagonists with
single-sentence motivations who kill at least as many people as the
ostensible villains of the piece.  The assumption is that we'll be on the
side of the star because...well, he's a star.  It doesn't matter how nasty
or brutal Arnold Schwarzenegger or Steven Seagal get -- if they're the
first name on the marquee, they're the ones whose gunplay and fisticuffs
are cheered.
     Mel Gibson is a different case entirely.  There has always been
something genuinely unstable behind his eyes when he wants there to be --
MAD MAX, the original LETHAL WEAPON, CONSPIRACY THEORY -- but also
something genuinely wounded that makes his instability as sympathetic as
it is menacing.  Gibson uses that persona to solid effect as Porter, a
career thief in single-minded pursuit of revenge.  It seems that Porter
was double-crossed by his partner Val (Gregg Henry) after a $140,000
heist, shot and left for dead so Val could square a debt with his
organized crime bosses.  Five months later, Porter is healed and
determined to recover his share of the loot, even if it means taking on
the sociopathic Val, corrupt cops, the Chinese mafia and Val's bosses in
The Outfit.
     Along the way to his goal, Porter encounters plenty of intriguing
characters, which is half the fun of PAYBACK.  Lucy Liu (from TV's "Ally
McBeal") dives into the role of a dominatrix who _really_ enjoys her work;
James Coburn steals his few scenes as a dapper mid-level crime boss; Kris
Kristofferson uses his rasp-and-squint to appropriate effect as The
Outfit's capo di tutti capi.  PAYBACK works in large part because it's not
just Mel Gibson running around shooting and getting shot at.  The whole
atmosphere of the film is bleak and corrupt, from Ericson Core's bleached
cinematography to the cold brick of Richard Hoover's production design.
Though it comes with a dose of humor, it's usually humor of the black
variety, and the film rarely strays far from pulp crime thriller
territory.
     That includes plenty of violence, of course, which is really the main
place where PAYBACK grows wearying.  There's violence, and then there's
_violence_, and then there's PAYBACK, which never shies away from the
roughest rough stuff from the opening scene of un-anesthetized surgery.
Where a slap might suffice, a pistol-whipping shows up instead; where you
might expect a good old-fashioned roughing up, you can count on the
strategic application of a sledgehammer.  Porter's world is certainly a
brutal one, and Porter himself is a brutal guy, but after a while it all
starts to feel like overkill.  You reach the point where you don't need to
see Val beat up a woman and shoot a dog to figure out that he's not too
nice a guy.
     Fortunately, it all comes back to Gibson, whose monomania about his
$70,000 makes just enough sense to keep the plot moving.  There's a bit
too much effort directed towards making Porter seem sensitive through his
relationship with a high-priced call girl (Maria Bello) -- apparently the
result of Gibson's initial dissatisfaction with director and co-writer
Brian Helgeland's relentlessly dark tone -- but it all seems like
unnecessary effort.  PAYBACK only works as entertainment because Gibson
himself conveys all the reason we need to get behind Porter.  If you can
get past all the bloodshed and brutality, you'll find a surprisingly slick
and surprisingly smart action thriller in PAYBACK.  The amazing thing is
that, by all rights, you _shouldn't_ be able to get past it.  Credit
Gibson for giving us the kind psycho you can't help cuddling up to.

Title
Review for When a Man Loves a Woman (1994)
Starring:  Andy Garcia, Meg Ryan, Lauren Tom, Tina Majorino. 
Screenplay:  Ronald Bass and Al Franken.
Director:  Luis Mandoki.
     This is the contradiction of WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN:  as
impressed as I was with most of its parts, I kept coming up with 
better ways to piece them together.  It's that rare film that pulls 
very few punches in its examination of a family in crisis, but there 
is a schizophrenia in the perspective.  There are some extremely 
effective performances, but director Luis Mandoki shows us far too 
much from the perspective of the alcoholic character.  Ultimately 
there is more right than there is wrong with WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN, 
yet is also makes choices which are more safe than they are 
appropriate.
     Michael (Andy Garcia) and Alice (Meg Ryan) are a San Francisco
couple who, in the parlance, "seem to have it all."  Michael is an 
airline pilor, and Alice a school counselor; they have a lovely home, 
two daughters (Tina Majorino, Mae Whitman) and an au pair (Lauren 
Tom).  They also have a problem:  Alice is an alcoholic. The problem 
seems "under control" until two close calls froce the Greens to 
confront the situation.  As Alice goes into rehab, Michael is left to 
hold the family together.  But that might be even harder than it first 
appears, as the lack of social lubricant exposes cracks in Michael and 
Alice's relationship, and the time comes for hard decisions.
     WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN is grounded in two expertly developed
characters, well-acted by Andy Garcia and Meg Ryan.  Michael is the 
consummate co-dependant, blinding himself to Alice's alcoholism 
because it's easier and more satisfying for him to play the problem- 
solver.  He doesn't respect Alice, and a couple of great scenes 
demonstrate how he treats her like one of his children.  Most 
effective are scenes where Michael realizes that the girls, who are 
always around when he is off on a trip, are much more aware of what is 
going on than he is.  Ryan is solid as the fragile and frightened 
Alice, and plays a very restrained drunk.  She also makes a believable 
transition after her detox, leading into a fine bit of acting in a 
counseling session.  The big showdown between Michael and Alice is 
completely raw and very compelling, and Garcia and Ryan have 
tremendous chemistry.
     The problem is that WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN doesn't commit to
its point of view.  I felt this was essentially the story of the 
family's response to and discovery of the extent of Alice's problem, 
and not the story of Alice and her recovery.  Consequently, I wasn't 
bothered by the slickness of the production, because it fit with 
Michael's lack of awareness of what was going on beneath the surface.  
But then Mandoki and screenwriters Ronald Bass and Al Franken seem to 
want it both ways, showing us Alice sneaking into the street for a 
drink, or in the middle of a case of the DT's.  When the nuts and 
bolts of Alice's addiction were given the spotlight, the polish seemed 
inappropriate.  I wanted all of our discoveries about Alice to come as 
Michael discovered them (like well-handled scenes of Alice comforting 
a friend from rehab out of our hearing), so that I didn't feel Ryan 
was just being given showy scenes because she's a star.  A focus on 
Michael would have mad this a very different film from most films 
about substance abuse, but WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN retreats into the 
obvious.
     One key element of WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN which bears
specific mention is the dynamic performance of Tina Majorino as eldest 
daughter Jess.  The child of Alice's first marriage, Jess brings a 
host of abandonment issues to the table, and a worldliness beyond her 
years which still seems very real.  Majorino's eyes are filled with 
profound sadness, and her reactions to Alice's final washout are 
stunning.  It was moments like her last scene with Garcia which 
finally brought me to tears, and convinced me that there should have 
been more family moments.  The original title of WHEN A MAN LOVES A 
WOMAN was SIGNIFICANT OTHER, but it really should have been 
SIGNIFICANT OTHERS.  When it lost sight of the others affected by 
alcoholism, it missed the chance to be truly special.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
     Of all the reasons I was pleasantly surprised by GOOD WILL HUNTING --
and there were several -- the easiest to identify was its subversive
awareness of its own genre.  The story of a troubled genius named Will
Hunting (Matt Damon) forced to work with emotionally wounded psychiatrist
Sean Maguire (Robin Williams) was ripe for the sort of cathartic
therapeutic hokum which has passed for emotional honesty in films like
ORDINARY PEOPLE or the recent BLISS.  I called long ago for a moratorium
on physician-heal-thyself psychiatrists as a cinematic type; therapy
sessions as revelatory contrivance seemed just as ready for mothballs.
     GOOD WILL HUNTING can't possibly steer clear of every pitfall
associated with therapy-centered drama, but it's conscious enough of those
pitfalls to provide a goofy sense of originality.  The script, by Damon
and his co-star and real-life buddy Affleck, keeps the dialogue between
Will and Sean generally smart and smart-alecky (particularly sharp was a
pastoral scene which Will describes as a "Taster's Choice moment between
the guys").  The arc of their relationship is convincing and patiently
developed, with Williams and Damon sharing an impressive chemistry.  In
fact, chemistry defines the cast from top to bottom -- Will's friendships
with his working-class chums, his romance with a British Harvard student
(Minnie Driver), and even Sean's contentious friendship with the MIT
professor (Stellan Skarsgaard) who envies Will's gift.  The performances
are consistently strong enough (even Robin Williams in his "bearded, ergo
serious" mode) to carry GOOD WILL HUNTING through its inevitable dips into
confrontation, as well as a running time which could have used a judicious
twenty minutes of trimming.
     Strongest of all is Damon himself in a dazzlingly charismatic piece
of screen acting.  Both believably brilliant and convincingly rough around
the edges, Damon avoids the too-common actor's trap of white-washing his
character's dark side.  That dubious distinction, unfortunately, goes to
director Gus Van Sant, who turns Will's primary surge of violence into a
slow-motion ballet, undercutting the character's pent-up rage.  It's too
conventional an instinct for a director who has rarely done anything the
conventional way, offering Damon a protection he simply doesn't need.  As
both actor and writer, Matt Damon gives GOOD WILL HUNTING energy, soul and
a welcome desire to avoid trite situations.  It's a rare drama which
satisfies without pandering, a feel-good, heal-good session which gives
you just a little hope that every trip to the couch doesn't have to be a
trip into Cliche-Land.

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
     Credit 20th Century Fox marketing with a first in my tenure as a
critic:  along with the press notes for PUSHING TIN, they included a copy
of the source material.  "Something's Got to Give," an article written by
Darcy Frey for the New York Times Magazine, took us behind the scenes at
the New York Terminal Radar Approach Control (or TRACON), which manages
air traffic in the busiest airspace in the world.  Focusing on the events
of one Thanksgiving weekend, the article provided a brilliant and
frightening look at the people who cope with incredible stress and
appalling working conditions to prevent your plane from slamming into
another plane every time you take off or land.  It was a superb piece of
reportage turned into a compelling story.
     There may be a great film to be made from that story, but PUSHING TIN
isn't it.  It's set at New York TRACON, all right, focusing on a hot-shot,
nerves-of-steel controller named Nick Falzone (John Cusack).  Nick is the
undisputed champ at taking them up and bringing them down...until Russell
Bell (Billy Bob Thornton) comes to town.  A laconic outsider who pushes
the limits of "pushing tin" -- controller lingo for maximizing the use of
airspace to keep flights on time -- Russell also pushes Nick's alpha-male
buttons, setting off a rivalry which leads to Nick sleeping with Russell's
wife Mary (Angelina Jolie), then suspecting that Russell has taken the
same liberty with Nick's wife Connie (Cate Blanchett).
     For about the first half hour, and sporadically thereafter, PUSHING
TIN is actually about the high-pressure world of air traffic controllers.
Director Mike Newell employs computer graphics effectively to get us
inside how controllers see their domain, and keeps up a brisk pace to
match the frantic energy of the characters.  Meanwhile, writers Glen & Les
Charles (co-creators of "Cheers") do a nice job with the camaraderie and
gallows humor that keeps everyone sane.  The control room scenes dump you
right into the milieu without explaining every scrap of terminology first,
pushing you through days in the life of a place always just seconds away
from chaos and complete disaster.
     In fact, just about everything is right with PUSHING TIN except its
central storyline.  Cusack and Thornton are such talented actors that it
might take longer than usual to register that their conflict has virtually
nothing to do with the world of air traffic controllers.  There was a
mini-series' worth of psychological material in Darcy Frey's article, but
PUSHING TIN instead chooses the mundane head-butting of Nick and Russell,
combined with smirky seductions and marital squabbles.  It's a conflict
that appears to have been pasted over this backdrop by people who had no
idea what to do with it for a major studio film except tell a generic
studio film story.  There's no reason for PUSHING TIN to be a film about
rival air traffic controllers if this was the story they were going to
tell; it could just as easily be a film about rival matadors, or rival
insurance salesmen, or rival periodontists.
     The lack of a solid center really shows in the final 45 minutes, when
the film falls apart completely.  There's a bumpy flight, a bomb scare, a
Zen immersion in a mountain stream and a showdown with jet engines, none
of which makes the characters more than the broad sketches they've been
from the start.  It all builds to a climax in which the big question is
not whether these twitchy folks will cause a mid-air collision, but
whether Nick and Connie will kiss and make up, playing cutesy over a
passenger jet's radio.  There was a tremendous opportunity for PUSHING TIN
to dig into the on-the-edge psyches of men responsible for thousands of
lives a day, the men Darcy Frey introduced us to in the source article.
That'll teach Fox to give us a glimpse into what might have been.

Title
Review for Paulie (1998)
PAULIE
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  voice of Jay Mohr, Tony Shalhoub, Gena Rowlands, Cheech Marin,
Bruce Davison, Hallie Kate Eisenberg.
Screenplay:  Laurie Craig.
Producers:  Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn, Allison Lyon Segan.
Director:  John Roberts.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult humor)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Even before I was a film critic, I was a studio marketing executive's
worst nightmare.  The standard for selling films has long been to provide
an easy frame of reference for the potential viewer, some comparison to a
well-known and well-liked predecessor to latch on to.  "From the director
of INDEPENDENCE DAY" one ad might trumpet, while another features a
critical comment that the film is "the best romance since GHOST."  Such
tactics have long left me skeptical, fearing yet another bandwagon-riding
copycat rather than looking forward to something with enough substance or
style to stand on its own.
     In my heart, I know PAULIE is an attempt to cash in on the family
film success of recent talking animal pictures like BABE and HOMEWARD
BOUND.  Like BABE, Paulie features a friendly, stubbornly loyal animal as
its protagonist, this one a smart-aleck parrot named Paulie (voice of Jay
Mohr); like HOMEWARD BOUND, it sends the talking animal on a long journey
to find his owner.  If your first instinct is to think of PAULIE as a
dopey rip-off, be prepared for a pleasant surprise. PAULIE may never reach
the enchanting heights of BABE, but it's consistently charming in its own
low-key way.
     PAULIE begins at the ending, in an animal research facility where
gentle immigrant janitor Misha (Tony Shalhoub) is amazed to find a
babbling, mango-loving bird caged in the basement.  Paulie then proceeds
to tell Misha a strange and wondrous flashback tale:  his separation from
Marie (Hallie Kate Eisenberg), the little girl who loves him; a friendship
with a kindly widow (Gena Rowlands); a stint entertaining the customers of
a mobile taco stand owner (Cheech Marin); and eventually a life of crime
assisting a small-time hustler (also played by Jay Mohr).  Though the
adventures are basic and sometimes silly, they are accompanied by lessons
gently taught.  Paulie learns about death, about the consequences of
stealing, about the virtue of politeness, and about the importance of
persistence in pursuing one's dream.  Simple stuff, to be sure, but more
edifying family fare than a dozen recent Disney films put together.
     More generally, PAULIE is a family film which doesn't begin with the
assumption that young audiences respond only to stupidity.  With the
exception of a token instance of flatulence humor and a few coarse
insults, scripter Laurie Craig keeps the gags above the belt, opting to
use animal tricks and verbal sparring for amusement.  Jay Mohr's Paulie is
an obvious hommage to Buddy Hackett (obvious enough that Hackett shows up
in a cameo), but he creates just enough feisty personality to make the
bird's story matter without making him annoying.  PAULIE also features an
unusually strong cast, headed by a grandmotherly Rowlands and the always
appealing Shalhoub (adding a Russian accent to his Nationality of the Week
repertoire).  This is one feature parents and kids will be able to sit
through together with smiles on every face.
     It would be easy to embrace PAULIE excessively simply because it
doesn't crash into a pile of singed green feathers the way you might
expect.  In fact, it's hardly a classic-in-the-making.  The episodic flow
of the narrative sends Paulie jumping to his next new pal just as we've
gotten interested in the last, and takes off on odd tangets involving a
flirtatious female parrot (voiced by Tia Texada, who also plays Mohr's
girlfriend in human form) and tentative swipes at animal testing.  Most
disappointing of all is a conclusion which leaves us with an odd romantic
pairing as its happy ending.  It's an uneven effort, but it's satisfying
to note that it's actually an _effort_.  PAULIE could have cruised along
on talking animals and foolishness; instead, it tells a story of
friendship and good manners with a few sharp jokes.  How nice to find a
fun bit of entertainment, and not just "the best talking animal movie
since BABE."

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
THIRTEEN DAYS
(New Line)
Starring:  Kevin Costner, Bruce Greenwood, Stephen Culp, Dylan Baker.
Screenplay:  David Self, based on "The Kennedy Tapes - Inside the White
House During the Cuban Missile Crisis" by Ernest R. May and Philip D
Zelikow.
Producers:  Kevin Costner, Kevin O'Donnell, Peter O. Almond and Armyan
Bernstein.
Director:  Roger Donaldson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  138 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In an early scene in THIRTEEN DAYS, Kenny O' Donnell (Kevin Costner)
sits at the breakfast table with his wife and children. It is October
1962, and O'Donnell is a special advisor to President John F. Kennedy
(Bruce Greenwood). As the conversation turns to field trips and report
cards, alarm bells begin going off. Not literal alarm bells for some civil
defense drill -- metaphorical, artistic alarm bells for viewers with a
sense of deja vu. This is a film about the Cuban Missile Crisis, but here
we are with a crew-cut Costner in his domestic glory. Will THIRTEEN DAYS,
like JFK before it, make the mistake of looking at a pivotal moment in
American history and asking, "How did it affect Kevin Costner's fictional
family?"
     Then, for most of the film, something wonderful happens: We see no
one but men in suits, trying to solve a seemingly unsolvable problem. As
tautly directed by Roger Donaldson, THIRTEEN DAYS finds riveting drama in
passionate debate, tricky politics and impossible decisions -- at least
until the O'Donnell kin start turning up again. Most of the narrative is
spent in the war rooms and strategy sessions that find JFK and his key
advisors -- O'Donnell, his brother and Attorney General Bobby (Steven
Culp), Secretary of Defense Robert McNamara (Dylan Baker) -- trying to
determine the appropriate course of action after spy planes identify
Soviet nuclear missile sites under construction in Cuba, just a couple of
weeks away from being functional. Do nothing, and doomsday is a five
minutes flight from half of America. Try diplomacy, and the sites become
operational while offers and counter-offers take place. Sneak in to
attack the sites, and the Soviets retaliate in Europe, setting off a
likely World War III.
     THIRTEEN DAYS is a history-based thriller that faces a variation on
the knuckle-headed joke promulgated by the anti-TITANIC contingent: In
this case, we know the boat (or the human race) _doesn't_ sink. But
THIRTEEN DAYS isn't about whether or not the world will be bombed to
cinders; it's about the astonishing real-life war game played by capable
but flawed people for the fate of civilization. For a film that is devoted
largely to debate and description of scenarios, THIRTEEN DAY is incredibly
tense. We watch politicians go toe-to-toe with soldiers over the
appropriate philosophical footing for dealing with the Red Menace. We
watch brinksmanship played like two kids shoving each other on a
schoolyard. It's the kind of smart film-making of ideas that can keep you
on the edge of your seat waiting for a phone to ring, or not to ring.
     Mostly, however, it's a profile in the courage under fire of John F.
Kennedy. Plenty of films have opted either to canonize JFK as our great
slain king or demonize him as a womanizing rich kid, but I don't think any
film has ever made him as compelling a dramatic character. As played with
a piercing intellect by Bruce Greenwood, Kennedy is portrayed as an often
short-tempered man with burdens to bear (the subtle acknowledgement of his
chronic back pain is one of many effective shorthands in David Self's
script). He's also the essence of a great leader, bringing the finest
minds together, considering the greatest possible good and finally
trusting his own reason and judgment. Greenwood's dynamic performance
finds JFK's legacy not in some legend of golden boy heroism, but in the
idea that he carried out his responsibilities with character.
     All is exceedingly well in THIRTEEN DAYS until the story begins
drifting back to O'Donnell fretting over his loved ones. Costner is a
much-maligned dramatic actor, and he doesn't do himself favors here with a
honking Boston accent that's borderline absurd next to the subtler
intonations of Greenwood and Culp (as scary a dead ringer for RFK as you
could imagine). When one scene after another in the final half hour of
THIRTEEN DAYS finds Costner staring pensively at one of his children,
sharing a quiet moment with his wife or rubbing his tightly-closed eyes,
it becomes too easy to lose focus on the big picture for some misguided
sense of "humanizing" the story. There are plenty of dramatically
fascinating humans in THIRTEEN DAYS without ever leaving the closed
conference rooms of the White House and the Pentagon. Policy can make
surprisingly intense cinema, without a breakfast table or report card in
sight.

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS
(Universal)
Starring:  Ethan Hawke, Youki Kudoh, Rick Yune, Max von Sydow, James
Rebhorn, James Cromwell.
Screenplay:  Ron Bass and Scott Hicks, based on the novel by David
Guterson.
Producers:  Frank Marshall & Kathleen Kennedy and Ron Bass & Harry
J. Ufland.
Director:  Scott Hicks.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (sexual situations, adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Several months ago, upon hearing that David Guterson's much-respected
novel _Snow Falling on Cedars_ was being turned into a film, I made my
usual effort to familiarize myself with the source material. After
approximately 90 pages, I did something I almost never do: I surrendered. 
The grinding pacing of the story -- which, at the point I lost interest,
had consisted almost entirely of a court proceeding -- did absolutely
nothing to motivate persistence. Whatever intriguing themes might have
been contained in Guterson's tale would never be known to me thanks to a
narrative decision I considered crippling: waiting far too long to get to
the point.
     This background is offered to make it clear that my ambivalence
towards Scott Hicks' SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS has nothing to do with
affection for the source material. It also sets up the problem with the
film, which is the same problem I had with the novel. The story begins in
1950, in a fishing village on an island off the coast of Washington state.
A murder trial is beginning, in which Japanese-American fisherman Kazuo
Miyamoto (Rick Yune) is accused of killing another fisherman with whom
there was a history of family dispute. Reporter Ishmael Chambers (Ethan
Hawke) is covering the trial, but his interest is more than merely
journalistic. In flashback, we learn of Ishmael's youthful romance with
Hatsue (Youki Kudo), who will become Kazuo's wife. Their love affair is
thrown into turmoil, by the "relocation" of Japanese-Americans during
World War II, an act of discrimination the implications of which carry
into Kazuo's trial.
     It's not the first time the screen has seen a story of lovers
separated by the Japanese-American internment camps (Alan Parker fumbled
the similarly-themed COME SEE THE PARADISE), but that doesn't mean it's
not an important story to tell. In fact, SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS has an
angle on the often-didactic issue of racism that makes it potentially
compelling. Ishmael faces a moral choice when he discovers information
that could exonerate Kazuo, a choice complicated by his own feelings of
hatred. Those feelings, however, are not some easily dismissable bigotry.
Instead, they're a churning mixture of Ishmael's tangled feelings about
his father (Sam Shepard), a controversial liberal publisher; about the
loss of an arm in the war; and about his lingering obsession/revulsion
towards Hatsue. While the prosecutor in Kazuo's case (James Rebhorn) 
engages in none-too-subtle race-baiting, Ishmael's own brand of less overt 
racism makes it harder to watch with smug superiority.
     Unfortunately, by the time it's clear how Hicks and co-screenwriter
Ron Bass are trying to personalize the murky matter of racism, the film is
almost over. That leaves a film with two glaring flaws. The first is Ethan
Hawke's performance as Ishmael, which is so blank that the role might just
as easily have been played by a cardboard cutout. Hicks does a nice job
with Ishmael and Hatsue's secretive adolescent trysts inside a hollow
tree, but he doesn't do much to help us understand Ishmael's longing. 
Hawke plays most of his scenes with a thousand-yard stare we're expected
to interpret as a combination of introspection and repressed emotion,
while it could just as easily be interpreted as trying to remember where
he left his car keys. By the time Hicks tries to crank up the drama by
cranking up James Newton Howard's score during a wildly overwrought
sequence involving Hatsue's "Dear John" letter, it's too late to give the
relationship the sense of consequence it demands.
     The second problem is the directorial self-indulgence exemplified by
that "Dear John" sequence, which shows up at every possible wrong time. 
There are quiet moments in SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS when the mournfully
personal manages to escape -- Kazuo and Hatsue sharing a wedding night in
the internment camp separated from her family only by a curtain, or the
always-segregated school bus suddenly missing its Japanese-American
passengers. Too often, however, Hicks either ladles on the symbolism
(Hatsue in a convoy to the internment camps reminiscent of her parade as
the town's "Strawberry Princess") or lets speeches tell his story (fixing
on a close-up of Max von Sydow as Kazuo's defense attorney, summing up for
the jury how "humanity itself is on trial"). There's too much film-making
business going on for too long, and too little of the human story that
should intensify the historical story. I didn't surrender on the film
version of SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS. I merely walked out unsatisfied,
wondering why the story, like bad journalism, had to bury the lead.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
SLEEPY HOLLOW
(Paramount/Mandalay)
Starring:  Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Miranda Richardson, Michael
Gambon, Casper Van Dien, Marc Pickering.
Screenplay:  Andrew Kevin Walker, based upon "The Legend of Sleepy
Hollow" by Washington Irving.
Producers:  Scott Rudin and Adam Schroeder.
Director:  Tim Burton.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Watching SLEEPY HOLLOW, you realize that Tim Burton could have made a
definitive masterwork about the Headless Horseman...if anyone had given
him a script that was actually about the Headless Horseman. Changing
source material -- even radically changing source material -- is nothing
new in Hollywood, so it's not terribly surprising to find only a passing
resemblance between the film and Washington Irving's classic ghost story.
It is both surprising and inevitably disappointing to discover that the
classic ghost story has been turned into a whodunnit. There is plenty of
splendid, grisly entertainment in Burton's brand of quirky gothic horror,
but it's bogged down in a story that's a cross between a parlor mystery
and an episode of "Scooby Doo."
     The story's protagonist is still named Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp),
but in SLEEPY HOLLOW Crane is a turn-of-the-19th-century New York City
constable dedicated to logical investigation and his own early
explorations into forensic science. After a clash with a local judge, he's
sent off to the remote upstate hamlet of Sleepy Hollow, where three people
have already been found decapitated. The town fathers, including wealthy
citizen Baltus Van Tassel (Michael Gambon), believe the murders to be the
work of a legendary Headless Horseman who haunts the area, but the
skeptical Crane is unconvinced. It is only after his own encounter with
the spectral figure that Crane changes the focus of his investigation from
"who" to "why."
     From its very first moments, SLEEPY HOLLOW shows tremendous promise.
The deaths of two of the Horseman's victims -- including Martin Landau in
a cameo as a Sleepy Hollow landowner -- lead into the introduction of
Crane as a jittery opponent of brutality in the name of justice. Depp is
rarely better than when he works with Burton (EDWARD SCISSORHANDS, ED
WOOD). Here he's an eccentric revelation as the big city rationalist
coping with supernatural phenomena. Depp has a ridiculous amount of fun
with Crane's prissiness, and Burton gets lots of mileage out of spraying
him with blood. Burton gets even more mileage out of the spectacular look
of SLEEPY HOLLOW, from the twisted woods to the gloomy town. He nails the
spooky side of the story, combining effective action with flying body
parts a-plenty whenever the Headless Horseman is at the center of the
narrative.
    Unfortunately, he's not at the center of the narrative nearly often
enough. Eventually, the film becomes focused on Crane's efforts to
understand the connection between the victims and who might be controlling
the Horseman. Crane methodically pieces together clues, notes suspects and
ponders motives...and I wonder who might possibly care. The question of
the head behind the Headless Horseman not only becomes an irritating
distraction -- and means you can count on a tedious expository scene of
the villain explaining his/her plan in excruciating detail -- it robs the
Horseman of too much power. Andrew Kevin Walker's script (tweaked by Tom
Stoppard) turns a primally frightening apparition into little more than
hired muscle from beyond the grave. Other plot elements prove burdensome
as well -- radically changing the role of Van Tassel's daughter Katrina
(Christina Ricci), exploring Crane's dark childhood secrets -- but nothing
is so ill-advised as blunting the force of the Horseman.
     I suppose that one glaring misstep is so troubling because SLEEPY
HOLLOW has so much going for it as one of Burton's typically grim fairy
tales. Between the delights of Depp's performance and the dark enchantment
of the production design, it's easy to start feeling the potential for
brilliance. You only need to feel the energy level rise when the Horseman
is on screen to understand that detective work didn't really belong in
this story. SLEEPY HOLLOW may be somebody's idea of "fleshing out"
Washington Irving's story, but what it really needed was less flesh and
more ectoplasm. Burton has made a wonderful monster movie from a script
that doesn't understand this is a monster movie.

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
AT FIRST SIGHT
(MGM)
Starring:  Val Kilmer, Mira Sorvino, Kelly McGillis, Steven Weber, Nathan
Lane, Bruce Davison.
Screenplay:  Steve Levitt, based on "To See or Not See" by Oliver Sacks.
Producers:  Irwin Winkler and Rob Cowan.
Director:  Irwin Winkler.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's a shame when a true story gets in the way of a good story.  Take
AT FIRST SIGHT, for instance, an adaptation based on a case study by
Oliver Sacks (AWAKENINGS).  It begins in New York City, where workaholic
architect Amy Benic (Mira Sorvino) is preparing for a long-overdue
vacation.  Her destination is an upstate mountain spa, where the amenities
include the services of gifted masseur Virgil Adamson (Val Kilmer).
Unexpectedly, the two begin developing a romantic relationship, a coupling
complicated by the fact that Virgil has been blind since he was a young
boy, and by the suspicions of Virgil's protective older sister Jennie
(Kelly McGillis).
     The first half-hour of AT FIRST SIGHT focuses largely on the
tentative early steps of Amy and Virgil's romance, and it's wonderfully
effective stuff.  Amy's first massage appointment with Virgil is intimate,
sexy and emotionally charged; their meeting on a remote skating pond is
loaded with simple charm.  Both lead actors are about as appealing as
we've ever seen them -- Sorvino aglow with re-awakened sensation, Kilmer
dropping his recent posing to connect with a fellow actor.  At first
glance, AT FIRST SIGHT is a throwback love story, short on world-changing
ramifications but long on gorgeous photography and superb chemistry
between Sorvino and Kilmer.
     Then the facts step in to blow the whole thing to shreds.  When Amy
researches Virgil's condition, she discovers that an experimental surgery
could offer hope.  Virgil eventually agrees to the surgery, and emerges
with the ability to see for the first time in over 25 years.  Director
Irwin Winkler does a fine job of conveying Virgil's initial
disorientation, an assault of stimuli on a man with no real visual
vocabulary.  And for a while, the medical details of Virgil's recovery --
such as his challenges with perspective and depth perception -- are
undeniably intriguing.
     The long-term problem with AT FIRST SIGHT -- and it becomes quite
long indeed -- is that the story becomes less about the relationship
between Virgil and Amy than it does about the relationship between Virgil
and his sight.  We watch Virgil struggle with being dependent once again
after living a hard-fought life of independence; we watch him struggle
with his feelings of abandonment after receiving a message from the father
who deserted him (Ken Howard).  Amy, meanwhile, is frustrated by her
inability to help Virgil enough, and turns to her ex-husband and business
partner Duncan (Steven Weber).  The simple appeal of the relationship
between Amy and Virgil turns overwrought, the chemistry fading with each
moment of focus on the disease of the week.
     It becomes even more frustrating when it becomes evident that AT
FIRST SIGHT is going to take exactly the same dramatic arc AWAKENINGS
took.  That's when you start to feel every minute of the two hour plus
running time, waiting for the inevitable revelations and confrontations
which in some cases are twenty or thirty minutes away.  AT FIRST SIGHT
closes with a caption informing us how Virgil and Amy fared in real life
after the events of the film, which only served to remind me that "based
on a true story" was no advantage in this case.  The film had too much
going for it as a love story to become a medical drama.  When fact proves
duller than fiction, it's time for a little artistic license.

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
     The conventional three-act film storytelling structure may not be
sacrosanct, but if you're telling a conventional story, it's a really good
idea to use it.  Marketing sets up the audience to expect a specific
conflict for the second act, and to expect that certain characters and
relationships will be the focal points; familiarity with other films tells
them those elements will appear before they've finished their bags of
popcorn.  If you give the people what they expect when they're expecting
it, you're going to satisfy them nine times out of ten.
     BLAST FROM THE PAST is set up as a romance and a fish-out-of-water
comedy, and eventually it is both.  It simply takes foooorrreeeeevvveerr
to get there.  The prologue begins in October 1962 in Los Angeles, where
brilliant, highly paranoid scientist/inventor Calvin Webber (Christopher
Walken) and his nine-months-pregnant wife Helen (Sissy Spacek) are
well-prepared for the Cold War to turn hot.  The Cuban Missile Crisis and
a nearby plane crash conspire to convince the Webbers that nuclear war has
begun, so they lock themselves into their plush multi-room fallout shelter
to wait out the radiation.  Thirty-five years later the door opens, and
the Webbers' son Adam (Brendan Fraser) -- who has spent his whole life
sealed away with Mom and Dad in 1962 -- emerges for supplies and, perhaps,
to find a wife.
     A sensible film-maker would have realized that the Webbers' life in
the shelter was the set-up for the story, not the story itself.  Director
Hugh Wilson, working from his own re-write of Bill Kelly's original story,
decides that those thirty-five years will take up the first thirty-five
minutes of the film.  He juxtaposes details of their day-to-day lives with
developments in the world above -- the latter centered around an employee
(Joey Slotnik) in a malt shop-turned-singles' bar-turned-punk dive --
betraying his sitcom roots by spending infinitely too much time on wacky
peripheral characters. Helen becomes an alcoholic while slowly going stir
crazy, Calvin revels in his role as teacher-lord of his domain, the malt
shop/bar employee becomes a burnout, and who really cares?  Get Adam into
the real world let him cope with it.
     At long last he does get into the real world, and befriends a cynical
young woman named Eve (Alicia Silverstone).  Naturally he reacts strangely
to new-to-him phenomena like riding on a bus and looking at the sky, and
naturally other people react strangely to his anachronistic politeness and
friendliness.  The whole business is handled clumsily, though; like Adam
himself, the film waits so long to begin doing the things it should have
been doing much earlier, it appears unsure how to do them.  The
relationship with Eve develops with inevitability, but without making
sense of her softening towards Adam.  How much better spent that first
half hour might have been if the real world juxtaposition had been Eve's
childhood rather than the pointless Slotnik character, both for comedic
social commentary potential and for plot development purposes.  But no
such luck -- BLAST FROM THE PAST often feels like an assembly-line product
made by people who've never seen an assembly line.
     BLAST FROM THE PAST does have its charms, enough not to make the
experience completely frustrating.  Brendan Fraser does have the naif in a
strange land thing nailed -- he should, after ENCINO MAN and GEORGE OF THE
JUNGLE -- with his big lug build and goofy kid grin; Dave Foley gets the
already tired role of the gay best friend, but delivers his lines with
zest.  Wilson brings a silly energy to the second half of the film, giving
it enough cute moments to make it watchable, but he never pulls it all
together in a way that's completely satisfying.  BLAST FROM THE PAST is a
pretty lousy execution of a fairly simple idea, a textbook case of a
by-the-numbers plot that just doesn't add up.

Title
Review for Leave It to Beaver (1997)
     In the production notes for LEAVE IT TO BEAVER, producer Robert
Simonds comments on why he chose director Andy Cadiff (TV's "Home
Improvement") for the project:  "Of all the shows on television, 'Home
Improvement' is tonally the 'Leave It to Beaver' of the '90s."  That
notion explains a lot about how the film incarnation of LEAVE IT TO BEAVER
ended up as it did.  If "Home Improvement" is our "Leave It to Beaver,"
that makes Tim Taylor our Ward Cleaver...only I don't remember Ward as a
well-intentioned but emotionally immature doofus.  The idea of a competent
father whose advice actually means something is about as hip as saddle
shoes and nickel malts.
     The central character of LEAVE IT TO BEAVER isn't really Theodore
"Beaver" Cleaver (newcomer Cameron Finley), or his older brother Wally
(Erik von Detten), and certainly not June (Janine Turner).  It's Ward
(Christopher McDonald), a decent guy and good provider who happens to have
a truckload of unresolved issues to hamper his parenting skills.  Today's
Ward Cleaver doesn't gently guide the incorrigible Beaver towards learning
from his mistakes.  He's too busy damaging the lad's self-esteem by
creating unrealistic expectations and appearing judgmental.
     And it's too bad, because there's a silly, innocent quality to LEAVE
IT TO BEAVER which makes it better than you'd expect from yet another TV
retread.  The comedy comes from the kind of predictably broad slapstick
common in most contemporary comedies for kids, but it's blessedly free
of toilet gags and exaggerated mayhem.  Brian Levant and Lon Diamond's
script (Levant worked on the syndicated "The New Leave It to Beaver"
series in the 80s) is often surprisingly clever, and even more
surprisingly clean.  The performances are sit-com simple yet mostly
appealing, particularly that of the agreeably adorable Cameron Finley.
Even the problems faced by the Beaver and Wally are sit-com simple:
Beaver loses his bike and struggles with playing pee-wee football, while
Wally accidentally steals away the girl admired by his best friend Eddie
Haskell (Adam Zolotin).
     In the good old days, Ward and June would solve the boys' simple
problems with simple but wise words of encouragement.  In 1997, solving
the Beaver's problems requires a trip to a family therapist and plenty of
soul-searching on Ward's part; Beaver may be the one to mess up, but it's
Dad who needs to learn a lesson.  It's obvious that LEAVE IT TO BEAVER
isn't meant to court the nostalgia audience, unless it is through the
inclusion of Barbara Billingsley (the original June) and Ken Osmond (the
original Eddie Haskell) in cameos.  Those viewers might actually enjoy
seeing the Cleavers portrayed as a healthy and happy family, rather than
just another dysfunction waiting to happen.  This LEAVE IT TO BEAVER is
unabashedly 90s in a fairly depressing way:  it takes paternal
incompetence as a given.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
     KEEPING THE FAITH is not a feature length version of the old joke
about a priest and a rabbi walking into a bar ... not exactly, anyway. 
The set-up finds director/co-star Edward Norton exploiting exactly that
concept as his character -- New York Catholic priest Brian Finn -- relates
the film's story to an incredulous barkeep. It seems that Brian has been
friends since childhood with Jake Schram (Ben Stiller), who grew up to
become a rabbi. Their middle-school cohort also included Anna Reilly
(Jenna Elfman), who moved away to California fifteen years earlier but has
recently returned to New York for her job. Her return creates romantic
tensions between the three friends, what with vows of chastity,
Jewish/Gentile relationship conflicts and all.
     There's a lot of ground to be covered in a romantic comedy that also
introduces questions of faith, cultural and religious melting pots and
balancing career and personal goals. And KEEPING THE FAITH seems intent on
covering every last square foot of it. Brian and Jake, each in his way,
sets out to shake up the complacency of their respective congregations
(usually with some sort of pop culture reference point in the mix). Anna
struggles with whether her go-go job as a corporate consultant has left
her soulless. Characters fret over how others will perceive their
decisions to cross cultural barriers. Screenwriter Stuart Blumberg dashes
madly back and forth between themes, while Norton dashes madly back and
forth between tones (how else to describe a sentimental romance that also
includes slapstick dips in holy water fonts and the surreal inclusion of
"Heroes of the Torah" trading cards?). Oh, and somewhere along the way
they're supposed to fit in a love story. It's no wonder Norton felt the
need to have a lightweight film clock in at two hours plus.
     Thank heaven that KEEPING THE FAITH is often quite funny in its
fragmented, scattershot way. Blumberg's script is ripe with good dialogue,
and a couple of solidly crafted set pieces (including a Jewish American
Princess date from hell). Stiller continues to build a body of comic
screen work that measures up to any of his contemporaries, giving zing to
Jake's self-deprecating manner. There are eye-catching bit parts,
including Ken Leung in a very funny scene as a karaoke machine salesman. 
And there's Jenna Elfman, who has never particularly impressed me in the
past except as a ball of energy. Here she's a completely convincing object
of desire (even if Norton lingers on her close-ups a bit too lovingly),
luminous, intelligent and driven. As one part of a romantic pairing, she's
a tough act to match.
     The match, as it turns out, becomes one of KEEPING THE FAITH's bigger
problems. Eventually the story pairs Anna with Jake, inspiring gags
surrounding Jake's fear of offending either his mother (Anne Bancroft) or
his more conservative congregation members by dating a Gentile. The
premise is sound enough, but Stiller never looks comfortable as a romantic
lead. In fact, there's more plausible chemistry between Elfman and Norton,
and not just because both actors are blonde -- the pairing we're expected
to root for just doesn't seem like a particularly good combination of
personalities. How much more interesting -- and daring -- KEEPING THE
FAITH might have been if the film had suggested Anna was merely
sublimating her desire for Brian with Jake, making for much tougher
choices at the film's conclusion.
     That's probably too much to ask from a film that, at its core, is a
fairly fluffy Hollywood confection. It's another one of those love poems 
to New York as the place where nice Jewish boys meet the goys of their
dreams, like ANNIE HALL or WHEN HARRY MET SALLY only less effective as
romance or comedy (though more than a match in romanticized Manhattan
skyline shots). It's certainly a pleasant enough diversion, good for more
than enough chuckles to make it worth a look, but it's surprisingly timid
for a film that tries to cover so many thematic elements. It's also a lot
warmer 'n' fuzzier than you'd expect from the cinematic equivalent of "a
priest and a rabbi walk into a bar..."

Title
Review for Wandafuru raifu (1998)
AFTER LIFE (WANDAFURU RAIFU)
(Artistic License)
Starring:  Arata, Erika Oda, Taketoshi Naito, Susumu Terajima.
Screenplay:  Hirokazu Koreeda.
Producers:  Masayuki Akieda and Shiho Sato.
Director:  Hirokazu Koreeda.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
In Japanese with English subtitles.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Hirokazu Koreeda's AFTER LIFE is a film that stirs the imagination
instantly -- which is fortunate, because the overflow of good will has to
carry through an ill-conceived conclusion.  The provocative premise
combines the post-mortem bureaucracy of DEFENDING YOUR LIFE with a
conversation from CITY SLICKERS about the best days of one's life.  In a
sort of celestial way-station, the recently departed are asked to identify
the best memory of their lives, the moment in which they were happiest and
most content.  After interviews with case workers, those memories are
turned into films, which will accompany the deceased as their sole memory
into the next world.
     The first half of AFTER LIFE sticks close to the interviews, drawn by
Koreeda from real conversations (in fact, several of the interviewees are
non-professionals relating actual events from their own lives).  The
memories about which they speak are intriguing enough in their own right
-- some with tales about childhood innocence, others with accounts of
adult adventures -- to spark reflections by viewers about their own
favored recollections.  More intriguing still is AFTER LIFE's exploration
of the nature of memory as a combination of things as they were and things
as we wish they could have been.  One woman, a former prostitute, recalls
a blissful encounter with a man in a hotel, until she reluctantly
acknowledges that the man never showed up.  Even the conceit of creating a
film version of an imperfect memory -- rather than using the archived
videotapes of people's lives available to the case workers -- emphasizes
the power of filtered, romanticized remembrance.
     For over an hour, AFTER LIFE delights with reflections on what we
remember and how we remember it, letting the steady stream of interviews
flow over the loose narrative structure.  Then, out of freaking nowhere,
Koreeda decides AFTER LIFE needs to be about someone in particular.  The
focus shifts from the scope of human experience to one case worker,
Mochizuki (Arata), working with one recent arrival, 70-year-old Mr.
Watanabe (Taketoshi Naito).  In the course of helping Watanabe -- who
considers his life so mundane that there's not a moment worth remembering
-- Mochizuki struggles with unresolved issues from his own life.  There's
also Mochizuki's apprentice/assistant Shiori (Erika Oda), who has romantic
feelings for Mochizuki and wanders wistfully through the streets of Tokyo
taking snapshots.  After spending most of the film as effective supporting
players, the Rosencrantzes and Guildensterns of AFTER LIFE cold-cock this
"Hamlet" and make it all about them.
     There's nothing inherently wrong with a movie about the longings of
otherworldly guides, unless you count the fact that it's already been done
a few times.  But AFTER LIFE shouldn't have been one of those movies,
since it already had so much going for it as meditation on transcendent
life experiences.  There's a strange appeal to the production's
heaven-as-low-budget-independent-film-set look, and plenty more appeal to
the tales of the deceased.  It's hard not to suspect that AFTER LIFE would
have made an extraordinary documentary, since Koreeda's steady,
concentrated medium shots of the characters describing their memories are 
so effective.  Maybe then Koreeda wouldn't have been tempted to leave the
strengths of his film -- which are plenty strong -- for the supernatural
melodrama of long-lost loves.  In my memory, this one will linger as a
good film that could have been great.

Title
Review for Wayne's World 2 (1993)
Starring:  Mike Myers, Dana Carvey, Tia Carrere, Christopher Walken.
Screenplay:  Mike Myers, Bonnie Turner & Terry Turner.
Director:  Stephen Surjik.
     "Wayne's World" was already a minor miracle by the standards of
"Saturday Night Live" sketches before it ever made it to the big
screen.  Where most SNL premises exhaust all charm in roughly a minute,
Wayne and Garth provided consistent laughs.  Then they tempted fate by
turning a five-minute sketch into a full length film, and it became a
huge, goofy hit.  So the question became, would the inevitable sequel
finally show a concept running on fumes?  Happily, the answer is no.
WAYNE'S WORLD 2 is a collection of more good-natured pokes at popular
culture, propelled by the infectious exuberance of Mike Myers as our
hero.
     WAYNE'S WORLD 2 again follows the adventures of Aurora, Illinois'
favorite public access television stars, Wayne Campbell (Myers) and
Garth Algar (Dana Carvey).  The boys have finally moved out of their
parents' homes, but all is not well.  Wayne, fearing the advances of
shady agent Bobby Cahn (Christopher Walken) on his girlfriend Cassandra
(Tia Carrere), looks for a greater purpose to his life.  He finds it in
a vision which leads him to organize a music festival called
Waynestock, lacking only any actual bands.  Garth, meanwhile, faces the
advances of the seductive Honey Hornee (Kim Basinger).
     Of course, plot ultimately means very little.  WAYNE'S WORLD, in
both its television and film incarnations, is about a generation whose
collective consciousness is a swirl of pop culture icons.  The gags
play on both genre conventions and particular images, but somehow they
manage to be sharper and more "in" than the slew of genre parodies
which littered theaters this year.  The best known targets in WAYNE'S
WORLD 2 (kung fu films, THE GRADUATE, THE DOORS) get the most extensive
treatments, but Myers isn't afraid to pull out obscure references to
Mahogany Rush or 70's detergent and shampoo commercials.  Wayne and
Garth, for all the inevitable comparisons, are no Beavis and Butthead;
they're clever and sharp- witted, simply with all their literacy
derived from the media.  They're in on the joke with their audience,
and they're willing to assume that audience can keep up with them.
     Social commentary aside, WAYNE'S WORLD 2 is just plain laugh-
out-loud funny.  Even the most obvious gags, like the performance of
Village People's "Y.M.C.A." which is destined to become this film's
"Bohemian Rhapsody," are handled with real zest.  The kung fu sequence,
a showdown between Cassandra's father (played by veteran actor James
Hong) and Wayne, is a hysterical parody of the exaggerated sound
effects in "chop-socky" films, and the sequence from THE GRADUATE
features such minor but funky flourishes as using The Lemonheads'
recent cover of "Mrs. Robinson."  Through it all struts Mike Myers,
sporting Wayne's trademark wiseguy grin.  The sense of fun he pumps
into Wayne is almost always engaging, and most importantly he never
seems to be trying to put anything over on his audience.  As a
performer, his enthusiasm can make up for numerous rough edges.
     And there are rough edges in WAYNE'S WORLD 2.  Christopher
Walken's character is basically a retread of Rob Lowe's from the first
film, but without the campy appeal.  The Dana Carvey/ Kim Basinger
segments never really worked for me, primarily because I generally find
Carvey annoying.  Overall, the direction isn't as creative as Penelope
Spheeris' work in the first, but Spheeris turned out THE BEVERLY
HILLBILLIES, so maybe that makes it even.  Like many recent sequels,
WAYNE'S WORLD 2 includes copycat elements from its predecessor, but far
fewer than most, and there's plenty of fresh fun to be found.

Title
Review for Manny & Lo (1996)
Starring:  Scarlett Johansson, Aleksa Palladino, Mary Kay Place.
Screenplay:  Lisa Krueger.
Director:  Lisa Krueger.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is nothing quite as sad for someone who loves movies as
watching a rookie film-maker who really wants to say something, but turns
out not to have very much to say, or appears unable to say it in a way
that connects.  Lisa Krueger states in the production notes for MANNY & LO
that she began with questions of "what is motherhood" and "what is family
made of," and you can tell that she is quite earnest about answering those
questions.  She has a Sundance Institute-approved screenplay, and all the
studied quirkiness she can fit into 89 minutes.  But Krueger has created a
predictable story with characters who still look like they exist on 3x5
notecards on her desk.  MANNY & LO is a comedy-drama without enough of
either.
     The title characters are two orphaned sisters:  16-year-old Laurel
(Aleksa Palladino), known as Lo, and 11-year-old Amanda (Scarlett
Johansson), known as Manny.  Runaways from their respective and separate
foster homes, Manny and Lo travel together, stealing groceries, gas and
free lodging in model homes in an effort to stay a step ahead of the
authorities.  There is about to be a major hindrance introduced into their
lifestyle, however.  It turns out that Lo is pregnant, and into her third
trimester before her deep denial gives way to reality.  Desperate for
someone to help them, Manny and Lo kidnap Elaine (Mary Kay Place), an
employee at a maternity store who seems to know everything there is to
know about babies, and hole up in an unoccupied mountain vacation home to
hide out until Lo gives birth.  Though they begin as enemies, the three
develop an understanding, and slowly begin to become an unlikely family.
     I suppose one of the things which irritated me most about MANNY & LO
is that for an ostensibly original independent film, its basic premise has
been done and done and done again.  As comedy, think of RUTHLESS PEOPLE;
as social drama, think of last year's WHITE MAN'S BURDEN.  And those are
just recent examples of stories which make the very Psych 101 observation
that kidnapers and their hostages aren't always so different, and
sometimes bond to fulfill their respective needs.  MANNY & LO doesn't
offer much of a twist on the movie truism that if the plot is about a
kidnapping, abductors and abducted will go from antagonism to uneasy truce
to friendship.  There wasn't a moment when I didn't know exactly where
Krueger was taking me.
     Her only chance at selling MANNY & LO was to create characters who
were interesting and worth spending time with in spite of the stock
situation, and she doesn't exactly set the world on fire.  Manny and Lo
are like a collection of eccentric traits from a screen-writing exercise
rather than fully realized people -- Manny collects pictures of happy
families, is obsessive about time and measurements, and sprays her
mother's preferred deodorant on whatever bed she is sleeping in; Lo
likes to practice for her chosen career as flight attendant by standing on
Manny's unstable back.  Scarlett Johansson and Aleksa Palladino look
adrift, young actors struggling to find the center of characters without a
center; it is as though Krueger had built them a house with lovely
curtains and landscaping, then didn't put up any walls.  Mary Kay Place, a
much more experienced performer, turns Elaine into something intriguing
almost in spite of Krueger.  There is a unique dignity about her, though
there are carefully parceled out hints about a troubled past, and Place
uses her own experience as a writer and director to fill in the blanks.
     I think there is a tendency to give first-timers the benefit of the
doubt on independent projects like this, because critics are usually aware
of the limitations of time and money.  I'm not sure that any of that
matters to the audience.  Lisa Krueger's intentions are good; she wants to
explore what can make a dysfunctional family functional, and how whether
or not you perceived your family as dysfunctional can determine the effect
it has on you.  She also leaves threads dangling, introduces characters
who do little or nothing to advance the story (like Cameron Boyd as the
terribly cute Chuck, who hands out his signature to Manny), and doesn't
direct her script with an eye to making either the humor or the 
relationships as effective as they might have been.  MANNY & LO is a slow,
rather simple and not terribly entertaining film, and that doesn't change
because Krueger is inexperienced, or a woman, or not working for a major
studio.

Title
Review for Junior (1994)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Danny DeVito, Emma Thompson, Frank
Langella.
Screenplay:  Kevin Wade and Chris Conrad.
Director:  Ivan Reitman.
     In 1988, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Danny DeVito and Ivan Reitman set
the standard for "high concept" with their comic vehicle TWINS.  In
Hollywood pitch-meeting parlance, it could be reduced to five
words--"Schwarzenegger and DeVito are twins"--and proved that sometimes
a simple idea and the right talent could add up to $100 million even
with a paper-thin script.  JUNIOR goes TWINS one better and two words
fewer--"Schwarzenegger is pregnant."  And in a limited sense, it
works.  JUNIOR is so simple and gently directed that the warm
performances of Emma Thompson and Schwarzenegger manage to struggle
through a script that always goes for the easy gag, and even then can't
make most of them particularly funny.
     Arnold plays Dr. Alexander Hesse, a fertility researcher at a
California university whose project is a drug called Expectane,
intended to combat miscarriages.  After the FDA rejects a request for
human experiments, the project loses its funding and lab space, and
appears destined for research limbo.  But Hesse's partner Larry
Arbogast (Danny DeVito) has other ideas, and more radical ones.  He
convinces Hesse to test Expectane on himself, fertilizing an ovum
stolen from researcher Dianna Reddin (Emma Thompson) and implanting it
in Hesse's abdomen.  The impregnation is a success, but of course
complications ensue.  Hesse must hide his condition both from Dianna,
with whom he is beginning a romance, and a university official (Frank
Langella) who would turn the experiment--Hesse's unborn child--into
university property.
     This is not Hollywood's first attempt at a pregnant man story, and
the disastrous first attempt (the Joan Rivers-directed Billy Crystal
vehicle RABBIT TEST) would not seem to inspire eagerness to give the
premise another try.  The joke in JUNIOR, of course, isn't just that a
man is pregnant; it's that the man in question is Arnold
Schwarzenegger.  Schwarzenegger's choices of roles in the last several
years have demonstrated a mastery of his own image, as he alternates
action blockbusters with against-type comedies, and he has proved
remarkably adept at both.  As limited as his acting skills may be, he
is usually very likable, and JUNIOR is no exception.  Hesse changes
from a lonely lab hound to a glowing parent-to-be over the course of
the film, and Schwarzenegger manages the transition nimbly with the
sure-handed assistance of director Ivan Reitman in their third
collaboration.
     He is also aided by Emma Thompson, who gets a rare opportunity to
showcase her background as a standup comic.  Those familiar with
Thompson only from her Branagh/Shakespeare and Merchant/Ivory efforts
will be quite pleasantly surprised by her goofy performance in JUNIOR.
Her Dianna, a clumsy and socially inept scientist, is the perfect match
for Schwarzenegger's Hesse, and Thompson's delightful moments of
physical comedy make her scenes with Arnold very appealing.
     That's really what JUNIOR has going for it:  appealing performers
at their most appealing.  Most of the jokes are based on the obvious
incongruities of Schwarzenegger in the family way--his appearance in a
prosthetic belly; his emotional response to a sappy Kodak commercial;
his delivery of lines like, "My nipples are very sensitive."  And it's
only because Schwarzenegger seems to be having so much fun that any of
it works.  Other bits, including the obligatory scene of a baby with
urine streaming down its leg, are too trite for any amount of good will
to make them work.  The script, credited to Kevin Wade and Chris
Conrad, is full of missed opportunities and silliness instead of any
real inventiveness.  A subplot involving DeVito's relationship with his
pregnant ex-wife really goes nowhere, and seems to be nothing but an
excuse to joke about a middle-aged woman having sex with a member of
the rock group Aerosmith.  Frank Langella, who was so good in the
Reitman-directed DAVE last year, is woefully underused as the
obligatory villain, and gets the most obvious comeuppance available.
     Perhaps that's the word that defines JUNIOR best:  obvious.  This
is terrain we've all seen many, many times before.  But the cast of
JUNIOR is so engaging that it feels like we're seeing that terrain in a
very comfortable car, in the company of old friends.

Title
Review for Shallow Grave (1994)
     Quentin Tarantino may prove to have a more profound effect on
the immediate future of cinema than any other single individual.
It's not just that other new filmmakers will be mimicking his style,
though such recent fare as LOVE AND A .45 shows that he is already
having an influence in that respect.  No, Tarantino's most important
legacy may be that films which until only recently would have seemed
doomed to obscurity are finding enthusiastic distribution because
the audience has spoken:  dark, funny and twisted is *in*.  The
first beneficiary of the Tarantino Effect might be the British
import SHALLOW GRAVE, a macabre little thriller with some shaky
characterizations but a great look and feel.
     SHALLOW GRAVE is the story of three friends sharing a flat in
Glasgow:  Juliet (Kerry Fox), a doctor with a penchant for avoiding
her suitors; Alex (Ewan McGregor), a cocky journalist; and David
(Christopher Eccleston), a quiet accountant.  Their search for a
fourth flatmate brings Hugo (Keith Allen), a secretive fellow who
claims to be a writer.  However, when the three friends find Hugo
dead in his room one day of apparent heart failure, they discover at
least one thing he failed to mention:  a suitcase full of money.
Rather than report the death, they decide to keep the money and
dispose of the body.  But as Hugo's "business associates" begin to
come around and the police begin to get suspicious, the friendship
proves considerably less than stable, as each one begins to become
distrustful and to plot ways to get hold of the cash.
     Thrillers like SHALLOW GRAVE depend on tight plotting, tense
situations and atmosphere, and it hits about two out of three.  The
point behind disposing of the body is somewhat lost on me, since
they could have reported the death without reporting the money, and
a few late developments are glossed over so quickly that it's easy
for the audience to wonder exactly what happened when.  But it is
mostly in retrospect that these problems appear, because SHALLOW
GRAVE is a pretty intense piece of work.  A pair of interviews with
a police detective are extremely effective, as you begin to watch
the roommates' resolve crumble, and Danny Boyle's direction
highlights a marvelous set, the massive flat shared by Juliet, David
and Alex.  The lighting, the bold colors and the seemingly endless
hiding places create a mounting paranoia that sweeps you in even as
it sweeps in the characters.
     Yet for all its tension and eventual excursions into viscera,
SHALLOW GRAVE is essentially a character piece that examines how the
fragile relationships between these three individuals are shattered
by their shared secret.  Christopher Eccleston has the meatiest
part, a boring man who is changed forever by his role in the crime.
Determined not to let his actions be for nothing, he retreats into
the attic with the money, and becomes the most hardened of the
three.  Unfortunately, the other two leads are not nearly as well
developed.  Kerry Fox is savvy and manipulative as Juliet, but there
is something missing, a bit too much left unsaid, particularly her
refusal to deal with the men who call for her or approach her at
social functions.  Ewan McGregor's Alex has the best quips, and his
bluster early in the film (especially during the opening montage
where the friends grill applicants for the room) gives way to a
convincing fear as he realizes the he has gotten in way over his
head, but he too isn't given quite enough background.  While the
story could have been about how their mutual participation in this
event changes all three, it ends up that David is the only one whose
state of mind is examined in any depth.
     Still, SHALLOW GRAVE works fundamentally because it keeps the
pressure on.  It is always only a matter of time before a "perfect
crime" is revealed in its imperfection, and the multiple double-
crosses are fun to watch.  Though SHALLOW GRAVE could have been
tighter and more psychological, Eccleston's intense performance and
a few nasty little twists make it a thriller that keeps you
watching, guessing and squirming.

Title
Review for Princess Caraboo (1994)
Starring:  Phoebe Cates, Jim Broadbent, Wendy Hughes, Stephen Rea,
Kevin Kline, John Lithgow.
Screenplay:  Michael Austin and John Wells.
Director:  Michael Austin.
     Every once in a while, a film sneaks up on me and takes me
completely by surprise.  I don't necessarily mean in terms of quality;
rather, I'm referring to the mere knowledge of its existence.  Usually
I know what films are on the way a year in advance, but two weeks ago I
had never heard of PRINCESS CARABOO.  It has slipped rather quietly
into limited release, and appears destined to slip out just as
quietly.  That's a shame, because PRINCESS CARABOO is a delightful
fable, romantic, gentle and very appealing.  What's more, it's
surprisingly insightful and provides a sharp-witted lesson in English
social history.
     PRINCESS CARABOO is based on an actual event in early 19th Century
England, involving a young woman (Phoebe Cates) who is found wandering
the countryside.  Apparently unable to speak any English, she is taken
in by good-hearted gentlewoman Mrs. Worrall (Wendy Hughes).  Her banker
husband (Jim Broadbent) is none-too-pleased about this strange
houseguest, until the Worralls begin to believe that the woman may be
royalty from an East Indian island, the Princess Caraboo.  This
development inspires plans for a lucrative trading venture for Mr.
Worrall, and an introduction into elite social circles for Mrs.
Worrall.  However, local journalist John Gutch (Stephen Rea) is not
convinced that the woman is what she seems to be, and sets out to find
out the truth about Princess Caraboo.
     As a social satire and comedy of manners, PRINCESS CARABOO is a
winner.  It takes place in an era when it was common practice in
England to jail vagrants and hang beggars, and that practice comes in
for an obvious hazing.  But it is handled most effectively through the
character of Mr. Worrall, a drunken womanizer whose bank is in deep
trouble thanks to his corruption and ineptitude.  He is worse than one
of the idle rich; he is one of the actively odious gentry so eager to
distance themselves from the lower class they think nothing of simply
eliminating them, and since the house and money are all from Mrs.
Worrall, he is a bit too close to them for comfort.  While hypocrisy is
an easy target for ridicule, director and co-writer Michael Austin
keeps the treatment too light-hearted to be heavy-handed.  He also
takes a unique stab at the trendiness of the upper classes, as the
Princess becomes a "sensation" at court.  In one of the film's best
sequences, Princess Caraboo is the guest of honor at a party hosted by
the Prince Regent (a wonderfully foppish turn by comic John Sessions),
and the lords and ladies end up following her around in a thoroughly
silly native dance.  It is then that PRINCESS CARABOO shows how easily
people are swept up in "sensations," an idea that takes on a timeless
quality (and makes the film an interesting companion piece to the
current QUIZ SHOW).
     Social commentary aside, PRINCESS CARABOO is simply an eminently
enjoyable entertainment.  The performers are mostly delightful,
particularly Phoebe Cates, who is radiant in a part that requires a
gift for pantomime.  Her supporting players are also appealing:  Wendy
Hughes as the patient and kindly Mrs. Worrall; Kevin Kline as Frixos,
the Worralls' suspicious and superior Greek butler; Stephen Rea as the
world-weary but ultimately romantic Gutch.  Only John Lithgow is a
disappointment, turning in a limp performance as a scholar who attempts
to verify the Princess's identity.  The story twists and turns just
enough so that the question of whether or not the Princess is really a
princess is always in some doubt, without becoming gimmicky.  It is
unfortunate that the growing attraction between Gutch and Princess
Caraboo isn't given more time to develop, because the potential seemed
to be there.  When it finally does blossom, it seems too quick to be
plausible.
     PRINCESS CARABOO is patient enough in establishing its sense of
time and place that it might seem a bit slow to viewers seeking a
fantasy romp.  Still, it has both escapist and intellectual appeal, and
is well worth seeking out.  It is the kind of film that makes my job
its most rewarding--a hidden gem.

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Meg Ryan, Matthew Broderick, Kelly Preston, Tcheky Karyo.
Screenplay:  Robert Gordon.
Producers:  Jeffrey Silver and Bobby Newmyer.
Director:  Griffin Dunne.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Begin with the fact that ADDICTED TO LOVE is about two people
stalking their respective ex-lovers, and you'll see that it isn't exactly
your conventional romantic comedy.  That's a strong statement when you
consider that "conventional" and "romantic comedy" are virtually
synonymous where major studios are concerned.  Perhaps more than any other
genre, the romantic comedy thrives on predictability, in much the same way
that romance novels thrive on predictability.  ADDICTED TO LOVE is a film
which takes risks within that genre, which makes it a rarity.  The fact
that so many of those risks pay off makes it particularly intriguing.
     ADDICTED TO LOVE stars Matthew Broderick as Sam, an astronomer living
a simple small-town life with long-time girlfriend Linda (Kelly Preston)
before she accepts a teaching fellowship in New York.  Sam contents 
himself with the knowledge that she'll be back in just a few months, until
he receives a "Dear John" letter from Linda ending their relationship.
Rather than take the break-up lying down, Sam races off to New York, where
he discovers Linda living with a French restaurateur named Anton (Tcheky
Karyo).  Taking up residence in the abandoned building across the street,
Sam begins spying on Linda and Anton, waiting for their relationship to
fall apart as he is sure it will.  That is before he meets Maggie (Meg
Ryan), Anton's ex-fiancee, who helps herself to sharing Sam's makeshift
abode.  Maggie doesn't want Anton back -- she wants revenge, and making
Anton suffer falls neatly into Sam's plans as well.  Together the two plot
to bring Anton to his knees, but unexpectedly find their joint mission
bringing them closer together.
     Perhaps the most impressive thing about ADDICTED TO LOVE is how it
makes its tricky premise work.  Screenwriter Robert Gordon could have gone
for all-out farce in which the motivations of the characters mattered less
than their wacky actions; he could have made Linda and Anton so
one-dimensionally villainous that they seemed to deserve whatever they
got.  In short, he could have written THE FIRST SIGNIFICANT-OTHERS' CLUB.
Instead, he tries something rather dangerous:  he makes everyone human.
Sam is a man whose obsession is less pathological than scientific -- he
keeps watching Linda because her behavior just doesn't make sense based on
his rational observations.  Maggie, on the other hand, is so deeply hurt
that all she can think about is hurting Anton right back, her feelings so
intense that she pulls Sam into them with her.  Even Anton is a 
complicated creation, with Tcheky Karyo giving a surprisingly engaging
performance as a man who is more self-absorbed than malicious.  ADDICTED
TO LOVE draws comedy and emotion from understanding of the people
involved.  Their actions don't automatically render them unsympathetic
because we are allowed to know why they do what they do.
     It was also a risk pairing Broderick and Ryan, since both have made
careers out of characters notable largely for their geniality.  Broderick
doesn't stray far from that persona, though he is still very appealing as
a decent guy doing some indecent things.  It is Ryan who stretches the
most, perhaps even farther than she stretched in the straight drama of
COURAGE UNDER FIRE.  This is no Sally Albright she is playing -- there
isn't a shred of romantic wistfulness left in Maggie.  Her comic lines are
savage and bitter, allowing Ryan to display a darker comedic edge which
previous roles hadn't given her a chance to show.  Her performance gives
the romance unexpected depth, lending poignancy to scenes like a romantic
interlude with Broderick in which each participant is thinking about the
one he or she _really_ loves.
     None of this would matter much, of course, if ADDICTED TO LOVE
weren't also funny.  There are plenty of quirky laughs in Gordon's script,
from a sweet scene between Ryan and Broderick providing dialogue for a
conversation between Anton and Linda to a stampede of cockroaches through
a restaurant.  Griffin Dunne's direction provides the one jarring flaw in
ADDICTED TO LOVE, creating an awkward rhythm in those comic moments of
Maggie and Sam's plan against Anton which isn't always in synch with the
character development.  The broad physical humor is sometimes out of place
in a story which does such a good job of creating characters struggling to
heal emotionally.  Then again, that is just one more way in which ADDICTED
TO LOVE doesn't take you exactly where you might expect to go.  In case it
really matters, ADDICTED TO LOVE is a conventional enough romantic comedy
that it provides a suitably happy ending.  Beyond that, let it surprise
you.

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
SLUMS OF BEVERLY HILLS
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Natasha Lyonne, Alan Arkin, Marisa Tomei, Kevin Corrigan.
Screenplay:  Tamara Jenkins.
Producers:  Michael Nozik and Stan Wlodokowski.
Director:  Tamara Jenkins.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, nudity, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Sometimes I just want to shake a film-maker who doesn't seem to
understand the strengths of her own story.  Take Tamara Jenkins, for
example, the first time writer/director behind SLUMS OF BEVERLY HILLS.
Her tale centers around the Abramowitz family, a semi-dysfunctional clan
living in Southern California circa 1976.  Papa Murray (Alan Arkin) is a
no-luck car salesman coping with persistent financial short-falls and
being a single parent to his three children, most problematic his only
daughter, 14-year-old Vivian (Natasha Lyonne).  Vivian is having enough
trouble dealing with typical teenage problems, like her suddenly daunting
breast size, without the added stress of moving from apartment to
apartment every few months to stay one step ahead of eviction.
     The mid-70s setting at first seems fairly arbitrary, a token attempt
at period color, but eventually the two main characters deepen the
resonance of the time.  Murray, the 65-year-old father of three young
children, is still very much a 1950s-style father, evidenced by a
throwaway scene in which he summons a black waiter in a restaurant with a
racial slur.  He defines his success as a father by his ability to provide
for his family, and makes it his goal to live in an area which will still
allow his children to go to the best schools (the "slums" of Beverly
Hills described in the title).  He certainly can't be the sensitive,
worldy parent Vivian needs as she begins exploring her sexuality in a time
light years removed from Murray's adolescence.  How can you discuss sex
with a dad who insists that you wear a bra with a halter top?
    That relationship forms the foundation for a solid story where the
laughs could have come from simple character interaction.  The two lead
performances are earnest and sympathetic, showing a strained affection
between father and daughter where communication is a challenge at best.
Lyonne in particular pulls off some difficult scenes of teenage sexual
experimentation without a hint of exploitativeness, ably assisted by Kevin
Corrigan as the next door neighbor with whom she experiments.
     Why, then, must Jenkins get hyper-quirky on us by introducing
Vivian's free-spirited older cousin Rita (Marisa Tomei), a troubled,
pregnant, recovering drug addict who comes to stay with Murray's family?
There's nothing faintly interesting or real about Rita or her problems;
they're like the shenanigans of a wacky relative on a television sit-com.
Every scene with Tomei is an over-the-top distraction, turning a low-key
character study into forced farce.  It's hard to take SLUMS seriously
when a tearful exchange between Vivian and Rita involves a gobbledegook
secret childhood language.
     It's not as though Jenkins needed to pad the running time because
there wasn't anything more substantial with which to fill it.  She never
quite explains why Vivian's mother is never discussed, never quite
explains what happened to the restaurant Murray once ran successfully,
never quite gives fully rounded personalities to Vivan's two brothers
(David Krumholtz and Eli Marienthal).  There's enough going on in that
slightly radioactive nuclear famliy to fill a feature film without
bringing in Crazy Cousin Rita.  SLUMS OF BEVERLY HILLS draws you in with
some sensitive observations about a family trying to cope with a profound
generation gap, as well as with a breakout performance by the
unconventionally fetching Lyonne.  Then, it starts pushing you away with
gratuitous eccentricity.  I wish Jenkins had showed more faith in Murray
and Vivian.  Like the Abramowitzes themselves, she doesn't seem to know
how good she really has it.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
THE MASK OF ZORRO
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Antonio Banderas, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher.
Screenplay:  John Eskow and Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio.
Producers:  David Foster and Doug Claybourne.
Director:  Martin Campbell.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  137 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are a few noteworthy similarities between Zorro and James Bond,
the last iconic hero directed by Martin Campbell (in GOLDENEYE).  Like
Bond, Zorro has a decades-long screen history; like Bond, Zorro has
been portrayed by some hard-to-follow screen legends (including Tyrone
Power and Douglas Fairbanks, Sr.); like those portraying Bond, those
portraying Zorro have almost never been of the same national origin as the
character.  Most significantly, in both cases the character himself is
larger than life -- all you need to do is put him on screen and you're
halfway to satisfying the audience.  
     It's a frustrating waste of effort to watch a character like that
dwarfed by a typically over-blown contemporary action film structure.
Antonio Banderas dons THE MASK OF ZORRO (eventually) with more than enough
charisma to create a rousing heroic adventure.  What a shame no one had
enough confidence in the actor, or the character.  Banderas plays  
Alejandro Murrieta, a thief who once with his brother assisted original
Zorro Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins) in his mission to protect the
poor citizens of 19th century Spanish-ruled California.  Twenty years
after that incident, Alejandro is anxious to avenge the death of his
brother at the hands of the cruel Captain Love (Matt Letscher), de la Vega
has finally escaped from prison, and de la Vega's old nemesis Don Rafael
Montero (Stuart Wilson) has returned to old California with a plan to
regain power.  To further his own plans of vengeance, de la Vega seizes
on Alejandro's, training a successor to wear the fear-inspiring black
costume and make the sign of the Z.
     The two make a decent enough pair -- Alejandro the impulsive pupil
and de la Vega his graying Yoda -- but THE MASK OF ZORRO only truly 
comes to life when Banderas is front and center, clad in black.  He brings
a roguish swagger to the part of a common man delighting at being turned
into a super-hero; when he over-hears the confession of Montero's adopted
daughter Elena (Catherine Zeta-Jones) that she finds the masked man
attractive, you suspect it's all he can do to keep from giving himself a
huge pat on the back.  In the few set pieces where Banderas gets to whirl
into action, whether crossing swords as Zorro or burning up the dance
floor with Elena while posing as a nobleman, he's an electrifying
presence, a genuine movie star giving the audience a grand show.
     In this bloated production, however, it's hard to keep focused on the
dash and flash of Zorro.  The length is padded by the obligatory back
story introducing us to the "origin" of the new Zorro, as well as a
ridiculous sword fight between Zorro and Elena which offers stilted banter
and a PG-13-preserving disrobing thanks to strategically placed hair.
Mostly, the story by Ted Elliott and Terry Rossio (the summer's busiest
writing team, with credits on GODZILLA and SMALL SOLDIERS as well) has the
generic feel of an action film just one re-write removed from being a Bond
vehicle.  The evil Don Rafael stands before a map to lay out his power-mad
scheme, his ice-hearted right-hand-man Captain Love acts as Oddjob-like
muscle, and the action scenes are strung together with only cursory
concern for narrative flow.  The setting has a back-lot blandness to it
without the back-lot charm of swashbuckling melodrama.   1840s California
might just as well have been 1960s East Germany or 1990s Iraq.
     You may be pleading for something as restrained as the finale of a 
typical Bond adventure by the time THE MASK OF ZORRO reaches its climactic
showdown at a gold mine.  The split story structure once again forces the
focus away from Banderas, as Campbell cuts back and forth between 
Alejandro's duel-to-the-death with Captain Love and de la Vega's
duel-to-the-death with Don Rafael, occasionally interrupted by the
panicked screams of slave laborers carted in from outtakes of INDIANA
JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM.  The whole thing culminates, naturally, in
an endless 50-powder-kegs-and-a-cloud of dust explosion where the zeal of
the pyrotechnicians is topped only by the sound effects guys' goofy
decision to make it sound like they just blew up a pack of dyspeptic
mountain lions.  So much for an adventure which primes you to cheer for a
great hero.  Banderas' appeal alone may be just enough to win over some
viewers; the waste of that appeal, and of the Man in Black's commanding
image, made me long for some heroic figure to come along and make a few
strategic slashes in the editing room.

Title
Review for Todo sobre mi madre (1999)
ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER (TODO SOBRE MI MADRE)
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Cecilia Roth, Marisa Paredes, Penelope Cruz, Antonia San Juan,
Candela Pena, Rosa Maria Sarda, Eloy Azorin, Toni Canto.
Screenplay:  Pedro Almodovar.
Producer:  Agustin Almodovar.
Director:  Pedro Almodovar.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Pedro Almodovar has always been a filmmaker with a world view that
is -- to engage in a bit of understatement -- unique. He loves the blurry
lines of sexuality; he loves the complexities of romantic relationships. 
He even seems to have some strange fascination with organ donation (if
memory serves, THE FLOWER OF MY SECRET featured a role play strangely
similar to that in ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER). Most of all, however, he loves
women, and has dedicated most of his films to their psychology. Yet even
when it comes to a subject like half the human race, Almodovar won't do
things the easy way. Take the decidedly non-nuclear family created in ALL
ABOUT MY MOTHER, for example: a single mother; a pregnant, HIV-positive
nun; a transvestite prostitute; a lesbian actress; and the actress's
heroin-addicted lover.
     Almodovar's critics have often accused him of being more fond of
the conspicuously provocative than with genuine emotional content. ALL
ABOUT MY MOTHER proves that he can ground his wild side in honest 
humanity.  Cecilia Roth stars as Manuela, the single mother whose
17-year-old son Esteban (Eloy Azorin) wants to know the truth about the
father Manuela has long claimed died before Esteban was born. Manuela
intends to tell the story, but Esteban is killed in an accident before she
can. The tragedy sends Manuela on a trip to Barcelona -- the city Manuela
fled when she learned she was pregnant -- in search of Esteban's father. 
There she meets up with the transvestite prostitute Agrado (Antonia San
Juan), an old friend, as well as a kindly young nun named Rosa (Penelope
Cruz). Then Manuela learns that Rosa is pregnant, and that the father was
another transvestite prostitute named Lola. And the plot thickens ...
     Or at least it gets dense with women on the verge of various
breakdowns. Along the way Manuela becomes a personal assistant to the
renowned stage actress Huma Rojo (Almodovar stalwart Marisa Paredes),
helping Huma both professionally and in her tempestuous relationship with
co-star Nina (Candela Pena). Manuela also tries to ease tensions between
Rosa and her judgmental mother (Rosa Maria Sarda), who herself has to care
for an increasingly senile husband (Fernando Fernan Gomez). In a sense,
it's a lot like an art house spin on broad Hollywood dramedies about the
power of sistah-hood, with the male characters either utterly peripheral
or half-female themselves. The women cope with tragedy, grow and learn,
depending on each other for support. In true Sister Sledge fashion, they
are fam-a-lee.
     The reason ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER doesn't inspire world-class eye
rolling (like, for instance, HANGING UP) is that Almodovar really does
want to make his characters complete. Cecilia Roth in particular is
exceptional as the grief-stricken mother who finds some peace by bringing
peace to others. Much of the comic relief is provided by the tart-tongued
Agrado, performed with depth beyond bitchy clichs by Antonia San Juan. 
Almodovar wraps the story in references to ALL ABOUT EVE (from which the
film draws its variation-on-a-theme title) and A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE
(the play in which Huma and Nina are performing as Blanche and Stella,
respectively) to underscore the more interdependent relationships of his
characters. These women aren't out to screw each other over, nor are they
going to be victimized by men. They're strong, and prepared to survive.
     Almodovar's all-encompassing embrace of womankind could strike some
viewers as inherently undramatic -- and in a sense, they'd be right. Aside
from the accident that claims Manuela's son, there really isn't a pivotal
plot moment in ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER. It's more of a general observation of
the maternal instinct, with a magical medical cure thrown in for good
measure. And it's hard to describe except to say that it works -- as
character study, as off-beat comedy, as defense of unconventional 
matriarchy.  You won't find many films that are simultaneously this warm
and fuzzy and this weird. In the Almodovar universe, you can hear those
women roar in numbers too big -- and variations too strange and wonderful
-- to ignore.

Title
Review for Immortal Beloved (1994)
Starring:  Gary Oldman, Jeroen Krabbe, Isabella Rossellini,
           Johanna Ter Steege, Valeria Golino.
Screenplay/Director:  Bernard Rose.
     Every time a film based on actual events or including real
historical figures appears, it seems that there are scholars stepping
over each other to decry its lack of faithfulness to historical fact.
Whether it's Shoeless Joe Jackson batting right handed in FIELD OF
DREAMS, or the condensed time line in the recent QUIZ SHOW, or any of a
hundred other possible examples, there seems to be a widespread refusal
to allow film dramas to be exactly that:  dramatizations of real
events, no more documentary than the re-creations on "America's Most
Wanted."  IMMORTAL BELOVED is based on a footnote in the life of Ludwig
von Beethoven, which will doubtless inspire Beethoven biographers to
inveigh against its questionable scholarship.  As a moviegoer, my only
question is, "Does it succeed as drama?"  The answer for IMMORTAL
BELOVED is that while it is sometimes quite enjoyable, it is better
experienced than analyzed.
     IMMORTAL BELOVED opens in 1827, shortly after the death of
Beethoven (Gary Oldman).  In the course of tying up Beethoven's
affairs, his personal secretary Anton Schindler (Jeroen Krabbe)
discovers a final will leaving Beethoven's entire estate to a woman
identified in a letter only as "my immortal beloved."  Schindler sets
out to discover the identity of the woman among the composer's many
lovers, including Countess Giulietta Guicciardi (Valeria Golino) and
Countess Anna Maria Erdody (Isabella Rossellini).  Through their
recollections, Beethoven's life and abrasive personality emerge in
flashback, including his struggle to hide his deafness from the world
and his bitter battle with his sister-in-law Johanna (Johanna Ter
Steege) for the custody of his nephew.
     Perhaps the best, if most precious, way to describe IMMORTAL
BELOVED is as LUDWIG VON-ADEUS.  Writer/director Rose has mounted a
sumptuous production, gloriously scored with the subject's compositions
and intended to bring some humanity to a figure most often seen as a
wildly coiffed bust on a marble pedestal.  And he manages to deliver
some marvelous sequences:  the sea of mourners greeting Beethoven's
casket; his deafness revealed to an audience as he attempts to conduct
an orchestra; the beautifully staged premiere of the 9th Symphony, as
the "Ode to Joy" accompanies flashbacks to Beethoven's difficult
childhood.  Rose manages to wed sound to image in that manner that is
uniquely cinematic, evocative without ever lapsing into
pretentiousness.
     As successful as IMMORTAL BELOVED is as a sensory experience, it
is not nearly as successful at establishing character.  For better or
worse, AMADEUS managed to make Mozart a character we could relate to;
IMMORTAL BELOVED does not quite manage that feat with Beethoven.  He is
always somewhat remote, even as we witness his struggle with disability
and his volatile interpersonal relationships.  Gary Oldman returns to
earth from his whacked-out recent performances, and is quite good as
the angry and isolated composer.  But the fragmented nature of the
narrative allows us only unsatisfying glimpses of the man Beethoven
might have been, and even Rose's tendency to film Oldman in medium and
long shots contributes to this distancing effect.
     Rose's choice of the "immortal beloved" letter might have seemed
perfect as a jumping off point for examining Beethoven as a character,
but too often it just doesn't work.  Part of the reason behind
Schindler's near-obsessive pursuit of the identify of the woman in the
letter is that he is fascinated by the object of such passion in this
often hateful man, but Rose lets both us and Schindler down by leaving
key relationships under-developed, particularly the relationship
between Beethoven and the woman Rose selects as the real "immortal
beloved."  When the film stops dead for Schindler to talk to one woman
or another about Beethoven, we expect some insight, and there just
isn't all that much.
     Though I have focused on many of IMMORTAL BELOVED's failings, I
should make it clear that on the whole, I enjoyed it, particularly in
the moment I was watching it.  Music coordinator Georg Solti fills the
theater with grand music, and those scenes which simply feature music
accompanying Rose's images are quite powerful.  But afterwards, I
realized what that made IMMORTAL BELOVED: a somewhat ineffectual plot
connecting some exceedingly well-made music videos.

Title
Review for Fearless (1993)
     Peter Weir is a director whose best work has ventured into the
darker corners (PICNIC AT HANGING ROCK, THE LAST WAVE); Jeff Bridges is
an actor whose best work has involved loners or characters on the
fringe (THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS, THE FISHER KING).  The collaboration
of these two individuals, along with one of the fall's most compelling
trailers, gave me high hopes for FEARLESS.  It only delivered halfway.
FEARLESS contains a handful of gripping moments and one outstanding
performance by Bridges, but it also has some hollow interpersonal
moments and a lack of focus that holds it back from real greatness.
     Bridges is Max Klein, a San Francisco architect who walks a way
from a devastating plane crash with a single scratch, and having saved
several other passengers.  Afterwards, Max finds himself possessed of a
surreal peace, a sense that he has triumphed over death.  His reaction
baffles disaster psychologist Bill Perlman (John Turturro), as well as
Max's wife Laura (Isabella Rossellini), who finds herself unable to
relate to him.  Dr. Perlman tries introducing Max to fellow survivor
Carla Rodrigo (Rosie Perez), a devoutly religious woman thrown into a
severe depression by the death of her infant son in the crash.  While
Max begins to draw Carla out, he remains unable to connect with anyone
else, leaving his friends and family to wonder whether he'll ever
return.
     FEARLESS begins and ends, quite literally, with a bang.  Max's
emergence from the smoking wreckage of the crash, holding a baby and
followed by other survivors, is a haunting and marvelously crafted
scene.  Indeed, FEARLESS maintains an intense, hypnotic energy for the
first fifteen minutes, as Max's odd new persona takes hold.  Then,
rather abruptly and much to the worse, it shifts gears into fairly
run-of-the-mill family drama.  Max alienates his wife and son; wife
Laura clings with a tenacious optimism that eventually he'll snap out
of it.  This tangent of the story doesn't work for two basic reasons.
One, Laura isn't all that interesting, and Rossellini doesn't succeed
in projecting any warmth or concern.  Second, Max is such a jerk that I
felt everyone would have been better off if he had just left.  He's a
man who has turned his trauma into carte blanche to treat everyone
around him with a divine condescension, a palpable impression that
their experience of life can't be as pure as his.  Screenwriter Rafael
Yglesias, adapting his novel, doesn't have the guts to really attack
Max's arrogance, and Weir lets his Christ imagery (Max probing a wound
in his side; Max making mud from his saliva) just sit there without any
irony.
     The story picks up steam again once Max and Carla link up.  Their
relationship is handled delicately, and avoids the too obvious step
into romance.  Bridges and Perez convey a kind of unspoken
communication which punches home how stranded these survivors feel in a
world of people who can't possibly understand.  But again there are
swings into scenes without a note of truth, like an awkwardly acted
group therapy session.  There's also a distracting and obvious swing at
ambulance-chasing lawyers personified by Max's attorney (Tom Hulce).
By the time FEARLESS hits its wrenching climax, a flashback to the
moment of the crash wonderfully scored by Maurice Jarre, I felt as
though I had been through a ride as bumpy as the passengers on that
plane had.
     While Max Klein's character may not have endeared itself to me,
Bridges' performance did.  Like he did in STARMAN, Bridges carries
himself like an alien among us, but this time an alien with some
smugness.  It is he who takes an unlikable character and invests him
with some caring.  Max really believes he can save people, but he
doesn't understand that he's obsessed with his new self- identification
as a savior.  It is only when he tries to take Carla with him--rather
dramatically--that he comes to a certain understanding.  This
performance shores up my judgment of Bridges as the best American
leading actor around, and it almost holds FEARLESS together on its
own.  However, FEARLESS takes its metaphysics too seriously, and
doesn't keep its eye on what works best:  the reactions of two
survivors to a world now seen with different eyes.

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
     This just in: The sincere romantic drama is not extinct. Make no
mistake, it's on the endangered species list; in this oh-so-ironic era,
sincerity sightings have been akin to those blurry shots of the Loch Ness
Monster and hubcap-like flying saucers. You don't expect mainstream movies
to deliver romantic stories that seem grounded in genuine feelings, and
you certainly don't expect it from Don Roos, who wrote and directed the
attitude-laden THE OPPOSITE OF SEX. Nevertheless, here comes BOUNCE
offering that rarest of Y2K big-screen commodities: an adult relationship
with some real emotion.
     It starts out, however, like a typical high-concept trifle. Buddy
Amaral (Ben Affleck), a cocky advertising executive, is on his way back to
L.A. from a business trip to Chicago when he meets Greg Janello (Tony
Goldwyn) in an O'Hare Airport bar. Greg is trying to get home to his
family on a snowy night with plenty of flight delays; Buddy is looking for
an excuse to stay the night with a woman he just met. Doing his version of
a good deed, Buddy hands Greg his boarding pass for his L.A.-bound flight.
Tragically, that flight crashes, leaving Buddy with a serious case of
survivor guilt. After a bout with the bottle, Buddy decides that the
closure he needs involves checking in on Greg's widow Abby (Gwyneth
Paltrow) a year after the crash to make sure she's doing all right.
     Naturally, a relationship grows between Buddy and Abby, complicated
by Buddy's unwillingness to admit to Abby that he was the person
responsible for Greg being on the ill-fated plane. The surprise is that
the relationship never feels like a wacky contrivance. Roos is a smart
writer with a nose for full characterizations, and the story development
as a whole rarely feels manipulated for the convenience of the plot (see
below for notable exception). He steps back as a director from some of the
most potentially exploitative moments, and injects his sharp wit in places
where it works organically (particularly in the person of Johnny Galecki
as Buddy's assistant). Though it's a romance with some humor, it never
ignores the basic sadness in both Buddy and Abby's lives that gives
resonance to their connection. Though it's a romance with tragic elements,
it never wallows in the tragedy so much that it turns into melodrama.
     BOUNCE could have been a true gem of a film if the leads had been
more evenly matched as actors. Gwyneth Paltrow is one of those performers
who appears doomed to be scorned and underappreciated for her talent as
long as she is still young and attractive, but let's get this straight:
She's a damned good actress. In BOUNCE, she's once again wonderful,
capturing Abby's strength and vulnerability. Affleck, on the other hand,
still has some growing to do as an actor. He's not a bad actor, but he
still carries himself on screen primarily with a swagger, even when he's
supposed to be emotionally wounded. Buddy the charming cad is a role
Affleck can make appealing in his sleep. Buddy the tormented alcoholic,
huddled in a shower with a drink in his hand, is too heavy a character for
Affleck to clean-and-jerk.
     Roos takes an unfortunately large mis-step during BOUNCE's third act,
when he introduces a sub-plot involving a court battle. Not only does it
once again place Affleck in the unfortunate position of getting all
mega-serious on us, it's also the only time BOUNCE starts to feel like
something that could only happen in a movie. There's nothing inherently
wrong with romantic dramas that take on that AN AFFAIR TO REMEMBER-style
sense of heightened tragedy. It's just so unusual when a film gives you
the opportunity to explore romantic complications more simply. BOUNCE
makes it's share of mistakes, but it's always clear that its heart is in
the right place. How refreshing to spend time with a film willing to show
you its heart at all.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
FORCES OF NATURE
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Sandra Bullock, Ben Affleck, Maura Tierney, Steve Zahn, Blythe
Danner, Ronny Cox, Stephen Schiff.
Screenplay:  Marc Lawrence.
Producers:  Susan Arnold, Donna Arkoff Roth and Ian Bryce.
Director:  Bronwen Hughes.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, drug use)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I relish those rare opportunities when a talented screenwriter can
make me feel like a fool.  I spent the first hour of FORCES OF NATURE
slowly stewing over its grim attitude towards marriage, grousing to myself
about its transparently PLANES, TRAINS AND AUTOMOBILES plot machinations,
and waiting for the inevitable Hollywood denouement.  This was a mass
market romantic comedy, after all, a genre which has been taken over by
teenagers and, even in its best days, worked hard to perpetuate the
romance = infatuation paradigm.  Then Marc Lawrence did something 
wonderful, something which made the entire film click into place:  he
showed me a comic love story about grown-ups.
     It certainly didn't look that way from the outset, which introduces
groom-to-be Ben Holmes (Ben Affleck) at his bachelor party, surrounded by
friends and family whooping over his "last night of freedom."  Ben loves
his fiancee Bridget (Maura Tierney), but the doom-and-gloom pronouncements
of everyone around him have him questioning the meaning of this 'till
death do you part business.  Then, on an ill-fated flight from New York to
his wedding in Savannah, Ben meets Sarah Lewis (Sandra Bullock), a
free-spirited woman with a string of failed careers and relationships
behind her.  As transportation troubles thwart them at every turn, Ben and
Sarah begin a three-day southward journey in which their connection grows
ever stronger, Ben seeing in Sarah the chances he's never taken and Sarah
seeing in Ben the stability she's never had.
     FORCES OF NATURE gets off to a solid enough start, setting up the
characters and the situations with plenty of witty dialogue.  Ben is an
ideal role for Affleck's easy-going charm, and he plays the straight-laced
straight man without forced exasperation.  Sandra Bullock, for her part,
is more loose and appealing than she has been in her last half-dozen films
combined, avoiding her recent habit of playing any semblance of character 
depth as moping.  The two performances -- part of a great top-to-bottom
cast -- are effective and connected from the start, yet the script's
apparent sympathy with the marital horror stories Ben hears makes it
difficult to enjoy the romance completely.  Lively and funny though it may
be on a consistent basis, FORCES OF NATURE leaves a bitter taste that
feels like self-justification.
     The kicker is that those acidic anecdotes serve exactly the opposite
purpose, leading to a surprisingly emotional resolution.  FORCES OF NATURE
isn't about a man developing a fear of commitment; it's about a man
learning what commitment means _to him_, learning that it's not what he
thought it was.  Lawrence's script feints and dodges before reaching its
happy ending, an ending which is happy because people make the choices
that make the most sense.  Earlier scenes that might have felt like
throwaways take on more resonance, and that bitter taste sweetens into
something fresh and genuine.  Though one too many plot contrivances keep
Ben and Sarah together through the film, and they do exchange the 
obligatory mutual character analysis of bickering screen couples, FORCES
OF NATURE wraps up so perfectly that you'll end up remembering the humor
and the simple wisdom.
     That is, provided you're not put off by the ridiculously busy
direction of Bronwen Hughes.  For a brisk romantic comedy, FORCES OF
NATURE comes loaded with some of the most over-directed scenes of the
year:  teetering hand-held shots, why-not low or high angles, sweeping
pans.  Occasionally the hyper-real approach works, with cinematographer
Elliot Davis creating a world of fantasy romance; far more often, Hughes
refuses to let a scene be what it is, covering it with flourishes so thick
you almost can't find what's underneath.  A script this smart and mature
deserved a more restrained director, but even Hughes' excesses can't spoil
this unique concoction.  FORCES OF NATURE may restore your faith in
romantic comedy as something with the power to enchant, something that
can make you happy to be proved wrong when you expect a tale for and
about adolescents.

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
FANTASIA/2000
(Disney)
Featuring:  James Earl Jones, Quincy Jones, Angela Lansbury, James Levine,
Steve Martin, Bette Midler, Penn & Teller.
Screenplay (Host Segments): Don Hahn, Irene Mecchi and David Reynolds.
Producer:  Donald W. Ernst.
Supervising Director:  Hendel Butoy.
Segment Directors:  Don Hahn, Pixote Hunt, Hendel Butoy, Eric Goldberg,
James Algar, Francis Glebas, Gaetan Brizzi and Paul Brizzi.
MPAA Rating:  G
Running Time:  74 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Even today, 20 years after I first saw the original FANTASIA and 60
years after its premiere, I'm still not sure whether the entire concept is
audaciously praiseworthy or pretentiously misguided. Walt Disney's grand
plan to bring classical music to the masses-accompanied by animated visual
interpretation-ranks as one of the strangest cultural literacy experiments
in mass media history. On the one hand, it could be seen as a sincere
effort to bring kids to the castor oil of the classics, with a little eye
candy as sweetener. More cynically, it could be seen as an attempt to
persuade parents to take kids to a cartoon because it's really "good for
them"-sort of like extolling pizza as nutritionally sound because it
includes all four food groups. 
     Yet another possibility is that it's an intriguing case study in
individual interpretation of an artistic work -- with all the peaks and
valleys that concept entails. FANTASIA/2000 introduces seven new visual
renderings of great compositions, wrapped around the return of Mickey
Mouse in Dukas' "The Sorcerer's Apprentice." Beethoven's "Symphony No. 5" 
becomes a tale of good and evil involving abstract shapes. Respighi's
"Pines of Rome" accompanies the adventures of a pod of humpback whales. 
Scenes of Depression-era New York life, sketched in the style of
caricaturist Al Hirschfeld, are set to Gershwin's "Rhapsody in Blue." 
Hans Christian Andersen's "The Steadfast Tin Soldier" becomes the libretto
for Shostakovich's "Piano Concerto No. 2." Flamingos with yo-yos cavort to
Saint-Saens' "Carnival of the Animals." Donald Duck helps Noah with some
animal roundup to the march of Elgar's "Pomp and Circumstance." And
Stravinsky's "Firebird Suite" turns into a mythological tale of birth,
destruction and rebirth.
     It's quite an eclectic program Roy Disney and supervising animator
Hendel Butoy have put together, and the results are predictably hit and
miss. There's the sense that FANTASIA/2000's creative team felt obliged to
maintain a balance between the experimental and the whimsical, when the
experimental pieces are the ones that leave the strongest impression. Most
dazzling of all is Butoy's computer-animated "Pines of Rome," in which the
image of whales soaring into the sky almost returns the literal meaning to
the word "breathtaking;" that moment alone made me wish I'd had the chance
to experience the film in its IMAX incarnation from earlier this year. 
It's a wondrous piece of work that creates its own world, a feat the
"Firebird Suite" segment comes close to matching (though there's more than
a little PRINCESS MONONOKE to the imagery). There is also an undeniable
energy to the "Rhapsody in Blue" segment, directed by Eric Goldberg
(ALADDIN) with a clockwork story sense and an obvious affection for the
artists who inspired both the look and the sound. When FANTASIA/2000
really lets its creative talent loose to explore the unfamiliar, the
results are impressive.
     Familiarity, however, doesn't help several of the segments. After his
appealing "Rhapsody in Blue," Goldberg gets anthropomorphized-critter
mundane with the cavorting flamingos of "Carnival of the Animals;" the
Noah story of "Pomp and Circumstance" also suffers from a case of the 
cutes. With "Pomp," there's the greater problem of the music's undeniable
connection to a specific context: graduation ceremonies. In fact, there's
something just a bit off about all of the segments connected to instantly
recognizable music-the grandiose abstractions of Beethoven's Fifth, the
Duck Tales-goes-Genesis "Pomp," even the generally satisfying "Rhapsody in
Blue." It may have been part of the FANTASIA plan to say, "Look, here's
another way to look at a piece of music you may have pigeonholed
previously," but it doesn't always work. A magical Mickey defined "The
Sorcerer's Apprentice" in the first FANTASIA; an antediluvian Donald just
makes you wonder why all these animals are graduating from the ark.
     A new twist to FANTASIA/2000 finds actors and musicians in brief
"host segments" introducing each work. Admittedly, a couple of them are
good for laughs (Steve Martin and Penn & Teller, to be specific). The rest
are an overly reverential bore. It's a curious decision, because if
there's one thing the rest of FANTASIA/200 is not, it's reverential. Even
when it flounders, it usually flounders because an experiment fails, not
because someone was unwilling to experiment. And that's the faint
damnation with which I ultimately praise the film: It doesn't always work,
but even when it doesn't work, it's in ways that make it obvious someone
was still trying. This FANTASIA inclines me to the perspective that it
should be seen as a showcase for pure inspiration, a way to see how fine
art can in turn inspire more fine art. This version is an uneven
realization of that vision. I'll still be looking forward to
FANTASIA/2060.

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
     In a way, it has been a sad thing watching Woody Allen grow as an
artist. I recall watching Allen as bumbling would-be thief Virgil
Starkwell in TAKE THE MONEY AND RUN as a youth every time it appeared on
local television; I remember the raucous laughter inspired by peeks at the
naughtier EVERYTHING YOU ALWAYS WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX and SLEEPER. This
was Woody before the more mature bittersweet comedy of ANNIE HALL,
MANHATTAN and HANNAH AND HER SISTERS, but also before the
look-Ma-I'm-Bergman phase of SEPTEMBER and ANOTHER WOMAN. In my heart I
longed for Allen to return to arrested adolescence in something besides
his romantic life, to a brand of comedy even solid films like MANHATTAN
MURDER MYSTERY and BULLETS OVER BROADWAY didn't provide. In my heart, I
longed for Allen to become Virgil Starkwell once again.
     I suppose I couldn't have asked for more convincing proof than SMALL
TIME CROOKS that Virgil Starkwell is, in fact, dead. Allen plays Ray
Winkler, an ex-con who's still got ideas about one big bank score. His
latest plan involves tunneling into a neighborhood bank from an adjoining
retail space, using his wife Frenchie's (Tracey Ullman) skill at baking
cookies as a front. Ray and his cohorts Denny (Michael Rapaport), Tommy
(Tony Darrow) and Benny (Jon Lovitz) struggle with digging their tunnel in
the right direction, but Frenchie's cookies prove to be a phenomenal
success. Instead of a bank score, the Winklers wind up with a business
score, landing them in the lap of luxury. And then the trouble begins ...
     The abrupt shift in plot from caper comedy to fish-out-of-water
comedy takes some adjusting, but it neither makes the film nor ruins it. 
Each segment of the film has its comic high points, from a broken water
main in the basement to an unhealthy obsession with finger bowls. There
are also distractions in each segment, including the faux-"Honeymooners" 
bickering between Ray and Frenchie and Hugh Grant's uncomfortable
performance as a fortune-hunting art dealer. As with most of Allen's
comedies of the last decade, there are just enough lively gags to remind
you why it's still worth looking forward to his films, and just enough
dead spots to remind you that he's just not the same.
     No shift in Allen's sensibility has been more damaging to his sense
of humor than the ever-increasing level of condescension in his films. 
Once upon a time, the jokes in Woody Allen's films were on Woody; he was
the neurotic bumbler whose every movement suggested he was not just out of
place in the world, but sometimes out of place in his own body. There's
one delightful moment in SMALL TIME CROOKS that nearly re-captures that
vibe -- Allen trying to slip away unobtrusively at a posh party -- but
more often the joke is on someone else. While Elaine May is amusing as
Frenchie's brain-dead cousin, she's also a walking punch line for Ray's
sense of superiority. When the film gradually becomes a lesson in being
careful what you wish for in case you actually get it, it's Ray's world of
simple pleasures that's held up as the ideal. Even when he's playing a
loser, he gets to win.
     I'd still rather watch any one of Allen's last dozen films (CELEBRITY
notably excepted) than the majority of what turns up on the local
multiplex screen. He's a smart guy who writes smart comedy, and he's
become an immensely gifted film-maker over his 30 year career as a
director. Unfortunately, you keep getting the sense that he knows it,
that he's grown so enamored of his ability to impress that he forgets what
an incredible gift he has simply to make us laugh. There's a sequence in
SMALL TIME CROOKS in which the film's characters are interviewed by "60
Minutes'" Steve Kroft for a newsmagazine story. There's some funny stuff
in that sequence, but it kept reminding me of the documentary style of
TAKE THE MONEY AND RUN. In SMALL TIME CROOKS, it's almost as though Allen
is trying to appease those aliens from STARDUST MEMORIES who cracked wise
about enjoying his "early, funny" films. Yet even when he's turning out a
passably entertaining comedy, it's clear he just doesn't have any Virgil
Starkwell left in him.

Title
Review for Barcelona (1994)
Starring:  Taylor Nichols, Chris Eigeman, Tushka Bergen, Mira
Sorvino, Pep Munne.
Screenplay/Director:  Whit Stillman.
     I remember missing Whit Stillman's METROPOLITAN when it was in
theaters in 1990, and eagerly awaiting its video release.  I had heard
Stillman compared to Woody Allen, and I've always been a sucker for
urbane banter.  But I was disappointed with METROPOLITAN; pithy
dialogue only goes so far without any real story.  BARCELONA is a step
in the right direction, but just a step.  There is more substance
unifying Stillman's clever observations, but BARCELONA will still come
off as far too slow and talky for many viewers, a 100 minute long New
Yorker cartoon with a view.
     Set in "the last decade of the Cold War," BARCELONA focuses on two
Americans living in the Spanish city.  Ted (Taylor Nichols) is a sales
representative for an American motor company, wrestling with career and
romantic uncertainties; his cousin Fred (Chris Eigeman) is a cocky
naval officer sent as an advance scout and unlikely goodwill ambassador
for an upcoming fleet visit.  While Fred is visiting Ted, both men find
themselves in tricky situations.  Ted falls for Montserrat (Tushka
Bergen), a Spanish woman still living with another man; Fred finds
anti-American sentiment running high, fanned by Montserrat's journalist
boyfriend Ramon (Pep Munne).  The cousins make their way through the
city sharing their thoughts about love, sex, family and international
relations.
     Where METROPOLITAN suffered from too many characters too sketchily
drawn, BARCELONA wisely narrows its focus.  Taylor Nichols plays Ted as
the quintessential over-thinker, a man who rationalizes himself into
complete inaction over his job, his romances and his relationship with
Fred.  Chris Eigeman's Fred is a continuation of his delightfully
insufferable Nick from METROPOLITAN, and he launches into his role as
the ugly American abroad with tremendous enthusiasm.  Both performances
are extremely strong, but unfortunately both characters are a bit
annoying.  With significant stretches of BARCELONA consisting almost
entirely of conversations between Ted and Fred, their prep school
petulance grows tiresome, and you begin to wish for absolutely anything
to _happen_ to these guys.  When it does, it's a welcome change of
pace.
     If there is one thing Stillman does know how to do, it's how to
load his films with quotable lines.  Ted has a sharp little monologue
about why he has decided only to date "plain, or even rather homely"
women (a resolution he promptly breaks); Fred counters with
observations on his confusion over the correct way to shave, as well as
why American society is mis-perceived as more violent ("We're just
better shots").  There are a number of moments which prompt genuine
laughs, but Stillman doesn't seem to know how to incorporate them into
a plot.  Everything comes to a halt so that his characters can trade
bon mots, and it begins to seem as though Stillman has simply set up
his camera in front of an expatriate version of the Algonquin Round
Table.  When he does pull out some quirky, character-based physical
comedy, like Ted cutting a rug to "Pennsylvania 6-5000" while reading
the Bible, it's as though he's jolted the entire production to life
with a cattle prod.  Only eventually it settles back into wry
philosophizing.
     BARCELONA does manage some keen insights into European perceptions
about American society and politics, and when Stillman focuses his
attention on that theme he is frequently on target.  His most
perceptive observation connects the attitudes of Europeans towards
American tastes to the miserable quality of hamburgers abroad, and it
was one of those rare movie moments where I saw the world, if only
briefly, through different eyes.  That achievement alone warrants
praise, and a moderate recommendation.  But I sense there will be many
viewers who will grow restless waiting for Stillman's characters to get
a life.  BARCELONA is just clever enough to get by on its charm, but
Stillman really needs to stop wallowing in his own cleverness and start
telling stories.

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
(October)
Starring:  Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake,
Robert Loggia.
Screenplay:  David Lynch and Barry Gifford.
Producers:  Deepak Nayar, Tom Sternberg, Mary Sweeney.
Director:  David Lynch.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  134 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Please don't bother asking me what LOST HIGHWAY is "about," because I
have only the vaguest idea.  I'm also not particularly bothered by that
fact, any more than I am bothered by not knowing what a Bosch painting or
a given chapter in "Ulysses" is "about."  A linear narrative is not a
pre-requisite for the evocation of an emotional response, and David Lynch
is one of the few artists who has tried to push the limits of cinema as a
medium of sound, images and possibilities.  That doesn't mean he always
knows when to stop pushing.  Somewhere between the fever dream of
ERASERHEAD and the ominous suburban dread of BLUE VELVET and the pilot of
"Twin Peaks" is a place where Lynch gets in trouble, where he begins to
irritate the audience he is trying to seduce.  LOST HIGHWAY is Lynch at
his best and his worst, as unnerving as it is excessive.
     Any attempt to describe the plot of LOST HIGHWAY is ultimately an
exercise in futility, but essentially it involves two uniquely connected
story-lines.  In the first, nightclub musician Fred Madison (Bill Pullman)
faces a couple of potentially threatening situations.  The jealous Fred is
worried that his wife Renee (a brunette Patricia Arquette) is cheating on
him, but even more worried when someone begins leaving videotapes on his
doorstep showing someone slowly stalking them.  Then, suddenly, Renee is
dead, and Fred is in prison on death row after being convicted of her
murder.  Then, even more suddenly, Fred has been replaced in his prison
cell by Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty), a young mechanic with no memory of
how he got there.  When Pete is released, he ends up mixed up with a
gangster named Mr. Eddy (Robert Loggia), Mr. Eddy's mistress Alice
(Patricia Arquette again, now a blonde) and a spooky mystery man (Robert
Blake).
     There is little doubt in my mind that, when he is working at the top
of his form, David Lynch can turn our darkest unspoken fears into
brilliant cinema like no other living director.  There are nightmare
visions in Lynch projects which can leave you shaking for days, and there
are moments during the first hour of LOST HIGHWAY which build and release
tension with an almost unbearable skill.  Long stretches of silence are
punctuated by sudden bursts of sound; characters drift into darkness in
shots that linger long enough to make you start peeking through your
fingers.  And then there is the hilariously creepy scene where Blake's
white-faced Mystery Man taunts Fred by making a phone call to Fred's
house...which the Mystery Man himself then answers.  With its eerie
production design and slowly mounting paranoia, LOST HIGHWAY begins to
cast a spell which will have viewers anxious but intrigued.
     Too bad it takes such a short time to lose those viewers entirely.
The Fred-to-Pete transformation is not a fatal error in and of itself,
though audiences used to conventional narratives may be baffled by it.
The real villain in the collapse of LOST HIGHWAY is Lynch's inability to
ground the film so that its world makes internal sense.  ERASERHEAD's
landscape was unquestionably surreal; BLUE VELVET, as unsettling as it
was, always focused on the horrors of the real world.  Lynch's misfires,
like WILD AT HEART and the latter stages of "Twin Peaks," teased viewers
with real world horrors before launching into surreal realms which left
them throwing up their hands (if not actually throwing up).  The mistake
in LOST HIGHWAY isn't the outrageous character shift, but the way the
other characters in the film respond to that event as a problem to be
solved.  If LOST HIGHWAY is about psychosis made flesh, about
psychological duality becoming physical duality, it falls short of pulling
you into that world because it has given you the impression that there is
an "answer."  And while you're busy giving yourself a headache trying to
solve that mystery, you aren't getting caught up in the atmosphere of the
mystery itself.
     LOST HIGHWAY contains too many individual moments of vintage Lynch to
be considered a failure.  However, Lynch does seem to be repeating himself
as he tries to create those moments.  The grimly comic violence, the
degraded sexuality and the languid exchanges of dialogue are all familiar,
and seem more like self-plagiarism than a characteristic style.  Loggia's
gangster with the hair-trigger temper is a pale imitation of Dennis
Hopper's savage menace in BLUE VELVET, and Lynch's madonna/whore fixation
is in full bloom both in Arquette's sly dual role and Pete's girlfriend
Sheila (Natasha Gregson Wagner).  Lynch often seems more interested in
re-creating than creating, in taking the perfect 10's of his career and
cranking them up to 11.  For its first hour, LOST HIGHWAY is brilliant,
and there are flashes of that brilliance for another 75 minutes, but they
don't hold together because there isn't a consistent tone or structure to
sustain them.  In a film where everything seems to be in two places at
once, it is fitting that LOST HIGHWAY doesn't stay in any one place long
enough.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
BULWORTH
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle.
Screenplay:  Warren Beatty and Jeremy Pikser.
Producers:  Warren Beatty and Pieter Brugge.
Director:  Warren Beatty.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, some violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Here's a comic premise with all the potential in the world:  a man in
a career where lying is part of the job description becomes disgusted with
his own life.  He has a breakdown, and as part of that breakdown he starts
telling the truth, the outrageous and unexpurgated truth, consequences be
damned.  Naturally, the public responds to this unusual display of candor,
and the teller of the truth becomes a sort of folk hero, much to the
consternation of corporate America.
     That's the basic premise of a 1990 comedy called CRAZY PEOPLE, in
which Dudley Moore plays an advertising executive who snaps his cap and
starts turning out product slogans like "Volvo -- They're boxy, but
they're good."  It's also the premise of BULWORTH, in which Warren Beatty
plays a Democratic Senator from California named Jay Billington Bulworth
who snaps his cap during a re-election campaign and starts making colorful
statements about his constituents in the African-American and film-making
communities, among others.  With three days left before the California
primary, a CNBC news crew following his every move and his Chief of Staff
(Oliver Platt) watching in helpless horror, Bulworth decides to go out in
a blaze of honesty after taking out a contract on his own life.
     CRAZY PEOPLE was less than completely successful because it didn't
have a shred of story to offer once you got past the admittedly hilarious
snippets of truth in advertising.  BULWORTH is less than completely
successful because it has _too much_ story, none of it in keeping with the
frivolous, politically incorrect tone of its trailers.  It turns out that
Jay Bulworth is a crushed idealist, a one-time activist turned mainstream
party drone.  Beatty crafts a solid opening as we see Bulworth reduced to
tears while watching a videotaped compendium of his television spots
bashing affirmative action, preaching family falues and mouthing
platitudes about "standing on the doorstep of a new millennium."  Though
he launches his uncensored commentary from a suicidal indifference to the
future, he finds himself re-energized by speaking from his true
principles, eventually trying to end the contract on his life so he can
continue delivering his message.
     It's a dark and provocative tale, one which could easily turn off
viewers who come in expecting something completely different.  Beatty uses
BULWORTH as a soapbox for old-school Democratic ideology, criticizing the
influence of big business and promoting single-payer health care.  Though
he deftly inserts most of his social commentary into rap-style lyrics --
somehow a rapped lecture sounds less like a lecture -- it's still an
aggressive attack on the Powers That Be as Beatty sees them.  Add to this
a tentative romance between Bulworth and a young black woman (Halle
Berry), the intrusion of the hit-man sub-plot and even a bit of
fish-out-of-water comedy as Bulworth hides out in the 'hood, and you end
up with a film that's more jittery than edgy.  BULWORTH keeps lashing out
in search of its tone -- one moment goofy and irreverent, the next moment
grim and pedantic.
     There's nothing inherently wrong with a comedy delivering its goods
unconventionally, provided the goods are delivered.  There are plenty of
comic high points in BULWORTH, including Platt's superb performance as
Bulworth's ever-more-frantic right hand man and the shoot-from-the-hip
speeches already showcased in previews.  But there's also a sense that
Beatty wants to lure people in with comedy so he can hit them over the
head with his politics.  Even if you agree with those politics, you may
find BULWORTH leaving a strange and unpleasant aftertaste; you'll know
you've seen an interesting film, but you may feel cheated by the kind of
film you got.  I suspect viewers will wish they'd seen more of Bulworth's
comic rantings.  Perhaps this ad campaign could have used a dose of CRAZY
PEOPLE's truth in advertising.

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
STATE AND MAIN
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Philip Seymour Hoffman, William H. Macy, Rebecca Pidgeon, Alec
Baldwin, Sarah Jessica Parker, David Paymer, Julia Stiles, Clark Gregg.
Screenplay:  David Mamet.
Producer:  Sarah Green.
Director:  David Mamet.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  106 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In Waterford, Vermont, the town doctor strolls down Main Street,
following up with his patients as they pass by. The residents exchange
expressions of support for the high school football team, and the clothing
store leaves racks untended on the sidewalk. The mayor is even named
George Bailey. George for-the-love-of-IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE Bailey. Yes,
indeed, Waterford is the quintessence of wholesome small-town America, God
bless us every one.
     Oh, and there was a string of suspicious fires back in the 1960s,
probably set by a deranged teenager.
     Somewhere between Frank Capra and David Lynch (by way of Woody Allen)
lies the world of David Mamet's STATE AND MAIN, a movie industry satire
that's not really a movie industry satire in its unique, sweetly cynical
way. The concept finds a Hollywood film crew searching for the ideal
backwater New England town for a location shoot. Director Walt Price
(William H. Macy) believes he has found his spot in Waterford, until
things start getting shaky. A key location is inconveniently absent,
leading man Bob Barrenger (Alec Baldwin) is once again indulging his taste
for underage girls and leading lady Claire Wellesley (Sarah Jessica
Parker) is balking at doing her nude scene. Meanwhile, the film's rookie
screenwriter Joseph Turner White (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is struggling
with his artistic conscience and his re-writes as he falls for local
bookseller Annie White (Rebecca Pidgeon).
     In a more conventional film, STATE AND MAIN would have turned into a
broad fish-out-of-water farce about clashes between the worldly and the
homespun. Mamet chooses to keep those two worlds largely distinct from a
narrative standpoint, juxtaposing the film's behind-the-scenes chaos with
the reactions of the townspeople to the crew's presence. Most of the more
straightforward humor comes from the pre-production, with good
self-deprecating work by Baldwin and Parker and hilarious work by David
Paymer as the film's cutthroat producer. Then there is Macy, whose
director takes on a different personality for every person he deals with
depending on how much power he wields over them. As both writer and
director, Mamet keeps masterful control over when information is revealed,
adding layers of humor at unexpected moments. In their clockwork
construction and delightful aura of self-importance, those movie scenes
are the stuff of great comedy.
     But STATE AND MAIN actually works best as something more than a
simple razzing of movie folk. The real object of Mamet's ridicule is the
whole idea of "purity" over which Black obsessess in his script. Waterford
is no idealized hamlet away from the hustle and bustle of Hollywood. It's
a town with dark secrets, ready to sell its soul for a chance to be part
of that hustle and bustle. The townies at the diner trade their local
paper for Variety, the mayor's wife (Patti LuPone) tears up her historic
home to host a dinner for the film crew, and the community theater actors
drop their local production for a chance to be an extra in the movie.
Mamet takes the myth of pop culture as corruptor of ordinary, decent
Americans and shows ordinary, decent Americans in our tabloid- and
WWF-obsessed "average American" world plenty ready to be corrupted if
given an excuse, thank you very much.
     That may sound like a terribly dark perspective, but STATE AND MAIN
is actually a bit more optimistic. The budding romance between Black and
White is not just significant in the metaphorical obviousness of their
names, but in showing how tough it is to maintain a moral center in any
environment. It's also, unfortunately, a seriously weak link. It's nice to
see an actor like Hoffman get a shot at a romantic lead, but there's
something missing from his character to make him a solid center. And while
Pidgeon is getting better on screen all the time, she still slips into the
most jarring examples of clipped Mamet-speak. STATE AND MAIN hits its own
giant pothole like the one the town continues to ignore, but unlike in the
film, it never gets big enough to cause a wreck. Mamet's script is too
sharp, the performances too strong, and the message too cleverly
insinuated. Good comedy is rare; good comedy with something to say is even
rarer. Welcome to Waterford, a little slice of America the way it used to
be -- and the way it really is.

Title
Review for Specialist, The (1994)
     There are moments in this job when one is faced with separating
the "so-bad-it's-entertaining" from the "just-plain-awful."  At those
times, I wish I could become Joe Bob Briggs, and make the
recommendation to "check it out" based simply on explosions, naked
breasts and Cuban gangster-fu.  But THE SPECIALIST doesn't deserve such
consideration.  Ponderous, pretentious and acted with astounding
indifference, THE SPECIALIST is a big fat bore with a couple of nice
explosions.  It's too somber to work as camp, and too tedious to work
as anything else.
     Sylvester Stallone stars as Ray Quick, a former CIA demolitions
expert now haunted by his past and hiring out his skills with
explosives freelance.  He is contacted by May Munro (Sharon Stone), a
woman obsessed with the murder of her parents at the hands of three
thugs led by Tomas (Eric Roberts), the son of a Miami drug lord (Rod
Steiger).  Ray is unsure whether he wants to take the job, until he
becomes a bit too personally interested in May's attempts to get closer
to Tomas.  He also discovers that the drug lord's head of security is
Ned Trent (James Woods), Ray's former CIA partner.  Trent carries a
ten-year grudge for Ray's part in having him thrown out of the Agency,
and plans to use May's vendetta to exact a little vengeance of his
own.
     Much as one might expect, THE SPECIALIST is being hyped on the
pairing of box-office heavyweights Stallone and Stone.  Unfortunately,
both of them spend most of the film looking as though they've just done
a NyQuil highball.  Stone swaggers through discos in slow motion,
wanders through her inexplicably massive house in slow motion, has sex
in slow motion.  At some point, director Luis Llosa needed to explain
to Stone that "haunted" and "bored" are entirely different emotions.
Stallone is even more comatose, conveying Ray's deep reservoir of
anguish and guilt through drooping eyelids and jaw muscle isometrics,
as well as speaking in what can only be described as an impersonation
of Henry Kissinger with a head cold.  Perhaps that was one of the
reasons behind a scene in which Stallone dispatches a group of young
hoods on a bus, which was added after test screenings:  they needed at
least some evidence that he had a pulse.
     The rest of the cast is nearly as bad.  James Woods tries to cut
loose as the demented Trent, but he never makes for a particularly
threatening villain.  He's better when humiliating a bomb squad
commander or making off-handed insults about a loud shirt.  Eric
Roberts, typecast for most of his career as a lout-mouthed sleazeball,
plays...well, a slightly more sedate sleazeball, delivering lines like
"What I want, I take" straight out of the Introduction to Basic
Machismo Handbook.  And Rod Steiger, who was given to overacting even
in his Academy Award-winning heyday, is appalling as the Cuban
Godfather, doing an accent which rivals Kevin Costner's Robin Hood as
the worst in recent memory.
     There are a couple of moments in THE SPECIALIST which are worth
unintentional giggles.  One is the ill-advised scene in which Stallone
and Stone stand together in a hotel room, undressing each other while
Stone stares down at the top of the 5'8" Stallone's head.  Another is
trying to understand how Stone's May, who looks about ten years older
than Roberts' Tomas, was supposed to be a young girl when an adult
Roberts helped kill May's parents.  But THE SPECIALIST is simply
brain-dead from top to bottom.  There are almost too many examples of
stupidity to single one out, but my personal favorite involves May
faking her own death by tossing her wallet in with a 60-year-old
corpse.  Apparently they don't have photos on ID in Florida.
     I have to hand the pyrotechnics team credit for blowing up a hotel
suite; it's a fairly impressive piece of work.  But that's when I
should have left.  Come to think of it, I wish that's where I'd come
in, too.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Kevin Kline, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rupert Everett, Stanley Tucci,
Calista Flockhart, Anna Friel, Christian Bale, Dominic West, David
Strathairn, Sophie Marceau.
Screenplay:  Michael Hoffman, based on the play by William Shakespeare.
Producers:  Leslie Urdang and Michael Hoffman.
Director:  Michael Hoffman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The cinematic cynic in me suspects that the lofty, unwieldy title of
WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM has as much to do with
timely marketing as it does with a nod to literary fidelity.  After all,
when adults are flocking to the Oscar-winning SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE and
teens are catching "The Taming of the Shrew" turned into 10 THINGS I HATE
ABOUT YOU, the Bard would seem to be riding a unique wave of
cross-demographic hipness.  Then again, Shakespeare has always been
pitched both at the gallery and at the groundlings, mixing the matters of
kings with the matters of clowns.  To that extent, this MIDSUMMER NIGHT is
truly William Shakespeare's in its mix of disparate elements, with all the
delights and potential pitfalls that accompany them.
     Writer/director Michael Hoffman transports the tale from Greece to
19th century Tuscany, where many plotlines swirl around the impending
wedding of Duke Theseus (David Strathairn) and Hippolyta (Sophie Marceau).
Hermia (Anna Friel), the daughter of one of Theseus' courtiers, is
forcefully engaged to marry Demetrius (Christian Bale), but Hermia instead
shares a love with Lysander (Dominic West).  Demetrius, meanwhile, is the
object of affection of Hermia's childhood friend Helena (Calista
Flockhart).  Another thread finds a group of amateur actors, led by the
weaver Nick Bottom (Kevin Kline), preparing a play to be performed for the
Duke's wedding, perhaps to receive an award if it is well-liked.  The
paths of these characters all cross in the nearby forest, where
complications ensue as the machinations of the Fairy King Oberon (Rupert
Everett) and his mischievous servant Puck (Stanley Tucci) -- aided by a
little love potion -- cause every romantic entaglement to become further
entangled.
     At its most basic level, A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM is a precursor to
bedroom farce without the slamming doors (doors being hard to come by in
the forest).  As the enchanted lovers become a circle of frustration --
Lysander is made to love Helena, who still loves Demetrius, who still
loves Hermia, who still loves Lysander -- saucy exchanges alternate with
good old-fashioned female mud wrestling.  It takes more than a little
while for the film to find its pacing, hindered by the atypically awkward
work of Strathairn, but once the pleasantly low-tech, stage-set world of
the forest becomes the focus, the high and low comedy both begin working.
The one major hindrance may be the clash of acting styles:  while Bale,
Friel and West go for pure Royal Shakespeare, Flockhart plays Helena as a
neurotic mess fretting over her appearance a la Ally McBeal.  It's an
interesting interpretation, but one that doesn't always mesh with the
other players.
     The other major sub-plot becomes both A MIDSUMMER NIGHT DREAM's high
point and its source of greatest disappointment.  Kevin Kline, turning in
one of his better performances, plays Nick Bottom as a wonderfully
tragi-comic sadsack, an unhappily married laborer with grand dreams of how
the stage will offer him a chance at greatness.  When he is simultaneously
transformed into an ass and into the object of desire of the love
potion-affected Fairy Queen Titania (Michelle Pfeiffer), it's touching to
note how his moment of glory makes him oblivious to his physical state.
Unfortunately, Hoffman doesn't exploit Kline's performance for all it can
offer, never really delivering a satisfying resolution to the character he
has set up.
     He does, however, build to a wonderfully comic climax as the actors
finally perform their play within the play.  The bumbling performance is
pure slapstick -- malapropped lines, misaligned props, over-the-top acting
and, to quote SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE, a bit with a dog.  The one nice twist
comes as Flute (Sam Rockwell), the actor-in-drag performing the ingenue
in the play, breaks from character to deliver an earnest paean to true
love.  It's a sweet note on which to end a play of sometimes discordant
tones, perhaps making this DREAM seem less uneven that it should.  The
course of this tale about the course of true love never does run smooth;
it merely offers a fanciful comedy deserving enough of the author's name.

Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
Starring:  Daniel Day-Lewis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Winona Ryder.
Screenplay:  Jay Cocks and Martin Scorsese.
Director:  Martin Scorsese.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Viewers of THE AGE OF INNOCENCE will likely fall into one of two
camps: those who consider it a minor masterpiece, and those who
consider it a huge bore.  There is something to be said for both
sides.  Director Martin Scorsese has crafted a sumptuous and dazzling
visual feast from Edith Wharton's novel of social propriety and
repressed desire, but one that suffers from an overlong second act and
a lack of character depth.  While still an exceptional film experience,
it is ultimately one which I found much more engaging intellectually
than emotionally.
     THE AGE OF INNOCENCE is the story of Newland Archer (Daniel
Day-Lewis), a lawyer in 1870s New York and a member of the privileged
class.  He is engaged to May Welland (Winona Ryder), a pleasant but
oblivious girl from another prominent family.  On the day of their
engagement announcement, Archer is re-introduced to May's cousin Ellen
Olenska (Michelle Pfeiffer), an unhappily married countess who has left
her European husband for the support of her family in New York.  Ellen
wants a divorce, but the family fears a scandal and entreats Archer to
persuade her to drop the suit.  As Archer becomes Ellen's confidante,
he realizes that she is one of the few people who shares his distaste
for the shallowness of their world.  He falls in love with Ellen, and
finds himself forced to choose between what he most desires and what is
demanded of him by his society.
     THE AGE OF INNOCENCE is a tale of surfaces, of a society concerned
with the appearance of things rather than the reality.  It is a world
where male infidelity is tacitly accepted, provided the man does not
flaunt his indiscretion, a world where a declined dinner invitation is
a social snubbing understood by both parties but never expressly
stated.  Scorsese captures this obsession with surfaces by letting his
camera dwell on things rather than people; calling cards, watch fobs,
earrings and table settings all become icons of status and civility.
Meanwhile, a running narration by Joanne Woodward calls attention to
the coded meanings and ironies in every word and gesture.  It's a
fascinating anthropological study, highlighted by typically bravura
Scorsese moments, including a piercingly insightful tour through one
house during a formal ball.  Yet for all its virtuosity, I found THE
AGE OF INNOCENCE working essentially as a documentary, not the
forbidden love story which is at its core.  Scorsese is so good at
establishing the framework, that he has little time left for the
characters.  They are kept at a distance, which may in part be the
point but left me a bit cold.
     The performers are not to be held responsible for these
shortcomings.  Day-Lewis is quite good as Archer, particularly in a
scene with Pfeiffer where he desperately struggles to find the polite
vocabulary to tell her people will think she's a whore if she gets a
divorce.  He carries himself as though he is constantly on the brink of
exploding but knows that it is impossible to do so.  I had feared that
Pfeiffer would end up repeating her Madame du Tourveil from DANGEROUS
LIAISONS, but she is too canny an actress for that.  She invests Ellen
with as much as the script will allow her, and then some, making her a
sad and slightly embittered woman who knows that being a woman means
never being able to find your own happiness.  Ryder has a thankless
part as May, and seems almost as uncomfortable as she was in BRAM
STOKER'S DRACULA; it appears to be time for her to forego period
drama.  Miriam Margolyes is delightful as May's eccentric and knowing
Granny Mingott, but the rest of the cast is forced to do what it can
with roles which essentially function as Archer's obstacles; they are
not really characters in their own right.
     However, the film's technical credits alone make it required
viewing.  Longtime Scorsese collaborator Thelma Schoonmaker does a
glorious editing job, and even gets her name on a billboard in the
film.  Cinematographer Michael Ballhaus takes some stunning and
instantly memorable shots, including an ocean panorama which looks like
a painting.  Elmer Bernstein's score is lush and evocative, and the
costume and production design are certain Oscar nominees.
     THE AGE OF INNOCENCE demonstrates yet again that Martin Scorsese
could direct "Dick and Jane" into a visual spectacle.  It's a
fascinating examination of lifeless and soulless time, and my attention
never waned.  But I kept finding myself oddly detached, wanting to care
more about whether or not Archer and Ellen would find happiness
together but never quite able to do so.  There is so much to admire
about THE AGE OF INNOCENCE that it seems like nitpicking, but I'm funny
that way: I want to be caught up in love stories.

Title
Review for Filth and the Fury, The (2000)
THE FILTH AND THE FURY
(Fine Line)
Featuring:  Johnny Rotten, Steve Jones, Paul Cook, Sid Vicious, Glen
Matlock, Malcolm McLaren.
Producers:  Anita Camarata and Amanda Temple.
Director:  Julien Temple.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In a lifespan of just over 24 months, the Sex Pistols managed to
distill the entire history of rock and roll into one short-lived,
phenomenally influential experiment. There were internal disagreements and
lineup changes. There were distractions from meddling girlfriends and
drugs. There were legal and fiscal wranglings with a shady manager and
anxious record companies. There were cries of outrage from adults who just
didn't understand the rebellious messages of this new musical form,
accompanied by the certain knowledge that civilization as we knew it was
about to come to an end. And finally, there was the inevitable
transformation of rebellion and singularity into its own kind of
conformity. 
     Anyone at all familiar with the Pistols would hope to high heaven
that a film-maker wouldn't choose to tell their story in the measured
tones of hero worship. No such worries under the direction of Julien
Temple, who turns THE FILTH AND THE FURY into a multi-media Sex Pistols 
assault. Temple frames his archival footage of the band with modern day
interviews with the band's four original members -- vocalist John "Johnny
Rotten" Lydon, guitarist Steve Jones, drummer Paul Cook and bassist Glen
Matlock -- and a 1978 post break-up interview with replacement bassist
(and eventual heroin casualty) Sid Vicious. Their voices describe a band
born out of the social conditions of mid-1970s England, a music of furious
discontent that made the Sex Pistols as reviled by their critics as they
were adored by their fans. They also tell of the factions within the band
between those loyal to the Pistols' manager and self-described creator
Malcolm McLaren and those who distrusted his business dealings and staged
outrageousness.
     Many of the stories told in THE FILTH AND THE FURY are by now the
stuff of rock legend: the profane appearance on an English television
show; the performance of "God Save the Queen" on the Thames during the
celebration of Queen Elizabeth's silver anniversary jubilee; the
one-song-and-out final concert at San Francisco's Winterland in January
1978. Julien Temple has already documented the Sex Pistols in 1980's THE
GREAT ROCK 'N' ROLL SWINDLE, so there was the danger that THE FILTH AND
THE FURY would feel not just like a canonization of a pioneering band, but
a recycled canonization. Instead, Temple captures not just the energy of
the Pistols, but their satirical sense of playfulness as well. That
expletive-filled television interview is described as a drunken Steve
Jones having fun at the expense of the equally drunk host; jabs at
"progressive rock" contemporaries like Yes and Emerson, Lake and Palmer
are accompanied by footage of stop-motion dinosaurs. With music, animation
and dozens of archival clips, Temple compiles a film that doesn't merely
lay out a Sex Pistols chronology; it captures the atmosphere and the
attitude of anarchy in the U.K.
     That's not to say that it's instantly reliable as the definitive Sex
Pistols story. SWINDLE may have been an obvious attempt at
self-congratulation by McLaren, but THE FILTH AND THE FURY occasionally
seems just as much like an ego piece for Johnny Rotten. The present-day
interviews are conducted with the band members in shadow, an effective
means of keeping the story in the "present" of 1970s England. They also
allow Rotten in particular to "set the record straight" in a manner that
sounds theatrically performed every time he opens his mouth. Rotten may
very well be a more reliable historian of the Pistols than McLaren, but
when he and Jones relate differing accounts of a hotel room snafu, it's
hard not to here Rotten's version as a bit of overdramatization. Make no
mistake, it's still tremendously interesting listening to Rotten's
perspective on the rise and fall of the band. It's also a little hard to
take when he actually begins crying over the tragic end of his friend Sid
Vicious.
     That's actually a fairly minor quibble with a film as vital and
generally unpretentious as THE FILTH AND THE FURY (you don't get less
pretentious than Steve Jones' crudely honest reason for wanting to be in a
band). While Temple clearly appreciates the Sex Pistols as the defining
force in English punk -- including footage of youngsters Siouxsie Sioux,
Billy Idol and Pogues frontman Shane McGowan at concerts or singing
Pistols songs -- he also confronts the bands members' dissatisfaction with
how their legacy has been defined. Rotten in particular bemoans punk being
"absorbed back into the mainstream," with middle-class kids wearing
leather the real early English punks could never have afforded. He's also
surprisingly philosophical about the band's disintegration during its 1978
U.S. tour. "The Sex Pistols had to end when it did," Rotten opines, "but
it didn't have to end _how_ it did." Of course, he probably would be less
concerned with the philosophizing than pure sensory jolt, and that's
something THE FILTH AND THE FURY provides. It took the Sex Pistols two
years to distill rock and roll into every one of its basic elements. It
takes Julien Temple 108 minutes to do the same thing to the Sex Pistols. 
It's a story with the frantic, two-and-a-half-minute raw energy blast of a
classic punk anthem.

Title
Review for Threesome (1994)
Starring:  Lara Flynn Boyle, Stephen Baldwin, Josh Charles.
Screenplay/Director:  Andrew Fleming.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I think "The Wonder Years" may be to blame.  There was a time when
I didn't take particular notice of voiceover narration one way or the
other; it was just another part of a movie.  Now I'm not sure whether
it is the content of the narration or my perception that has changed,
but it seems lately that hearing narration at the beggining of a film
is enough to make me suspicious.  There comes with some narration a
pretentiousness that can weigh down a simple story or pummel an
audience over the head with a moral.  THREESOME has all the elements to
be a successful lighthearted character romp, but many of its strengths
are obscured by the moments it takes itself far too seriously.
     THREESOME opens in the mid-term at an unnamed university, where
two new transfers prepare to join a returning student in a three-person
dormitory suite.  The returning student is Stuart (Stephen Baldwin), a
boorish womanizer; his new roommates are Eddy (Josh Charles) and Alex.
Much to everyone's surprise, Alex (Lara Flynn Boyle) turns out to be a
woman, assigned to the room through a bureaucratic blunder.  Tensions
are high at first, but eventually the three become close friends.
Naturally, romantic attractions begin to get in the way.  Stuart is
attracted to the fiery Alex.  Alex is attracted to the sensitive Eddy.
And Eddy, who is just discovering his sexual identity, is attracted to
Stuart.
     THREESOME is set up almost as a three-character stage play wherein
other characters exist only to make observations on the behavior of the
three principal characters, and those characters are established with
widely varying degrees of success.  Stuart is probably the most
interesting and fully-rounded character, one who bears many of the
marks of a stereotypical college jerk but responds to his roommate's
sexual orientation with minimal sturm und drang.  Stephen Baldwin is
surprisingly charming in the role, spewing forth sexual single-entendre
with an infectious enthusiasm.  Josh Charles is appropriately tense as
the confused Eddy, one of those over-thinkers many of us knew (or were)
in college.  Still, there comes a point where his heaviness is a bit
much for an audience to take.  Lara Flynn Boyle, who has gone from
looking too old for her part as a high school student on "Twin Peaks"
to looking too old for her part as a college student here, does some
interesting things with a character who never really finds a center.
Alex is part sex kitten, part basket case, and several other parts of
several other characters, and it's difficult for anyone to strike the
right tone with such a character.
     What did work strike a chord with me was the interaction between
the three characters, which was extremely reminiscent of relationships
I knew.  College was filled with people who bantered and sparred,
trying desperately to ignore sexual tension, and while the specifics of
the relationship between the three characters in THREESOME are somewhat
unique, that dynamic is not.  The dialogue, while tending toward the
unrealistic, is still frequently funny, and I found myself basically
engaged in the lives of these three people as long as they weren't
navel-gazing about how hard it all was.
     And it is on the level of its self-consciousness that THREESOME
falls somewhat flat.  What could have been a lively and fairly
entertaining look at a slightly different kind of romantic triangle
instead becomes a film that tries far too hard to be *about*
something.  The narration, which comes retrospectively from Eddy, is
filled with descriptions that could just as easily have been provided
visually, and with pseudo-profound pronouncements about that wrong turn
that becomes the best part of a trip.  There are a couple of three-way
love scenes which are handled deftly, but much of Andrew Fleming's
direction is leaden.  It appears as though he wasn't quite clear that
he had a decent little comedy on his hands; it wasn't really necessary
to try to turn it into an earth-shaking drama.

Title
Review for Panther (1995)
Starring:  Kadeem Hardison, Bokeem Woodbine, Marcus Chong,
           Courtney B. Vance, Joe Don Baker, Richard Dysart,
           M. Emmett Walsh.
Screenplay:  Melvin Van Peebles.
Director:  Mario Van Peebles.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I have often said that the first responsibility of a
historically based film is not necessarily to be good history, but
to be good drama.  Documented facts can sometimes make for a
compelling story on their own, but usually a bit of creative license
is not merely acceptable, it's required.  So how can I say that out
of one side of my mouth, while with the other I criticize PANTHER
for being a mediocre account of the rise of the Black Panther Party?
Because by painting the characters in a far too positive light, the
filmmakers have robbed the characters of their humanity, and
everything that might make them interesting.  While there are a
number of powerful images, PANTHER is a one-note drama which misses
the opportunity to include some internal conflict.
     PANTHER opens in 1967, with the formation of the Black Panther
Party in Oakland by Bobby Seale (Courtney B. Vance) and Huey Newton
(Marcus Chong).  With white police officers brutalizing their
neighborhoods with impunity, Seale and Newton begin recruiting black
youths to help defend the community.  Among those they attempt to
recruit is Judge (Kadeem Hardison), a Vietnam vet and college
student unsure about whether to work for change inside or outside
the system.  Loudly proclaiming their Constitutional rights, the
Black Panthers arm themselves and begin policing the police.  This
development doesn't sit at all well with local law enforcement,
which attempts to turn Judge into an informant, or with FBI chief J.
Edgar Hoover (Richard Dysart), whose plans for eliminating the
Panthers are far more extreme.
     Mario Van Peebles is developing into a director with a real
flair for powerful visuals, and PANTHER is no exception.  His use of
documentary footage and different film stocks has a bit of Oliver
Stone theatricality, but without the wretched excess.  The early
scenes of the Panthers' emergence as a force have a tense energy.
In one such scene, a group of armed Panthers stop a pair of police
officers from beating a black man, resulting in a showdown witnessed
by hundreds of blacks awed by the sight of black men standing up to
the white establishment and getting away with it.  It is a vivid
example of why the Black Panthers' message was so widely embraced,
and why they became so powerful so quickly.
     What Van Peebles is unable to do is provide any real sense of
who these men were, and the reason is one of intent.  Both
screenwriter Melvin and director Mario are not particularly
interested in creating characters, it seems; they want to create
idols.  Bobby Seale is presented as a serene sort of philosopher-
king, relegated to the background in favor of the more vocal Huey
Newton.  But even Newton becomes little more than a figurehead, a
mouthpiece for a message rather than a fully-realized man.  Kadeem
Hardison's Judge is the narrator of the story, and for a while it
appears that his character will provide a degree of ambiguity as he
struggles with whether or not to join the Panthers.  That ambiguity
is short-lived, as he becomes a dedicated soldier with no doubts as
soon as he puts on the black beret.  There is a single scene of
Eldridge Cleaver (well-played by Anthony Griffith) breaking ranks to
take more forceful action, but with that exception the Black
Panthers in PANTHER come off as one collective consciousness.
     The absence of any real internal conflict makes PANTHER become
extremely derivative.  The first couple of times, the sight of Huey
Newton forcing an arrogant cop to back down (including once while
protecting Malcolm X's widow Betty Shabazz, played by Angela Bassett
reprising her role from MALCOLM X) is exciting.  The tenth or
eleventh time, it has long since lost its sting.  There are just too
many scenes of sneering brutality which become interchangeable in a
way I'm sure the Van Peebles' did not want.  The addition of a
government/mafia conspiracy to flood the black community with cheap
drugs only emphasizes the fact that this is a story entirely about
looking outward.  The Black Panther story is an important part of an
important time, but it could have had real power if PANTHER had been
more about the men behind the movement and less an exercise in hero
worship.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
     Did you ever get the feeling that Brian DePalma designs entire films
around set pieces he thinks would be really cool?  Think about MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE -- can you recall more than a few scattered seconds aside from
the computer room break-in and the train tunnel finale?  Even DePalma's
strongest efforts like CARRIE and THE UNTOUCHABLES hit their stride when
he was showing off bravura bits like the prom night apocalypse and the
train station steps shootout, respectively.  The trivial business of
building a story between cool sequences frequently seems to bore him; if
there were a directorial equivalent for "script doctor," he'd probably be
all over it.
     SNAKE EYES opens with a typically flashy piece of DePalmannerism, a
20-minute, single-take Steadicam shot following Rick Santoro (Nicolas
Cage) as he makes his way through a sporting arena on the night of a
heavyweight championship fight.  Santoro is a gleefully corrupt Atlantic
City police detective, invited to the fight by Naval Commander Kevin Dunne
(Gary Sinise), Santoro's old school buddy and the head of security for the
Secretary of Defense (Joel Fabiani).  But something goes wrong in the
first round:  two mysterious women cause distractions, the champ (Stan
Shaw) goes down, a sniper takes out the Secretary, and the crowd goes
crazy.  The only question is what really happened, and whose perspective
on the events can be trusted.
     That opening reel is a nice piece of work, and an ideal showcase for
Cage at his bug-eyed, manically-grinning finest.  Santoro glides through
the arena like an animal protecting his turf, DePalma watching him get
anything and anywhere he wants with a strut, an attitude and the flash of
a badge.  There's a kinetic artistry to the scene as DePalma captures the
excitement at the event, the shark-like constant motion of our
protagonist, and the unstable nature of the events about to occur. We
recognize instantly that for every pie in Atlantic City, there's Rick
Santoro with his fingers deeply immersed or doing his best to dip them in.
We also recognize that somewhere in the dizzying scene are the clues to
what will come next.
     What will come next is an investigation of the shoting which often
feels like an afterthought.  The story's arc is clearly designed to lead
Santoro towards a redemptive choice -- cash vs. The Right Thing -- but it
seems to take an awful lot longer than 90 minutes to get there.  And
that's not to say that SNAKE EYES doesn't move.  In fact, DePalma rarely
stops moving, mixing up extended point-of-view sequences with
tautly-edited pursuits, throwing in a drifting overhead pan through a
series of hotel rooms for good measure.  SNAKE EYES has technical
virtuosity and sheer forward momentum to spare.  What's missing is heart,
a reason to care about stringing DePalma's shiny individual baubles
together into cinematic jewelry.
     By the climax, DePalma seems to have lost all focus on making SNAKE
EYES a redemption thriller, hinging a pivotal sequence on a turn of the
weather.  Between that stormy sequence, the extended speeches in which the
villains explain their motivation, and the tagged-on romantic coda, you
may find yourself wondering what the point of it all could be.  Then the
answer comes back:  it was an opportunity for Brian DePalma to film a
20-minute single-take Steadicam shot.  I suppose SNAKE EYES could satisfy
an audience as a display of craftsmanship, but that really defines why so
few of DePalma's films satisfy as stories.  He's not really a film-maker.
He's a scene-maker.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
A PERFECT MURDER
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, Viggo Mortensen, David
Suchet.
Screenplay:  Patrick Smith Kelly, based on the play "Dial M For Murder" by
Frederick Knott.
Producers:  Arnold Kopelson, Anne Kopelson, Christopher Mankiewicz and
Peter MacGregor-Scott.
Director:  Andrew Davis.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You'll be seeing ads for A PERFECT MURDER trumpeting "from the
director of THE FUGITIVE," which should set off a few alarms.  If you're
inclined to do the math, you'll note that THE FUGITIVE came out five years
ago, and you might reasonably wonder what Mr. Davis has been up to in the
interrim.  The answer is two films Warner Bros. is hoping everyone has
long forgotten:  the bloated, laughless caper comedy STEAL BIG, STEAL
LITTLE and the bloated, lifeless action film CHAIN REACTION.  Those films
too were advertised as "from the director of THE FUGITIVE," only the
director of THE FUGITIVE never showed up.  Could Davis finally display the
film-making skill which once held viewers on the edge of their seats, but
seems to have been in hibernation for half a decade?
     I'm pleased to note that Davis directs A PERFECT MURDER with much
more of the style and savvy which characterized THE FUGITIVE.  Too bad the
script is such a mess.  The film is based on Frederick Knott's play "Dial
M for Murder," previously made in 1954 by a fellow named Hitchcock.  This
version casts Michael Douglas as Steven Taylor, a wealthy New York
commodities broker with a lovely young wife named Emily (Gwyneth Paltrow).
Though she's a highly-educated diplomat with the United Nations, Emily is
treated like a trophy by Steven, leading her to seek fulfillment in an
affair with starving artist David Shaw (Viggo Mortensen).  Unfortunately,
Steven learns of the affair, and has the natural husband's reaction of
wanting to kill somebody.  His approach, however, is somewhat unusual:  he
offers David half a million dollars to kill Emily.
     Thus begin the expected twists, turns and double-deals, with the
three main characters regularly exchanging the upper hand.  All three
roles are well-cast and well-played -- Paltrow as the smart but vulnerable
ingenue, Mortensen as the sexy but dangerous "other man," and Douglas as
the calculating, morally shady businessman in the manner he should have a
patent on by now.  Douglas in particular gives the material a welcome
edge, pitching tart dialogue with a superior sneer and making it supremely
satisfying to watch his plans go awry.  Davis' production team, including
production designer Philip Rosenberg and cinematographer Dariusz Wolski,
creates an appropriately gothic atmosphere to complement tautly-directed
individual sequences.  All these elements are crafted by Davis into a
satisfying package likely to keep you intrigued as long as your watching.
     Watch out for the drive home, though, when the whole thing may fall
apart in your head so fast you'll lose sight of the road.  On the one
hand, A PERFECT MURDER contains as many metaphorically unfired guns as any
film in the history of post-Chekhovian drama.  Why doesn't it matter that
Emily is multi-lingual?  Why is one character left conspicuously
wounded-but-not-necessarily-dead, never to appear again?  Why does a
sharp-witted homicide detective (the talented David Suchet, in a magnetic
but under-used performance) play virtually no role in the investigation?
On the other hand, it underlines some of its key plot points so blatantly
(INSERT LINGERING CLOSE-UP OF MEAT THERMOMETER HERE) that it's more than
vaguely insulting, then drops key clues into the narrative from out of
nowhere.  Add to that a story which dumps intellectual gamesmanship for
struggles over a gun, and it's no wonder the film went back before the
cameras for 11th-hour re-shoots of its final scenes.  Writer Patrick Smith
Kelly makes a lot of changes from DIAL M FOR MURDER, but he doesn't make
much sense.
     I suppose it's a credit to how much Davis does right that A PERFECT
MURDER still pushes plenty of the right buttons until the anti-climactic
climax.  If a director is lucky, he gets a good script he can make even
better with stylistic choices.  On other occasions, the best he can do is
apply makeup to all the blemishes.  Between the film's mood and its solid
performances, A PERFECT MURDER is about as strong a film as you can make
from such feeble material.  It may not be redemption for "the director of
THE FUGITIVE," but it sure is a step in the right direction.

Title
Review for Jack Frost (1998)
JACK FROST
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Michael Keaton, Kelly Preston, Joseph Cross, Mark Addy.
Screenplay:  Mark Steven Johnson and Steve Bloom & Jonathan Roberts and
Jeff Cesario.
Producers:  Mark Canton and Irving Azoff.
Director:  Troy Miller.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, mild vulgar innuendo)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     On a snowy Christmas Eve, Jack Frost (Michael Keaton) reaches a
life-changing decision.  A small-time blues musician, Jack consistently
puts attention to his wife Gabby (Kelly Preston) and 11-year-old son 
Charlie (Joseph Cross) on the back burner when a gig or recording session
calls.  It looks like this year will be no different, with Jack dropping
plans for a family holiday when a record company exec schedules a 
Christmas day audition, but before he reaches the audition Jack realizes
what he's missing and turns around to head home.  That's when an icy road
and broken windshield wipers intervene, and Jack is killed in a car
accident.
     At the half-hour mark of the family fantasy JACK FROST, the titular
character has not yet been reborn as a walking, talking snowman a year
after his death thanks to a magic harmonica tune.  He has, however,
already been reborn in the only way that matters dramatically.  Jack
doesn't die as a vaguely selfish flake who needs to learn What Really
Matters; he dies repentant, on his way back home to make things right.
What follows the appearance of Jack-as-snowman is not an experience which
allows Jack to head to eternity with his priorities straight, but a
collection of special effects-enhanced buddy-bonding moments.  It's cute,
yet utterly weightless.
     There are worse things, I suppose, than a harmless bit of family
shmaltz for the holiday season.  Keaton is engaging enough as the
hustling, slightly immature human Jack, goofing with Charlie in a way that
suggests he's more interested in being a playmate than being a father.
There's at least one very lively chase sequence which will charm the young
ones, as well as a welcome paucity of inappropriately sniggering content.
And it's true that the snowman (courtesy Jim Henson's Creature Shop) is a
nifty creation, just the right combination of classic look and human
expressiveness.  There are enough giggles and guffaws in JACK FROST to
make it fun for youngsters without either embarrassing parents or boring
them entirely to sleep.
     What makes it hard to swallow is that it's utterly inconsequential
while pretending to be both hipper and more emotional than it really is.
Self-aware dialogue has the newly-snowy Jack pondering the cosmic purpose
for his state, wondering "Is it the name?  'Cause if it is, that's not
even very clever."  Another scene has Jack shaking his head ironically
when Charlie flips past the animated "Frosty the Snowman" on television.
Yet despite attempts to show that the film is a bit above its cutesy
premise, it's rarely anything more than a syrupy trifle, sentimental
without being resonant (from a story by Mark Steven Johnson, who made the
sentimental, resonance-free SIMON BIRCH).
     One could argue that JACK FROST isn't really about Jack at all, but
about Charlie (a generally understated performance by Joseph Cross), in
need of closure after the loss of a father he barely knew.  Even that take
on the story doesn't give it any added pull, not when the script keeps
adding simplistic touches like a bully who abruptly drops his bullying and
helps Charlie because he too understands what it's like to be without a
dad.  Eventually it's hard to identify any significant story at all as
JACK FROST becomes more derivative and rushed towards its climax, complete
with a final vision of the human Jack so reminiscent of GHOST I expected
"Unchained Melody" to burst out on the soundtrack.  JACK FROST isn't so
much a story as it is a diverting bit of special effects silliness leading
up to a sob cue.  It taught me something important about What Really
Matters in a film script:  a character arc for the protagonist that's not
complete before the first plot point.

Title
Review for Baby's Day Out (1994)
Starring:  Joe Mantegna, Lara Flynn Boyle, Joe Pantoliano, Brian
Haley, Adam & Jacob Worton.
Screenplay:  John Hughes.
Director:  Patrick Read Johnson.
     Just as a little role playing exercise, pretend you're John
Hughes.  The HOME ALONE films have grossed somewhere in the
neighborhood of a gazillion dollars, and you're not convinced that
particular cow has been fully milked.  Unfortunately, Macaulay Culkin
has crossed the line from adorable moppet to gawky adolescent, and last
year's variation on the theme, DENNIS THE MENACE, didn't do well enough
to warrant a sequel.  So what do you do?  Apparently, you write and
produce BABY'S DAY OUT, yet another kiddie-pleaser featuring copious
cartoon mayhem directed at bad guys.  Strangely, though, there is a
modicum of originality present, thanks to imaginative visual effects
and the charmed wanderings of Baby Bink.
     Baby Bink (twins Adam & Jacob Worton) is the 9-month-old son of
the wealthy Cotwells (Lara Flynn Boyle, Matthew Glave), self-
absorbed socialites whose primary concern is getting Bink's picture
in the paper.  To that end they hire a photographer, but the three
men (Joe Mantegna, Joe Pantoliano and Brian Haley) who show up at
the Cotwell mansion have other plans for Bink ... plans that include a
$5 million ransom.  Of course, getting the ransom requires actually
having the baby, and when Bink slips out through a window to explore
New York, the three hapless kidnappers find themselves perpetually
chasing down the little tyke, and racking up a growing injury count in
the process.
     For anyone who has seen either HOME ALONE or its carbon copy
sequel, there is very little new to be found in BABY'S DAY OUT.  Joe
Pesci has been replaced by Joe Mantegna, and Daniel Stern has been
split into Joe Pantoliano and comic Brian Haley.  Mantegna appears
embarrassed much of the time, making his slow burn look like a plea for
sympathy from the audience.  The scenes of the three villains being
thwarted in their attempts to re-acquire Bink are a parade of Wile E.
Coyote routines, most recognizably a shot of Haley dropping from a
great height to produce a small plume of dust; director Patrick Read
Johnson at times seems to cop more liberally from Chuck Jones than from
John Hughes.  Still, there are only so many ways that the male
genitalia can be mangled before intense boredom sets in.  I heard gales
of laughter from kids in my audience at such mid-section humor, but I
think they would have responded the same to a 90 minute loop of kicks
to the groin.
     What is most annoying about films like BABY'S DAY OUT is that they
pretend to have an emotional message.  In one scene, Lara Flynn Boyle
tearfully acknowledges her misplaced priorities when the kidnapped Bink
does appear in the paper, and later comforts Bink's distraught nanny by
admitting that the nanny is probably more of a mother to Bink than
herself.  But BABY'S DAY OUT is no more about good parenting than SPEED
is about traffic safety.  Hughes and Johnson make no attempt to follow
up these token gestures with any closure; it's just typical Hughesian
troweled-on emotion to make the violence more palatable.
     If there is one reason for anyone of driving age to sit through
BABY'S DAY OUT, it is to see the clever special effects which allow
Bink to survive every adventure with nary a smudge of dirt to tell the
tale.  One sequence finds him crawling across a busy street as cars
whiz by in every lane but the one he happens to be in.  Later, he makes
his way through a construction site in Rube Goldberg fashion, sitting
blissfully as tractors roll over him and sliding down girders onto
moving elevators.  These are fun moments, made all the more appealing
by the adorable Wortons as Bink.
     Naturally, Hughes ends BABY'S DAY OUT with a teaser for a sequel.
But enough is enough, John.  The Wortons are probably two by now; that
doesn't mean you can squeeze four more films out of them.

Title
Review for Evening Star, The (1996)
(Paramount/Rysher)
Starring:  Shirley MacLaine, Bill Paxton, Miranda Richardson, Juliette
Lewis, Marion Ross, George Newbern, Mackenzie Astin.
Screenplay:  Robert Harling.
Producers:  David Kirkpatrick, Polly Platt, Keith Samples.
Director:  Robert Harling.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE EVENING STAR has so much good will working for it from the start
that it would have taken an effort to make it a complete catastrophe.
TERMS OF ENDEARMENT was a popular and critical success, and Aurora
Greenway gave Shirley MacLaine a character which re-defined her career.
Screenwriter and director Robert Harling is well-aware of this history,
and his opening credits sequence tries to make the most of it.  Over
pictures of MacLaine, Debra Winger and Jeff Daniels, Michael Gore's
familiar TERMS OF ENDEARMENT theme plays, working that good will like a
boxer works the body to soften up the opponent.  The unintended effect of
these familiar signifiers, however, is to remind you how much more focused
and satisfying a film TERMS was than THE EVENING STAR.
     The sequel (based on Larry McMurtry's sequel to his own original
novel) finds Aurora Greenway fifteen years older and little-changed.  The
same nearly-oppressive love which complicated Aurora's relationship with
her late daughter Emma has similarly complicated her relationships with
the three grandchildren she raised, all of whom are leading less than
perfect lives.  Tommy (George Newbern) is in jail for drug possession;
Teddy (Mackenzie Astin) is an unmarried father driving a tow truck;
Melanie (Juliette Lewis) is determined to run off to Los Angeles with her
aspiring model boyfriend (Scott Wolf).  An unhappy Aurora seeks help in
therapy, where she finds her young counselor Jerry Bruckner (Bill Paxton)
as helpful personally as professionally.  Through various trials and
tragedies, Aurora tries to make sense of her life by organizing photos and
mementos into a scrapbook which -- she hopes -- will explain her place in
the world.
     The key to the success of TERMS OF ENDEARMENT lay in its
pitch-perfect study of a contentious mother-daughter relationship, yet it
is not exactly because Emma is absent that THE EVENING STAR feels less
potent.  That one relationship focused TERMS, however; you knew exactly
what it was really about.  THE EVENING STAR is in desperate need of that
kind of focus.  In addition to Aurora's relationships with each of her
three grandchildren and with her counselor/suitor, the film examines
Aurora's friendship with her long-time maid Rosie (Marion Ross), Rosie's
romance with next-door neighbor Arthur (the late Ben Johnson in his last
role), Aurora's rivalry with wealthy divorcee Patsy Carpenter (Miranda
Richardson), Melanie's relationship with her boyfriend, and Aurora's
strange relationship with a former flame (Donald Moffatt).  Harling throws
a lot of stuff at the screen, and some of it sticks, notably some
exceptional moments for Ross and a few catty exchanges between MacLaine
and Richardson.  Unfortunately, there isn't enough of the stuff that
works, and plenty of down time as Harling searches for a narrative
deserving of Aurora's fire.
     Shirley MacLaine obviously has a blast returning to the role of
Aurora, and that obvious joy is likely to bring an audience with her
farther than the material itself deserves.  Aurora preens deliciously
after she spends the night with Jerry, smiles a venomous smile as she
catches Patsy in a deception, and generally makes overbearing motherhood
her own personal fiefdom; it's just plain fun to spend time with a
character this colorful.  If only MacLaine hadn't made so many of Aurora's
quirks so familiar by taking on a succession of infuriating-but-lovable
roles distinguishable from one another only by the film in which they
appeared -- STEEL MAGNOLIAS, POSTCARDS FROM THE EDGE, GUARDING TESS, MRS.
WINTERBOURNE.  All found MacLaine doing riffs on Aurora with varying
degrees of success, and even a lively performance feels recycled after so
many precursors.  It doesn't feel at all like we have missed over a
decade of Aurora Greenway's life.  We've just been watching her using
aliases.
     The only time THE EVENING STAR hits a pure high note is when Jack
Nicholson makes an all-too-brief cameo as playboy astronaut-turned-family
man Garrett Breedlove (the role for which he won a Best Supporting Actor
Academy Award).  It is one of Nicholson's best and most restrained pieces
of film acting in years; he seems both genuinely pleased to see his old
love, and genuinely unsure about how to interact with her.  There is so
much affection and charm in those few scenes, as all the soap opera plot
developments and histrionics take a breather, that it almost feels like
1983 all over again.  Of course, that is what Robert Harling was going for
all along in THE EVENING STAR, but he only had a couple of pieces of the
puzzle available to him.  A Paul McCartney concert with a token appearance
by Ringo does not a Beatles reunion make, and THE EVENING STAR strives for
a similar appeal it can't hope to achieve.

Title
Review for Cecil B. DeMented (2000)
CECIL B. DEMENTED
(Artisan)
Starring:  Stephen Dorff, Melanie Griffith, Alicia Witt.
Screenplay:  John Waters.
Producers:  John Fiedler, Joe Caracciolo Jr. and Mark Tarlov.
Director:  John Waters.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is something so petulant and defensive about the tone of CECIL
B. DEMENTED that it's almost enough to make you cry for John Waters. Once
upon a time, he _was_ underground cinema. He made the movies he wanted to
make, and damn the sensibilities of anyone else. But times have changed
since Waters' early '70s heyday. Independent film-making came into its
own, and while "mainstream" comedy has grown more gratuitously daring in
recent years, Waters has drifted to the ideological center with
campy-yet-tame movies like CRY-BABY, HAIRSPRAY and SERIAL MOM. In CECIL
B. DEMENTED, Waters seems engaged in a desperate attempt to be recognized
for his edge once again. He'd show us where his sympathies were; he'd give
it to mainstream Hollywood big time.
     This is what it has come to for the man who introduced coprophagy
into the contemporary cinema: crafting a toothless, uninspired satire of
Hollywood, and using Melanie Griffith to do it. Griffith stars as Honey
Whitlock, a raging bitch of an A-list Hollywood actress appearing at a
fund-raiser premiere in Baltimore for her latest mediocrity. At the event,
she's kidnapped by guerrilla director Cecil B. DeMented (Stephen Dorff),
who has big plans for his big star. Along with his cast and crew of
similarly dedicated underground cinema enthusiasts, DeMented plans to make
a film about a frustrated art theater owner declaring war on the
multiplexes and bloated studio films of America. It will be shot in actual
theaters and movie sets, recording actual acts of anti-Hollywood 
terrorism. And Honey Whitlock is going to be the reluctant leading lady.
     Subtlety has never exactly been John Waters' strongest suit as a
film-maker, so it may be unfair to expect anything different from CECIL. 
Nevertheless, it's wearying to sit through a satire that takes such broad,
trite shots at its target. Waters aims for guffaws from such predictable
subjects as the cost of theater concessions, PATCH ADAMS: THE DIRECTOR'S
CUT and unnecessary sequels, then gets even more insider by railing
against fines for film set transgressions. Even when it seems like he's
preparing to let loose with his gloriously bad taste -- a scene in a porn
theater where onanistic patrons appear on the verge of defending Cecil and
company from pursuers with a hail of bodily fluids -- Waters backs off to
something silly and subdued. CECIL's 88 minute, non-stop assault on the
obvious may not include a single honest belly laugh.
     And the sad part is, there are a couple of decent ideas floating
around here. Griffith's Honey isn't really a character -- Waters probably
hasn't written a real character in his life -- but the charge she gets out
of the underground cachet of working with Cecil could have made for some
sharp jabs at other big-time actors who work on low-budget projects. 
Waters also comes up with an insightful line when Cecil notes that there's
nowhere for renegade film-makers to go but to the extreme after Hollywood
has co-opted sex and violence. In neither case does Waters take the idea
anywhere interesting. Griffith's performance is high camp in the grand
Waters tradition, but there's nothing funny or clever about the way her
conversion to Cecil's way of thinking is handled. And for an ambush,
pseudo-snuff production, Cecil's film itself doesn't demonstrate nearly
enough creativity or outrage.
     The way Waters approaches his protagonist and his dream project
ultimately doom CECIL as much as its limp humor. It's certainly clear that
Waters disdains the vapid product shoveled into American theaters, a
sentiment in which he has plenty of company. But it also appears that he
has no concern for whether or not Cecil's film is going to be any good; 
to Waters, the simple act of fighting the movie establishment power is
enough to make him a hero. It may have been true 25 years ago that a film
could be exhilarating just because its creator was daring and thrifty. 
Today, it helps if the film itself is more than an exercise in 
self-indulgence. CECIL B. DEMENTED finds John Waters insisting that his
brand of underground film-making is still the way to go. The bitter irony
is that he's made something just as disposable as PATCH ADAMS: THE
DIRECTOR'S CUT.

Title
Review for Quest for Camelot (1998)
QUEST FOR CAMELOT
(Warner Bros.)
Voices:  Jessalyn Gilsig, Cary Elwes, Gary Oldman, Eric Idle, Don Rickles,
Pierce Brosnan.
Screenplay:  Kirk DiMicco and William Schifrin, based on "The King's
Damosel" by Vera Chapman.
Producers:  Dalisa Cooper Cohen, Frank Gladstone.
Director:  Frederik DuChau.
MPAA Rating:  G (some scary action)
Running Time:  80 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are plenty of good reasons why I try to write reviews as soon
as possible after seeing a film.  Some are purely practical, like the
deadlines that stack up one against the other as Friday release-date
approaches; some are philosophical, like the desire not to be influenced
by any other opinions I might hear.  QUEST FOR CAMELOT has provided me
with yet another reason, perhaps the best yet -- when you're dealing with
a film as hopelessly bland as this one, you'll be lucky if you can
remember a single detail 48 hours later.
     Thank heaven for press notes, without which I might not recall that
QUEST FOR CAMELOT is the story of Kayley (Jessalyn Gilsig), a
strong-willed young woman in the time of King Arthur.  It seems that a
cruel and ambitious knight named Sir Ruber (Gary Oldman) has stolen
Excalibur from Arthur (Pierce Brosnan), then promptly lost the magical
sword in a dark and dangerous forest.  In an attempt to prove herself
worthy of knighthood and to help save her kidnapped mother (Jane Seymour),
Kayley ventures into the forest alone, where she eventually joins up with
a blind young man named Garrett (Cary Elwes) and a two-headed dragon named
Devon (Eric Idle) and Cornwall (Don Rickles).  Together they must battle
the dangers of the forest, find Excalibur, defeat Ruber, restore order to
the kingdom, blah blah blah.
     And I do mean "blah."  QUEST FOR CAMELOT is one of the most
ennervated animated films in recent memory, a lifeless conglomeration of
elements each more instantly forgettable than the last.  Visually, it
offers uninspired settings and lackluster character design until the
appearance of a nifty computer-generated ogre.  The comic relief isn't
much of a relief at all, serving up a volley of pop culture pot shots
(TAXI DRIVER, DIRTY HARRY, FRIDAY THE 13TH, SUPERMAN), banal bickering
between the dragon's two heads and cringe-inducing voice casting like
Bronson Pinchot and Jaleel White.  Of course we also need to have songs,
which means a truly awful bunch of David Foster/Carol Bayer Sager
compositions alternating between middle-of-the-road piffle and soporific
show-stoppers.  Director Frederik DuChau can't even manage to get his
voice talent to sound vaguely enthusiastic; Brosnan reads the legendary
King of the Britons as though he needs a Prozac far more than he needs
Excalibur.
     QUEST FOR CAMELOT's story seems well-intentioned enough, empowering
its misfit heroes despite the various obstacles to success they face.
Unfortunately, that's about all the story offers.  The film moves with a
deadening listlessness, as DuChau bungles the few genuine bits of action
with bizarre decisions like scoring a tense chase scene to the big love
ballad.  The choice of Elwes as the voice of Kayley's guide through the
forest proves to be a huge mistake, reminding viewers familiar with THE
PRINCESS BRIDE of Westley's infinitely more engaging romantic adventures
through the Fire Swamp with Buttercup.  Eventually, the failure of the
rest of the story makes even the empowerment message annoying, playing
like an anachronistic scolding of the Round Table for including only
fully-abled white male humans.  
     As I vainly searched for something to hold my attention, I kept
noticing the children in the theater wandering up and down the aisles, or
engaged in conversations far more lively than anything on the screen.  I
can't imagine why a parent would subject their children to being bored
silly by a film like QUEST FOR CAMELOT, especially when adults will 
probably be bored even sillier.  Then again, I suppose there would be a
bright side:  two days later, they'll never even remember what they had to
sit through.

Title
Review for Speed (1994)
     Since the dawn of time, three Great Questions have defied the
greatest minds:  Is there a God?  Is there existence after death?  And
how does Keanu Reeves continue to get work as an actor?  All right,
that might be a slight exaggeration; I have some ideas about that life
after death thing.  Reeves remains a mystery, a physically striking but
mush-mouthed thespian who has been cast by Coppola, Bertolucci and
Branagh.  A post-BILL AND TED star-making vehicle has eluded him,
however--until now.  Arriving with more buzz than a swarm of killer
bees is SPEED, and you can believe the hype.  Thrilling and relentless
to a fault, SPEED seems destined to score big box office and make
Reeves a very hot property.
     Reeves plays Jack Traven, a risk-taking member of the L.A.P.D.'s
anti-terrorist unit.  In the film's sensational prologue, Jack and his
partner (Jeff Daniels) foil a bomber (Dennis Hopper) holding an
elevator full of people hostage.  Jack thinks the bomber is dead, but
he returns, still seeking his $3.7 million but now with a score to
settle as well.  The bomber tells Jack that a city bus has been rigged
to blow if it drops below 50 miles per hour, and that any attempt to
evacuate the passengers will also lead to the destruction of the bus.
Jack manages to get on board the bus, searching for a way to defuse the
bomb and helping the passenger (Sandra Bullock) who has taken over for
the incapacitated bus driver to keep them all alive and speeding.
     As high concepts go, SPEED would have been difficult to screw up
completely.  Where I had my doubts was regarding the ability to keep
things varied and interesting; there are only so many ways a bus can
crash through guardrails and other cars.  But astonishingly, SPEED
continues to come up with new and interesting predicaments just when
you think there can't be anywhere else for it to go.  Screenwriter
Graham Yost and director Jan DeBont almost give themselves too tough an
act to follow by opening with the elevator rescue, a stunningly staged
sequence that will leave you breathless before you're even out of
popcorn.  Once the action hits the road, the set pieces come fast,
furious and rarely derivative.  The location moves from crowded
freeways to open spaces, each new environment providing new
challenges.  There is even that rarity of rarities, a moment that
inspires a collective audible gasp, followed closely by relieved
laughter.  The term "edge of your seat" is thrown around a lot, but
that is exactly where I spent the majority of SPEED's two hour running
time.
     Still, there is the Keanu question, and the fortunate answer is
that Jack Traven is the perfect role for Reeves.  He is asked to do
little more than set his jaw and look good in a tight T-shirt, and he's
good at both.  The taciturn Traven is a switch from the Willis/
Schwarzenegger school of one-liner heroism, and something of a welcome
one at that.  With Reeves maintaining a poker face, the required
tension release falls to the supporting cast.  Sandra Bullock, so
annoying as Stallone's partner in DEMOLITION MAN, is extremely
appealing as driver/passenger Annie, managing to combine strength and
emotion in a surprisingly seamless performance.  Dennis Hopper as a
psycho killer is no stretch, but he plays it with panache, and Alan
Ruck (best known as FERRIS BUELLER's buddy Cameron) has a couple of
good moments as a tourist on the bus.  The performances are better than
one might expect from a film like SPEED, and from Keanu Reeves in
particular.
     If there is a fault to be found with SPEED, it's that it really
doesn't know when enough is enough.  The bus's physics defying leap
over a stretch of incomplete freeway is more comically absurd than
exciting, and almost lost me.  Once the bus-based plot is over, there's
still another fifteen minutes to go, and perhaps out of some sense of
houw an action film has to end there is a mano-a-mano between Reeves
and Hopper aboard a commuter train.  At that point, yet another set of
improbable crises becomes overkill.  And ironically, it may have
eliminated one possible plot for the sequel.  Don't be surprised if
there is one; SPEED is 1994's THE FUGITIVE, and then some.

Title
Review for Lon (1994)
Starring:  Jean Reno, Natalie Portman, Gary Oldman, Danny Aiello.
Screenplay/Director:  Luc Besson.
     I wonder if budget is at all a criterion for whether or not a
movie can be considered an exploitation flick.  Take THE PROFESSIONAL,
for example.  It boasts extremely glossy cinematography, a couple of
recognizable name actors, and a couple of fairly impressive
explosions.  It's also basically about violence and cheap titilation,
and features a central relationship between a middle-aged man and a
twelve-year-old girl with a decidedly ambiguous sexual dimension.  THE
PROFESSIONAL is all over the map, and its pretensions of being about
anything more than its most unpleasant elements simply make it all the
more unpleasant.
     THE PROFESSIONAL of the title is a New York hit man named Leon
(Jean Reno), brutally efficient but also very isolated.  One day he is
forced to let someone into his life when a girl from his apartment
building knocks on his door.  Her name is Matilda (Natalie Portman),
and the rest of her family has just been killed by crooked and very
wired D.E.A. agent Norman Stansfield (Gary Oldman) after Matilda's
father tried to rip him off.  Leon reluctantly takes Matilda in, then
begins to teach her his profession when she says that she wants to
avenge the murder of her young brother.  The two become closer, which
makes them all the more vulnerable when Stansfield learns that they
know too much, and sets out to eliminate them both.
     Writer/director Luc Besson has gone this route before with his
popular French import LA FEMME NIKITA, a slick potboiler about a female
assassin.  There is no question that Besson can make a great *looking*
film; with the assistance of cinematographer Thierry Arbogast, he has
created a film chock full of moody close-ups and evocative lighting.
But beneath the shiny wrapper, there isn't nearly as much going on as
Besson would like us to believe.  The relationship between Leon and
Matilda never clicks because neither one is given a character to
develop.  Leon is mostly a collection of quirky traits, all intended to
show us that for a hired killer, he's really not so bad a guy:  he
drinks lots of milk, takes meticulous care of a potted plant, and
enjoys Gene Kelly movies.  Jean Reno succeeds at giving Leon a haunted
and desperate quality, but he never makes an emotional connection to
Matilda.  Natalie Portman is all wrong for a part that called for a
much grittier quality, but she doesn't have too much to work with,
either.
     Besson would have been better served spending more time trying to
bring his characters to life, and less on feeble attempts at humor
which are often embarrassing.  A silly game between Leon and Matilda
involving celebrity impersonations is completely out of place, as is a
scene where Matilda shocks a hotel manager by announcing that Leon is
her lover; character is thoroughly sacrificed for a cheap gag.  Gary
Oldman's entire part is something of a cheap gag, wild-eyed and way
over the top, but at least he is interesting to watch.  There isn't a
real person to be found anywhere in THE PROFESSIONAL, which isn't
always a problem in an action thriller, except that this one is trying
to pass itself off as something more.
     A more disconcerting problem with THE PROFESSIONAL is that it
plays around with the sexuality of a twelve-year-old in a really
distasteful way.  There were only two real choices for dealing with
that component of Leon and Matilda's relationship:  confront it head
on, or ignore it entirely.  But Besson flirts and teases the audience
with the idea that he's going to show them a forbidden love story,
while choosing simply to focus his camera on Portman's rear end and
dress her in skimpy clothing.  This is to say nothing of the
questionable decision to make it look like quality paternal time when
Leon is teaching a child to load a 9mm pistol, or the blood which is
spilled aplenty.  A great deal of the time, THE PROFESSIONAL is just
plain sleazy, and all the soft filters in the world can't disguise that
fact.

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY 
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Woody Allen, Hazelle Goodman, Bob Balaban, Kirstie Alley, Judy
Davis, Elisabeth Shue, Billy Crystal.
Screenplay:  Woody Allen.
Producer:  Jean Doumanian.
Director:  Woody Allen.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Woody Allen spends 95 minutes blurring the lines between life and art
in DECONSTRUCTING HARRY.  Allen plays Harry Block, a loathsome little worm
of a successful writer who turns his misery and philandering into the
subjects for his stories.  Understandably, this becomes a sore point for
the ex-wives and ex-lovers who populate his work as thinly-disguised
analogs; it's bad enough dealing with harry in real life without being
subjected to further indignities in fictional form.  Throughout the film,
we get a chance to see Harry's autobiographical tales brought to life,
with different actors playing the roles of various individuals in his life
-- Julia Louis-Dreyfuss as one-time lover Judy Davis, Demi Moore as second
wife Kirstie Alley, and so on.
     It's a fairly successful conceit, one which allows Allen to take off
on some extremely funny flights of fancy.  Robin Williams has a neat cameo
as an actor having trouble getting focused (literally), while an elevator
trip to hell becomes an opportunity to tear into occupations worthy of a
special place among the damned ("the media," "lawyers who appear on
television").  Allen has plenty of fun with the narrative device, but that
same device also points out one major casting problem in DECONSTRUCTING
HARRY:  with all the surrogate role-playing going on, Allen should have
found someone else to play Harry Block.
     In part, it's because the levels of self-referentiality become
wearying.  Allen is playing himself in a semi-autobiographical story about
a writer who writes semi-autobiographical stories in which he sometimes
plays himself, and so on to infinity like some double-mirror effect.  More
to the point, Allen isn't deft enough as an actor -- or ego-less enough as
a director -- to make Harry truly repugnant.  In order for us to take
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY seriously as Allen's acknowledgement that art does
not forgive all, Harry needs to be more than a pathetic little nebbish.
Another actor might have given Harry's misogynistic rantings and
rationalizations genuine bite; Allen's desperate need to be accepted and
understood bathes his every moment on screen in apologetic blandness.
     Of course, it's just as easy to read DECONSTRUCTING HARRY as Allen's
argument that art _does_ forgive all.  And in some ways, the film is its
own best argument, teasing the audience with goofy entertainment whenever
it's not making half-hearted attempts to dig into Harry's psyche.  Perhaps
it does matter to some viewers whether or not allen is a horrible human
being with a morally reprehensible personal life.  Me, I'll settle for
being treated to a bunch of laughs once a year.  Unfortunately, Allen has
been spending most of the last several years using his films as feature
length p.r. announcements for himself.  DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is as
effective in its comedy as it is distracting in its self-absorption,
blurring the line between life and art just enough to make you wish Allen
could blur it a bit more.

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
     Movie people love making movies about movie people -- they validate
film-making as the most fascinating of all pursuits, even as they allow
Tinseltown to tweak its own inflated image.  It's a wonderful mystery of
the film industry that so much self-absorption and self-loathing can
co-exist without some sort of matter/anti-matter explosion.  Too often,
though, the tweak doesn't take.  Steven Seagal playing himself in MY GIANT
was unconvincing as a pompous, difficult star playing a pompous, difficult
star; BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN was as brainless and misguided as the films it
intended to satirize.  For every THE PLAYER, there are half a dozen
attempts at insider humor too self-congratulatory to tap into what's truly
goofy about Hollywood.
     Steve Martin is one of the guys who gets it, and in BOWFINGER he
finds an unlikely partner in Eddie Murphy.  Martin plays Bobby Bowfinger,
a never-was producer convinced that he's finally found a project that will
launch him into the big time.  The science-fiction/action project needs
only one thing to guarantee studio support:  the participation of Kit
Ramsey (Murphy), action star extraordinaire.  Ramsey has no interest in
the project, but Bowfinger has a creative solution.  He plans to send his
cast and crew wherever Ramsey happens to be, throwing him into the film
without his knowledge.  Little does Bowfinger know that the strange things
happening around Kit are sending the already-edgy celebrity into a
full-fledged paranoia.
     Martin, who also wrote the script, has previously demonstrated his
fondness for skewering Los Angeles (L.A. STORY) and classic cinema (DEAD
MEN DON'T WEAR PLAID); he even played a soulless studio suit himself in
GRAND CANYON.  The key is that he knows how to do it with affection,
finding the absurdity in film culture and conventions while still
recognizing their magical appeal.  In a sense, BOWFINGER is a broad,
contemporary re-working of ED WOOD, the story of a guy so determined to
make his mark that he'll go to bizarre lengths to do it.  Martin the actor
lets go of his recent flustered Everyman persona to find a guy willing to
look ridiculous to be a player.  Martin the writer, meanwhile, takes broad
aim at every possible industry target -- producers with short attention
spans, action films, the casting couch, Scientology (thinly disguised as
an organization called Mindhead), even former girlfriend Anne Heche.
While some of the barbs are caustic, they all come back to a group of
people trying to make magic ... even if the magic is an alien adventure
called "Chubby Rain."
     The scattershot approach to Hollywood satire should have fallen flat,
and on occasion it does feel somewhat forced.  Director Frank Oz certainly
deserves some credit for his deft touch, but the real anchor of BOWFINGER
is Eddie Murphy.  Unlike Seagal, Murphy appears genuinely willing to poke
fun at his history as holy terror.  His Kit Ramsey is a borderline
psychotic, surrounded by yes-men who validate his demented conspiracy
theories and a Mindhead guru (Terrence Stamp) who gets rich off of them.
It's a wild, wired performance, complemented by his second role as Jiff,
the geeky Kit Ramsey look-alike Bowfinger hires as a stand-in.  Jiff not
only lets Murphy subtly satirize his fondness for playing multiple roles;
he provides a sympathetic face for an innocent's sense of wonder at the
world of the movies.  Murphy should always be this loose and entertaining.
     BOWFINGER isn't a perfect comedy, at times pushing its thin premise
farther than it can sustain.  Heather Graham's secretly Machiavellian
ingenue grows a bit tiresome, and the Mindhead gags often feel timid and
blunted.  When the set pieces work, however -- Jiff's terrified journey
across a freeway, or an attempt to spook Kit in a parking garage, or
gathering a "crew" at the Mexican border -- they're wonderfully funny
stuff.  It's also a movie about movies that doesn't get caught up in its
own hipness.  When Steve Martin wants you to laugh at something about
Hollywood, you know it's out of authentic whimsy, not a movie star's
hypocritical attempt to cozy up to the laypeople.  As a result, BOWFINGER
feels relaxed and honest, a satire with enough wisdom to recognize there's
still something delightful about being a film-maker.

Title
Review for City Slickers II: The Legend of Curly's Gold (1994)
Starring:  Billy Crystal, Daniel Stern, Jon Lovitz, Jack Palance.
Screenplay:  Billy Crystal and Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel.
Director:  Paul Weiland.
     It's a hard life being a sequel.  It must be something like being
the younger sibling of someone incredibly successful: the self-imposed
pressure to deal with the mystique of the predecessor; inevitable and
unforgiving comparisons; some level or another of disappointment.  We,
as viewers and critics alike, have tremendous difficulty separating the
Roman numeral from the name that precedes it, even when the sequel
might be a perfectly decent film in its own right.  CITY SLICKERS was a
lively, funny film with a dose of warm fuzziness; CITY SLICKERS 2: THE
LEGEND OF CURLY'S GOLD is less lively, less funny and a bit more
heavy-handed in its emotion.  For all that, it's still got more laughs
than any other comedy out right now, and a dose of high-spirited action
besides.
     One year after the events in CITY SLICKERS, Mitch Robbins (Billy
Crystal) is riding high.  He's now station manager at his radio
station, has provided a job for best friend Phil (Daniel Stern), and is
looking forward to a happy 40th birthday.  However, a few surprises are
in store.  One is the arrival of Mitch's ne'er-do-well brother Glen
(Jon Lovitz); another is the discovery of what appears to be a treasure
map in the lining of the Stetson left by deceased trail boss Curly
(Jack Palance).  Then there is Mitch's belief that he is being followed
by Curly's ghost.  When the map proves to be legitimate, Mitch, Phil
and Glen hit the trail to find $20 million in gold bars.  Along the way
they are joined by Curly's twin brother Duke (also Palance), and face a
variety of obstacles on their quest for the gold.
     CITY SLICKERS 2 faces a couple of problems from the get-go.  One
is that avarice isn't nearly as endearing a motivation as
self-discovery.  The Mitch Robbins of the original was in search of his
smile; this time around he is in search of money.  There is a lack of
depth to much of the humor as a result, and even the fraternal conflict
between Mitch and Glen can't pick up the slack.  The other problem is
that director Paul Weiland (whose only previous feature was the
legendary Bill Cosby debacle LEONARD PART 6) doesn't seem capable of
keeping his actors in the service of the story.  He indulges Billy
Crystal's worst tendencies toward hamming it up with Borscht belt
shtick, and Daniel Stern goes bug-eyed at the slightest provocation.
There was an irony and a light touch to Ron Underwood's direction of
the original, a touch Weiland doesn't seem to have.
     However, CITY SLICKERS 2 is consciously a very different kind of
film than its predecessor.  It's a big, broad, silly adventure and on
that level it succeeds.  The New York prologue is overlong (and
includes a pointedly anachronistic shot of the "Late Show" marquis on
the Ed Sullivan Theater when the film is set in 1992), but once the
slickers hit the trail the fun begins in earnest.  Jack Palance is
again a delightful presence, amd makes Duke a bit nastier yet also more
accessible than the crusty Curly.  No one plays a sadsack quite like
Lovitz, who outshines his co-stars with his oddball inferiority complex
and impromptu renderings of soliloquies from the GODFATHER films.  The
action sequences, while a bit too familiar, are still well-staged, and
the script by Crystal and CITY SLICKERS veterans Lowell Ganz and
Babaloo Mandel is full of funny lines.  They may not always add up to a
huge payoff, but they keep coming and there aren't many duds.
     CITY SLICKERS 2 centers its character growth on the value of
friends and family, but most of the time the emotion seems forced.
Ganz and Mandel seem to require a saccharine center to their comedic
confections, and the result is an even greater likelihood of an
unfavorable comparison to CITY SLICKERS.  Had Crystal insisted on a
pure romp, he might have scored big.  As it stands, CITY SLICKERS 2:
THE LEGEND OF CURLY'S GOLD is a sunny, funny comedy at least as
worthwhile as comedy/Western competitor MAVERICK ... and right now,
that might be the more valuable comparison.

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
THE OPPOSITE OF SEX
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Christina Ricci, Martin Donovan, Lisa Kudrow, Ivan Sergei, Lyle
Lovett, Johnny Galecki, William Scott Lee.
Screenplay:  Don Roos.
Producers:  David Kirkpatrick and Michael Besman.
Director:  Don Roos.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE OPPOSITE OF SEX may actually be too limiting a title for
screenwriter Don Roos' tart-tongued directorial debut.  After winding its
way through relationship comedy, road picture grit and a dozen genre stops 
in between, it turns out to be the opposite of nearly everything it first
appears to be, including:
     1) The opposite of sincerely-narrated coming-of-age drama.  Long-time
readers know of my disdain for voice-over narration as a substitute for
effective film storytelling.  THE OPPOSITE OF SEX opens with a warning
from Dedee Truitt (Christina Ricci), the 16-year-old vixen at the center
of the story:  "If you're one of those people who don't like movies where
some person you can't see talks the whole time and covers up the holes in
the plot...then you're out of luck."  Like most of Dedee's comments, that
one isn't particularly trustworthy.  The narration provides crucial and
often hilarious peeks into the troubled character, who runs away from home
to stay with her gay half-brother Bill (Martin Donovan), then proceeds to
seduce his lover Matt (Ivan Sergei), steal $10,000 of his money and hit
the road again with Matt in tow.  Roos turns Dedee's bitchy,
politically-incorrect narration into an effective tool for understanding
characters and subverting expectations, enough to make me soften my
absolutist anti-narration stance.  That's not to say that the film is all
about caustic indifference.  In fact, it's...
     2) The opposite of cynical.  Roos has little interest in wallowing in
indie-pic nihilism.  Despite the multitude of quirky touches, THE OPPOSITE
OF SEX is a surprisingly human story of people for whom sex is either
frightening, or manipulative, or a substitute for something more
substantial.  Ricci plays deftly both with and against Dedee's bile-filled
dialogue, giving her a sympathetic edge as she journeys towards some
measure of maturity.  Even better is Lisa Kudrow, cast brilliantly against
type as Lucia, the deeply-repressed sister of Bill's deceased lover.
Playing a character so profoundly disappointed by life that everything and
everyone similarly disappoints her, she moves and speaks like a
perpetually constricted sphincter muscle.  It's a brutally funny and quite
touching performance, one of the year's best.  It also makes it clear that
THE OPPOSITE OF SEX is...
     3) The opposite of a "guy movie."  Photos of a scantily-clad Ricci on
the promotional posters notwithstanding, THE OPPOSITE OF SEX is only
moderately successful at getting inside the male head.  For some reason,
Roos (SINGLE WHITE FEMALE, BOYS ON THE SIDE) has generally written much
more compelling female characters than male characters through his career.
That's true again here, where Ricci and Kudrow steal the show from their
male co-stars in less-developed roles.  Erstwhile "Roseanne" co-star
Johnny Galecki, as a body-pierced, mincing youth infatuated with Matt, is
less a character than gay comic relief; William Scott Lee offers yet
another Christian character who's ignorant and violent.  Even Lyle Lovett,
as the gentle sheriff with a crush on Lucia, is given too little shading
for the important role he ultimately plays.  Only Martin Donovan, always
adept at fleshing out minimalist characterizations with piercing glances,
emerges fully-formed.  Roos covers up several weaknesses with his sharp
dialogue, but he can't hide the sketchy male roles, nor the fact that THE
OPPOSITE OF SEX is...
    4) The opposite of flashy independent film-making.  Every once in a
while, Roos gets overtly cinematic on us -- a slow pan after a gunshot is
heard, a sentimental montage of Bill after Matt leaves.  Otherwise, THE
OPPOSITE OF SEX might as well be a stage play, a collection of static
medium compositions of characters in conversation.  Fortunately, those
conversations are full of quotable lines and keen insights into the way we
use and abuse sex, and vice-versa.  Don't expect dumb comedy, gratuitous
titillation or cheap sentimentality from THE OPPOSITE OF SEX.  You're
going to get the opposite of all that.

Title
Review for Trick (1999)
     TRICK is one of those rare gay romantic comedies that passes the
"straight test."  As films with gay themes became more prevalent in recent
years, they began to blur together.  Filmmakers appeared to think that the
mere act of putting a same-sex couple on the screen made the film
praise-worthy, often failing to introduce much that was entertaining on
its own merits.  Thus was born my "straight test," which allowed for a
fairly quick barometer of quality: would anyone pay the slightest
attention to the same story if the two principal characters were a man and
a woman?
     Jim Fall's bright, fun, frisky comedy not only passes the "straight
test," it makes plenty of straight romantic comedies look positively inept
by comparison.  Christian Campbell stars as Gabriel, an aspiring
musical-comedy composer who spends his days working temp jobs and his
nights feeding the ego of his best girlfriend/aspiring singer Katherine
(Tori Spelling).  That doesn't leave much time to find love, let alone a
one-night stand, until a trip to a bar introduces Gabriel to Mark (J. P.
Pitoc), a sexy go-go dancer.  They make plans for a night of simple sex,
but plans go awry when every opportunity to be alone is thwarted.  As the
evening progresses, and Gabriel and Mark get better acquainted, simple sex
begins to seem less interesting -- though also less complicated -- than
the prospect of a more serious relationship.
     TRICK's single-day structure may be something of a trick in itself,
yet there's rarely a moment when Jason Schafer's screenplay feels forced
or contrived.  Sure, it falls back on humor from drag queens and cabaret
performances.  Both devices also happen to produce two of TRICK's funniest
scenes:  a Spanish-language ode to the singer's male member, and advice
from a man made up to bear a startling resemblance to one of the cast
members.  In fact, as pure comedy, TRICK rarely stumbles.  Every character
gets wonderful moments, sparked by the kind of dialogue Woody Allen used
to produce in his prime.  Even Tori Spelling -- yes, I said Tori Spelling
-- is a revelation as the blissfully self-absorbed Katherine, particularly
throwing her "talents" behind a performance of Gabriel's composition
"Enter You."  When a director can turn Spelling into a gifted comic
actress, you know he's a talent to watch for.
     I suppose the reason TRICK is even more appealing than its laugh
value is that it does more with a gay relationship than any film I can
remember.  That's probably because it isn't _just_ about a gay
relationship.  The adorably dimpled Christian Campbell (brother of
SCREAM's Neve) makes for an appealing protagonist because he's so
recognizably human in his relationship anxieties.  The developing
relationshp between Gabriel and Mark works the way all good romantic
relationships work, exploring the way people discover surprisingly
wonderful things about each other when they least expect it.  The fact
that the relationship develops in the midst of such entertaining comedy is
a delightful bonus.  The obstacles thrown in their way do begin to feel a
bit contrived, but you may be having too much fun to notice.  TRICK is so
effortlessly charming, I may just change the name of the "straight test"
to the "TRICK test."

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
HIGH FIDELITY
(Touchstone)
Starring:  John Cusack, Iben Hjejle, Todd Louiso, Jack Black, Lisa Bonet,
Catherine Zeta-Jones, Joan Cusack, Tim Robbins, Lili Taylor.
Screenplay:  D.V. DeVincentis & Steve Pink & John Cusack and Scott
Rosenberg, based on the novel by Nick Hornby.
Producers:  Tim Bevan and Rudd Simmons.
Director:  Stephen Frears.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At first glance, there's every reason to believe John Cusack is the
ideal cast for Rob Gordon, the protagonist of HIGH FIDELITY. A single,
likeable, somewhat directionless guy in his early 30s, Rob spends his days
hawking the archaic music format of vinyl in his shop Championship Vinyl,
then spends his nights obsessing over his failed relationships. Throughout
HIGH FIDELITY, Rob narrates his story directly to the audience, describing
his troubles with his soon-to-be-latest-ex Laura (Iben Hjejle) and Laura's
place in his catalog of break-up stories. Few actors could pull off the
amount of narration required of Rob without becoming instantly annoying; 
even fewer could make self-absorption somewhat sympathetic. 
     So why does Cusack seem ever-so-slightly wrong in a role that should
be so right? It's not the sharp comic setting crafted by director Stephen
Frears and a team of four writers (adapting Nick Hornby's novel). That
setting finds Rob and his co-workers Barry (Jack Black) and Dick (Todd
Louiso) holding court in Championship Vinyl, mocking customers for their
lack of musical acumen and exchanging Top Five lists of best songs in
detailed categories (e.g., Top Five Side-One, Song-One Tracks). Cusack is
fine as the saner center, but his co-stars are superb. Black's Barry is an
aggressive, abrasive pedant who delights in the power of dispensing arcana
or withholding a rare record; Louiso's Dick is a portrait in awed fan-geek
deference. When the Championship crew is rattling off obscure band
influences or rattling customers with their disdain, HIGH FIDELITY finds
its highest energy.
     It's not the focus on Rob's relationship history, either. Rob
recounts his woman woes in search of a pattern to his failed love affairs,
allowing for some great moments of comic humiliation (and a couple of
priceless fantasy sequences). It also allows for a parade of familiar
faces in extended cameos: Tim Robbins as Laura's other man; Lili Taylor as
one needy ex; Catherine Zeta-Jones as another, more intimidating ex; even
Bruce Springsteen pops up to offer advice. The gimmicky casting is
occasionally distracting, but not so much so that it overwhelms the
strengths of the individual episodes. There's even some charming wisdom in
HIGH FIDELITY's acknowledgement that middle school make-out sessions can
stay with you for life, or that a skillfully made mix tape can speak from
the heart.
     No, the one key problem with an otherwise thoroughly entertaining
film is that Cusack's screen persona is just too ... nice. Rob is a
somewhat unreliable narrator, since it is gradually revealed that he's
caused just as much emotional damage as has been done to him. One breakup
inspired by his own sexual frustration has morphed in his mind into the
woman's fault; he acknowledges having cheated on Laura while they were
together; he sleeps with a singer (Lisa Bonet) even as he's fuming over
Laura's involvement with another man while they're separated. Combine his
romantic irresponsibility with his musical snobbery, and you've got a
character that should be played with more jerkish, immature edge. With
Cusack, the nice guy is too dominant. Rob's confessions -- which should
have played as calculated attempts to win us to his side -- feel more like
guileless soul-baring coming from Cusack's mouth. And they never quite
feel right.
     In the end, Rob learns some valuable lessons and starts to grow up a
little. It's only then that you can feel enthusiastic about wishing for
Rob's happiness. HIGH FIDELITY's sharp wit could have made up for a
multitude of sins, when in fact it only has to make up for one; there's
more than enough quality film-making to weigh in the film's favor. There's
also that nagging realiation that Rob's not the good-natured hero we all
want him to be when John Cusack is playing the part. Cusack has proven
himself to be a talented, versatile actor, but there's a guy we've come to
know and love in off-beat romantic comedies like THE SURE THING, SAY
ANYTHING and GROSSE POINTE BLANK, and it's hard not to listen to  Cusack
reveal personal traumas without expecting that guy. Even when HIGH 
FIDELITY is at its most inspired, you can tell that Rob Gordon isn't that
guy.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
     For what it's worth, I correctly guessed the identity of the killer
in SCREAM 2...well, sort of.  I suppose I should feel satisfied at my own
cleverness, since Dimension and the makers of SCREAM 2 have put so much
effort into keeping that piece of information secret.  Even more so than
in the original SCREAM, writer Kevin Williamson goes to ridiculous
extremes to keep the audience guessing whodunnit, so ridiculous that the
film becomes too focused on the one thing which should have been least
important.  As a horror film, it's a solid piece of work; as a satire,
it's frequently hilarious.  As a mystery, it tries way, way, _way_ too
hard.
     SCREAM 2 takes place two years after the events of the original, just
in time for Hollywood to cash in on the Woodsboro High murders.  The
non-fiction book by reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has become a
popular horror film called "Stab," which in turn appears to have generated
a copycat killer.  When two college students turn up dead at the film's
premiere, Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) once again begins to fear for
her life.  Other Woodsboro survivors like Dewey Riley (David Arquette) and
video-store-clerk-turned-film-student Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) offer
support, but bodies continue to turn up at an alarming rate.  Who could
the killer be?  Sidney's boyfriend Derek (Jerry O'Connell)?  Cotton Weary
(Liev Schreiber), the man Sidney once wrongly accused of murder?  Gale's
cameraman Joel (Duane Martin)?  Film student Mickey (Timothy Olyphant)?
Reporter Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf)?   Gale?  Dewey?  Randy?  Jermaine?
Marlon?  Tito?
     If you can keep the suspects straight without a press kit, more power
to you.  Williamson often seems so concerned with turning every live body
in sight into a potential suspect that he lets that question overwhelm
everything else.  When the characters aren't busy trying to survive the
night, they're either sitting around trying to figure out who the killer
is or _running_ around trying to figure out who the killer is.  It all
builds to a revelatory climax drawn out so long past the point of
diminishing returns -- loaded with confessions, motives and false finishes
-- that you can't even see the point of diminishing returns from there.
     I'm being a bit harder on SCREAM 2 than it might deserve, because
that one big problem may be the only real problem.  Williamson's satirical
darts are expertly targeted, not just at horror film cliches or the
"inevitable inferiority" of sequels, but at the original film itself.  The
film-within-a-film "Stab" provides a few wonderful moments, as do the
audience reactions to some of the more improbable situations (e.g. "Hang
up the phone and Star-69 his a**").  The dialogue is sharp, smart and not
at all afraid of naming names (Cox's "Friends" co-stars David Schwimmer
and Jennifer Aniston are among those skewered), a perfect counter-point to
Wes Craven's crafty suspense scenes.  If you're not ready to crawl out of
your skin when Campbell crawls across the unconscious form of her
tormentor, it's time for a pulse check.
     SCREAM 2 is so entertaining both as a chiller and as a chuckler that
the lack of attention to those elements is a frustration.  Kevin
Williamson is carving out a new genre for himself which certainly seems to
be finding an audience -- both SCREAMs and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
take off with the radical notion that umasking the monster is a good idea.
There's just something deflating about a tense, comic horror film that
turns into a Scooby-Doo episode.  Williamson has too much talent as a
writer of comedy to keep getting side-tracked by conventions, even if
they're conventions he's helping to re-create.  Scare us or make us
laugh...we know you can do both.  Just keep the Mystery Machine parked at
the curb.

Title
Review for Cops and Robbersons (1994)
     All right, I'll admit it:  I'm guilty of a bias towards writers.
Perhaps it's the part of me that identifies with them, or the romantic
image of a guy alone in a room staring down a blank sheet of paper in a
battered manual Smith-Corona until the paper blinks first.  The fact is
that when I feel a project has gone sour, the writer is frequently the
last target of my wrath, and the first one to get the benefit of the
doubt.  Not this time.  I can't think of a director alive who could
have done anything with COPS & ROBBERSONS, or an actor who could have
made it watchabel.  To call this script inept would be to give it more
credit than it deserves.
     Chevy Chase stars as Norman Robberson, a suburban father of three
whose family doesn't respect him at all.  To compensate for his
timidity in real life, Norman watches every T.V. cop show he can,
memorizes police procedures and worships their heroics from afar.  The
chance to worship up close comes when a counterfeiter (Robert Davi)
moves in next door, and the police decide to set up a stakeout in the
Robbersons' home.  The veteran in the stakeout team is Jake Stone (Jack
Palance), a growling tough guy who immediately commands everyone's
respect.  Meanwhile, Norman gets caught up in the action, and in his
attempt to "help out" ends up jeopardizing the entire operation.
     It is exceedingly difficult to imagine what Bernie Somers was
thinking when he started putting this mess together.  It often seems as
though he never developed the idea beyond a single-sentence
pitch--"cops move in with a loser who idolizes cops."  There isn't a
single original situation or character to be found, but that can be
said of eight scripts out of ten that come out of Hollywood.  The more
telling point is that Somers didn't seem to have a clue where to go
with this story.  The predictable resolution would have been for
milquetoast Norman to discover an inner reserve of strength and end up
saving the day.  But even that simplistic an answer seems to be beyond
his grasp.  Norman begins and ends the film exactly the same, and there
isn't even a pat answer provided for why there is anything different in
the way his family would treat him.
     Then there are the other characterizations, which run from the
stereotypical to the incomprehensible.  Jason James Richter (FREE
WILLY) as the rebellious son and Fay Masterson (THE MAN WITHOUT A FACE)
as the teenage daughter are completely without personality, and Diane
Weist is saddled with an unpleasant shrewishness.  Robert Davi, who by
now might as well have the word "villain" tattooed to his forehead,
bounces from nasty to clownish as the counterfeiter.  Among the
creative stretches in the plot are the daughter falling for the hunky
young cop (David Barry Gray) and the family ending up hostages.
Please, my heart can't take any more surprises.
     The biggest losers, however, are probably the two names above the
title.  Chase, as I've already noted, is stuck with a character who
goes nowhere, dooming him from the start.  Still, it would have been
nice if he hadn't walked through the film as though he were still
stunned by the cancellation of his talk show.  He's not even as
endearingly incompetent as the VACATION series' Clark Griswold, just
deathly boring.  Jack Palance doesn't fare much better, but he does
have an innate gruff charm that transcends the role as written;
however, that still doesn't explain why the Robbersons seem so
instantly drawn to Jake despite his abusiveness, nor why Jake
eventually reciprocates.  If all you want is the chance to see Palance
flare his nostrils and roll his own cigarettes, rent CITY SLICKERS
again.
     I laughed exactly twice during COPS & ROBBERSONS, once when Chase
attempts to roll his own cigarette and once during a coda which plays
on Palance's famous one-armed pushups.  Even at bargain prices, that's
two bucks a laugh.  *That's* a crime.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
ROAD TRIP
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Breckin Meyer, Seann William Scott, Amy Smart, Paulo Costanzo,
DJ Qualls, Tom Green.
Screenplay:  Todd Phillips and Scot Armstrong.
Producers:  Daniel Goldberg and Joe Medjuck.
Director:  Todd Phillips.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult humor, profanity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Having passed the year for which the designation "sophomoric" is
named in the mid-1980s, my perspective on a film like ROAD TRIP is bound
to be skewed. It is part of a grand tradition of leering, sniggering
comedies in which the anti-social behavior and hormone-fueled idiocy of
18-year-olds (portrayed by 25-year-olds) are celebrated for the
entertainment of 15-year-olds. But I remember a time when such tales were
sublimely crude (ANIMAL HOUSE) rather than ridiculously crude (AMERICAN
PIE), when the goal was celebrating an anarchic spirit rather than seeing
how much bodily fluid you could get away with in an R-rated film. Pushing
the envelope, Farrelly brothers-style, can be fun; stuffing the envelope
to the point that it requires hundreds of dollars in postage can become a
simple, wearying exercise in "can we get away with this?"
     If you belong to that demographic that finds a joke most appealing
when it's accompanied by a groan of disgust, have we got a treat for
you. ROAD TRIP is framed as a tale of infamy told by a campus tour guide
named Barry (Tom Green) at the fictional University of Ithaca. He tells of
Josh Parker (Breckin Meyer), an earnest enough fellow in a long-distance
relationship with a childhood sweetheart attending college in Austin,
Texas. When Josh hooks up one night with Beth (Amy Smart) and videotapes
their tryst, he thinks it's a momentary lapse ... until he discovers that
one of his roommates has mailed the tape to his girlfriend Tiffany. Soon
Josh and three pals -- libertine E.L. (Seann William Scott), brilliant
Rubin (Paulo Costanzo) and geeky Kyle (DJ Qualls) -- are on the road for
Austin, racing the clock to get to the tape before Tiffany returns to
school from a family funeral.
     I believe it should go without saying that the quartet takes a few
detours before reaching Texas. Most of those detours involve the Sacred
Duo of Collegiate Intemperance: mood-altering substances and sex. There's
a stop to make deposits at a sperm bank when they run out of money.
There's a stop at a college where they end up partying with members of a
black fraternity, and where Kyle loses his virginity to a corpulent
woman. And there's an overnight stay with an elderly couple where the
grizzled man of the house gets stoned and hallucinates a conversation with
his dog. It's a regular cornucopia of crudeness, choreographed by director
Todd Phillips with all the voyeuristic vigor he demonstrated when
choreographing (allegedly) the outrageous antics in the staged (allegedly) 
"documentary" FRAT HOUSE.
     Only it's just not all that funny. Unlike the pointlessly
message-mongering AMERICAN PIE, ROAD TRIP never pretends to be anything
more than a cesspool of moral depravity. It's even refreshing in a twisted
way that the girl who seduces Josh -- inspiring the cross-country recovery
mission in the first place -- actually becomes the film's heroine, daring
to suggest that sexually aggressive women can also be nice people. But
ROAD TRIP's singularity of purpose doesn't translate into much manic
energy. Its low-brow set pieces are pitched at obvious incongruities: 
the pairing of rail-thin Kyle with his substantial ladyfriend, an old man
sporting an obvious erection, the macho E.L. delighting in a prostate
massage. There's not much of a sense of comic discovery to ROAD TRIP's
gags; they're the gags teenagers are expected to laugh at.
     Deserved kudos do go to Tom Green, the MTV variety show
host-cum-circus geek who plays the demented Barry. Green's act can be
off-putting, but he's surprisingly funny as the perpetual undergrad with
an unhealthy obsession with Rubin's pet python ("unleash the fury" has
already become part of my film-based lexicon). His scenes are some of the
only moments in ROAD TRIP where you can't be sure exactly what's going to
happen next. The rest of this trip meanders through some extremely
familiar countryside, and not familiar in a way that inspires fond
comparisons to classic genre cousins. ROAD TRIP is comedy a level removed
from anything that could be really funny, because it's all about how funny
the mere idea of a profane, stoned dog could be. As the real classics of
sophomoric humor have proved over the years, even when it comes to
gross-outs, execution is everything.

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
THE ROAD TO EL DORADO
(DreamWorks)
Voices:  Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Rosie Perez, Armand Assante, Edward
James Olmos.
Screenplay:  Ted Elliott and Terry Rossio.
Producers:  Brooke Breton and Bonne Radford.
Directors:  Bibo Bergeron and Will Finn.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the last decade or so, animated feature film-making has not just
risen from the dead, it has become the most consistently reliable
Hollywood genre for creative entertainment. Compare the unqualified
artistic successes (BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, TOY STORY, TOY STORY 2, A
BUG'S LIFE, THE IRON GIANT) and solid entertainments (ANTZ, ALADDIN, THE
PRINCE OF EGYPT) with the out-and-out duds (QUEST FOR CAMELOT, THE KING
AND I ... pretty much everything from Warner Bros. _except_ THE IRON
GIANT, actually), and you'll find a batting average any studio would kill
for. The "Disney model" has led to films from several studios in which
strong scripts and genuine creative energy generate -- pardon the cliche
-- fun for the whole family.
     It's easy to visualize a live-action version of THE ROAD TO EL DORADO
as a colossal failure, clumsily mixing whimsy with huge production values. 
The animated version, however, manages a multitude of charms. The story
begins in Spain circa 1519, where Cortez is about to begin his exploration
(and plundering) of the Americas. Enter Tulio (Kevin Kline) and Miguel
(Kenneth Branagh) a pair of happy-go-lucky con artists looking for a quick
escape after winning a map in a rigged dice game. They become inadvertent
stowaways on Cortez's ship, eventually going overboard to make their own
way to the American shore. Soon they discover that the map actually does
lead to the legendary "City of Gold" El Dorado, where Tulio and Miguel are
received as gods come to earth. They also find themselves in the middle of
a power struggle between the High Priest Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante) and
the amiable Chief (Edward James Olmos), and divided by the opportunistic
native girl Chel (Rosie Perez).
     In any number of ways, THE ROAD TO EL DORADO does feel like a
too-obvious attempt to mimic Disney's 1990s animated output. Like THE LION
KING, the film combines a Hans Zimmer score with songs by Elton John and
lyricist Tim Rice, among them the catchy (if not instantly hummable) "The
Trail We Blaze" and "It's Tough to Be a God." It also brings on board the
writing team of Terry Rossio and Ted Elliott, who contributed to the
script for ALADDIN. There's even a Disney voice veteran in Kevin Kline,
who previously worked on THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME. The basic story
progression is familiar, and the obligatory musical numbers are feeling a
bit more obligatory all the time. It's pretty fair to say that THE ROAD TO
EL DORADO doesn't do anything radically different than the dozen or so
Disney animated features that have preceded it.
     Then again, why mess with success? The makers of THE ROAD TO EL
DORADO seem to understand that telling a good story with wit and
excitement will be enough to satisfy virtually anyone. They begin with a
pair of roguishly likeable protagonists -- well-performed by Kline and
Branagh and splendidly animated -- who carry the story effectively. 
Directors Bibo Bergeron and Will Finn lead them through a series of wild,
high-spirited action sequences, unobtrusively combining computer-generated
details and traditional cel animation. And the script and the character
animation provide more hearty laughs than a dozen recent live-action
comedies. Sure, there's a formula to THE ROAD TO EL DORADO, but it rarely
seems like those involved are content to let their film feel formulaic. 
Within the constraints of their genre, everyone is working to keep the
film lively and appealing.
     THE ROAD TO EL DORADO certainly isn't the most inspired animated film
to come down the pike. The third act in particular begins to drag, relying
too much on a rift between Tulio and Miguel. The character development is
a bit sketchy, the villainous Tzekel-Kan doesn't get enough time to show
his villainy and even a toned-down Rosie Perez is still Rosie Perez. It's
not a dazzling visual spectacle, and it's not going to move anyone to 
tears.  It is, however, the kind of sturdy, generally smart film
craftsmanship that shows up far more often when a world is drawn than when
it's photographed. Maybe it's the unique creative perspective of 
animators; maybe it's the freedom inherent in creating a world from
scratch. Or maybe it's just one of those Golden Ages we here so much about
but experience so rarely. THE ROAD TO EL DORADO may not be solid gold, but
it continues an impressive string of animated features worth spending your
silver on.

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
DROWNING MONA
(Dimension)
Starring:  Danny DeVito, Bette Midler, Neve Campbell, Jamie Lee Curtis,
Casey Affleck, William Fichtner, Marcus Thomas.
Screenplay:  Peter Steinfeld.
Producers:  Al Corley, Bart Rosenblatt and Eugene Musso.
Director:  Nick Gomez.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At one point in DROWNING MONA -- one of the strangest, most
frustrating films I've ever been able to sort of recommend as a critic --
small-town cop Wyatt Rash (Danny DeVito) conducts an interview after the
suspicious death of town witch Mona Dearly (Bette Midler). The interviewee
is Mona's dimwitted son Jeff (Marcus Thomas), who is trying to implicate
his landscaping business partner Bobby Calzone (Casey Affleck) by
recounting a confrontation in which he recalls that Bobby shouted a threat
to Mona: "I'll tear out your ovaries!" An incredulous Chief Rash asks
Jeff, "He said 'ovaries?'" "Oh yeah," responds Jeff, "all the time."
     That can't possibly read as funny as it plays, but it's typical of
the throwaway gags that kept me chuckling constantly through an utterly
pointless plot. The premise is that virtually everyone in town -- Jeff,
Bobby, Mona's husband Phil (William Fichtner), Phil's waitress lover Rona
(Jamie Lee Curtis), Bobby's fiancee and Chief Rash's daughter Ellie (Nee
Campbell), even Chief Rash's deputy Feege (Peter Dobson) -- had a motive
for slaying the much-hated Mona. Through flashbacks we see a variety of
antagonizing incidents, many of which may have happened in a completely
different way. The goal would seem to be a broad, dark comedy combining
DeVito's twisted sensibilities, Midler at her most obnoxious and a
well-known everybodydunnit: THROW THE RUTHLESS PEOPLE FROM THE ORIENT
EXPRESS.
     Only the broad, dark comedy is far and away the least interesting
thing about DROWNING MONA. At its best, it's a showcase for the sort of 
giddy, utterly unexpected moments (by screenwriter Peter Steinfeld) that
can make a devotee of great film writing swoon. Due to a test marketing by
the car manufacturer, everyone in the town drives a Yugo (and the service
station helpfully announces "We specialize in Yugos"). A suicidal man's
demand to Chief Rash, "Don't come any closer, Sheriff" is greeted by
another officer's insistent plea, "Wait wait wait ... he's not a sheriff!" 
A funeral parlor's neon sign announces "As seen on TV." And so on.
     Actually, and so on and on and on. Steinfeld is clearly a clever
fellow, but he also doesn't quite know when to quit, or how to keep the
tone jaunty. There are trite scenes involving an alcoholic Catholic
priest, shoulda-been-but-not-quite gags involving a man's use of the
"Wheel of Fortune" board game as foreplay and a misguided scene apparently
intended to make Mona a sympathetic loser (instead of the cackling cartoon
better suited to the story). By the time the final half hour rolls to a
close -- including a forced bit with a lesbian kiss and Tracey Walter
becoming the film's town loony ex machina -- DROWNING MONA has lost a lot
of the bounce in its step, tossing out much of the subversive humor for
chases and exposition (and far too much screen time for Neve Campbell).
     Still, there are those great bits of business that make too much of
DROWNING MONA too much oddball fun to dismiss completely. Plenty of those
bits of business would have worked just as well in any other story, which
makes it a shame that it had to be a wacky farce. Crank DROWNING MONA down
a notch or five, yank some of the bigger stars out of the film and make it
a sly low-budget film (which has been director Nick Gomez's milieu), and
you might have really had something. You have something anyway, something
as smart and weird as it is big and dumb. Maybe it's only a certain kind
of viewer who will enjoy sitting through the big, dumb stuff to get to
big, dumb Jeff sarcastically tapping his thumb and forefinger together,
taunting Bobby by playing "the world's smallest tambourine."

Title
Review for Belle poque (1992)
Starring:  Jorge Ganz, Fernando Fernan Gomez, Ariadna Gil, Maribel Verdu,
           Penelope Cruz, Miriam Diaz-Aroca.
Screenplay:  Rafael Azcona, from a story by Azcona, Jose Luis Garcia
Sanchez & Fernando Trueba.
Director:  Fernando Trueba.
     It was considered something of an upset when the Academy Award for
Foreign Language Film went to Spain's BELLE EPOQUE, but in retrospect
it really shouldn't have been.  The category has recently favored safe,
small entertainments over big political epics, as evidenced by the
victory for MEDITERRANEO.  BELLE EPOQUE bears more than a passing
resemblance to that former winner; it's a sunny, sensual comedy with
all the makings of a crossover success.  Although it features no real
story to speak of, and some clownish characters, its frisky tone and
clever direction by Fernando Trueba make it a worthwhile experience.
     BELLE EPOQUE takes place in 1931 Spain, where a republican
revolution has challenged the monarchy and the Catholic Church.
Fernando (Jorge Sanz), a member of the king's army with republican
sentiments, has deserted into the Spanish country side.  He meets
Manolo (Fernando Fernan Gomez), a free-thinking artist and political
simpatico who offers to take Fernando in for the night.  However,
Fernando's arrival coincides with a visit from Manolo's four
daughters:  serious widow Clara (Miriam Diaz-Aroca); mannish Violeta
(Ariadna Gil); lusty Rocio (Maribel Verdu); and innocent Luz (Penelope
Cruz).  Fernando ends up staying just a bit longer than planned,
switching affections between the sisters as fast as he changes beds,
while the political drama plays out in the background.
     Comedy is probably the hardest cinematic genre to translate from
foreign language films, so it is high praise indeed to note that BELLE
EPOQUE had the audience where I saw the film laughing hard and often.
The subtitling is superb, losing only minor idioms in the translation.
Those more familiar with Spanish history and culture might be quicker
to figure out what a "Carlist" is, or the humor behind the parish
priest's affinity for philosopher Miguel de Unamuno, but far more of
the fun in BELLE EPOQUE transcends particulars of culture.  There are
delightful moments of physical comedy, most notably Violeta's
gender-bending seduction of Fernando while both are in costume at a
carnival.  Another highlight is the arrival of Manolo's opera singer
wife and her jealous manager, accompanied by a window serenade.  The
humor is almost entirely accessible, and it's very winning.
     Much of BELLE EPOQUE's earthy charm comes from the slightly
anachronistic "if-it-feels-good-do-it" attitude of many of the
principal characters.  This is not, as one might expect, some leering
variation on the old traveling salesman/farmer's daughters story;
Manolo's response to Fernando's revelation of his tryst with Violeta is
delightfully unexpected.  Director Trueba uses the backdrop of the
republican revolution to highlight a shift away from the rigidly
Catholic Spain to a more liberal era, a transition emphasized in
wonderful scenes involving Rocio's uptight fiance Juanito and his
domineering mother.  Juanito is so deeply rooted in Catholicism that
when he rebels against his mother, he goes to the local church
believing there is some ceremony involved in renouncing the faith.
     However, BELLE EPOQUE makes no pretense to being "about" anything,
and it is in that respect that the film commits its few errors.  There
is really no plot, just a series of amusing encounters which don't
serve to develop any of the characters.  The characterizations are
somewhat weak, particularly that of Fernando, whose seminarian
background, professed agnosticism and unabashed romanticism are never
successfully linked.  Clara, Luz and Rocio are too sketchy, and Juanito
is simply a buffoon.  There are two strong performances, from Ariadna
Gil as Violeta and Fernando Fernan Gomez as Manolo, and it is no
coincidence that they are also the most fully developed characters.
Still, BELLE EPOQUE does what Trueba intends for it to do, which is to
entertain and amuse.  It may not have been my choice for an Oscar, but
there could have been far worse choices.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY
(Paramount/Miramax)
Starring:  Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jude Law, Cate Blanchett, Philip
Seymour Hoffman, Jack Davenport, James Rebhorn.
Screenplay:  Anthony Minghella, based on the novel by Patricia Highsmith.
Producers:  William Horberg and Tom Sternberg.
Director:  Anthony Minghella.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, brief nudity, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For the life of me, I don't know why any film-maker would take on the
thankless task of literary adaptation. If he takes too many liberties
(see: Roland Joffe's THE SCARLET LETTER), he risks derision. If he is too
scrupulously faithful (see: ANGELA'S ASHES), he risks creating a narrative
without its own identity as a film. You don't want to infuriate fans of
the source material (Paul Verhoeven's STARSHIP TROOPERS), and you don't
want to sacrifice a unique artistic perspective just to get every detail
right (THE GREEN MILE). Guaranteed name recognition comes with a price. 
It is, simultaneously, a can't-miss and a can't-win proposition.
     If Anthony Minghella feels that pressure, he sure doesn't show it. He
squeezed and compacted THE ENGLISH PATIENT's complex narrative, and came
up with a beautiful old-fashioned romantic drama. Now, in taking on
Patricia Highsmith's THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY, he has completely re-made
the story's titular morally-ambiguous protagonist. The result may give
purists fits, but it's a strangely invigorating piece of psychological
suspense. Matt Damon plays Tom Ripley, a young New Yorker living just
close enough to lives of privilege to understand he doesn't live one
himself. A unique opportunity arises when shipbuilding magnate Herbert
Greenleaf (James Rebhorn) offers to send Tom to Italy, believing Tom to be
a college classmate of his son Dickie (Jude Law). Greenleaf wants the
free-living Dickie to return home, and hopes his "friend" Tom can persuade
him. Tom, however, finds Dickie's life of expatriate revelry  far too
fascinating to be concerned with much besides ingratiating himself into it
-- by any means necessary.
     Those familiar with Highsmith's novel will remember Ripley as a con
artist (he uses his address and IRS letterhead to collect "underpaid
taxes" from naive self-employed artists) who coolly considers murdering
Dickie. Minghella is more interested in the Tom who initially sees his
trip to Europe as a fresh start, and whose actions snowball into something
he can no longer control.  Minghella's RIPLEY turns Tom into something far
more than an admittedly fascinating portrait of amorality. He's a man
obsessed with fitting in who ultimately has no chance of fitting in -- a
twisted knot of self-loathing, self-justification, fear, exhilaration and
calculation. Those who would knock Matt Damon's unconventionally creepy
performance as too bright-eyed aren't looking at Tom Ripley the way I
think Minghella wants us to look at him: as a fellow unable to stop
himself from performing his entire life in search of acceptance for
something he's not.
     Minghella combines this twisty characterization with direction that
occasionally leans too heavily on visual metaphor. When Dickie discovers
Tom playing dress-up with his clothes, Tom hides behind a mirror, his head
appearing above a reflection of Dickie; when Dickie's fiancee Marge
(Gwyneth Paltrow) confronts Tom with suspicions of his duplicity, he
stands before her (literally) exposed. The cues can feel a bit 
heavy-handed, but Minghella can also stage scenes where tension appears in
unexpected ways -- a shouted confession unheard, a lingering moment caught
in the space between two lies. It's one thing to direct actors well, which
Minghella certainly does here (Philip Seymour Hoffman is particularly fine
as an icily condescending ugly American). It's rarer to find someone who
can find all the right notes in character interaction, from the turn of a
phrase to the placement of an uncomfortable silence.
     Many viewers are likely to be put off by THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY's
less-than-tidy conclusion, which serves as a bookend to the film's
arresting opening shot. Of course, that's just one of the many ways that
Anthony Minghella risks losing his audience. He interrupts a relationship
drama with a bloody confrontation; he changes some characters from the
novel radically, and introduces new ones. His interpretation of THE
TALENTED MR. RIPLEY is undeniably a departure from Highsmith, but it's a
departure that works the way any thoughtful re-interpretation can work. 
The talented Mr. Minghella has fashioned a seductive, sad portrait of a
man helplessly watching the loss of his own soul. It may be fitting that
Tom Ripley, master chameleon, has taken on yet another new shape for this
version of his story.

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
     In contemporary popular art, there's a very fine line between sheer
brilliance and head-smacking pretentiousness.  It's a line most visionary
film directors flirt with on a regular basis, to the point of tying said
line into the occasional sheepshank knots.  It almost seems as though, for
all their periodic misfires, film-makers like David Lynch, Terry Gilliam
and Stanley Kubrick have no choice but to take you places no one else can
or will take you.  Every true film lover relishes the moment of discovery
when a film suggests the emergence of a challenging new voice.  You
suspect that even though the film you are watching may not be great, the
creative mind behind it could be.
     Darren Aronofsky's debut feature PI may not be a work of pure
originality -- the echoes of Lynch's ERASERHEAD are too distinct -- but I
can virtually guarantee you won't see anything else like it this year.
The subject, amazingly enough, is theoretical mathematics, centering on a
reclusive math savant named Max Cohen (Sean Gullette).  Max lives in a New
York apartment on the verge of swallowing him whole, a jungle of wiring
and circuitry powering his supercomputer Euclid.  His obsessive goal is
proving that there is a mathematical pattern in every complex system, a
theory he tests by attempting to develop a perfect method for predicting
the behavior of the stock market.  Euclid responds to Max's programming by
spitting out a 216-digit number, a number Max initially believes to be
useless.  That's before his mentor (Mark Margolis) drops oblique hints as
to the number's relevance, before a Hassidic scholar (Mark Margolis)
suggests that the number is the key to understanding the mind of God, and
before a group of homicidal stock brokers seem prepared to do anything it
takes to get their hands on the number.
     At its core, PI is an Icarus fable of a man reaching for knowledge
beyond his capacity to handle it, with a side order of cyber-era isolation
cautionary tale.  Aronofsky uses voice-over narration effectively to get
us inside Max's seizure-wracked head (with superb musical assistance from
Clint Mansell of Pop Will Eat Itself), showing us the world as an
actualized paranoid fantasy viewed through a self-imposed cage of
computers.  PI might have been a frighteningly engrossing character study
if only Sean Gullette had been able to match the intensity of the
material.  His Steven Wright-as-computer geek demeanor suggests a typical
socially-challenged nerd more often than a man spinning into madness;
though he didn't need to bug out his eyes and foam at the mouth, he did
need to place Max close enough to the edge for us to see the bottom from
there.  Gullette's competent but distant performance lowers the stakes of
PI's twisted conspiracy theoretics.
     It's only when you step back from the narrative of PI that you
realize what a singular universe Aronofsky has created.  Yes, he does
stretch too hard at times to achieve his Lynchian vibe -- grainy
black-and-white photography, a mysterious sticky substance, blinding
flashes of light and a brain covered with ants do not necessarily a
profound statement make.  But who else would construct a psychological
thriller around large number theory, Wall Street and the Kaballah?  Who
else would create visuals as distinct as Max's techno-organic apartment,
or make an audience squirm so violently at the do-not-try-this-at-home use
of a certain power tool?  And who else has demonstrated the cinematic
instincts to turn a scene of a man writing down numbers into something
more tension-packed than a dozen Hollywood chase scenes.  The most obvious
antecedent may be Lynch, but even Lynch's hypnotic images have rarely been
this kinetic.  Though Aronofsky may have been limited by finances,
available talent or technical constraints, he has created a work which
leaves you hungry for what he could do next.  PI is the creation of that
one film-maker in a hundred who seems unlikely to make movies by the
numbers.

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
BRINGING OUT THE DEAD
(Paramount/Touchstone)
Starring:  Nicolas Cage, Patricia Arquette, John Goodman, Ving Rhames, Tom
Sizemore, Marc Anthony.
Screenplay:  Paul Schrader, based on the novel by Joe Connelly.
Producers:  Scott Rudin and Barbara De Fina.
Director:  Martin Scorsese.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If the opening minutes of BRINGING OUT THE DEAD start to look very
familiar, you're not alone -- even Martin Scorsese agrees with you. The
story opens "in the early 1990s" with EMS paramedic Frank Pierce (Nicolas
Cage) beginning the first of three consecutive chaotic shifts, and at the
end of his rope. His night shifts cruising the streets of New York City
are filtered through red lights; his voiceover narration, scripted by Paul
Schrader (from Joe Connelly's novel), reveals a soul in turmoil. Fueled
only by alcohol and coffee, haunted by the image of a girl he couldn't
save, Frank is ready to snap. "There's a correlation to TAXI DRIVER, 
there's no doubt," Scorsese comments in the press notes, which admission
can only inspire a sarcastic, "No, really?" For a while, you suspect the
film should be called AMBULANCE DRIVER.
     Scorsese ultimately takes BRINGING OUT THE DEAD somewhere quite
different, which is both a blessing and a disappointment. Much of the film
is spent on the day-to-day -- or, in this case, night-to-night -- life of
the paramedics, and on that level it's often fascinating and brutally
hilarious. Frank's three riding partners provide a variety of perspectives
on the way people respond to the stresses of the occupation. Larry (John
Goodman) remains distant, focused either on his next meal or the private
medical response company he plans to open some day; Marcus (Ving Rhames) 
turns emergency calls into opportunities to do a little of the Lord's
work, notably in a wonderful scene where he a resuscitation in a Goth
nightclub becomes an impromptu tent revival meeting; Tom Walls (Tom
Sizemore) turns into a wild animal ready to beat the hell out of his truck
or a frustrating patient, whichever happens to be at hand. Even the trips
into the Our Lady of Perpetual Mercy emergency room -- a barely-controlled
bedlam that would send even the "ER" cast screaming for the hills -- pound
home the nightmare of the job. When Scorsese and cinematographer Robert
Richardson keep their eyes trained on the kinetic, frenetic world of
Pierce and his cohorts, BRINGING OUT THE DEAD has the darkly comic vibe of
M*A*S*H, providing entertaining (if occasionally unnerving) insight into a
violent world where the only sane response is to go a little insane.
     There is, however, a backbone to this story, if not an exceptionally
strong one. BRINGING OUT THE DEAD is ultimately a redemption tale, in
which Frank longs to escape from the feeling that every call is hopeless,
and that he no longer has the power to save anyone. Much of that story
focuses on his relationship with Mary (Patricia Arquette), a woman whose
father Frank revives after a cardiac arrest. Frank becomes obsessed with
Mary, rescuing her from a relapse into drug use and becoming her personal
liaison on her father's condition. His relationship with Mary should shine
a narrative light into his soul, yet Frank's personal crisis never becomes
nearly as vivid as the world in which he exists. Cage delivers a
performance that is alternately wild-eyed and catatonic, a frustrating
pastiche of previous Cage roles instead of a distinct character of its
own. The moments when Frank isn't on the job, when he's trying to find
some semblance of peace and normalcy, should be BRINGING OUT THE DEAD's
emotional anchor. More often, they leave you wondering when someone's
going to get back in an ambulance so the real action can continue.
     Scorsese and Schrader really miss the mark in the film's final
minutes, when Frank's epiphany becomes a depressingly obvious combination
of Glinda-the-Good-Witch dialogue and purifying white light. It's all well
and good that Scorsese and Shrader claim they've "a little mellower now," 
and that 25 years after TAXI DRIVER they've opted for something a bit less
bleakly pessimistic. The 1999 model Travis Bickle didn't necessarily need
to be an armed sociopath, but his actions still needed to draw us into the
way one man deals with New York's grim underworld. There's plenty of
visual gusto to BRINGING OUT THE DEAD, and there are plenty of wildly
entertaining episodes to keep you watching. It's just hard not to wish for
a personality half as intensely memorable as Bickle to pull it all
together. Whenever Frank's introspections take center stage, you need to
keep rousing yourself to ask, "Are you talkin' to me?"

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
THE MIGHTY
(Miramax)
Starring:  Kieran Culkin, Elden Henson, Sharon Stone, Gena Rowlands, Harry
Dean Stanton, Gillian Anderson, James Gandolfini.
Screenplay:  Charles Leavitt, based on the novel _Freak the Mighty_ by
Rodman Philbrick.
Producers:  Jane Startz and Simon Fields.
Director:  Peter Chelsom.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The recent release SIMON BIRCH, based on a best-selling novel, told
the story of two boys who formed a close friendship.  Both outcasts in
their community, they shared many adventures, some humorous and some
serious.  The resulting film was mawkish and erratic, sacrificing strong
and consistent characterizations for cheap slapstick and even cheaper
melodrama.
     I love the cosmic symmetry that allows me to point out exactly what's
right about one film because of what went wrong in another.  THE MIGHTY is
also based on a best-selling novel, and also tells the story of two young
boys who form a close frienship.  Both outcasts in their community, they
share many adventures, some humorous and some serious.  Yet THE MIGHTY is
superior to SIMON BIRCH in almost every way.  It's a family film about
triumph over adversity that earns honest emotional response.
     Rodman Philbrick's popular young adult novel _Freak the Mighty_
inspired this tale of two Cincinnati middle-schoolers coping with
difficult circumstances.  Max Kane (Elden Henson) is an academically-
challenged giant of a lad, troubled by taunting classmates and a family
tragedy which has forced him to live with his grandparents (Gena Rowlands
and Harry Dean Stanton).  His new next-door neighbors are single mom
Gwendolyn Dillon (Sharon Stone) and her son Kevin (Kieran Culkin), a
sharp-witted genius afflicted with a crippling genetic disease.
Gradually, the two come to realize they have much to offer one another.
While Kevin tutors Max in reading and becomes his inspirational voice, Max
literally carries Kevin on his shoulders to become his legs.  Together,
they become a formidable force, a justice-seeking two-headed knight Kevin
dubs Freak the Mighty.
     You might expect THE MIGHTY to be just a glorified "Afterschool
Special," unless you knew the work of director Peter Chelsom.  The auteur
behind the eccentric gems HEAR MY SONG and FUNNY BONES gives the story a
fantastic flair, with images of the symbiotic duo crossing swords with
enemies in their flights of fancy.  Even the scenes clearly designed to
draw cheers, including a gym class basketball game, somehow seem too
surreal to be manipulative.  THE MIGHTY has more than its share of
messages, yet it rarely feels like a "message movie."  It has more than
its share of shifts in tone, yet it rarely feels inconsistent.
     Give credit both to Chelsom and to his two young leads, who deliver a
pair of superb performances.  Kieran Culkin (yes, _his_ younger brother)
finds the fine line between intelligent and obnoxious -- a line most young
actors trample into dust -- to make Kevin an appealing protagonist.  Elden
Henson, however, provides the film's real emotional core as the deeply
troubled Max.  There's not a false note to be found, from his early scenes
as surly introvert to his later fierce devotion to Kevin.  Culkin and
Henson share a casual chemistry even when they're exchanging deep
thoughts, preventing the flashing red "lesson" light to go on during their
scenes together.  Ably assisted by restrained, dignified supporting turns
from Stone, Rowlands and Stanton, Culkin and Henson create a solid
dramatic foundation.
     THE MIGHTY only gets clumsy when James Gandolfini shows up as Max's
bad-news father.  The sub-plot's darker tone, involving murder and
kidnapping, are challenging enough to fit into a family film without
Gandolfini playing the role as a leering monster.  That's aside from
Gillian Anderson's look-at-me-I'm-versatile turn as a good-hearted girl
from the wrong side of the tracks (or perhaps a Tennessee Williams play).
Yet even then Chelsom rallies to give us a potent climax without an ounce
of fat.  The power of the story, and its convincing bonds of friendship,
make teary-eyed actors and sweeping musical cues utterly unnecessary.
SIMON BIRCH's hystrionics bullied viewers into caring about two young
friends.  THE MIGHTY builds two characters worth caring about.

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
     It's easy enough to adopt the head-shaking perspective that the
Muppets just ain't what they used to be.  Certainly the death of Jim
Henson left a void in the Muppet universe, but it's only fitting that the
show has gone on.  "The Muppet Show's" setting as an old-time vaudeville
revue wasn't just a goofy conceit; it exemplified the whole Muppet
philosophy.  Sure, the scattershot jokes and variety numbers could be
groaners, but they were delivered with such a pure desire to please that
it almost didn't matter.  The Muppets were -- and continue to be --
entertainment from a bygone era, where you rarely had to target kids
exclusively because virtually all entertainment was "family
entertainment."
     MUPPETS FROM SPACE is a broad, silly, fairly charming piece of Muppet
capering based on a 20-year-old running gag:  exactly what is Gonzo (Dave
Goelz) anyway?  Stepping away from their recent literary adaptations, the
Muppets are cast as themselves, living together in one big house.  Though
they appear to be a happy felt-headed family, Gonzo still feels isolated
by his singularity.  A possible answer comes to him in the form of a
message from his alphabet breakfast cereal, leading Gonzo to the
conclusion that he is a refugee from an alien race.  This development
grabs the attention of government operative K. Edgard Singer (Jeffrey
Tambor), who intends to use Gonzo as proof of his theory that we are not
alone.
     The premise sets up jokes targeted at just about every "aliens among
us" movie of the last 25 years.  A woman shows up with a mashed potato
sculpture of Gonzo a la CLOSE ENCOUNTERS; the Muppets encounter some
star-cameo Men in Black, including "SportsNight's" Josh Charles and
wrestler Hollywood Hulk Hogan; a scene at a laboratory window recalls
INDEPENDENCE DAY.  There's even a swing into the unexpected territory of
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, as imprisoned rat Rizzo (Steve Whitmire) escapes
through a hole hidden behind a "Mice Girls" poster.  Sly pop culture
references and slapstick carry most of the humor, but there's also the
simple pleasure of the company of familiar characters.  When Kermit,
Fozzie and Miss Piggy lead a mission to rescue Gonzo, the history of those
characters somehow makes every simple joke that much funnier.
     It's also true that MUPPETS FROM SPACE has an inconsistent tone and 
a higher-than-usual ratio of duds to chuckles.  Several cameo appearances
fall flat, including David Arquette as a crazed scientist and F. Murray
Abraham as a dream-sequence Noah.  The use of a musical score full of 70s
soul classics like "Brick House" and "Celebration" feels forced, since the
Muppets are anything but funky.  And as hard as the post-Henson Muppet
gang has worked to make Gonzo the new protagonist, he just doesn't have
the warmth and appeal of Kermit, who's now relegated to a sort of elder
statesman role.  MUPPETS FROM SPACE can keep you smiling, but it rarely
hits the high points of classic anarchic Muppet wit.
     Still, there's enough subtly subversive humor in MUPPETS FROM SPACE
-- as well as enough wild sight gags -- to make you glad the Muppets are
still around.  The film's best, most cultural crusader-unfriendly joke
finds Gonzo admitting to his pals that "I guess I've always had alien
tendencies...this just seems natural to me."  Those who have fretted for
years that Bert and Ernie were actually lovers may furrow their brows at
such alternative lifestyle innuendo, but it's a perfect nod to the kind of
unconventional family the Muppets have always been.  Then again, that's
the kind of bond theater people often form, and the Muppets are nothing if
not true theater people.  Okay, not _people_ exactly...just entertainers
who remind you that it's a good thing for the show to go on.

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
THE FLINTSTONES IN VIVA ROCK VEGAS
(Universal)
Starring:  Mark Addy, Kristen Johnston, Stephen Baldwin, Jane Krakowski,
Alan Cumming, Thomas Gibson, Joan Collins.
Screenplay:  Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont and Jim Cash & Jack Epps Jr.
Producer:  Bruce Cohen.
Director:  Brian Levant.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult humor)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Brian Levant, director of THE FLINTSTONES IN VIVA ROCK VEGAS (as well
as the 1994 FLINTSTONES feature), says and does everything you'd expect of
a sequel to a film based on a television series. He professes his
affection for the original series, and his desire to remain true to its
spirit. He tosses in touchstones both from the series (the alien Great
Gazoo; Harvey Korman, original Gazoo voice, in the role of Wilma's father) 
and from the first film (Rosie O'Donnell as the voice of an octopus
masseuse). In short, it is Levant's goal to create a thoroughly 
synthesized film experience. If anything in VIVA ROCK VEGAS disrupts the
comfort of the familiar, he has failed.
     That being the case, chalk up VIVA ROCK VEGAS as a smashing success
of the most yawn-inducing sort. The "prequel" story begins with the Great
Gazoo (Alan Cumming) assigned by his race to study the mating habits of
prehistoric earthlings. He lands in Bedrock, where Fred Flintstone (Mark
Addy) and Barney Rubble (Stephen Baldwin) are bachelor pals fresh out of
the Bronto Crane Academy. On a trip to the neighborhood Bronto King, they
meet waitresses Wilma Slaghoople (Kristen Johnston) and Betty O'Shale
(Jane Krakowski), and romance is soon in the air. Little do any of them
know that Wilma is actually a runaway heiress whose would-be fiance Chip
Rockefeller (Thomas Gibson) is sort of a poor loser. Chip invites the
happy couples to his casino in Rock Vegas, where his dastardly plans will
be set in motion.
     It's somehow more depressing when a film like VIVA ROCK VEGAS shows
flashes of genuinely inspired writing, letting you know that those
involved could have done much better if it had mattered at all to them. 
There's a great gag about circus side-show freaks including "a 40-year-old
man," a wonderful ham-fisted compliment with Fred comparing Wilma's eyes
to "two big  eyes" and an addled rock star's vague concern over whether
his female companion is a minor. It's also hard not to get a few giggles
out of Cumming's double-duty as the effete Gazoo and the preening Mick
Jagged. In general, though, the film is content to coast on its special
effects, its insider humor (Ann-Margret, co-star of the Elvis Presley film
VIVA LAS VEGAS, singing the title song) and its bronto-crane-load of
"rock" puns. Handling such a recognizable commodity, Levant sees no need
to rock -- no pun intended -- this particular boat.
     Of course, he has no choice but to deal with a complete overhaul of
the original film's cast. John Goodman gives way to Addy, who's personable
enough and bypasses Alan Reed's Fred entirely to go right to the source
with a decent imitation of Jackie Gleason. The muscular Baldwin isn't
nearly as ideal a Barney as Rick Moranis, nor does Johnston match
Elizabeth Perkins' endearingly flat readings of Wilma's signature "Frad;" 
in neither case does the film waste any time explaining how each one
shrinks several inches by the time the next film rolls around. Only
Krakowski seems more physically right for her part -- God love Rosie
O'Donnell, but she's no wasp-waist -- and her titter is on target. There's
not much one can say to criticize performances like these -- "cartoonish" 
would be a compliment, after all -- but there's not much that 
distinguishes them, either. The actors, like most everything else in the
film, seem set up not to get in the way of the general feeling of good
will.
     Some might argue that a disposable entertainment like VIVA ROCK VEGAS
is nothing more than brightly-colored, slapstick-heavy eye candy for the
kids, and should be treated as such. It might be easier to buy that
reasoning if it didn't take exactly four minutes before the first
flatulence joke, and 15 minutes for the first joke about Fred and Barney
sheepishly denying the appearance of a homosexual relationship. I don't
recall those as the kind of gags typical of the series for which Brian
Levant expresses so much fond remembrance. THE FLINTSTONES IN VIVA ROCK
VEGAS, isolated bursts of genuine humor aside, is a deeply pandering
film. It panders to stereotypes; it panders to the most inane adult
nostalgia; it panders to the most simplistic kiddie humor. That's often
the kind of film you get when your primary goal is the comfort of the
familiar ... in this case, humor that was already tired when dinosaurs
walked the earth.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
ROUNDERS
(Miramax)
Starring:  Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, Martin Landau, John
Malkovich, John Turturro, Michael Rispoli, Famke Janssen.
Screenplay:  David Levien and Brian Koppelman.
Producers:  Ted Demme and Joel Stillerman.
Director:  John Dahl.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the ongoing tastes-great-less-filling verbal war of attrition
between John Q. Critic and Joe B. Average Movie-Goer, a crucial
common ground often gets overlooked.  On the same fundamental level, every
one of us loves to be taken somewhere we've never been before, to be told
a story in a way it's never been told before.  Movies are our eyes to 
previously unseen worlds, whether that new world is the surface of an
asteroid, the deck of the Titanic, or behind the lines with World War II
soldiers.  At their most engrossing, movies offer the giddy thrill of the
utterly new.
     At its most engrossing, that's exactly what ROUNDERS offers:  a
fascinating glimpse inside the world of high-stakes poker.  Our tour guide
is Mike McDermott (Matt Damon), a brilliant young rounder (i.e., a
professional who makes the rounds at local poker games) who loses a
$30,000 bankroll on one bad night.  Nine months later, Mike is walking the
straight-and-narrow, having sworn off the game at the insistence of his
girlfriend Jo (Gretchen Mol) and devoted himself to his legal studies.
But trouble is just around the corner in the person of Mike's old pal Worm
(Edward Norton), just out of prison with an ever-accumulating gambling
debt hanging around his neck.  In order to save that neck -- and his own
when he makes the mistake of vouching for Worm -- Mike has to get back
into the game and use every trick he ever learned to win the biggest games
of his life.
     And oh, how much we learn while he does so.  Writers David Levien and 
Brian Koppelman use Damon's narration much the same way Ray Liotta's
narration was used in GOODFELLAS -- as a sociology lesson.  We learn why
Texas hold-'em is the high stakes game of choice, how real players lure
the amateurs into big pots, and how Mike spots the "tells" of his
opponents to help make his playing decisions.  It's utterly fascinating, 
whether the setting is a back alley card room or a gaudy Atlantic City
casino.  Damon anchors the story in a solid performance as a man beginning
to understand that he has a gift, not a problem.  Though hooked on the
thrill of winning, he's no different than a performer hooked on the thrill
of an audience's reaction.  Through his eyes we see poker as an art, not
an addiction.
     ROUNDERS has such a solid hook that it's disappointing to watch it
drift into a handful of distracting sub-plots.  The relationship between
Mike and Jo is too vaguely defined for their fate to matter, yet director
John Dahl (THE LAST SEDUCTION) lingers on their confrontations as though
the obligatory love story were dramatically potent.  John Turturro's role
as the small-time gambler who acts as Mike's mentor is also 
under-developed, as is the potentially compelling interaction between Mike
and an understanding law professor (a very good Martin Landau).  Even the
old-school chemistry between Damon and Norton -- full of almost-charming,
can't-help-myself sleaze as the compulsively crooked Worm -- feels less
genuine than it should.
     If anything positive comes out of these half-formed relationships,
it's the sense that Mike's best friend is really the game.  Damon's
charisma is never more potent than in the climactic showdown with the
Russian gangster who beat him in the game that broke him (John Malkovich,
employing his dead eyes to perfect effect and a Boris Badinov accent with
considerably less success).  It's a confrontation where Mike's life is on
the line, but the drama is always in the game, not the potential outcome.
For that confrontation, the narration grows conspicuously silent at key
points, trusting you to grasp the game to which you have been introduced.
Viewers who used to think of poker simply as gambling may have to re-think
their position after sitting through ROUNDERS.  This tale shows us a
different world entirely -- the world of card-player as tortured artist.

Title
Review for Englishman Who Went Up a Hill But Came Down a Mountain, The (1995)
Starring:  Hugh Grant, Colm Meaney, Tara Fitzgerald, Ian McNeice,
           Kenneth Griffith.
Screenplay/Director:  Christopher Monger.
     If it had not been for Jim Carrey, Hugh Grant might have been
hailed as *the* breakout star of 1994.  His affable, self-effacing
persona turned FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL int the biggest "art house"
hit in the history of the country, leading to a not-so-coincidental
increase in business for another Grant film, SIRENS, after his face was
substituted for Elle Macpherson's bare backside in that film's print
ads.  THE ENGLISHMAN WHO WENT UP A HILL BUT CAME DOWN A MOUNTAIN might
have faced a monumental marketing challenge, or at least a name change,
if not for the advantage of being Hugh Grant's first post-WEDDINGS
effort.  Unfortunately, it's no honeymoon.  Grant's fans could be
massively disappointed, both by his relatively minor role and by the
film's frequently tedious pace.
     Grant plays Reginald Anson, an English surveyor who comes to
Wales in 1917 with his partner George Garrad (Ian McNeice) to map
the terrain for the war effort.  Among their tasks is determining
the height of Ffynnon Garw, a geographical feature which the locals
take inordinate pride in calling "the first mountain in Wales."
However, Anson and Garrad find that Ffynnon Garw is sixteen feet
short of the 1,000 foot height required for the designation of a
mountain.  Refusing to accept that Ffynnon Garw is just a "hill,"
the locals, led by innkeeper Morgan (Colm Meaney) and the Reverend
Jones (Kenneth Griffith) concoct an elaborate plan to add the
required height to Ffynnon Garw, and to keep Anson and Garrad in
town as long as necessary to obtain a favorable re-measurement.
     The story, based on a tale from the family of Welsh writer/
director Christopher Monger, begins as a promising enough fable
about fish out of water and a legendary act of combined community
will.  Monger does a nice job of establishing the scene, introducing
the quirks of the characters in the matter-of-fact manner of an
accomplished tale-teller who relates a story he knows to be fanciful
with utmost earnestness.  The clash of personalities between the
merrily profane Morgan "the Goat" and the ever-apoplectic Reverend
Jones is entertaining, thanks largely to a good-natured performance
by Colm Meaney, and Stephen Endelman provides a bright and lilting
score which keeps the tone light.
     Sadly, although it is clear that Monger has a great affection
for this particular story, it isn't nearly as interesting as he
seems to think it is, at least not for 100 minutes.  The key problem
is that as much as he tries to convey why this "mountain" is so
important to the people of Ffynnon Garw, he never quite manages to
do so.  He toys both with the idea of Welsh identity being tied to
the mountains, and with the general sense of loss brought on by the
first World War, but as hard as he tries to draw us into the
imperative of the Ffynnon Garw mission, he can't make it matter as
much to the audience.  While the efforts of the townspeople to
thward Anson and Garrad in their every attempt to leave are
sometimes amusing, there is a lot of space between them, and THE
ENGLISHMAN slows down to become a sporadically whimsical bore.
     It also appears that the presence of Hugh Grant resulted in an
ill-advised restructuring of the script.  The story really should
have been about the Welsh townsfolk, not about the two Englishman,
and indeed Hugh Grant is little more than a peripheral figure for
fully half of the film.  Then Tara Fitzgerald (Grant's wife in
SIRENS) appears as a woman of ill repute brought to town to keep
Anson occupied, Anson becomes sympathetic to the determination of
the Welsh villagers, and suddenly we have an unnecessary and
unwelcome love story thrown into the mix.  Grant really just walks
through this part, relying on his crinkly smile and hesitating
delivery and little else.  If the story had to focus on one of the
Englishman, it should have been Garrad, played with puffed-up
impatience by Ian McNeice.  Of course, McNeice is only an actor;
Hugh Grant is a movie star.  THE ENGLISHMAN WHO WENT UP A HILL BUT
CAME DOWN A MOUNTAIN has some charms, and an appealing sense of
place.  It is also a case of an hour's worth of story stretched an
extra forty minutes, and of a big name star in an essentially
supporting role who becomes a tail wagging the dog.

Title
Review for Duets (2000)
DUETS
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Maria Bello, Andre Braugher, Paul Giamatti, Huey Lewis, Gwyneth
Paltrow, Scott Speedman, Kiersten Warren.
Screenplay:  John Byrum.
Producers:  Kevin Jones, Bruce Paltrow and John Byrum.
Director:  Bruce Paltrow.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, brief nudity, adult themes,
drug use, violence)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the opening scene of DUETS, director Bruce Paltrow establishes
with little room for doubt that we have fled reality for its hideous
cinematic doppleganger. In that scene, a weathered-looking fellow in
horn-rims named Ricky Dean sits in a karaoke bar, taunting the hot-shot
kid who has just wowed 'em from the stage. Ricky feigns ignorance about
"karateoke," then bets the kid that he can win the competition out from
under him. Of course the bet proves to be a hustle, but the problem is the
casting. As Ricky dazzles the crowd with his rendition of Joe Cocker's
"Feeling Alright," we're left with the baffling realization that Ricky is
played by Huey Lewis. The kid's jaw drops, the patrons shriek, women throw
themselves at him ... not for the Voice of God, but for the competent,
breathy chops of Huey Lewis. This isn't the Eddie Felson of the karaoke
set we're talking about; it's not even the Eddie Money of the karaoke
set. It's Huey. Freaking. Lewis.
     For the next 108 minutes or so, DUETS leaps from that implausible
scenario to scenarios even less plausible, turning it into a character
study in which inhabitants of the planet earth are nowhere to be found.
Essentially it's a road picture, switching back and forth between three
less-than-dynamic duos converging on a big karaoke contest in Omaha. The
aforementioned Ricky is on his way, with a tag-along named Liv (Gwyneth
Paltrow) who happens to be the daughter he's never met before. Brassy Suzi
Loomis (Maria Bello) also has designs on the prize, and a reluctant
chauffeur in recently-cuckolded cab driver Billy (Scott Speedman). And
Todd Woods (Paul Giamatti), a career salesman having a mid-life crisis,
has also become a born again karaokist, accompanied by a career convict
named Reggie (Andre Braugher) he picked up hitchhiking.
     DUETS is one of those "When Bad Movies Happen to Good Actors" 
experiences that makes you wonder whether anyone involved actually read
the script before committing. It's particularly sad watching Giamatti and
Braugher do the buddy bonding thing with such shallow characters. Giamatti
makes for such a wonderfully manic schlub that he's entertaining to watch
in spite of the material; Braugher has presence, but he can't bring any
depth to a character that's ultimately supposed to be tragic. Paltrow does
a nice ditzy bit, but that's the one note her character is allowed. In
fact, that's true of every character in the film. Bello, Speedman, Lewis
and company are all playing characters with one note, one epiphany and one
grinning resolution. These aren't performances; they're cries for help.
     Paltrow the elder offers none, and goes one better by actually making
matters worse. A talented television director with little feature film
experience, Paltrow puts his film together in such a disjointed manner
that even well-constructed characters would have been hard-pressed to
emerge intact. Close-ups become medium shots for a couple of seconds for
no apparent reason before returning to close-ups; ostensibly comic scenes
linger and dawdle with no punch. Paltrow does have the paternal generosity
and good sense to let the gifted cinematographer Paul Sarossy shoot
Gwyneth lovingly. There's no pacing, no momentum and no point.
     There is, however, plenty of karaoke. DUETS seems constructed with
the desperate hope that viewers will be entertained enough by the
musical numbers -- lifted heavily from the pop music glory years of the
late '70s and early '80s -- that they'll ignore the complete absence of
personality in anyone singing them. For the record, Gwyneth Paltrow has a
sultry, insinuating voice, and does justice to both "Bette Davis Eyes" and
Smokey Robinson's "Cruisin';" also for the record, there is no need for
cross-cutting between a police action and plus-size comic John Pinette's
rendition of "Copacabana." Unfortunately, that's fairly typical of the
skewed world served up in DUETS. If you loved Huey as the pride of every
karaoke joint, you'll love the police leaving an armed man alone for a
final tender moment. In this paper-thin road film, reality is the road not 
taken.

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
(Columbia/Mandalay)
Starring:  Jennifer Love Hewitt, Brandy, Freddie Prinze Jr., Mekhi Phifer,
Matthew Settle, Muse Watson.
Screenplay:  Trey Callaway.
Producers:  Neal H. Moritz, Erik Feig, Stokely Chaffin and William S.
Beasley.
Director:  Danny Cannon.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  96 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER seems like exactly the kind of
film at which SCREAM and SCREAM 2 took their satiric jabs.  In this sequel
to last fall's horror hit, Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt) is still
traumatized after surviving a killing spree by a gortex-clad, hook-handed,
vengeance-minded psycho (Muse Watson).  A year after the events in the
first film, she's terrorized again -- this time on a tropical holiday with
her college roommate Karla (Brandy), Karla's boyfriend Tyrell (Mekhi
Phifer) and a classmate named Will (Matthew Settle) with a crush on Julie
-- in all the expected ways.  People begin dying in reverse credits order.
Shadowy figures flit across the background.  Small creatures dart out to
the accompaniment of blasts of music.  The electricity goes out.  The
killer moves...very...slowly towards potential victims.  And no matter how
violently the killer meets his apparent demise, he always turns up to
suggest yet another sequel.
     Aside from its chronologically-challenged title -- if this is
happening a year after the first film, shouldn't it be I STILL KNOW WHAT
YOU DID TWO SUMMERS AGO? -- I STILL KNOW SHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER is
constructed with an almost benign predictablity.  Yet in a way, that's the
appeal of the teen horror film.  There's nothing truly scary about the
film, nor was there ever intended to be.  It's a Halloween funhouse with
spaghetti for intestines and peeled grapes for human eyeballs.  There's
nothing dehumanizing about the way characters are gleefully dispatched,
because they're never meant to be any more human than a mannequin being
decapitated.  You scream because it's what you're supposed to do, and you
laugh about it afterwards.
     That doesn't make it any more fun for the average viewer of voting
age to watch a film where you can identify every twist or turn several
minutes before it happens.  This is the kind of film you go to for only
one reason:  you're a teenager, you're on a date, and you're ready for an
excuse to grip someone tightly.  You're not going for the chance to see
Jeffrey Combs' demented turn as a hotel manager with an attitude.  You're
not going to care about the inane attempts to give our protagonists actual
personalities.  You're certainly not going to care about the silly
dialogue, or the less-than-terrifying prospect of Julie becoming an
ultraviolet McNugget while locked into a tanning bed.  You'll pay your
money for a hug and a shriek, and you'll get exactly what you pay for.
     If I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER didn't feel as long as its
title by the time the credits finally roll, it might have warranted even
more slack.  After all, it's a genre film doing what a genre film is made
to do.  It's also a film which feels blasted into production on a shaky
premise with virtually no attempt at creating a quality product.  It might
seem strange to see a film like this after SCREAM turned its kind into
comic relief, but there's still an audience for this sort of grind-it-out
funhouse ride.  I'm not it, but you know who you are.

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Andy Garcia, Ian Holm, Lena Olin, Richard Dreyfuss, Ron
Liebman, James Gandolfini.
Screenplay:  Sidney Lumet, based on the novel "Tainted Evidence" by Robert
Daley.
Producers:  Thom Mount and Josh Kramer.
Director:  Sidney Lumet.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are a couple of things you can generally count on finding in a
Sidney Lumet film:  people in positions of power or influence who become
corrupted, and the noble crusaders who oppose them.  In a career spanning
six decades, Lumet has trained his camera on the back-room workings of
power in America, creating gems like TWELVE ANGRY MEN, SERPICO and NETWORK
in the process.  Recent years, however, have found Lumet telling the same
cynical story of perverted criminal justice over and over:  PRINCE OF THE
CITY, Q&A, GUILTY AS SIN.  NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN is not a bad film.
It's just a terribly familiar one, one which Lumet races through so
quickly that it leaves little more than a blur of crooked cops and
shattered naivete.
     Andy Garcia stars as Sean Casey, a young New York prosecutor who gets
handed a career-making case.  Notorious drug dealer Jordan Washington
(Shiek Mahmud-Bey) stands charged with the murder of two police officers,
and the wounding of a third who happens to be Sean's father Liam (Ian
Holm).  The district attorney (Ron Liebman) thinks this connection makes
Sean perfect for the case, which would appear to be a slam dunk even for
an inexperienced prosecutor.  The surprise comes when Jordan's lawyer,
civil rights attorney Sam Vigoda (Richard Dreyfuss), mounts an unexpected
defense.  Jordan, he claims, was acting in self-defense against cops he
had been paying off for years, but who now planned to kill him for
refusing to pay more.  As Sean follows up on the accusations of police
corruption, he finds them leading him into dark corners where the line
between justice and the law gets very indistinct.
     The best moments in NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN come early in the film,
with a superb montage of Sean learning the hard facts about his new job.
One judge chuckles at Sean's suggestion that a $500 bail for a poor black
woman is too low; another judge dozes off during an earnest summation.
The day-to-day workings of the legal system may never have looked as
mundane and depressing on film.
     That's all interesting stuff, but it's nothing particularly new.  TV
programs like "Law & Order" have turned the technicalities and small
compromises of crime and punishment into effective drama without turning
them into the stuff of morality plays.  NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN is about
Sean's fall from grace, which is both overly melodramatic and a bit
disingenuous.  If the indignities we watch Sean suffer in the first
fifteen minutes aren't enough to puncture his idealism, he's already more
saint than civil servant.
     Sean's character might have made more sense if watching NIGHT FALLS
ON MANHATTAN didn't feel like a drill from a speed-reading course.  Weeks
of narrative time fly by in seconds, Jordan Washington's trial is over in
an anti-climactic ten minutes, Sean and one of Vigoda's assistant
counselors (Lena Olin) become soul-mates overnight, and Sean is elected
district attorney almost before he is ever a candidate.  The unpredictable
rhythms Lumet injects in NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN would be welcome of they
didn't come at the expense of a well-developed protagonist.  Andy Garcia
is an actor of limited range even when he has a detailed characterization
at his disposal.  Sean Casey, for all his moral turmoil, is little more
than a prop in a film so over-burdened with plot that he gets carried
along in its wake.
     There are some interesting performances in NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN,
notably Ron Liebman's flamboyant work as the animated, 
angina-waiting-to-happen D.A. Morgenstern, which make many individual
scenes in the film worth watching.  Even those performances, however, are
subjugated to the idea of the story.  The rules are only there to be bent,
Lumet informs us.  If he hadn't already told us the same thing before --
and better -- NIGHT FALLS ON MANHATTAN might have been a more engrossing
experience.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
(Columbia)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Brad Pitt, Margaret Colin, Ruben Blades, Treat
Williams, Natascha McElhone.
Screenplay:  David Aaron Cohen & Vincent Patrick & Kevin Jarre.
Producers:  Lawrence Gordon and Robert F. Colesberry.
Director:  Alan J. Pakula.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You can bet that Sony Pictures executives have spent plenty of time
in the last few weeks hoping that there is, in fact, no such thing as bad
press.  Rumors of on-set tension have been swirling for months, production
delays bumped the film from its higher-profile fall '96 release date, and
reports had the budget creeping into the $90 million range.  Then, in a
Newsweek interview, Brad Pitt took a few shots at the mid-stream script
changes on his upcoming film THE DEVIL'S OWN, inspiring the kind of spin
control usually seen only on the teacup ride at Disneyland.  Pitt's
comments were surprising in an era when stars are generally obliged to
swoon over their latest project, but it may be even more surprising to see
the end product of the process which frustrated him so.  THE DEVIL'S OWN
is an uncommonly thoughtful suspense film with a razor-sharp performance
by Pitt, proving that Pitt's standards may be considerably higher than
anyone else's in Hollywood.  If anything, it is the missed opportunities
for even more detailed characterizations which end up disappointing.
     Pitt plays Frankie McGuire, a native of Northern Ireland with a
haunted past and a challenging present.  A man who watched as a young boy
while his father was gunned down as a Republican sympathizer, Frankie has
become a notorious IRA terrorist wanted for several bombings and murders.
With superior government firepower threatening to overwhelm them, the IRA
sends Frankie to the U. S. to purchase black market missiles for their
effort.  Aided by American friends, Frankie comes to New York under the
name Rory Devaney, and is put up in the home of unsuspecting veteran cop
Tom O'Meara (Harrison Ford).  Rory soon becomes close with the O'Meara
family, but they are all put at risk when complications develop in the
transaction with arms dealer Billy Burke (Treat Williams).  Soon two men
with differing concepts of duty will be set not just against a common
enemy, but against each other.
     THE DEVIL'S OWN clearly wants to establish a father-son dynamic
between Tom (who has three daughters but no sons) and Rory, and it works
primarily because it never strains too hard to make the point.  The
bonding between them is casual and un-dramatic -- a game of pool here, a
snippet of conversation there -- and director Alan J. Pakula trusts the
actors to establish a connection without resorting to trite dialogue or
inappropriate outbursts of emotion.  These are two quiet, determined men
who simply seem to like each other and enjoy each other's company.
     We like them, too, and for quite a while both of them are the heroes
of THE DEVIL'S OWN...until Pitt kicks his performance into another gear.
Though the film's opening scenes show Frankie in a gun battle with
government troops in Belfast, we come to believe that the soft-spoken man
in New York is the "real" Frankie/Rory.  That man is as fictional as
"Rory Devaney," however, the man Frankie might have been if he had lived
another life.  He turns utterly ruthless when his back is against the
wall, and Pitt gives him the weariness of a man who cannot afford the
luxury of a conscience.  Pitt plays the anti-hero to Ford's more
conventional square-jawed hero, and it is hard to choose sides between
them.  It is a unique conflict for a Hollywood film, a struggle between
two people whose moralities were determined by their circumstances, and
who both believe firmly that they are in the right.
     In a film with such an unconventional struggle at its center, it is
all the more jarring when conventional formula elements rear their ugly
heads.  Obligatory psycho-villain Treat Williams gets to ooze malevolence
and serve up severed heads; obligatory romantic interest Natascha McElhone
gets to be gorgeous and supportive of Frankie.  There is a distracting
sub-plot as well, concerning the involvement of Tom's partner Eddie (Ruben
Blades) in the shooting of a car thief, which serves only as yet another
reminder that Tom is honest, hates violence, and believes in the letter of
the law.  When THE DEVIL'S OWN begins to resemble low-rent DIE HARD
clones, it drifts.
     Those occurrences are relatively rare, however, because THE DEVIL'S
OWN doesn't move the way you expect suspense thrillers to move.  The
action sequences are infrequent but emphatic, with a premium placed on the
patient establishment of character.  Still, there is a moment late in THE
DEVIL'S OWN (during a climax reportedly re-shot just a few months prior to
opening) which may be an example of what Pitt was complaining about to
Newsweek.  In that scene, Tom suggests that he never wanted to be a cop, a
sub-text which appears out of nowhere and might have given more depth to
the character throughout the film.  There are certainly instances where
THE DEVIL'S OWN feels like the product of a script-by-committee, but the
star power of Ford and Pitt in an intriguing relationship guides it over
its rough points.  I could only hope to be subjected to more "troubled
productions" like this.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A CIVIL ACTION 
(Touchstone)
Starring:  John Travolta, Robert Duvall, William H. Macy, Tony Shalhoub,
Zeljko Ivanek, Bruce Norris, John Lithgow, Kathleen Quinlan.
Screenplay:  Steven Zaillian, based on the book by Jonathan Harr.
Producers:  Scott Rudin, Robert Redford and Rachel Pfeffer.
Director:  Steven Zaillian.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For those unfamiliar with the American legal system -- and count it
among your blessings if you are one of them -- it is not generally the
stuff of which great drama is made.  It is a thing of motions, pleadings,
depositions and causes of action, of hundreds of hours spent reading
thousands of incoming documents, or redacting thousands of outgoing
documents.  It is a war of attrition played out in conference rooms, only
rarely involving tense attorney-witness confrontations or even-more-tense
waits for a verdict.  Cinematic law is a satisfying fiction; real law is,
for the most part, a laborious game of chicken before an out-of-court
settlement.
     A CIVIL ACTION's dubious merit involves the extent to which it
effectively captures real law.  It's based on a real case, recounted in
Jonathan Harr's non-fiction best-seller about Jan Schlichtmann (John
Travolta), a Boston personal injury lawyer with a gift for turning the "s"
in "suffering" into a dollar sign.  He sees no such dollar signs in a case
brought in by his partner Kevin Conway (Tony Shalhoub), a case involving a
statistically significant cluster of children dying of leukemia in the
town of Woburn...that is, until he discovers that the toxic chemicals in
the area just may be spilling out of the deep pockets of R.W. Grace Corp.
and Beatrice Foods.  Schlichtmann smells a killing, and the Woburn case
comes to consume everything he has and everything he is.
     There was every reason to believe that, if anyone could lend a spark
to slogging through the legal mire, it would be Steven Zaillian.  This
was, after all, the director who made chess both kinetic and poetic in
SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER.  Indeed, there are several scenes in which
Zaillian nails the harsh truths of tort law:  Schlichtmann coldly ticking
off the relative cash values of women vs. men or black vs. white in
wrongful death cases; a hilarious courtroom moment in which a corporate
defense attorney realizes he's lost the jury's sympathy before he's even
begun; an effective montage showing the mounting costs of research and
expert witnesses.  A CIVIL ACTION pulls few punches when it comes to
underlining a process that's always about money, and only accidentally
about justice.
     Unfortunately, it pulls all its punches when it comes to giving the
story an emotional hook.  Schlichtmann's conversion from shark to softy is
supposed to anchor the film, except that it's far too subtle.  In fact,
Travolta often plays Schlichtmann as though his concern is always still
about the money, his frustration less about letting his clients down than
about letting the big one slip away -- which, frankly, is a more
interesting choice.  Those clients, meanwhile, remain stoic, heroic
abstractions, the working class American equivalent of the struggling
non-white characters who serve as background color in stories of a wealthy
white character's awakening to social conscience (like SEVEN YEARS IN
TIBET).  As the film slowly becomes the story of how the Woburn case
drains all the cash out of Schlichtmann and his firm, it slowly drains
what little narrative and visual energy it had.
     Certainly much of that energy was supposed to be provided by Robert
Duvall as Jerry Facher, Beatrice's eccentric veteran attorney.  I suppose
the idea is that he's wily because he passes himself off as such a goof,
but the character's tics -- taping up an ancient briefcase covered in
Snagglepuss decals; absently bouncing a ball during a phone conversation;
obsessing over the Red Sox -- are more often distracting than they are
entertaining.  At least Duvall's fussy colorfulness, along with William H.
Macy's less-mannered breakdown as Schlichtmann's nervous accountant, give
you something to watch.  Too often A CIVIL ACTION feels like the sort of
lecture in legal maneuvering we see Facher give to students at Harvard
Law.  It runs out of gas when it runs out of things to tell us, since it
lacks characters to engage us.  Real law makes the appeal of John
Grisham-esque courtroom melodrama make a lot more sense.

Title
Review for Renaissance Man (1994)
Starring:  Danny DeVito, Gregory Hines, Kadeem Hardison, Mark Wahlberg,
           Stacey Dash, Khalil Kain, Lillo Brancato, James Remar.
Screenplay:  Jim Burnstein.
Director:  Penny Marshall.
     It was inevitable that RENAISSANCE MAN would be compared to DEAD
POETS SOCIETY.  The 1988 Robin Williams vehicle was a critical and
commercial success, and the comparison makes for ready-made epithets
(DEAD POETS PLATOON, "Oh drill sergeant my drill sergeant").  But the
comparison is really rather specious; once you get beyond the classroom
setting, there really isn't all that much substance or tone in common
between the two.  It's much more useful to think of RENAISSANCE MAN as
SISTER ACT 2 on an army base--as well as much more depressing.
Constructed around pre-fabricated emotion and a premise that's sporting
liver spots, RENAISSANCE MAN is only slightly more entertaining than
last year's Whoopi Goldberg debacle, and twenty minutes too long
besides.
     Danny DeVito stars as Bill Rago, a Detroit advertising executive
whose creative cold streak and chaotic personal life land him on the
unemployment line.  There they find Bill a temporary job at the local
army base, and it's not advertising.  Despite no previous teaching
experience, Bill is assigned the task of teaching basic thinking skills
to a group of eight under-achieving recruits know as the Double D's.
Bill seems content just to put in his time, and to needle the drill
sergeant (Gregory Hines), until a lesson on "Hamlet" seems to spark the
interest of his charges, as well as Bill's own interest.  One by one
the Double D's are able to confront their problems, and even the
teacher learns a few lessons.
     It's indicative of how sloppy the writing is that Jim Burnstein
anticipates the film's key credibility question--why doesn't the Army
just kick the Double D's out--without bothering to answer it.  Maybe
the base commander (nicely played by Cliff Robertson) could have
confessed that he was once like those troubled kids, or something of
the sort.  But Burnstein offers little more than a shrug of the
shoulders.  "I've given you the movie," he seems to be saying; "you
fill in the motivation."  And so it goes in a script that's like a
Chinese combination platter: one from Column A, one from Column B.
Only without any of the flavor.
     That goes for a meticulously integrated collection of Double D's,
craftily acted to a one but established from their sledge-hammer
opening confessionals in the broadest possible terms.  Hobbs (Khalil
Kain) is the Smart One; Jamaal (Kadeem Hardison) is the Jive-Talking
One; Junior (Peter Simmons) is the Sensitive One; and so on.  They play
their parts, then dutifully emerge on the other side of the film as
Better People.  The Sweathogs were given more depth.
     Then there is Danny DeVito, who is all wrong as Bill Rago.  He
should have been much slicker, a hustler who discovers his heart like
Steve Martin in LEAP OF FAITH.  DeVito never looks for a minute like
someone who is obsessed with money and career, which makes his
"transformation" virtually indiscernible.  With his Ewok hugability,
DeVito can't pull off the hard-edged Rago of the film's early scenes.
     Nuances of character aside, RENAISSANCE MAN is simply an unfunny,
earthbound comedy.  There are at least three too many Double D's, each
requiring a personal epiphany of varying magnitude, and Penny Marshall
has to spread the film far too thin to accomodate them.  There is no
spark, no energy, no anything to RENAISSANCE MAN's laboriously staged
set pieces but musical crying cues.  Marshall's old-fashioned brand of
sentimentality doesn't play without characters the audience cares
about, and RENAISSANCE MAN chugs to its conclusion without an ounce of
genuine humanity.
     RENAISSANCE MAN is the kind of film that wears its emotion in such
lines as "Victory starts here" (accompanied by an emphatic gesture to
the head), and exchanges between Rago and his daughter like:  "Do you
want your pennant?"  "No, I just want you to believe in me."  Usually I
respond to such films in spite of myself, but not this time.
RENAISSANCE MAN is a glossy mess that, like its young protagonists,
just can't shoot straight.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
DOGMA
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Linda Fiorentino, Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Chris Rock, Jason
Mewes, Kevin Smith, Jason Lee, Alan Rickman, Salma Hayek, George Carlin.
Screenplay:  Kevin Smith.
Producers:  Scott Mosier.
Director:  Kevin Smith.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence, drug use)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Kevin Smith's DOGMA is offensive. Devotees of film industry
scuttlebutt probably know that Miramax, DOGMA's original distributor, put
the film on the auction block after religious groups started turning up
the heat. Catholic organizations in particular declaimed the film's
subject matter, many proclaiming it sacrilegious sight unseen ("I don't
need to swim in a sewer to know it stinks," went one typical slice of
logic). It won't surprise any of those folks when I say DOGMA is 
offensive. And I'm not even talking about the theological content. DOGMA
should be offensive to anyone who expects more from a movie than two hours
of a filmmaker's musings on every religious notion that ever came into his
head.
     Those musings are linked -- rather tenuously -- to a plot involving
the very fate of existence itself. It seems two outcast angels -- Loki
(Matt Damon) and Bartleby (Ben Affleck) -- have found a loophole involving
the Catholic dogma of plenary indulgence, through which they plan to
re-enter heaven. Circumventing God's will would, however, result in the
end of all creation, so a human agent is summoned to thwart the angels'
plans. That human is Bethany Sloan (Linda Fiorentino), a Catholic of
questionable faith and even more questions about her mission. Accompanied
by several celestial assistants -- including unknown 13th apostle Rufus
(Chris Rock) and the muse Serendipity (Salma Hayek) -- and two very
earth-bound assistants -- Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob (Kevin
Smith) -- Bethany tries to save the universe between lengthy
conversations.
     And oh boy, are there plenty of lengthy conversations. Smith's
eternity-threatening premise is probably meant to distract from an
otherwise non-stop series of metaphysical/scriptural/doctrinal discussions
on everything from the nature of God to religious intolerance. It doesn't.
DOGMA is an incredibly long sit, a deep-n-profound dorm room debate of a
movie without the benefit of cold pizza and beer. Sometimes Smith is
simply snarky (a deconstruction of "The Walrus and the Carpenter" as a
critique of organized religion), in which cases he often churns out
genuine laughs. Sometimes Smith is serious (Bartleby's rant against God's
unfair preferential treatment of humans over angels), in which cases he's
alternately perceptive and tedious. And sometimes Smith cops an attitude
(Loki's swift judgment on a corporate boardroom), in which cases you want
to remind him that anyone who gives Jay and Silent Bob major roles in a
film should look at the plank in his own eye before going after the mote
in anyone else's.
     When Smith actually does get into the events of his plot, things
don't get much better. Smith has always been a filmmaker only in the most
nominal sense, but his limitations are even more evident when he makes a
half-hearted effort to add supernatural action to the mix (radically
shifting the tone from comedy to grim violence along the way). In a way,
the low-tech fight sequences have their charms; battles always seem to
occur just outside the frame, and people come flying through the air from
improbable directions. It's hard to cut Smith that much slack, though,
because you can't help but think his choices are based entirely on his
limited visual vocabulary. He'll point a camera at people sitting around a
table as long as you'll let him. Ask him to throw in one piece of real
action for our efforts, and he turns into Captain Coy.
     I suppose the most frustrating thing about DOGMA is that, whatever
your feelings about its messages, Kevin Smith is the wrong messenger. It's
not that his insights aren't insightful -- he has some interesting things
to say about faith, religions and self-righteousness -- but that he's
pitching his weighty notions in such a scattershot fashion. LIFE OF BRIAN
could get away with borderine sacrilege because Monty Python played it
smart and scathing; DOGMA may be a sincere expression of belief, but it's
too juvenile too often. Smith opens the film with a disclaimer that the
film is only meant to be a satire, then includes a comment to the effect
that "God must have a sense of humor ... look at the platypus." You simply
_must_ do better than that if you want to turn sacred cows into fajitas. I
hope Smith feels better about religion after venting his spleen into a
feature film. Losing two hours to deep thoughts wrapped in limp jokes --
now _that_ I find offensive.

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
     Nihilism does not equal art.  I want to get that point out of the
way, because it appears to be a widely-held belief that critics feel
exactly the opposite.  People note the praise lavished upon films like
NATURAL BORN KILLERS, KIDS and SEVEN and conclude that there is some
conspiracy among the film cognoscenti to force bleakness down the
collective throat of the viewing public.  While I can speak for no critic
but myself (I admired SEVEN, but not NBK or KIDS), I believe that the
common thread is actually daring.  Film-makers dealing with unpleasant
subject matter are almost forced to be inventive to keep the audience
watching.  Others, if they choose, may praise TRAINSPOTTING for its
squalor; I prefer to praise it for the invigorating perspectives of a
writer and a director with ideas and the ability to convey them.
     The ostensible hero of TRAINSPOTTING is Mark Renton (Ewan McGregor),
a young man in Edinburgh who, as his opening monologue announces, has
chosen "not to choose."  Instead, he has chosen to remain perpetually high
on heroin with his friends Spud (Ewen Bremner) and Sick Boy (Jonny Lee
Miller), unemployed and uncaring.  Though he attempts to go straight on
occasion, he always returns to his one and only love, even when
discouraged by non-using friends like Tommy (Kevin McKidd) and Begbie
(Robert Carlyle).  It is only when he is caught shoplifting that Renton is
forced to go cold turkey, and to confront every unpleasant reality of his
life.
     TRAINSPOTTING, a smash hit in Britain, has received a great deal of
comparison to A CLOCKWORK ORANGE, both of them tales of amoral youth with
a likeable, philosophically inclined first-person narrator.  It is a
connection director Danny Boyle obviously doesn't discourage, since one
scene is set in a nightclub styled after CLOCKWORK's Korova Milkbar, and
he is going for a similar kind of social criticism.  Though Renton begins
the film with a rant against materialism and suburban values, it is always
clear that his heroin habit has nothing to do with protest.  In one
memorable scene, Spud goes to a job interview required by social services
if he is to remain eligible for unemployment, and he is forced to do his
best to make sure that he doesn't actually get the job.  They are
unapologetic leeches, but Boyle and writer John Hodge (adapting the novel
by Irvine Welsh) also show the hypocrisy of those who criticize Renton,
each with his or her own addiction problem:  Begbie is a drunkard, Tommy
smokes, and Renton's mother takes Valium.  No one is clean; it's all a
question of degree.
     But if there is one thing Boyle does masterfully, it is showing
exactly how brutal this particular degree can be.  The users' relationship
with the drug might be romanticized -- including a scene in which Renton
feels himself sinking into the floor -- there is nothing romanticized
about the effects of heroin addiction.  Boyle's most effective scenes show
users literally wallowing in their own filth:  Renton as he rumages
through a toilet to find the heroin suppositories he just lost, eventually
being swallowed by the bowl; and Spud waking up in a strange bed to find a
rather disgusting mess.  In some of these scenes there is a comic edge,
but Boyle counters them with some absolutely chilling moments, including a
tragedy for which the only response anyone can think of is to get high
again, and a nightmarish detox hallucination by Renton which is guaranteed
to have you squirming.  With a virtuoso's skill, Boyle is able to take
viewers deeply enough into the experience of heroin users that they can
see both the horrible toll the drug takes and the sensation which makes it
all worthwhile to them.
     TRAINSPOTTING's third act, focusing on a heroin deal which interferes
in Renton's attempt to live a straight life, is something of an
unfortunate side trip, as the film loses much of the urgency it had done
such an exceptional job of building.  It does give Robert Carlyle's
hair-trigger psychotic Begbie a showcase, but the whole episode feels like
padding in a much edgier film.  There is one thing that sub-plot does
quite a good job of demonstrating, however, and that is how truly
meaningless drug friends can be to each other; once they're not high, the
lads in TRAINSPOTTING are ready to screw each other over in a moment.  It
also provides a perfect comic coda for Renton's stab at respectability,
because it's clear he doesn't have the moral fiber for it.  That actually
shows what a neat trick Boyle has pulled off:  he has made a moral film
without moralizing, even though it might not look like one on the surface.
Bleak may not always be beautiful, but in TRAINSPOTTING it is necessary to
make the point, a point as sharp as a needle in the arm.

Title
Review for Trigger Effect, The (1996)
     There is nothing that will make a Hollywood marketing executive
salivate like a current news story to which a new film can be linked, and
if you remember the bounce THE CHINA SYNDROME got from the Three Mile
Island accident of 1979, you'll understand why.  When a seven-state power
failure hit the American west on August 10th, the folks at Gramercy must
have done the Mipos Dance of Joy -- five days later, I had press material
for the blackout thriller THE TRIGGER EFFECT mentioning the August 10th
failure.  It's hard to resist that kind of "torn-from-today's-headlines"
marketing, but I hope they don't make THE TRIGGER EFFECT look like a cheap
knock-off by overdoing it, because it is nothing of the kind.  This is a
sharp and surprisingly effective thriller which makes up for a sluggish
middle with an exceptional start and finish.
     It is Friday in an unnamed California city, and a young married
couple named Matt (Kyle MacLachlan) and Annie (Elisabeth Shue) are
enjoying a night at the movies despite some talkative fellow audience
members.  The problems really begin when they get home.  Their infant
daughter has an ear infection, their housing contractors appear to be
committing petty thefts, and to make matters worse, the power goes out.
The first night, it's an inconvenience; the next day, it becomes
dangerous.  Along with the power, phones and radio stations are also out,
causing rumors to run rampant, and stores -- those which remain open --
can only take cash.  Along with their friend Joe (Dermot Mulroney), Matt
and Annie try to wait out the blackout, but find themselves forced to act
as the threads of civilization begin to unravel around them.
     THE TRIGGER EFFECT opens with one of the niftiest single-take scenes
of the year, following a chain of events in a mall which eventually
introduces us to Matt and Annie.  Beginning with a man on the receiving
end of a spilled cup of coffee, rookie director David Koepp (screenwriter
for JURASSIC PARK, MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE and others) shows people acting
shocked at the rudeness of others, then proceeding to treat someone else
just as rudely.  It is a smart and subtle piece of film-making which
underlines the main premise of THE TRIGGER EFFECT:  how fragile a
foundation it is on which civilization is based.  It is amazing how much
more obvious the ineptitude of THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU becomes when
compared to a film which takes a very similar theme -- what separates us
from animals -- and does it so much better.
     It's a great concept for an information age thriller, with both a nod
to and an updating of the classic "Twilight Zone" episode "The Monsters
are Due on Maple Street," but Koepp loses track of his story for a while
to focus on relationship troubles between Matt and Annie.  He tries to
connect those troubles to the film's central themes -- Annie has a problem
respecting the mild-mannered Matt until he steals medicine for the baby --
and he is successful for a little while.  Elisabeth Shue does smart work
as a sexy mother and wife with a bit of a wild streak, and Kyle MacLachlan
is a solid hero as the relentlessly civil Matt, but they are distracted
along with Koepp by the introduction of Mulroney and a romantic triangle.
Whatever point Koepp might have been trying to make about the attraction
of "animal behavior" gets muddled in the house-bound middle third of THE
TRIGGER EFFECT.
     Fortunately, Koepp pulls it all together for a nerve-wracking
conclusion as Matt, Annie and Joe hit the road in an attempt to get out of
town.  Just two days removed from a normal life, the world around them
dissolves into paranoia and a relentless pursuit of survival, and a climax
featuring two superb showdowns:  one involving an edgy stranger (Bill
Simitrovich) who claims to want nothing more than a ride, the other
involving Matt's attempt to break into a house to steal car keys.  Koepp
is not a genius at creating shaded characters (remember, he _did_ write
JURASSIC PARK and MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE), but he demonstrates an impressive
talent for building tension and for pacing a thriller to keep his audience
involved.  It is also noteworthy that Koepp never makes a point of
explaining what caused the blackout, because that would have been sending
the wrong message about what mattered about this story.  THE TRIGGER
EFFECT is a disturbing and all-too-real tale which makes the ironic
observation that we have come to depend on technology for our humanity,
and if a little creative marketing will bring people out to see it, then
so be it.

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
(Columbia)
Starring:  Jennifer Love Hewitt, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Freddie Prinze
Jr., Ryan Phillippe, Johnny Galecki, Anne Heche.
Screenplay:  Kevin Williamson, based on the novel by Lois Duncan.
Producers:  Neal H. Moritz, Erik Feig, Stokely Chaffin.
Director:  Jim Gillespie.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Screenwriter Kevin Williamson helped make Dimension Films a mint on
last year's smash hit SCREAM by demonstrating that he understood the
"rules" of horror film plots.  You know the ones:  never have pre-marital
sex, never say "I'll be right back," never let the killer chase you up the
stairs.  Williamson's self-aware slasher film tickled the funny bones of
genre buffs, but SCREAM didn't work only as a satire.  It was an effective
horror film in its own right because director Wes Craven understood that,
even more important than the rules for being a character in a horror film,
you've got to know the rules for _making_ a horror film.
     I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER was also penned by Williamson (from a
popular novel by Lois Duncan), but its success is more scattershot than
SCREAM's.  At times, it's a potent and effective chiller; at other times,
it's fairly uninspired.  In short, someone wasn't always following the
rules.  When the rules are firmly in place, I KNOW WHAT YOU DID stays
mostly on track.  To wit:
    1) ESTABLISH A FUNDAMENTALLY SOUND PREMISE.  Unlike most horror films,
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID doesn't just send a psycho on a random killing spree.
His targets are very specific:  four teenagers (Jennifer Love Hewitt,
Sarah Michelle Gellar, Freddie Prinze Jr. and Ryan Phillippe) involved in
a July 4th hit-and-run accident who try to hide their crime, then discover
a year later that, well, someone knows what they did last summer.  That
set-up requires a bit of mystery and a bit of creativity, and Williamson
does a decent job of providing them.  Which doesn't mean that he should
have made the film a mystery, because...
     2) WHODUNNIT DON'T MATTER.  A horror film is under no obligation to
tease the audience as to the killer's identity; Freddy Krueger and Michael
Myers did plenty of damage with the audience on a first-name basis.  I
KNOW WHAT YOU DID goes to great lengths to make that question important --
all the characters are preoccupied with it, suspects pop up at regular
intervals, and the finale seems built around an eventual unmasking, all
of which makes it perplexing that the script never gives you a chance to
guess who the killer is.  It's also disappointing to find the menacing
slicker-clad maniac -- you may never trust the Gorton's fisherman in the
same way again -- turn into just some person with a grudge and an ice hook
for the final reel.  Williamson could have done better than a Scooby-Doo
resolution to a scary film.  Which points why it's important to...
     3) FIND A TONE AND GO WITH IT.  Much of the exposition in I KNOW WHAT
YOU DID -- and there's a bit too much of it -- frames the story as a
psychological mystery, with plenty of guilty confessions and attempts to
investigate who wants to do in our protagonists.  Then, a few minutes will
pass and someone will end up with an ice hook inconveniently lodged in his
or her carotid artery.  Williamson and Gillespie often seem to be
scrambling for an R rating, when they could have made just as effective a
film with a PG-13.  I KNOW WHAT YOU DID didn't have to be a horror film to
be scary, as long as the makers understood rule #4...
     4) THERE'S A DIFFERENCE BETWEEN A SHOCK AND A SCARE.  Any hack with a
mixing board can freak out an audience with a burst of loud music.  It
takes considerably more style to build up an audience for a scare, then
scare them anyway.  Director Jim Gillespie stages a few exceptionally
creepy set pieces, building suspense which lasts a lot longer than the two
seconds it takes for someone to leap into frame.  One ten-minute sequence
in particular, in which Gellar tries to escape her assailant, is an
exhausting (if somewhat anti-climactic) ride.  And speaking of
anti-climaxes...
     5) TRY TO FINISH WITH YOUR BEST STUFF.  The ship-board finale is a
solid piece of film-making, but the unmasked villain doesn't quite cut an
imposing figure.  Once again I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER appears to
suffer from an identity crisis; much of the last reel could have come from
any of a dozen crime thrillers.  Perhaps that's why Gillespie and
Williamson have so much trouble following the rules of horror film-making.
It's only every so often that they seem convinced they're actually making
a horror film.

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
MEET THE PARENTS
(Universal) 
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Ben Stiller, Blythe Danner, Teri Polo, Owen
Wilson.
Screenplay:  Jim Herzfeld and John Hamburg.
Producers:  Nance Tenenbaum, Jay Roach, Jane Rosenthal and Robert DeNiro.
Director:  Jay Roach.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, drug references)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Not surprisingly, MEET THE PARENTS is being promoted as a film "from
the director of AUSTIN POWERS;" when you've got a connection to a $200
million film in Hollywood, you take advantage of it. It just strikes me as
an absurdity of the highest order to pump up Jay Roach for his POWERS 
oeuvre. They were Mike Myers films, plain and simple, and pretending
otherwise is like giving Tom Shadyac credit for the success of ACE
VENTURA, or Dennis Dugan for BIG DADDY. To his credit, Roach knew enough
to mostly get out of Myers' way, showing he understands how to take
advantage of a gifted comic performer's strengths. Let's not forget,
however, that this is also the director of MYSTERY, ALASKA -- not exactly
the second coming of Preston Sturges.
     In MEET THE PARENTS, Roach gets to oversee yet another gifted comic
performer, and once again the film is primarily effective to the extent
that it gets out of that performer's way. Ben Stiller plays Greg Focker, a
Chicago male nurse who's ready to pop the question to his girlfriend Pam
Byrnes (Teri Polo). But before he does, there's a key test to pass: Pam's
no-nonsense father Jack (Robert DeNiro). Greg has gotten an inkling that
Jack is a tough man to win over, yet he's optimistic when he and Pam head
to upstate New York for the weekend to attend the wedding of Pam's sister. 
And that's when Greg realizes that Jack may be an impossible man to win
over, with his every attempt to make things better inevitably making
things worse instead.
     With Woody Allen having migrated away from his trademark schlemiel
character in recent years, Ben Stiller has become cinema's reigning
champion of outsider anxiety as comedy. There's more of an undercurrent of
hostility to Stiller's on-screen persona, but he still makes has an
uncanny ability to make his characters' frustrations and awkward
situations hilarious. MEET THE PARENTS gives Stiller plenty of
opportunities to squirm -- notably when he concocts an impromptu
recollection about milking the family cat -- and his discomfort is almost
always good for a laugh. He also gets a great straight man to work with in
DeNiro, whose straight-faced portrayal of the over-protective Jack is just
the right counterpoint for Stiller's manic antics. If you're a Ben Stiller
fan, you'll probably be a MEET THE PARENTS fan.
     Unfortunately, Stiller does have to struggle against an inconsistent
script and flaccid direction. Though MEET THE PARENTS is at least subtle
enough to avoid make Greg's antagonist an out-and-out villain, it's still
primarily a film of broad individual gags. The situations grow more
elaborate, and the set pieces more convoluted, but there's no natural
build-up to the comedy. Roach's direction misses the right rhythm both for
individual scenes (notably the domino effect after Greg unwittingly lets
the Byrnes' cat out of the house) and for the film as a whole. There's
never any sense that MEET THE PARENTS is building to a humorous crescendo
so much as it is doling out punch lines and pratfalls at regular 
intervals. Every possible situation comes to the expected worst-case
scenario for Greg, and the characters come to the expected epiphanies at
the expected times.
     That the film works in spite of the people behind the camera says a
lot for the people in front of the camera. The supporting players support
effectively; Owen Wilson, even underused as he is here, still adds an
off-beat edge to every scene he's in. MEET THE PARENTS is one of those
films where most of the laughs come from waiting for the protagonist's
next humiliation, and often such films are as nerve-wracking as they are
amusing. Stiller is simply so funny when he's sweating -- and so
determined not to be a victim even as he's being victimized -- that the
amusement manages to emerge triumphant. It's a shame that he's working
with a workmanlike director who cuts off scenes before they've reached
their zenith, but it's often the fate of brilliant comics that they can't
find brilliant directors to work with. Working with the likes of Mike
Myers and Ben Stiller is a smart career move for the Jay Roaches of the
cinema world. Even when the performers' gifts manage to emerge, the
reverse is rarely true.

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
(New Line)
Starring:  Michael Richards, Jeff Daniels, Charlize Theron, Jessica Steen,
Rip Torn, Austin Pendleton.
Screenplay:  Sara Bernstein and Gregory Bernstein.
Producers:  Gary Ross and Jonathan Lynn.
Director:  Jonathan Lynn.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     On its face, director Jonathan Lynn's decision to make TRIAL AND
ERROR looks like a very, very bad one.  Sure, he had an unexpected success
with a previous film about an inexperienced attorney fumbling around in a
backwater courtroom (MY COUSIN VINNY), but that was exactly the reason not
to try it again.  The subject matter is flimsy enough without trying to
make it work _twice_; such hubris usually guarantees the wrath of the
cinematic Fates.  Yet TRIAL AND ERROR somehow turns out to be another
lightweight-but-agreeable comedy in the tradition of MY COUSIN VINNY, with
just enough smiles and giggles to prove satisfying.  
     "Seinfeld's" Michael Richards stars as Richard Rietti, a
rarely-employed actor in Los Angeles who is about to act as best man for
his long-time friend, attorney Charlie Tuttle (Jeff Daniels).  Charlie is
marrying the boss's daughter (Aleksandra Wentworth), and joining the
family means getting choice assignments like helping out a distant
relative of the boss's wife who has been charged with fraud in a small
Nevada town.  Dealing with the case looks to eliminate plans for a
bachelor party, but Richard shows up in Nevada to send Charlie off in
style.  That send-off sends Charlie off to bed with a hangover and two
black eyes after a bar fight, inspiring Richard to "help out" by posing as
Charlie in court.  Desperate to avoid disaster -- as well as several
felony counts -- Charlie tries to help Richard maintain the illusion that
he is actually Charlie Tuttle, while mounting the notorious "Twinkie
defense" for their client (Rip Torn).
     It's hard to get terribly worked up over either the positive or
negative qualities of TRIAL AND ERROR.  The character arcs -- flaky actor
Richard learns to take some responsibility for his actions, while uptight
lawyer Charlie learns to go after what he wants rather than what he is
supposed to want -- are simply designed and efficiently resolved, but
rather poorly developed.  The comic situations offer consistent chuckles,
as well as a fair number of missed opportunities.  The casting presents
appealing and talented performers like Richards, Daniels, Torn and
Charlize Theron (sparkling with energy as a waitress who steals Charlie's 
heart) then gives them little to do.  Time and again TRIAL AND ERROR will
deliver a really satisfying moment, only to follow it up with an
underwhelming one.
     It's actually to Lynn's credit, however, that TRIAL AND ERROR never
seems like it's straining for every possible laugh.  That's what you might
have expected if the film had been set up as a star vehicle for Richards;
the idea of LIAR LIAR with Richards in the lead is primally disturbing.  
As it turns out, Richards and Jeff Daniels share the spotlight quite
comfortably.  Richards's role isn't far removed from "Seinfeld's" Kramer,
providing the expected physical comedy and goofy reaction takes.  In a
hilarious scene early in the film, Richard does his "mafia bit" during an
acting audition, which consists of doing a solo impression of a man being
beaten insensible.  As he contorts his body to simulate getting a kick to
the ribs, you wonder whether Richards can defy gravity to suit his comic
purposes.  Yet Daniels is never treated strictly as a second banana; in
fact, his romantic sub-plot may be the real heart of the film.  The two
gifted supporting actors do something fairly rare in screen buddy
comedies:  they actually support each other, rather than trying to step on
each other.
     Despite the effective pairing of Richards and Daniels, TRIAL AND
ERROR doesn't generate as many laughs as it should, particularly in the
courtroom.  Richards' legend-in-his-own mind actor is a howl when he tries
to translate the confrontational hyperbolics of fictional courtrooms to
the real world, but that doesn't happen often enough.  He also doesn't
have as effective a foil as Joe Pesci had in MY COUSIN VINNY; neither
Austin Pendleton (as the judge) nor Jessica Steen (as the incredulous
prosecutor) can match the late Fred Gwynne's imposing presence.  Only at
isolated moments, like during Torn's sob-story testimony, does the script
really seem to be providing A-level material.  TRIAL AND ERROR isn't a
truly memorable comedy, but it's a well-paced and frequently amusing one.
Let's just hope Jonathan Lynn doesn't decide to prove a third time can
still be a charmer.

Title
Review for Miami Rhapsody (1995)
Starring:  Sarah Jessica Parker, Antonio Banderas, Mia Farrow, Paul
Mazursky, Gil Bellows, Kevin Pollak, Carla Gugino.
Screenplay/Director:  David Frankel.
     The line between homage and cinematic plagiarism can be a
fairly fine one, and largely a matter of perception.  Then there are
directors who quote so frequently and so freely from their idols
that it becomes an exercise in supreme critical generosity not to
say that the sincerest form of flattery has become a faded photocopy
of a great work of art.  This week's winner of the Brian DePalma
Memorial Award for Stylistic Cannibalism is David Frankel, whose
MIAMI RHAPSODY, though frequently amusing, is such a blatant and
second-rate ersatz Woody Allen film that it might as well have been
called MIAMI HALL.
     MIAMI RHAPSODY stars Sarah Jessica Parker as Gwyn Marcus, a
clever but anxious writer for an ad agency.  After a two year
relationship she has finally become engaged to boyfriend Matt (Gil
Bellows), but Gwyn seems unsure about marriage.  Her uncertainties
are magnified when she discovers that virtually every member of her
family has been unfaithful.  Her father (Paul Mazursky) has had a
string of affairs; Mom (Mia Farrow) is involved with Grandma's Cuban
nurse Antonio (Antonio Banderas); brother Jordan (Kevin Pollak) is
cheating on his pregnant wife (Barbara Garrick).  Even her younger
sister Leslie (Carla Gugino), who has been married for just a few
weeks, is getting some on the side.  All these revelations force
Gwyn to consider whether the compromises necessary in marriage are
worth it all.
     Frankel has crafted a fairly simple story on which to hang his
witty observations about modern marriage, and has created an
interesting character to act as tour guide.  Gwyn is a smart and
funny woman, but an overthinker who uses her cutting remarks to keep
people at a distance.  Sarah Jessica Parker is an extremely
appealing actress, and she is full of energy and sparkle in this
role.  The problems begin when she opens her mouth.  Her character
is so obviously a gender-transferred version of Woody Allen's
compulsively self-analytical intellectual that every word out of her
mouth seems just horribly wrong, or a really misguided impression.
I kept waiting for Parker to put on a pair of horn-rims and be done
with it.
     If only that were the only thing Frankel cribs from Allen.
MIAMI RHAPSODY opens with a jazz score over credits on a black
screen, with cast listings in alphabetical order.  Sound familiar?
It should if you've seen any Woody Allen film in the last fifteen
years.  There are several lines and concepts taken whole cloth from
ANNIE HALL:  a reference to the fact that "love fades;" Gwyn's final
comments on relationships which are remarkably similar to Woody
Allen's "we need the eggs" rationalization at the end of ANNIE HALL;
even an oblique reference to the original title of ANNIE HALL
(ANHEDONIA, or aversion to pleasure) in Gwyn's line, "I'm just
terrified of anything good that might happen to me."  Add to that a
confrontation between Gwyn's father and his mistress which recalls
CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS, and the mere presence of Mia Farrow.  With
every sardonic quip and every recognizable setup, MIAMI RHAPSODY
began to feel more and more forced and artificial, like some film
school project to cram as many Woody Allen references as possible
into 95 minutes.
     None of this is to say that Frankel doesn't get off his share
of very funny lines, most memorably in a scene at Leslie's wedding
in which she and her husband exchange vows apparently written by Dr.
Seuss.  There are far worse models for making a film than Woody
Allen, and Frankel fires off so many jokes that several of them
invariably hit.  But while Frankel is adept at writing one-liners
for his characters, he doesn't really know how to place them in
interesting or memorable situations.  He also doesn't use his cast
particularly well, leaving Gil Bellows' Matt and Kevin Pollak's
Jordan to drift without a sense of who they are.  MIAMI RHAPSODY is
not without its moments, and I laughed more than a few times.  But
David Frankel is like that guy who quotes all the best lines from
his favorite comedies to his friends.  If I *really* want to laugh,
I'll watch the original.

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Hugh Jackman, Patrick Stewart, Ian McKellen, Famke Janssen,
James Marsden, Halle Berry, Anna Paquin, Tyler Mane, Ray Park, Rebecca
Romijn-Stamos, Bruce Davison.
Screenplay:  David Hayter.
Producers:  Lauren Shuler Donner and Ralph Winter.
Director:  Bryan Singer.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I think it's fair to say that I've been looking forward to a film
version of X-MEN for a while now -- somewhere in the neighborhood of 23
years, as a matter of fact. X-MEN #107 was one of the first comic books I
ever bought, and it launched me on a love affair with the medium that
abated only when, as a college student, I could no longer afford my habit. 
Some readers may suspect that this history would lead me to go easy on an
adolescent fan-boy. Personally, I thought it would make me much tougher. 
After all, a 23-year wait can do something to one's expectations. I didn't
think I'd settle for anything less than the kind of comic book adaptation
you almost never see: one that combines rousing heroic action with a solid
story.
     To my joy and astonishment, that's exactly what I got. X-MEN is not
just a great comic book movie; it's actually a pretty good movie _period_. 
For those unfamiliar with the source material, the X-Men are mutants --
humans with unusual powers that manifest themselves during puberty. 
Telepathic mutant Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart) has dedicated
himself to helping mutants learn to cope with their powers at his School
for Gifted Youngsters, mutants like retractable claw-wielding Wolverine
(Hugh Jackman) and a teenager called Rogue (Anna Paquin) who absorbs the
life force of people she touches. Xavier also has a powerful adversary in
Magneto (Ian McKellen), who sees mutants as destined for superiority, and
who believes the mass of humanity fears and hates mutant-kind. It seems
Magneto's perspective is justified when U.S. Senator Robert Kelly (Bruce
Davison) begins advocating for mutants to register with the government. 
And when Magneto and his Brotherhood of Mutants set in motion a plan to
mutate all of humanity, you can bet that a battle with Xavier's X-Men is
not far off.
     The X-Men universe has grown pretty unwieldy over the years, but
director Bryan Singer (THE USUAL SUSPECTS) and his team of writers wisely
keep the focus on a limited number of characters: team leader Cyclops
(James Marsden), telekinetic Jean Grey (Famke Janssen) and weather
manipulator Storm (Halle Berry). Even more wisely, he focuses primarily on
Wolverine and his paternal relationship with the fragile, frightened 
Rogue. That choice not only gives the story an emotional anchor, it gives
plenty of screen time to X-MEN's most intriguing character and easily its
best performance. You've probably never seen Australian actor Hugh Jackman
before -- though he resembles a brawnier Gary Sinise -- but you will see
him again, because the guy has charisma to burn. Jackman offers everything
a fan could hope for in a portrayal of Wolverine, from the trademark
muttonchops to the genuine sense of mystery and menace. If X-MEN had
nothing else going for it but Jackman, it would still be worth seeing.
     The wonderful thing is that X-MEN _does_ have more going for it. 
Drawing on one of the comic's best stories of the 1980s, X-MEN effectively
uses the subtext of anti-mutant hysteria as a combination of Red scare
(there's a great moment in a Senate debate in which Kelly waves around a
"list of names of known mutants"), racism and homophobia. It offers dozens
of insider gags for the X-Men faithful, while avoiding the slavish
devotion to every detail that can interfere in solid film story-telling. 
And, just in case it matters to anyone, it offers some of the
kick-ass-in'-est action scenes this side of THE MATRIX. The climactic
battle between the X-Men and the Brotherhood -- including shape-shifter
Mystique (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos), tongue-flicker Toad (Ray Park) and
bone-crusher Sabretooth (Tyler Mane) -- is simply superb. The fact that
you don't have to wade through 90 minutes of junk to get to it is a
wonderful bonus.
     Of course X-MEN has its flaws. There's not much for Halle Berry to do
but look intense when her eyes go white, which is probably all for the
best given the Incredible Disappearing Accent she occasionally employs. 
The script also doesn't do quite enough with turning Magneto into a
genuinely tragic villain, especially given the amount of time devoted to
his back-story in the prologue. It's always tough for a film like X-MEN to
lay the foundation while still delivering the goods, so it's inevitable
that there are going to be some lulls and loose ends. I was startled,
however, by how few there were. Maybe my inner adolescent fan-boy did
emerge during X-MEN, but it emerged because the film reminded me of the
best the comic book had to offer, as well as some of the best an action
film can offer. I think it was worth the wait, though I have a sneaking
suspicion it won't be 23 years before the X-Men hit the screen again.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS
(Universal)
Starring:  Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro.
Screenplay:  Terry Gilliam & Tony Grisoni and Tod Davies & Alex Cox.
Producers:  Laila Nabulsi, Patrick Cassavetti and Stephen Nemeth.
Director:  Terry Gilliam.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief gore, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Terry Gilliam's FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS is about as faithful
an adaptation of Hunter S. Thompson's 1971 "gonzo journalism" classic as I
can imagine...though that's not necessarily a good thing.  The book has
long been called "unfilmable," which probably referred more to whether it
_should_ be made than whether it _could_ be made.  As it happens, FEAR AND
LOATHING on film is nearly an event-for-event re-creation of the
adventures of journalist Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Benicio Del Toro), kindred spirits who ingest every possible
controlled substance during a wild spree through Vegas, ostensibly while
covering an off-road race and/or a law enforcement narcotics conference.
It's wild, perverse, incoherent, sometimes very funny, and too visually
literal an adaptation of a book best left to a twisted imagination.
     In terms of tone, at least, it's a nearly flawless companion piece to
Thompson's book.  The writer's descriptions of tripping on everything from
acid to mescaline to ether never assaulted the reader with horror stories
of harrowing experiences.  They were essentially journalistic, clinical
analyses where even the most unpleasant situations were softened with a
dollop of deadpan, left-field humor.  Gilliam similarly finds the demented
gag in every situation, including a hallucinogenic orgy of lounge lizards
(rendered as actual reptiles by makeup whiz Rob Bottin), while still
acknowledging the squalor.  With Depp doing a hilariously spot-on
performance of Thompson-as-Duke and Del Toro sporting plenty of extra flab
as the unhinged Dr. Gonzo, FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS feels exactly
like it should feel:  a cockeyed white-water rafting tour down a polluted
stream of consciousness.
     It's also true that an episodic film like FEAR AND LOATHING is only
as successful as its individual episodes.  Some of the most memorable ones
are grand pieces of absurdist theater:  Duke trying to skip out on a hotel
bill as a desk clerk detains him; Duke and Gonzo doing coke at the
narcotics conference while surrounded by cops; a flashback to Duke's first
acid trip in a nightclub restroom.  There are also several scenes which
turn absolute fidelity to the source material into grinding sluggishness.
At nearly two hours, FEAR AND LOATHING could have used some judicious
trimming; once we understand the situation and the characters, encounters
like Gonzo's showdown with a diner waitress (Ellen Barkin) feel like
excess weight.  A head-trip film like this one is better suited for 90
minutes of damn-the-torpedoes pacing than for this kind of reverence.
     Gilliam also manages to extract Thompson's one and only "message"
regarding the drug culture of the 60s and early 70s.  The film's temporal
setting -- "this foul Year of Our Lord nineteen hundred and seventy-one"
-- is defined as a turning point in the use and perception of drugs, with
the innocent notion of chemicals as reality-expanding tools giving way to
chemicals as reality-numbing tools.  Even here Gilliam's fidelity to the
source undermines him, as images of Vietnam and Nixon point a too-obvious
accusatory finger, with Thompson's own unapologetic voice subverted by
suggestions that he's just a victim of the times.  The audience for a film
as down and dirty as this one is limited anyway, but the now-anachronistic
incorrectness man not even appeal to the like-minded.
     FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS does do a solid job of capturing the
era's madness in a city which is a madhouse distillation of the American
dream; it's a scattershot rendering of a scattershot story told with
scattershot effectiveness.  It's also consistently intriguing, if for no
other reason than Gilliam's willingness to go every ugly place Thompson's
book went.  The only thing really wrong with Gilliam's FEAR AND LOATHING
is that it's a movie, bringing into vivid color that which should only
have lived on the page.  Gonzo film-making doesn't end up with quite the
same rebellious spark.

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
THE WINSLOW BOY (1999)
(Sony Classics)
Starring: Nigel Hawthorne, Jeremy Northam, Rebecca Pidgeon, Gemma Jones,
Guy Edwards, Colin Stinton, Aden Gillett, Matthew Pidgeon.
Screenplay: David Mamet, based on the play by Terence Rattigan.
Producer: Sarah Green.
Director: David Mamet.
MPAA Rating: G
Running Time: 100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Depending upon one's point of view, THE WINSLOW BOY is either as
unlikely a piece of material as one could expect from David Mamet or a
perfect fit in the Mamet oeuvre.  Certainly it's surprising to find Mamet
directing a script by another writer, even more surprising to find the
ultra-contemporary Mamet directing a period piece, and more surprising yet
to find the profanity-happy Mamet directing a G-rated script.  There's
also something perfectly Mamet-like in the film's themes of people seeking
the truth of things behind the formalized dance of conversation.  Mamet
isn't straying far from comfortable ground, but he strays far enough to
find an intriguing new perspective on film-making.  THE WINSLOW BOY may be
his finest work as a film director, perhaps because he's working from a
less tightly-controlled script.
     The story, set in the early 1910's, concerns an upper-middle class
English family called the Winslows.  Father Arthur (Nigel Hawthorne), a
banker, is comfortable with the life he has made, and even with the lives
of his underachieving son Dicky (Matthew Pidgeon) and Suffragette daughter
Catherine (Rebecca Pidgeon).  He is not at all comfortable, however, with
youngest son Ronny's (Guy Edwards) dismissal from military school when he
is accused of stealing a five-shilling postal order.  Determined to clear
his son's name, Arthur throws all his resources into Ronny's defense,
including retaining famed lawyer Sir Robert Morton (Jeremy Northam).  But
the Winslows face an uphill battle trying to obtain a civil trial before
either their money or Sir Robert's political connections run out.
     A contemporary movie-goer might expect THE WINSLOW BOY to turn into a
courtroom drama, chock full of witness stand backpedaling and banging
gavels.  In fact, there's not a second of courtroom footage in THE WINSLOW
BOY; the closest it gets is Morton's tense interview with Ronnie before
deciding to take the case.  Rattigan's text is more concerned with subtler
matters than the melodrama of legal confrontations, including issues still
resonant fifty years after the play's debut.  As the Winslows' resources
dwindle, Arthur begins to wonder whether he can afford to pursue the case
indefinitely, inspiring questions on the modern connection between wealth
and justice.  The story also attacks the casual dismissal of pursuits of
justice, not on the basis of right or wrong, but on the basis of how
annoying it is to have normalcy disrupted.
     As thought-provoking as THE WINSLOW BOY may be, however, it's often 
far too sedate in its interpersonal relationships.  Rattigan's narrative
generally focuses not on the people involved in the Winslow case, but on
all the business surrounding the case: the intense press scrutiny 
(including a "women's issues" reporter more interested in curtains than
Ronnie's guilt or innocence); the vagaries of public opinion; the
machinations required even to bring a case against the Admiralty.  The
characters in THE WINSLOW BOY face consequences for their choices, but the
choices are more interesting to Rattigan than those consequences.  There's
a Merchant Ivory vibe to the repressed emotions without the Merchant Ivory
readiness to show the intensity behind them.
     Mamet has never been known for his emotionalism, but the fault here
appears to lie far more with Rattigan.  Indeed, Mamet takes some of the
simplest scenes and charges them with more feeling than they might deserve
(notably Arthur's demand of honesty from Ronnie).  He has always been a
remarkably efficient film director, and THE WINSLOW BOY certainly doesn't
stray in that regard.  He does, however, find a facility with actors not 
always evident when he's working from his own words.  Hawthorne is
brilliant, Northam is appropriately enigmatic, and even Rebecca Pidgeon
seems vaguely human.  There's little Mamet can do with the huge chunks of
dialogue involving exposition of off-stage events, or to fill in the
spaces between the people, but he does a lot with a story that's more
conceptual than actual.  THE WINSLOW BOY is an interesting challenge to
which Mamet rises, applying his intricate construction as well to a
stately manor as he does to a skyscraper.

Title
Review for Death and the Maiden (1994)
Starring:  Sigourney Weaver, Ben Kingsley, Stuart Wilson.
Screenplay:  Rafael Yglesias and Ariel Dorfman.
Director:  Roman Polanski.
     One of 1994's most unintentionally hilarious films was the
adaptation of Isabel Allende's THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS, a bloated
epic in which Jeremy Irons, Meryl Streep, Glenn Close and Winona
Ryder were supposed to be playing Latin Americans.  It baffled me
that such casting could take place in an age where an Anglo playing
any other race would incite riots, and the casting of SPIRITS was
ultimately much of its undoing.  Roman Polanski has made the same
choice with DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, and again it was a very bad one.
While as a concept DEATH AND THE MAIDEN is strong and intriguing
enough to maintain interest, it is sabotaged by actors who often
appear not to have the faintest idea what to do with the material.
     Sigourney Weaver stars as Paulina Escobar, a woman still
suffering profound psychological side effects after being tortured
as a political prisoner fifteen years earlier in an unnamed South
American country.  The fascist government is recently fallen as the
film opens, and Paulina's husband Gerardo (Stuart Wilson) is
preparing to investigate the human rights violations of the old
regime.  One stormy evening, Gerardo's car gets a flat near their
seaside home, and he is given a ride home by Dr. Roberto Miranda
(Ben Kingsley).  When she hear's Miranda's voice, Paulina becomes
convinced that he is the man who repeatedly raped her during the
torture sessions, and she takes him hostage.  Although Miranda
protests that he is not the man, and Gerardo believes Paulina is
crazy, Paulina insists that Miranda make a full and sincere
confession of his crimes, or she will kill him.
     The psychological underpinnings of DEATH AND THE MAIDEN are a
complex set of relationships and interactions which make for an
extremely promising story.  At its heart is Paulina's conviction in
Miranda's guilt, a conviction which we should always doubt because
of her paranoia and unreliability.  Unfortunately, as it plays out,
the performances and direction make our choice far too easy for us.
Sigourney Weaver is part of the problem, playing Paulina not just
over the top (which is probably where the role should be) but so far
over the top that she falls off the top.  Weaver as a personality
simply seems too strong to be so close to complete breakdown, so she
makes up for it by contorting her face and snarling.  But a more
serious problem is the performance of Ben Kingsley, who is
approaching a land speed record for most different races and
nationalities played in a career.  He plays Miranda as such a little
weasel that if he's not guilty of this particular crime, we figure
he must be guilty of _something_.  The part requires more ambiguity,
and the very talented Kingsley just doesn't deliver in this case.
     Perhaps even more disappointing is the relationship between
Paulina and Gerardo, which is remarkably intricate.  Paulina's
torture was the result of refusing to give Gerardo's name as the
publisher of an opposition newspaper during the dictatorship, but
she is repaid by betrayals both real (an affair Gerardo had while
she was in prison) and perceived (his acceptance of the position
with what Paulina believes is a shadow court to slap torturers on
the wrist).  Her feelings for Gerardo range from hatred that she
sacrificed herself for him to a love more necessary for self-
preservation than real; Gerardo, meanwhile, never feels quite worthy
of what she did for him.  All this is in the text, but somehow
director Roman Polanski doesn't let it out.  Paulina never seems to
love Gerardo, while Gerardo is mostly befuddled.  The moments when
they do reveal themselves, all in very stagy speeches, ring hollow
because the same truths should have been evident in the
performances.
     Once upon a time, Roman Polanski was a master at building
suspense (CHINATOWN, ROSEMARY'S BABY, REPULSION), but he rarely gets
the tone of DEATH AND THE MAIDEN right.  One scene shows what might
have been, late in the film when Kingsley makes a confession.
Polanski holds a very long take on Kingsley, refusing to cut to
Weaver's reaction, and at that moment you genuinely wonder whether
this is a guilty man spilling his guts or an innocent man giving the
performance of a lifetime to save his skin.  But moments later,
Polanski cops out with a too-obvious resolution.  The performances
in DEATH AND THE MAIDEN should have created a mystery.  Instead, the
mystery is why they couldn't make the material work.

Title
Review for Kiss of Death (1995)
Starring:  David Caruso, Nicolas Cage, Samuel L. Jackson,
           Stanley Tucci, Michael Rapaport, Helen Hunt, Kathryn Erbe,
           Ving Rhames.
Screenplay:  Richard Price.
Director:  Barbet Schroeder.
     To answer the most obvious question first: no, David Caruso's
naked posterior does not appear in KISS OF DEATH, although it might
have been appropriate.  After one highly-publicized season on "NYPD
Blue" which included even-more-highly-publicized dorsal nudity,
Caruso left the series in a yet-more-highly-publicized squabble over
salary and time off to make movies, which had fellow cast members
suggesting that he not let the door hit his bare backside on the way
out.  Caruso's first opportunity for an "I told you so" comes in
KISS OF DEATH, but he might be advised to postpone any self-
congratulation.  In a film that is erratic but frequently intense,
his casting in the lead role is the most glaring flaw.
     Caruso plays Jimmy Kilmartin, a car thief trying to straighten
out his life after a stint in prison.  Unfortunately, he is pulled
back into another job by his bad-news cousin Ronnie (Michael
Rapaport), a job that goes bad and lands Jimmy back in prison.
While inside he agrees to become a state's witness for District
Attorney Frank Zioli (Stanley Tucci), but the one deal Jimmy makes
isn't good enough for Zioli.  As Jimmy comes up for parole, he is
pressured into going undercover into the crime organization run by
Little Junior Brown (Nicolas Cage), a psycho with a very short fuse.
Caught between Little Junior, Zioli and a cop with a score to settle
(Samuel L. Jackson), Jimmy realizes that his only way out is to take
matters into his own hands.
     The screenplay for KISS OF DEATH, written by Richard Price
based on a 1947 film noir of the same name, is a dense piece of
plotting, but an extremely confident one.  Like a novel, KISS OF
DEATH unfolds in well-developed pieces, building towards a solid
conclusion with very little extraneous material.  The plot's twists
are both relevant and unexpected, and director Barbet Schroeder
keeps a steady hand on the pace.  Yet somehow, in the middle of all
the clockwork plotting, gaping flaws in logic and flat-out
sloppiness appear.  In one sequence, Kilmartin's family is supposed
to be under police protection, but his daughter is allowed to play
on a swing along what is apparently a main thoroughfare with only
one guard, while earlier two agents with high-powered rifles stood
watch while she played near a secluded cliffside.  Then, near the
end of the film, one of the big payoff revelations is spoiled by an
unnecessary establishing shot.  It sometimes seems that Schroeder is
so busy painting the trim on the house that is KISS OF DEATH that he
fails to notice it's missing a wall.
     It's a good thing that so many of the people in that house are
so interesting.  Samuel L. Jackson turns in one of his now-routine
dynamite supporting turns as Calvin, the wounded cop who develops an
unexpected connection with Jimmy.  He is mis-used in the conclusion
for a gimmicky applause moment, but otherwise turns in stellar work.
Michael Rapaport, still growing his hair out from his role as the
skinhead in HIGHER LEARNING, is fantastic as the sleazy Ronnie right
through to his brutal comeuppance, as is Anthony Heald in a small
role as Little Junior's slick and savvy attorney.  Add Stanley
Tucci's duplicitous D. A. and Helen Hunt as Jimmy's recovering
alcoholic wife, and you have one of the best supporting casts since
PULP FICTION.
     Unlike PULP FICTION, however, the lead performances are not of
the same caliber.  Nicolas Cage is an actor who has shown the
ability to play everything from romantic leads to villains, but
there is no center to Little Junior.  One second he is brutal but
shrewd; the next he is simply off his nut.  As for Caruso, he is
given a role that would be a challenge to make sympathetic by an
actor with much greater range.  Caruso is unable to give Jimmy any
humanity, delivering every line in the same hushed,
primed-to-explode manner.  Only he never does explode, and it is
particularly telling that Jimmy's one big emotional outburst occurs
behind a closed door.  We need to see Jimmy as a charater reacting
to what is happening to him, but by playing him with an omnipresent
hangdog resignation, Caruso might have been the KISS OF DEATH for a
potentially engrossing thriller.

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
     These are the times that try a critic's soul, these summer months of
high budgets and low expectations.  They are the times that can make me
begin to question what it is I am looking for in escapist entertainment,
as I read raves for hyped-up disappointments like TWISTER and MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE and wonder what it is that I am supposed to be missing.  They
are the times when a piece of fluff like DRAGONHEART seems that much
better when compared to the competition, and they are the times when a
film like THE ARRIVAL, lacking a big star or never-before-seen special
effects, will likely drown in a sea of higher-profile releases.  But THE
ARRIVAL is the kind of thriller which reminds me _exactly_ what I'm
looking for in escapist entertainment:  a script which has genuine wit,
genuine intelligence, and genuine excitement, and which convinces me that
the writer spent at least as much time creating it as I spent watching it.
That perfectly describes THE ARRIVAL.
     Charlie Sheen stars as Zane Ziminski, a radio astronomer working at a
Search for Extra-Terrestrial Intelligence (SETI) facility, searching the
skies for signals of other-worldly origin.  On one late-night shift, that
is exactly what he finds, yet Zane's boss Phil Gordian (Ron Silver) seems
remarkably cool to the news, and in fact informs Zane that he is being
laid off.  But Zane refuses to let go of his discovery, and his continuing
investigation leads him to Mexico.  There he hooks up with Ilana Green
(Lindsay Crouse), an atmospheric researcher studying global warming.
Together, they begin to discover a conspiracy which suggests that the
aliens aren't just coming -- they're already here.
     THE ARRIVAL marks the directing debut of writer David Twohy (THE
FUGITIVE and the under-appreciated TERMINAL VELOCITY), and he demonstrates
such a keen understanding of what makes an action thriller work that it
seems he was born for the job.  In the first minute of the film, he
grabbed me by the collar with a beautifully constructed opening sequence,
and for the next 109 minutes he simply refused to let go.  There are
sequences in THE ARRIVAL which play like textbook examples of how to build
tension, particularly one involving a room full of scorpions which is
guaranteed to have you squirming if you have a pulse.  There is a kind of
suspense which plots based on paranoia are much better at generating, and
Twohy nails it, as well as turning it to humorous effect by connecting the
greenhouse effect and the failure of the Hubble telescope to alien
visitors.
     That is really what separates THE ARRIVAL from the pack:  a sense of
humor which surpasses most of the so-called comedies I see in any given
year.  Sheen has a solid, deadpan sense of comic timing which worked well
with Twohy's TERMINAL VELOCITY script, and again he wraps each line in a
wry self-awareness.  Zane is not a particularly dynamic role -- he's
gung-ho about finding extra-terrestrial life, but it's never quite clear
why -- and another actor might have given it more depth.  However, Sheen
makes the comic lines feel un-scripted, and he appears to be adept at
playing Twohy's favored hero -- a resourceful individual whose actions
under duress seem natural and basically intelligent.  Plus, there is a
priceless irony to Sheen, the most notorious and unapologetic customer of
"Hollywood Madam" Heidi Fleiss, reading the line, "There's something to be
said for abstinence."
     THE ARRIVAL is so effective in some of its early scenes that the big
sequence in the aliens' lair comes as something of a disappointment, since
Twohy seems less concerned with maintaining the pace than he is with
showing off his visual effects.  There are a few logical errors I caught
upon reflection, and the abrupt ending is likely to leave some viewers
feeling a bit unsatisfied.  But THE ARRIVAL is a rarity so far this summer
movie season:  it is a smart and tightly-plotted film that I couldn't
always out-guess, and didn't always find myself _trying_ to out-guess.  I
was so instantly aware of how skillfully David Twohy could manipulate me
that I simply let him.  And that, friends, is how I define "willing
suspension of disbelief."
o help us understand
her; she is merely presenting us with the facts of an individual's life
and the world surrounding that individual.  I SHOT ANDY WARHOL is
exceedingly well-documented, and that makes it great journalism.  Mary
Harron directs her actors and her environment to perfection, and that
makes it great theater.  What is missing is human drama, and a sense of
what this story is really about.  That, quite simply, does not make a
great film.

Title
Review for Mr. Jones (1993)
     There was a point during MR. JONES when it occurred to me that if
it had been made in French, someone might have championed it as an
understated bit of high culture.  It's well-directed, generally
well-acted, and includes several meaningful closeups and a few piano
performances.  It also features a story which goes absolutely nowhere.
If any film this year can be said to demonstrate a visual monotone,
it's MR. JONES.
     Richard Gere is Mr. Jones, a manic-depressive pianist turned
construction worker.  Jones is given to grand theatrics, such as
poising himself on the edge of a roof and claiming he's going to fly,
or jumping onstage at a symphony to conduct the orchestra.  After such
incidents, he is brought to a hospital where he is treated by Dr. Libby
Bowen (Lena Olin), a jittery psychiatrist recently separated from her
husband.  Dr. Bowen wants to have Mr.  Jones involuntarily committed,
but he convinces a judge that he's merely a grandiose personality.
However, he soon bottoms out of his euphoria, and voluntarily enters
the hospital to be treated.  Dr.  Bowen becomes attracted to Mr. Jones'
sense of living life on the edge and tries to help him exorcise his
demons, getting closer and closer to crossing the line between
therapist and patient.
     A film like MR. JONES has to walk its own very fine line, being
careful not to romanticize mental illness.  Unfortunately, MR. JONES is
doomed from the start because it's about a romance with a mentally ill
man.  Dr. Bowen is introduced as a compulsively late emotional wreck,
and we are expected to see her become more serene and appreciative of
life as she sees it through his eyes.  Is the idea that one can only
truly live while on the manic side of manic depression?  Or that Dr.
Bowen develops a protective love for this shattered man?  Both concepts
are fairly distasteful, and it makes it awfully hard for the love story
to generate any resonance.  It also hurts that Dr. Bowen's character is
terribly underdeveloped.  She is supposed to be the dynamic character
in this piece, like Tom Cruise to Dustin Hoffman in RAIN MAN, but
there's not a clear enough sense of where she's coming from to make
where she's going compelling.  MR. JONES is just a case of a poorly
developed basic premise.
     This basic premise is also undercut by a performance from Richard
Gere which is excellent, but toned totally wrong for the film.  It's a
daring portrayal, never kooky just for the sake of being kooky (like
Mary Stuart Masterson directing traffic with ping pong paddles in BENNY
& JOON), and willing to dig into the darker corners of this disturbed
man's psyche.  The problem is that Gere is so good at conveying Jones'
dark side that Dr. Bowen's attraction just doesn't make any sense.
Lena Olin spends most of the film sporting a look of bewildered
concern, and exactly where or why her attraction is supposed to begin
is never clear.  These two people seem to have been thrown into bed
together simply for the expendience of the story, and not because of
any character motivation.
     Where MR. JONES is likely to lose most viewers, however, is a tone
so muted that it's virtually inaudible.  Everything is slowly,
painstakingly framed, even those moments which are supposed to
represent Mr. Jones' mania.  There is virtually no underscore, causing
far too many scenes to come off cold and clinical.  Where some films
beat you over the head with big emotions, MR. JONES seems to dare you
to find any emotional attachment.  It doesn't help that some scenes are
poorly lit, and that in others Lena Olin's dialogue is almost
completely incomprehensible.  I want to admire MR. JONES for not
leaning towards the sentimental, but it's no virtue to opt instead for
comatose.
     MR. JONES has been sitting on the shelf for a year or so, and it's
easy to see why.  It's a love story without much love, and a character
study low on character.  I was impressed by Richard Gere, but he alone
isn't reason enough to spend two hours with Mr. Jones ... whose first
name Dr. Bowen never bothers to ask.

Title
Review for Trees Lounge (1996)
Director:  Steve Buscemi.
Screenplay:  Steve Buscemi
Director of Photography:  Lisa Rinzler.
Producers:  Brad Wyman, Chris Hanley.
Editor:  Kate Williams.
Music:  Evan Lurie.
Starring:  Steve Buscemi, Mark Boone Junior, Chloe Sevigny, Eszter Balint,
Michael Buscemi, Anthony LaPaglia, Elizabeth Bracco, Daniel Baldwin.
Director:  Alan Taylor.
Screenplay:  David Epstein.
Director of Photography:  John Thomas.
Producer:  Uberto Pasolini.
Editor:  David Leonard.
Music:  Rachel Portman.
Starring:  Vincent Gallo, William Forsythe, Adam Trese, Lisa Gay Hamilton,
Bridgit Ryan, Kim Dickens, Gareth Williams.
     When two films as thematically similar as TREES LOUNGE and
PALOOKAVILLE appear virtually on top of one another, you have to take a
look around at the society which inspired them.  Americans have always
rooted for underdogs, but usually they like their underdogs to come out on
top.  What do we make of a pair of movies, both set in the Tri-State area,
which turn mere economic survival as an act of heroism?  TREES LOUNGE and
PALOOKAVILLE may be responses to an urban America where desperation is de
rigeur, but both films struggle to make black comedy out of bleak tragedy,
largely because they take our sympathies for granted.
     TREES LOUNGE, which marks the writing and directing debut of Steve
Buscemi, finds the erstwhile supporting actor playing the lead role of
Tommy Basilio, a man who has lost his job as a mechanic, his long-time
girlfriend Theresa (Elizabeth Bracco) and his way in the world.
Unemployed and unmotivated, Tommy spends his days and nights drowning his
sorrows at the Trees Lounge, a run-down watering hole where the other
regulars are almost as bad off as he is.  Among them is Mike (Mark Boone
Junior), who escapes from his apparently successful business and family at
the Trees, and Bill (Bronson Dudley), a lost soul who keeps his cash on
the bar to keep the drinks coming.  When Tommy finally gets a job
opportunity driving the ice cream truck left behind by his deceased uncle,
he is distracted by Debbie (KIDS' Chloe Sevigny), Theresa's 17-year-old
niece who is looking for an escape of her own.
     There is a detached verisimilitude to the people and situations in
TREES LOUNGE -- the indulgent bartender (Carol Kane); the barroom
conversations where strangers become best friends or lovers in the space
of a few hours -- which keeps it just interesting enough to earn the
benefit of the doubt for a while.  Buscemi gives his characters full
histories, and peppers the film with quirky moments like the repeatedly
thwarted efforts of one young boy to buy ice cream, yet the payoffs are
rather unsatisfying.  TREES LOUNGE cruises along, building up atmosphere
like a film in search of a Tom Waits soundtrack, but when it is all said
and done you might wonder what Buscemi wanted us to make of his cast of
not-so-beautiful losers.  Although he manages to get you interested in
what _might_ happen to them, he is not as successful at getting you to
care about what _does_ happen to them.
     That's more than you can say about the palookas in PALOOKAVILLE.  The
story involves three best friends -- Russ (Vincent Gallo), Sid (William
Forsythe) and Jerry (Adam Trese) -- all of whom are facing tough economic
times.  Russ is living at home with his mother, sister and brother-in-law;
Jerry has a child and a wife (Lisa Gay Hamilton) who is about to lose her
job at a supermarket; Sid and his dogs face eviction at any moment.
Together they decide that all they need to get back on their feet is a
"momentary shift in lifestyle"...more specifically, one big robbery.
While they plan for that big score, they struggle with relationships and
with half-hearted attempts to make legitimate money.
     PALOOKAVILLE was inspired by a collection of short stories (by
Italian writer Italo Calvino), and it feels every bit of it.  Director
Alan Taylor flits back and forth between episodes like Sid's budding
romance with a clerk at a used furs store (Bridgit Ryan) and the friends'
failed effort at starting a shuttle service for elderly shoppers, but he
never manages to unify them.  There is a real lack of narrative momentum
in PALOOKAVILLE, as stories bob and weave around the characters, giving
them just enough personality (Jerry's sweet tooth, Sid's soft spot for
dogs) to make it evident that they needed more.  Kim Dickens has a few
nice moments as Russ's young girlfriend, but our three protagonists are
never quite as sympathetic as they are pathetic.
     I suppose that is what makes PALOOKAVILLE even more disappointing
than TREES LOUNGE:  writer David Epstein seems to assume that we will feel
for his characters simply because they are in financial trouble.  There
are moments in PALOOKAVILLE when its serious turns make it clear that
there is a Statement About Desperate Times lurking beneath the attempts at
gallows humor, yet there is little effort to show that the predicaments of
Jerry, Sid and Russ are beyond their control.  In TREES LOUNGE, Tommy at
least comes to an understanding that he is partly responsible for his own
troubles, and that his preferred cure for those troubles may be even
worse; as sluggish as it may be, it does take Tommy on a journey of 
growth.  PALOOKAVILLE makes the mistake of asking us to identify with
three men who don't even seem to be trying, who surrender at any sign of
difficulty.  Yes, it's rough out there, as both TREES LOUNGE and
PALOOKAVILLE do an adequate job of presenting, but most of us already know
that.  Social consciousness still requires a story, and characters with a
motivation to make themselves -- and not just their bank accounts --
better.

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
     In 1990, at the ripe old age of 22, Julia Roberts became a Movie
Star.  She didn't plan it that way -- you _can't_ plan it that way -- but
PRETTY WOMAN placed her in that rarefied stratum of film performers
audiences will come to see on the strength of their names.  The trade-off,
of course, was that they would want to see her in very specific
circumstances:  beautiful and in love (PRETTY WOMAN, SOMETHING TO TALK
ABOUT) or beautiful and in danger (SLEEPING WITH THE ENEMY, THE PELICAN
BRIEF).  For a couple of years, Roberts tried to fight for her right to be
a Serious Actress, taking less glamorous roles (MARY REILLY) or supporting
roles (MICHAEL COLLINS, EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU) for A-list directors,
but the audience made its voice heard:  "We want our Pretty Woman back."
     In MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING, Roberts concedes to being a Movie Star
once again.  With her hair long and curly and her smile out in full force,  
she plays Julianne Potter, a food critic as choosy about her men as she is
about her creme brulee.  One of her former lovers, Michael O'Neal (Dermot
Mulroney), is also her best friend and confidante, the closest thing
Julianne has to "one that got away."  And indeed he may be getting away
for good after calling to inform Julianne that he is getting married in
four days.  The impending nuptials spark Julianne to the realization that
she really wants Michael for herself, and that she's ready to break up the
happy couple to do it.  She isn't expecting to find that Michael's fiancee
Kimmy (Cameron Diaz) is "annoyingly perfect," making the task of snaring
Michael a genuine challenge.
     That premise sets the stage for some potentially outrageous comedy of
the "all's fair in love and war" variety, but Roberts never looks entirely
comfortable with being outrageous.  The interpretation of Movie Star-dom
adopted by Roberts, screenwriter Ronald Bass and director P. J. Hogan
(MURIEL'S WEDDING) involves never being anything less than likeable, never
doing anything which risks turning the audience against you.  They don't
understand that one of the perqs of being a Movie Star is that the
audience is always ready to be on your side.  It's no great revelation
that there are only two possible outcomes in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING --
either Julianne will triumph over an out-classed opponent, or she'll learn
in important lesson and make a sacrifice.  In either case, we're ready to
be amused by her machinations before we get to that outcome; we greet
Julianne's announcement that Kimmy is "toast" with a chuckle of
anticipation, not a sigh of disapproval.
     The reason MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING isn't a better comedy, the reason
it meanders but rarely soars, is that Julianne's feeble efforts are about
as likely to toast Kimmy as a hot water bottle is to toast bread.  Bass's
script is guided by the idea that Julianne's hands should never get too
dirty.  She types up a phony email from Kimmy's father, but it is left to
someone else to send it (quite accidentally); she announces that her gay
friend George (Rupert Everett) is her fiancee to make Michael jealous,
then sits back while George plays the role to the hilt.  Roberts has some
wonderful reaction shots in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING, but she reacts far
more than she acts.  In one of the film's most ironic lines, Julianne
apologizes to Michael for all the "awful and not even terribly imaginative
things" she has done.  Bass might have been better served coming up with
more imaginative things rather than apologizing for the ones he came up
with.
     Surprisingly, MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is still fairly entertaining,
thanks to a few unexpected bursts of irreverence.  Director Hogan, who is
turning into a prime candidate to direct a musical some day, continues his
fascination with lip-synching to pop chestnuts, setting a slick opening
credits sequence to "Wishin' and Hopin'" and turning a rehearsal dinner
into an impromptu sing-along to "I Say a Little Prayer."  The latter scene
is a showcase for Rupert Everett, whose hilarious supporting work as 
George eliminates all fears of yet another "gay friend" character.  His
every moment on screen gives the film a jolt of comic energy, and proves
that it is possible to be both devilish and thoroughly appealing.  Julia
Roberts could have learned a few things by studying his performance.  If
this is what she feared about Movie Star roles -- that they would require
her merely to show up, smile and toss her hair -- she may have had good
reason to be concerned.  While MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is pretty amusing,
Roberts' return to being a Pretty Woman is pretty ordinary.

Title
Review for Carlito's Way (1993)
     Brian DePalma needs a hit *really* badly.  Since scoring big with
THE UNTOUCHABLES in 1987, DePalma has seen CASUALTIES OF WAR, RAISING
CAIN and particularly the disastrous BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES go down in
flames.  Consequently, it would be easy enough to consider CARLITO'S
WAY a shrewd commercial choice for DePalma, reteaming with Al Pacino
(SCARFACE) and returning to the gangland ground which has yielded his
two greatest box office successes.  It doesn't hurt any that he has
latched on to a solid story and brought out dynamite performances from
Pacino and Sean Penn.  CARLITO'S WAY, while hampered by DePalma's
characteristic excesses and stylistic cannibalism, is a truly tense and
engrossing drama.
     Carlito Brigante (Pacino) is a life-long criminal who finds
himself unexpectedly given a second chance.  In 1975, Carlito is
released from prison after serving only five years of a thirty year
sentence when his conviction is overturned on a technicality.  He
declares himself reformed, tired of life on the streets and determined
to fulfill his simple dream of buying into a rental car business in the
Bahamas.  Among those who find this conversion hard to believe are
David Kleinfeld (Penn), Carlito's crooked attorney and childhood
friend, and bodyguard Pachanga (Luis Guzman).  Carlito rediscovers old
flame Gail (Penelope Ann Miller), and seems ready to retire in peace.
Old ways die hard, though, and old associates pull Carlito step by step
back into a life he can't seem to shake.
     CARLITO'S WAY will probably make the strongest impression with the
two outstanding set pieces which bracket the film.  In the first,
Carlito accompanies his young cousin on a drug buy which will have
anyone with a pulse on the edge of their seat; the film closes with an
equally thrilling chase through the New York subway and Grand Central
Station.  Both highlight DePalma's gift for choreographed mayhem, and
these are not the only occasions when the stage blood flows freely.
Yet for all the viscera, I found the character study even more
compelling.  Carlito Brigante has a lot of Michael Corleone in him, an
aging gangster trying unsuccessfully to go legit.  But where the
culmination of the GODFATHER saga played like opera, there's more of an
immediacy to CARLITO'S WAY, an ever-present sense of doom launched by
the title sequence which sets the flashback story in motion.  You sense
that there's no way, after so many years, that Carlito can stay out of
trouble.  Indeed, he observes that his attempt at the straight life is
more a function of time than a change of heart:  "You don't get
reformed; you just run out of wind."  Pacino captures Carlito's dilemma
with surprising subtlety and the cautious observation borne of years of
experience watching every corner for an enemy.  Sean Penn is even
better, turning in his best performance to date as Kleinfeld.  A Jew in
the world of Puerto Rican and Italian wiseguys, Kleinfeld is an
outsider with a huge chip on his shoulder.  He could have been simply
pathetic, a heavy drinker and cocaine addict playing tough with guys
way out of his league, but Penn invests Kleinfeld with tremendous
nervous energy and an overwhelming survival instinct.  He shows a man
moving steadily towards the brink, making the moment he goes over quite
jolting.
     As compelling as the narrative is, viewers may experience a
profound sense of deja vu.  DePalma continues to steal shamelessly from
other directors, this time adding Scorsese to his repertoire with a
point of view tracking shot and a Copacabana scene with more than
passing resemblances to GOODFELLAS.  He even recycles some of his own
previous plagiarisms, like a 360 degree swing around a kiss (VERTIGO
via BODY DOUBLE) and the climactic shootout which will strike many as
far too reminiscent of the train station sequence from THE
UNTOUCHABLES.  From a story standpoint, there's an obligatory love
story with a cliche'd long-suffering girlfriend character.  Penelope
Ann Miller is a good but limited actor who doesn't do anything new with
the role, and eventually she becomes just a distraction, never
integrated fully enough into the story.
     Still, it's easier to be forgiving of superficial flaws when the
backbone is so solid.  The two principle characters held an iron grip
on my attention, one all the cinematic thievery in the world couldn't
break.  CARLITO'S WAY plays like a tragic novel:  deliberate, confident
and powerful.  Those willing to grant DePalma his tendencies towards
the extreme should find themselves well- rewarded.

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
THE 6TH DAY
(Columbia)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Tony Goldwyn, Michael Rapaport, Robert
Duvall, Michael Rooker, Sarah Wynter, Wendy Crewson, Todd Rowland.
Screenplay:  Cormac Wibberley & Marianne Wibberley.
Producers:  Mike Medavoy, Arnold Schwarzenegger and Jon Davison.
Director:  Roger Spottiswoode.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  124 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's been more than a little bit sad watching Arnold Schwarzenegger
turn into an object of fond nostalgic reminiscence. Nobody's kidding
anybody here -- the big guy has always been an iconic presence first, last
and always. Back in the '80s and early '90s, however, that presence was
put to effective use in guilty action pleasures (COMMANDO, PREDATOR) and
genuine action pleasures (the TERMINATOR films, TOTAL RECALL). What does
he have to show for most of the last decade? THE LAST ACTION HERO, BATMAN
& ROBIN, JINGLE ALL THE WAY and END OF DAYS. Going to an "Ah-nuld" movie
became a desperate grab at what he used to be: American cinema's one true
super-hero.
     There's no point going overboard with praise for THE 6TH DAY, a solid
action thriller and little more. It is, however, a pleasure to watch
Schwarzenegger in action without cringing in embarrassment. He plays Adam
Gibson, a charter pilot in a near-future America where genetic
manipulation is rampant but human cloning is illegal. Gibson heads home
from work one day to find himself already with his family -- presumed dead
after his business partner (Michael Rappaport) takes his assignment one
day, he has been replaced by a clone. When those responsible, including
billionaire Michael Drucker (Tony Goldwyn) discover the overlapping
Gibsons, it becomes necessary to erase one of them. That leaves Gibson
running for his life from apparently immortal assassins and trying to
figure out how he can get his life and family back.
     The title of THE 6TH DAY refers to the Genesis verse about the
creation of man, and the film as a whole fiddles around with questions of
bio-ethics and playing God. Surprisingly, it does so in a manner that's
both moderately intelligent and fairly clever. The script by Cormac and
Marianne Wibberley has fun with near-future developments like life-size
genetically-engineered dolls (with creepy, Chuckie-like features), cloned
versions of deceased pets (the wonderfully named RePet) and virtual
girlfriends, while still addressing the legitimate issues involved in
human cloning. The pseudo-science that advances the plot is far from
consistent -- the cloned assassins somehow remember their deaths even
though their memories hadn't been "backed up" to that point -- but it
rarely proves intrusive enough to sabotage the whole package.
     One of the reasons it's easier to enjoy that package is that it's so
simple to unwrap. Too many action films ignore the genre's basic rules for
success: create a likeable enough protagonist; give him worth adversaries;
pump up the energy for the set pieces; and don't over-think things.
There's nothing spectacular about any of the action sequences in THE 6TH
DAY, but spectacle isn't the real selling point here. Roger Spottiswoode
is a competent enough action director who finds just the right pacing for
his key moments. He does tend to over-direct the expository segments,
reducing even the most basic domestic moments to snippets of film, and
proves overly fond of jittery, distorted point-of-view shots for
characters' memories. Fortunately, he finds the right pace when it counts,
and avoids action overkill. The result is a film that keeps moving without
feeling as though it's dragging you along or assaulting your senses.
     It's also simply enjoyable seeing Schwarzenegger return to form. He
has always shown a great sense of humor about his screen image (beyond the
trademark quips, even), and he gets a few opportunities here to indulge
his lighter side. He also avoids over-indulging that lighter side, so that
decidedly un-whimsical pillow fights between Gibson and his wife (Wendy
Crewson) don't inspire a gag reflex. THE 6TH DAY finds Arnold armed with a
few one-liners, but he's not over-indulged there either. In fact, there's
a refreshing quality of "just enough" to most of the film. There's a
pointless explosion here or a bit too much exposition there, but from
start to finish it's generally concerned with delivering the goods. It's
faint praise, but praise nonetheless. And after nearly a decade, it's
worth a nod of encouragement that Arnold Schwarzenegger finally doesn't
look like a lost action hero.

Title
Review for Fresh (1994)
Starring:  Sean Nelson, Giancarlo Esposito, Samuel L. Jackson,
N'Bushe Wright, Luis Lantigua.
Screenplay/Director:  Boaz Yakin.
     The recent commercial and critical success of such urban-themed
films as BOYS N THE HOOD and MENACE II SOCIETY is proving to be a
strange double-edged sword.  While they have inspired more films
focused on inner city life, there seems to be a developing perception
among mainstream moviegoers that they are more or less interchangeable,
that if you've seen one film with urban kids shooting at each other,
you've seen them all.  Not only does this perception perpetuate the
idea that there is only one story to tell about the inner cities, but
it can force some fantastic films to the margins before they even have
a chance.  Witness FRESH, a powerful urban drama that ranks among the
year's best and most devastating works.
     FRESH is the street tag of Michael (Sean Nelson), a
twelve-year-old New York youth with a dream of making it out of the
projects.  He slowly builds an impressive roll of cash by making
deliveries for heroin dealer Esteban (Giancarlo Esposito), as well as
selling crack on the streets.  However, he soon finds himself in
trouble from every direction.  He is a witness to a murder committed by
a short-fused neighborhood tough (Jean LaMarre), and is in danger of
going back to a group home when his aunt disapproves of his
activities.  Fearing for his very life, Fresh begins applying the chess
lessons of his absentee father (Samuel L. Jackson) to a plan to make
his dream a reality.
     FRESH easily could have been just another drama about drugs n the
hood, but what makes it truly harrowing is its focus on pre-teenagers.
Fresh is smart enough to realize that the trash talk of the streets
means nothing, but for his classmates, particularly the loud-mouthed
Chuckie (Luis Lantigua), it is a rite of passage.  By mimicking the
language that surrounds them, even as they discuss baseball cards and
comic books, they become part of the cycle before they even realize
it.  The words themselves at a certain point become meaningless,
particularly when Chuckie tries to convince Esteban that he too should
make deliveries because he's "got all the dope moves." Writer-director
Boaz Yakin creates a portrait of doomed youth that is gripping and
gut-churning.
     The centerpiece of this study is a stunning performance by young
Sean Nelson as Fresh.  There is not a moment when he rings false, his
eyes betraying a sadness beyond his years and a burning intelligence.
His reaction to one of the film's pivotal scenes, involving a shootout
in a schoolyard, is jaw-dropping, and it's only one of many wrenching
moments he has to carry.  The film's third act only works because we
believe that Fresh is so sharp and observant, and the final scene only
works because we understand how much he wishes it hadn't been
necessary.  As FRESH ends, Michael's street tag takes on a bitter irony
as his "freshness" disappears.
     Nelson gets more than enough assistance from a superb supporting
cast.  Samuel L. Jackson plays Fresh's father with a shaky dignity, one
that doesn't require an explicit explanation as to why he is not
Fresh's guardian.  Though similar to Laurence Fishburne's character in
SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER, it's more layered, and more imbued with
history.  Giancarlo Esposito is a subtle and complex figure as Esteban,
and delivers a skin-crawling scene as he describes his lust for Fresh's
sister while cradling his infant daughter.  From top to bottom the
performers do just a little more than you might expect, turning the
stereotype into a flesh and blood character.
     In many ways, FRESH is an extremely pessimistic film, and as such
will be difficult to watch.  It is about innocence corrupted, described
in shocking detail with no punches pulled.  I left FRESH with my mouth
literally hanging open, affected to the bone by a spectacular piece of
storytelling.

Title
Review for Multiplicity (1996)
Starring:  Michael Keaton, Andie MacDowell, Richard Masur, John DeLancie,
Eugene Levy, Harris Yulin.
Screenplay:  Chris Miller, Mary Hale, Lowell Ganz, Babaloo Mandel, Harold
Ramis.
Director:  Harold Ramis.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There have been many instances where my positive reaction to a film
has been as much a result of what it _wasn't_ as what it was, and
GROUNDHOG DAY may be the perfect example.  On paper, it was a high-concept
premise with nowhere to go, an over-extended "Twilight Zone" episode with
a laugh-track.  There didn't appear to be any way to make an infinitely
repeated day anything but infinitely repetitious, but director/co-writer
Harold Ramis and co-writer Danny Rubin startled me with a comedy of
improbable inventiveness and even more improbable resonance.
MULTIPLICITY, Ramis' latest project, arrives with many of the same warning
signs, and again it stays fresher through its running time than you might
expect.  This time, however, the comedy is as instantly disposable as it
is enjoyable.
     MULTIPLICITY stars Michael Keaton as Doug Kinney, a construction
foreman living the 1990s version of the American Dream:  a beautiful wife,
Laura, (Andie MacDowell); two wonderful children; a never-quite-completed
dream house...and almost no time to enjoy any of them.  Changes at work
are threatening to make Doug's life even more hectic, but he is offered a
unique solution to his time crunch by geneticist Dr. Owen Leeds (Harris
Yulin) -- the opportunity to be cloned, to have a second self help
shoulder the burden of his responsibilities.  The procedure is a success,
and Doug #1 finds himself able to enjoy life more as #2 takes over his
job responsibilities.  But even two Doug Kinneys doesn't seem to be
enough, and when Doug #3 enters the picture, the opportunities for
disaster multiply right along with him.
     In a way that GROUNDHOG DAY never was, MULTIPLICITY really is a
gimmick film.  It was easy to summarize GROUNDHOG DAY's plot in a short
sentence, but it was always about the change in Bill Murray's Phil Connor.
MULTIPLICITY is always about the farce of several Doug Kinneys getting
each other into trouble, and the fact that it works so well and so often
shows how artfully Ramis is able to execute that farce.  Michael Keaton
has tremendous fun with the Doug his three clones, each of whom has a
rather specialized personality for his designed purpose -- #2, the
workaholic, is a hard-nosed man's man, while #3, the housekeeper, is sort
of a cross between John Bradshaw and the Anal-Retentive Chef.  The comedy
gets rather broad with Doug #4, the "copy of a copy" who turns out to be
"special, but the situations are great showcases for those characters, and
Keaton does some good work considering he is often working with no one but
himself.  Particularly memorable:  a night when Doug #1 is away and the
three clones get a chance to play...with a sexually insatiable Laura.
     MULTIPLICITY is a very funny film, full of clever touches like the
character of a blissfully incompetent sub-contractor played by Eugene Levy
and a housing development called "Vista del Nada" (View of Nothing), and
it's easy to keep smiling through most of its 110 minutes.  Unfortunately,
its attempts at a message get rather muddled.  Contributing screenwriters
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel (CITY SLICKERS, FORGET PARIS) have a
tendency to paint emotional situations in extremely broad strokes, and
that leads to some rather forced conflicts between Doug and Laura.  Andie
MacDowell, who was so good in GROUNDHOG DAY, doesn't have the chance to
make an impression here; her character is a necessity, not an individual.
As the film wraps up, Doug is forced to save his marriage by facing hard
truths about himself, but exactly what those truths are and how they
relate to the cloning escapades which have come before are never quite
clear.
     There are a number of rough edges in MULTIPLICITY (including the
excessively grainy special effects photography by Richard Edlund which
allow the four Dougs to interact), and they are mostly the result of an
attempt to be the kind of film GROUNDHOG DAY was:  a laugh-out-loud comedy
which also managed to be about something warm and human.  That kind of
film is a rarity indeed, and it is no sin to have aspirations to that kind
of completeness.  MULTIPLICITY, however, is simply a laugh-out-loud comedy
about clones running around, and the mayhem which ensues.  Ramis set
himself a high bar with GROUNDHOG DAY, but you don't need to set a world
record every time out to be a winner.  In MULTIPLICITY, one laugh usually
turns into another.

Title
Review for One Night Stand (1997)
     The first half of Mike Figgis' ONE NIGHT STAND contains some of the
most effective film-making moments to hit American screens this year, yet
even at the outset it's obvious that Figgis isn't working at his sharpest.
The film opens with protagonist Max Carlyle (Wesley Snipes) directly
addressing the audience as he walks down a Manhattan street.  He relates
to us that he's a successful L.A.-based television commercial director,
happily married with children and hoplessly straight, though some of his
best friends are gay.  In fact, the reason he's in New York is to mend
fences with Charlie Reevis (Robert Downey Jr.), an estranged gay buddy Max
just learned has AIDS.  It's a lazy narrative device which allows Figgis
five minutes of screen time to re-hash the press notes before allowing Max
to finish with a portentous "We'll see what happens."
     What happens, at least for nearly an hour, is a marvelously detailed
portrait of an isolated infidelity and what it means to a man's life.  In
his New York hotel, Max meets a beautiful woman named Karen (Nastassja
Kinski), then ends up spending the evening in her company after missing
his flight back to California.  One string quartet concert and a thwarted
mugging later, Max and Karen are sharing a bed, and a sexual encounter
staged with tremendous eloquence.  The sequence lingers and builds,
showing the participants taking tentative steps while fooling themselves
that each subsequent step is as far as they will go.
    The scenes between Max and Karen are tantalizing, but they're also
risky, since Figgis is showing us an act of adultery without first
providing much context to build sympathy for the characters.  That doesn't
happen until Max returns to Los Angeles, and we get a chance to see him
with his wife Mimi (Ming-Na Wen).  In one outrageous and hilarious scene,
Figgis shows Mimi ordering Max through a fast and furious bout of
lovemaking.  The two sex scenes in ONE NIGHT STAND are probably the most
disparate I've seen in a single film, and the most uniquely effective.
Max's shallow, romanceless life unfolds gradually, allowing the
significance of his one night stand to build in our minds even as it
builds in his.
     All is well in ONE NIGHT STAND until the words "One Year Later"
appear on the screen, at which point the film begins to disintegrate like
a bad marriage.  In part, the casting of Snipes in the lead role is
responsible.  Snipes is a reliable performer, but he never seems entirely
in touch with this character.  To be fair, Figgis has written the part as
the most guilt-wracked, angst-filled and introspective soul this side of
Hamlet.  Max spends much of the second half of ONE NIGHT STAND wandering
about in a heavy-lidded daze, ever on the verge of bursting into a
profound soliloquy.  There are a couple of solid moments between Snipes
and Downey (affecting and acerbic as the terminally ill Charlie), but at a
certain point, 45 minutes in anticipation of a life-changing revelation
feels like about 30 minutes too many.
     The blame for that belongs entirely with Figgis, who can't hold the
level of interest built by the film's first half.  At turns he opts either
to tell too much (in Snipes' opening monologue) or too little (in most of
the second hour).  It's a story which hints and teases, then offers a
resolution which asks for a tremendous leap of faith as to the
compatibility of certain characters.  What begins as honest and probing
turns sluggish, predictable and coy.  ONE NIGHT STAND is at its most
provocative when it finds a man beginning to question everything
fundamental in his life.  Sooner or later, for our sake if not for his
own, he needs to stop questioning and actually do something.  Snipes as
the melancholy Dane isn't the stuff of which great drama is made.

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
     As well-known as Spike Lee may be as a film-maker or spokesman for
African-American causes, he may be equally well-known as a basketball fan.
Most Americans first saw Lee's work in Nike commercials of the late 80s,
featuring Michael Jordan and Lee himself as SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT character
Mars Blackmon.  Since then, Lee has become a much-lauded film director,
but he has also become a vocal court-side fixture at New York Knicks
games, moonlighting as director and narrator of Nike ads supporting
women's basketball.  Make no mistake, Spike loves his hoops.
     I can't help but feel that love clouded Lee's judgment as he put
together HE GOT GAME.  The story deals with the strained relationship
between convicted felon Jake Shuttlesworth (Denzel Washington) and his
teenage son Jesus (with the Biblical, not Spanish, pronunciation, and
played by Milwaukee Bucks guard Ray Allen).  As Jake finds himself out of
prison after nearly six years, he tries to re-connect with his son and
daughter (Zelda Harris), only to find Jake deeply embittered and unable to
forgive.  Jesus also happens to be the #1 high school basketball prospect
in the nation, which is the reason his father is on the streets again.
The governor wants Jesus to attend his alma mater Big State, and offers
Jake the prospect of early parole if he can persuade his son to sign a
letter of intent.  Unfortunately, Jake is competing with plenty of other
people -- Jake's uncle (Bill Nunn), his girlfriend (Rosaria Dawson),
agents, college coaches and various hangers-on -- who all hope Jesus will
show them the money if they show it to him first.
     The corrupt race to recruit top high school athletes isn't exactly
fresh subject matter, having already appeared in the 1994 film BLUE CHIPS.
Lee puts a humorous spin on some of the ridiculous excesses of the
process, but his real chance at originality would have been putting us
inside the head of the young men, most from impoverished backgrounds,
facing these dizzying attempts to influence.  That's somwhere Lee and
first-time actor Ray Allen never take us, allowing us to see the insanity
without allowing us to understand how Jesus really feels about it.  Allen
looks comfortable enough on screen, but his character is too passive, so
fundamentally decent he never seems fazed by anything.  Lee has a lot of
stuff he wants to show us; Jesus's role is more or less to absorb it all.
     As it turns out, Lee has so much to show that he keeps getting
sidetracked from the one undeniable strength of HE GOT GAME, the
relationship between Jake and Jesus.  Washington is typically impressive,
most notably in a pair of dynamic schoolyard sequences:  relentlessly
driving young Jesus to improve his game in a flashback, then competing
with Jesus in a one-on-one game.  Both sequences tear into the heart of
Jake's sense of his own lost opportunities, burning with the intense
competition between father and son and unspoken desires to return to
simpler times.
     If Lee had centered on that relationship, HE GOT GAME might have been
a truly memorable film.  Yet Lee keeps turning his attention elsewhere --
a strange sub-plot involving Jake's relationship with a young prostitute
(Milla Jovovich), pointless banter between Jake and his two parole
officers.  Mostly, however, he's distracted by basketball, blasting heroic
Aaron Copland compositions at every slow-motion image of schoolyard ball.
There's enough thematic material here for two films; Lee decides to make
them both simultaneously.  The resulting film feels scattershot, heavy on
interesting images and ideas but light on cohesiveness.  Somewhere in
there is an engrossing family drama, often relegated to the nosebleed
seats while Lee keeps pulling us courtside to watch his inner city story
with a basketball backdrop turn into a basketball story.

Title
Review for Smilla's Sense of Snow (1997)
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Julia Ormond, Gabriel Byrne, Richard Harris, Robert Loggia,
Clipper Miano.
Screenplay:  Ann Biderman, based on the novel by Peter Hoeg.
Producers:  Bernd Eichinger and Martin Moskowicz.
Director:  Bille August.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Before SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW, the last time director Bille August
gut hold of a mysterious, best-selling novel was 1994's THE HOUSE OF THE
SPIRITS.  If that thought doesn't send a shudder of dread through you at
the prospects for SMILLA, you were probably fortunate enough to miss THE
HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS.  SPIRITS was a disastrous combination of mis-guided
casting and even more mis-guided story-telling, and it lost all sense of
Isabel Allende's magical realism.  Peter Hoeg's _Froken Smillas
Fornemmelse for Sne_ (Miss Smillas' Feeling for Snow) presented a
similarly challenging combination of atmosphere, character and plot, and
August, but this time around he has been much more faithful to the source
material.  Unfortunately, the result still isn't a particularly good film.
As tense and evocative as SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW is during its first hour,
it shares the fundamental flaw of the novel:  a strange plot device which
may leave you wondering if you've just seen "The X-Files" movie.
     Julia Ormond stars as Smilla Jaspersen, an arctic researcher living
in Copenhagen, Denmark.  A woman of Greenlandic Inuit descent who has
never felt comfortable in Denmark, Smilla has lived a life closed off from
all other people, with the exception of a young Inuit boy named Isaiah
(Clipper Miano) who lives in her apartment building.  That one friendship
is shattered when Isaiah is found dead on the sidewalk outside the
building, the victim of an apparent accidental fall from the roof.  But
Smilla has a special sense of snow, and her instincts tell her that
Isaiah's death was no accident -- he was running from something before he
fell to his death.  As Smilla investigates with the help of a neighbor
(Gabriel Byrne), she finds herself in the middle of a conspiracy which
will lead her back to the beautiful desolation of her icy homeland.
     You'd never expect a film with the plot I just described based on the
first scene in SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW.  It shows a 19th century Inuit ice
fisherman rudely interrupted from his labors by a crashing meteorite,
which proceeds to create a tidal wave of crushed ice sufficient to supply
the planet with daquiris for several decades.  The moment is spectacular,
but when the scene suddenly shifts to modern Copenhagen and the film
becomes a dark, moody mystery, you might wonder whether you've just had an
out-of-genre experience.  More to the point, you might fear that August
has snapped his cap.
     Actually, August is simply preparing the audience for the radical
shift still to come, a shift which wasn't nearly as radical in Hoeg's
novel.  For about three-quarters of its length, SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW is
a fairly compelling character study anchored by a strong lead performance.
Julia Ormond may be a bit young for Hoeg's Smilla, but she makes the
character her own with an unapologetic toughness uncommon in female screen
characters.  Smilla's relationship with the neglected Isaiah is skillfully
established in flashbacks, and though Smilla is not a particularly
pleasant person her loyalty and determination win the audience over to her
side.  Screenwriter Ann Biderman has done a fine job of paring down the
novel's often-cumbersome plot and its glut of conspirators, allowing the
focus to stay squarely on Smilla and her relationships.  Ormond's
performance and August's direction capture Hoeg's lyrical, haunting
psychological drama, a style reminiscent of _The English Patient_ author
Michael Ondaatje.
     But then there's that third act, and there's nothing August, Biderman
or anyone else can do about SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW's unexpected
metamorphosis from Michael Ondaatje to Michael Crichton except take it all
the way overboard.  The Greenland-based climax includes some splendid
landscapes by cinematographer Jorgen Persson, and the arctic vastness
suggests the coming of a resolution with an internal dimension -- Smilla
coming to terms with her life, her land and her heritage.
     Well, the resolution is internal, all right, only it's the interior
of an ice cave, where villainous industrialist Andreas Tork (Richard
Harris) is up to no good with some mutant parasitic worms and the same
meteorite which spoiled the day of our old friend the ice fisherman a
hundred years and five reels earlier.  The finale is so utterly bizarre --
and so unsatisfying -- that it taints the entire two hour experience of
SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW.  Perhaps Bille August needs to choose something
simple for his next project, a story which doesn't begin as an emotional
journey and end as a cross between a James Bond film and THE BLOB.

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
     It's really rather a slick conceit when you stop to think about it --
telling the tale of the early years of the reign of Queen Elizabeth I
(Cate Blanchett) with the Virgin Queen turned into Michael Corleone.  This
lavish paean to court intrigue begins in 1554, as the ailing Don -- er,
Queen Mary (Kathy Burke) -- faces an uncertain future for her empire.
Dissension between Catholic and Protestant factions breeds internal
conflict; external threats to the near-bankrupt empire loom from both
Spain and France.  Caught in the middle is Elizabeth, the Protestant heir
apparent to her childless Catholic half-sister, who faces losing all
semblance of a personal life once she wields responsibility for protecting
the interests of the family -- er, nation.
     It's all played as grand opera, with the initially uncertain monarch
surrounded by advisors of every possible motivation.  The Duke of Norfolk
(Christopher Eccleston), a Catholic advisor to the late Queen Mary, plots
to join with Mary, Queen of Scots to overthrow Elizabeth.  Sir William
(Richard Attenborough), Elizabeth's consigliere, pleads with her to wed
and produce an heir as soon as possible to solidify her rule.  Sir Francis
Walsingham (Geoffrey Rush) schools the young queen in the necessity of
ruthlessness in the political arena.  Even the Pope (John Gielgud) gets
into the act, offering what amounts to a heavenly bounty on the queen's
heretical head.  And then there is Lord Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes),
the love of Elizabeth's life who may turn out to be part Kay and part
Fredo.
     Screenwriter Michael Hirst and director Shekhar Kapur manage to keep
all these balls in the air quite deftly, moving back and forth between the
machinations of various factions while keeping all the players clearly
defined.  Ultimately, however, ELIZABETH is more a well-crafted plot
structure than a great tragic drama.  Only occasionally does Kapur allow
us inside the heads of his characters, as he does when Elizabeth shakily 
rehearses a crucial speech proposing a uniform Church of England.  In
general the players move from this place to that like pieces in a
historical board game, psychology and motivations giving way to who wants
to kill whom.  As solid as most of the cast members are, they aren't asked
to do much more than furrow their brows and skulk.
     At least it's all quite a spectacle to behold.  ELIZABETH slips back
and forth between dark cavernous halls and banner-draped pageantry,
allowing a sharp contrast between the private and public life of the
queen.  The radiant Blanchett makes a wonderful Elizabeth, though her
chemistry with Joseph Fiennes isn't nearly as invigorating as it was with
brother Ralph in OSCAR AND LUCINDA.  It's a consistently engaging film,
but one which never crosses over into being truly captivating.  While
aiming for the epic sweep of a GODFATHER film, the film-makers seem to
have forgotten that Coppola created an epic of relationships, not just
political alliances.  ELIZABETH is that rare film that would have been
much better if it had been much longer.  If it had offered the chance to
feel the personalities of history as well as watch them, it would have
been an offer you couldn't refuse.

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
     Mike Myers transforms himself in 54, in virtually every way a
performer can transform himself.  Myers plays Steve Rubell, the nightclub
impresario who created the Manhattan disco to be the center of the party
universe in the closing years of the 1970s.  Rubell presides over his
kingdom in a heavy-lidded barbiturate stupor, wheezing a forced monotone
cackle as he moves among his glitterati guests.  In his first truly
dramatic screen performance, Myers is still recognizable with his
open-mouthed little boy grin, but here he uses it to create an overgrown
little boy convinced he can only find friends by throwing the coolest
party.  Wearing Izod shirts and sweaters, thinning hair perched
pointlessly on top of his head, Rubell is a proto-Gates portrait of
entrepreneurial geekdom.  If people won't play with him because they like
him, he'll make them play with him because they need him.
     Rubell is a fascinating character, performed by Myers with a mix of
savvy, pathos and self-absorption.  If writer/director Mark Christopher
had had the common sense to make 54 the story of Steve Rubell, he might
have created a great film.  Instead, he makes his protagonist a New Jersey
kid named Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe) who comes to Manhattan in 1979 to
break away from his dead-end family.  He first manages to catch Rubell's
eye and gain entry into the club, then lands a job as a busboy, eventually
moving up the Studio 54 social ladder to bartender.  Along the way he
befriends another busboy named Greg (CLUELESS's Breckin Meyer) and Greg's
wife, aspiring disco diva Anita (Salma Hayek).  He also becomes infatuated
with Julie Black (Neve Campbell), a soap opera ingenue whose
Jersey-to-the-big-time success story inspired him to action.
     54's base-line narrative is so trite it almost plays like a parody, a
disco-era goof on MIDNIGHT COWBOY or some far less seminal corruption of
the innocent melodrama.  Naturally, the fame and flash go immediately to
Shane's head as he poses for modeling shoots and buys a Camaro with
personalized plates; naturally, he is lured into a sordid world of sex,
drugs and money; naturally, he begins to alienate his friends and family.
Christopher heads down every obvious path in the interactions between
Shane, Greg, Anita and Julie, apparently oblivious to the fact that every
one of those characters is a piece of cardboard.  Perhaps it was his idea
of irony:  like Studio 54 itself, his movie invites people in so they can
stand around and be attractive.
     The plotting and pacing are so relentlessly predictable that the film
doesn't even work well as a sociology lesson.  Occasionally it offers
peeks at the side rooms or basement hot spots where the elite meet to
revel in their elite-ness; occasionally it focuses on the politics of
succeeding in an environment of glamour for glamour's sake.  Shane's
voice-over narration dutifully informs us why Studio 54 was so unique and
popular, but there's never enough energy for us to believe him or care.
54 spends 91 minutes pointing off-handedly at this or that detail like a
bored tour guide.  For a film that includes money-laundering, ripping off
the mob, sex, drugs, celebrities and plenty of boogie oogie oogie-ing, it
almost never gets the pulse racing.
     The notable exceptions are the scenes involving Myers as Rubell.
Sure, the character isn't perfectly realized; in fact, it probably seems
better simply because it's surrounded by so much uninspired junk.  There
is something undeniably intriguing about Rubell, however, as his king of
the playground glee mingles with self-destructive anxiety and paranoia.
It's also amusing watching him tell a talk show host "the road of excess
leads to the palace of wisdom" after we've seen him lying in a pile of
money, drooling vomit.  There's a great story in that unhappy collection
of contradictions, but you won't find it amidst the smothering cliches of
Mark Christopher's script.  With all the stranger-than-fiction truth at
his disposal, he somehow found the least interesting approach possible.
Steve Rubell would have been disgusted to see Studio 54 turned into
something so...mundane.

Title
Review for River Wild, The (1994)
Starring:  Meryl Streep, Kevin Bacon, David Strathairn, Joseph
Mazzello, John C. Reilly.
Screenplay:  Denis O'Neil.
Director:  Curtis Hanson.
     Meryl Streep has proved to be an actor impossible to pigeonhole.
Early in her career, she became renowned for her roles in such serious
fare as SOPHIE'S CHOICE and OUT OF AFRICA, but was also stereotyped as
an "accent of the month" technician without an audience-friendly
personality.  Then, with films like POSTCARDS FROM THE EDGE, DEFENDING
YOUR LIFE and DEATH BECOMES HER, she showed a completely new and
extremely appealing gift for comedy.  Now Streep has gotten serious
again, but this time in the context of an action-suspense thriller.
THE RIVER WILD gives Streep the chance to flex new muscles (literally
and artistically), and while she continues to be one of the most
talented actors alive, she is failed here by a script which is
thoroughly by-the-numbers.
     Streep plays Gail, a Boston woman in the midst of marital
difficulties.  When her workaholic husband Tom (David Strathairn) bails
out on a river rafting trip for son Roarke's (Joseph Mazzello)
birthday, Gail, Roarke and the family dog head for the high country
anyway.  Tom surprises her by joining them at the last minute, but
tensions run high.  They run even higher when they happen upon Wade
(Kevin Bacon) and Terry (John C. Reilly), two inexperienced rafters who
have lost their guide.  Gail, a veteran of the river, offers to help
them make it down, but it soon becomes clear that Wade and Terry plan
to go farther than Gail wants to take them, and that she and her family
have no choice but to go along.
     There is something to be said simply for the opportunity to watch
Meryl Streep perform.  At times during THE RIVER WILD, her talent
explodes through the film's surface like one of the Class V rapids Gail
must navigate.  In one phenomenal scene, Gail leans in close to Wade to
explain in a vicious whisper that she simply isn't capable of
navigating "The Gauntlet," a series of rapids which lies ahead.  She
manages to convey not only her anger at Wade for threatening her
family, but a subtle seduction in the attempt to convince him and a
genuine frustration that she isn't good enough to make this journey
even if she wanted to.  It was because of scenes like that that my
attention never completely wandered as long as Streep was on the
screen, and she is almost always on the screen.
     The problem is that most of the elements surrounding her aren't
one-tenth as interesting.  Denis O'Neil's script goes exactly where you
expect it to go exactly when you expect it to go there, a story any
movie of the week could come up with.  A scene between Streep and David
Strathairn in which they discuss their marital problems brought up
elements of Gail's personality which can be found nowhere in the
script, leaving Streep to flesh out this "demanding" streak on her
own.  Strathairn is solid, but has little to do; Kevin Bacon has a lot
to do, and does most of it poorly.  He's too stupid and not crazy
enough when he needs to be most threatening, and there's not all that
much conflict involved when the only thing the villain has over the
protagonists is a gun.  Director Curtis Hanson directs in a workmanlike
manner, trotting out such suspense film standbys as the old "pet leaps
out to the accompaniment of a blast of music" trick.  It frequently
seems as though he sees the family conflict storyline as something in
the way, something to be pushed through to get to the rafting
sequences.
     To be fair, those sequences are exciting.  Cinematographer Robert
Elswit's camera swoops and dives, and there is a genuine sense of
danger.  The location scenery is also magnificent, filmed on rivers in
Oregon and Montana, and helps fill in many of the dead spots.  But THE
RIVER WILD is too often THE RIVER MILD, a mediocre melodrama gifted
with the presence of one great actor.

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
TRAFFIC
(USA Films)
Starring:  Benicio Del Toro, Michael Douglas, Erika Christensen, Don
Cheadle, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Amy Irving, Luis Guzman.
Screenplay:  Stephen Gaghan, based on the BBC mini-series "Traffik"
created by Simon Moore.
Producers:  Edward Zwick, Marshall Herskovitz and Laura Bickford.
Director:  Steven Soderbergh.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, violence, profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  145 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In most films about drugs or drug addicts, drugs themselves are an
almost supernatural presence. Even the very good ones tend to turn
addiction into a monster, something that stalks and consumes the people in
the film -- a THC-laced Blob, or a Needle from the Black Lagoon. They may
play with moral ambiguity, but ultimately they come down to a horror film
mano a mano: Either the monkey kills the hero, or the hero kills the
monkey.
     In Steven Soderbergh's elusively gripping TRAFFIC, drugs are not a
monster; they're not even the villain. Drugs become a character, crafted
with more complexity and nuance than the human characters in most films.
The broad canvas explores multiple perspectives on that strange entity
called "the war on drugs." In Washington D.C., Ohio judge Robert Wakefield
(Michael Douglas) prepares to become the United States' new "drug czar."
Back in Cincinnati, Wakefield's daughter Caroline (Erika Christensen)
herself becomes part of the demand side of the problem. In San Diego,
upper class housewife Helena Ayala (Catherine Zeta-Jones) finds her world
thrown into turmoil when her husband (Steven Bauer) is accused of being a
drug lord, while a pair of Federal agents (Don Cheadle and Luis Guzman)
protect the star witness (Miguel Ferrer). And in Mexico, casually corrupt
local police officer Javier Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro) gets involved in
some far-less-casual corruption.
     Based on a BBC mini-series, TRAFFIC sets up an ambitious scope that
proves absolutely critical to its effectiveness. Every character in the
film is in some way complicit in making the drug trade the violent beast
it is, from the blatantly unconcerned Mexican officials, to the wealthy
white teenagers whose pretentious expressions of existential despair
ignore the real-world implications of their drug use. Zeta-Jones' Helena
is initially sympathetic in her shock over discovering her husband's
secret life, then a darker figure once concern for preserving her
comfortable life overwhelms all other concerns. Perhaps most challenging
of all, TRAFFIC asks what can be accomplished by a generation of Americans
who continue to push publicly for anti-drug efforts while remaining
ambivalent about the danger of the drugs that many of them used themselves
in their youth. Steven Gaghan's script never once offers either a pat
condemnation of anti-drug efforts or a simplistic demonization of the
substances themselves. It's a rich, deeply thought-provoking piece of
work.
     It's not half-bad as pure film-making either. Soderbergh has become a
master of incorporating stylistic innovation into relatively mainstream
fare, and he scores again here. The scenes set in Mexico are given a
grainy, saturated look that make the whole country look like it's
suffering from a case of heat-stroke; there's a sharp, sudden contrast
with an early courtroom scene shot in an icy blue. TRAFFIC often has an
almost improvisational edge to it, and virtually every scene and
performance feels kinetic and urgent. This is a film full of scenes that
grab you without a hint of melodrama, full of background characters (Peter
Riegert as Ayala's smug attorney, "That '70s Show's" Topher Grace as
Caroline's cocky boyfriend) that burst to vibrant life. And that's saying
nothing of at least one foreground character (Benicio Del Toro's
conflicted cop) so splendidly performed that his scenes seem like part of
a documentary.
     TRAFFIC only hits speed bumps when the sheer density of the narrative
becomes a hindrance. The script occasionally resorts to making speeches to
make its points -- with Ferrer's mid-level dealer in particular uttering
"you can't stop us" taunts to law enforcement -- as though afraid the
points already made by the arc of the story would be lost in the shuffle.
Some of the key characters feel vaguely under-developed, and there are a
couple of late scenes and plot developments that feel forced into an
already dense tale, giving TRAFFIC the sense of being over-loaded during
its third act. It's still an awfully good third act, one that wraps up an
even better movie with the perfect combination of harsh reality and
genuinely satisfying optimism. I'm not sure you could say TRAFFIC ever
takes a side on its difficult subject, unless it's the side that small,
personal victories can still make a losing battle worth fighting. That's a
refreshingly mature take on a subject that usually comes down to killing
monsters.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
PATCH ADAMS
(Universal)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Monica Potter, Daniel London, Philip Seymour
Hoffman, Bob Gunton.
Screenplay:  Steve Oedekerk, based on the book "Gesundheit!" by Hunter
Doherty Adams and Maureen Mylander.
Producers:  Barry Kemp, Mike Farrell, Marvin Minoff and Charles Newirth.
Director:  Tom Shadyac.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     We've seen this Robin Williams before, though not much recently.  We
saw him in GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM as the disc jockey whose unconventional
approach to military broadcasting endears him to grunts while irritating
The Establishment; we saw him in DEAD POETS SOCIETY as the teacher whose
unconventional approach to literature endears him to students while
irritating The Establishment.  This is Robin Williams the crowd-pleasing
riff-meister, playing the comedy-drama character arc in which he is
temporarily sobered by tragedy but eventually emerges triumphant in the
lives he has touched with humor.
     This is the Robin Williams -- the stand-up comic with the heart of
gold -- that we see in PATCH ADAMS, the fact-based story of a medical
student whose unconventional approach to patient care endears him to
patients while irritating The Establishment.  Unfortunately, we've never
seen this character so compromised by such an aggressively feel-good film.
It opens in 1969, where Hunter "Patch" Adams is a voluntary inmate in a
mental hospital.  His experience with the patients there energizes him
with a desire to heal, leading to his enrollment two years later in
medical school.  There he becomes a top student, but angers a conservative
dean (Bob Gunton) by testing his theory that laughter is the best medicine
on actual hospital patients.  While repeatedly butting heads with
administrators, Patch and two classmates (Monica Potter and Daniel London)
commit themselves to creating a place where they can treat patients not
just with prescriptions, but with compassion, personal contact and big red
clown noses.
     The first half of PATCH ADAMS certainly belongs to Williams the
Clown, given free rein to do his stuff; not coincidentally, it's also the
most entertaining half.  He performs and pratfalls for a juvenile oncology
ward, grants the wishes of the ailing and elderly, and breaks through the
anger of a surly terminally ill man (ubiquitous commercial voice Peter 
Coyote).  His rebel with the mile-a-minute mind delivers quite a few
laughs through an hour of PATCH ADAMS, but then again, he has to.  It's so
obvious where this narrative is headed from the moment he enters medical
school, Williams offers the only spark of invention.  Even when contending
with the hammering pathos of grinning, hairless children, he still has the
ability to disarm an audience with a joke.
     Those grinning, hairless children do bode ill for the second half,
when PATCH ADAMS gets serious on us.  It's not just that screenwriter
Steve Oedekerk and director Tom Shadyac (who teamed up on Eddie Murphy's
THE NUTTY PROFESSOR) play to the most cliched devices of emotional
manipulation, like a tearful speech over a grave and a pedantic speech in
a courtroom setting.  What's worse is that they don't understand when 
_not_ to resort to emotional manipulation.  There is a particularly
distasteful moment in PATCH ADAMS when a character reveals that she is a
survivor of childhood sexual abuse.  Instead of allowing the scene any
sort of sensitivity or dignity, they turn it into a romantic interlude,
complete with Marc Shaiman's obtrusive, syrupy underscore (Shaiman's work
should be declared a health risk for diabetics).  PATCH ADAMS not only
dares you not to be uplifted, it jams a forklift under your seat and
slowly grinds you into the ceiling of the theater.
     I know plenty of viewers will be amused enough by Williams' antics to
consider PATCH ADAMS worthwhile.  I know plenty of viewers will be
applauding Patch sticking it to Big Medicine as the end credits roll.
PATCH ADAMS is a calculated, carefully constructed Response Machine,
unencumbered by complexities like making the traditional doctors anything
more than ogres.  True story or no, this is a vehicle for Robin Williams
as we've known him best and loved him most.  He's the non-conformist ready
to quip you into submission...except that he appears all-too-willing to
conform to formulaic roles in formulaic films.  Doctor, order this film up
an IV of subtlety, stat.

Title
Review for Swingers (1996)
     It's tough to find a fresh angle when you're making a movie about
20-somethings and their relationships in 1996, since the last five years
have seen such a glut of such films that you couldn't throw a rock without
hitting one.  Young film-makers may be attempting to follow the Creative
Writing 101 dictum of "write what you know," but in so doing they are
writing what we all have seen enough of by now to know even better than
they do.  SWINGERS appears at first glance to be more of the same, but
it's not really a relationship film.  Instead, screenwriter Jon Favreau
has created what amounts to a comedy with a National Geographic twist, a
charming, almost documentary account of the habits of the North American
human male in the wild.
     Favreau plays Mike Peters, an aspiring stand-up comedian and actor
recently relocated to Los Angeles from New York.  Mike is recovering --
very slowly -- from the end of a six-year relationship, and finding it
very difficult to get back into the swing of dating.  The ultra-cool
atmosphere of L.A.'s hidden nightclubs doesn't make things any easier, not
does the well-intentioned goading of Mike's friends Trent (Vince Vaughn),
Sue (Patrick Van Horn), Rob (Ron Livingston) and Charles (Alex Desert),
who force Mike out into a world of party- and bar-hopping with which they
are far more comfortable than he is.
     SWINGERS is set in the nouveau-hip "cocktail nation" milieu, a
retro-Swing movement which has become all the rage at Hollywood
nightspots.  That setting gives SWINGERS a unique look and vibe, captured
most notably in a scene at the legendary Derby with the band Big Bad
Voodoo Daddy, as well as a unique lexicon (beautiful women are "babies;" a
man who radiates success and confidence is "money").  Director Doug Liman
seems to be working hard to create a sense of place; in fact, he sometimes
seems to be working a bit too hard.  SWINGERS opens with Mike and Trent
taking a road trip to Las Vegas, then proceeds to bounce from location to
location in the name of authenticity.
     The authenticity Liman is going for with those locations is an
authenticity specific to the time and place where SWINGERS is set, and
that is fine, but it is much more winning in its authentic portrayal of
the way men act when they are out in groups and on the prowl.  Vince
Vaughn turns in a priceless performance as Trent, the ladies' man who
makes it his mission to turn Mike into an equally potent dating machine;
there is a great scene in which Trent and Sue, both drunk, watch Mike
trying to pick up a woman (Heather Graham), high-fiving and cheerleading
all the while.  The dynamics of a group of male friends is presented with
a hilariously spot-on realism, with Trent as alpha male directing the
behavior of guys who are little like him, and in fact may not not _like_
him.  That is another aspect of male friendships which is rarely
represented on screen but which is nailed in Favreau's script:  men often
find themselves hanging out with guys with whom they share virtually
nothing in common.  SWINGERS gets its' characters relationships so right
that it is almost frightening.
     It is rather disappointing that so much time is spent on Mike mooning
over his ex, given the stronger kick of the male-bonding scenes.  Jon
Favreau, who looks like a cross between Jay Leno and Steve Guttenberg, is
extremely likeable as Mike, and he gets a few great scenes highlighting
how uncomfortable he is dealing with women, particularly a struggle with
an unforgiving answering machine.  The sad fact is that, like in real
life, spending a lot of time with someone who does little but whine about
his lost love gets to be a bit of a drag.  Mike's extremely tentative
steps toward getting back on the horse are the frame on which the events
in SWINGERS hang, which makes it kind of a necessary evil.  The comedy is
much richer when Favreau, Liman and the cast of SWINGERS take you on
safari, observing a mating dance that is both strange and wonderfully
familiar.

Title
Review for Ladybird Ladybird (1994)
     Arriving as it does in the middle of the Newt Gingrich-generated
national discussion on the benefits of removing children from unstable
homes, LADYBIRD, LADYBIRD could not be more timely.  Although set in
England rather than the U.S., it presents a fact-based, textbook case
for the esteemed speaker's social services plan.  And while director
Ken Loach could not possibly have realized it, he has made a film which
should inspire both sides in this debate to consider their points of
view more carefully.  Harrowing, challenging yet never pedantic,
LADYBIRD, LADYBIRD is about as balanced a presentation of a difficult
issue as one could hope for, a portrait of a self-destructive woman
colliding with a by-the-book system, and brought to breathtaking life
by a knockout debut performance from Crissy Rock.
     Rock plays Maggie Conlon, a working-class lounge singer who
seems never to have had a break in her life.  The child of an
abusive father, she has gone on to a series of relationships which
has produced four children, all by different fathers.  Early in the
film, she meets Jorge (Vladimir Vega), a Paraguayan political
activist and a refugee from his home country, and describes in
flashback how she came to lose custody of her children to social
services.  Maggie and Jorge grow closer, and soon decide to begin a
family of their own.  However, Maggie finds it impossible to escape
from her past, and as the government continues to follow her every
move she finds her own abrasive personality making matters worse at
every turn.
     Director Loach, the poet laureate of the contemporary English
working class (RIFF RAFF, RAINING STONES) has delivered perhaps his
most powerful film yet with LADYBIRD, LADYBIRD.  He tells Maggie's
story in a straight-ahead fashion, eschewing cinematic hyperbole or
heavy musical cues.  It is a dramatic enough story in its own right,
and Loach knows it.  A pair of scenes in the film show two children,
one the young Maggie and the other one of Maggie's own children,
responding to witnessing an abusive father, and there is little else
Loach needs to do to demonstrate the self-perpetuating cycle
domestic violence creates.  He also trusts the audience to draw its
own conclusions from Maggie's story, and presents both Maggie and
the government social workers alternately as the solution and the
problem.  This is a story in which, ultimately, there are no
winners, and Loach refuses to let us off the hook by giving us a
convenient villain.
     What really makes the ambiguity work is the incendiary
performance by Crissy Rock, who had never acted before LADYBIRD.
Hard-edged and painfully low on self-esteem, Maggie repeatedly
torpedoes her own chances for happiness by refusing to believe that
she deserves any, and Rock plays this out in several incredibly
emotional scenes, every one of which feels completely honest.  She
layers Maggie's character so expertly that at times it truly does
appear that she is an unfit mother, making it hard to fault the
government's intentions.  It's powerful work by a performer who
understands instinctively that a character like this has to be real,
and Rock truly becomes Maggie.  In fact, she's so powerful that she
completely eclipses Vladimir Vega's Jorge, whose character is never
developed quite as fully as Maggie's.  There's a reason that he
sticks by her through so much hardship, but I, like Maggie, wasn't
always sure what that reason was.
     The screenplay by Rona Munro, though based on a true story, is
dramatically unwieldy towards the end; scenes begin to repeat
themselves, and I started to feel that I was being put through an
emotional wringer.  It's one of those cases where a bit of license
with fact might have made for a tighter and even more effective
story.  But it amounts to quibbling to fault LADYBIRD, LADYBIRD for
being too true to a gripping story.  It's a film that makes demands
of its audience, specifically to look at this story and to reach its
own conclusions about whether or not Maggie was treated fairly.  Her
story is so riveting, and so spectacularly re-created by Crissy
Rock, that any audience should be up to that challenge.

Title
Review for Next Stop Wonderland (1998)
    "I don't believe in fate," says Erin Castleton (Hope Davis), the
wistful heroine looking for love in NEXT STOP WONDERLAND, but _someone_
calling the shots on contemporary romantic comedy sure does.  SLEEPLESS IN
SEATTLE became a huge hit introducing two destined lovers who only meet in
the film's final scene; a few years later, 'TIL THERE WAS YOU also told a
tale of lovers-to-be leading parallel lives until the closing credits
start to roll.  Earlier this year, SLIDING DOORS offered yet another
speculative stab at how and why we meet our soulmates. Something in the
zeitgeist has film-makers falling over themselves to convince us that Mr.
or Ms. Right is out there, somewhere, just waiting for us to go to the
right party or step on the right elevator.
     NEXT STOP WONDERLAND falls into that category, but only in the most
nominal sense.  It does follow the never-quite-converging lives of two
discontented singles, these two in contemporary Boston.  Erin is a nurse
in the middle of the latest of a series of serial break-ups with her
activist boyfriend (Philip Seymour Hoffman); Alan Monteiro (Alan Gelfant)
is a 35-year-old former plumber trying to break with his working class
background and become a marine biologist.  The narrative follows each of
them on the trials and tribulations of their respective lives, Erin
dealing with responses to a personal ad placed for her by her mother
(Holland Taylor), Alan fending off the advances of a fellow student (Cara
Buono) while trying to avoid the wrath of his loan shark Frank (Victor
Argo).
     The reason NEXT STOP WONDERLAND never feels exactly like a fated
romance is that it feels so grounded in the simple reality of its
protagonist.  Hope Davis is an irresistable presence as Erin, a wannabe
cynic whose romanticism bursts through in her love of her late father's
poetry.  It's as complete a female characterization as we've seen this
year -- she's smart, clever, just vulnerable enough that you feel for her,
just tough enough that you trust her.  And it doesn't hurt that she
anchors the best set-up in the script by Brad Anderson and Lyn Vaus, with
a string of would-be suitors, each more unappealing than the last, leaving
hilarious messages on the personal ad's phone line.  Anderson directs
with a 1990s Woody Allen vibe, complete with jump edits and hand-held
camera work, yet the film never comes off as derivative of either the
Allen oeuvre or other SLEEPLESS-style comedies.  A character who grabs
your interest can do that for a story.
     NEXT STOP WONDERLAND is always Erin's story, which makes Alan's half
of the film a very long introduction to "the other guy."  Gelfant is
appealing in a low-key way, but he never gets the audience as emotionally
invested in Alan's hopes and dreams as Davis does in Erin's.  He also has
to contend with a silly sub-plot involving a shady real estate developer
(Robert Klein) with an axe to grind against the aquarium where Alan
volunteers.  The time wasted on Alan kidnapping a balloonfish and dealing
with the buffoonish Frank could have been used to develop a relationship
between Alan and his father, who casts a long shadow on Alan's
aspirations.  Everything involving Alan is secondary to everything
involving Erin.
     The odd fringe benefit of this imbalance is that it takes the focus
off the question that dogged other films employing this gimmick:  why
should we think these two people belong together?  Our concern rests
squarely with Erin; we want her to be happy, whether that's with Alan, the
Brazilian charmer (Jose Zuniga) who catches her fancy, or even alone.
The coda which has been added since the film screened at the Sundance Film
Festival makes that concern even more central.  The ending is no longer
happy just because these two people meet, but because it looks like they
could be happy together, and Davis's delightful performance invests us
in her happiness.  NEXT STOP WONDERLAND is a sweet and entertaining fairy
tale not just because she finds Prince Charming, but because the one fate
we care about -- Erin's fate -- is the only one the film is realy
concerned with.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
THE SWEET HEREAFTER
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, Gabrielle
Rose, Alberta Watson, Stephanie Morganstern, Caerthan Banks.
Screenplay:  Atom Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks.
Producers:  Atom Egoyan and Camelia Frieberg.
Director:  Atom Egoyan.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's not often that a film inspires me to use the adjective
"sublime," but there's no better word to describe what Atom Egoyan has
accomplished in THE SWEET HEREAFTER.  Most films about tragic subjects
appear to be driven by a fear that emotions writ small will leave an
audience hungry for grand catharsis, so they attack with teary-eyed
embraces and a swelling John Williams score.  Egoyan refuses to turn on a
warning light when he's about to go for your emotions.  When he does, he
catches them almost as unguarded as the emotions of his characters.
     No other approach could have worked the same mournful, hypnotic
magic Egoyan delivers in THE SWEET HEREAFTER.  The setting is a small town
in British Columbia devastated by a school bus accident which claimed the
lives of twenty children.  Into the still shell-shocked town steps
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), an attorney who wants to represent the
children's parents in a civil negligence suit.  Many of the parents
respond to Stephens and come on board quickly.  Others, like Billy Ansel
(Bruce Greenwood), want nothing to do with Stephens.  After all, he's just
an ambulance-chaser preying on the community's need for someone to hold
accountable for their pain.  Isn't he?
     Well, like most things in Atom Egoyan films, the obvious answer
usually isn't the right one.  Through a masterful use of overlapping and
interwoven time frames, Egoyan gradually reveals details about the
characters which cloud every motivation.  Stephens, we learn, is tormented
by the fate of his own daughter Zoe (Caerthan Banks), a drug addict who
contacts him only when desperate for money.  The roles of other characters
in the story also unfold in bits and pieces:  Nicole (Sarah Polley), a
teen-aged survivor of the crash; Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose), the
bus driver who can't help speaking of some of the victims in the present
tense; Nicole's father Sam (Tom McCamus); Billy and married motel manager
Risa (Alberta Watson).  Egoyan's story-telling demands that you pay
attention, forces you to draw conclusions, and allows you to feel without
telling you _how_ to feel.
     He's also a director who can startle you with his confident refusals
to make the obvious choice.  Nowhere is this more evident than his
depiction of the bus accident itself.  The moment is gripping and
devastating in a completely unpredictable way because of what we see, what
we don't see, and the context in which it is framed.  The scene becomes a
shocking and indelible image of parental helplessness, as does Ian Holm's
bravura monologue in which Stephens describes a medical emergency which
threatens Zoe's life as an infant.  Egoyan portrays the deep, powerful and
often illogical emotions of parenthood from several different
perspectives, each one performed to perfection, each one with different
wrenching consequences.
     One of Egoyan's riskier choices is also one of the few which doesn't
pay off.  Several scenes in THE SWEET HEREAFTER are accompanied by Nicole
reading passages from "The Pied Piper of Hamelin," an extended metaphor
which grows less effective each time it's used.  On screen, with the
persistence of a voice, the comparison occasionally feels forced; I can
imagine the device working much more effectively in the Russell Banks
novel on which the film is based (and which I haven't read), as an entry
or exit point to a chapter.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is still a remarkably
literary film in the best sense of the word, perhaps the most novel-like
film since John Sayles' LONE STAR.  What Egoyan adds cinematically -- from
Mychael Danna's otherworldly score to the ambiguity-enhancing final shot
-- turns THE SWEET HEREAFTER into one of the year's most powerful works.
And, in all probability, the most sublime.

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
TIMECODE
(Screen Gems)
Starring:  Jeanne Tripplehorn, Salma Hayek, Stellan Skarsgaard, Saffron
Burrows, Leslie Mann, Kyle MacLachlan, Richard Edson, Holly Hunter.
Story:  Mike Figgis.
Producers:  Mike Figgis and Annie Stewart.
Director:  Mike Figgis.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, drug use, adult themes,
violence)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Late in Mike Figgis' experimental drama TIMECODE, a young would-be
film-maker pitches an idea to a Hollywood production company for a film
shot on digital video, following four characters in real time in one
uninterrupted take ... at which suggestion one of the production
executives bursts into laughter and calls the idea "pretentious." It seems
like Figgis is trying to have a little fun at his own expense, since that
pitched idea is exactly the idea behind TIMECODE: four characters followed
in real time, the screen divided into four quadrants to follow their
individual stories. And it would be easier to buy Figgis' self-deprecation
as genuine if he didn't then begin his closing credits with a caption
describing exactly how the film had been made. "Look what an interesting
and original film you've just watched," Figgis says to us out of one
corner of his mouth, while the other mutters, "And it was all just a big
pretentious joke."
     Figgis has been on a kick in the last couple of years of trying to
stretch cinematic boundaries, but it's too often too difficult to get past
his art-for-art's-sake bluster. In TIMECODE, he takes a fairly mundane
90-minutes-in-the-life story and tries to spice it up with his four-play. 
One segment of his screen opens with a therapy session involving a woman
named Emma (Saffron Burrows), describing her marital dissatisfaction. 
Eventually we learn that her husband is Alex Green (Stellan Skarsgaard),
the aforementioned chuckling production executive. Alex is an addict and
an alcoholic barely hanging on to awareness of his business, though he has
enough time for an affair with aspiring actress Rose (Salma Hayek). 
Unfortunately, Rose's lover and sugar mama Lauren (Jeanne Tripplehorn) 
suspects that something is up, and spends the afternoon checking up on
Rose after planting a microphone on her.
     TIMECODE was essentially improvised around a loose plot structure,
leading to a predictably ragged feel to the film. And while Figgis would
probably emphasize that raggedness as a function of the film's realism and
immediacy, it simply doesn't make for particularly engrossing viewing a
lot of the time. At times TIMECODE is a satire of film industry poseurs,
and occasionally a very funny one. Steven Weber does a great
straight-faced description of a potential Matt Stone-Trey Parker project
called TIME TOILET -- a comedy about a janitor who discovers a portal
through time in a commode -- as having "educational value," all while a
masseur (Julian Sands) caresses his earlobes. Then Figgis will turn up the
volume on Burrows pining over her unhappy life, and we'll take a quick
right turn into melodrama. Most intrusive of all is the use of a series of
earthquakes as a device to shake up the lives of the characters. In a more
conventional film, it might have been easier to forgive the obvious and
repetitive symbolism. In a film like TIMECODE, you begin wondering when
Figgis will ever take off his avant-garde hat and just let a story be a
story.
     I might have considered TIMECODE a thoroughly failed experiment if
not for a development that briefly justifies the entire structure. During
one stretch of the film, Tripplehorn listens in on a tryst between Rose
and Alex that takes place behind the screen of a screening room while
other executives watch audition clips of actresses playing a sex scene. In
a conventionally edited film, the director might cut back and forth
between the encounter and the jealous lover in her headphones, giving us
only the moment of realization as a payoff. In TIMECODE, I was able to
watch Tripplehorn throughout the scene, from her puzzled but intent face
as the background noise from the screening room prevents her from hearing
Rose, to the anguish that overwhelms her once it's impossible to deny the
truth. Film too rarely allows us to watch actors do purely physical
acting. I was so fascinated by Tripplehorn's wordless performance that I
rarely took my eyes off of her quadrant of the screen, even when there was
dialogue coming from elsewhere.
     I'd gladly accept a structure like that in TIMECODE if it meant I
could spend time following interesting supporting characters instead of
blank-faced bores like Burrows' depressed Hollywood wife. Of course, I'd
prefer it if a film-maker acknowledged the importance of developing
character and story, rather than assuming falsely that improvisation is
always the best way to get at the "truth" of a situation. No moment makes
that fallacy more evident than a scene at a production meeting when a
musician responds with a snicker to an Asian woman's introduction of
herself as "Connie Ling." The snicker itself was a completely believable
reaction; the woman's puzzled expression, as though she had never before
in her life heard a joke about her name, strains all credulity. A director
doing the job of directing might have taken that opportunity to coach the
actress that anyone who grew up on Planet Earth would have been taunted
mercilessly throughout her adolescence for having the name "Connie Ling," 
and therefore might not respond as thought the character had just been
dropped from the sky that afternoon. Figgis, however, never intrudes on
his experiment in realism, not even so it might make more real-world
sense. All that remains is his self-congratulation at doing something
entirely new, even if it ultimately feels mostly like a big pretentious
joke.

Title
Review for Dog of Flanders, A (1999)
A DOG OF FLANDERS (1999)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Jack Warden, Jeremy James Kissner, Jesse James, John Voight,
Steven Hartley, Cheryl Ladd, Farren Monet.
Screenplay:  Kevin Brodie and Robert Singer, based on the story by Ouida.
Producer:  Frank Yablans.
Director:  Kevin Brodie.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I note the following in the interest of fairness:  a smattering of
audience applause greeted the conclusion of A DOG OF FLANDERS at the
screening I attended.  That audience consisted almost entirely of parents
and pre-teens, causing me to ponder comments I've received over the years
regarding whether "family films" should be held to a different critical
standard.  Sure, A DOG OF FLANDERS could appeal to children without very
discriminating tastes; yes, parents may be happy to find something warm
'n' fuzzy for the young'uns.  I, however, watched as someone who expects
little things like decent performances, a narrative with a point, and a
script that doesn't feel like it was written _by_ children instead of
_for_ children.  A DOG OF FLANDERS is simple, non-threatening, harmless
family filmmaking that also happens to be thoroughly uninteresting on
almost any level.
     Based on a 19th century children's tale by Ouida, A DOG OF FLANDERS
tells the story of a young boy named Nello Daas (Jesse James) living in
Belgium -- presumably the late 1800's, presumably around Antwerp.  A poor
farmboy living with his ailing grandfather (Jack Warden), Nello dreams of
being a great painter some day like his idol Peter Paul Rubens.  Despite
the support of kindly local artist Michel La Grande (Jon Voight), however,
Nello seems trapped by his social station.  Class conflict grows more
evident when the teenage Nello (Jeremy James Richter) encounters objection
to his friendship with a merchant's daughter (Farren Monet), and even
finds himself accused of arson.  But Nello always perseveres, entering a
youth art contest and maintaining a pure and honest heart.
     If you notice the conspicuous lack of any dog mentioned in that plot
summary, there's a very good reason.  Despite the title, Nello's pet
Bouvier des Flanders, Patrasche, plays only a token role in the film's
events.  That's not just unfortunate because it's somewhat deceptive --
it's unfortunate because the dog may turn in the film's best performance.
The young performers, particularly newcomer Farren Monet, at least have
inexperience as an excuse.  Voight and Warden, who fuss and knit their
brows and play with ever-varying accents, earn no such slack.  A DOG OF
FLANDERS may be a youth melodrama, but there's not a moment of real
character-based emotion to make the film tolerable as a narrative.  It's
hard to imagine how a production like this avoided the direct-to-video
dustbin.
     It's also hard to imagine from this version that the story is such a
classic that it has already been filmed three previous times.  Without a
familiarity with either the source material or the earlier film
incarnations, I can only assume that a story with such appeal had to focus
on the adventures of a boy and his faithful dog.  This film focuses on the
adventures of a boy as he discovers the pitfalls of his poverty, takes
milk into town, draws pictures of his childhood sweetheart, discusses art
theory with his mentor La Grande, and learns hard lessons about the
politics of youth art contests.  There is a colorful encounter with a
traveling circus, it's true, and one moderately rousing chase and knife
fight with Patrasche's cruel former owner.  Otherwise, A DOG OF FLANDERS
delivers the kind of timeless youth appeal one usually associates with an
evening of CNN.
     I suppose it's pointless to add the cartoonish villainy of Nello's
landlord (who also yells at his wife and calls her "woman," so we know
he's a really bad guy), or to note the retina-rattling eye-rolling that
accompanied a Yoda-like apparition of Rubens himself, or to snicker at the
WIZARD OF OZ denouement which includes a not-at-all startling revelation
of parentage.  Those who enjoy the film will probably find ways in which
those elements complement the story perfectly.  For me, A DOG OF FLANDERS
lacked any of the elements which bring life to a family film -- emotional
resonance, strong relationships, well-drawn characters.  I'm not going to
deny the appeal of a protagonist who perseveres and maintains a pure and
honest heart, especially for parents looking to teach strength of
character.  It would have been nice, however, to build a watchable film
around that strength of character.  I'll leave this one to those parents
and children who watch with a heroic generosity of spirit, those who won't
leave thinking the real dog is the film itself.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH
(MGM)
Starring:  Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise
Richards, Judi Dench, Robbie Coltrane.
Screenplay:  Neal Purvis & Robert Wade and Bruce Feirstein.
Producers:  Michael G. Wilson and Barbara Broccoli.
Director:  Michael Apted.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  128 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     After 40 years and 19 films, the James Bond series is a cinematic
institution -- perhaps even the last cinematic institution. In a film
industry climate where the object of big-budget movies is generally to
show the audience something new and dazzling, the Bond series is all about
structural stability. You know you'll get a show-stopping stunt sequence
to kick things off. You know that stunt sequence will lead into opening
credits filled with writhing female silhouettes. You the opening credits
will lead into a visit with Q (Desmond Llewelyn). You know Bond will fire
off a few ghastly puns aimed at Q's latest gadgets. Going to a Bond film
is like going to a fast food restaurant. You attend because there's
something comforting about knowing it will taste the same every time. It's
a recipe you don't want to see shaken or stirred.
     In a sense, there's little to say about THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH that
hasn't already been said about the 18 installments that have preceded it.
It goes without saying that Agent 007 (Pierce Brosnan) has a mission that
involves a beautiful woman or two. One of them is Elektra King (Sophie
Marceau), an oil heiress whose pipeline -- and life -- appear to be in
danger; one of them is Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), a nuclear
weapons expert in a pin-up body. It similarly goes without saying that
there's a villain bent on mass destruction. His name is Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a terrorist-for-hire who has been rendered impervious to pain by
a bullet to the medulla oblongata. And it goes without saying that the
clock is ticking on a dastardly plan involving the very fate of the free
world (or at least Istanbul), and that only Bond can save us.
     It does bear mentioning that THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH turns out to be
a frustrating combination of the all-too-common and the distractingly
absent. The film does open with a rousing pre-credits chase sequence
involving motorboats racing down the Thames. When Bond leaps from a boat
sailing through the air, catching the dangling rope on a hot air balloon
in the process, there's hope that director Michael Apted can maintain that
sort of high-flying absurdity. Then the wearying deja vu begins to set
in. How many times can we thrill to Bond fleeing gunmen while skiing? How
many times can a shootout in a place where every inanimate object explodes
be interesting? How many times can you wring excitement from getting
caught underwater without air? To Apted's credit, he does find a slick new
twist when he threatens Bond with a helicopter armed with a massive
clearcutting saw. Far more often, the perfunctory thrice-hourly action
sequences are just there to remind you that you're watching a Bond film.
     Sometimes the reminder is necessary, because THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH 
is otherwise short on traditional Bond texture. The film may trot out
locations in Spain, Kazakhstan, Azerbaijan and Turkey, but it never does
anything with them, denying us the welcome pleasure of Bond film as exotic
travelogue. Sophie Marceau and Denise Richards, scrumptious though they
may be, are a major come-down from the magnetism of TOMORROW NEVER DIES'
Michelle Yeoh. Most disappointing of all is Renard, who may be the least
commanding villain the series has ever seen. It's bad enough that he gets
only a few scenes to develop any kind of personality; it's inexcusable
that he turns out to be a self-pitying lap dog for the real villain
pulling the strings. Mix in the absence of a suitably unstoppable nasty
henchman (are the Oddjobs and Jaws's of the post-Cold War world so hard to
come by?), and you've got a pretty vanilla thrilla.
     It is enjoyable to watch Pierce Brosnan growing into the role of Bond
so comfortably. Connery enthusiasts may cringe, but I believe Brosnan is
the best all-around Bond yet -- no one else has combined such convincing
licensed-to-kill menace with a bon vivant twinkle in the eye. He's still a
presence worth watching, as are Dame Judi Dench (in a meatier-than-usual
role for M) and John Cleese (bringing his exquisite comic timing to Q's
maladroit assistant). But when the best thing about a Bond film is the
acting, you know something isn't right. Perhaps I've reached a point in my
movie-going life where a Bond film is a no-win proposition. THE WORLD is
not enough -- not enough creativity, and not enough welcome nostalgia
value. Even for fast food, the familiar tastes too familiar, and the
unfamiliar just tastes wrong.

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
(Columbia/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Kenneth Branagh, Derek Jacobi, Kate Winslet, Julie Christie,
Richard Briers, Nicholas Farrell, Michael Maloney.
Screenplay:  Kenneth Branagh, based on the play by William Shakespeare.
Producer:  David Barron.
Director:  Kenneth Branagh.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  238 minutes, with a 20 minute intermission after 158
minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Kenneth Branagh's HAMLET is the first film version of Shakespeare's
revered tragedy to use the full, uncut text, and you know what that means:
before you settle into your theater seat, smoke 'em if you got 'em, be
sure to use the restroom, and bring extra quarters for parking.  This
HAMLET is 238 minutes long -- 258 including the intermission -- making it
one of the longest films ever produced for theatrical distribution.  It is
a terribly risky undertaking, but Branagh has proven once again that the
Bard is safe in his hands.  His HAMLET does a remarkable job of
demonstrating exactly how much is lost in edited versions of the play,
re-vitalizing characterizations and offering a visual spectacle.  It is a
worthy challenger to Laurence Olivier's 1948 HAMLET as the definitive film
interpretation of the text.
     The story's titular character is the son (Branagh) of the King of
Denmark, but Hamlet was also the name of the recently deceased King
himself.  Young Hamlet is troubled by the marriage of his mother Gertrude
(Julie Christie) to his uncle Claudius (Derek Jacobi), who has assumed the
Danish throne, but he is even more troubled when he is visited by the
ghost of his father (Brian Blessed).  The ghost informs Hamlet that
Claudius murdered the King, and sets him to the task of avenging the foul
deed.  Hamlet, however, is unsure how to proceed, and his frustration
spills over onto everyone around him, including his beloved Ophelia (Kate
Winslet).  Meanwhile, Fortinbras of Norway (Rufus Sewell) begins a
military campaign which may include a threat to Denmark.
     That bare bones synopsis cannot even begin to do justice to the
complexity of HAMLET, of course, but neither do many abbreviated film and
stage versions.  Branagh's use of the entire text proves to be far more
than a purist conceit, as he reveals additional layers of meaning.
Fortinbras' actions to answer the dishonor of his father, forced to
surrender lands to the elder Hamlet, becomes a counterpoint to the young
Hamlet's inability to answer a more grave dishonor; Ophelia's descent into
madness is given a wrenching power as she dissolves in front of her
already grief-stricken brother Laertes (Michael Maloney).  There is also
surprising humor, particularly in the banter of the two gravediggers
(Simon Russell Beale and Billy Crystal), which leavens the melancholy in
the story of the melancholy Dane.  This HAMLET is richer than any other
you might have known because every piece of sub-text remains in the text.
     It is also a version which uses the unique opportunities of cinema
better than any other.  Branagh has an instinct for excess in his film
direction, but his dedication to Shakespeare has anchored his adaptations
of HENRY V and MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING where MARY SHELLEY'S FRANKENSTEIN
and DEAD AGAIN occasionally got away from him.  In HAMLET, Branagh employs
flashback cutaways to show a sexual relationship between Hamlet and
Ophelia which makes her subsequent reactions more understandable; resonant
sound turns the ghost's apparition into a terrifying ordeal for Hamlet;
snowy landscapes give Elsinore (Oxfordshire's Blenheim Palace) a chilly
desolation.  Combining creative interpretive choices for the characters
(Polonius [Richard Briers] becomes more malevolent and hypocritical as he
is shown with a prostitute before sending someone to check up on Laertes
in France) with superb technical credits (Tim Harvey's dazzling production
design and Alex Byrne's elegant, evocative 19th century costumes), Branagh
adds another thoroughly cinematic Shakespeare to his resume.
     His direction may be nearly unimpeachable, but there are other areas
where Branagh's "more is more" philosophy are a hindrance.  The casting of
several familiar faces in minor roles feels more like a stunt than an
artistic choice, and while Crystal and Charlton Heston (as the player
king) in particular are surprisingly effective in their roles, the effect
is more often to turn HAMLET into a Hollywood sight-seeing tour:  "Look,
there's Gerard Depardieu!  Look, there's Robin Williams!"  Branagh's lead
performance is also distracting, and not because he makes poor character
choices (unless his bleached-blond hair counts); the problem is that he is
playing to the balcony even though he is on a movie screen.  There may be
one too many scenes in which spittle flies from the thin lips of his
impassioned Hamlet, and while Branagh has a firm grasp of the Dane's
lighter side, his emoting is often forced.  Still, it is hard to come down
too hard on a man who not only committed himself to the most challenging
role in the history of theater, but directed an epic period production of
the most challenging play in the history of theater.  Branagh took an
exceptional gamble, and it paid off in an exceptional film.  Take a chance
on spending 238 minutes to stretch your understanding of this remarkable
play; you can always stretch your legs during the intermission.

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
THE HOUSE OF YES
(Miramax)
Starring:  Parker Posey, Josh Hamilton, Tori Spelling, Freddie Prinze Jr.,
Genevieve Bujold.
Screenplay:  Mark Waters, based on the play by Wendy MacLeod.
Producers:  Beau Flynn and Stefan Simchowitz.
Director:  Mark Waters.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Norman Rockwell would not approve of what the movies are doing to
Thanksgiving.  Once upon a time, the fourth Thursday in November was the
place where Americana accumulated:  loved ones, football games, a golden
roasted bird and pleasant conversation.  That was before the idea of a
stable, happy family became tres declasse.  A couple of years ago,
director Jodie Foster depicted a Midwestern family dissolving under the
stress of being HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS.  This fall, no fewer than three new
releases -- THE ICE STORM, THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS and THE HOUSE OF YES
-- are turning Turkey Day into Dysfunction Junction.
     At least Mark Waters, screenwriter and director of THE HOUSE OF YES,
seems to understand that the recrimination-filled holiday gathering has
already become a film cliche.  THE HOUSE OF YES is a black comedy not at
all concerned about making its family feuds a touch surreal.  Those feuds
involve the Pascal clan of Washington, D.C., and they take place on
Thanksgiving day 1983.  The year is significant because it marks the 20th
anniversary of the assassination of President Kennedy, a date which holds
even more significance for the Pascals than for most Americans.  You see,
it was on November 22, 1963 that Papa Pascal disappeared never to be seen
again, cementing the fixation of a daughter known as Jackie-O (Parker
Posey) with the widowed First Lady.  Jackie is equally obsessed with her
twin brother Marty (Josh Hamilton), who shakes up the family by bringing
home his fiancee Lesly (Tori Spelling).  While Mother (Genvieve Bujold)
doesn't try at all to make Lesly feel at home, and younger brother Anthony
(Freddie Prinze Jr.) tries a bit _too_ hard, Marty's attempt to find a
normal life begins to collapse under the weight of family secrets.
     Waters adapted THE HOUSE OF YES from a play by Wendy MacLeod, and you
can hear the theatrical roots in every line of dialogue.  Posey, Prinze
and Bujold exchange clipped quips with the practiced air of a company in
mid-run, lines building on top of one another at a dizzying pace.  Waters'
direction also tends towards the conventional, usually holding the speaker
in medium shot then shifting immediately to the next speaker.
     Ordinarily, a production this uniformly stagy would feel forced and
awkward on the screen, but not THE HOUSE OF YES.  As it turns out, this is
a story of overly dramatic people living a self-conscious soap opera.
Jackie-O performs every minute of every day, dominating the Pascal
household like a hammy actor dominates the stage, while her mother glides
in and out of rooms like a condescending WASP matriarch from central
casting.  Appropriately enough (if unexpectedly), Tori Spelling delivers
the film's most naturalistic performance; the rest of this clan is like
the Addams family, so immersed in their own singularly demented world that
they don't even see anything out of the ordinary.  The script also keeps
the wicked humor coming so regularly that you may not notice the arch
deliveries (or at least not mind them).  The dialogue is fast, funny and
quirky enough to defuse some touchy subject matter.  For most of the
film's running time, Waters refuses to treat the Pascals' family skeletons
as tragedies.  
     It's late in the film when THE HOUSE OF YES takes its most
ill-advised turn, going exactly the somber and serious route it had so
carefully side-stepped.  The last shot in particular seems to ask for a
careful psychological analysis, potentially rendering Jackie-O as a
guiltless, misunderstood victim.  It's a jarring miscalculation which
takes a satire of dysfunction dramas and turns it into something which
leaves a dysfunction drama taste in your mouth.  THE HOUSE OF YES should
have stuck with what it was doing best:  providing an alternative
Thanksgiving meal, something salty and bitter without a trace of
saccharine.

Title
Review for Blue Chips (1994)
Starring:  Nick Nolte, Mary McDonnell, J. T. Walsh, Anfernee "Penny" Hardaway,
           Shaquille O'Neal, Matt Nover.
Screenplay:  Ron Shelton.
Director:  William Friedkin.
     There may be only one thing in this world that I know better than
movies, and that would be college basketball.  For every two hours that
I spend in a theater, I probably spend four in a gym or watching hoops
on television.  I spent a lot of time in BLUE CHIPS picking on the
details, but that wasn't only because I felt I knew the details; it was
also because there isn't all that much detail to be found.  BLUE CHIPS
is a morality play drawn in big broad strokes, with a message that can
be summarized in two words:  "Cheating *bad*."
     Set at a fictional California institution called Western
University, BLUE CHIPS stars Nick Nolte as Pete Bell, head basketball
coach at Western.  Two championship banners hang in the rafters from
Bell's tenure, but a point shaving scandal three years back has
tarnished the program's reputation and resulted in fewer prime
recruits.  In an effort to turn around a losing team, Bell tries to
bring in three potential stars:  Chicago guard Butch McRae Anfernee
"Penny" Hardaway); Indiana farm kid Ricky Roe (Matt Nover); and
untrained physical specimen Neon Bodeaux (Shaquille O'Neal).  Standing
in the way is Bell's sense of ethics, since it appears that he'll need
to break recruiting rules and pay off the athletes to get them to
Western, a dilemma which doesn't seem to trouble a wealthy alum (J. T.
Walsh).
     The problem facing BLUE CHIPS from the outset is a tone bordering
on the terminally naive.  Screenwriter Ron Shelton (BULL DURHAM, WHITE
MEN CAN'T JUMP) approaches the subject of big money in collegiate
athletics as though he were the one blowing the whistle on it.  "Can
you believe this?" he seems to be saying.  "It's not just a game any
more!"  The film revels in self-congratulatory outrage, leaving its
characters to founder undeveloped.  Nolte's Bell is a purist who just
loves the game, but he's too shiny a knight, and his final, pedantic
speech to a group of sportswriters is just sloppy.  J. T. Walsh plays
Happy, the fat-cat athletic booster, as an absurd stereotype, and Mary
McDonnell plays Bell's ex-wife as a recycled version of her spirited ex
from SNEAKERS.  There is the potential for an interesting conflict when
O'Neal's Bodeaux exhibits a reluctance to buy in to the same ethic as
his teammates, but Shelton and director William Friedkin seem reluctant
to give any of the novice actor-athletes too much to say.  They also
seem unwilling to ask any of the hard questions about collegiate
athletes, such as whether or not they actually deserve some sort of
compensation.  Every choice is the obvious one and the wrong one, right
down to an awful "conscience" voiceover during the climactic game.
     BLUE CHIPS could have saved itself by getting its basketball
right, but there are a basket full of problems there as well.  The
on-court action is fairly bland, and photographed from all the wrong
angles.  Friedkin makes no particular effort to make the setting seem
collegiate, with crowd shots focusing on politely cheering alumni.
However, two gaffes particularly irked me.  In the first game, with the
margin twenty points in the last minute, every seat in the stand was
still filled; I suppose it would have been tricky telling half the
crowd to leave when rumor has it that tickets for the filming were
being scalped for $100.  Then, in the final game, the crowd reaction
comes far too slowly given the result, and doesn't seem remotely
authentic.  It's too bad Shelton couldn't have brought the same feel to
the hardwood that he brought to BULL DURHAM's dugout.
     There are a few things to like about BLUE CHIPS.  Nolte is
perfectly cast as a coach, and O'Neal and Hardaway are pleasant
surprises.  I was also amused by the inclusion of ousted coaches Lou
Campanelli and Jerry Tarkanian among the gaggle of competitors pursuing
Bell's prized recruits.  They are, however, small consolation.  BLUE
CHIPS' puffed-up indignance wears thin quickly.

Title
Review for Good Son, The (1993)
     I have a confession to make which may compromise my integrity as a
reviewer (if that isn't an oxymoron):  I wanted THE GOOD SON to be
horrible.  *Really* horrible.  I've grown so tired of Macaulay Culkin's
yelping mug and the highly-publicized power grabs by his manager-dad,
that I wanted him to be wholly responsible for a colossal failure.
Well, THE GOOD SON isn't horrible; it's merely mediocre, which may be
worse.  At least a truly awful thriller can provoke campy laughs.  All
THE GOOD SON provoked in me was boredom.
     THE GOOD SON is the story of Mark (Elijah Wood), a young boy who
has just lost his mother to cancer and is guilt-ridden because he
promised her he wouldn't let her die.  When his father (David Morse) is
forced to leave the country on business soon after Mom's death, Mark is
taken across country to stay with his Uncle Wallace (Daniel Hugh Kelly)
and Aunt Susan (Wendy Crewson) in New England.  There Mark soon becomes
fast friends with their son, his cousin Henry (Macaulay Culkin).  All
seems well until Henry begins to pull some rather destructive pranks.
As Mark becomes more and more frightened of Henry, Henry becomes more
and more malevolent, until Mark begins to fear that Henry's
directionless mayhem might be turned on his own family.
     I had very little problem with the basic premises of THE GOOD
SON.  I could accept that a child might be pushed over the edge into
pathological behavior by a trauma (the drowning of Henry's infant
brother); I could accept that parents still in shock over the death of
one child might be completely unwilling to believe that one of their
other children is a creep, even in the face of evidence.  The problems
with THE GOOD SON are almost entirely in the execution.  The film waits
far too long, nearly a third of its running time, before introducing us
to Henry, setting up Mark's guilt and showing off desert scenery.  By
then, it's so late in the game that Henry has to get too crazy too
soon.  There's no time for the menace to build slowly, or for the early
pranks to be tame enough so that Mark could get a bit caught up in them
himself.  Ian McEwan's script seemed to need another draft and earlier
plot points.
     The performances are also a big problem.  Elijah Wood is fine, a
good young actor forced to spend most of this film making his eyes as
wide as possible.  His relatives, however, don't fare as well.  I said
that I accepted the idea of oblivious parents in shock, but Wendy
Crewson and Daniel Hugh Kelly don't play Susan and Wallace as shocked.
We're never specifically told how long it has been since the death of
the other son, and that would have helped.  As it is, Wallace seems
perfectly recovered, while Susan appears simply melancholy, striking
Bronte-esque poses on a seaside promontory.  Consequently, they come
off as ridiculously stupid.  This is also parly the fault of a
performance by Culkin lacking in subtlety.  Instead of the
straightforward tone of a true sociopath, Culkin adopts the wide-eyed,
solemn, sing-song style any parent would instantly recognize as a child
lying.  It's even harder to believe he's able to convince a family
therapist.  To give him his due, he does a decent job of playing the
devilish prankster; that is, after all, what he was in the HOME ALONE
movies.  It's homicidal that he hasn't quite mastered.
     If there's one surprising culprit in THE GOOD SON's failings, it's
director Joseph Ruben.  After THE STEPFATHER and SLEEPING WITH THE
ENEMY, you'd think he'd have the "psychotic extended family" thing down
cold.  But THE GOOD SON goes everywhere you expect it to go, exactly
when you expect it.  It's a competent but cut-and-paste directing job,
providing the minimum recommended allowance of suspense.  I never
groaned out loud, but I never felt any real tension, either.
     THE GOOD SON is not a complete failure.  It's the kind of thriller
where you might jump once, then wonder why you fell for *that* old
bit.  And as reluctant as I am to admit it, Culkin shows that he might
be more than a one-trick pony given a little seasoning.  It just might
be a good idea if his next trick is something original.

Title
Review for Steel (1997)
STEEL
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Shaquille O'Neal, Annabeth Gish, Richard Roundtree, Judd
Nelson.
Screenplay:  Kenneth Johnson, based on the comic book characters created
by Louise Simonson and John Bogdanove.
Producers:  Quincy Jones, David Salzman and Joel Simon.
Director:  Kenneth Johnson.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, comic book violence)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It doesn't take long to figure out that there's something decidedly
unfashionable about STEEL.  The opening theme song, with its
wakka-cha-wakka guitar track, sounds like it was salvaged from a 1970s TV
series; ditto the no-nonsense exposition, arch-villains and even archer
performances.  All of which is quite appropriate, since writer/director
Kenneth Johnson wrote and directed for 70s adventure series like "The
Bionic Woman" and "The Incredible Hulk."  You might swear that Johnson had
made STEEL 20 years ago, dusted it off and gussied it up with a few modern
special effects, if not for the fact that Shaquille O'Neal would have been
in pre-school at the time.
     The funny thing about STEEL is that it's so unfashionable it's
actually refreshing.  The plot casts O'Neal as an army weapons expert
named John Henry Irons, who leaves the service when one of his creations
accidentally leaves his good friend Sparky (Annabeth Gish) a paraplegic.
"Johnny" is resolved to lead a quiet civilian life until he notices that
some powerful military hardware has ended up in the hands of a street
gang.  With the help of Sparky's electronics wizardry and the raw
materials provided by his junkman Uncle Joe (Richard Roundtree), Johnny
creates a high-tech suit of armor to help him bring down the turncoat
soldier (Judd Nelson) providing military technology to criminals.
     Thus is born Steel, a hero with a decidedly unfashionable modus
operandi:  he just wants to make the world a better place.  He isn't a
tormented soul seething with a need for vengeance, or a shady anti-hero
with a dark side and a hundred vices to "humanize" him.  He doesn't even
kill anybody.  He simply acts out of a sense of responsibility...and he's
very polite.
     Perhaps it helps to have a certain nostalgia for the admittedly
B-grade TV STEEL is modeled after, because it's certainly nobody's idea of
stellar film-making.  Shaquille O'Neal, who still can't act a lick, coasts
through the film on his affability and a running gag about his inability
to make free throws.  Johnson asks little of his actors -- he's used to
working with Lou Ferrigno, for heaven's sake -- offering them direction
which seems to consist of "stand there and read your lines."  He seems
perfectly aware that STEEL is a formulaic action film with stock
characters and fight scenes placed at carefully spaced intervals, yet he
also seems perfectly sincere about his subject.
     That sincerity is part of what makes STEEL so improbably satisfying.
Johnson refuses to wink at Steel's selflessness, or to mock him for being
such a square; he refuses to take his straightforward narrative and turn
it into a collection of incoherently edited battles peppered with
one-liners.  He has made a film about role models, role models who happen
to be an African-American man and a disabled woman, and you get the
impression that the people involved feel good about that without
preaching about it.  STEEL isn't going to dazzle anybody, particularly the
kids who will make up most of the audience.  They'll be used to cutting
edge effects, chaotic battles and even more chaotic storylines, not the
perfectly comprehensible (if extremely simplistic) narrative of STEEL.
Those kids may find it all pretty old-fashioned, but I hope there's still
a place for old-fashioned heroes, the kind who say "Yes, ma'am" and mean
it.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
KUNDUN
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Tanzin Thuthob Tsarong, Tsewang Jigme Tsarong, Gyatso Lukhang,
Tencho Gyalpo, Gyurme Tethong, Tulku Jamyang Kunga Tenzin, Tsewang Migyur
Khangsar, Tenzin Yeshi Paichang, Tenzin Trinley.
Screenplay:  Melissa Mathison.
Producer:  Barbara DeFina.
Director:  Martin Scorsese.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As life goals, serenity and wisdom are noble and admirable.  As
drama, on the other hand, they leave a _lot_ to be desired.  Martin
Scorsese's KUNDUN, advertised as "the amazing story of the fourteenth
Dalai Lama," is a beautifully filmed and extraordinarily reverent bio-pic.
And it's a strong dose of cinematic NyQuil.  Though it's bound to please
those who admire its subject, other viewers are going to wonder why they
should spend over two hours watching a film with only the faintest whisper
of internal conflict.
     KUNDUN opens in 1937, where a group of Tibetan holy men are on a
quest for a very special child:  the 14th Dalai Lama, the reincarnation of
the Buddha of love and compassion.  In a remote village near the Chinese
border, they find him, an inquisitive two-and-a-half-year-old (Tenzin
Yeshi Paichang) who correctly identifies artifacts from the previous Dalai
Lama.  The boy is brought with his family to the city of Lhasa, where his
instruction begins under Ling Rinpoche (Tenzin Trinley).  Unfortunately,
it is a time of conflict between Tibet and China over Tibetan sovereignty,
forcing the teenage Dalai Lama (Tenzin Thuthob Tsarong) to deal with
delicate matters of state.  Faced with impending Chinese aggression, the
Dalai Lama must decide whether to stay with his people or flee into exile.
     The most frustrating thing about KUNDUN is that it's the kind of
story I've chastised Hollywood for not telling.  Unlike the recent SEVEN
YEARS IN TIBET, it is a story set in Tibet which is actually about
Tibetans, featuring a cast composed entirely of non-professional actors.
That gives KUNDUN a greater sense of integrity, but it does nothing for
the dramatic impact of the story.  Scorsese has brought together a group
of people whose goal is to honor the Dalai Lama with snapshots of his life
and his devotion to the welfare of his people.  We watch the Dalai Lama
learn Buddhist doctrine; we watch him eager to face his responsibilities;
we watch him consult with his advisors and make wise, morally sound
decisions.  What we see scarcely a moment of is the Dalai Lama as an
individual.  Though he sometimes sees terrible visions, this
preternaturally serene teen almost never seems shaken or lacking in
confidence.  The resulting film is completely faithful, but it moves like
a tortoise in need of a laxative.  When the Dalai Lama begins looking
through his telescope as an adolescent, I started hoping he'd spot Brad
Pitt so the production could find some energy.
     Eventually there is a bit more interest generated by the Dalai Lama's
interactions with the Chinese.  The final hour becomes a series of fervent
hopes and broken Chinese promises, periodically broken up by an audience
with Chairman Mao.  Though this ideological battle should provide plenty
of chances for strong dramatic sequences, it rarely does.  The Dalai Lama
is shown in a near-constant state of concern over how his decisions will
affect his people, but we get only token glimpses of those people.
KUNDUN's most potent moment finds a Tibetan villager, asked by the Dalai
Lama how she is doing, collapsing in tears as she mouths a Communist
slogan about how "happy and prosperous" she is.  Even a few more such
moments could have given the suffering of the Tibetan people a face and an
emotional connection.  This is a history of a repressed people which
almost never leaves the confines of the world of politicians.
     Martin Scorsese is too talented a director to put together anything
that is a complete waste of time.  There are a couple of clever moments
like the puzzled reaction of the Dalai Lama's older brother when forced to
bow to him; Scorsese's regular team, including production designer Dante
Ferretti, turns Moroccan locations into a splendid backdrop for the Dalai
Lama's life.  It's what happens in front of that backdrop which may cause
you do drop back in your seat and grab a quick nap.  As important a story
as KUNDUN may be, the film rarely does more than trudge through fifteen
years of Tibetan history, always careful to show the utmost respect for
His Holiness.  Perhaps Scorsese saw this as an opportunity to make up for
his previous attempt at the life story of a revered figure, one which
sparked instant outrage.  No chance of controversy this time around --
think of KUNDUN as THE LACK OF TEMPTATION OF THE DALAI LAMA.

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
CENTRAL STATION (CENTRAL DO BRASIL)
(Sony Classics)
Starring:  Fernanda Montenegro, Vinicius de Oliveira.
Screenplay:  Joao Emanuel Carneiro and Marcos Bernstein.
Producer:  Arthur Cohn.
Director:  Walter Salles.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  114 min.
In Portuguese with English subtitles.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some day soon, I'm going to put together a list of the most over-used
premises in film history, the ones which describe the entire story arc in
a single sentence.  It will include such classics as "Mismatched Buddy
Cops Gradually Become Friends While Blowing a City to Shrapnel" (recently
seen in RUSH HOUR), "Workaholic Learns Through Tragedy and/or Wacky
Misadventures to Appreciate His/Her Family" (recently seen in ONE TRUE
THING).  To be fair, and to recognize that certain plots become canonical
for valid thematic reasons, I'll even try to note examples of each that
managed to add a spark of originality.
     CENTRAL STATION takes one marvelously constructed character and uses
her to put just enough of a twist on one of those well-known 
single-sentence stories:  "Jaded Older Character Learns Important Lessons
When Forced to Care for a Child."  The jaded older character is Dora
Teixera (Fernanda Montenegro), a retired schoolteacher who supplements her
meager income by writing letters for the many illiterate individuals who
pass through Rio de Janeiro's train depot.  One of Dora's customers is a
woman who writes to the absentee father of her 9-year-old son Josue
(Vinicius de Oliveira).  When the woman is hit by a bus, leaving Josue a
homeless orphan, Dora's first instinct is to sell him to an adoption
broker.  Instead, she decides to deliver both the letter and the boy in
person, setting off with Josue on a difficult journey to Brazil's rural
northeast.
     Such stories usually begin with characters that are crusty but
identifiably loveable, making the journey little more than a waiting game
until the resident adorable tyke trims off the crust.  Dora, on the other
hand, is a fairly grim piece of work.  Our initial image of her as a
kindly educated woman helping out the pobrecitos gives way to an image of
bitterness and cynicism, as we see her arbitrarily shred or hide away
letters she decides are not worth sending.  Fernanda Montenegro uses her
wonderfully weathered face to create Dora as a grandmotherly con artist,
and not the kind of devilishly adorable con artist justified in most films
by the fact that he or she steals Robin Hood-like from the rich.  Dora
steals from the poor because she feels contempt for them and for the 
foolish optimism they express in their letters and their prayers.
     What we gradually learn is that Dora's contempt is really a
manifestation of her own insecurities, her inability to maintain
relationships, and her issues with the father who abandoned her as a
child.  It's eventually obvious that CENTRAL STATION is about Dora's quest
for her own father more than it is about her quest for Josue's father, but
that's exactly what gives the familiar story more thematic weight.  The
cute bonding moments between Dora and Josue are few and far between,
allowing director Walter Salles to concentrate on the fact that the
journey changes Dora more than the child does.  Montenegro's performance
brings an edge even to moments like her clumsy attempts to show affection
to a truck driver (Othon Bastos).  For most of the film, her anti-social
personality feels completely genuine, not in the least like a device for
an uplifting conclusion.
     Inevitably, though, CENTRAL STATION has got to reach its uplifting
conclusion.  Dora will see a light of optimism, both for herself and for
Josue, and move on to live a more fulfilled life.  And it is only when
that happens that CENTRAL STATION feels false, even though the change is
necessary in order for it to be dramatically satisfying.  Montenegro is a
deft enough actress to limit the burden of schmaltz, but she can't change
the fact that the script tells her that, by God, she's going to learn
Important Lessons.  CENTRAL STATION is still a good film, satisfying for 
three-quarters of its length as a character study.  There's just no way
it can escape completely the conventions of its single-sentence story.

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL (LA VITA 'E BELLA)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Sergio
Bustric, Horst Buchholz.
Screenplay:  Robert Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami.
Producers:  Elda Ferri and Gianluigi Braschi.
Director:  Roberto Benigni
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, a fancifully dark Italian comedy from
co-writer/director/star Roberto Benigni, has inspired one of the most
misguided criticisms of recent years.  A large portion of the film, set in
Italy circa 1939-1945, involves an Italian family in a concentration camp:
Jewish bookseller Guido Orefice (Benigni); his Gentile wife Dora
(Nicoletta Braschi); and their five-year-old son Giosue (Giorgio
Cantarini).  In an effort to protect his son from the terrifying reality
of their situation, Guido convinces Giosue that they are playing a grand
game, collecting points for being quiet or remaining hidden.  When German
soldiers arrive at the bunkhouse to announce the camp rules, Guido feigns
being able to translate into Italian so he can announce the rules of the
"game" to Giosue; when Giosue hears stories of the evils going on at the
camp, Guido laughingly dismisses them as the attempts of other "players"
to gain a psychological advantage.
     The criticism leveled at LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is that it is a sanitized
version of the Holocaust, which somehow diminishes the gravity of the
tragedy by squeezing humor from it.  The absurdity of that criticism is
that it seems to miss the point entirely.  Guido's entire purpose in the
second half of the film becomes sanitizing the Holocaust, turning the
experience into something his son can survive both physically and
emotionally.  Benigni crafts a sensitive relationship between the father
and son, as Guido's wit and imagination allow him to create a world of
pleasure and hope where no pleasure or hope should be possible.  There are
more than enough grim reminders of the camp's true purpose -- as well as a
glimpse of banal evil in the character of an obliviously self-absorbed
physician (Horst Buchholz) -- to dismiss any notion that Benigni as a
film-maker is candy-coating one of the bleakest chapters in human history.
His character, however, is doing exactly that; his success is a triumph of
love and determination in the creation of their own reality.
     The irony of that misguided criticism is that there's a much simpler
reason to be less than dazzled by LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL -- namely, most of the
first hour.  In essence, it's an _extremely_ extended prologue,
introducing us to Guido as a carefree seeker of love and fortune who
directs his creative energies towards winning Dora's heart.  The pleasant
scenes between them certainly establish their bond, as well as Guido's
imaginative gifts, but on their own they're fairly innocuous bits of
romantic tomfoolery.  Benigni mixes physical comedy with the occasional
social commentary, all with moderate success and the sense that he's just
passing time until he can get to the real meat of the story.  It's easy to
imagine Benigni setting up all the necessary relationships in about half
the time, making the shift in tone less abrupt...and making shifting in
your seat less necessary.
     None of that detracts from the potent, bittersweet pleasures of the
film's second half.  All of the things that could have gone wrong instead
go right -- the young Cantarini radiates charming innocence without
cloying self-awareness; Benigni hits just the right balance between clown
and unlikely hero; the darker moments always feel consistent with the
human comedy.  LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL grows richer by the minute, making it
easy to forgive the amiable but meandering first half. If it hadn't takeng
quite so long to reach its most powerful scenes, LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL would
have been an easy choice as one of the year's best films.  An expression
as trite as "triumph of the human spirit" doesn't quite do justice to what
Benigni has pulled off here.  He has taken pure horror and turned it into
a whimsical love story -- between a man and a woman, between a man and his
son, between a man and the idea that we never lose the capacity to create
beauty in our lives.

Title
Review for Jungle2Jungle (1997)
(Disney)
Starring:  Tim Allen, Martin Short, Sam Huntington, Lolita Davidovich,
David Ogden Stiers, JoBeth Williams.
Screenplay:  Bruce A. Evans and Raynold Gideon.
Producer:  Brian Reilly.
Director:  John Pasquin.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Whenever film fans learn of plans by an American studio to re-make a
foreign language film, the common reaction is a collective cringe.
Wonderful foreign films like THE VANISHING and DIABOLIQUE have been turned
into big-budget garbage, as Hollywood tends to grab on to a plot without
grasping the point.  The prospect of a remake of UN INDIEN DANS LA VILLE
(LITTLE INDIAN, BIG CITY), however, inspired cringes of a different kind.
The 1996 American theatrical release of LITTLE INDIAN inspired some of the
most savage reviews of the year, making the prospect of the Disney-fied
version JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE almost too much to bear.  Hollywood could only
improve on the original this time around, but it hasn't improved enough.
JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE is a dopey and predictable family comedy which could be
thought of as disappointing, if not for the wretchedness of the source
material.
     Tim Allen stars as Michael Cromwell, a Wall Street commodities broker
with a non-stop lifestyle.  He barely has time in his schedule to finalize
his divorce from his first wife Patricia (JoBeth Williams) -- who left him
for medical work in the Amazon -- so that he can marry his current
girlfriend Charlotte (Lolita Davidovich).  When Michael reaches Venezuela,
he finds quite a surprise waiting for him:  a 13-year-old son named Mimi
Siku (Sam Huntington) who has spent his entire life in the jungle.  A
hastily made promise lands Michael the task of taking Mimi Siku back to
New York with him for a visit, but Michael still has little time to teach
his newfound son about life in the concrete jungle, especially when
Michael and his partner Richard (Martin Short) get in hot water trying to
dump a load of coffee futures on the Russian mafia.
     Yes, you read correctly, the Russian mafia.  JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE
certainly doesn't take any chances on having too few plot threads,
offering up David Ogden Stiers as the menacing mafioso, an entourage of
film-makers following Michael's fashion designer fiancee Charlotte, a
romantic interest for Mimi Siku in Richard's daughter Karen (LeeLee
Sobieski, who _will_ be cast some day as a young Helen Hunt) and a pet
tarantula who makes trouble any time things get slow.  There is a lot of
going on to keep everyone busy, but even at its busiest JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE
simply isn't funny very often.  The gags in the script by Bruce A. Evans
and Raynold Gideon (previously responsible for masterworks like KUFFS and
CUTTHROAT ISLAND) include tired pokes at postal employees, foreign cab
drivers and the battle of the sexes over leaving the toilet seat up.  It
sometimes seems as though most of the film was transcribed from
10-year-old Jerry Seinfeld routines.
     It's hard to believe that after waiting over two years to follow up
his $144 million film debut in THE SANTA CLAUSE, Tim Allen decided this
was the script he couldn't pass up.  JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE (directed by THE
SANTA CLAUSE's John Pasquin) once again finds Allen playing a workaholic
who requires extraordinary circumstances to teach him lessons in
fatherhood, but THE SANTA CLAUSE gave Allen a unique set-up and clever
situations to work with.  JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE doesn't give him nearly as much
good material, relying on standard fish-out-of-water scenarios -- Mimi
Siku dines on cat food and tropical fish, hunts pigeons and climbs on the
outside of skyscrapers -- and a healthy serving of pratfalls.  Allen has
many comic talents, including fine timing with an exasperated one-liner,
but he is not particularly deft at physical comedy.  When co-star Martin
Short throws his tiny body at a locked door in a futile attempt to break
it down, you see what a real physical comedian looks like; Allen just
looks like he realizes he is much smarter than this material.
     Everyone in JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE does thoroughly likeable work in their
one-dimensional roles, which is probably as much as you should expect from
the performances in a film of this kind.  JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE is intended
primarily for kids, of course, and it does offer some appealing bits.
Most of the best ones involve Michael's ineptitude with Mimi Siku's
sleep-inducing blow darts, including a very funny struggle to revive
Charlotte's anesthetized cat.  The same kids who find that sequence
hilarious probably won't be able to make heads or tails out of the big
deal over some coffee, however, nor are they really a proper audience for
swishy gay stereotypes or jokes about flatulence and penis size.  There
just didn't seem to be much thought put into JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE except to
give it just enough tailoring to make it a Tim Allen vehicle.  Considering
that the original outfit they were working with was a cinematic polyester
suit like LITTLE INDIAN, BIG CITY, it might have been a better idea to
throw it all away and start from whole cloth.

Title
Review for Geronimo: An American Legend (1993)
Starring:  Jason Patric, Gene Hackman, Robert Duvall, Wes Studi,
           Matt Damon.
Screenplay:  John Milius and Larry Gross.
Director:  Walter Hill.
     To paraphrase the old song, and to make a distressing confession,
I don't know much about history.  When approaching a film based on
historical subject matter, I rarely find myself basing my critique on
accuracy, for better or worse.  Nevertheless, I had a feeling I was
going to have a problem with GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND as sool as I
noted that Wes Studi, who portrays the title character, had been given
fourth billing.  As authentic as it looks, GERONIMO just doesn't click
because it doesn't make its principal character the focus of the
story.  Like DANCES WITH WOLVES, it's not so much a story about Native
Americans as it is about guilty white men.
     GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND is narrated by 2nd Lt. Britton Davis
(Matt Damon), a fresh-out-of-West Point officer assigned to the 6th
Cavalry responsible for re-settling Apaches in the American Southwest
on reservations.  The only resisters are the Chirokawa Apache, led by
Geronimo (Wes Studi).  Geronimo surrenders himself to sympathetic 1st
Lt. Charles Gatewood (Jason Patric) and Gen. George Crook (Gene
Hackman) as the film opens, but an incident on the Turkey Creek
Reservation enrages Geronimo.  He breaks off with a small band of
warriors and begins a violent series of raids on both sides of the
U.S.-Mexican border.  Gatewood, Davis and veteran Indian tracker Al
Sieber (Robert Duvall) attempt to track down the Apaches and make a
deal the U.S. has no intention of keeping.
     Perhaps the most glaring problem with the script for GERONIMO is
that it doesn't seem to have a direction or a clear enough sense of its
point of view.  Although the narration is coming from Davis, GERONIMO
is not a first-person narrative.  Much takes place without him present,
so it's difficult to see events as they develop as somehow having an
impact on Davis.  When Davis gives an impassioned statement near the
end of the film about his shame at the government's treatment of the
Apache, I found myself wondering why he was the one to get that scene.
As questionable as the decision to let the story come from a white man
might be, GERONIMO at least should have had the conviction to show us
more through his eyes once that decision was made, so that Davis' loss
of innocence makes sense.
     Screenwriters John Milius and Larry Gross also do a less than
impressive job of making Geronimo himself come alive.  Wes Studi is
grim-faced and taciturn, but his anger is never real enough.  Perhaps
out of some fear of making him too unsympathetic, they show Geronimo
actually killing unarmed settlers only once, and that scene is given a
"they asked for it quality."  Geronimo is treated more as a symbol than
a man, and I came away from the film with very little insight into his
character.
     All this is not to say that GERONIMO doesn't do many things
right.  Cinematographer Lloyd Ahern does some of the year's finest
work, capturing the Southwestern deserts in rich reds and oranges.
Director Walter Hill (THE LONG RIDERS) and Milius (CONAN THE BARBARIAN,
APOCALYPSE NOW) are veterans of bloody cinema, and their battle scenes
are well choreographed.  Gene Hackman and Robert Duvall both turn in
typically marvelous performances, finding much more nuance than the
script provides, and their one scene together is truly great work.  Ry
Cooder's score is also noteworthy.  In fact, everything about GERONIMO
screams "epic," but somewhere along the line a fair amount of substance
leaked out of the stylish wrapper.
     GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND clocks in at about 1:55, short by the
standards of the holidays' other big releases, yet it seemed much
longer.  A barroom showdown with a group of bounty hunters didn't seem
to serve any real purpose, and the editing generally seemed
disjointed.  GERONIMO wants to be revisionist, but it doesn't provide
enough real information, or compelling enough characters to make me
care.  Somewhere amidst the cliches is the story of a warrior who
fought and killed for what was being taken from him, but it didn't make
it to the screen in this version.  In a case of an extremely misleading
title, GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND doesn't do enough to make a real
historical figure real.

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
Starring:  Jim Carrey, Cameron Diaz, Peter Riegert, Peter Greene,
Richard Jeni, Amy Yasbeck.
Screenplay:  Mike Werb.
Director:  Charles Russell.
     Either you "get" Jim Carrey, or you don't.  All right, maybe
there's a little middle ground, but not much.  Carrey is turning into
one of those performers who inspires as much head-shaking among his
detractors as laughter among his fans.  Apparently my Carrey Threshhold
is higher than that of most critics; I enjoyed his ACE VENTURA shtick
while all about me were hurling brickbats.  Now he gets to carry a big
budget summer fx comedy, THE MASK.  And once again, his manic gifts
turn a wafer-thin story into a real guilty pleasure.  As lively as the
special effects are, THE MASK would be a loud dud without Jim Carrey's
unique talents.
     Carrey stars as Stanley Ipkiss, a milquetoast bank clerk who
frequently finds himself on the receiving end of life's splashed
puddles.  One evening after his car breaks down, Stanley finds a
strange mask floating in the ocean.  When he puts the mask on, he
becomes a superhuman whirling dervish, seemingly able to make his every
whim a reality, including winning the attentions of beautiful night
club singer Tina Carlyle (Cameron Diaz).  However, The Mask also draws
the attention of Tina's shady boyfriend Dorian (Peter Greene) when he
interferes in a bank heist Dorian is orchestrating, and of a stoic
police detective (Peter Riegert) for the same reason.  Much to his own
amazement, Stanley becomes a real superhero, fighting crime to save the
day.
     If the underlying premise of THE MASK seems familiar--mild-
mannered guy is affected by supernatural forces and finds his innermost
desires released--it's because it was already done this summer in
WOLF, right down to the detail of how the same phenomenon has a
different effect on people with different "true natures." WOLF handled
the theme much better, but it was a more stylish film in many ways.
THE MASK is full of cookie-cutter small-time hoods better suited for
comic relief than for any real villainy, which makes Stanley's
predicament much less interesting.  In fact, it's probably safe to say
that nothing in THE MASK would be at all interesting without its
inventive visuals and Jim Carrey's rubbery mug.
     Fortunately, THE MASK does have those elements, and they make for
a dizzying ride.  The computer graphics which turn Carrey into a
walking Tex Avery cartoon are delightful, granting him a lunatic
arsenal of tricks.  The most whimsical use of ILM magic might be the
Mask's effect on another cast member, Stanley's scene-stealing dog
Milo, in a hilarious bit from the final showdown.  Special kudos also
should go to the makeup team headed by Greg Cannom, which has managed
the challenging task of making Carrey's Mask distinctly otherworldly
without obscuring his malleable features.  With so much technical
wizardry flying around, it might be easy to overlook the art direction
and set decoration, from Stanley's apartment to the Coco Bongo Club,
all of which are perfectly in tune with the comic book atmosphere of
THE MASK.  All these elements are skillfully combined by director
Charles Russell (who was "Chuck" Russell when directing low-budget pics
like A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 3).
     Then there is 1994's boy wonder, Jim Carrey, who turns in a
performance so energetic it should probably be regulated.  He goes
Robin Williams' ALADDIN Genie one better, using his own face and body
as often as any cinematic chicanery to become a gallery of characters.
He is the single best reason to see THE MASK, and he truly must be seen
to be believed.  Surprisingly, he actually gets supporting help,
particularly from Peter Riegert, effectively deadpan as the no-nonsense
cop.  There are flat spots, like the sluggish performance of Richard
Jeni as Stanley's friend and co-worker, and the aforementioned
yawn-inducing villains.  The bottom line is this:  if you can
appreciate the idea of a group of police officers involuntarily joining
The Mask in a performance of "Cuban Pete, and if Carrey doesn't make
you cringe, THE MASK will fit you perfectly.

Title
Review for Romeo + Juliet (1996)
Director:  Baz Luhrmann.
Screenplay:  Craig Pearce and Baz Luhrmann.
Director of Photography:  Donald McAlpine.
Producers:  Gabriella Martinelli, Baz Luhrmann.
Starring:  Leonardo DiCaprio, Claire Danes, John Leguizamo, Harold
Perrineau, Dash Mihok, Pete Postlethwaite, Miriam Margoyles.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
     WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S ROMEO AND JULIET is an exercise in such sheer
audacity that you will probably want either to stand up and applaud
director Baz Luhrmann or smack him in the head.  I mean, using jump cuts,
fast-motion, American accents and rock music, then calling his film
_WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S_ ROMEO AND JULIET?  Setting the story against 20th
century gang violence, as though WEST SIDE STORY never had existed?  You
need two pairs of pants to hold cajones that big, but this is one of those
rare cases where nothing succeeds like excess.  Al Pacino tried to make
Shakespeare "relevant" with a hyped-up lecture in LOOKING FOR RICHARD;
Luhrmann's glorious and gaudy ROMEO AND JULIET does it right.  It is a
work full of energy, humor and surprisingly gentle romance.
     The story, of course, is based around two warring clans, the
Montagues and the Capulets, set in sunny, flashy, modern-day Verona Beach.
The men loyal to Ted Montague (Brian Dennehy) include his son Romeo
(Leonardo DiCaprio), Romeo's cousin Benvolio (Dash Mihok) and Romeo's
friend Mercutio (Harold Perrineau); the partisans of Fulgencio Capulet
(Paul Sorvino) are led by his nephew Tybalt (John Leguizamo).  In an act
of daring and defiance, Romeo and his cohorts crash a party at the Capulet
mansion, and there Romeo spies a vision in white named Juliet (Claire
Danes).  Unfortunately, Juliet is Capulet's daughter, a circumstance which
forces the lovers to woo and wed in secret.  Meanwhile, the war continues
unabated, and a tragic death forces Romeo to flee from Verona and from a
love destined to be written in the stars.
     For half an hour or so, you might wonder whether Luhrmann and his
co-writer Craig Pearce have decided to turn the love story into an
afterthought.  The film's first image is a television screen, featuring a
news anchorwoman introducing the events; Luhrmann then bursts directly
into the conflict between the Montagues and the Capulets with a face-off
at a gas station.  That face-off is staged with frenzied editing more akin
to Robert Rodriguez than Franco Zeffirelli, and there is scarcely time for
a breath before we barrel into the costume ball, where Mercutio (played
with dazzle and fire by SMOKE's Harold Perrineau) prances in drag to
disco.  In between there is a broadly comic scene in which Juliet's mother
(Diane Venora) is made by camera trickery to move like a darting insect as
she dresses for the party.  It is a visual blitzkrieg Luhrmann launches,
played against a soundtrack which surges from the up-tempo rock of Garbage
to Mozart to a ballad by Des'ree before DiCaprio and Danes ever share a
scene.
     Once they do meet, however, the wait seems quite worthwhile.  The
scene in which they first see each other, staring through a fish tank, is
beautiful in its quiet observation, as is Juliet's dance with suitor Paris
(CLUELESS's Paul Rudd) while she is unable to take her eyes off Romeo.
Their connection registers immediately, one of the most effective and
convincing portrayals of love at first sight I have seen in years, and
Danes and DiCaprio share a sweet but powerful chemistry.  They may be the
best male and female actors of their generation, respectively, and they
give themselves both to the characters and to the language so completely
that they seem to be discovering the 400-year-old text for the first time.
     Luhrmann directs their moments together as idyllic interludes in a
world of chaos and violence, but he also gives them a fair amount of
sexual double-entendre, and anyone with more than a nodding acquaintance
with the Bard knows that Lurhmann didn't create those bawdy references
himself to appeal to the teenagers in the audience.  He is interested in
those young viewers, however, and that is what makes his vision of WILLIAM
SHAKESPEARE'S ROMEO AND JULIET so faithful even in its iconoclasm.
Shakespeare was a writer for every social stratum of his time, and ROMEO
AND JULIET is an action-filled teen romance which also retains the tragic
force of the play.  Through it all, Luhrmann also manages to make
Shakespeare's words an integral part of his film.  The rapid, colloquial
deliver of those words occasionally overwhelms them, and Luhrmann doesn't
always know when to turn down the adrenaline.  What he has done is to take
dynamic lead performances by Claire Danes and Leonardo DiCaprio and guide
them through a telling of WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S ROMEO AND JULIET which
makes the poetry and thematic depth of the play resonate in 1996.
Luhrmann took his own stab at looking for Shakespeare, and may end up
showing him to an entirely new audience.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
HILARY AND JACKIE
(October)
Starring:  Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, David Morrissey, James Frain.
Screenplay:  Frank Cottrell Boyce, based on the memoir "A Genius in the
Family" by Hilary and Piers Du Pre.
Producers:  Andy Paterson and Nicholas Kent.
Director:  Anand Tucker.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     From its opening minutes, HILARY AND JACKIE promises intriguing spins
on a couple of time-worn dramatic set-ups:  the competitive siblings, and
the tortured artistic genius.  We first meet our sister protagonists as
children in 1950s England -- Hilary Du Pre (Keely Flanders) soaring on the
flute while Jacqueline (Auriol Evans) saws flatly on her cello.  It is
Hilary whose talent lands her on a BBC broadcast, earning her adulation
from her parents and others which spurs Jackie to a ferocious commitment
to improving her own musical skills.  Soon it is Jackie whose performances
are receiving standing ovations, the adult Jackie (Emily Watson) who rises
to international aclaim while Hilary (Rachel Griffiths) slips into
comfortable domesticity with her husband Kiffer (David Morrissey).
     Director Anand Tucker's adaptation of Hilary's memoir (co-written
with brother Piers) introduces some provocative questions regarding how
and why a prodigy becomes an artist.  Jackie's success surpasses Hilary's
not through superior inate talent, it is suggested, but through superior
effort, exemplifying the 99% perspiration in that aphorism about what
makes genius.  The film also introduces a wild card in the form of the
dance and movement classes both girls take, lessons which seem to
contribute to Jackie's uniquely passionate style but hinder Hilary's
efforts to excel at her own instrument.  The tension between the sisters
is set in what happens after their apparent childhood destinies flip-flop:
how Hilary abandons music altogether, and how Jackie comes to feel trapped
by her own success.
     If Tucker and screenwriter Frank Cottrell Boyce had explored the
siblings' relationship as effectively as they explore their respective
careers, HILARY AND JACKIE might have been a brilliant film.  As it
stands, it's a pretty good one which offers wildly disparate insight into
its two main characters.  At one point in the first hour, a title card
with the single word "Hilary" launches us into one sister's world when
Jackie's success first divides them.  This leaves us with Hilary, whose
interior life is left something of a mystery to us as she chooses marriage
and family over music.  There's a spark of curiosity as Jackie makes an
incredible request of her sister, but we never get a clear enough sense of
why Hilary grants that request.  The author chooses to remain enigmatic
herself, allowing the spotlight to shift entirely to Jackie in this story
with the same questionable selflessness she chose in life.
    There's hope that their relationship will become clearer when the
"Jackie" section begins, but that's not the case.  Instead, the story
begins a fascinating look at Jackie's love-hate relationship with her
music, which she feels is the only reason anyone loves her.  Emily Watson
gets a showy role as the artist who struggles with her own identity and,
eventually, with multiple sclerosis.  It's a great performance as a great
character, yet it's disappointing that we watch her interact with her
cello nearly as much as she interacts with Hilary.  Though Jackie's sense
of isolation is the theme of the film's second half, it doesn't allow us
to understand what these two women were to each other.  HILARY AND JACKIE
is a revelation when it allows us to see what people surrender for art, as
well as why people surrender their art.  As a family affair, it's more
labor than genius.

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Tommy Lee Jones, Anne Heche, Gaby Hoffman, Don Cheadle.
Screenplay:  Jerome Armstrong and Billy Ray.
Producers:  Neal H. Moritz and Andrew Z. Davis.
Director:  Mick Jackson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's hard to believe it has been over two and a half months since the
last volcano movie hit North American screens; it seems like only, gosh,
seven or eight weeks.  20th Century Fox is banking on the fact that lava's
lovelier the second time around, rolling out VOLCANO as an April preview
to the summer movie season, but whether or not it works depends on what
you're looking for in your disaster movies.  DANTE'S PEAK was frequently
dumb and predictable, but it also delivered suspense down the stretch in
well-packaged bursts.  VOLCANO is less chained to convention, a bit more
clever, and boasts a more talented cast.  It is also more about spectacle
than suspense, a very impressive production which is easier to enjoy from
a detached distance than it is to get caught up in.
     Tommy Lee Jones stars as Mike Roark, a supervisor for Los Angeles'
Office of Emergency Management who is supposed to be on vacation with his
daughter Kelly (Gaby Hoffman).  That is before a moderate earthquake hits,
and before an incident involving the death of several utilities workers
suggests an unusual underground heat source.  Seismologist Dr. Amy Barnes
(Anne Heche) has a theory, but no one believes it -- that is, until the La
Brea Tar Pits turn into a fountain of magma spewing destruction all over
Wilshire Boulevard.  As the sea of lava begins its inexorable march, Roark
tries to figure out some way to stop it or re-direct its course.
Meanwhile, Dr. Barnes suggests that there may be another more powerful
eruption yet to come, and tries to figure out where and when it might hit.
     There are certain elements you have come to expect in a film of this
kind, and VOLCANO delivers all of them:  intransigent bureaucrats who end
up making a bad situation worse, a hero whose personal life is given equal
footing with large-scale destruction, pets which make improbable escapes.
Fortunately, the script by Jerome Armstrong and Billy Ray offers a few
variations on those themes along the way.  The intransigent bureaucrat,
instead of becoming the guy whose inevitable death is a cause for cheers,
gets a shot at redemption; those amazing animals are given a satirical
poke in a feel-good TV news piece about "the other victims."  The dialogue
sometimes does get stilted and heavy-handed, and a few of the sub-plots
-- including one involving a self-absorbed real estate developer (John
Corbett) -- are abandoned mid-stream without any fanfare.  Apparently
someone realized that a fast pace and minimal exposition make for a better
disaster.
     That doesn't prevent the writers from attempting some clumsy stabs at
social commentary, which are notable largely because they are among the
few attempts at making the film specific to L.A.  As dopey as the tag line
"The Coast is Toast" may be, it showed that the marketing people
understood one of the more appealing elements of VOLCANO's premise:
people want to get a perverse charge out of watching Tinseltown become
Tindertown.  VOLCANO could have used more of a sense of place, more
recognizable landmarks like the Angelyne billboard turned into briquets.
Sure, it's wonderful that racially-fragmented Los Angelenos become one big
ashen can't-we-all-just-get-along family when forced to work together for
the common weal, but be honest.  Wouldn't you rather see lava creeping up
on a trademark L.A. traffic jam or chasing an army of suddenly less mellow
in-line skaters through Santa Monica, instead of crawling like fluorescent
tapioca down Wilshire?
     Which is not to say that the fluorescent tapioca in question isn't
extremely impressive.  In fact, there are a lot of impressive visuals in
VOLCANO, including tactically launched lava bombs and a dizzying array of
explosions.  The pyrotechnicians earn every cent of their pay in VOLCANO,
but the imagery could have been accompanied by more tense set pieces.  One
superb sequence finds Jones and Heche dangling over lava from a fire truck
ladder, while a man lying on the ladder contends with a fire burning its
way up a hose.  However, that's one of the rare moments when anyone seems
to be in any genuine peril.  The lava gets rolling, it destroys a bunch of
buildings, folks try to figure out how to stop it, and then they try to
figure out _another_ way to stop it.  VOLCANO loses a lot of steam after
Mount Wilshire blows her top, but there's just enough magnificent magma to
carry it through until Randy Newman sings "I Love L.A." over the closing
credits.  I love L.A., too, though I might have preferred it even more
well-done.

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
(Fine Line)
Starring:  James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara Unger,
Rosanna Arquette.
Screenplay:  David Cronenberg, based on the novel by J. G. Ballard.
Producer:  David Cronenberg.
Director:  David Cronenberg.
MPAA Rating:  NC-17 (graphic sexual content, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In case you were wondering what all the consternation was about
concerning CRASH -- the film which New Line chief Ted Turner nearly
refused to release in America in a fit of moral outrage -- writer/director
David Cronenberg makes it clear in the space of a few minutes.  The first
scene finds a woman (Deborah Kara Unger) having sex with a man while bent
over the engine of a twin-prop plane; the second scene finds another man
(James Spader) having sex with another woman on the desk of his office.
In the third scene we learn that Unger and Spader are husband and wife
Catherine and James Ballard, and that they have a habit of describing
their affairs to each other in detail while having sex with each other.
     That might be considered quite enough to get some folks worked into a
lather, but, dear friends, you ain't seen nothin' yet.  CRASH is really
about what happens after James is responsible for an automobile accident
which leaves him and another driver, Dr. Helen Remington (Holly Hunter)
badly injured, and kills Dr. Remington's husband.  While in the hospital,
Helen and James are approached by Vaughan (Elias Koteas), a strange man
obsessed with car crashes.  Vaughan draws Helen and James into his unique
world, which includes re-creating celebrity car crashes for spectators and
keeping scrapbooks of accident scenes and injuries.  This obsession takes
on a sexual dimension as well, as confrontations with mortality turn into
expressions of primal appetites.
     I am sure that there are plenty of people who would find plenty of
things inherently repugnant about CRASH, including the fundamental
sex-violence link and the fifteen individual scenes involving some kind of
sexual behavior between the main characters in every possible form and
gender permutation.  CRASH involves some unpleasant subject matter, but I
certainly don't think it is evil.  There are plenty of dark corners of the
human psyche -- many of them dealing with sex -- and CRASH explores how
people might respond to the adrenaline rush of a brush with death in a
world where they ordinarily feel deadened, dehumanized and disconnected.
The fetishizing of destruction into a sexual act is part of a progression
for these characters; they are like addicts searching for a new high when
the old one is no longer enough to make them feel anything.
     It's challenging stuff Cronenberg is serving up, but the reason CRASH
ultimately doesn't work has nothing to do with the fact that it's
challenging.  If a film-maker is going to take a chance on creating a
world this alien, he has to give his audience someone with whom to
identify, someone to be their surrogate and tour guide.  That person
should be James, but it's not.  James is a producer of soft-core porn
films with a propensity for kinky sex when we first meet him, making it a
relatively small step to the ghoulish carnality offered to him by Vaughan
(played with creditable faux-DeNiro menace by Elias Koteas).  The
seductiveness of the crash cult needs to make sense to those of us who
don't get off narrating our affairs to our wives, and Cronenberg doesn't
make that happen.  There is the briefest glimpse of an outsider's-eye-view
when a car salesman assists James and another crash victim (Rosanna
Arquette) in an erotic bit of showroom shopping, just enough to make you
wish someone like that salesman had been for the previous hour. The
relatively static nature of James' character also makes it evident that 
for all its excesses, CRASH lacks drama, a force pushing it towards some
kind of revelation or resolution.  Spader's performance as James is flat
and detached throughout, and we need to have some understanding of his
response to Vaughan's ever-more-extreme behavior; every development seems
to strike him with the exact same mild confusion.
     Some of Cronenberg's scenes are superbly crafted, effective and
unsettling -- a tryst while going through a car wash is accompanied by
overwhelming sounds of machinery, and one scene after a crash turns
smoke from the wreckage into a romanticized mist over a meadow. 
Occasionally CRASH manages to be erotic, but far more often it is
wearying, running sex scenes at you in waves and turning every available
moment into an excuse for a grabbed crotch or a frantic
menage-a-fill-in-the-blank.  It was a mistake for Ted Turner to equate
CRASH with pornography, because the average porno film probably has more
plot.  As fitfully intriguing as the psychology of CRASH may be, it's
never engrossing.  By failing to give his audience a sense of complicity,
he has made them merely spectators at a rather monotonous freak show.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
THREE KINGS
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonze, Nora
Dunn, Cliff Curtis, Said Taghmaoui, Jamie Kennedy.
Screenplay:  David O. Russell.
Producers:  Charles Roven, Paul Junger Witt and Edward L. McDonnell.
Director:  David O. Russell.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  111 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In THREE KINGS, writer/director David O. Russell seems intent on
creating the quintessential debunking of the "official" Gulf War story.
Eight years ago, the war was treated as a great boost to national pride in
the midst of a recession, a pseudo-exorcism of the Vietnam demons and a
vision of the great bloodless techno-battle that would become the way of
warfare.  It was all night-vision and smart-bombs, desert shields and
protections of sovereignty -- a just war waged against a power-mad
dictator.  We were swept up in the images, watching our forces hammer away
towards a foregone conclusion.
     There's more than a little irony to the fact that THREE KINGS is just
as visually striking as the Gulf War, and nearly as shaky in its
substance.  The story focuses on a quartet of U.S. Army soldiers eyeing a
personal windfall as the war reaches its conclusion in March 1991.  Sgt.
Troy Barlow (Mark Wahlberg), Staff Sgt. Elgin (Ice Cube) and Pvt. Conrad
Vig (Spike Jonze) discover a map they believe leads to a fortune in
plundered Kuwaiti loot.  Special Forces Capt. Archie Gates (George
Clooney) also learns of the map, but believes there's far more to be had
than cell phones and Rolexes -- specifically, bunkers filled with millions
in gold bullion.  The four men begin a journey into the heart of Iraq to
cash in, but they soon discover a nation still at war, and find that their
mission objectives keep shifting as they learn more.
     As a moderately revisionist history lesson, there's no question that
THREE KINGS both engages and enlightens.  Russell paints a picture of
American troops as rowdy kids celebrating victory in a war they barely
fought, while the brass concerns itself primarily with feeding reporters
stories to keep them happy.  Meanwhile, Iraqi citizens initiate rebellion
against Saddam Hussein after being promised support by America, then find
themselves slaughtered by Iraqi troops when it becomes clear that no
cavalry will be on its way.  THREE KINGS becomes a journey of discovery
for the four soldiers, their quest for personal gain gradually giving way
to a belief that they can't obey the orders that would have them abandon
Iraqi rebels to their deaths.
     Provocative moral dilemmas abound in THREE KINGS, which should be the
stuff of compelling drama.  Somehow, it just isn't.  The messages are
similar to those familiar from anti-war films like PATHS OF GLORY, M*A*S*H
and PLATOON -- war is even more hellish when policy has little to do with
humanity -- yet the characters are not nearly as strong.  While Clooney,
Wahlberg and company perform capably, Russell doesn't give them much to
work with beyond surface characterizations:  Gates the jaded veteran, Vic
the simple-minded hick, Barlow the naive family man, etc.  They're too
often placed in situations where other characters explain to them the real
horrors of the war, turning chunks of THREE KINGS into an informative
but stagnant lecture.  Russell wants to put a personal face on an
impersonal war, but he can only create an urgency of situation, not
urgency connected to the people in the situation.
     He can also create plenty of urgency with his stylistic flourishes,
of which plenty abound.  THREE KINGS is a genuinely eye-catching piece of
work in which Russell makes bold choices to drive home a point, from the
graphic internal images of a wounded body to the slow-motion punctuation
of bullet wounds as video game warfare tears through real flesh.
Unfortunately, the same impulse to drive a point home leads to scenes in
which a scene described in dialogue is simultaneously portrayed on screen.
Hearing an Iraqi soldier (Said Taghmaoui) describe his infant son's death
during a bomb raid is wrenching; watching the infant crushed by debris is
startling; combining the two is pure overkill.
     In retrospect, I'm not sure why I still admired THREE KINGS as much
as I did.  It's certainly an unconventional film, zig-zagging between dark
comedy and raw drama with surprising effectiveness.  Every once in a
while, Russell will do one of those little things that remind you how
invigorating cinema can be.  There's just not enough to shake the sense
that THREE KINGS is too enamored of its sense of historical importance.
All that remains is getting swept up in the images, watching Russell's
forces hammer away towards a foregone conclusion.

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
Director:  Michael Apted.
Starring:  Jodie Foster, Liam Neeson, Natasha Richardson.
Screenplay:  William Nicholson and Mark Handley.
     The pre-release buzz over Jodie Foster's performance in NELL tells
you two things about this year's Academy Awards race.  First, it's
another abysmal year for female leading roles when people can't think
of any worthy nominees and start to hype a performance two months
before anyone has seen it.  Second, it's another year when overcoming a
disability is virtually the express lane to a nomination.  What it
doesn't tell you is how good Foster actually is in NELL, and that is
simply good, and far from great.  NELL as a whole is even less
successful, a well-acted but unremarkable film which makes a couple of
profound missteps.
     NELL opens in the remote woods of North Carolina, where a
reclusive old woman is found dead by a delivery boy.  When local doctor
Jerry Lovell (Liam Neeson) is brought out to determine the cause of
death, he discovers that the woman was not living alone.  She has a
daughter, called Nell (Jodie Foster), who has grown up completely
isolated from civilization.  She is also isolated by a unique language,
partly the result of learning to speak from a mother who suffered a
stroke.  Jerry enlists the aid of psychologist Paula Olsen (Natasha
Richardson) to determine whether or not Nell is competent to live
alone.  As the two doctors observe her, they begin to discover that she
is far more than a "wild child," and to discover some things about
themselves in the bargain.
     Director Michael Apted has demonstrated an affinity for films set
in the South (COAL MINER'S DAUGHTER) and films about culture clashes
(THUNDERHEART), so he would seem like a good fit for NELL.  Indeed, he
is mostly on target.  He and cinematographer Dante Spinotti (who
collaborated on the visually imaginative BLINK earlier this year)
create some marvelous images of the beautiful locations, in clear deep
blues, and there are a few extremely effective scenes of Nell reacting
to a strange new world.  However, he makes at least one truly awful
choice.  Part of the mystery of NELL involves how her language cannot
be attributed completely to her mother's aphasia, and other peculiar
behaviors she exhibits.  But Apted clues the audience in far too soon
by using flashbackes from Nell's perspective, and consequently we are
not given the chance to discover her secrets as Lovell and Olsen do.
     The problem with NELL is deeper than that one error, however.
Thematically, it's simply THE ELEPHANT MAN in a log cabin: "civilized
people" discover "freak" and learn that "freak" is more human than any
of the "civilized people."  At times, NELL seems to match THE ELEPHANT
MAN note for note, from the kindly doctor attempting to communicate
with the outsider, at first assuming some kind of retardation, to the
outsider being taunted and abused, to the outsider becoming a media
sensation, and so on.  Unfortunately, NELL is not nearly as subtle or
engrossing as THE ELEPHANT MAN.  The script, by William (SHADOWLANDS)
Nicholson and Mark Handley from Handley's own play, would have been
better as a mystery than as the morality play it becomes, but Apted's
one false move robs it of that mystery.  By the time we get to the
climactic scene in which Nell delivers the kind of courtroom speech
which makes courtroom scenes so generally annoying in contemporary
films, she has become too much the noble savage and not nearly human
enough.
     Jodie Foster is a wonderful actress, but there's really only so
much she can do with this part.  Though it seems tailor-made for a heap
of awards, Nell surprisingly fails to generate much emotional
resonance.  Physically, Foster does som superb acting; she lets this
character inhabit her entire body.  It just often seems as though she
is concentrating so hard on her part that she's not making connections
with the other actors.  Liam Neeson and Natasha Richardson are both
solid as the feuding doctors, but they come to parts which have the
kind of pre-fabricated back stories that come out in tearful speeches,
a frequent flaw of playwrights turned screenwriters.  Their
relationship feels contrived, which is a true shame considering Neeson
and Richardson's real-life romance.  That development is like a lot of
NELL: awkward, even as it looks great.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE
(Miramax/Universal)
Starring:  Joseph Fiennes, Gwyneth Paltrow, Geoffrey Rush, Colin Firth,
Ben Affleck, Tom Wilkinson, Judi Dench.
Screenplay:  Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard.
Producers:  Donna Gigliotti, David Parfitt & Harvey Weinstein and Edward
Zwick & Marc Norman.
Director:  John Madden.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, profanity, adult themes).
Running Time:  122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE offers an answer to 400 years' worth of high
school English students who wondered why the heck he wrote that way --
turns out he spoke that way, too.  As portrayed by Joseph Fiennes in this 
smart, sly and enchanting historical confection, Will Shakespeare is a
the quintessential artist as hopeless romantic.  Afflicted with writer's
block and surviving only by scamming advances on his next play, Will needs
a muse to inspire him.  When he finds one -- the beautiful gentlewoman
Vila de Lesseps (Gwyneth Paltrow) -- the words flow faster than he can
contain them, both onto the page and from his lips.  A poet awash in the
language he gives to his own grand emotions, he even annoys his
contemporaries into requests that he "talk prose."
     One of the many brilliant twists in SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is how it
treats its protagonists' love with both utter sincerity and an ironic 
wink.  The affair between Will and Viola is, of course, doomed -- he's an
impoverished artist with an estranged wife and family, she's well-born and
promised to the haughty Earl of Wessex (Colin Firth) -- yet that's part of
what makes it so appealing for both of them.  Prohibited from pursing an
acting career by the era's prohibition of women on the stage (Elizabethan
drama cast men in drag in women's roles), Viola sees her alliance with
Will as a double rebellion against society; for Will, an ultimately
unattainable woman inspires the heights of romantic idealism his art
requires.  As the two fairly glow in each other's presence, it's always
clear that they're building a sense memory, not a relationship.
     Before it begins to seem that SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is merely a
meta-commentary on romantic love, it should be clear that it's a sharp
comedy which uses that theme for wonderful satire.  The central romance
becomes a parallel to the play Will is writing during the film -- one
which begins as the comedy "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter" but
morphs into something a bit more tragic.  While debt-ridden theater owner
Philip Henslowe (a great bit of comic acting by Geoffrey Rush) pleads for
Will to create a crowd-pleasing comedy -- "something with a shipwreck,
and a dog" -- the author secretly crafts what he believes is a more honest 
story.  We see that the story's timeless appeal comes from the fact that
it's as unreal as his romantic comedies -- it's a melodrama about two
teenagers treating love the way teenagers do.  Will Shakespeare is styled
as the first Hollywood screenwriter, creating a love story not as it is,
but the all-consuming way we all want to belive it is.
     The Hollywood motif actually runs throughout SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE, and
provides its best laughs.  A money-lender (Tom Wilkinson) becomes a
production partner with debtor Henslowe, suggesting net profit
participation ("monkey points") as payment for the actors; later, a
riverboat driver drops Christopher Marlowe's name as a previous passenger,
and asks Will to read a script he has written; there's even a great piece
of business where Will coaxes a prima donna actor (Ben Affleck) into
taking a smaller role in "Romeo and Juliet" by telling him the play is
titled "Mercutio."  Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard (a writer who knows a
think or two about deconstructing the Bard from "Rosencrantz and
Guildenstern are Dead") create a whip-smart script which drops
unapologetic anachronisms and fanciful historical revisionism into an
already buoyant romantic comedy.
     Considering how many things SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE tries, the
astonishing thing about it as that it nails every one of them.  As a
period piece, it captures the glorious squalor of chamberpots raining down
on pedestrians in 16th century London.  As an allegory, it captures the
appeal of the theatrical life for all its vanity and shady business
dealings.  As an actors' showcase, it gives splendid parts to splendid
performers, notably Paltrow, Rush and Judi Dench (as a breathtakingly
regal and insightful Queen Elizabeth).  And as a pure romance, it has all
the swoon appeal you could hope for in a tale of star-cross'd lovers.
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is the kind of story that first delights as an
exhilarating simple trifle, then only becomes better when you think about
its layers and its language.  It's almost -- dare one say it --
Shakespearean.
     On the Renshaw scale of 0 to 10 tragical-historical comedies:  10.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
GODZILLA (1998)
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria.
Screenplay:  Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich.
Producer:  Dean Devlin.
Director:  Roland Emmerich.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (intense situations, profanity, some violence)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin have thrown down the gauntlet to film
critics...or, at the very least, to two film critics in particular.  In
GODZILLA, the latest summer spectacle-cum-marketing assault from the
creators of INDEPENDENCE DAY, a mutant reptile from the South Pacific
comes to New York City on a rampage, much to the consternation of the
city's blustering mayor (Michael Lerner).  A corpulent fellow with
familiar graying hair and glasses, the mayor noshes on Hershey's kisses
between campaign stops where he gives citizens his "Thumbs Up for New
York" signal.  Oh, and his name is Mayor Ebert.  Oh, and he has an
ineffectual, balding assistant named Gene.
     I don't know why Emmerich and Devlin found this snarky fit of
retaliatory pique necessary.  Certainly the negative reviews of Gene
Siskel and Roger Ebert didn't hurt the box office take of "ID4," which
somehow overcame two thumbs down to gross $300 million in North America.
GODZILLA is certain to be similarly critic-proof, pitting a massive CGI
beast against intrepid biologist Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), his
former girlfriend and aspiring reporter Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo) a
mysterious Frenchman (Jean Reno), the entire U.S. Army and the fortunes of
every other summer film standing in its path.  Is critical acceptance so
important to the film-makers that doing well isn't good enough as the best
revenge?
     If such is the case, here's a simple bit of advice for Emmerich and
Devlin:  make better movies.  GODZILLA is a baby step in the right
direction, if for no other reason than that it's more honest in its
big-budget intentions than the dopey and grandiose INDEPENDENCE DAY.
Using ALIENS and JURASSIC PARK as its models rather than the adventures of
its rubber-suited predecessor, GODZILLA takes only half an hour before the
scaly behemoth hits the Big Apple and turns midtown Manhattan into a
Jurassic parking lot.  This sequence is followed by a dizzying helicopter
chase through the man-made canyons, which is followed by an underwater
encounter with submarines, which is followed by a search for what may be
the creature's nest, and so on.  The sheer variety of situations insures a
consistent level of interest, while simultaneously insuring several unique
levels for the inevitable Sony PlayStation version of the game.
     Whenever the film rests on human shoulders, however, you could sprain
your eyeballs from rolling them.  Continuing their uncanny knack for inane
back-story, Emmerich and Devlin create a mayo-on-white-bread relationship
dynamic between Broderick and Pitillo, and a mission for Reno which makes
less and less sense every moment I think about it.  The dialogue is
hopelessly feeble, the attempts at humor strained even by action movie
standards, and the characters so caricatured that Al Hirschfeld should
have drawn them.  Most unforgivably, GODZILLA wastes the immense comic
talents of Hank Azaria and Harry Shearer, restricting Azaria to loyal
sidekick duty as Pitillo's cameraman and leaving Shearer to do a
half-hearted (and less animated) version of his "The Simpsons" anchorman
Kent Brockman.  Even the always-appealing Broderick looks baffled by how
to be charming in such a suffocating role.
     At least Emmerich sends the audience home on a high note, closing
GODZILLA with a superb sequence in which Godzilla chases a cab through the
city, eventually onto the Brooklyn Bridge.  It's a sharp piece of action
film-making, and not the only one.  Yet GODZILLA can't get by on its
big-ness alone; in fact, the visuals sometimes seem decidedly less than
state-of-the-art, particularly when our heroes are threatened inside
Madison Square Garden.  When a blockbuster exists solely to impress you
with "you gotta see this" tricks, it's tough not to be disappointed when
you've seen the tricks before, and seen them done better.  There are ways
around that disappointment, though, which Emmerich and Devlin should
ponder:  Write better scripts.  Create real characters.  Make better
movies.  Either that, or continue blaming the messengers for the way they
hold their thumbs.

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
SIMON BIRCH
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Joseph Mazzello, Ian Michael Smith, Oliver Platt, David
Strathairn, Ashley Judd, Jan Hooks.
Screenplay:  Mark Steven Johnson, suggested by the novel _A Prayer for
Owen Meany_ by John Irving.
Producers:  Laurence Mark and Roger Birnbaum.
Director:  Mark Steven Johnson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time: 113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At least they prepared me right off the bat, right there in the
credits.  I knew SIMON BIRCH was based on John Irving's whimsically
twisted 1989 novel _A Prayer for Owen Meany_, but I had also heard that
screenwriter/director Mark Steven Johnson had taken great liberties with
the text.  I didn't need to wait long to understand how many liberties,
thanks to an admirably forthright screen credit:  "Suggested by the novel
_A Prayer for Owen Meany_."  Not "inspired by," not "based on," not even
"loosely based on" like the 1995 travesty of _The Scarlet Letter_.
"Suggested by."
     I wish I had known Johnson was taking suggestions, because I might
have offered a few.  I might have suggested that he retain slightly more
than the basic set-up, involving two 12-year-old friends in a New England
Town circa the early 1960s.  Joe Wenteworth (Joseph Mazzello) is the son
of an unmarried woman (Ashley Judd) who has refused to divulge the
identity o fJoe's father; Simon Birch (Ian Michael Smith) was "the
smallest delivery ever recorded in the history of Gravestown Memorial
Hospital," and has remained unusually small.  The two young lives are
connected first by their status as town outsiders, then further sealed
when an errant Little League foul ball off the bat of tiny Simon has
tragic consequences.
     Right about there, all similarity to the source material ends.  Sure,
a few individual details remain, notably a school Christmas pageant which
goes dreadfully awry, but even that element is given an ill-advised twist.
The film's Simon, like his literary counterpart, has a preternaturally
mature sense of existential purpose, an almost arrogant belief that God
intends great things for him.  It makes no sense for that character -- who
schemes in the novel to be the Baby Jesus in the Nativity play because he
thinks only he can do the role justice -- to be turned into a grumpy and
reluctant Christ-child.  It makes even less sense for the Christmas Eve
catastrophe to begin with reverent-beyond-his-years Simon trying to feel
up the Virgin Mary.  Johnson goes for the cheap laughs of projectile
vomiting and pre-pubescent groping rather when he should be trying to
maintain some consistency in his characterizations.
     I don't mean to suggest that SIMON BIRCH is an awful film,
particularly if you walk in like most viewers with no knowledge of
Irving's novel.  Johnson has put together a tremendously appealing cast,
including Judd, David Strathairn, and an atypically slime-free Oliver
Platt (as the kindly suitor of Joe's mother).  The friendship between Joe
and Simon is unique and well-developed, though the more experienced
Mazzello makes first-time screen actor Smith look quite self-conscious at
times.  Even the narration (by an uncredited Jim Carrey, who also appears
as the adult Joe in the film's present-day framing scenes) is under-stated
and amusing.  The first half of SIMON BIRCH is generally satisfying, a
sprightly and quirky reminiscence cast in the autumn tones of Aaron E.
Schneider's cinematography.
     It's the latter half, which diverges most sharply from Irving's
story, that goes most horribly wrong.  The light-hearted, off-beat story
takes a sharp turn into melodrama in heavy syrup, centered around a school
bus crash which should make everyone who saw THE SWEET HEREAFTER thank
Whatever God to Whom They Pray that Mark Steven Johnson didn't get his
hands on it.  The music score (by the ever-cloying Marc Shaiman) begins
reminding us every several seconds that it's time to weep, eventually
building to the orchestral equivalent of yanking out your nose hairs one
at a time.  With its "oh by the way, in case you're a complete moron,
here's the moral of the story" punch line of dialogue, SIMON BIRCH is less
emotionally cathartic than it is emotionally insulting.  Johnson doesn't
just streamline Irving's sprawling narrative, he dumb-lines it, casting
everything in the broadest tear-jerker strokes.  What a waste of a 
singular story to turn it into a trite Hallmark card of a dramatic 
experience.  The power of suggestion sure can make people do foolish
things.

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
     In an era of soaring stock markets, Republican Revolutions and enough
backlashes to give you whiplash, Michael Moore is something of an
anachronism:  part stand-up comic, part guerrilla film-maker but always
100% old-school liberal.  Moore became famous for his successful 1989
documentary ROGER & ME, in which he chronicled his Quixotic quest to speak
with General Motors CEO Roger Smith about the colsure of a manufacturing
plant in Moore's hometown of Flint, Michigan.  The intervening years have
found him dabbling in feature film-making (CANADIAN BACON), television
("TV Nation") and book writing (the best-selling "Downsize This! Random
Threats from an Unarmed American"), but the unifying thread in his work
has continued to be the deflating of corporate America, the anger
sweetened with a wink and a smile.
     Moore might be considered one of the most dangerous radicals in
America if only you didn't want to giggle every time you saw him.  His new
documentary THE BIG ONE is a hilariously unique piece of social commentary
as vaudeville, a cross between "60 Minutes" and David Letterman which
draws most of its laughs from Moore's mere presence.  The film follows
Moore on what is supposed to be a book tour for the 1996 release of
"Downsize This!", but actually serves as an excuse for Moore to pounce on
corporate down-sizers around the country.  In Centralia, Illinois, he
meets with a representative from Leaf Candy who explains that workers'
jobs could have been preserved "if (the factory) had been making less
money;" in Cincinnati, he hands Proctor & Gamble reps a Dubious
Distinction Award even as he shares his fondness for Tide detergent.
     The confrontations which make up the backbone of THE BIG ONE easily
could have been humorless kamikaze journalism if not for the fact that
it's Michael Moore holding the microphone.  With his round face, shaggy
hair and omnipresent baseball cap, Moore looks less like an investigative
reporter than he does the kind of guy who goes shirtless at Green Bay
Packer games.  He has an agenda, to be sure, but he's also a splendid
performer who makes it look easy drawing his flies with honey rather than
vinegar.  As entertaining as he may be in full concert mode -- describing
how 1996 presidential candidate Steve Forbes never blinks; explaining the
role of "shareholders" in the U.S. Constitution; suggesting that our
country change its name from the boring "United States" to the more
intimidating "The Big One" -- Moore is at his best as the self-effacing
goofball who ends up making others look like even bigger goofballs.
     Nowhere is this gift better displayed than in Moore's already
controversial encounter with the first CEO who ever agreed to meet him
personally, Nike boss Peter Knight.  When Moore asks Knight why Nike
employs child labor in Asia rather than American workers, Knight calmly
replies that "Americans don't really want to make shoes."  If Knight comes
off looking like the devil -- and with his Tim Curry grin, he certainly
looks the part -- it's not because he's acting in the economic best
interest of his company.  Knight simply doesn't have the guts to come out
with such an admission, a fact largely attributable to Moore's preferred
conversational style.
     It's rather foolish to accuse Moore of blantant propagandizing, since
he never bothers to hide the fact.  Occasionally he butts heads with
recalcitrant company drones past the point of diminishing returns, and a
couple of moments with "average Americans" (including a tearful session at
a book signing) appear either staged or needlessly like photo
opportunities.  Still, it's hard to imagine that even the staunchest
Libertarian won't find something to smile at in Moore's singular tapestry
of 1990s Americana.  That goofy round-faced guy in the baseball cap sure
knows how to make a lecture not seem like a lecture.

Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
DANGEROUS BEAUTY 
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Catherine McCormack, Rufus Sewell, Oliver Platt, Moira Kelly,
Jacqueline Bisset, Fred Ward.
Screenplay:  Jeannine Dominy, based on the novel "The Honest Courtesan" by
Margaret Rosenthal.
Producers:  Marshall Herkovitz, Edward Zwick, Arnon Milchan, Sarah Caplan.
Director:  Marshall Herskovitz.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For quite a while, DANGEROUS BEAUTY tempts you with an irresistable
combination of compelling substance in a glorious package...quite fitting,
considering the premise.  Based on Maragaret Rosenthal's fact-based "The
Honest Courtesan," it tells the story of Veronica Franco (BRAVEHEART's
Catherine McCormack), a young woman of humble means in 1583 Venice.  With
no dowry to offer, Veronic has little hope of ever being a suitable match
for her beloved Marco Venier (Rufus Sewell), a gentleman of high station.
In fact, her mother (Jacqueline Bisset) offers that Veronica's only hope
of a good life which can support her family is to become a courtesan to
the powerful men of Venice.  Though she initially recoils at the idea,
Veronica soon finds herself one of the most desired women in venice,
sharing her bed with senators, kings, bishops...and yes, even the
now-married Marco.
     If you smell a tale of degradation and class warfare in the making,
sniff again.  DANGEROUS BEAUTY actually paints quite a rosy portrait of
Veronica's life while presenting an intriguing history lesson in gender
politics.  While the noble ladies of Venice were able to marry well, they
paid the price with their tongues and minds.  Denied education, property
or participation in public life, a good wife faced a lifetime of staying
home, bearing children and sitting quietly in a corner with her sewing.
Veronica, on the other hand, learns that a courtesan is expected to seduce
not just with her body, but with her mind as well.  She learns of history
and art, writes love poetry and interacts with men as they discuss the
issues of the day.  When the other option is mute insignificance,
prostitution suddenly seems considerably less cruel a fate.
     Director Marshall Herskovitz wraps this tale in enough style, romance
and humor that it's usually as entertaining as it is provocative.
Sumptuous production design renders 16th century Venice in romanticized
colors and dark interiors, accentuated by Lucianna Arrighi's marvelous
costumes.  The central pairing of Sewell and McCormack generates heat and
tension as the two characters negotiate the tricky parameters of their
relationship.  Then again, McCormack never hits a single false note in her
performance, her expressive face registering emotions ranging from
innocence to astonishment to wicked wit.  Her sense of liberation as she
achieves a level of equality a "lady" could never achieve anchors the
film's strongest scenes, including a battle of verse with Marco's cousin
Maffio (Oliver Platt) and an encounter with oblivious Venitian wives
forced to quiz her on the war in which their husbands are engaged.
     For well over three quarters of its running time, DANGEROUS BEAUTY is
an unqualified pleasure.  You can feel free to leave the theater when the
plague strikes fair Venice, because at that point it quickly degenerates
into thematic proclamations and over-wrought courtroom confrontations.  It
certainly doesn't help matters that the court in question is an
Inquisition court charging harlotry and witchcraft as the causes of the
plague, providing plenty of opportunity for right-thinking audience
members to cluck their tongues at religious hypocrisy and demagoguery.
After offering well over an hour of subversive notions cloaked in costume
drama, Jeannine Dominy's script plants Veronica on a soapbox for the
deliver of an I-am-Renaissance-woman-hear-me-roar manifesto, inspiring all
and sundry to leap to their feet in an "Oh Captain, my Captain" show of
solidarity.  Don't let those cheap theatrics wash the good taste of the
rest of DANGEROUS BEAUTY out of your mouth.  McCormack's radiant
performance and an unusual exploration of primitive feminism give it the
real punch its forced conclusion tries too hard to provide.

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
     How's this for damnation via faint praise: I'm pretty impressed that
28 DAYS didn't turn out to be an utterly unwatchable disaster. There
aren't many film premises that would set off my Early Crap Alert System
like a feel-good comedy-drama about folks in a rehab clinic (maybe Robin
Williams in a feel-good comedy-drama about a robot who wants to be human).
You've got your pathos, you've got your cheap emotion, you've got your
showy drunken scenes for actors and you've got your central character
arc so rigidly defined you could set your watch by when denial turns into
a great big group hug. 
     I've got to hand it to director Betty Thomas for lending 28 DAYS a
little dark edge, and to screenwriter Susannah Grant for delivering a few
more solid laughs than I was expecting. Unfortunately, they're still not
able to overcome the basic flaws in their story. Their protagonist is Gwen
Cummings (Sandra Bullock), a party girl always running just on the edge of
out-of-control with her drinking and pill-popping. She crosses over that
edge when she leaves her sister's (Elizabeth Perkins) wedding in a
shambles and crashes a limousine into a house. Gwen finds herself
sentenced to a four week stay at Serenity Glen Rehabilitation Center,
where she initially refuses to identify with the other patients. Soon,
however, she realizes she does have a problem, and begins the long, slow
road to sobriety.
     Emphasis on the "long" and "slow." Gwen actually hits bottom
relatively early in 28 DAYS, leaving plenty of time for comic episodes
focusing on Gwen's fellow travellers, including Oliver (Mike O'Malley), a
doughy self-styled ladies' man; Gerhardt (Alan Tudyk), a flamboyant gay
man who grows emotional easily; Eddie (Viggo Mortensen), a professional
baseball pitcher; and Andrea (Azura Skye), Gwen's high-strung, soap opera-
and heroin-addicted roommate. There are more than a few good gags to be
found in the interaction between the support group members, but there's
nothing driving the narrative forward once Gwen decides to go straight.
It's not that the process of recovery ends with one decision, of course.
In 28 DAYS, however, the process of drama does end with that one
descision, leaving the film to grab at relationships and confrontations
that never go anywhere.
     Those moments might have seemed more vital if not for the uninspired
performance by Sandra Bullock. It feels like I've been a Bullock booster
long after most others have leapt from her feisty-cute bandwagon, but
there's little going on behind her attitude in 28 DAYS. Flashback segments
show Gwen and her sister dealing with their alcoholic single mother,
scenes that should add resonance to Gwen's struggle for sobriety. But
there's never any urgency to Gwen's struggle with addiction -- she never
slips once she admits she's an alcoholic, and she becomes one of her
group's "strong ones" too quickly. At least her post-sobriety scenes are a
reprieve from her cartoon rendition of staggering drunkenness. In this
role, Bullock looks like she's completely out of her depth.
     Then again, depth doesn't really appear to be a priority in 28 DAYS. 
Betty Thomas does do a nice job with altered perspectives, shooting hazy
memories in grainy video and capturing some funny confessional scenes with
an I'm-the-center-of-the-world iris effect. There is the small problem
that those confessionals don't really belong in 28 DAYS, but there's no
solid sense of what belongs throughout the story. It becomes frustrating
to realize that Gwen's relationship with her equally party-time boyfriend
Jasper (Dominic West) is going to be central to the plot, rather than her
relationship with her straight-arrow sister. The fragmentation of family,
the different paths taken by two adult children of an alcoholic and the
challenges of forgiveness could have made for a much more compelling
sub-text than a half-hearted romantic triangle with Eddie at the other
vertex. Instead, 28 DAYS tosses the sisters a couple of token scenes
before retreating to the safe comedy of Gwen's personal cuckoo's nest. 28
DAYS offers some effective comedy, and it does manage to avoid pathos and
cheap emotion. In fact, with its fragmented narrative and limp lead
performance, it comes close to avoiding emotion altogether.

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
MIGHTY JOE YOUNG (1998)
Starring:  Charlize Theron, Bill Paxton, Rade Sherbedgia, Peter Firth,
David Paymer, Regina King.
Screenplay:  Mark Rosenthal & Lawrence Konner.
Producers:  Ted Hartley and Tom Jacobson.
Director:  Ron Underwood.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Mighty Joe Young gives the most noteworthy performance in MIGHTY JOE
YOUNG, which is only to be expected.  After all, like the dinosaurs in
JURASSIC PARK or the tornados in TWISTER (another film in which Bill
Paxton is upstaged by a special effect), the big ape is the only reason
anyone might want to see the film.  In this big-budget remake of the 1949
ersatz KING KONG, a combination of monkey suit, computer animation and
electronics replace Ray Harryhausen stop-motion to provide a more
versatile range of emotion.  The goal was a sympathetic simian, a 15-foot
ton o' love you couldn't help but cheer for.
     All evidence suggests that making Joe a crowd-pleasing character was
all anyone involved in MIGHTY JOE YOUNG cared about -- and they couldn't
even get _that_ right.  They begin by making him an orphan, his mother
killed by poachers in Africa on the same night that anthropologist Dr.
Ruth Young (Linda Purl) leaves her own daughter an orphan trying to save
the apes.  Twelve years later, American zoologist Gregg O'Hara (Bill
Paxton) comes to Africa to investigate legends of a giant ape, and
discovers Joe to be real -- and his caretaker, Dr. Young's daughter Jill
(Charlize Theron), to be beautiful.  O'Hara offers Joe protection at a Los
Angeles nature preserve, but danger lurks in the person of Strasser (Rade
Sherbedgia), the killer of Joe and Jill's parents who has both dollar
signs and vengeance on his mind.
     MIGHTY JOE YOUNG can only work on a story level if Joe is not a
monster but a sensitive, misunderstood stranger in a strange land, like a
hirsute E. T.  Unfortunately, there is not a shred of internal logic to 
Joe's personality.  At times, he's a big playful kid; at other times, for
no apparent reason other than a cheap laugh, he's a super-intelligent
beast who shakes his head ironically and escapes from pursuers with
cleverly-executed diversionary tactics.  One minute he's looking at O'Hara
as an enemy and a rival for Jill's affection, and the next he's holding
O'Hara's hand like they're old pals.  Even Joe's situational sense of
morality makes it hard to care about him, as he dispatches villains with
the kind of ruthlessness you'd expect of James Bond, not the furry hero of
a Disney movie.  Joe's not a character -- he's a contrivance, manipulated
by technicians for whatever tone suits the needs of the moment.
     That leaves the human characters, and oh what a scary mistake that
turns out to be.  Charlize Theron is a tremendously appealing actress, but
she's instantly ridiculous traipsing around the jungle in a designer
coiffure; Bill Paxton fares little better as the earnest, bland hero you
expect at any moment will scold the villain with "he's in it for the
money, not the science."  They get to wander together in a couple of
canned romantic interludes so absurd you'll want to shoot yourself in the
thigh with a tranquilizer dart.  The rest of the cast consists of 
obligatory types (the Intransigent Authority Figure, the Henchman, etc.)
and obligatory cameos from the original (Terry Moore and Ray Harryhausen
himself), all standing around waiting for Joe to go on his action-packed
climactic rampage.
     There are plenty of viewers to whom none of this will matter in the
slightest, provided MIGHTY JOE YOUNG delivers its share of family
adventure.  In fact, it works sporadically on that level, with a couple of
lively chases and some whoop-it-up destruction on Hollywood Boulevard.
I'm just not sure what kids will make of the violence Joe inflicts on
innocent bystanders, or his streak of homicidal vigilantism.  It's telling
that the film has to put a child in jeopardy in the final ten minutes to
make Joe's noble heart evident, and have the child plead for the ape's
well-being with a wide-eyed "Is Joe gonna be all right?"  All the
film-makers needed to do for MIGHTY JOE YOUNG to work on a basic level was
make it easy to root for Joe.  Instead, the only character that matters --
in a Disney film, no less -- is an unstable, ill-defined murderer.  Say it
ain't so, Joe...say it ain't so.

Title
Review for Orphans (1997)
ORPHANS
(The Shooting Gallery)
Starring:  Douglas Henshall, Gary Lewis, Stephen McCole, Rosemarie
Stevenson, Frank Gallagher.
Screenplay:  Peter Mullan.
Producers:  Paddy Higson and Frances Higson.
Director:  Peter Mullan.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You can't quite prepare for the possibility that your enjoyment of a
film will hinge on subtitles. Those translating captions are truly a mixed
blessing for the worldly cineaste. On the one hand, they're infinitely
preferable to wretched dubbing that sucks the life out of performances. On
the other hand, they can be undercut by techical ineptitude (fuzzy white
text that gets lost in white backgrounds) or linguistic laziness (opting
to translate only about every fourth word). Then there are the oddest
cases, where English is translated back into English due to concern over
the intelligibility of thick accents: TRAINSPOTTING, MY NAME IS JOE and
the 1997 Scottish comedy-drama ORPHANS, just now making its way to
American screens.
     There's some pretty interesting stuff going on in ORPHANS. I only
wish the subtitling hadn't distracted me virtually every minute of the
film. The bulk of the story takes place in the 24 hours before the funeral
of a Glasgow mother of four. Over the course of one long night and
morning, the four siblings deal with radically different responses to
their mother's death. Eldest son Thomas (Gary Lewis) keeps a vigilant,
self-sacrificing watch over the casket at the church after an emotional
performance at a karaoke bar. Michael (Douglas Henshall) copes with a
knife wound sustained in a fight with a man who mocked Thomas' teary song.
John (Stephen McCole) sets out with his pal Tanga (Frank Gallagher) to
kill the man who injured Michael. And Sheila (Rosemarie Stevenson) --
wheelchair-bound with an unspecified condition, perhaps cerebral palsy --
simply wants to avoid the funeral altogether.
     The siblings' adventures are entirely episodic, and therefore -- not
surprisingly -- of widely varying quality. Most compelling are the
misadventures of John and Tanga, including their stop to torment a
customer who stiffed Chinese food deliveryman Tanga on a tip and a
startling moment after John finally confronts the man he's sworn to kill.
Michael's quiet encounter with his ex-wife is also a winner, leaving so
many things unsaid that it says virtually everything. Less effective are
Sheila's troubles after her chair's power runs out, and Thomas'
over-the-top interpretation of his responsibility as number one son. The
tone varies radically as well -- I don't know what twisted flight of
writer/director Peter Mullan's fancy inspired Michael's run-in with an
ill-tempered pub owner -- but on balance the stronger segments and the
solid performances make ORPHANS well worth watching.
     Unless, of course, the subtitles make you want to apply the palm of
your hand to your forehead in a disco beat. It's not just that the
accents, though thick, seem fairly understandable without any visual aids.
It's not just that the subtitler seeks to prove that point by arbitrarily
opting to let several lines of dialogue stand on their own. No, it's
really the cringe-inducing job the subtitler does of not merely
transcribing, but translating (eliminating contextually obvious colloquial 
expressions in favor of their blander synonyms). And not just translating,
but editing (the subtitler steadfastly refuses to place a certain magic
four-letter word on screen, and often substitutes "damn" for "f***ing").
The result is an art house film experience that's intellectually
insulting: a movie delivered to a theatrical audience as though it were
the airline version.
     You can't blame Mullan for such a godawful decision; in fact, I feel
sorry for him. He's made a film which, while flawed, has some provocative
things to say about grief and family, wrapped up in turns of plot and
character that are downright Shakespearean. That should have been the film
American audiences were allowed to see, not this bizarre approximation in
which the subtitles are wrapped around the film like a strip of paper on a
hotel room toilet, sanitizing it for your protection. If this is what
subtitle purists are going to get for their buck, maybe it's time to
reconsider hiring Americans to do a dub job. I can listen to a botched,
scene-ruining translation just as easily as someone I can read it.

Title
Review for Nobody's Fool (1994)
Starring:  Paul Newman, Jessica Tandy, Bruce Willis, Dylan Walsh,
           Melanie Griffith, Pruitt Taylor Vince.
Screenplay/Director:  Robert Benton.
     Maybe it's envy, maybe it's years of Hollywood trying to sell
every pretty boy or gorgeous girl as the Next Big Thing, and maybe
it's some combination of the two.  For whatever reason, both
moviegoers and critics alike seem to have incredible difficulty
acknowledging that attractiveness and talent could go hand in hand.
Paul Newman was nearly sixt before it became widely acknowledged
that there was more to this guy than his famous blue eyes; he could
actually act.  When he won as Best Actor in 1987 for THE COLOR OF
MONEY, it was widely considered a lifetime achievement award, but
apparently Newman had at least one more trick up his sleeve:
NOBODY'S FOOL, a small, quiet drama driven by Newman's delightfully
weathered lead performance.
     Newman plays Donald "Sully" Sullivan, an often-unemployed
construction worker living in the sleepy upstate New York town of
North Bath.  After suffering an on-the-job knee injury, Sully's days
are largely spent playing poker, bantering with his landlady
(Jessica Tandy) and trying to squeeze some compensation out of the
construcion company's owner Carl Roebuck (Bruce Willis).  But during
this holiday season, there are other opportunities.  In town for
Thanksgiving is Sully's son Peter (Dylan Walsh), a son he's had an
uneasy relationship with since Sully left the family when Peter was
a baby.  Peter is having marital troubles of his own, and when Peter
stays in town with his own son, Sully has the chance to look back on
his life and begin to take on some degree of responsibility for it.
     Writer/director Robert Benton has a gift for making low-key,
relationship-based films (KRAMER VS. KRAMER, PLACES IN THE HEART),
and NOBODY'S FOOL is a worthy heir to that tradition.  Benton uses
his snow-covered locations beautifully, practically turning North
Bath into one of the characters in the story.  In many ways,
NOBODY'S FOOL is as much about North Bath as it is about Sully.
This is a town where everyone really does know everyone else, where
local disputes are settled by a judge (Philip Bosco) who addresses
people by their first names, and where a guy like Sully, to all
outward appearances a loser in life, is still treated with a basic
respect for his independent mind.  When a local banker attempts to
bring a theme park to North Bath, it is a demonstration of a
fundamental misunderstanding of what the town is about:  a sense of
family.
     That connectedness makes the relationships between characters
in NOBODY'S FOOL a rare joy.  There is not a mean-spirited moment to
be found, because even the characters who don't get along treat each
other as fellow humans.  Sully's feud with Carl is one of the few
external conflicts in the film, manifested primarily in a game of
stealing a snow-blower back and forth, but even that exchange is
essentially good-humored.  It's one of the things that makes Sully
so appealing as a character:  as ornery as he can be, he always
treats people decently.  His paternal relationship with sadsack
co-worker Rub (Pruitt Taylor Vince) is a pleasure to watch unfold,
and a simple moment when Sully helps a senile older woman back to
her home is handled without an ounce of condescension.  It's
ironic--and perhaps part of the point of NOBODY'S FOOL--that the one
relationship which seems forced is that between Sully and Peter.
Still, there's something strangely satisfying about a meeting
between an estranged father and son which doesn't include a shouting
match or tears.
     However, the main reason Sully is so appealing is Paul Newman.
He has reached a point in his career where he doesn't really play
characters any more; instead, he slips into them like the flannel
shirts Sully favors.  That is in no way meant to belittle what
Newman does as an actor.  The fact is that he makes it all look
effortless, as though he's really been Sully all his life, and
someone just happened to turn the camera on at this moment.  The
background for the character (an abusive father, his own abandonment
of his family) seems almost tacked on so the movie seems to be about
something more, but Newman doesn't really need it.  What we are
watching is the story of a man who is somehow coming to terms with
all the choices he has made in his life, and choosing to move
forward rather than stand in place.  It's Newman's gift that he can
do all that with a well-placed sigh and a twinkle in those eyes.

Title
Review for Bogus (1996)
Starring:  Whoopi Goldberg, Gerard Depardieu, Haley Joel Osment.
Screenplay:  Alvin Sargent.
Director:  Norman Jewison.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is a frustrating thing to watch a high concept get in the way of a
perfectly good film.  In BOGUS, there is a scene in which the Jimmy
Stewart classic HARVEY is showing on a television, and the reference makes
you suspect that someone went into a pitch meeting to describe BOGUS as
"HARVEY, but you can see the rabbit...and he's Gerard Depardieu."  BOGUS
could have been -- and should have been -- a simple story of mutual need,
and there are plenty of reasons to believe it could have been a rather
good one.  Instead, poster-driven film-making has turned out yet another
promising but disappointing effort.
    BOGUS begins in Las Vegas, where 7-year-old Albert Franklin (Haley
Joel Osment) is living with his mother Lorraine (Nancy Travis), a circus
performer.  When Lorraine is killed in a car accident, Albert is left in
Lorraine's will to the care of her foster sister Harriet (Whoopi
Goldberg), whom she had not seen in many years.  Harriet, a serious-minded
businesswoman living in Newark, NJ, claims she doesn't "have a maternal
bone in (her) body," but she agrees to take Albert in when the only other
option is state care.  Still, Harriet has difficulty relating to the young
boy, who has chosen to relate instead to an imaginary friend who emerged
from a coloring book, a Frenchman called Bogus (Depardieu).
     There are a lot of things right with BOGUS, beginning with the
performances.  Whoopi Goldberg apparently decided to shake off a string of
one-note trash-talkers and turn in some of her best work in years; Harriet
is not the typical Whoopi wiseacre, although she still gets in a few
decent lines.  Instead, she is a woman dedicated to over-compensating for
a harsh childhood by becoming a more successful adult.  Shaggy-haired
Haley Joel Osment hovers just this side of precocity, doing surprisingly
little posing and emoting as the smart but lonely Albert, and he really
seems to work well with other actors.  The connection between Goldberg and
Osment develops slowly, but eventually it seems quite genuine.  And
Depardieu, who is genetically incapable of sleep-walking through a
performance, has the ideal comical demeanor for his role.
     That role, unfortunately, is the real problem with BOGUS, because
someone should have realized that its central conceit was a big mistake.
It is evident enough in the fact that Depardieu really has nothing to do
but strike an offended pose when someone doesn't believe in him or feed
Albert lines like a French TelePrompter.  Bogus is a prop, not a
character -- he is required strictly to smile benignly and to offer
advice which one would expect from a child psychologist rather than an
imaginary playmate.
     The more substantial issue from a structural standpoint is that
screenwriter Alvin Sargent never commits to whom this story is about, and
Bogus is the crutch which allows him to do it.  When Albert and Bogus are
conversing, BOGUS is about a boy in need of comfort, and that is _not_
what it should be about.  This is Harriet's story, and we should watch her
grow into an understanding of what her life is missing through her
attempts to understand what Albert's life is missing.  By attempting to
place those two stories on an equal footing, Sargent and director Norman
Jewison diminish both of them.  They also end up condescending both to
Harriet and to the audience, because we should no more be able to see
Bogus than we are able to see Harvey.  Harriet's doubts are given no
weight, and there is a strange lack of trust in the audience demonstrated
by the refusal to allow our imaginations -- which the story seems to value
so greatly -- do their work.
     I am certain that some viewers will find the more fanciful elements
in BOGUS enchanting.  These same viewers might also consider my
pooh-poohing of those elements so much humbuggery, but to do so is to
misunderstand my meaning.  BOGUS should be fanciful; it simply didn't need
to be obvious.  Imagine the story with a boy fond of magic, chatting with
an invisible friend instead of grieving, and the severe Harriet (whom we
see in a wonderful scene reacting so violently to a gathering of children
that she actually knocks several of them over) struggling to connect with
Albert by re-connecting with a childhood she feels she never had.  Imagine
more time spent establishing Harriet's workaholic character, and less time
spent on goofy scenes like Albert's defense of Bogus in his classroom.
BOGUS is far from a bad film -- Goldberg is too good, and there are some
solid laughs -- but there is a far more affecting film to be found
somewhere where a tale of redemption and imagination takes precedence over
how easy it will be to construct an advertising campaign.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
THE HAUNTING (1999)
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson.
Screenplay:  David Self, based on the novel _The Haunting of Hill House_
by Shirley Jackson.
Producers:  Susan Arnold, Donna Roth and Colin Wilson.
Director:  Jan De Bont.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's too bad there couldn't have been a bit more distance between the
release of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT and the making of THE HAUNTING -- then,
at least, director Jan De Bont wouldn't have had an excuse.  With recent
history to consider, it may have made a perverse economic sense to turn
Shirley Jackson's supremely creepy story into a special effects-filled
funhouse.  Then along comes BLAIR WITCH to prove that you can still rattle
an audience with what might be happening rather than a computer-generated
representation of what is happening.  Ironically, BLAIR WITCH owes a debt
to the original 1963 version of THE HAUNTING in its study of the
psychology of fear.  Sadly, THE HAUNTING circa 1999 owes a debt to Jan
(TWISTER, SPEED 2) De Bont in its study of thick-headed filmmaking.
     An even more bitter irony is that this version of THE HAUNTING
gathers its characters for a study of the psychology of fear.  Researcher
Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) brings together three subjects for an
experiment, telling them only that it's a study of insomnia.  His actual
goal is to examine mounting fear and paranoia by placing his trio of
volunteers in the creepy Hill House, a mammoth manor with a dark history.
Nell (Lili Taylor), Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and Luke (Owen Wilson) all
soon experience strange phenomena, but it is the emotionally fragile Nell
who experiences them most strongly.  She comes to believe that the spirits
of tormented children haunt Hill House, and that she must play a special
role in quieting those spirits.
     It's fairly clear from the start that the real star of THE HAUNTING
is the house itself.  De Bont sprinkles the film liberally with sweeping
helicopter shots of the sprawling exterior; he prowls through the bending
hallways and pans across cavernous great rooms; he lets cinematographer
Caleb Deschanel bathe the ornate bedrooms in muted oranges and reds.
Eugenio Zanetti's production design is certainly eye-catching, offering
more detail than one could possibly absorb in one sitting, but at a
certain point the sprawling staginess of the house starts to work against
the film.  It begins to feel like Disney's Haunted Mansion crossed with
the Winchester Mystery House, a tourist attraction designed more for 
spooky giggles than for genuine shivers.
     Once the house fails to deliver the creepiness, you're left with the
treatment of the material, which is literalist to the mundane extreme.
Robert Wise's 1963 THE HAUNTING was hardly perfect -- Julie Harris' 
hand-wringing fussiness took her Nell too far over the edge from the start
-- but it began from the principle that fear is about anticipation, not
revelation.  De Bont has no interest in any such subtleties.  Instead of
making a film about the way an environment of terror is more powerful in
imagination than in reality, he makes a film about faces appearing in
pillowcases, leaping skeletons, windows that turn into big staring
eyeballs, and living statues a la Ray Harryhausen.  Every bit of subtext
is either turned into in-your-face text (Claire Bloom's ambiguously
flirtatious Theo in the original becomes Catherine Zeta-Jones' "Hi, I'm a
bisexual" Theo) or abandoned (a key piece of Hill House back-story about
a tormented caretaker similar to Nell).  With its foundation-shaking
finale and monstrous apparitions, this isn't a remake of THE HAUNTING.
It's a remake of POLTERGEIST.
     Of course there's a place for the POLTERGEISTs of cinema.  Generally,
however, it helps if that sort of film can tap into something primal, like
scary clowns or menacing trees.  THE HAUNTING can't really be classified
as a horror film, because there's nothing remotely horrifying about it,
unless you count the inanely expository dialogue (e.g., a character
reacting to a stairway collapsing: "Look, the stairway is collapsing!").
In fact, it's often downright laughable -- sometimes intentionally (Owen
Wilson's goofball performance), sometimes not (a blissed-out otherworldly
ending that makes GHOST look restrained).  De Bont has made a film from
The School of Quips and Money Shots, all flash and chuckle.  He's merely
interested in showing off his big-budget toys so everyone can see the
thing that goes ooga-booga.  That's a pretty limp take on a tale of the
ooga-boogas inside our heads.

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
THE PERFECT STORM
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, John C. Reilly,
William Fichtner, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio.
Screenplay:  Bill Wittliff, based on the book by Sebastian Junger.
Producers:  Paula Weinstein, Wolfgang Petersen and Gail Katz.
Director:  Wolfgang Petersen.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  136 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The amazing thing about Sebastian Junger's best-selling non-fiction
book THE PERFECT STORM was that it created an enthralling, page-turning
story out of two less-than-pulse-pounding subjects: fishing and weather.
Even more surprising, perhaps, was the manner in which he chose to make
those subjects readable. Rather than creating a de facto novel about the
people involved in the events, Junger dives into journalistic detail. He
immerses the reader so completely in the hard lives of swordfishermen as a
culture that it's never necessary for him to over-dramatize the individual
lives he's focusing on. As for the weather, he is similarly successful at
creating specifics out of generalities. For Junger, tension and adventure
came from the simple facts.
     Screenwriter Bill Wittliff, in adapting THE PERFECT STORM, did not
choose journalistic detail. Instead, he chose melodramatic twaddle. The
time is October 1991, and the Gloucester, Mass. swordfishing boat Andrea
Gail has just returned to port with a less-than-stellar catch, leading
Captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney) to attempt one more run before the
season ends. Fishing the Grand Banks is dangerous in the late fall, but
Tyne and his five crewmen -- including relative newcomer Bobby Shatford
(Mark Wahlberg) -- head into the tricky waters anyway. Little do they know
that a hurricane is brewing near Bermuda, and that it's heading straight
for two other East Coast weather systems. An unlikely confluence of events
finds the Andrea Gail ready to head home just as the three systems
collide, stranding them at sea in the middle of a once-in-a-century
maelstrom.
     It's not an easy job Wittliff has taken on, because there's no
obvious through-line for Junger's account to take as a screen story.
Wittliff anchors his script with the relationship between Bobby and his
loving girlfriend Christina (Diane Lane), with token attention to the
personal lives of other Andrea Gail crew members like divorced Murph (John
C. Reilly) and romantically inept Bugsy (John Hawkes). The book
effectively conveyed the personal and physical toll exacted by a
fisherman's life, and for a while it appears that Wittliff is pointing the
story in the right direction. He sets up Tyne's recent run of hard luck, a
run he fears may cost him his boat if he doesn't pull in a big haul this
time around; he sets up Bobby's conflict over whether he can give up
fishing to settle down with Christina. THE PERFECT STORM could have been
set up as a seafaring TWISTER, with stick figure characters wrapped in
cool meteorological special effects. This film, at least, has its heart in
the right place.
     Its dialogue, however, could not be more wrong, wrong, wrong. Perhaps
panicked over how to make a journalistic account "engaging" for viewers,
the makers of THE PERFECT STORM apparently gave Bill Wittliff the
following instructions for writing his characters: "Imagine a particularly
bad romance novel with a $100 million budget." The people in THE PERFECT
STORM talk to each other like no human beings on the planet have ever
spoken to each other, let alone the taciturn folk of a New England fishing
town.  They say things like, "There's only love;" they say things like,
"You're heading right into the mouth of the monster!;" a rescue jumper
screams "Jonesy!" into the storm after a fallen comrade. For all the
verisimilitude Wittliff pumps into the conversations, the fishermen might
as well have spent two hours growling "Arrgh, matey" to one another. 
     If not for the thrillingly staged final hour, THE PERFECT STORM might
have been a total loss. As it stands, it's just on the border of worth a
look. Director Wolfgang Petersen stages the Andrea Gail's perilous journey
with the kind of tension that finds you pulling yourself into a ball in
your seat; there's also a strangely effective scene involving a mid-air
refueling attempt for a rescue helicopter thwarted by the intense winds.
It's purely visceral film-making, mind you, but it's very good visceral
film-making, and at least you don't have to worry about listening to the
next ridiculous thing to come out of someone's mouth. It's ironic, because
THE PERFECT STORM had the potential to be a powerfully human story in
spite of showy visual effects and adventure set pieces. Instead, it's only
worth watching for its visual effects and adventure set pieces. The storm
itself is perfect; the purple prose journey towards that storm makes you
long for a bit more journalistic distance. Or at least for someone to
fiddle with the sound mix so the wind drowned out every word.

Title
Review for Jerky Boys, The (1995)
Starring:  Johnny Brennan, Kamal Ahmed, Alan Arkin, Brad Sullivan.
Screenplay:  Johnny Brennan & Kamal Ahmed and James Melkonian &
             Rich Wilkes.
Director:  James Melkonian.
     There is a regular feature in "Sports Illustrated" magazine
devoted to examples of astounding stupidity.  It is titled "This
Week's Sign That the Apocalypse is Upon Us."  That phrase kept
running through my head as I sat through THE JERKY BOYS.  Somehow,
two obnoxious losers had managed to parlay a fascination with
juvenile humor and prank phone calls into an incredibly popular pair
of audio releases and a movie deal.  For irritating people, they
were being rewarded in the millions of dollars.  And the worst thing
is, *none* of it is funny.  THE JERKY BOYS is a terrible idea badly
executed.  And it will undoubtedly be extremely profitable.
     THE JERKY BOYS are Johnny (Johnny Brennan) and Kamal (Kamal
Ahmed), a pair of unemployed buddies still living with their mothers
in Queens, NY.  With all the time on their hands, the boys enjoy
running up hefty beer tabs and making wacky prank phone calls.  One
of these calls is made to organized crime boss Ernie Lazarro (Alan
Arkin), with the boys claiming to be mafia big shots from Chicago.
When Lazarro learns that they aren't who they claim to be, they find
themselves on the run from Lazarro's goons, as well as from the
local cop (Brad Sullivan) who over hears the phone call and believes
that they boys really are with the mob.
     Let us begin here: The idea of building a movie around prank
phone calls is somewhat mind-boggling to begin with.  THE JERKY BOYS
is full of shots of phones ringing, of stationary speaker phones, of
people talking on the phone.  I'm hard-pressed to think of any way
such a format could have been turned into riveting cinema.  Then
again, THE JERKY BOYS never had to be riveting cinema.  This is a
movie about one thing, giving two idiots a chance to do their
schtick, which consists entirely of insults, threats and silly
voices.  There are a bunch of absurd setups which are designed to
get the boys on a phone, an intercom or a dispatch radio, where they
each display their gift for two voices (Johnny is either a nasal
grouch or a nasal whiner, Kamal either a babbling immigrant or a
snarling authority figure).  In a strange way, it's a little like
the old Elvis Presley movies, in which it didn't matter what was
going on in the plot, as long as Elvis got a chance to sing.  That
was what the people were coming for.
     But for people coming to THE JERKY BOYS expecting the same
thing they heard on their best-selling CDs, they aren't going to get
it.  I have listened to the "Jerky Boys" CD, and I think it is
spectacularly unfunny, but there could be some minor entertainment
value in the befuddled reactions of the recipients of the calls.  Of
course, that simply is not possible in a movie; everyone is in on
the gag, so you end up with a lot of reaction shots of actors fuming
in mock frustration.  And there are few things sadder than the fact
that one of those actors is Alan Arkin.
     Much has been and will be written about THE JERKY BOYS as not
simply a bad movie, but as part of a horrible trend, the logical
successor (if logical is the word I want to use) to the popularity
of DUMB AND DUMBER, "Beavis and Butthead" and the like.  Not only
does treating THE JERKY BOYS in this way give it far more
sociological importance than it deserves, it insults those other
examples by comparison.  As bad as DUMB AND DUMBER was, at least
someone was trying; as stupid as "Beavis and Butthead" can be, at
least they are rooted in satire.  THE JERKY BOYS is simply junior
high school humor aimed at junior high schoolers.  It is aimed
squarely at those who are guaranteed to burst into uproarious and
self-righteous laughter at swishy gay stereotypes and copious
expletives.  If hearing someone intone the word "liverlips" several
times is your idea of yuks galore, then by all means toss your $7
into THE JERKY BOYS' coffers.  I suspect few moviegoers old enough
to get into this movie legally will waste their money or their time.

Title
Review for Emma (1996)
Starring:  Gwyneth Paltrow, Toni Collette, Jeremy Northam, Alan Cumming,
Ewan McGregor, Greta Scacchi, Juliet Stevenson, Polly Walker, Sophie
Thompson.
Screenplay:  Douglas McGrath.
Director:  Douglas McGrath.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When last we left Miss Emma Woodhouse, she was living in Beverly
Hills, happily in love with her step-brother...oh, and her name was Cher.
She was the lead character in a smart and utterly charming 1994 film
called CLUELESS, although she was never expressly named, and that makes
EMMA an experience of intense deja vu, even more so given the spate of
recent adaptations of other Jane Austen novels.  That places everyone
involved with EMMA in positions of uncomfortable but inevitable immediate
comparison -- director Douglas McGrath trying to portray upper class life
in 19th century England as artfully as SENSE AND SENSIBILITY's Ang Lee,
Gwyneth Paltrow competing with Alicia Silverstone for brattish
adorability, and so on.  Given these challenges, EMMA becomes almost more
entertaining than it already is on its own merits, another witty and
winning addition to the Austen canon, in which Paltrow becomes a bona fide
leading lady.
     Paltrow's Emma is a young woman living in the Surrey town of
Highbury, where her recent successful pairing of her former governess
(Greta Scacchi) and landowner Mr. Weston (James Cosmo) has her eager to
play matchmaker again.  Her target is the recently arrived Harriet Smith
(Toni Collette), whom Emma sees as an ideal match for the minister Mr.
Elton (Alan Cumming); Mr. Elton, however, has designs on someone else
entirely.  Mr. Frank Churchill (Ewan McGregor) is another possible suitor,
though Emma isn't sure that she doesn't want him for herself.  All this is
observed by Emma's brother-in-law Mr. Knightley (Jeremy Northam), who
tries to discourage her interference with honest counsel, then finds
himself caught up in Emma's complicated romantic world.
     As I considered Gwyneth Paltrow's performance in EMMA, I recalled an
old George Carlin routine in which he concluded that the reason dogs were
more expressive than cats was that dogs had eyebrows.  This observation in
no way means to compare Paltrow to a dog (far from it, though that is
another kettle of hormones entirely), but to describe why I think Paltrow
may be the most expressive young actress working:  in short, she has
phenomenal eyebrows.  If it seems I am doing an injustice to her ability
to interpret a line, or to her impressive British accent, I do not mean to
do so.  It is simply that there are moments in EMMA where Paltrow adopts a
facial expression so utterly perfect that her infuriating ability to make
you care about her despite her pettiness and manipulation seems drawn from
the soul of Austen's novel.  There are actors in films today that it is
distressingly clear will never know how to act with a degree of subtlety
which allows a shift of the eye or a hint of a frown to advance their
character.  At the ripe old age of 22, Gwyneth Paltrow gives a clinic on
acting for the screen in EMMA.
     It is a blessing that she is able to do so, since she has to carry
much of the first half of the film.  McGrath's rookie direction is
somewhat static, and the Harriet-Emma-Mr. Elton triangle is hampered by a
surprisingly stuffy performance by Toni Collette.  It is the late
introduction of Frank Churchill and Mr. Elton's new wife (Juliet
Stevenson) which kick-starts EMMA into enough energy to match its
cleverness.  Ewan McGregor (the heroin-addicted Renton in the current
TRAINSPOTTING) infuses Churchill with a charisma which proves a match for
Emma's nonchalance about her own love life; a scene in which he seizes her
fancy by proving men can gossip as well as women is an utter joy.  Emma
finds a match of another kind in Mrs. Elton, a self-obsessed busybody whom
Emma comes to dislike intensely, perhaps because they are too much alike,
and Juliet Stevenson plays the part of the shrew with a casual good humor
which undercuts the stereotype.  And I would be remiss in not pointing out
the delightful performances by Sophie Thompson as the garrulous spinster
Miss Bates and Jeremy Northam as the dashing Mr. Knightley.
     It is more than a bit distracting at times to be only 12 months
removed from the release of CLUELESS; duplicated details like Harriet
burning silly little mementos of Mr. Elton lose some of their snap in
their familiarity.  But McGrath's screenplay is a gem of humor and
sparkling characterizations, and is more than faithful to the spirit of
his source material.  Most importantly, he has cast his lead role with a
keen sense of its challenges -- he needed an actor with a willingness to
play a vain, foolish and snobbish young woman without winking at us to
make sure we don't dislike her.  She trusts her ability to make Emma's
good heart shine through her youthful conviction in her own infallibility,
and McGrath is wise to trust her as well.  Both prove far from clueless in
that respect.

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
     I'm sure there are people out there who view BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO
AMERICAN as yet another sign that the end-times are upon us; they are
probably the same folks who have condemned from day one the MTV series on
which it is based as a celebration of violence, stupidity and lack of
respect.  Speaking as an admittedly defensive some-time fan of the show, I
think "Beavis and Butt-Head" is much smarter and more self-aware than its
detractors give it credit for being.  Mike Judge created a series for MTV
which takes aim at the generation of youth MTV helped create:  kids
without the attention span to sit through an entire music video.  Do young
viewers of the show sometimes delight in the anarchy and low humor
without appreciating the sub-text?  Probably, but the same statement is
true of "The Simpsons," and no one would accuse "The Simpsons" of not
being smart.
     Then again, Bart Simpson is only ten; Beavis and Butt-Head are
teenagers, scrawny packages of surging hormones and attitude, and BEAVIS
AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA captures them at their worst, which is to say
their best.  The story finds our heroes (both voiced by creator/director
Judge) discovering that their beloved television has been stolen, and
setting out to find it or any acceptable replacement.  Instead, they find
Muddy Grimes (an uncredited Bruce Willis), a shady character who thinks
Beavis and Butt-Head are the two guys he's hired to "do" his duplicitous
wife Dallas (an equally uncredited Demi Moore).  The boys don't interpret
"do" as "kill," however, and head for Las Vegas where thy think they are
finally about to score.  Dallas has other ideas, though, and uses the
dim-witted pair to transport a stolen military germ warfare weapon to
Washington D.C.  As Beavis and Butt-Head make their way across America,
they are chased by ATF Agent Fleming (Robert Stack), a hard-nosed Fed with
an unusual fondness for body cavity searches.
     There's no point in pretending that BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA
doesn't traffic in plenty of below-the-belt gags -- and above-the-belt,
where women are concerned -- because that is the level of Beavis and
Butt-Head's sense of humor.  Sex, masturbation, gas and other toilet
functions all send the twosome into paroxysms of their trademark immature
snickering, yet Judge stages many of these moments with a knowing wit.  A
stylized montage of high-rolling Vegas action, which in most films would
find the heroes living it up and enjoying the big time, instead finds
Beavis and Butt-Head unable to stop staring at a bare-breasted ship's
figurehead; another scene has them missing a bus thanks to their
fascination with auto-flush urinals.  While Beavis and Butt-Head find only
sexually suggestive town names worth noting on their trans-continental
trek, Judge allows the audience to recognize that he too understands how
idiotic they are.
     That is not to say that a little Beavis and Butt-Head doesn't go a
long way.  Even fans of the series might find 80 minutes of their antics
getting repetitive, particularly when connected to a standard "mistaken
identity" premise in which morons take such bizarre actions that they are
assumed to be brilliant.  The series also benefits from the commentary on
music videos which breaks up each episode's plot, and that commentary is
missed in BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA.  Its absence removes the rare
opportunities you have to witness how selective their obliviousness can be
as they analyze the cliches of videos.  Judge tosses in some clever bits
unrelated to the series, including a great opening credits sequence scored
to a "Shaft"-like Isaac Hayes tune and voice cameos by Cloris Leachman and
a fellow credited as "Earl Hofer" (David Letterman's nom-de-cinema in
CABIN BOY), but most of the gags are directed squarely at fans of the
show.  The uninitiated might find themselves baffled at the applause which
goes up for Cornholio, Beavis' caffeine- and sugar-fueled alter-ego.
     A keen grasp of reality prevents me from attempting anything like a
conversion of "Beavis and Butt-Head" haters.  Hard-core opponents consider
them not just annoying but actively evil, an animated pair of
potty-mouthed Pauly Shores sucking the collective will to think out of the
heads of America's impressionable youth.  But BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO
AMERICA, crude though it may be, is more genuinely inventive than SPACE
JAM and 101 DALMATIANS combined, and less insulting to the intelligence of
younger viewers.  All it takes is a very funny moment which underscores
the futility of Butt-Head trying to piece together a rather elementary
crime scene to point out that dumb characters don't have to mean a dumb
movie.  BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA overcomes its fundamental dopiness
to provide entertainment for those prepared to laugh with its
self-absorbed protagonists _and_ those prepared to laugh at them.

Title
Review for Phantom, The (1996)
     The recipe for THE PHANTOM is the result of the kind of perverse
logic which produces some of Hollywood's most spectacular flops.  There is
a super-hero in a form-fitting costume, because the people seemed to love
it in SUPERMAN and BATMAN; there is derring-do in the 1930s involving
mysterious and powerful relics, because the people seemed to love it in
the Indiana Jones films; there is a nasty industrialist and a feisty
heroine because, well, the people always seem to love that.  In short, THE
PHANTOM is an action-adventure Frankenstein's monster, cobbled together
from pieces of other much better films -- and then nobody remembered to
give it a jolt of energy.
     Based on the 60-year-old comic strip by Lee Falk, THE PHANTOM tells
of Kit Walker (Billy Zane), the latest in a line of legendary figures
carrying on a 400-year old oath handed down from father to son to fight
"piracy, cruelty and injustice in all its forms" as The Phantom.  The form
it takes in 1938 is Xander Drax (Treat Williams), a power-hungry
millionaire who has learned of the existence of three ancient skulls
which, when brought together, can generate an incredible power.  Drax's
plans have become known to a New York newspaper publisher (Bill
Smitrovich), who sends his niece Diana (Kristy Swanson) to investigate a
mysterious web symbol which appears to be connected to the plan.  When
Diana is kidnapped by Drax's operatives, The Phantom comes to the rescue,
and Diana joins him on a mission to keep the skulls out of Drax's hands.
     If THE PHANTOM resembles any other recent attempt at cinematic
super-heroism, it is 1994's bomb THE SHADOW.  It is a film which never
once carves out for itself a distinct theme -- too straight most of the
time to be camp, and too dumb to work as a rousing adventure.  Director
Simon Wincer (LONESOME DOVE, FREE WILLY) has many talents, but he is a bad
choice for an action adventure.  Wincer likes to let his stories unfold at
a leisurely pace, but there isn't much of a story to unfold in THE
PHANTOM.  That leaves him with action set pieces which are slow,
perfunctory, and lacking a unique flavor.  THE PHANTOM feels like the work
of a director who simply never had an idea about what to do with the
material.
     To be fair to Wincer, that appears to be true of the cast as well.
Billy Zane, a solid physical presence who looks frighteningly like Peter
Gallagher's younger brother, provides no personality for either The
Phantom or Kit Walker.  The best adjective for Zane's Phantom is affable
-- he goes about the business of dispatching bad guys as though he were a
neighborhood beat cop in a 1930s movie, waving his baton at a couple of
young ruffians and admonishing them to run along home, now.  Similarly,
megalomania has never seemed as charming and unthreatening as it does
coming from Treat Williams, in one of the least interesting villain
performances in recent memory.  When Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa turns up as
pirate lord Kabai Sengh nearly 90 minutes into THE PHANTOM, I found myself
utterly stumped as to why he wasn't the primary bad guy, since at least he
had charisma.  And pity poor Kristy Swanson, trying so hard to be a spunky
liberated woman that she never bothers to notice that she doesn't have a
character to play.
     Rarely have I seen a so-called adventure film in which so many
participants seemed to be going through the motions like basketball
players on the wrong side of a blow-out, wrestling with a thoroughly
synthetic script.  Jeffrey Boam (INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE,
LETHAL WEAPON 2 & 3) knows how to work with established characters in an
established formula, and that's the way he approaches THE PHANTOM:  as
though we already know the drill, he's just filling in the blanks, and The
Phantom character's status as antecedent to modern action films
shields it from charges of wholesale theft.  But it simply isn't the case
that his audience is essentially familiar with The Phantom.  He assumes
that we know Kit Walker and Diana Palmer, and that he doesn't need to
bother setting up their relationship; he assumes that we are already on
the side of his hero.  He assumes that if he takes a story which could
have been the next Indiana Jones adventure (which, incidentally, is Boam's
next project) and puts a guy in a purple suit in place of the guy with the
fedora, no one will notice.  Lee Falk's Phantom may be 60 years old, but
to movie audiences, he's just another guy in a cover band trying to pass
himself off as a rock star.

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi IV: Jian dan ren wu (1996)
(New Line)
Starring:  Jackie Chan, Jackson Lou, Chen Chun Wu, Jouri Petrov.
Screenplay:  Stanley Tong, Nick Tramamonte, Greg Melliott, Elliot Tong.
Producer: Barbie Tung.
Director:  Stanley Tong.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, mild profanity).
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Try to keep up, there will be a test later:  JACKIE CHAN'S FIRST
STRIKE is the American theatrical release of the Hong Kong film POLICE
STORY 4: FIRST STRIKE, which was the sequel to POLICE STORY 3: SUPERCOP,
which was released in America last year as just plain SUPERCOP.  Then
there was another sequel to SUPERCOP, which also was called POLICE STORY 4
but was more widely known as PROJECT S, though that is something of a
tangent.  In the earlier POLICE STORY films, Jackie Chan's character was
called Chen Chia-chu; now in FIRST STRIKE, he is simply Jackie.  The
strange re-release patterns inspired by Chan's sudden American popularity
has made it nearly impossible to make any sense of the POLICE STORY
chronology, if making sense of things like this matter to you.  FIRST
STRIKE itself makes only a rudimentary kind of sense, but Chan's
hair-raising stunts and affable demeanor rarely require much set-up to be
enjoyable.
     Jackie, a Hong Kong cop, is on an assignment for the American CIA to
watch a woman called Natasha (Grishajeva Nonna) as the film opens, a
simple enough task on an airplane to the Ukraine.  It becomes less simple
when Natasha turns out to be smuggling American dollars to a man named
Tsui, dollars which will be used to purchase a Ukranian nuclear warhead
for sale on the black market.  Jackie is soon recruited by a Russian
intelligence agent named Gregor (Jouri Petrov) to track down Tsui, and
heads to Australia where Tsui's sister Annie (Chen Chun Wu) works at an
aquatic theme park.  Though Jackie is able to find Annie, he also finds
that Tsui's motives are unclear, and that Gregor may have a dark agenda of
his own.
     FIRST STRIKE is the third Jackie Chan feature in less than a year to
get an American release, following RUMBLE IN THE BRONX and SUPERCOP, and
it is certainly the biggest production of the three.  There are a couple
of off-hand references to James Bond in FIRST STRIKE, and that seems to be
the vibe director Stanley Tong is going for this time around.  A chase
sequence involving gun-toting skiers is straight out of FOR YOUR EYES
ONLY; the underwater battles in a shark tank with oxygen the most prized
possession is vintage THUNDERBALL.  The scenery shifts from Hong Kong to
the Ukraine to Australia, serving up a few sacrificial vehicles
(helicopters, a funeral carriage) for big-time explosions.  Throw in a
Saul Bass opening credits sequence and a vodka martini and you might think
007 had become a celibate Asian.
     Unfortunately, while FIRST STRIKE is the grandest of Chan's American
releases, it is also the least charming, for most of the same reasons.
Jackie Chan films don't work because of large scale set pieces; they work
because Chan himself is extremely personable and because his unmatched
fight choreography can make you giddy with pleasure.  The moments when
Chan gets to show his stuff up close are wonderful -- he flips through
windows as though he were made of paper, dances across rooftops, uses an
inflatable pool toy to walk quite literally on water.  The extended
sequence where he takes on four men by turning a broom, papier mache
dragon heads and an eight foot ladder into weapons is one of the most
spectacular hand-to-hand combat sequences I have ever seen on screen, a
combination of martial arts and acrobatics edited with astonishing
fluidity.  While the more elaborate bits fall flat with ho-hum
familiarity, the seven minutes of that one fight sequence make FIRST
STRIKE worth seeing.
     The very end of that sequence may be just as indicative of what makes
a Jackie Chan action film unique.  After battling the four opponents to a
standstill, Jackie watches a dozen new foes arrive, and slumps to the
ground in resignation.  As superhuman as Chan can be on screen, he is also
quite human in his persona.  In one clever scene, Jackie exchanges blows
with a massive Russian in typical chop-socky fashion, assumes his standard
preparatory fighting stance, then cringes at the punishment he has just
absorbed.  He doesn't endear himself to the audience by tossing off dreary
one-liners; he simply plays a guy, sometimes silly and sometimes
embarrassed, who happens to be able to defy gravity.  JACKIE CHAN'S FIRST
STRIKE is a terminally dopey spy thriller with anyone else in the lead
role.  Jackie Chan alone is enough to make the thought of FIRST STRIKE 2
-- or is that SUPERCOP 3, or POLICE STORY 5? -- somewhat appealing.

Title
Review for Bad Boys (1995)
Starring:  Martin Lawrence, Will Smith, Tea Leoni, Joe Pantoliano,
           Tcheky Karyo.
Screenplay:  Michael Barrie & Jim Mulholland and Doug Richardson.
Director:  Michael Bay.
     Gnaw on this factoid for a moment:  BAD BOYS was originally a
project with Dana Carvey slated to play one of the leads.  That is
not a misprint.  Dana Carvey.  And if you think about it long
enough, you will realize why BAD BOYS never had a prayer of being
anything more than mediocre, and in fact turned out quite bad.  It
is the classic case of a shell plot intended to do nothing more than
showcase the star's familiar comic routine.  BAD BOYS is an
amazingly boring action film, and will be funny only to fans of
Martin Lawrence and/or Will Smith.
     Lawrence and Smith play Marcus Burnett and Mike Lowry, two
Miami narcotics officers with very different personalities.  Marcus
is a home body with a wife (Theresa Randle) and three kids; Mike is
a player with a steady stream of lady friends.  They do share a
problem, however...a fortune in heroin from one of their busts which
has been stolen from the police station by mastermind Fouchet
(Tcheky Karyo).  The case becomes complicated when a witness (Tea
Leoni) to a pair of murders committed by Fouchet and his goons calls
for help, setting in motion a sequence of events in which Marcus is
forced to pretend he is Mike.  Meanwhile, both Mike and Marcus try
to track down Fouchet before he re-sells the heroin to mobsters.
     I'll tell you exactly what kind of movie BAD BOYS is.  It is
the kind of movie where anything that *can* blow up, *will* blow up.
It is the kind of movie where glass exists solely to be shattered,
either by bullets or by bodies; in one hilariously idiotic example,
a glass aquarium is mounted in the wall of a nightclub, allowing a
convenient view of the inside of the men's room as well as providing
a ready-made breakable item.  It is the kind of movie where a
misinterpreted phone conversation turns into an episode of "Three's
Company."  And it is the kind of movie where a guy in a wheelchair
gets knocked over by the villain just so you know that he's *really*
a villain (he probably doesn't recycle, either).  In short, it is a
collection of every conceivable action film cliche, right down to
the high-strung police captain (an incessantly screaming Joe
Pantoliano).
     Don't expect much better from the characters.  Martin Lawrence
has the role with the most potential, the family man playing the
part of the sexy bachelor, but he completely butchers it.  The part
requires someone capable of a little restraint, someone who appears
uncomfortable acting smooth and seductive.  That someone is *not*
Lawrence, who is full of swagger and attitude.  Falling back on his
popular stand-up and sit-com persona might prove popular with his
die-hard fans, but others will wonder exactly how he is supposed to
be different from Mike.  Marcus is a part that actually requires
some acting ability, and Martin Lawrence doesn't have much.  Will
Smith *does* have acting ability, and plenty of it, but he really
takes a back seat to Lawrence.  When he is allowed to show his
frustration with the mess Lawrence is making, of his house and his
image, Smith is quite good, and there is actually some energy in BAD
BOYS.  Those occasions, however, are all too rare.
     The simple truth is that, basically, BAD BOYS is trying to
showcase Lawrence and Smith the way BEVERLY HILLS COP showcased
Eddie Murphy, and a coherent plot would just get in the way of the
jokes.  There are clearly a lot of people who think Martin Lawrence
is funny, but I am not one of them.  It is just depressing watching
him bug his eyes at the suggestion that he is gay, or fumbling for
an explanation when his wife catches him in a lie (which,
incidentally, exists only as a lame plot device).  While Will Smith
can be quite funny, he becomes something of a straight man to
Lawrence, and that is a real misuse of his talents.  BAD BOYS is a
generic action flick full of pointless slow-motion shots by director
Michael Bay and heavy use of orange filters by cinematographer
Howard Atherton, sporadically interrupted by Lawrence and Smith's
profane version of the traditional buddy film odd couple.  BAD BOYS,
even worse movie.

Title
Review for Crow: City of Angels, The (1996)
Starring:  Vincent Perez, Mia Kirshner, Richard Brooks, Iggy Pop.
Screenplay:  David S. Goyer.
Director:  Tim Pope.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The advertising campaign for THE CROW: CITY OF ANGELS invites us to
"Believe in the power of another," but it sounds more like a plea for
sympathy.  After all, what are you supposed to do when you want to make a
sequel but the star of the first film is no longer with us?  Well, I
suppose the obvious answer -- swallow your checkbook and allow THE CROW to
rest in peace -- was unacceptable, but this is one sequel which seemed
utterly doomed from the first minute.  1994's THE CROW was a film with a
striking look, but it owed virtually every ounce of emotional resonance it
had to the tragic death of star Brandon Lee while filming the scene in
which his character is killed.  CITY OF ANGELS has no such back story to
prop up its re-tread of the first film, and seems determined to substitute
excess for emotion in what has to rank as one of the year's most grueling
cinematic ordeals.
     The setting is the near future in the City of Angels, where a drug
lord named Judah Earl (Richard Brooks) controls all.  It is the misfortune
of a mechanic named Ash (Vincent Perez) and his young son to witness a
gang of Judah's thugs murdering someone, and they in turn are murdered as
well.  But a little thing like death can't keep Ash down, not when he
becomes one with the vengeance-minded spirit of The Crow.  He befriends a
tattoo artist named Sarah (Mia Kirshner), but he has little time to spend
on relationships.  His mission is to find the people responsible for his
son's death -- including Judah himself -- and destroy them so that his
soul might find peace.
     If there is anyone you should really feel sorry for in this mess, it
is Vincent Perez, because I don't think he ever had a chance.  This isn't
like Val Kilmer stepping into Batman's boots, or Pierce Brosnan taking
over as 007; it's more like someone trying to replace Patrick Stewart as
Captain Picard.  THE CROW's fans are passionate about the film, and in
particular about the man they see as headed towards stardom before he was
cut down in his prime.  Perez has the right look for the part -- he looks
serviceably eerie in The Crow's face paint and leather duster -- but he's
not Brandon Lee.  That's not even a criticism, because I'm not convinced
Lee was anything that special.  The point is that those who come to this
film because they loved THE CROW are going to have a real problem with
this guy with a French accent taking over for their hero.
     Then again, I suppose Perez always could have said no, especially
once he got a look at a script which has him making his entrance emerging
from a fountain of water in tattered clothes looking like Esther Williams
on the way to a rave.  There is plenty of silliness like that in CITY OF
ANGELS (it tries to stake a claim to mytho-poetic status by including a
Tiresias-like blind seer), but mostly it is an empty recycling of THE
CROW.  The radical switch involves having the dead man avenging a son
rather than a lover, but otherwise it simply finds a different
leather-clad fellow killing his own killers one by one, and oh, the time
and energy exerted on finding creative methods of inflicting pain.  The
bill of fare in CITY OF ANGELS includes a hypodermic needle jammed up a
nose, a tattoo needle applied to the eyeball, eyes gouged out, and even a
tortured crow (don't worry, no animals were harmed in the making of this
film).  It's a resolutely ugly film director Tim Pope has put together,
heavy on gratuitous S&M but light on any semblance of a point.  Sarah (we
assume this is the skate-punk from the first film all grown up) serves
only to give us the lovely Mia Kirshner to look at, and Pope appears far
more concerned with serving up candle-wax-on-the-nipples than creating
characters.
     There are plenty of individual reasons to avoid CITY OF ANGELS
(though Iggy Pop makes an ideal villain for The Crow since he looks like a
corpse himself), but it's much simpler to explain why each category of
potential viewer should stay away.  If you did not see the first film, you
probably have no interest in a dark story of vengeance with plenty of
unpleasantness. If you saw the first film and did not like it, expect more
of the same in CITY OF ANGELS, only less compelling, less artistic and
more obsessed with music video theatrics.  And if you saw the first film
and _did_ like it, do the memory of Brandon Lee a great honor and do not
let his death provide a producer with an excuse to build a franchise this
awful on his grave.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME
(New Line)
Starring:  Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Robert Wagner, Michael York, Mindy
Sterling, Seth Greene, Verne Troyer, Rob Lowe.
Screenplay:  Mike Myers & Michael McCullers.
Producers:  Suzanne Todd, Jennifer Todd, Demi Moore & Eric McLeod and Mike
Myers & John Lyons.
Director:  Jay Roach.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, adult humor)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     First, this must be said:  I was wrong about the original AUSTIN
POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY.  In 1997, I gave the film an
unenthusiastic 5 out of 10, noting that writer/star Mike Myers'
infatuation with old "Saturday Night Live" sketches and characters blunted
the truly inspired comic moments.  I'm still pretty comfortable with my
rating, though a recent second viewing suggested I may have been slightly
stingy (Dr. Evil alone is too hilarious not to warrant at least a mild
recommendation).  No, I was wrong in a suggestion I made for improvement.  
I thought AUSTIN POWERS might have worked better as a pure 1960s period
piece rather than a fish-out-of-water comedy with shagadelic, cryogenic
secret agent Austin Powers (Myers) coping with 1990s life when he's thawed
out to battle old nemesis Dr. Evil (also Myers).  AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY
WHO SHAGGED ME proves that a different temporal setting wouldn't have
changed anything, because Myers used a different temporal setting and
_didn't_ change anything. 
     Those familiar with the original -- mostly from its spectacular
second life on video -- will recall that we left Dr. Evil drifting through
space in his Big Boy rocket while Austin honeymooned with agent Vanessa
Kensington (Elizabeth Hurley).  Both the Big Boy and Vanessa are quickly
dispatched to set Dr. Evil on his latest plan, which requires getting
Austin out of the way.  His fiendish plot involves traveling back through
time to 1969 to steal from the still-frozen Austin the source of all his
Powers:  his mojo.  Faster than you can say Basil Exposition (Michael 
York), Austin has a time machine of his own, and pops back to swinging
London.  There he teams up with CIA operative Felicity Shagwell (Heather
Graham) to recapture the mojo in question and prevent something evil from
happening.
     The exact nature of that something evil is, of course, entirely
beside the point.  THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME is at its goofy best when it's
most self-aware, mocking film conventions of all sorts.  Austin and 
Felicity drive through the "English Countryside" while noting "it's
amazing how much England looks in no way like Southern California;"
concerns about physics of time travel are dismissed with an admonishment
to the audience to do the same.  Myers can be utterly brilliant working
with incongruous situations, as when he follows a romantic liaison between
Dr. Evil and co-worker-in-evil Frau Farbissina (Mindy Sterling) with an
awkward "morning after" meeting at the underground lair's coffee machine.
When Myers finds a comic target -- Starbucks, the music of the 80s, STAR
WARS' opening narrative crawl -- he knows how to use it.
     He also doesn't know how to _stop_ using it.  The original AUSTIN
POWERS was at its most wearying when Myers took a joke and beat all
semblance of life out of it for several agonizing minutes.  He's at it
again this time, and he's using identical gags he already exhausted in the
previous film.  Once again, a naked Austin's naughty bits are hidden
strategically by other (usually phallic) objects; once again, Dr. Evil
engages in a binge of pre-emptively shushing his son Scott (Seth Greene);
once again, Austin makes several exaggerated, James Bond-like puns
referring to a villain's demise.  Even the original's best sequence -- the
Evil family therapy session -- is revisited as a "Jerry Springer" episode. 
And when Myers does come up with a new concept, he still insists on using
it twice, or twice as long as necessary.  We've all come to expect sequels
that recycle huge chunks of the original, usually in the action genre.
When a satirical comedy loses its sense of discovery, there's not much
reason for it to exist.
     The one major change is the 1969 setting, though there doesn't seem
to be much point to it.  The best reason for putting Austin back in his
element is to watch him be his lascivious, un-self-conscious self through
contemporary eyes.  Unfortunately, the plot turns him into a mojo-impaired
90s guy worried about his relationship, leaving the setting-specific humor
to a few Dr. Evil anachronisms.  There are some other new twists -- the
diminutive Dr. Evil clone Mini-Me (Verne Troyer); Rob Lowe doing a dead-on
Robert Wagner impression as the young Number 2; Myers finding a way to do
another character _and_ work in his beloved Scottish accent as the grossly
obese, aptly named Fat Bastard -- that hit and miss.  Mostly, it's a lot
more of the same.  That's a good thing when we're talking about Dr. Evil,
still looking for super-villain respect while dealing with a complicated
personal life.  That's a bad thing when we're talking about making the
same mistakes twice.  AUSTIN POWERS fans will surely be ready to forgive
Myers' lapses in imagination.  Others will be left trying to figure out
where this promising series could actually reach its potential.  Maybe the
1950s next time?

Title
Review for Female Perversions (1996)
(October)
Starring:  Tilda Swinton, Amy Madigan, Karen Sillas, Laila Robins, Dale
Shuger, Paulina Porizkova, Clancy Brown.
Screenplay:  Susan Streitfeld and Julie Hebert.
Producer:  Mindy Affrime.
Director:  Susan Streitfeld.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some people have facial features which seem to come from another era;
Tilda Swinton has features from another world.  Her almost translucent
skin, high cheekbones and wide blue eyes conspire to give her a faintly
alien appearance, intelligent and curious but isolated.  Those striking,
androgynous features made her perfect for the gender-bending title role in
1993's ORLANDO.  In a different way, they also make her perfect for the
role of FEMALE PERVERSIONS' protagonist Eve Stephens.  In Susan
Streitfeld's compelling character study, Eve's psyche becomes the
battleground between a hundred different social images of womanhood.
Watching that battle in Swinton's face is, quite simply, electrifying.
     Eve is an up-and-coming Southern California prosecutor, up-and-coming
enough that the governor is considering her for a seat on the Court of
Appeals.  An impending judgeship should make Eve a very confident woman,
but instability seems to define every aspect of her life.  She carries on
sexual relationships simultaneously with a man (Clancy Brown) and a woman
(Karen Sillas); a strained relationship with her sister Madelyne (Amy
Madigan) becomes even more complicated when Madelyne is arrested for
shoplifting.  As her interview with the governor approaches, Eve is forced
to confront insecurities inspired by years of mixed messages about what it
means to be a woman.
     FEMALE PERVERSIONS takes its title the non-fiction text by Dr. Louise
J. Kaplan in which she defines "perversions" as deviations from strict
societal proscriptions on female behavior, sexuality and fantasy.  It's a
great jumping-off point for a sociological study of modern American
femininity, but Streitfeld shows a peculiar and ill-advised devotion to
her source.  The film's most awkward conceit involves the periodic 
appearance of quotes from the book in odd locations -- embroidered into
pillow-cases, as advertising on billboards and in magazines -- offering
modestly insightful epigrams like "Perverse scenarios are about desperate
need."  It's a Peter Greenaway type of stunt from a rookie director
(Streitfeld is a rehabilitated...sorry, _retired_ Hollywood agent) which
tosses generalities into the path of individual characters.
     Those characters, and Eve's interactions with them, really are the
"plot" of FEMALE PERVERSIONS.  Each one feels like something which began
as a case study but grew into a unique and fully-realized individual.
Madelyne's landlady Emma, who is obsessed with getting her latest
boyfriend to marry her, is played with a heartbreaking desperation by
Laila Robbins; Frances Fisher turns Emma's sister Annunciata into a tutor
in sexual manipulation; Emma's pubescent daughter Edwina (Dale Shuger) is
so terrified of her impending sexuality that she chops off her hair and
hides her body in baggy clothes.  The performances -- by Amy Madigan,
Karen Sillas, even Paulina Porizkova -- are uniformly superb, taking
snapshots of different women coping with life and giving them unexpected
vitality.
     We see them all through Eve's eyes, eyes which watch herself in a
news conference after winning a big case and can only see the lipstick
smeared on her teeth.  Swinton takes on the incredibly challenging role of
a woman living multiple lives -- she has to seem plausible as a competent
and effective professional who exposes herself in her lover's office,
and who flies into a disgusted rage at her fumbled response to an
interview question about her marital status.  Over the course of FEMALE
PERVERSION, Eve's confidence waxes and wanes, her remarkable face
alternately displaying confidence and deep feelings of inadequacy about
her physical appearance.  It is a performance so rich and detailed that it
feels like part of a documentary.
     Streitfeld stumbles when she reduces Eve's complex psychology to the
result of one childhood trauma.  FEMALE PERVERSION is about much more than
one woman's issues with Mommy and Daddy; Eve's story deals with the state
of being a woman as much as it deals with a specific woman.  Give credit
to Tilda Swinton for bringing life to an archetype, for giving a face to
the struggles of modern women.  And what a face it is.

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)
SPACE COWBOYS
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Clint Eastwood, Tommy Lee Jones, Donald Sutherland, James
Garner, James Cromwell, Marcia Gay Harden, William Devane, Loren Dean.
Screenplay:  Ken Kaufman and Howard Klausner.
Producers:  Andrew Lazar and Clint Eastwood.
Director:  Clint Eastwood.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SPACE COWBOYS will be greeted with enthusiasm in a certain
demographic group simply because it dares to suggest that Americans over
the age of 60 exist. That's a fairly revolutionary notion in pop culture,
most of which is targeted at an audience that still gets graded in
"nap-time" and "scissors." It's also a rare opportunity for veteran actors
to get work in major roles, so you can't blame anyone involved for being
enthusiastic about the project, especially given its themes. It's fun to
watch a film like SPACE COWBOYS -- and probably even more fun for those
viewers in the stars' peer group -- because the film itself could be an
example of what its protagonists are trying to demonstrate: Sometimes,
wisdom and experience trump washboard abs.
     Clint Eastwood has been around the block a few times in Hollywood, so
you'd think that his experience would teach him the difference between a
good idea and a good script. Unfortunately, as he has done in most of his
recent films, he settles for the former. The story opens in 1958, where
the four members of the U.S. Air Force's Team Daedalus are preparing to be
the first men in space. NASA and a chimp usurp their place, however,
robbing them of their chance for space travel. But 42 years later, NASA
comes calling on Frank Corvin (Eastwood) when a Russian satellite with a
guidance system he designed is about to plummet to earth. The mission
requires in-orbit attention, and Frank takes advantage of his bargaining
position by insisting that his original team be allowed to join him for
the flight. And so Team Daedalus is re-united: master pilot "Hawk" Hawkins
(Tommy Lee Jones), engineer Jerry O'Neil (Donald Sutherland) and navigator
Tank Sullivan (James Garner).
     There's more than a little bit of GRUMPY OLD ASTRONAUTS to SPACE
COWBOYS, with screenwriters Ken Kaufman and Howard Klausner taking
advantage of time-worn senior citizen incongruities. Hawk and Frank are
still feisty enough to get into fistfights (chortle); Jerry is still a
skirt-chaser, even with his telescope-lens glasses (hoot); a female doctor
walks in to examine our drooping, totally nude heroes (big-time guffaw). 
It's cheap humor, but it's still amusing because the performers seem
dignified even when they're doing silly things, and because everyone seems
to be having so much fun doing it. They also get a chance to turn the
tables and mock the cocky younger astronauts (Loren Dean and Courtney B. 
Vance) on their mission, a development always good for a round of 
applause. In any other outer space adventure, the hour-plus wait for the
astronauts to get off the ground would be excruciating. Eastwood makes the
Daedalus team's detailed training regimen a chance to let his gifted
NASA-meets-AARP stars flaunt their ease in front of the camera.
     Then the astronauts finally do get off the ground, and SPACE COWBOYS
crashes to earth. It's bad enough that once the Daedalus mission is
underway, the good humor and cameraderie of the training center sequences
vanishes, leaving nothing but crisis resolution-based plotting. Worse
still is the mission itself, a ridiculous "surprise" that would have been
evident even if Eastwood hadn't filmed certain characters with ominous
slow-zoom close-ups to signal their soon-to-be-revealed villainy. Eastwood
doesn't even seem interested in the entire third act, racing through the
events at such a frantic pace (particularly for the usually meandering
director) that you may wonder if he was running out of film. More likely,
he understands that once the entertaining interplay between the actors
gives way to shaky-cam explosions, there's not much reason to wait before
sprinting toward the credits.
     SPACE COWBOYS builds up enough good will through its first 80 minutes
to carry it over the massive hump of its lame conclusion. Eastwood is
still one of the most uniquely evocative visual film-makers around -- a
director generally willing to linger where other directors would cut --
which generally makes his films worth experiencing. His style also makes
him a uniquely appropriate choice for a film about characters that have
reached the point in life where they'd rather amble than run. SPACE
COWBOYS ambles right along with Eastwood, Jones, Sutherland and Garner,
right up to the point where they amble into the conclusion of a generic
summer action film. This kind of veteran acting talent deserves better. 
Wisdom and experience should tell someone like Clint Eastwood that there's
plenty of kids' stuff out there without trying to make him and his 
co-stars part of it.

Title
Review for North (1994)
Starring:  Elijah Wood, Jon Lovitz, Mathew McCurley, Jason Alexander,
           Julia Louis-Dreyfuss, Bruce Willis.
Screenplay:  Alan Zweibel and Andrew Scheinman.
Director:  Rob Reiner.
     In 1987, director Rob Reiner brought to the screen a satirical
fantasy that was thought to be unfilmable, William Goldman's THE
PRINCESS BRIDE.  Though uneven, it basically worked thanks to a genuine
sense of whimsy and Goldman's own clever adaptation.  The relative
success of THE PRINCESS BRIDE would seem to suggest that if anyone
could make a movie out of Alan Zweibel's goofy fable NORTH, it would be
Reiner.  Wrong.  Instead, he has turned out a smug, tedious and
wrong-headed mess which wraps the moral of THE WIZARD OF OZ in a
thoroughly unappealing package.
     NORTH is the name of a multi-talented eleven-year-old (Elijah
Wood) who feels that he is being ignored by his self-involved parents
(Jason Alexander, Julia Louis-Dreyfuss).  He decides that he deserves
better, and declares himself a free agent, offering himself to the most
attractive pair of parents.  A judge grants North's request under the
condition that he make his final choice in two months or face being
sent to an orphanage.  North then sets off on a globe-spanning quest
for the perfect parents which inspires a kid's rights movement,
masterminded by North's devious classmate Winchell (Mathew McCurley)
and an ambulance-chasing lawyer (Jon Lovitz).  Along the way, North
receives advice from a ubiquitous man (Bruce Willis) who acts as his
guardian angel.
     For a few moments at the very beginning, NORTH looks like it might
be on the right track.  There is a clever little sequence showing North
as a brilliant student, a top athlete and a budding star of the musical
theater, pitched at just the right level of low-key surreality; a bit
later, a series of parents chastise their children with all the things
that "North wouldn't" do.  But very early on, NORTH takes a precipitous
dive into near-unwatchability.  North's encounters with his prospective
parents (including Dan Aykroyd and Reba McIntire as "How-dee" Texans,
and Kathy Bates and Graham Greene as Eskimos) are repetitious and
annoying, all variations on the same theme.  In order for the
fairy-tale one-dimensionality of these parents to work, they all need
to represent something unique, not interchangeable levels of
stupidity.  Most surprising, Reiner paces everything at a crawl,
including a production number in the Texas sequence which should have
pumped some life in the proceedings.  Instead, it's just another part
of an 89 minute film which feels 85 minutes too long.
     There is yet another massive misstep with an emphasis on the
subplot involving Mathew McCurley as the miniature Machiavelli and Jon
Lovitz as his attorney-toady.  McCurley is allowed to chew the scenery,
lisping ruthless-beyond-his-years dialogue and mincing about in
suspenders and slicked back hair (as sure a sign of cinematic evil as a
"666" tattoo).  Cringing is Lovitz's forte, and he gets to do a lot of
it, playing to all of his worst instincts.  The youth revolt might have
worked with a lighter touch, but Reiner makes it too nasty, darkened
further by a murder plot which engenders a pointless chase.
     Where did so much talent go so dreadfully wrong?  Reiner has been
box-office gold; co-screenwriters Zweibel (an original "Saturday Night
Live" scribe) and Andrew Scheinman (this summer's pleasant fantasy
LITTLE BIG LEAGUE) have some great product under their belts.  Elijah
Wood, a talented young actor, is a rather obnoxious North, taking the
book's more measured nine-year-old protagonist and turning him into an
adolescent packing a serious attitude.  Reiner probably called in every
favor he had to pepper NORTH with cameos, but they serve only to show
that it's possible for an entire supporting cast to be as bored making
a film as the audience is watching it.
     Perhaps the biggest mystery of NORTH is for what audience it
was intended.  It's too slow and full of dopey in-jokes to keep kids
interested, and too simplistic for adults.  Rob Reiner had better
check his compass; he got dreadfully lost trying to find NORTH.

Title
Review for High School High (1996)
Director:  Hart Bochner.
Screenplay:  Robert LoCash, Pat Proft, Jerry Zucker.
Producers:  Jerry Zucker, Pat Proft, Gil Netter.
Starring:  Jon Lovitz, Tia Carrere, Mekhi Phifer, Louise Fletcher, Malinda
Williams, Guillermo Diaz.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  86 minutes.
     Jon Lovitz stars in HIGH SCHOOL HIGH as Richard Clark, and it is
indicative of how far the film strays from the dependable groan-worthiness
of previous Zucker brothers projects (AIRPLANE!, THE NAKED GUN) that it
misses one of its most obvious gags:  there is nary a "Dick Clark" gag to
be found.  Obviousness was never really an issue for the Zuckers, because
their modus operandi was a non-stop assault of puns, pratfalls and pop
culture references, allowing every dud joke to be swallowed up by the next
one in line.  HIGH SCHOOL HIGH doesn't seem to have time for that kind of
comic machine-gunning, because it is too busy with -- of all things -- a
plot.  And this is that rarity among contemporary films, one which needs
less plot instead of more.
     Lovitz's Clark is a prep school history teacher when the film begins,
under the thumb of his father (John Neville), the school's domineering
headmaster.  Richard, however, has a dream of reaching and teaching kids
where they need the most help, which leads him to take a job at Marion
Barry High School (located just past the street sign marked "Inner City").
Richard finds almost everything working against him -- a burned-out
principal (Louise Fletcher), an antagonistic gang leader named Paco
(Guillermo Diaz) and indifferent students.  However, he does have the
principal's beautiful administrative assistant Victoria (Tia Carrere) on
his side, and a belief that if he can get a well-respected student named
Griff (Mekhi Phifer) to tune in, he can get through to everyone.
     It should be made clear first of all that the extent of Zucker
involvement in HIGH SCHOOL HIGH is David Zucker's participation as
co-writer and co-producer (brother Jerry being too busy now making
"serious" films like GHOST and FIRST KNIGHT).  HIGH SCHOOL HIGH was
directed by erstwhile B-actor and PCU director Hart Bochner, and he shows
little aptitude for the kind of frame-filling humor which characterized
other Zucker parodies.  Nearly every gag is front and center here,
providing little incentive to scour the background for throwaway bits.  On
the rare occasion when a joke is tucked away for discovery -- like a sign
in a topless bar-cum-theater which promises "Next Week:  All-Nude Ibsen"
-- it is like a gift.  Too much of the time, however, writers Zucker, Pat
Proft and Robert LoCash measure out the laughs as though aware that there
aren't that many to go around.
     They also can't seem to decide what kind of laughs they are going
for.  I'm not going to suggest that low humor hasn't always played a
significant role in Zucker films, since they were inspired largely by MAD
Magazine, but there was usually the sense that they were writing dumb
comedy for smart people, jackhammer-subtle but intricately absurdist.
HIGH SCHOOL HIGH is not nearly as clever, aiming many of its gags at the
same audience which Tri-Star is targeting with a hip-hop-heavy soundtrack.
The number of jokes aimed at gays or lesbians runs in the high teens; the
over-use or mis-use of urban slang runs a close second.  The latter
produces a few minor successes (Richard attempting to diagram the
sentence "Yo, you wack punk" for his class), but the former begins to get
repetitive and unpleasant very quickly.
     The dependence on a soundtrack and the surprisingly straight-forward
narrative often make HIGH SCHOOL HIGH feel less like a parody of DANGEROUS
MINDS than a slightly more amusing remake of DANGEROUS MINDS.  Actually,
in some ways it resembles this year's THE SUBSTITUTE even more, with its
sub-plot of drug dealing and administrative complicity, but THE SUBSTITUTE
was a more subversive film.  HIGH SCHOOL HIGH is not nearly hard enough on
the cliched movies made for and about urban youth, perhaps afraid of
insulting its own audience.  With its cast a combination of comic actors
like Lovitz and dramatic actors like Fletcher and Phifer, HIGH SCHOOL HIGH
slides uncomfortably between mockery and schlockery.  The surest sign of
HIGH SCHOOL HIGH's spartan comedy is that it almost isn't worth staying
through the closing credits, where the Zuckers usually tossed off half a
dozen silly little references.  It's just a basic crawl this time, which
also sums up the pace of the film rather nicely.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
DARK CITY
(New Line)
Starring:  Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William
Hurt, Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson.
Screenplay:  Alex Proyas and Lem Dobbs and David S. Goyer.
Producers:  Andrew Mason and Alex Proyas.
Director:  Alex Proyas.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A little over an hour into DARK CITY, three of the film's central
characters sit in a small boat, rowing slowly through a canal.  John
Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) is a man who wakes up one night to find himself a
suspect in a series of murders, though he has no memory of his past;
Detective Bumstead (William Hurt) is the officer investigating the crimes;
Dr. Daniel Screber (Kiefer Sutherland) is a mysterious psychiatrist.  As
they row row row their boat, Schreber explains in detail how he was forced
to serve a group of sinister, nattily-dressed extra-terrestrials known as
The Strangers.  Through the use of their awesome power to manipulate
reality -- called "tuning" -- The Strangers have constructed an artificial
city as a massive test environment, playing with the lives and memories of
human subjects to discover what makes them human.  Only Murdoch, whose own
nascent "tuning" abilities allow him to block The Strangers' control, can
help free the Dark City from its dark overlords.
     Sutherland prattles on with his plot summary for around five minutes,
his wheezing, mannered Peter Lorre-meets-The Elephant Man delivery growing
more insufferable by the moment, his character rapidly becoming something
akin to AUSTIN POWERS' Sir Basil Exposition.  It's the sort of lazy,
aggravating scene which is all too common in science-fiction/fantasy
films, but in DARK CITY it's even more aggravating.  You see, Sutherland's
interminable synopsis consists of three distinct sub-categories:  1) stuff
already explicitly stated in the equally lazy opening narration; 2) stuff
which should have been painfully easy to show rather than tell; 3) stuff a
viewer should have been able to figure out by actually watching the
preceding hour instead of waiting for someone to give him the gist of it.
     And therein one can spot why it's a bad idea to take a dark
existential thriller and pitch it at 15-year-olds.  Director and co-writer
Alex Proyas (THE CROW) begins with several intriguing ideas -- the nature
of identity, love as present experience versus collected experience,
modern paranoia about loss of control -- but he seems so afraid of losing
his audience that he keeps slowing down to allow the stragglers to catch
up.  Every time DARK CITY begins building towards a sense of mystery or
menace, a convenient, prosaic bit of dialogue breaks the spell to start
spelling everything out.  When Proyas isn't afraid of losing his audience,
he's afraid of boring them, which means that the climax of his
psychological study becomes a ridiculously chaotic battle in which Sewell
and veteran British actor Ian Richardson (as The Strangers' leader) go at
it like Karloff and Price in THE RAVEN, staring each other down as waves
of psychic energy, unfortunately by-standing Strangers and clouds of
debris swirl around them.
     I can't even work up much enthusiasm for the look of DARK CITY, with
its pale, bald antagonists and a few morphing twists added to the
bleak-chic cityscapes of modern science-fantasy.  Despite its brief
flirtations with profound philosophical questions, it's really just
another good-looking vessel in which a cast of second-tier stars
(Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly) and slumming "serious actors" (Sewell,
Richardson, Hurt) is asked to rattle around for 90 minutes until the
special effects budget runs out.  It didn't necessarily have to be like
that, not with a provocative premise as promising as that of BLADE RUNNER.
It simply takes guts to let a premise like that play itself out, the kind
of guts studio executives generally don't have.  I wouldn't be surprised
to find out that word came down to Proyas to compromise his vision, to
create something virtually impossible to walk out of saying "I don't get
it."  That kind of story-telling buys you long, slow boat rides down a
cinematic canal, where explorations of a shattered human mindscape give
way to the pointless tour-guide ramblings of Sir Kiefer Exposition.

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
     I don't think any American filmmaker in my lifetime has had his
personal life as closely associated with his films as Woody Allen. For 25
years, his leading ladies on screen -- Louise Lasser, Diane Keaton, Mia
Farrow -- were his leading ladies off screen. When HUSBANDS AND WIVES --
his last film with Farrow before their break-up became a tabloid staple --
came out in 1992, critics observed it in terms of the disintegration of
their real-life relationship. DECONSTRUCTING HARRY was seen as a
justification for someone to live as a complete jerk provided he also
created great art (and got younger women in the process). The compulsively
auto-analytical Allen created a classic film persona, but he also created
a monster: a body of work constantly being read for clues about its
creator.
     SWEET AND LOWDOWN is framed as the documentary biography of a great
but little-known (read: fictional) jazz guitarist of the 1930s named Emmet
Ray (Sean Penn). Widely regarded by scholars as second only to the
legendary Django Reinhardt among jazz guitarists, Emmet also has a few
minor personal quirks. He's a womanizer. He's a kleptomaniac. He's an
alcoholic. He's a part-time pimp. He's an egomaniac. And he spends every
dollar in his pocket before he actually has it in his pocket. But he's a
player whose artistry causes women to swoon and club owners to forgive his
chronic unreliability.
     At first, it may sound like another apologia for the artist as
world-class clod, a la DECONSTRUCTING HARRY, but there's actually
something more going on in the character of Emmet Ray. As played by Penn,
Emmet has bought into the clich of the artist as self-destructive free
spirit. He proudly announces to his various women his need to "be free;" 
he wears the fanciest clothes to support his image; he shoots junkyard
rats for entertainment. When he tells every listener that he's the
greatest guitar player there is -- "except for this gypsy" -- he's
desperately trying to defend his life. If he's not the best there is at
his art, he may not be able to justify his self-imposed isolation from
emotional connection.
     I'm coming to believe that Sean Penn may be the most talented 
American actor alive. His ability to take characters like Emmet Ray and
DEAD MAN WALKING's Matthew Poncelet and give them a sympathetic soul
without softening them is an extraordinary gift. Penn does so many things
right as Emmet that it suddenly becomes evident that Allen doesn't quite
know how to handle it when an actor can make his script seem irrelevant. 
The light-hearted structure, with jazz scholars commenting talking-head
style on Emmet's misadventures, becomes jarring and distracting as Emmet's
story unfolds. Episodes like Emmet's attempt to con an amateur talent
contest or his role in a botched hold-up (told in three possible
variations) feel like forced attempts at giving the film a Woody Allen
sensibility. Only when Allen holds Penn unexpectedly in the dead center of
a reaction shot -- a crucial exchange with another character where you'd
usually expect a cutaway -- does it appear the director understands what
he has working for him.
     Samantha Morton has also received plenty of praise for her role as a
mute laundress with whom Emmet has a lengthy relationship, and it's 
certainly an impressive physical performance. It's also clear how much
Morton is contributing to the story when she leaves the story, only to be
replaced as primary romantic interest by the gratingly mannered Uma 
Thurman. But this is a jazz odyssey that works thanks to a stunning lead
performance of a fascinating character, in spite of a structure always on
the verge of sabotaging that character. You might suspect that the
notoriously private Allen was using SWEET AND LOWDOWN as a first attempt
to really open himself up emotionally on screen, but found it so awkward
that he had to keep telling jokes. Or maybe he's just an imperfect
filmmaker who cast a great actor in an imperfect film.

Title
Review for Last Man Standing (1996)
(New Line)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Christopher Walken, Bruce Dern, William
Sanderson, David Patrick Kelly, Alexandra Powers, Ned Eisenberg.
Screenplay:  Walter Hill.
Producers:  Walter Hill, Arthur Sarkissian.
Director:  Walter Hill.
Running Time:  100 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations)
Grade:  D+ / Skip It
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Depending on your degree of cinematic acumen, LAST MAN STANDING is
either a) a Prohibition-era remake of Akira Kurosawa's 1961 classic
YOJIMBO; b) a Prohibition-era remake of Sergio Leone's 1964 classic A
FISTFUL OF DOLLARS; c) a Prohibition-era action drama with a completely
original story-line.  New Line is certainly counting on the fact that
there are far more potential viewers in category (c) than in the other two
combined, much as the recent remakes of DIABOLIQUE and THE VANISHING
counted on avoiding such comparisons.  The fact is that there is yet
another way of looking at LAST MAN STANDING, which is as the first film
version of the story which nods to the _real_ source material, the
Dashiell Hammett novel _Red Harvest_.  It also shows that Kurosawa and
Leone knew better what to do with that material than Hammett himself.
     This time around, The Man With No Name is played by Bruce Willis, a
fellow with a shady history of an undefined nature who rolls into the
Texas border town of Jericho one day on his way to Mexico.  By all
appearances, Jericho is well on its way to becoming a ghost town, with the
few remaining inhabitants generally belonging to one of two bootlegging
operations fighting for control of liquor coming over the border.  One is
headed by an Irishman named Doyle (David Patrick Kelly); the other is run
by Chicago-connected Italian mobster Strozzi (Ned Eisenberg).  Calling
himself John Smith, the man decides that there is money to be made from
the conflict, and hires himself out as an enforcer to Doyle's side.  But
Smith's allegiance is as uncertain as his name, and he begins to play the
two sides against each other while trying to stay one step ahead of both
of them.
     Viewers familiar with both previous incarnations of this story will
find virtually nothing radically changed from a plotting standpoint, and
that alone should make LAST MAN STANDING somewhat more respectable than
other recent Hollywood remakes-cum-bastardizations.  There is the happily
ineffectual lawman (Bruce Dern), the unhappily detained object of one of
the bosses' affections (Karina Lombard), the barkeep who becomes our
anti-hero's only friend (William Sanderson), suspicious lieutenants
(Christopher Walken and Michael Imperioli) to question the bosses' trust
in Smith, a brutal beating, and a big fire.  Director Walter Hill gives
the proceedings his usual injection of steroids, including a pair of guns
for Willis which have the ability to propel an assailant backward with
sufficient thrust to achieve escape velocity, but at least he doesn't try
to turn the story into a slasher film or a buddy picture.
     What he _does_ do is nearly as big a mistake, and that is to provide
a running voice-over narration by Willis which rings of the standard
hard-boiled style of pulp detective fiction.  Yes, that narration is full
of cliches, but those are are not particularly troubling.  The problem is
that both YOJIMBO and A FISTFUL OF DOLLARS succeeded largely on the
inscrutability of their lead characters.  They were a mystery, to the
other characters in the film and to the audience, their motives never
entirely clear even after they have acted, and that quality contributed to
their almost mythical status.  With John Smith's voice chattering on in
the background and allowing us into his every thought, he becomes more
mundane, just another tough guy trying to stay alive.  It feels like a
Hammett novel, all right, and Hill can plead faithfulness to his text for
his choice, but it simply doesn't work.  The narration allows The Man With
No Name to take us into his confidence, and The Man With No Name takes _no
one_ into his confidence.
     Even if you walk into LAST MAN STANDING as a blank slate, I can't
imagine it being much more than a heavily armed minor distraction.  Willis
tones down his macho swagger as the taciturn Smith, but there is still a
level on which he always seems like he is counting on being tougher than
everyone else rather than smarter than everyone else.  Christopher Walken
plays Doyle's brutal henchman as a slight variation on his gallery of
soft-spoken psychos, and there isn't another single character whom makes
even the slightest impression.  With no compelling antagonist for Smith,
there is no build-up towards the expected showdown, and when it does come,
that showdown is over so quickly you wonder what all the fuss was about.
Cinematographer Lloyd Ahern (who also did the only noteworthy work on
Hill's 1995 flop WILD BILL) creates some nifty sunburned vistas, but his
work is only to keep the eye distracted between the spurts of gunfire and
the next bit of counter-productive narration.  Sometimes when someone sees
a lackluster remake of a revered original, they'll wonder what all the
talk was about.  In the case of LAST MAN STANDING, it is those who know
the originals who will wonder what all that talking was about.

Title
Review for Frat House (1998)
*Note: FRAT HOUSE will appear on HBO in the spring as a presentation of
"HBO Undercover"
     I've known many men and women over the years who were members of
Greek organizations in college.  I have heard their decisions to pledge
defended with terms like "service," "networking," or "fellowship."
However, the most brutally honest explanation I've ever heard comes from
one unnamed student in the Sundance Grand Prize winning documentary FRAT
HOUSE:  "It's about finding the people you enjoy getting f*****d up with
most."
     FRAT HOUSE doesn't spend much time on the question of why peole join
fraternities and sororities, perhaps limited by a television-restricted
running time.  It aroused my interest enough that I was disappointed to
find that issue unexplored, but ultimately Todd Phillips and Andrew
Gurland's goal was to show _what_ people join when they join fraternities
and sororities.  However, though their footage of hazing, strippers,
binge-drinking and humiliation has "expose'" written all over it, I'd be
lying if I said I was surprised by anything I saw in FRAT HOUSE.  The film
depicts college-age males in all their testosterone-fuelled glory,
reveling in their ability to dominate others in the name of "brotherhood,"
homophobic epithet-slinging and the pursuit of women (though the fairer
gender is more frequently referred to with a five-letter anatomical slang
synonymous with "feline").  I saw enough in my own college days to reach
the point where nothing a drunken, misogynistic 19-year-old does or says
will shock me.
     What _is_ shocking and surprising is the fact that Phillips and
Gurland were able to capture this behavior on film.  The notoriously
secretive nature of Greek initiation was laid bare thanks to an East
Carolina University fraternity member, lovingly known as Blossom.  A
thick-headed ogre of a human being, Blossom tells all and shows all to the
film-makers with the arrogant disregard of someone whose worldview
revolves around the complete absence of consequences.  Only when it
becomes clear that his brethren have gotten cold feet does Blossom
summarily (and psychotically) dismiss Phillips and Gurland, with a slap in
the face for good measure.
     While FRAT HOUSE is certainly a testemonial to male bonding at its
ugliest, it may be even more effective as a testemonial to the
determination of the film-makers.  After losing their "in" at ECU,
Phillips and Gurland managed to find another fraternity willing to open
its doors on condition of anonymity.  There was one other condition as
well:  the film-makers themselves would be obliged to go through
everything the pledges went through.  Thus began a nightmarish six weeks
during which the two directors would be subjected to verbal abuse, sleep
deprivation, punishing and pointless boot camp-style exercise, open
flames, and several activities which suggest the brothers were spending
_far_ more time dreaming up creative tortures than they were on academia.
Never has the pain of creating a film gelled as smoothly with the subject
of the film itself.
     It doesn't do justice to the quality of FRAT HOUSE as a piece of
film-making to focus entirely on the hard work of Phillips and Gurland.
Their instincts for making their subject entertaining are impressive,
notably in a hilarious juxtaposition of one sorority's "Hell Night"
(composed primarily of sobbing through a lyrically-amended version of
"Through the Years") with the fraternal equivalent.  FRAT HOUSE is worth
watching not just because the subject matter is sensational, though that
may draw some concerned parents.  Its real achievement is creating a
record of the kind of ridiculous, frightening and grimly hysterical 
behavior everyone already knows goes on college campuses across the
country; it's the realest "Real World" episode you'll ever see.  Credit
Phillips and Gurland with going the extra mile to show that reality to the
world.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
JACKIE BROWN
(Miramax)
Starring:  Pam Grier, Samuel L. Jackson, Robert Forster, Bridget Fonda,
Michael Keaton, Robert DeNiro.
Screenplay:  Quentin Tarantino, based on the novel "Rum Punch" by Elmore
Leonard.
Producer:  Lawrence Bender.
Director:  Quentin Tarantino.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, drug use, sexual situations)
Running Time:  155 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the three years since PULP FICTION dazzled critics, raked in $100
million at the box office and polarized Academy voters, it has become
fashionable to brand Quentin Tarantino with that favored label of
contrarian pundits everywhere:  "over-rated."  Many film buffs dismissed
him as a cinematic plagiarist or a profane wordsmith drunk on his own
familiarity with pop culture; his attempts at acting (DESTINY TURNS ON THE
RADIO, FROM DUSK TILL DAWN) were viewed as ego run amok.  With a three
year output behind the camera consisting of one "E/R" episode and a
lackluster segment of the ill-advised FOUR ROOMS, it was easy to start
asking questions.  Had the Flavor of the Month lost his flavor on the
bedpost overnight?
     A lot of those same folks are going to see JACKIE BROWN as a
validation of their suspicions.  After all, it's not the kind of dizzying,
heart-stopping morality-play-disguised-as-nihilism PULP FICTION was.  It's
simply a well-crafted Elmore Leonard caper (based on his novel "Rum
Punch") about a middle-aged flight attendant named Jackie Brown (Pam
Grier) caught in a tight spot.  Nailed by ATF agent Ray Nicolet (Michael
Keaton) for transporting cash and cocaine into the country from Mexico,
Jackie faces jail time unless she's willing to give up the man she's
acting as courier for.  That man is Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson), a
gun-runner who has already shown a reluctance to let potential snitches
remain among the living.  Faced with a no-win situation, Jackie decides
she wants to win anyway, elisting the aid of bail bondsman Max Cherry
(Robert Forster) in a sting where she hopes everyone but her will get
stung.
     Both fans and foes of Tarantino tend to fixate on his writing, but
JACKIE BROWN may prove once and for all that the man is a remarkably
talented film director.  He does things with his camera that keep viewers
off-balance, while avoiding the swooping ostentation of many young
film-makers.  At times, he will linger on a shot just after a character
has moved out of frame; at other times, he may shoot a conversation from
behind the characters' backs.  In one hilariously perfect scene, he uses
complete darkness to build tension, complemented by an expertly handled
split-screen to deliver the punch line.  He directs a scene with such
confidence that he can convince a viewer to follow wherever he's leading,
because it always seems to be somewhere slightly unexpected.
     He's also got a gift for directing actors most directors will never
have.  John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson and Bruce Willis gave the
performances of their careers in PULP FICTION; even Uma Thurman had an
uncommon intensity.  In JACKIE BROWN, Tarantino resurrects the careers of
not one, but two forgotten actors of the 1970s.  Most of the press has
gone to Pam Grier, still looking as Foxy as she did in the 70s as she
plays nobody's-victim Jackie.  Grier does fine work, but it's Robert
Forster who breaks out of JACKIE BROWN with a superb performance.  A
veteran of B-grade cop shows like "Nakia" and "Banyon," Forster plays the
world-weary Cherry with natural charisma and a touching affection for
Jackie.  In a cast full of heavy hitters like Samuel L. Jackson and Robert
DeNiro (both of whom are also top-notch), Grier and Forster make an
unexpected romance between two people past their Hollywood-pretty prime
funny, sexy and convincing.
     It's true that JACKIE BROWN includes plenty of familiar elements from
previous Tarantino efforts:  bursts of unpredictable violence,
twelve-letter profanities by the truck-load, non-linear narrative,
creative use of old songs (doing for "Strawberry Letter #23" what
RESERVOIR DOGS did for "Stuck in the Middle With You").  It's also true
that JACKIE BROWN moves at the kind of measured pace which could have some
Tarantino fans tapping their toes with impatience.  It's not an instant
classic, just a sharp piece of entertainment with the kind of
tightly-structured script you wish Tarantino could teach to other writers.
I found it hard not to smile virtually from start to finish in JACKIE
BROWN -- not because it's constantly amusing, but because it's such a
pleasure to be in the hands of someone who knows how to use the medium.
Even if it's an over-rated, plagiarizing Flavor of the Month like Quentin
Tarantino.

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
     For what it's worth, Matt Healy's script for CLAY PIGEONS is
remarkably unpredictable as film scripts go.  It opens in a Montana field,
where buddies Clay (Joaquin Phoenix) and Earl (Gregory Sporleder) are
drunkenly firing away at empty bottles of Bud.  The friendliness ends,
however, when Earl reveals to Clay that he's aware of Clay's afair with
Earl's wife Amanda (Georgina Cates).  The humiliated Earl kills himself,
having set up Clay to take the fall.  It looks for all the world like CLAY
PIGEONS is about to become a TROUBLE WITH HARRY-style black comedy, with
Clay desperately trying to hide dead bodies while scorned woman Amanda
makes his life more complicated by the moment.
     Suddenly, the film takes a hard right turn with the arrival in town
of Lester Long (Vince Vaughn), a jovially vulgar truck driver who bonds
with Clay over brews and a game of pool.  The two go fishing together,
only to discover a floating corpse.  Lester seems particularly keen to
avoid any connection with the body, which makes more sense when another
dead body turns up in town.  What begins to look like a twisted battle of
wills between Clay and Lester then takes another sharp turn with the
arrival of FBI agents to investigate the dead body, led by Special Agent
Dale Shelby (Janeane Garofolo).  Big-city Shelby doesn't by Clay's folksy
protestations of innocence, leading to culture clash.  Is it a serial
killer thriller, a dark comedy, or a Tarantino-era spin on small-town
stagnation -- THE LAST PICTURE SHOW with stab wounds and copious use of a
certain "f-word?"
     I didn't mind not knowing from one moment to the next where CLAY
PIGEONS might take me.  I did mind that by the time I got where it was
taking me, I didn't much care.  Joaquin Phoenix brings his wounded,
sensitive demeanor to Clay, making him a sympathetic enough protagonist in
spite of his flaws.  Director David Dobkin, on the other hand, doesn't
seem nearly as interested in investing us in Clay's plight, or the hints
that Clay's learning something about himself through it all.  He's going
for Atmosphere with a capital "A," lingering on drifting clouds and
slow-motion inserts.  Just when he should be trying for some hook into the
story -- whether emotional or comedic -- Dobkin lets the narrative get
progressively grimmer, chillier and more remote.  It's a tic-and-flourish
film in search of a solid center.
     It's a shame he couldn't have done more with an intriguing, eccentric
cast.  Vince Vaughn, perhaps using Lester as a dry run for his turn as
Norman Bates in the upcoming PSYCHO re-make, gives his amiable drifter an
unsettling edge to go with his hollow laugh.  Janeane Garofolo tries to
give her ironic observations on small-town ways some bite, but her
character always seems to belong in a slightly different movie.  Elements
like the town's dim-witted deputy never mesh with the sinister undertones
of Vaughn's mysterious drifter.  A film that could have been a quirky
original instead feels merely off-putting, as though the director is
daring the audience to find something to enjoy.  Unpredictability can only
carry a film so far; CLAY PIGEONS makes you feel like a sucker for coming
along for the ride.

Title
Review for 8 Heads in a Duffel Bag (1997)
(Orion)
Starring:  Joe Pesci, Andy Comeau, Kristy Swanson, David Spade, Todd
Louiso, Dyan Cannon, George Hamilton.
Screenplay:  Tom Schulman.
Producers:  Brad Krevoy, Steve Stabler, John Bertolli
Director:  Tom Schulman.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  93 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Clueless college students on holiday inadvertently cross paths with
mobsters, and end up having to tote around a lot of dead flesh in order to
stay alive; macabre wackiness ensues.  Is this the plot to WEEKEND AT
BERNIE'S III.  No, no, thank merciful God in heaven, no.  The film in
question is 8 HEADS IN A DUFFEL BAG, and it's not nearly as awful as its
plot or direct-to-video-style title might suggest.  It's the story of a
low level mobster named Tommy Spinelli (Joe Pesci) who is given the
assignment of carrying the titular crania from New Jersey to San Diego as
proof for the Big Boss that a contract hit has been completed.
Unfortunately for Tommy, his bag is mixed up with one belonging to aimless
but affable medical student Charlie Prichett (Andy Comeau), who is
accompanying his girlfriend Laurie Bennett (Kristy Swanson) and her
parents (Dyan Cannon and George Hamilton) on a trip to Mexico.  That
leaves Tommy only 24 hours to track down his heads, with the unwilling
assistance of Charlie's two best friends (David Spade and Todd Louiso).
     It comes as quite a surprise to realize that twisted plot was created
by Tom Schulman, the screenwriter behind the decidedly not-twisted DEAD
POETS SOCIETY.  There area few moments of gruesome comic brilliance in 8
HEADS IN A DUFFEL BAG, most of them involving the strange fates which
continuously befall the heads.  One ends up in the laundry, tumbling dry;
another is carried off by a coyote.  Makeup artist Greg Cannom (THE MASK)
does a delightful job of creating the heads, which keep turning up at
inconvenient moments and end up providing the film's best scene during a
sweet rendition of "Mr. Sandman."
     When Schulman is willing to push the limits of good taste, 8 HEADS IN
A DUFFEL BAG produces some big laughs, but he should have been willing to
push those limits even further, and more often.  For the first half of the
film, Charlie and the Bennett family scream and fumble around in a posh
Mexican hotel in a strained manner, with newcomer Comeau trying to carry
the farce on his thin shoulders.  He needs a lot more help than can be
provided by Dyan Cannon and George Hamilton, however; their presence only
serves to give you the feeling that you're watching a dark-humored episode
of "The Love Boat."  While he has a bizarre and original plot device at
his disposal, Schulman inexplicably resorts to unpleasant Mexican
stereotypes, Cannon's incessant shrieking and a parade of pratfalls.
     Joe Pesci, on the other hand, is wonderfully relaxed, and his
character does a lot to save 8 HEADS.  For most of the film, Tommy is busy
threatening Charlie's freaked-out buddies, and we expect Pesci to become
the amped-up sadist he made famous in GOODFELLAS and CASINO.  The great
gag in Pesci's scenes with Spade and Comeau is that he's much more simple
and creative in the tortures he devises for his wimpy captives.  With the
reserve of a veteran, Tommy gets the information he needs by whipping the
two men with wet towels, hanging them upside-down from gravity boots, and
twisting their ears.  It's a great, goofy spin on Pesci's stock character,
and it gives 8 HEADS some of its best moments.
     Too bad only Pesci seems to realize that fact.  Schulman actually
doesn't seem to know what he wants to do with the characters, resulting
sloppy and fairly pointless attempts at providing motivation.  Charlie, we
learn, is unable to decide on an academic direction, probably because he
really wants to be a writer; Laurie thinks she wants to break up with him
because of his lack of stability; Tommy is decent enough guy who just
wants to retire after this one last delivery.  None of these snippets of
personality amount to anything, however; they're stock situations which
don't even yield stock resolutions.  Schulman just lets his direction and
script wander, getting terribly conventional at the oddest moments and
pulling back when he should have been ready to go for the jugular.  8
HEADS IN A DUFFEL BAG is just too uneven to be satisfying, even if some
individual gags work to perfection.  When you're throwing body parts at
the audience, you've got to offer more than half-hearted whimsy.

Title
Review for Little Nicky (2000)
LITTLE NICKY
(New Line)
Starring:  Adam Sandler, Harvey Keitel, Patricia Arquette, Rhys Ifans, Tom
"Tiny" Lister, Kevin Nealon, Allen Covert.
Screenplay:  Tim Herlihy & Adam Sandler & Steve Brill.
Producers:  Jack Giarraputo and Robert Simonds.
Director:  Steve Brill.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult humor, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  93 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Back in the late '70s and early '80s, Burt Reynolds started making
movies that generally appeared to be cast parties committed to celluloid. 
Most notably in the CANNONBALL RUN films, Burt and a bunch of his pals
apparently got together and decided, "Wouldn't it really be great if we
took enormous amounts of a studio's money and then just got together and
screwed around for a couple of hours?" The result was the kind of film 
where it was obvious that everyone in the movie was having loads and loads
of fun. Viewers, on the other hand, generally found the experience about
as much fun as having the cars in the film back up repeatedly over the 
base of their skulls.
     In LITTLE NICKY, Adam Sandler decides to hold a reunion for all his
former "Saturday Night Live" cast-mates and cronies, only he forgot to
bring a script. Or anything funny to do. Or anything to counteract the
typically Y2K gratuitous crudeness that makes you want to swear off ever
seeing movies again. The premise finds Sandler cast as Nicky, the
milquetoast son of the Devil (Harvey Keitel). Dear old dad has recently
decided that he's not ready to give up the throne to one of his progeny,
which angers Nicky's nastier brothers Adrian (Rhys Ifans) and Cassius (Tom
"Tiny" Lister). Nicky's Satanic siblings flee to the world above,
determined to create a hell on earth (perhaps by financing additional Adam
Sandler movies). This development threatens to upset the balance between
good and evil, or something to that effect, so Nicky must go retrieve his
brothers -- and make out with Patricia Arquette, and do a feature-length
commercial for Popeye's Chicken -- before Daddy Devil disintegrates into a
pile of special effects-generated body parts.
     Let's leave aside for a moment the fact that LITTLE NICKY is based on
the morally itchy proposition that we're expected to root for the survival
of the Devil. There's plenty more repugnant stuff in LITTLE NICKY that may
make you wish you too were disintegrating into a pile of special
effects-generated body parts (ideally without any sensory apparatus to
take in the film itself). Sure, we could all just chuckle about it and
shake our heads ruefully about the increasing popularity of such "moron
movies." That would mean giving a pass to (ostensible) gags based on
children getting drunk and vomiting, dogs humping, jabs at a guy perhaps
being gay, various bodily fluids, a pair of comic relief Satan-worshipers,
a demon with a huge pair of breasts on his head and Hitler getting his
daily punishment of large objects shoved up his rectum. Please, somebody
throw me a pair of knee pads, 'cause they're aching from where I'm
slapping them.
     Of course, Adam Sandler fans would likely consider such a sarcastic
dismissal the whining of an out-of-touch guy who just doesn't get how
brilliantly hysterical Sandler is. And such a predictable view might be
remotely defensible if not for the fact that Sandler himself is reduced to
the status of straight man for most of the film. LITTLE NICKY finds
Sandler mugging and doing the requisite silly voice, yet generally
shrinking into the background while his supporting characters toss out the
lame punch lines. Like the good host, he defers to his "SNL" buddies 
(Carvey, Lovitz, Nealon, Schneider, writer Robert Smigel as the voice of
Mr. Beefy the Bulldog), cast members from previous films (Allen Covert,
Peter Dante, Jonathan Loughran) and even Harvey Keitel and Quentin
Tarantino. This is a film that asks you to laugh harder at a performance
by Quentin Tarantino than a performance by Adam Sandler. If you need to
know anything more to keep you away, your soul is already lost.
     LITTLE NICKY finds a brief spark of life late in the film when Reese
Witherspoon turns up as an angel in a heaven that's more like a sorority
house. The gags about giggling cherubim are at least moderately amusing,
and Witherspoon continues to show the comic chops that made her so good in
ELECTION. But LITTLE NICKY can never get past the vibe that the whole
thing was an excuse for Sandler to give work to his friends so they could
riff on the set. You don't need to waste time being outraged by a film
about a hero from hell, or by its stupidity and crass humor. You can save
all your outrage for the idea that Adam Sandler is asking you to for your
ticket dollars to finance his high-concept hot tub party. 

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
     In my review of John Sayles' 1996 film LONE STAR, I wrote that my
initial frustration with the film must have meant that I missed something.
Such was my confidence in Sayles' storytelling that I was convinced I
could find the unifying thematic thread if I just pondered long enough.
In that particular case, I was right.  Sayles' new film LIMBO presented me
with the same initial frustration, and the same determination to find the
one piece that would turn the merely intriguing into the truly brilliant.
And it just wasn't there.
     For the first hour, there are plenty of reasons to believe LIMBO
could be the latest thematically rich cinematic Sayles novel.  The setting
is Port Henry, Alaska, a remote fishing town in the Southeastern islands.
Among the residents is Joe Gastineau (David Strathairn), a former
fisherman turned jack-of-all-trades after a long-ago trauma.  He becomes
interested in new arrival Donna de Angelo (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio), a
singer who has her own problems dealing with moody teenage daughter Noelle
(Vanessa Martinez) and a string of bad romantic choices.  As Joe and Donna
grow closer, they begin to break out of their protective shells and face
their demons.
     As he has with the settings of most of his recent films -- THE SECRET
OF ROAN INISH's coastal Ireland, LONE STAR's Texas border town, MEN WITH
GUNS' unnamed Latin American interior -- Sayles turns LIMBO's Alaska into
a character as carefully drawn as any of the people.  Here, Alaska has at
least two faces: the raw, blank-slate wilderness that provides escape and
opportunity for new beginnings, and the tourist attraction that provides a
sanitized version of that wilderness.  Sayles offers plenty of local color
with his supporting characters, but it's the way those characters interact
with the place that gives LIMBO weight.  For half the film, LIMBO sets a
tentative romance against a backdrop of civilization trying to claim one
of the few remaining frontiers, even as residents who should know better
keep searching for a predictability that just isn't there.
     I suppose you could see the second half as Sayles' attempt to show
just how far civilization has to go, if you were feeling particularly
generous.  An abrupt twist in the proceedings finds our three principal
characters in trouble, stranded on an uninhabited island after a botched
drug deal by Joe's hustling half-brother Bobby (Casey Siemaszko).  The
metaphorical connections to the three characters' respective troubles are
a bit too tidy -- Joe has two people to save after being responsible for
two deaths, Donna is stuck with a guy she can't run from, and Vanessa has
to confront her sense of isolation.  Even worse, the links to the first
half's portrait of Alaska at a cultural crossroads become tenuous at best.
The second half is solid enough, but it's a jarring shift.  Instead of a
novel, Sayles has written two short stories slammed together in an
uncomfortable fit.
     John Sayles' films are always comparative pleasures in the bigger
picture of filmmaking, with their smart dialogue and attention to human
detail.  Strathairn, Mastrantonio and Martinez all do fine work, with
Mastrantonio providing the added pleasure of performing her own songs in a
beautiful smoky voice.  Sayles has also become a more visually interesting
director with every film, turning in at least one hypnotically beautiful
sequence of Joe returning to fishing (another triumph for cinematographer 
Haskell Wexler).  He can say fascinating things both with his dialogue and
his camera.  In LIMBO, all those fascinating things just don't add up to a
fascinating, unified story.  LIMBO isn't a disappointment because he
doesn't say enough, as in the ambiguous final shot.  It's a disappointment
because he tries to say too much.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
THE THIN RED LINE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Sean Penn, Ben Chaplin, Jim Caviezel, Arie Verveen, Elias
Koteas, Nick Nolte, Woody Harrelson, Dash Mihok, Adrien Brody.
Screenplay:  Terrence Malick, based on the novel by James Jones.
Producers:  Robert Michael Geisler & John Roberdeau and Grant Hill.
Director:  Terrence Malick.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  168 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The announcement that THE THIN RED LINE would mark Terrence Malick's
return to the director's chair after a twenty year absence was greeted as
the cinematic equivalent of J. D. Salinger popping open his Smith-Corona
to give it another go.  This was, after all, the hermit-genius of Great
American Movie-Making, whose only two previous films -- BADLANDS and DAYS
OF HEAVEN -- were spoken of in tones of reverence.  Yet try as I might, I
couldn't work up the same enthusiasm.  As adept as Malick was at crafting
stunning visuals, narrative seemed to be an afterthought to him, something
to be cobbled together with voice-over narration.  Good films, yes, and
profoundly beautiful ones, but not profound ones.
     Malick reaches for profundity once again in THE THIN RED LINE; the
result is another good, great-looking tone poem where deep thoughts stand
in the way of genuine drama.  Based on James Jones' 1962 novel, it tells
the tale of the 1942-43 World War II Guadalcanal campaign through the eyes
of several members of a U.S. Army rifle company called C-for-Charlie.
Malick weaves his way through the minds and eyes of several characters as
C-for-Charlie prepares for its first action, including:  company commander
Capt. Staros (Elias Koteas), an officer concerned about his men; Lt. Col.
Tall (Nick Nolte), the batallion commander who sees this campaign as a
career-making opportunity; Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel), an idealist who
repeatedly goes AWOL; Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn), whose cynicism hides a
heart; and Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin), whose every thought is focused on his
wife back home.
     It's instantly clear that Malick intends to take THE THIN RED LINE in
a very different direction from Jones' novel.  Jones, while he frequently
found his way into the heads of his characters, was equally concerned with
providing a vivid sense of the physical -- the oppressive heat and
humidity, the boots full of water, and the insect attacks that challenged
the men on Guadalcanal before a single shot was fired.  For long stretches
of THE THIN RED LINE, Malick seems to forget that these characters have
bodies at all. The narration captures the men thinking about God, about
the nature of evil, about their lives and loves.  The incessant koan-like
philosophizing becomes aggravating enough, but it's even more frustrating
that every one of the men, from the law school-educated Staros to
Kentucky-bred farm boy Witt, thinks in the same college-sophomore-on-a-
double-bong-hit, my-fingernail-could-be-a-whole-nother-universe terms.
With only a couple of notable exceptions -- Bell's obsessive love for his
wife, and Tall's careerist self-loathing -- Malick's internal monologues
turn the characters into an indistinct jumble of existential angst.
     Ironically, THE THIN RED LINE is at its best when it does get down
and dirty, following the company's assault on a well-defended Japanese
hill position.  It's a superb piece of kinetic war film-making, the camera
bursting through tall grass as soldiers are cut down during a suicidal
head-on attack.  It is here, during the heat of battle, that Malick finds
his most affecting and insightful moments:  a platoon sergeant (Woody
Harrelson) facing a greater threat from his own carelessness than from the
enemy; Doll reacting to his first kill; Staros and Tall facing off over a
risky attack order.  There's more poetry and insight as the men discover
what battle will make of them than there is in an hour's worth of
navel-gazing and heavy-handed juxtapositions of war ("bad") and nature
("good").
     There's little question that THE THIN RED LINE is an aesthetic
wonder, shot by John Toll in fickle available light and edited into a
wartime KOYAANISQATSI.  And it all might have worked much better if Malick
had let viewers draw their own messages from the images, rather than
letting a soldier inform us that "war don't ennoble men...it turns 'em
into dogs, poisons the soul."  Even that tactic might have worked better
if the voices had been distinctive, or if there were some exploration of
esprit de corps which connected these men to one another.  Each character
in THE THIN RED LINE is living too squarely inside his own head to connect
much with anyone else.  That sentiment applies to Terrence Malick as well,
who returns from his two decade sabbatical for three hours of stunningly
photographed, overwrought introspection.

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
     In 1861, Queen Victoria's husband Prince Albert died of typhoid
fever, sending the monarch into years of secluded mourning.  MRS. BROWN
deals with an interesting footnote to those years, the relationship
between Victoria (Judi Dench) and a Scotish groom named John Brown (Billy
Connolly) who comes to service for the queen in 1864.  While Victoria has
grown accustomed to her servants and family humoring her moods, she finds
no such deference in Brown.  Indeed, his manner with her borders on
outright insolence, but such treatment seems to be exactly what the queen
needs to rouse her from her gloom.  As Brown becomes Victoria's closest
confidante, salacious gossip begins to accumulate around their friendship,
including references to Her Royal Highness as "Mrs. Brown."
     If MRS. BROWN had been a love story, it would be a pretty poor excuse
for one.  Jeremy Brock's script offers far too few scenes between the two
principles, providing very little sense of the basis for those rumors; 
their relationship is as much a rumor to viewers of the film as to the
scandal-mongers it portrays.  Victoria's devotion to Brown remains 
unexplored, the feelings of both parties purely a matter of conjecture.
     Despite promotional suggestions to the contrary, however, MRS. BROWN
isn't a love story at all.  Instead, it's a drama of political intrigue,
both on a national scale and within the queen's own household.  As
liberals in Parliament begin challenging conservative Prime Minister
Benjamin Disraeli (Antony Sher) with proposed reforms in the status of
the monarchy, the facts of the queen's relationship with Brown become
irrelevant.  The monarchy is no longer inviolate in the eyes of the
public, the idea of abolishing it no longer heretical.  MRS. BROWN is
quite effective as a portrait of rumor as political lever, as well as the
changing perception of monarchy.  In this context, MRS. BROWN works as a
companion piece to another recent film about the British crown in turmoil,
THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE -- think of this one as THE SADNESS OF QUEEN
VICTORIA.
     The household politics are less clearly drawn, due largely to the
uneven characterization of Brown.  Billy Connolly (previously best known
to Americans for replacing Howard Hessemann in the television series "Head
of the Class, I'm certain to his great dismay) portrays Brown with a
matter-of-fact arrogance which energizes the film.  Brown refuses to
suffer fools of any social station, a quality which is both his greatest
asset and his greatest fault.  His motivations, however, fluctuate too
frequently -- at times he seems self-serving, at other times insanely
devoted to Victoria.  John Brown remains as mysterious as his dalliance
with the queen.
     It is Antony Sher's performance as Disraeli which really makes MRS.
BROWN worth watching, capturing the work of a consummate politician in an
era when consummate politicians were few and far between.  Disraeli gets
exactly what he wants while convincing everyone around him that they are
getting exactly what they want, all done with a smile, an off-the-cuff
remark and a self-effacing manner.  If MRS. BROWN were half as compelling
behind the doors of Balmoral Castle as it is behind the doors of
Parliament, it could have been as fine a romantic tragedy as it is a piece
of political theater.

Title
Review for Flesh and Bone (1993)
Starring:  Dennis Quaid, Meg Ryan, James Caan, Gwyneth Paltrow.
Screenplay/Director:  Steve Kloves.
     It's about fifteen minutes into FLESH AND BONE before you see the
first speck of sunlight, or hear the first note of underscore.  In
fact, there's almost no movement or sound of any kind.  It's clear from
the outset that writer/director Steve Kloves (THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS)
is going for a dark and moody feel.  However, there's moody, and then
there's comatose.  FLESH AND BONE is the perfect example of a solid
story choking nearly to death on its own atmosphere.
     FLESH AND BONE opens with a rural Texas family taking in an
apparently homeless boy for the night.  In fact, the boy is the son of
a thief who has fequently pulled this con, letting his dad into homes
after everyone is asleep.  This time, the robbery is botched and three
members of the family are slain, leaving only an infant girl.  Thirty
years later, grown-up Arlis Sweeney (Dennis Quaid) is eking out a
living running a vending machine supply business, content with a
simple, predictable life.  While on a job, he meets Kay Davies (Meg
Ryan), a runaway wife jumping drunkenly out of a cake at a bachelor
party.  Arlis brings Kay along on his rounds, and an attraction grows.
Trouble also grows when Papa Roy (James Caan) reappears, linked up with
a slick young grifter (Gwyneth Paltrow).  Despite every attempt to
distance himself from his past, Arlis finds himself drawn into his
father's obsession with tying up loose ends.
     At the heart of FLESH AND BONE is an intriguing character in an
intriguing premise.  Arlis Sweeney is a man desperately trying to
convince himself that he's not like his father, trying to live out his
days meekly as a personal penance for whatever crimes he might have
been party to.  He feels completely unworthy of the too-trusting Kay,
giving their relationship a nice dynamic.  Unfortunately, Dennis Quaid
is playing Arlis.  As charming as he can be, Quaid simply doesn't have
the dramatic range necessary to dig into this complicated character;
when he should be looking introspective and guilt-ridden, he just looks
stiff.  I was left imagining a Jeff Bridges in the role, and what might
have been given a more versatile actor.
     Other aspects of the performances also left me unsatisfied.  Meg
Ryan has the light touch required for the film's few moments of humor,
but she doesn't quite strike the balance of strength and accumulated
pain required for this role.  James Caan has a surprisingly small part,
given his prominence in the advertising campaign, and never quite hits
his stride.  His performance is too mannered, full of odd jaw movements
and rolled eyes.  It's a major drawback, because Caan's Roy is supposed
to be FLESH AND BONE's living manifestation of evil, and he's nowhere
near threatening enough.  Surprisingly, the best performance is turned
in by Gwyneth Paltrow as the savvy Gennie, but it's hard to figure what
purpose her character serves, other than perhaps to remind Arlis of
what he could be.
     For all the problems with the acting, it's another issue entirely
that proves to be FLESH AND BONE's ultimate undoing:  it's positively
snore-inducing.  At two hours and ten minutes, it's at *least* twenty
minutes too long.  The second act is interminable, chock full of scenes
best left on the cutting room floor, like Kay's confrontation with her
husband (apparently a refugee from THELMA AND LOUISE).  There were
establishing shots which lasted twice as long as necessary, and
meaningful pauses which weren't very meaningful.  To make matters
worse, there were two minute stretches of dialogue between Caan and
Quaid which were practically indecipherable (I'm not sure whether to
blame the sound mixing or the theater for that one).  In live theater,
there is an expression:  "Tighten it up." What FLESH AND BONE needed
was a good tightening up.
     The tone that FLESH AND BONE is going for is fully achieved.  The
West Texas locations are expertly captured by cinematographer Phillippe
Rousselot, and the spare score by Thomas Newman has a nice edgy feel.
Everything is working towards a grim tension, and it succeeds, but
tension requires release and it's there that FLESH AND BONE doesn't
deliver.  Thanks to an ill-conceived ad campaign, one of the film's key
plot points is given away in the trailers, blowing one of those release
points for anyone who has seen them.  There is a great deal of craft to
the broad strokes of FLESH AND BONE.  However, in this tale of evil,
the devil is truly in the lack of details.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
TRUE CRIME
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Clint Eastwood, Isaiah Washington, Denis Leary, James Woods,
Diane Venora, Lisa Gay Hamilton.
Screenplay:  Larry Gross and Paul Brickman and Stephen Schiff, based on
the novel by Andrew Klavan.
Producers:  Richard D. Zanuck and Lili Fini Zanuck and Clint Eastwood.
Director:  Clint Eastwood.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  126 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In Robert Altman's film industry satire THE PLAYER, an earnest young
screenwriter pitches a death penalty "issue" drama called HABEAS CORPUS,
which he insists should have "no stars" and a downbeat ending, because
"that's reality."  The studio buys the story and turns it into an action
thriller in which Bruce Willis races in at the last moment to save Julia
Roberts from the gas chamber, quipping "Traffic was a bitch" as he carries
her to safety.  Capital punishment had been reduced to a plot device for a
by-the-numbers crowd-pleaser.  In Hollywood, _that's_ reality.
     On the surface, TRUE CRIME appears to be something a bit more
highbrow, but it's still a frustrating gloss over a sensitive subject.
Clint Eastwood directs himself as Steve Everett, an Oakland newspaper
reporter with a shambles of a life -- he's an alcoholic only two months on
the wagon, a married inveterate philanderer, and a gung ho investigative
journalist with a history of gung ho-ing too far.  When his editor (Denis
Leary) hands him a puff-piece human interest assingment on convicted
murderer Frank Beachum's (Isaiah Washington) last day before his
execution, Everett can't help poking around in the facts.  Those facts
suggest to him that a key witness couldn't have seen what he claimed to
see, and that Beachum may be an innocent man.  With the execution set for
midnight, Everett has only twelve hours to save Beachum's life.
     And, we assume, to save his own personal and professional soul in the
process.  TRUE CRIME is naturally more Everett's story than anyone else's,
which might lead you to expect that he's the character who will learn,
grow and change, especially since he has enough character flaws to fill a
week's worth of Jerry Springer episodes.  Instead, Eastwood doesn't even
pretend that Everett's crusade is about anything more than salvaging a
shred of his professional dignity.  He's a self-absorbed, flirtatious
irresponsible cuss in his first scene, and he's a self-absorbed,
flirtatious, irresponsible cuss in his last scene.  The role is
surprisingly flat, leading to a narrative where all that matters is the
plot progression towards Beachum's midnight deadline.
     It's in their dealing with Beachum that Eastwood and his writing team
throw TRUE CRIME into the most confusion.  Beachum's final hours with his
wife and daughter are given a lot of screen time -- perhaps to deflect the
perception that this is yet another movie about a white man finding
salvation through helping anonymous non-white characters -- yet those
scenes serve primarily to tangle the film's themes.  If we're watching
Beachum's torment simply to give Everett's story a face, it's a
trivialization of that suffering.  If we're watching to gain a greater
understanding of the emotional anguish faced by death row inmates, in
effect making TRUE CRIME a death penalty "issue" drama, then Everett's
pursuit of the story is trivial.  And if we're watching to build sympathy
for an innocent man, than a late twist which suggests Beachum might be
guilty is a manipulative cheat.  The film plunges us into one side of the
capital punishment debate when it serves its purpose, then tiptoes around
the edges of the issue at other times to avoid the appearance of making a
controversial statement.
     Ironically, it's only the fact that TRUE CRIME is a slick Hollywood
star project that makes it fairly watchable.  Eastwood once again gathers
wonderful technical support -- cinematographer Jack N. Green, composer
Lennie Niehaus, production designer Henry Bumstead -- to create impressive
atmosphere.  He also draws a slick supporting performance from James
Woods' as Everett's crass editor-in-chief, a role which makes you wonder
whether Woods and Denis Leary accidentally swapped scripts but the result
turned out perfectly.  The buildup to Everett's down-to-the-wire race to
find exonerating evidence will probably work on you in spite of your
resistance, but ultimately it's clear that Eastwood's craftsmanship is
disguising a genuinely weightless story.  TRUE CRIME is true Hollywood, a
disposable entertainment that toys with earnest respectability before
turning into a chase thriller where the traffic is a bitch.

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
HALLOWEEN H20: TWENTY YEARS LATER
(Dimension)
Starring:  Jamie Lee Curtis, Josh Hartnett, Adam Arkin, Michelle Williams,
Adam Hann-Byrd, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, LL Cool J, Chris Durand.
Screenplay:  Robert Zappia and Matt Greenberg.
Producer:  Paul Freeman.
Director:  Steve Miner.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It was 20 years ago that teenage babysitter Laurie Strode (Jamie Lee
Curtis) and her long-institutionalized, homicidal brother Michael Myers
took sibling squabbling to a new plateau, one involving cutlery and the
creative use of wire hangers.  The film was John Carpenter's HALLOWEEN, a
low-budget phenomenon which launched the much-loathed but immensely
profitable "teen slasher" genre.  Masked and/or mutilated maniacs
proliferated, the numbers on the sequels clicking by faster than the
number of customers served by McDonald's.  It's no wonder Dimension Films
tagged the sub-title TWENTY YEARS LATER on HALLOWEEN H20; they probably
feared viewers would actually think this was the 20th film in the series.
     This sequel, of course, is banking on something a bit more than name
recognition to draw viewers:  nostalgia.  After nearly two decades
(including the 1981 sequel HALLOWEEN 2), Jamie Lee Curtis returns to the
role that made her famous, showing us how effectively Laurie Strode
recovered from that one traumatic Halloween night, namely not at all.
Living under an assumed name as the headmistress of a California private
school, Laurie is a walking psychological disaster area.  Behind her are
an abusive marriage and years of therapy; still with her are an alcohol
problem, a prescription drug problem, recurring nightmares and a
paralyzing fear of letting her teenage son John (Josh Hartnett) out of her
sight.  If you've ever wondered what surviving the carnage of a teen
slasher movie would do to someone, here's your answer.
     That effective bit of back story carries HALLOWEEN H20 over the
pitfalls of genre convention which even executive producer Kevin
Williamson -- the post-modernist horror connoisseur behind SCREAM and
SCREAM 2 -- can't quite shake off.  The events begin with Michael raiding
the files of the late Dr. Loomis (the late Donald Pleasance, to whom the
film is dedicated) to find Laurie's new identity, though why he would
demonstrate the grand sense of theater to wait until the 20th anniversary
is never quite clear.  From there he proceeds to make his way west,
reserving most of his wrath for the libidinous, in keeping with the fine
sex-equals-death tradition of slasher film-making.  Blood is spilled,
startling musical cues accompany every movement into frame by the most
innocuous character, and kitchen implements are used contrary to the
safety instructions.
     The one thing Williamson and director Steve Miner _do_ bring to the
proceedings is a bit more understated menace.  Surprisingly, every
encounter between Michael and an unfortunate stranger does not result in
an impromptu Ginzu aeration.  The threat of impending death is sometimes
used strictly as a threat, raising the stakes of every subsequent
encounter because you know it's possible to survive.  This killer's
singularity of purpose, combined with some well-crafted set-pieces, allows
this HALLOWEEN to score more points with tension than it does with shock
value.
     Clearly it also scores on the basis of its climactic showdown.
Though Hartnett, Michelle Williams and Jodi Lyn O'Keefe are on hand for
teen hormone value, Curtis is unquestionably the star of this show.  
Laurie's resourcefulness in the original HALLOWEEN made her an uncommon
screen heroine, and the same quality is present this time around.  She
goes into battle armed not just with an axe, but with twenty years of 
history and a convincing grim determination.  It's actually here that
Williamson's sensibility shows through most obviously; playing on genre
expectations, HALLOWEEN H20 shows Laurie not trusting anything as mundane
as a body bag to guarantee that Michael won't be back to continue
tormenting her in HALLOWEEN H21.  The return of Laurie Strode could have
been a cheap publicity stunt.  Instead, it's a genuinely effective
recognition of the original's influence.  Though too conventional to be
truly thrilling, HALLOWEEN H20 is a fitting final round for one of screen
history's bloodiest family feuds.

Title
Review for Borrowers, The (1997)
THE BORROWERS
(Polygram)
Starring:  John Goodman, Flora Newbigin, Tom Felton, Bradley Pierce, Mark
Williams, Jim Broadbent, Celia Imrie, Raymond Pickard.
Screenplay:  Gavin Scott and John Kamps, based on the novels by Mary
Norton.
Producers:  Tim Bevan, Eric Fellner and Rachel Talalay.
Director:  Peter Hewitt.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild vulgarity)
Running Time:  83 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE BORROWERS is the kind of goofy charmer of a family adventure film
Hollywood should be able to make it its sleep, if only it would bother.
Instead, it took British Working Title Films to bring Mary Norton's
popular children's novels to life.  The premise posits the existence of
4-inch-tall beings called Borrowers who live beneath the floorboards and
in the walls of human homes, making their living off the bits and pieces
we always seem to be misplacing -- a loose button for a plate here, a sock
for a bed there.  In THE BORROWERS, a Borrower family called the Clocks --
papa Pod (Jim Broadbent), mama Homily (Celia Imrie) and children Arietty
(Flora Newbigin) and Peagreen (Tom Felton) -- faces homelessness when
nasty real estate developer Ocious P. Potter (John Goodman) schemes
unscrupulously to nab the home of their human hosts, the Lenders.
     The Clock family's quest to thwart Potter's plans, aided by young
Pete Lender (Bradley Pierce), anchors an energetic story which begs a
couple of very important questions.  First:  why can't more films employ
special effects with THE BORROWERS' unobtrusive whimsy?  Visual effects
supervisor Peter Chiang, production designer Gemma Jackson and
cinematographers John Fenner and Trevor Brooker have joined forces to
fashion a warm, visually enthralling world for the film's characters, in
which the oversized props and camera trickery serve a purpose besides
calling attention to themselves.  Humans and Borrowers interact
convincingly, creating wild and thoroughly entertaining set pieces.  It's
a great-looking, lively piece of work with neat bits of throwaway business
-- a Monopoly card hung on the Clocks' wall like a Pop Art showpiece --
and a crisp pace.
     The second, more disspiriting question:  when and why did it become
obligatory for every children's film to aim for cheap chuckles from bodily
functions?  For most of its running time, THE BORROWERS' slapstick comedy
is disarming in its cartoonish innocence -- foam in the face, cheese on
the head, exaggerated electrocutions and pratfalls.  Why, then, do we need
to see Peagreen immersed in a massive pile of dog droppings?  Why the
running gag about a flatulent hound?  Why an off-hand comment from Pete to
his parents that he "has to pee?"  Is it really so difficult to fill 83
minutes with entertainment a parent can share with a child sans
embarassment?  There's so much immagination throughout THE BORROWERS that
it's even more disappointing to find it swinging so typically below the
belt.
     There's nothing particularly ground-breaking about the basic
story-line of THE BORROWERS, which melds the recent MOUSE HUNT with a teen
alienation sub-plot as Arietty longs to find other Borrowers.  The appeal
of the film comes not from narrative wackiness, but from the complementary
pairing of John Goodman's snarling villainy with the storybook delights of
the film's overall look and feel.  Sure, it stumbles occasionally in the
ways its most like most ostensibly "family films" of recent years.  It's
the ways in which THE BORROWERS is least like its genre cousins which
should make it satisfying matinee viewing.  This is fantasy escapism which
doesn't make you feel stupid for escaping.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
TOMORROW NEVER DIES
(United Artists)
Starring:  Pierce Brosnan, Jonathan Pryce, Michelle Yeoh, Teri Hatcher.
Screenplay:  Bruce Feirstein.
Producers:  Michael G. Wilson and Barbara Broccoli.
Director:  Roger Spottiswoode.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Michelle Yeoh is ultimately the best thing about TOMORROW NEVER DIES,
the 18th installment in the phenomenally popular series based on Ian
Fleming's James Bond (Pierce Brosnan).  And in a strange way, she also
points out its most glaring weaknesses.  You see, Bond may be a brand
name, but as I noted in my 1995 review of GOLDENEYE, the franchise no
longer has the market cornered on high-flying, globe-hopping action.  When
the alternatives to the latest Bond adventure include watching the
dazzling Jackie Chan battle international espionage with considerably more
imagination, TOMORROW NEVER DIES starts to look rather bland and
uninspired.  The presence of Yeoh, Chan's capable sidekick in SUPERCOP,
only serves as a reminder that there are new kids on the block.  Brosnan
may look appropriately dapper, but the series just looks old, cruising on
its place in cinematic history.
     The premise has a kind of perfunctory Bond-ian grandiosity about it,
despite an extremely lackluster villain.  Jonathan Pryce plays Elliot
Carver, an international media mogul just about to launch a new satellite
news network.  Operating on the principle that it's easier to create news
than to hunt it down, Carver and his operatives begin making their own
headlines by instigating a conflict between the British navy and China,
one which results in a downed British battleship and talk of war.  Enter
Bond, assigned to determine the dirty details of Carver's operation.  Ably
assisted by Chinese government agent Wai Lin (Yeoh), Bond must stop the
presses before Carver's meddling results in all-out war between England
and China.
     The ho-hum megalomania of Pryce and his obligatory, inhumanly
resilient henchman (Gotz Otto) are only part of an extremely familiar
package which prevents TOMORROW NEVER DIES from ever getting off the
ground.  Token attempts at adding depth to Bond's romantic conquests (he
_really_ cares about old flame Teri Hatcher...no, really, he does) fall
flat, but that's no great surprise.  The real disappointment is the
quality of the action set pieces -- a few flashes of creativity
chaotically directed by Roger Spottiswoode (AIR AMERICA, TURNER AND HOOCH)
to lend the illusion of real energy.  The gunplay is routine, the chases
are routine, even Q's gadgets are routine (a car that drops little spikey
things to flatten the tires of the car behind you...what will he think of
next?).  Even peppering the action with traditional Bond quips doesn't
help, especially when most of the audience is baffled into silence by a
reference to Carver's "edifice complex."
     The only real change of pace is Yeoh, who provides the Bond series
with its best, most exciting leading lady in years (with all due respect
to Maud Adams and Grace Jones).  She's such a match for Bond -- just as
resourceful and even more physically capable -- that it's a shame to see
her reduced to damsel-in-distress status.  Watching Yeoh fly through an
acrobatic martial arts fight sequence conjures images of the more
inventive stunt wizardry of Jackie Chan's films.  Chan has been
out-Bonding Bond for years now, a detail it's hard to overlook while
TOMORROW NEVER DIES is punching and exploding its way through two hours on
automatic pilot.
     Pierce Brosnan once again provides Bond with an appropriate
ruthlessness, but he's also burdened with the anachronistic he-man antics.
Much of the continued appeal of the series can be attributed to the fact
that the more things change, the more James Bond remains the same -- in
the liberated, safe-sex, designated driver 90s, he's still an unabashed
chauvinist who sleeps around, drinks his vodka martinis and kicks ass for
queen and country.  That sense of familiarity may be the series' greatest
financial strength, but it's also its greatest impediment to quality.
Once upon a time, the James Bond series was a bi-annual festival of "can
you top this?"  The goal is simpler now; the producers aren't even trying
to compete with the big-budget big boys.  They rely on one secret weapon
not provided by Q:  nostalgia.  TOMORROW NEVER DIES never once tries to
play "can you top this?"  It's a film content to offer "do you remember
this?"

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
END OF DAYS
(Universal/Beacon)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Kevin Pollak, Robin
Tunney, Rod Steiger, CCH Pounder, Miriam Margolyes.
Screenplay:  Andrew W. Marlowe.
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein and Bill Borden.
Director:  Peter Hyams.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, nudity, sexual situations, adult
themes).
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For about ten seconds, there is the faint hope that END OF DAYS is
clued in to its own absurdity. Our hero, Jericho Cane (Arnold
Schwarzenegger), finds himself in the basement of a New York City Catholic
church, protecting a woman named Christine York (Robin Tunney) and
learning a lesson in the apocalypse from a priest (Rod Steiger). It seems
that the Evil One has taken human form (Gabriel Byrne), and plans to bring
about the end of days by impregnating Christine with his child. In order
for the anti-Christ incarnation to "take," according to the priest, said
consummation must occur between 11 p.m. and midnight on December 31, 1999.
Incredulously, Jericho asks the priest, "Is that Eastern Time?"
     It's a nice line, and it couldn't come at a more crucial time. For
over an hour, END OF DAYS fairly drowns in preposterousness. It's the kind
of film where a suspect is found carrying a matchbook that leads Jericho
directly to important clues, and where the same suspect also has something
Jericho cleverly intuits is Christine's name carved into his stomach. It's
the kind of film where Jericho locates Christine by searching though New
York City driver's license records, apparently finding only one Christine
York in a city of 10 million people. It's the kind of film where Jericho
grabs a single book off a shelf, and miraculously finds a clue to a
mysterious pendant he has obtained. And it's the kind of film where, while
being pursued by Satan himself, Christine stops to grab her coat on the
way out the door. After sixty minutes of painful head smacking, I was
ready for that glimmer of hope. Maybe, just maybe, it was time to start
having some fun with the end of the world as we know it.
     This, however, is a supernatural thriller that takes itself far too
seriously. Much of that seriousness revolves around Schwarzenegger, who
plays an ex-cop-turned-private security professional, wallowing in
alcoholism and self-pity after the death of his wife and daughter (for
which he had some indirect responsibility). One assumes this is meant to
be a chance for Schwarzenegger to stretch his serious actor muscles in a
plot line ready-made for a little redemption (Christine owns a music box
just like his daughter had, in case the surrogate daughter angle was too
obscure for you). But Arnold plays tormented as just plain mad, and the
moment when he reaches divine understanding of how he can defeat the Dark
Angel is brutally, unintentionally hysterical. Turning END OF DAYS into a
character piece is a mistake; letting Schwarzenegger play that character
is flat-out foolish.
     It probably seemed like a good idea at the time, since there's also
plenty of gun-firin', helicopter-danglin', subway car-explodin' action.
Some of it is even pretty lively, including the early chase sequence in
which a suspended Schwarzenegger pursues a sniper over a rooftop. Peter
Hyams is a true hack-tion director, and he usually knows how to keep a
film moving along with fireballs a-plenty and several kajillion rounds of
ammunition fired off. There's also quite a bit of unpleasant brutality in
the form of snapped necks, severed jugular veins and punched-out vital
organs. It's not that you expect Satan to be a nice guy -- indeed, Gabriel
Byrne plays him effectively as a smug libertine with a _very_ short temper
-- but that it's hard to settle in and enjoy END OF DAYS as an adventure
thriller when so much is treated as grim and portentous.
     And that's really the fatal flaw of END OF DAYS: it never decides on
an appropriate tone. If we're expected simply to enjoy the carnage, it's
foolish to make the hero a lost soul. If we're expected to take the dark
scenario seriously, the ridiculous plot contrivances make that impossible.
If we're expected to be genuinely scared, the comic relief is a cheat
(though sidekick Kevin Pollak gets one killer line after the ubiquitous
cat-jumping-out-of-nowhere). END OF DAYS could have been effective either
as a genre goof or as edgy SEVEN-esque millennial creep show. Instead,
it's a murky dud that tries to chuckle its way out of the corner it writes
itself into. 

Title
Review for Miracle on 34th Street (1994)
Starring:  Richard Attenborough, Elizabeth Perkins, Dylan McDermott,
           Mara Wilson.
Screenplay:  John Hughes and George Seaton.
Director:  Les Mayfield.
     Let's leave aside for a moment the question of whether it was
really *necessary* to make an updated version of the 1947 classic
MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET.  It's the question that plagues every remake,
often unfairly.  While it may be rare to find a film done *better* the
second time around, that doesn't necessarily mean that the remake might
not be perfectly enjoyable on its own merits.  And I believe that this
is true in the case of this gentle fantasy.  While it is nothing
spectacular, it's genuinely touching, and feeds off a surprisingly
strong current of spirituality.
     MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET opens in New York on Thanksgiving day,
where the Cole's Department Store Thanksgiving Parade is about to kick
off the Christmas shopping season.  When the parade's Santa makes a
drunken spectacle of himself, parade organizer Dorey Walker (Elizabeth
Perkins) plucks a replacement right off the street.  He is Kriss
Kringle (Richard Attenborough), and he becomes a sensation as a
department store Santa filled with the holiday spirit.  He even begins
to make a believer out of Dorey's cynical-before-her-time daughter
Susan (Mara Wilson).  But Kriss Kringle's success means trouble for a
rival discount store, whose owner (Energizer Bunny nemesis Joss
Ackland) orchestrates a scandal which will force the people of New York
to decide whether or not they believe in Santa Claus.
     John (HOME ALONE) Huges was the producer and co-scripter of this
film, and it may work primarily because it operates against everything
you might most fear from a Hughes project.  With the exception of some
pratfall shenanigans at the parade early in the film, Huges and
director Les Mayfield avoid excess, keeping the story low-key and
character based.  The characters are not uniformly interesting, mind
you.  The love story between perkins and a too-good-to-be-true
attorney (Dylan McDermott) is not well-developed, largely because
Perkins doesn't do too much with her role to show why such a perfect
guy is interested in such a depressing woman.  The villains are also
pretty boring, and Jane Leeves (Daphne from TV's "Frasier") in
particular has nothing to do and even less to say as one of the rival
store's operatives.
     However, it is the casting of actor/director Richard Attenborough
as Kriss Kringle which helps the MIRACLE happen.  Sure, he's no Edmund
Gwenn, who won an Academy Award for his portrayal in the original, but
Attenborough is a warm and lively presence who is perfectly believable
as an embodiment of human kindness without being *too* saintly.  A
scene in which he "speaks" to a deaf girl in sign language really put a
lump in my throat, and there is a lot of genuine emotion in the film.
Also impressive is Mara Wilson, the youngest daughter from MRS.
DOUBTFIRE, who avoids overly-precocious traps while handling some
tricky dialogue for a young actress.  She too pulls off a touching
scene in which the young Susan, torn over whether or not to believe in
Santa Claus, asks her mother whether she could believe if she wanted
to, without disapproval.
     That conversation is part of a challenging theme in MIRACLE ON
34TH STREET, and it brings us back to the question we started with:
why remake this movie?  The answer can be found in the ways (and
occasionally none-too-subtle ones, it should be fairly noted) that
Huges and Mayfield use belief in Santa Claus as a metaphor for
contemporary views on religious faith.  The film asks whether the world
is a better place for the erosion of faith, not because of some effect
on "values," but because of an effect on the human spirit; it asks
whether it is really a good thing to raise a child without faith.  Many
viewers might not appreciate being confronted with these questions, but
so few films ever dare to deal with the subject of faith that MIRACLE
ON 34TH STREET should be commended for trying.  If it's not entirely
successful, it's partly because Robert Prosky, as the judge presiding
over the Kriss Kringle case, fumbles the speech which should emphasize
this theme by making it far too animated when it should be pitched
lower.  The film's denouement is also somewhat too long, and doesn't
maintain the spirit of the scenes with Attenborough.  But the important
thing is that MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET is a good family entertainment
that takes a chance on being about something.  And it made a believer
out of me.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
FOR LOVE OF THE GAME
(Universal)
Starring:  Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, John C. Reilly, Jena Malone.
Screenplay:  Dana Stevens, based on the novel by Michael Shaara.
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein and Amy Robinson.
Director:  Sam Raimi
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, brief gore)
Running Time:  138 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     To paraphrase Garrett Morris as Chico Escuela from the old "Saturday
Night Live," baseball been bery, bery good to Kevin Costner.  Arguably his
two strongest performances -- in two of his strongest films -- have come
when he was dealing with baseball:  BULL DURHAM, and FIELD OF DREAMS.
There's something about Costner, some combination of his convincingly
athletic build and his aw-shucks, laconic manner that makes him
well-suited to tales of our peculiarly mythologized national pastime.
It's only natural that he'd want to return to the diamond for a film like
FOR LOVE OF THE GAME.  Could he maintain his perfect batting average,
even playing a non-hitting American League pitcher?
     The short answer is yes, though it's more of a solid single than
FIELD OF DREAMS' ground-rule double or BULL DURHAM's inside-the-park home
run.  Costner stars as Billy Chapel, a one-time great Detroit Tigers
pitcher now 40 years old, staring down the end of a career and the end
of a relationship. On the last day of a disappointing season -- the same
day that his long-time girlfriend Jane (Kelly Preston) announces she's
moving to London for a job as a magazine editor -- Billy learns that he
will be traded to another team unless he retires.  Over the course of that
evening's game, Billy reflects on his career and his five years with Jane,
almost unaware that he has a chance at throwing the pitcher's dream: a
perfect game.
     FOR LOVE OF THE GAME is deftly constructed as perhaps the ideal date
movie -- it's a love story that also happens to be a baseball movie.  In
the flashback segments, we watch the arc of Billy's romance with Jane,
including his acceptance of Jane's teenage daughter Heather (Jena Malone).
Though Costner is plenty agreeable in his easy-going way, it's Preston who
really sells the romantic side of the story.  She gives a bright,
appealing performance as a woman whose tentative steps into a relationship
with a professional athlete all feel momentous to her.  The chemistry
between Preston and Costner is solid, but there's a nagging sense that
there's much more to know about Billy.  The absence of any previous
romantic history for Billy robs the love story of context; it's hard to
see the person he was, so we can feel for the person he needs to become.
     Some of that context is provided by the baseball sequences, which are
satisfying in their own right.  They're less about the game than they are
about Billy's intensity and gamesmanship: his ability to "clear the
mechanism" and remove all external distractions, his internal monologues
about the batters he is facing, his almost old-fashioned respect for the
game.  Though there are a couple of technical blunders -- a scoreboard
that shows no hits for both teams shortly before the announcer says the
Tigers have two hits -- the game sequences do their job as character
development.
     Still, it's sometimes difficult to lock into the fate of Billy and
Jane's relationship, not because of the distractions of the game 
sequences, but because Billy remains so enigmatic.  In one sense, that
mystery gives FOR LOVE OF THE GAME an intriguingly different romantic
tone, since Jane remains oblivious to Billy's focus on baseball until an
injury causes him to turn that intensity against her.  In another sense,
that mystery could simply be a distraction from a viewer's confidence that
these two people actually belong together.  
     Make no mistake, FOR LOVE OF THE GAME is fundamentally satisfying --
it can't help but be with _two_ big payoff scenes -- and well-acted.
Director Sam Raimi delivers the crowd-pleasing goods, and the film
delivers more laughs than you might expect.  I only wish Billy Chapel had
been more of a complete character, and less one of those baseball icons
Costner has exploited so successfully in other films.  The game continues
to be bery, bery good to him.  It just could have been better.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
PLAYING BY HEART
(Miramax)
Starring:  Gillian Anderson, Ellen Burstyn, Sean Connery, Anthony Edwards,
Angelina Jolie, Jay Mohr, Ryan Phillippe, Dennis Quaid, Gena Rowlands, Jon
Stewart, Madeline Stowe.
Screenplay:  Willard Carrol.
Producers:  Meg Liberman, Willard Carrol and Tom Wilhite.
Director:  Willard Carrol.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     PLAYING BY HEART inspires the question, "how many stories do you need
to tell in one film in order to cover the entire spectrum of human
relationship dynamics?"  Is three sufficient?  Five?  Ten?  The answer, of
course, is that it's actually a trick question; you can't possibly cover
the subject of love in toto over the course of one two-hour feature.  The
best you can do is make the stories you _do_ choose to tell compelling
enough and insightful enough that they feel somehow more universal.
     Writer/director Willard Carrol, apparently unhip to the tricky nature
of the aforementioned question, has answered it "six."  And that's at
_least_ two too many.  Carrol's line-up of romantically lost souls,
centered primarily in Los Angeles, includes:  elderly married couple Paul
(Sean Connery) and Hannah (Gena Rowlands), struggling with the shadow of a
long-ago infidelity; emotionally defensive Meredith (Gillian Anderson),
struggling with whether to pursue a relationship with Trent (Jon Stewart);
party girl Joan (Angelina Jolie), struggling to dent the armor of surly
party boy Keenan (Ryan Phillippe); unhappily married Gracie (Madeline
Stowe), struggling to keep her affair with a married man (Anthony Edwards)
meaningless; and Hugh (Dennis Quaid), struggling to come up with a new sob
story every night to win the sympathy of women in bars.  Added for good
measure is the reconciliation of a mother (Ellen Burstyn) with her
terminally ill son (Jay Mohr), each struggling to understand the other.
     There's an inherent danger in films that include several intertwining
stories, namely that some will be much more interesting than others, and
that the interesting stories will be less effective because we keep
dashing away from them.  At least one of the stories is extremely
effective -- Anderson and Stewart's tentative sparring -- thanks largely
to the charismatic intelligence of the two actors.  Two others are
consistently diverting -- Jolie and Phillippe, and Connery and Rowlands --
again thanks largely to the performers, which is a particular surprise in
the former case.  But with three other stories vying for time, including
the utterly tedious trysts between Stowe and Edwards, there's never enough
time for the good ones to build any momentum.  Carrol and usually reliable
editor Pietro Scalia (an Oscar-winner for JFK) chop PLAYING BY HEART into
bite-sized three minute chunklets, giving the film all the emotional
resonance of a wittier-than-usual episode of "The Love Boat."
     That wittiness is what Carrol is counting on to carry us through
PLAYING BY HEART, a film with more than its share of effective verbal
sparring and clever quips.  The dialogue makes the episodes diverting a
fair amount of the time; it also disguises a script that has virtually
nothing interesting or new to say about relationships.  It often feels
like Carrol is engaged in a decade-late scramble for a "modern" take on
love and sex -- incorporating HIV into not one but two of the storylines
-- but essentially every one of the stories is about people trying to
understand and be understood.  It's not a particularly revelatory take on
why love is complicated, which makes it even more unclear why Carrol had
to tell so many stories to say one thing.
     Perhaps it's the sense that Carrol is trying _so_ hard that makes
PLAYING BY HEART frustrating in spite of its occasional sparks of life.
John Barry's score drapes a curtain of strings heavily over too many
scenes, Vilmos Zsigmond's cinematography paints an unbelievably
romanticized L. A. nightscape, and the conversations sometimes turn into
exchanges that in real life would end with someone getting smacked across
the face.  Yet for all its flaws, PLAYING BY HEART probably would have
worked if it had given us the time to build a familiarity with only one or
two couples, allowing us to understand their hopes and fears about love in
more depth than a quick character capsule could provide.  The moments just
don't add up in this epic of the heart that proves the law of diminishing
returns.

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
CHARLIE'S ANGELS
(Columbia)
Starring:  Cameron Diaz, Drew Barrymore, Lucy Liu, Bill Murray, Sam
Rockwell, Tim Curry, Crispin Glover, Kelly Lynch, Luke Wilson.
Screenplay:  Ryan Rowe & Ed Solomon and John August.
Producers:  Drew Barrymore, Nancy Juvonen and Leonard Goldberg.
Director:  McG.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, adult humor)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     CHARLIE'S ANGELS is the sort of marvelously out-of-control Hollywood
contraption that can turn any critic into Joe Bob Briggs. Let's tally up
the contents: Bill Murray in a sumo fat-suit. Cameron Diaz's cleavage. 
Beyond-the-valley-of-THE MATRIX martial arts wire work. Drew Barrymore's
cleavage. Big-ass explosions. Crispin Glover as a mute assassin with
sculpted eyebrows and a fetish for clumps of torn-out hair. More of Drew
Barrymore's cleavage. Tom Green extended cameo. Matt LeBlanc extended
cameo. Cameron Diaz in a white Lycra bodysuit. Lucy Liu playing corporate
trainer/dominatrix. Every cheesy song ever recorded between 1974 and 1984
with the word "angel" in the title. And one pygmy nuthatch.
     By any reasonable filmmaking standard, CHARLIE'S ANGELS is a mess, a
bizarre attempt to mix '70s cheesecake with '00s computer-enhanced James
Bond-ian action. It's infuriating not to be able to shred it to ribbons
for being the geek-boy wet dream it clearly was meant to be, but there's
just too much wild amusement here to dismiss. Welcome to a world where a
trio of brilliant, kung fu fightin', babealicious private detectives --
Natalie (Diaz), Dylan (Barrymore) and Alex (Liu) -- do the bidding of
anonymous, never seen benefactor Charles Townsend. They have been hired to
find out who was behind the kidnapping of software genius Eric Knox (Sam
Rockwell), and their mission (ostensibly) is to retrieve Knox and his
cutting-edge voice-recognition technology from competitor Roger Corwin
(Tim Curry). In fact, their mission is to induce endocrine overload in
viewers who can't get enough of hot chicks doing spinning kicks through
the air while wearing curve-hugging clothing.
     There's no point getting too cerebral about CHARLIE'S ANGELS. In
fact, if you do decide to see it, it would be wise to check under your
seat as you leave to make sure your mind hasn't leaked out of your ear
into a puddle on the floor. Sure, there are the requisite self-aware
nudges to show that it knows not to be taken seriously -- a reference to
T. J. HOOKER: THE MOVIE, a gag about overwrought action film acting, etc. 
-- but it still keeps up a frantic pace so you won't notice how awkwardly
made it is. Certain action sequences are chopped short, character-building
sub-plots stall the film in place and the tone shifts abruptly from moment
to moment. Whatever 21st century spin the folks involved might want to put
on this version of CHARLIE'S ANGELS, it's still all about the T&A --
whether it stands for technique & attitude, or bears the cruder, more
common meaning.
     But damned if it still isn't more fun than MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2, or
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH, or virtually any other recent high-tech caper
you'd care to name. Part of it is how unabashedly over-the-top it all is,
from the physics-defying fight sequences to the megaton explosions. Part
of it is the way the comic relief actually provides comedy, including Bill
Murrays' inimitable Bill Murray-ness and Cameron Diaz getting into her
ditzy side. Part of it is the strange appeal of watching a film that lets
women be the James Bonds (including the unapologetic casual sex), and
comes up with better villains than the Bond series has had for some time
(dig that Crispin Glover!). And yes, a whole lot of it is how it pulls off
the neat trick of sending up the series' hair-flipping jiggle appeal while
still taking advantage of it.
     Do all the pieces of CHARLIE'S ANGELS add up to slick movie-making? 
No. In fact, rookie feature film director McG clearly has a lot to learn
about elements beyond slow-motion and near-subliminal edits. He does,
however, have a game cast, a competent script, some awesome fight 
choreography and a willingness to turn anything into a joke. This ain't
art, but it ain't the kind of tediously predictable big-budget garbage you
usually find at your multiplex, either. This is movie-making heavy on the
Drew Barrymore-hangin'-out-a-window-while-nekkid-fu. Scott says check it
out.

Title
Review for Rudy (1993)
Starring:  Sean Astin, Ned Beatty, Charles S. Dutton.
Screenplay:  Angelo Pizzo.
Director:  David Anspaugh.
     Here's where I get to come off like the callous, cold-hearted
critic that I am.  The subject is RUDY, the new fact-based story of a
would-be college football player.  RUDY is uplifting; RUDY is
inspirational.  It's feel-good Hollywood entertainment in all its
glory.  It's also just not all that interesting.  RUDY is too diffuse,
takes too long to get where it's going, and skimps on what should be
its climax.
     RUDY is the true story of Daniel "Rudy" Ruettiger (Sean Astin), a
working-class Indiana youth who dreams of playing football for his
beloved Notre Dame.  The two main obstacles:  he's too small, and his
grades aren't good enough to get him in.  Instead, Rudy joins his
father (Ned Beatty) and brothers working at a steel mill for four
years, until a pivotal event motivates him to give Notre Dame his best
shot.  He's set up at a community college near Notre Dame by a helpful
priest (Robert Prosky) to earn the necessary grades, and spends all of
his free time helping out Fortune (Charles S. Dutton), the head
groundskeeper of Notre Dame Stadium.  The next two years become a race
to get admitted to Notre Dame and make the team before his eligibility
runs out.
     RUDY's primary structural flaw is that its script tries to cover
too much time and too many different (and tangential) aspects of Rudy
Ruettiger's story.  The body of the film covers eight years, and
involves several "time passes" montages, making it hard for the
establishment of any narrative momentum.  It also drifts into an
unnecessary subplot involving Rudy's friendship with his socially inept
tutor, a choice which seems all the more ill-conceived when compared to
the time spent establishing why Rudy is so tenacious in the pursuit of
his dream.  However, I was most frustrated by what seemed to be an
indecision on the part of screenwriter Angelo Pizzo and director David
Anspaugh as to where the triumph in Rudy's story lies.  A series of
individual victories begins with Rudy's inevitable acceptance to Notre
Dame, each of which could have been a testimony to an indomitable
spirit.  But at a certain point, Rudy stopped seeming determined and
started seeming obsessed.  I was glad for Fortune's lecture regarding
why Rudy should consider himself a success, but by the end I had lost
some necessary sympathy for Rudy.
     This is not the fault of Sean Astin.  He's quite good at bringing
across Rudy's earnest determination, and looks the perfect part with
his solid but undersized body.  Unfortunately, I don't think the script
gives him a firm enough grasp of Rudy's character.  The brief sequence
showing Rudy as a child doesn't do it, nor do the confrontations with
his family which seem intended to do so.  Indeed, most of the
characters suffer from such an overly broad stroke.  Charles S.
Dutton's Fortune is a bit too cliche as a gruff mentor, as is Beatty as
the father with low expectations.  Prosky gets a couple of nice scenes,
but there's not much freshness to his character either.  This is a
script with too many lines like, "If I don't do this now, I won't be
any good for you, or me, or anyone," and, "Not a day goes by that I
don't regret it."  It's the "one from Column A, one from Column B"
school of sports film screenwriting.
     To its credit, RUDY does a great job with the atmosphere of Notre
Dame and Notre Dame football; in fact, the South Bend campus becomes a
character more carefully developed than most of the humans.  The Golden
Dome, the stadium locker room, the mosaic known as Touchdown Jesus are
all photographed with an eye to the mystique that is Fighting Irish
football.  However, with such effective buildup, I was disappointed
with the handling of the final game sequence.  Things happened far too
fast, and an important shot involving Rudy's last play is just badly
directed.
     It's too bad.  RUDY has a great deal of energy and an interesting,
improbably heroic story to tell.  It's a moderately entertaining film,
with a message and content appropriate for the whole family.  What it
lacks is focus.

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
Starring:  Michael Keaton, Glenn Close, Marisa Tomei, Robert Duvall,
           Randy Quaid.
Screenplay:  David Koepp and Steven Koepp.
Director:  Ron Howard.
     After establishing himself with gentle mass-market fantasies and
taking a break for an overstuffed comedy, this man got the bug to be
Taken Seriously as a Director; the results tended to be as notable for
their excesses as their successes.  Sound like I'm describing Steven
Spielberg?  Not surprising.  Ron Howard's career as a director has
often seemed too consciously patterned after Spielberg's (although
there are clearly worse models), and has represented much that is best
and worst about his much more successful colleague's work.  THE PAPER
is one of these films.  It's a bit too busy and precocious for its own
good, but still has enough of a charming throwback quality that I was
willing to forgive many of its flaws.
     THE PAPER stars Michael Keaton as Henry Hackett, metro editor of a
New York tabloid daily called The Sun.  In the course of one hot
Friday, Henry and his colleagues will face a journalistic moment of
truth.  Henry has been offered a position at the more respectable New
York Sentinel, much to the delight of his very pregnant wife Marty
(Marisa Tomei).  However, Henry finds himself waffling on the move as
he is caught up in the biggest story of his life, an apparently
racially-motivated slaying which Henry discovers may be something else
entirely.  As deadline approaches, Henry pleads with editor Bernie
White (Robert Duvall) for time to get his story, while managing editor
Alicia Clark (Glenn Close) pushes for a front page which highlights the
two black fall guys arrested in the case.
     THE PAPER is delivered with an energy that matches the barely
controlled chaos of the newsroom, and that energy is nearly enough to
sell the film all by itself.  The go-go pacing echoes newspaper films
of past decades, the same films the current THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
parodies.  Indeed, while there is a decidedly 90's spin to the
proceedings (no film of the 40's would ask if its hero were spending
too little time with his wife), THE PAPER still features such standbys
as the gruff editor, the wet-behind-the-ears reporter (here a
photographer), and an ethical dilemma.  There is nothing daringly
original about the way THE PAPER serves up these elements, but the
setting itself is so lively and the cast generally so engaging that the
lack of originality doesn't assault you.  Keaton, in his third
collaboration with Howard, delivers a solid protagonist even though the
role demands little of his considerable talents.  Marisa Tomei has some
delightful moments as Marty, herself a reporter going through career
withdrawals and dealing with her fears that Henry will always be too
busy for their baby.  Randy Quaid gets the showy role as a paranoid
attack columnist, and Catherine O'Hara has a funny cameo as Marty's
bitter friend.  Less successful are Close and Duvall, but that
certainly isn't the fault of the two talented actors.
     The weak link in the script by David and Steven Koepp is an
unnecessary subplot involving Duvall as the editor dealing with a
diagnosis of prostate cancer and trying to reconcile with his estranged
daughter.  While the intention was clearly to establish a parallel
between what Bernie is and what Henry is becoming, Bernie's story is
never integrated with Henry's  We never see Henry responding to
Bernie's situation; for all we know, he never even knows about it.  As
a result, it seems like we're getting snippets from an entirely
different movie.  Bernie's story is just filling up minutes.
     It's too bad, because a resolution connected to Bernie's family
troubles would have been much more effective than the one we get.  That
resolution includes a bar scene which suffers from extremely sloppy
editing leading into not one but two medical crises.  It seems like a
Ron Howard film isn't complete without someone dying or nearly dying,
as though he doesn't trust any conclusion not based on the biggest
possible emotion.  What had been a taut, energetic film about
priorities and the thrill of reporting bogs down seriously in the final
fifteen minutes.  It's not quite enough to sabotage THE PAPER's
strengths completely, but it does show once again that Ron Howard the
"serious director" too often equates serious with saccharine.

Title
Review for Brady Bunch Movie, The (1995)
Starring:  Shelly Long, Gary Cole, Christine Taylor, Michael McKean.
Screenplay:  Laurice Elehwany & Rick Copp and Bonnie Turner
             & Terry Turner.
Director:  Betty Thomas.
     It is official now:  I have become everything that I despise.
I am of a certain age where my youth has become a marketing tool,
re-packaged and returned to me for nostalgic consumption.  But those
attempts to this point (THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES, THE FLINTSTONES)
have basically left me unmoved.  The Brady Bunch ... now, there's a
different story.  I grew up with them, and I remember their dopey
antics with an inexplicable affection.  So the upshot is, they
finally got to me.  THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE is a movie that most
likely was put together by chimps, and I had fun anyway.
     As anyone who watched the 1969-1974 series will recall, this is
the story of a lovely lady (Carol, played by Shelly Long) who was
bringing up three very lovely girls:  Marcia (Christine Taylor); Jan
(Jennifer Elise Cox); and Cindy (Olivia Hack).  Carol is married to
a man named Brady (Mike, played by Gary Cole), who previously had
been busy with three boys of his own:  Greg (Christopher Daniel
Barnes); Peter (Paul Sutera); and Bobby (Jesse Lee).  The Bradys are
still hopelessly mired in the 70s, but around them it is 1995 Los
Angeles.  They are not only holdouts of an era, they are also
holding out against selling their house to next door neighbor Mr.
Ditmeyer (Michale McKean), who wants to turn the neighborhood into a
mini-mall.  Unfortunately, an unexpected tax bill might force the
family to move, unless the industrious Brady kids can raise $20,000
in a week.
     I think any discussion of THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE must begin with
this statement:  you had to be there.  Familiarity with the series,
whether in first run or its endless incarnation in reruns, is
essential, since the film is composed almost entirely of bits and
pieces of plots from the series.  When the audience laughs at Marcia
being hit in the face by a football, or Peter's cracking voice, or
Greg's attempt to turn himself into rock star Johnny Bravo, it isn't
because any of these situations are inherently funny; in fact, they
are really fairly inane.  But they are so familiar, so much a part
of the fabric of growing up in America at a particular time, that
watching THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE is like re-discovering an old toy.
Even if you realize that it was sort of a stupid toy, you are still
going to play with it, and smile while you're doing it.
     THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE was going to sink or swim on the basis of
casting, and there are both successes and failures.  Shelly Long has
Florence Henderson's mannerisms down pat as Carol, and Gary Cole is
a hoot as he pronounces Brady platitudes with a deadpan solemnity.
The dead ringer award goes to Christine Taylor, who looks and sounds
so much like original Marcia Maureen McCormick that it is truly
frightening.  Less impressive are Jennifer Elise Cox, whose slightly
unhinged Jan is too reminiscent of Melanie Hutsell's "Saturday Night
Live" characterization of Jan, and Henriette Mantel, who does a
version of housekeeper Alice which includes pratfalls and,
inexplicably, a leather bustier.
     There are about equal parts homage and parody in THE BRADY
BUNCH MOVIE, and both have their moments, but what surprised me most
was the way the film managed to recall a simpler time without
mockery.  When Jan visits a school counselor (played with a leer by
RuPaul), it is not entirely a gag that her problem is not a
pregnancy, drug abuse or an eating disorder, but simple sibling
rivalry.  Similarly, when the neighbors eventually rally around the
Bradys' stand against the developers, it recalls a time when
neighbors actually knew each other.  Make no mistake, THE BRADY
BUNCH MOVIE is occasionally quite sluggish, and required about a
thimbleful of creativity.  At the same time, it made me wistful not
only for a piece of my youth, but also for an era when families were
functional, communities seemed closer, and "Have a Nice Day" was
something people actually meant.

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
     Proceed no further, Gentle Reader, if you are of a delicate
constitution or prefer to see your films with no potential surprises
revealed:  I am about to "out" IN & OUT.  You see, the Paramount marketing
department has been living a lie.  They've been selling IN & OUT in
commercials and theatrical trailers as the story of Howard Brackett (Kevin
Kline), an Indiana high school teacher who hears his former student,
actor Cameron Drake (Matt Dillon), thank him during an Academy Awards
acceptance speech...while simultaneously announcing to the world that
Howard is gay.  Only Howard insists he's _not_ gay.  In fact, he's engaged
to be married in less than a week to long-time sweetheart Emily
Montgomery (Joan Cusack).  It's all a big misunderstanding, he claims,
based on his cleanliness, his sense of style, and his inordinate fondness
for the Barbra Streisand oeuvre.
     Don't be deceived, Gentle Reader.  It turns out that Howard really is
gay, a fact which is driven home when a gay tabloid television reporter
(played by Tom Selleck!) plants a 15-second kiss on his lips.  An audible
gasp rustled through the auditorium where I saw the film when the audience
suddenly realized it had been duped.  A woman near me muttered, "That is
disgusting."  Mr. and Mrs. John Q. Heterosexual-American, expecting a
straight farce from IN & OUT -- emphasis on "straight" -- may be in for a
very rude awakening.
     I'm not averse to rude awakenings as a rule; in fact, I think cinema
in particular could use a lot more of them.  In this case, however, the
premise they're selling is so much more interesting than the premise they
end up using.  If IN & OUT had been about a genuinely heterosexual man who
finds himself in the middle of such a controversy, screenwriter Paul
Rudnick could have taken deadly aim at many societal quirks:  the
automatic presumption that accusations are true, the reaction of activist
groups to such an announcement (and its subsequent denial), the
stereotypical pereceptions both of truly masculine and suspiciously
effeminate behavior.  For about half its running time, IN & OUT is heading
in the right direction, but as soon as Howard admits that he's gay, it
feels like all the satirical energy has been sapped from the film.  It
becomes just another sincere plea for tolerance and understanding --
pleasant and laudable, but lacking bite.
     It's tough to be too hard on IN & OUT, because Rudnick's script is so
often so sharp.  When he sets his acidic sights on targets like 
supermodels (one is reduced to tears by her inability to operate a rotary
phone) and Steven Seagal's thesping skills (he is one of Cameron's fellow
Best Actor nominees for his performance in SNOWBALL IN HELL), the results
are blistering.  The cast supports the script with uniformly solid work,
particularly Joan Cusack in a brilliant physical performance which turns a
wedding dress into a spectacularly versatile comic prop.
     Kevin Kline's performance is also satisfying...at least half of it
is.  He's charming early on both in his exasperated insistence on his own
heterosexuality and in his living room boogie to "I Will Survive."  He
just doesn't know what to do with himself once he comes out, nor does the
script know what to do with him.  For the final half hour, Howard simply
sits around waiting for the people of Greenleaf, Indiana either to accept
him or reject him.  As a protagonist, he turns into a doormat.
     I'm not sure if director Frank Oz (HOUSESITTER, DIRTY ROTTEN
SCOUNDRELS) could have made a film with the kind of dead-eye social
commentary the "straight" IN & OUT would have required.  I would have
liked to see him try, though.  This is one of the year's few
unquestionably funny comedies, yet it's also one of the most frustrating.
Give the Paramount marketing department credit for coming up with one of
the most hilarious comic plots in recent memory, the plot to the great
film IN & OUT _almost_ was.  Instead, it's here, and it's queer, and I
guess we'll have to get used to it.

Title
Review for Space Jam (1996)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Michael Jordan, Wayne Knight, Bill Murray, voices of Danny
DeVito, Billy West.
Screenplay:  Leo Benvenuti & Steve Rudnick and Timothy Harris & Herschel
Weingrod.
Producers:  Ivan Reitman, Joe Medjuck, Daniel Goldberg.
Director:  Joe Pytka.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult humor).
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Michael Jordan and Bugs Bunny share top billing in Warner Bros.' live
action/animation extravaganza SPACE JAM, but I'm going to go out on a limb
to suggest that it was made more for those who grew up with His Airness
than for those who grew up with His Hareness.  Jordan is a superstar in an
era where the line between entertainment and marketing is more like a
faint smudge, and SPACE JAM is a film which defines the state of the art
in tie-ins:  action figures, Happy Meals, clothing, soundtrack albums and
on and on and on.  That kind of emphasis on merchandising made it a long
shot for artistic merit, but I hoped the Looney Tunes could make for some
genuine lunacy.  No such luck, Doc.  SPACE JAM is a sporadically amusing
cartoon for a rapid-edit audience with too little of the classic Warner
wit.
     The story involves an extraterrestrial entrepreneur named Swackhammer
(voice of Danny DeVito), owner of an outer space amusement park called
Moron Mountain which is in need of a new attraction.  Swackhammer thinks
earth's wacky Looney Tunes characters are just the thing, so he sends five
diminutive henchmen to bring them back.  Head Looney Tune Bugs Bunny
(voice of Billy West) cleverly convinces the tiny aliens to play a
basketball game for their freedom...at least he thinks it's clever until
the aliens steal the talent of NBA players including Charles Barkley,
Patrick Ewing and Larry Johnson and become the Monstars.  In an attempt to
even the odds, Bugs recruits Michael Jordan, currently in the middle of
his basketball retirement and playing baseball for the minor league
Birmingham Barons.  Thus begins the Space Jam, with Michael lacing up the
high-tops again to save his two-dimensional pals from intergalactic
slavery.
     Anyone who has seen Michael Jordan in any of his several thousand
commercial appearances (McDonald's, Gatorade, Nike, Hanes) should not be
surprised to hear that he has very little screen presence.  Jordan has
exactly one facial expression when trying to act -- eyebrows raised, lips
pursed in a wrinkled smirk -- and he runs the gamut of emotions from
affable bemusement to amiable bemusement.  That makes it challenging 
enough for him to work with another human actor, weighing down an
otherwise amusing scene where a star-struck catcher feeds Jordan
information about what pitches to expect.  When he is expected to react to
animated characters, he is utterly lost.  It isn't that much of the comedy
involves interaction between Jordan and the 'Tunes; mostly he is asked to
be pleasant and dunk in slow motion.  There just seems to be no particular
reason why Jordan couldn't have been animated himself, where an artist
could have made him more...well, animated.
     Of course, the animated segments have their own problems.  Make no
mistake, SPACE JAM is going to be entertaining to 10-year-olds, relying
on the slapstick violence which has always characterized Looney Tunes.  
What's missing is the subversive, adult-oriented humor of the Looney Tunes
of old, and not "adult-oriented" in the sense that it was crude.  The
classic Warners cartoon capers took the time to build both visual and
verbal gags, but director Joe Pytka doesn't believe his audience will have
that kind of patience.  SPACE JAM's idea of sharp satire is a reference to
the Disney-owned Mighty Ducks NHL franchise, and it is disspiriting to
find the 'Tunes scraping for laughs by uttering lines like "Nice butt," or
"We're getting screwed."  It also seems strangely appropriate that Bugs
Bunny is voiced by Billy West; with its bodily functions humor, SPACE JAM
seems less like a vehicle for Bugs than one for West's other cartoon voice
roles, Ren and Stimpy.
     SPACE JAM only really comes to life when Bill Murray appears as
himself.  Murray's comic persona is the human descendent of Bugs Bunny, a
wiseacre rebel unfairly smarter than his adversaries, and he is a riot in
his scant minutes.  He is also virtually the only reason for an adult to
slog through SPACE JAM.  For the kids, it provides well-known 'Tunes; for
the teens, it provides well-known tunes (covers of "Fly Like an Eagle" by
Seal and "Basketball Jones" by the truth-is-stranger-than-fiction pairing
of Barry White and Chris Rock); for both, it provides perhaps the most
well-known athlete on the planet.  SPACE JAM is a commercial construct,
and it feels like it.  How sad that a brilliant comic creation like Bugs
Bunny has to ride shotgun with a wooden basketball star, all to provide a
set of collector's cups.

Title
Review for Air Bud: Golden Receiver (1998)
     Quite a few things have changed since last we visited with Buddy, the
hoops-shooting golden retriever star of AIR BUD.  His human pal, Josh
Framm (Kevin Zegers) is starting junior high school; Josh's widowed mother
(Cynthia Stevenson, taking over from Wendy Makkena) is re-entering the
dating arena.  Even the name before the film has changed, with Disney
shuttling the sequel from its flagship banner to Dimension, the genre
division of Miramax (apparently realizing the original had too few fart
jokes to qualify as a live-action Disney film).  And of course, the most
significant and tragic change involved the death of the original Buddy
from cancer, though he was only one of several dogs to perform in AIR BUD.
     I only wish that with all those changes they could have rustled up a
new screenwriting team.  Paul Tamasy and Aaron Mendelsohn return to duty
for AIR BUD: GOLDEN RECEIVER, this time turning Buddy into a football star
when Josh goes out for the local hapless youth football team led by
good-natured, multiple-bypass-waiting-to-happen Coach Fanelli (Robert
Costanzo).  Naturally this leads to amusing sequences of Buddy befuddling
opposing defenses as he makes like Jerry Rice.  But wait, there's more!
You also get touching dramatic sub-text as Josh struggles to accept his
mom's new relationship with a kindly veterinarian (Gregory Harrison).  All
that, plus a bumbling pair of Russians (Nora Dunn and Perry Anzilotti) who
want to kidnap Buddy to join their trained animal circus.
     The original AIR BUD had good intentions and solid family values to
spare, but it tied them up in such derivative and unfocused package that
even the kids in the audience couldn't keep their attention on the
precocious pooch.  New director Richard Martin picks up the pace
considerably this time around, but he can't do much to create any
cohesiveness with this story.  From moment to moment, it's hard to tell
whether AIR BUD: GOLDEN RECEIVER is supposed to be an Afterschool Special,
a John Hughes film or an episode of Rocky and Bullwinkle (though with
considerably less wit).  Martin even throws in some low-rent vaudeville by
pairing his own dad Dick (of Rowan & Martin fame) with Tim Conway as goofy
play-by-play announcers. It's hard to take the messages about believing
in yourself and loving a new parent seriously when they're juxtaposed with
two clowns sliding around in the contents of a tank conveniently labeled
"Fish Guts."
     It's also hard to take seriously a film where a premise so bizarre is
shrugged off as a given.  To the credit of the original AIR BUD, at least
it showed people fumbling with the basketball rule book to figure out
whether a dog was eligible for the team.  This time around, Buddy trots
onto the field in his leather helmet and shoulder pads as though it were
the most natural thing in the world.  Perhaps somewhere on the cutting
room floor is a scene in which an arbitrator cites the "Air Bud"
precedent.  Without such a scene, everything that follows seems a little
insulting to the intelligence, and an indication of how lazy the
screenwriters were that they couldn't come up with some creative way to
land Buddy on the team.  Isn't it about time for a satiric poke at school
"inclusiveness" rules?
     I'm not pretending that AIR BUD: GOLDEN RECEIVER was made with me in
mind.  This one is a short attention span kiddie-caper which did have the
young ones clapping and guffawing with some regularity, and perhaps that
counts for something.  It even features a few decent throwaway gags,
including a llama named Dolly and a splendidly off-key rendition of the
American National Anthem. There's just something vaguely desperate about
this whole AIR BUD franchise -- they have build not just one film but a
series of them on what amounts to a better-than-average Stupid Pet Trick.
Sure, it's harmless enough, but the frantic amalgamation of disparate
elements gave me a headache.  It's a bit frightening to note that the
original Buddy's trainer Kevin DiCicco is putting together another
project, AIR BUD: THE NEXT GENERATION.  Perhaps in the course of teaching
a new dog a new trick, he could teach a new screenwriting team one I'd
really love to see:  how to write a script that might appeal to someone
over the age of five.

Title
Review for Moll Flanders (1996)
     If you're looking for a textbook example of counter-programming, you
would have to say that MGM's release of MOLL FLANDERS qualifies...either
that, or a textbook example of complete stupidity.  June is supposed to be
the exclusive domain of sequels, special effects and super-stars; films
based on period novels are not supposed to appear until the kids are back
in school, the leaves have changed colors and the air is heady with Oscar
talk.  Nevertheless, here we have a romance with English accents taking on
Cruise, Connery and Carrey.  It's a risky move, but one which could pay
off, because MOLL FLANDERS is a solid drama with a top-notch cast, and
gives Robin Wright a break-out role to show off her talents.
     The film, based on Daniel Defoe's novel, opens with a man named
Hibble (Morgan Freeman) showing up at a London orphanage to collect a
young girl named Flora (Aisling Corcoran).  Hibble tells the girl that he
knew her mother, and begins to read to her from the woman's memoir as they
make their way to their destination.  It tells of Moll Flanders (Robin
Wright), the daughter of a woman hung for thievery just after her birth,
raised by nuns in a foundling's home.  When she runs away from the home,
she is taken in first by a society family, and then by the bold and cruel
Mrs. Allworthy (Stockard Channing).  She soon discovers that Mrs.
Allworthy runs a brothel, and eventually joins the profession herself,
subsequently sinking into alcoholism.  But when an impoverished artist
(John Lynch) takes Moll in to be a model, she slowly begins to recover her
sense of self, and to learn about true love.
     Pen Densham oversees a marvelous look for the production of MOLL
FLANDERS, and that look helps to make a fitful first half easier to take.
Densham's screenplay often seems in too big a hurry to race through Moll's
early life and get her to Mrs. Allworthy's, and he doesn't always allow
the significance of certain events to become clear.  The greatest charms
in that first half are provided by Freeman and Corcoran, who share some
frisky scenes as the no-nonsense manservant and his mischievous charge;
those scenes provide welcome comic relief.  Making your way through MOLL
FLANDERS can be like the experience of reading the novel in a high school
English class -- the early exposition can lose you before you get to the
meat of the story.
     I would hope that such is not the case, because MOLL FLANDERS becomes
an extremely effective and satisfying love story, and because even in
that sluggish first hour Robin Wright turns in a wonderful performance.
Despite her delicate features, Wright can make herself appear amazingly
solid and determined, and that is a critical facet of the personality she
is trying to convey.  This is a story about the inner strength of a woman
who struggles against the life to which she was born towards her vision of
the life she believes she deserves, and Wright makes that journey as
touching as it is painful.  She has a superb partner in John Lynch, who
provides gently shaded work as the frustrated artist-cum-scientist whose
search for the ability to commit a soul to canvas helps Moll to
re-discover her own soul.  There is a completely natural chemistry between
them, and their relationship makes the second half of MOLL FLANDERS
something special.
     Densham's erratic sense of pacing does undercut the love story
somewhat, as MOLL FLANDERS never quite achieves the big, cathartic
emotional moments one expects from a story of this kind.  I think that he
also doesn't allow Freeman or Stockard Channing to do the best work of
which they are capable.  Freeman may be the best American screen actor of
the moment, but he never quite finds the character of the emotionally
enslaved Hibble, and Channing similarly wavers between a kind of
one-dimensional Victorian villainy and a kinder, gentler side.  By driving
his story towards the relationship between Moll and the artist, Densham
has sacrificed certain aspects of the story, but he makes that sacrifice
pay off.  What really makes MOLL FLANDERS work, in a way that the recent
JANE EYRE didn't, is that Densham maintains a fundamental sense of
optimism and energy, relegating the sense of loss and foreboding which
could have dominated the story to a secondary status.  MOLL FLANDERS is a
redemption story, and it is an effective one.  It is also a human story,
and that alone may help it to stand out while every theater around it
reverberates with tornadoes and explosions.

Title
Review for Waiting for Guffman (1996)
(Sony Classics/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Christopher Guest, Eugene Levy, Fred Willard, Catherine O'Hara,
Parker Posey, Bob Balaban.
Screenplay:  Christopher Guest and Eugene Levy.
Producer:  Karen Murphy.
Director:  Christopher Guest.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  83 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The reason inspired satire is so rare nowadays is that people have
been given a warped perception of what satire is.  The popular culture --
fed by "Saturday Night Live," David Letterman and even political pundits
-- has created the notion that irony, sarcasm and satire are
interchangeable, and that there is something inherently hip about ridicule
as a spectator sport.  But it takes no imagination to savage someone or
something you despise; the best satire in any medium has been born of
affection, from people with a gift for pointing out the negative while
recognizing the positive.  THIS IS SPINAL TAP, the best comedy of the
1980s, was a brilliant satire of the excesses of rock and roll which also
respected the commitment of the artists to their work.  WAITING FOR
GUFFMAN, a comedy from TAP alum Christopher Guest, is a more uneven
effort, but it is at its funniest skewering small-town America in all its
cockeyed optimism.
     WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is set in fictional Blaine, Missouri, a peaceful
little town preparing to celebrate its 150th birthday.  Part of that
celebration will be an original musical production called "Red, White and
Blaine," and it is placed in the hands of New York theater expatriate
Corky St. Clair (Christopher Guest).  Corky has big plans for the big
event, and builds a cast including local community theater veterans Ron
(Fred Willard) and Sheila Albertson (Catherine O'Hara) and first-time
performers Dr. Allan Pearl (Eugene Levy) and Libby Mae Brown (Parker
Posey).  The production faces crises great and small as the
sesquicentennial approaches, but even more exciting than the show itself
is the prospect of a visit from a New York producer named Mort Guffman,
who may offer to take the show to Broadway.
     Publicity for WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is emphasizing the SPINAL TAP
connection by describing Guest as "the lead guitarist of Spinal Tap," but
I don't think that comparison does GUFFMAN any favors.  Yes, it is
similarly filmed in a faux documentary style, and derives a similar
off-beat energy from its largely improvised script.  However, there are
fewer outrageous high points, largely the result of a less inherently
outrageous milieu.  The more you expect a middle-American SPINAL TAP, the
more time you might spend waiting for the inevitable disasters in the play
which turn out to be not so inevitable after all.
     It may take sitting through all of "Red, White and Blaine" before it
becomes clear that WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is not going to be a parade of
incompetence, though Guest (who co-wrote the story with co-star Levy) does
have fun with the cloistered perspectives of his characters.  The
Albertsons, who are travel agents by day, turn out never to have left the
state of Missouri themselves; a reported alien visitation in 1946 is so
much a part of Blaine's history that it makes its way into the pageant as
an accepted fact.  Most memorably, nobody in the town seems to notice that
Corky is as stereotypically homosexual a human being as has ever walked
the earth.  Guest has taken some heat for his swishy portrayal, but I
think such criticism misses the point.  Everyone watching the film
understands that Corky is supposed to be gay, but no one _in_ the film
understands it.  Gay men simply are not part of their world, so no one
thinks twice about why they have never seen Corky's "wife" Bonnie, or
about his exaggerated mannerisms being anything but "theatrical."
     The real subject of WAITING FOR GUFFMAN, however, isn't merely how
narrow the world-view of Blaine's residents may be, but how the residents
involved in the production respond to a whiff of big city show-biz.  For
Corky, "Red, White and Blaine" is his chance to return to the big time;
for Dr. Pearl, a latent comedic legend in his own mind, it is a spark of
excitement in his otherwise monotonous life.  You may spend much of
WAITING FOR GUFFMAN waiting for "Red, White and Blaine" to be terrible,
but it isn't terrible.  The orchestra, conducted with intense pride by the
high school music teacher (Bob Balaban) sounds pretty good, the songs
(written by Guest and his fellow Tap-ers Michael McKean and Harry Shearer)
are silly but hum-able, and the actors are amateurs who give the show all
they've got.  It is simply ridiculous, of course, that a show like this
could ever go to Broadway, but the performers are too wonderfully naive to
recognize that fact.  WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is occasionally sluggish through
its middle half hour, and hardly the non-stop riot SPINAL TAP was; it also
treats its characters with far more good-humored respect than you might
expect.  Guest understands that it is possible to laugh at people and
still love them, and that fine satire can be achieved with the poke of a
finger as well as a sledgehammer.

Title
Review for Shadowlands (1993)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Debra Winger, Edward Hardwicke,
           Joseph Mazzello.
Screenplay:  William Nicholson.
Director:  Richard Attenborough.
     If Anthony Hopkins and Debra Winger aren't careful, they're likely
to knock themselves out of contention for Academy Award nominations by
doing too much excellent work in one year.  Hopkins has received
much-deserved accolades and several critics' awards for his role in THE
REMAINS OF THE DAY, while Winger has been nominated for a Golden Globe
for her performance in A DANGEROUS WOMAN.  Now the two talented actors
are paired in Richard Attenborough's SHADOWLANDS, and the result is
stunning.  This moving, intelligent love story provides Winger with her
best role in a decade, and Hopkins with a chance to add the second best
male performance of 1993 to a resume which already includes the best.
     SHADOWLANDS, adapted by William Nicholson from his own fact-based
stage play, focuses on renowned English author and scholar C. S. Lewis
(Hopkins), known by his friends as Jack.  It is 1952, and Jack is
living an orderly, sheltered life as an Oxford don and sharing a house
with his brother Warnie (Edward Hardwicke).  Into this life walks Joy
Davidman Gresham (Winger), a brash American poet who has been
corresponding with Jack.  Her honesty immediately captures Jack's
fancy, and the two strike up a close friendship.  When Joy and her son
(Joseph Mazzello) relocate to London after Joy's divorce, that
friendship becomes a marriage of convenience, which in turn becomes a
chance for Jack to experience a love which his fears had always denied
him.
     This is the second time SHADOWLANDS has been committed to film
(the first in 1985 with Joss Ackland and Claire Bloom in the leads),
but this version is certain to become definitive.  Nicholson's play is
a winner, and he has written a sparkling adaptation.  The verbal
sparring between Lewis and Joy is wonderful, the best this year not
written by William Shakespeare.  It's the kind of love story Hollywood
just doesn't turn out all that often, a simple but affecting
examination of the ability of love to transform, and to make life's
pain bearable.  Lewis himself wrote about the experience in the
philosophical work A GRIEF OBSERVED, and that is the tone SHADOWLANDS
adopts:  introspective and restrained, yet still deeply felt.  The
score by John Fenton is non-intrusive, and some of the film's most
potent emotional moments are almost completely silent.  It's an
extremely deft piece of filmmaking by Attenborough, a director best
known for epics like GANDHI but equally skilled at personal moments.
     And it doesn't hurt that his two leads give Oscar-worthy
performances.  Anthony Hopkins' Jack Lewis begins much like his Stevens
the butler from REMAINS, a reserved and guarded man blind to his own
feelings; this time, however, he gets to undergo a real
transformation.  He laughs, he cries, he even finds himself completely
flustered by room service.  Once again Hopkins demonstrates the rare
ability to act with his entire body, turning an aborted wave to a
departing cab into a rich visual text.  However, SHADOWLANDS would have
come up short if Joy had not been equally well-handled, and Debra
Winger proves well up to the challenge.  Winger sparkles as she prods
and tests Jack, refusing to let him rest in his self-imposed cocoon.
There is strength, intelligence, savage wit and deep emotion in her
performance, and she somehow manages to steal scenes from one of the
finest screen actors in the world.  Winger has been seen far too
infrequently in recent years, but it would appear SHADOWLANDS is likely
to correct that oversight.
     SHADOWLANDS was well on its way to being a "10" before it lost
steam in the last half hour.  The third act drags on some, and a late
scene in which a glycerine teardrop dangles in physics-defying fashion
from Joseph Mazzello's eye pushed by cynic button.  Still, SHADOWLANDS
ranks among the best films of 1993, artistic and profoundly emotional.

Title
Review for Vegas Vacation (1997)
     It's tough to say who has been part of more fiascos in the past
fifteen years:  the VACATION series' Clark Griswold, or Chevy Chase.
Personal problems and terrible choices in film projects -- dreadfully
comedies like FLETCH LIVES, NOTHING BUT TROUBLE and COPS AND ROBBERSONS --
have turned Chase into a poster boy for unfulfilled career potential, and
lately it seems that he is trying so hard to win back his audience's good
will that it simply comes off as pathetic.  His latest attempt to
re-animate the corpse of his film career -- a return for a fourth draw
from the successful VACATION well -- probably seemed like a good idea at
the time, and the film isn't a complete disaster.  It's simply so lacking
in attempts at humor that Chase might have had a better chance at coming
up with a winner playing a slot machine.
     Chase once again plays Clark Griswold, hapless patriarch of Chicago's
Griswold clan:  wife Ellen (Beverly D'Angelo), daughter Audrey (Marisol
Nichols) and son Rusty (Ethan Embry).  With a freshly-earned bonus burning
a hole in his pocket, Clark decides to take the family on another vacation
adventure, this time to the new family entertainment Mecca of Las Vegas.
Naturally, nothing goes quite according to plan for Clark.  While he is
busy losing his shirt at every possible game, Ellen becomes infatuated
with Wayne Newton (Himself), whose feelings may be mutual.  Even worse,
Cousin Eddie (Randy Quaid) and his family turns out to be living in the
nearby desert, bringing even more bad luck too bear on the Griswolds.
Meanwhile, Rusty parlays a fake I.D. into a glimpse of the high life, and
Audrey learns some bad habits from Eddie's daughter Vicki (Shae D'Lyn).
     After fourteen years and three previous films, the VACATION series
has been around long enough to be the target of some in-jokes, and a
couple of the film's best gags are based on familiarity with 1983's
NATIONAL LAMPOON'S VACATION at the very least.  Early in the film, Clark
laments a lack of family time together by noting to the kids, "I hardly
recognize you any more;" after four different actors have played both
Audrey and Rusty, it's not surprising.  There is also a cameo appearance
by Christy Brinkley, once again playing Clark's sports car-driving object
of desire, only now with a baby on board.
     Unfortunately, the series has also been around long enough for the
audience to expect a certain level of outrageousness and wild sight gags a
la series creator John Hughes, and VEGAS VACATION simply limps along for
much of its 92 minutes.  Chase can still make incompetence an art form,
and he gets a couple of amusing bits in an airplane bathroom and trying to
plug leaks in the Hoover Dam with chewing gum.  The truth is that many of
the actual jokes in VEGAS VACATION are funny; there are just stretches of
minutes at a time when there isn't even an attempt at a joke to be found.
The film gets particularly tedious when it follows the exploits of Audrey
and Rusty (played with a transcendental blandness by Nichols and Embry),
but it's not much better trying to turn Wayne Newton into a comic actor.
Screenwriter Elisa Bell has set a film in one of the easiest cities in the
country to make fun of, yet she seems unable to come up with anything
funny to say about it.  In fact, between the sluggish script and the
extended sequences showing off the Vegas sights and observing a Siegfried
and Roy show, you'd think that VEGAS VACATION had been commissioned by the
Nevada Chamber of Commerce.
     The biggest surprise in VEGAS VACATION turns out to be that after
over an hour of snooze-inducing nonsense, it comes up with one of the most
purely inspired comic sequences of the last few years.  With Clark nearly
broke and desperate to make back the thousands of dollars he has lost to a
black jack dealer (played with delightful smugness by Wallace Shawn), he
walks into a second-rate casino which allows gambling on some more
familiar games:  Flip a Coin, Rock Paper Scissors, the children's card
game War.  I was nearly in tears laughing as a stone-faced croupier at 
the "I'm Thinking of a Number Between 1 and 10" table informed Clark that
7 was incorrect, then almost immediately angry that a fraction of that
imagination hadn't gone into the rest of the film.  All that remained was
for VEGAS VACATION to trot out the obligatory car crash and finish up with
another ten minutes worth little more than a shrug.  For five minutes,
VEGAS VACATION is a hilarious parody of the gambling culture of Vegas; for
five minutes, Chevy Chase was back on top.  Perhaps those five minutes can
serve as a launching pad to better choices.  But I wouldn't bet on it.

Title
Review for Bad Girls (1994)
BAD GIRLS (or, "Girls Just Want to Have Guns")
Starring:  Madeleine Stowe, Mary Stuart Masterson, Andie MacDowell,
Drew Barrymore, James Russo, Dermot Mulroney.
Screenplay:  Ken Friedman and Yolande Finch.
Director:  Jonathan Kaplan.
     I'd be willing to bet that someone sold the concept for BAD GIRLS
with a one-line pitch like, "THE WILD BUNCH in bloomers." Such is the
way in Hollywood these days.  After all, Westerns have been hot at the
box office, and making the protagonists women guarantees a smidgen of
politically correct credibility (in addition to cleavage).  Besides,
with the paucity of good roles for women, talented actresses like
Madeleine Stowe and Mary Stuart Masterson will jump at that chance to
shoot guns.  The problem is that these prefabricated films almost never
bring along a script.  BAD GIRLS is always either hopelessly cliche or
insufferably stupid--and usually both.
     BAD GIRLS is the story of four prostitutes in Echo City, Colorado,
who wind up on the run together when one of them, Cody Zamora (Stowe)
kills an unruly customer.  She is saved from the hangman's noose by
Anita (Masterson), Eileen (Andie MacDowell) and Lily (Drew Barrymore),
and they head out together with detectives hot on their trail.  Their
plan is to make their way to Oregon, where Anita and her late husband
had a timber claim, and to finance a lumber operation with Cody's ample
savings.  These plans are interrupted when those savings are stolen by
Kid Jarrett (James Russo), a notorious bandit who has a history with
Cody.  The women and the gang of thieves repeatedly cross paths until
it becomes clear that this movie ain't big enough for the both of 'em.
     BAD GIRLS is frequently so incoherent that I was forced to wonder
whether director had chopped all the raw footage into two minute
chunks, strewn them about on the editing room floor and pieced the film
together in whatever order he happened to pick them up.  I knew I was
in trouble from the outset, when the rescue of Cody takes place.
Screenwriters Ken Friedman and Yolande Finch couldn't be bothered with
such niceties as explaining why Eileen and Lily might want to save Cody
(at least Anita was the one Cody saved).  There is not a second spent
letting these characters interact first, so that there seems to be some
kind of connection between them.  Apparently it's enough that they're
sisters in the world's oldest profession.  Then we are introduced to
Josh (Dermot Mulroney), a taciturn cowboy who's out to avenge ... wild
guess, anyone? ... the death of his Pa.  The thing is that this subplot
is not only cliche, it's put together in the least economical way
possible, with the inclusion of Kid Jarrett's aging father (Robert
Loggia).  This additional character just muddles the movie further; in
fact, I would go so far as to say that the inclusion of the entire Josh
subplot is unnecessary.  But that would have left Cody without a love
interest, and we couldn't have that, now could we?
     Oh, but there's more, pardners.  In the last two minutes, there is
the suggestion that Lily harbors a more intimate affection for Eileen,
something we are completely unaware of until the music swells to a
tear-jerking crescendo which means nothing because we have been given
no background.  James LeGros makes an appearance as a simple
homesteader who wins Eileen's heart, but his is the only performance
that isn't completely perfunctory.  Madeleine Stowe and Mary Stuart
Masterson are two of my favorite current young actresses, and both are
forced to spout dialogue which puts the "hack" back in hackneyed.
Director Jonathan Kaplan apparently had no idea what to do with a
Western, so rather than set up his own shots he tries to do his
half-hearted homage to Sam Peckinpah, with disastrous results.  Whole
set pieces are ripped off from THE WILD BUNCH, and Kaplan's use of slow
motion becomes absurdly comic.  The cinematography is quite good, but a
big pile of garbage is a big pile of garbage no matter what kind of
filter you put over the lens.
     Sometimes you can look at a film as bad as BAD GIRLS and see the
germ of an interesting idea that was undeveloped or simply butchered,
but not here.  There isn't the faintest attempt to make BAD GIRLS a
real examination of the plight of women in the American West; the women
are just a gimmick, unlike in THE BALLAD OF LITTLE JO.  BAD GIRLS is
lazy, stupid, sloppy and, worst of all, boring.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
     There comes a time in a critic's life when he simply has nothing to
say about a film as gruellingly generic as MERCURY RISING, but he's got
space to fill so he keeps on jabbering away anyway.  This is the kind of
action film where dogs jump out of nowhere to spook the audience, where
glass shatters in slow motion, and where children are placed in jeopardy.
It's the kind of action film which went through a slew of title changes --
from SIMPLE SIMON to SIMON to MERCURY FALLING to MERCURY RISING -- but may
as well have been called BRUCE WILLIS ACTION FILM PROJECT 1998.  It's a
hero with a gun, a villain with an attitude, a woman with nothing to do
but cringe in fear and a script with some time to kill.  It's competent,
business-like and utterly uninspired.
     I suppose MERCURY RISING deserves at least an ounce of credit for
trying to make its protagonist human.  Willis plays Art Jefferies, an
undercover FBI agent thrown into a depression when a Waco-like shootout
results in the death of two teenage boys.  Re-assigned to penny ante
detail, Jefferies stumbles upon an apparent domestic murder-suicide which
turns out to be more than meets the eye.  The surviving family member is
a 9-year-old autistic savant named Simon Lynch (Miko Hughes) who
unwittingly has broken a top-secret government code called Mercury, hidden
by its creators in a puzzle magazine as a test of the "geek factor."  When
National Security Agency nasty Lt. Col. Nick Kudrow (Alec Baldwin) orders
the boy "erased," only Jefferies puts his life on the line to save Simon.
Thus begins a rather one-sided paternal bonding experience, in which
Jefferies tries to redeem his previous failure (underlined in grainy
flashbacks that haunt his dreams) and connect with Simon between spurts of
gunfire.
     Nice try, bad idea.  I don't know who thought it was wise to remake
RAIN MAN as a gritty thriller, but it's a combination that falls
completely flat.  Though Willis is a cut above his action hero
contemporaries as an actor, he still can't work miracles with a character
reduced to baleful stares and hoarse whispers as he vainly struggles to
befriend his troubled charge.  It's not just that he has trouble
connecting with Simon, which is sort of the point -- he has trouble
connecting with anyone.  Willis moves as though on auto-pilot, exchanging
dialogue with his supposed best buddy (Chi McBride) as though they were in
different rooms, and making no discernible effort to differentiate this
action film from his last (THE JACKAL), which also happened to include a
scene where someone gets caught between two trains speeding in opposite
directions.
     It's that kind of creative deja-vu which makes sitting through
MERCURY RISING such a chore.  It's not that it's a terrible film; in fact,
director Harold Becker's pacing is a cut above recent genre cousins, the
narrative never actively insults, and the performances are solid all the
way around.  Baldwin, in prime arrogant S.O.B. mode, even gets off a sharp
little inside joke when he tells a mach-posturing Willis "you've been
watching too many of those 4-wheel-drive commercials" (Baldwin himself
being the television voice of Chevy trucks).  But those are the kind of
moments you grasp for when you've seen the same film a dozen times a year
for the last five years, when you've written about the same film a dozen
times a year for the last five years.  If your objective in watching a
film like MERCURY RISING is spending a two hour block which will
immediately blur into previous two hour blocks, you've found a winner.
You may even have something worth writing about it.  If so, I've got a
couple of column inches you could help fill.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
     Tom Tykwer's RUN LOLA RUN is pure cinema at its most maddening and
invigorating.  Few films this year will leave viewers as charged from 
experiencing the film medium in the hands of someone who knows how to use
it; few films this year pack so much reckless energy into a tight 81
minutes.  And few films this year not directed by George Lucas will put
more effort into telling a tale about people who don't really matter as
characters.  RUN LOLA RUN is a giddy exercise in overkill combining
splendid bursts of audacity with a largely "who cares" narrative.
     The story opens with an 11:40 a.m. call to Lola (Franka Potente) from
her luckless boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), a smuggler's courier,
about an impending crisis.  It seems that Manni left 100,000 marks of his
boss's money in a bag on the metro, a problem he has little time to solve. 
If Manni and money are not at the designated pickup spot at noon sharp the
same day, Manni is almost certainly a dead man.  That leaves Lola twenty
minutes to track down the cash from her wealthy banker father (Herbert
Knaup), twenty minutes which could end any number of ways depending on the
slightest caprice of chance -- a stumble on the stairs here, a moment's
hesitation there.
     The crux of Tykwer's premise is showing us three alternate fates for
Lola and Manni based on those caprices of chance.  It's a gimmick that
allows him to turn a short film into a feature, but it works better than
you have any reason to expect.  Each segment comes with at least one
surprising twist, the kind of detail that shows Tykwer's rare talent for
being ingenious without being self-congratulatory about his ingenuity.
The most surprising twist of all may be the welcome flippancy in his gloss
on the usually heavy topics of fate and chance.  His best-executed running
gag involves staccato, freeze-frame asides in each segment showing how
Lola's encounters with complete strangers -- changed by a matter of
seconds in each variation -- change those peripheral lives as well.
Tykwer uses his marginalia better than many filmmakers use the entire
page.
     Often, however, it's all just a bit...much.  The collisons of
animation, video, still images and film seem to exist as much because they
can as for any practical reason; surrealist touches like Lola's ability to
shatter glass with a scream are more befuddling distraction than artistic
nuance.  All the busy-ness of Tykwer's business does an effective job of
distracting from just how emotionally weightless it all is.  The quiet
interpersonal moments between Lola and Manni, inserted between the
alternate reality segments, should have been striking for the insight they
provide.  Instead, they're striking because they're about the only chance
you have to catch your breath.
     Still, it's hard to resist a film that maintains such a relentless
pace and squeezes so much pleasure from such a simple concept.  It's also
hard to resist the charisma of Franka Potente, the wild-eyed star whose
furiously pumping legs fuel RUN LOLA RUN.  If there had been the hint of
a person behind that personality, RUN LOLA RUN could have been sheer
brilliance.  Even without that strong human story, it's still the sort of
action-packed crowd-pleaser that makes so many blockbusters look so sadly
bloated.  The sheer momentum of Tykwer's techno-pop-pulsing direction
makes the film an entertaining jolt to the system, even if it's all
ultimately auteurist eye candy.

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
     Yes, it's true -- STIR OF ECHOES features a child who sees dead
people.  It includes in its metaphysics the notion that disgruntled
spirits cause chilly temperatures in the human world.  It is at least
partially a tale of a wrongful death made right.  Depending on where you
fall in the old glass half-full/half-empty argument, STIR OF ECHOES is the
beneficiary of either extraordinarily good timing or extraordinarily bad
timing.  Maybe comparisons with mega-success THE SIXTH SENSE will doom it
to obscurity.  Or maybe a spillover effect, with movie-goers still hungry
for supernatural subject matter, will present it with an audience it might
not otherwise have had.
     For my money, viewers can't go far wrong either way.  If they go,
they'll be moderately satisfied; if they don't go, they won't be missing
all that much.  It begins as a tale of a working class Chicago guy named
Tom Witzky (Kevin Bacon) who dabbles in a garage band and generally feels
his life hasn't amounted to all that much.  That perception changes
radically when his sister-in-law (Illeana Douglas) hypnotizes him at a
party, turning him into a receiver for weird psychic visions featuring
a missing neighborhood teenager (Jenny Morrison). Tom also discovers that
his 5-year-old son Jake (Zachary David Cope) is even more tuned into the
netherworld, and that his wife Maggie (Kathryn Erbe) is understandably
freaked out by his odd behavior.
     It's awfully easy to dwell on the similarities between STIR OF ECHOES
and THE SIXTH SENSE, weighing in simply with whether the former is better
or worse than the latter.  It would be easier to ignore those similarities
if the whole film didn't feel overly familiar.  When a kindly black cop
(Eddie Bo Smith Jr.) informs Maggie of Jake's visionary gifts, he suddenly
turns into Scatman Crothers in THE SHINING; when Tom's obsessive behavior
leads him to tear up the house and alienate his family, he's Richard
Dreyfuss in CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND.  The Richard Matheson
novel on which STIR OF ECHOES is based is forty years old, so no one can
rightly accuse the film of thievery.  That doesn't change the way STIR OF
ECHOES is likely to be viewed today: a mish-mash of familiar elements.
     That's not to say that STIR OF ECHOES isn't also a reasonably
effective thriller in its own conventional way.  David Koepp, who helmed
the unsettling and little-seen TRIGGER EFFECT, has a knack for crafting a
scene that gets under your skin without resorting to too many shock cuts.
He also draws nice work from a solid cast, particularly Erbe adding a few
shadings to the thankless wife role.  Koepp's direction may get a little
showy -- jittery time-lapse shots of ghosts, funky business in the
"theater" of Tom's hypnotic trance -- but it does its job manufacturing
the creeps.  It ain't deep, but it's scary enough.
     Unfortunately for STIR OF ECHOES, it's less effective than it could
be because Koepp seems to think it _is_ deep.  The subtext of Joe Six-Pack
Tom seeing his new gift as a shot at finally doing something extraordinary
comes and goes, and it's hard to see anything voluntary in his character
arc.  Bacon's performance suffers from this erratic motivation -- he's
reasonably convincing both in his terror and in his determination, but the
two never come together.  By the time Koepp trots out an extended
flashback of a crime in progress, his melodrama has bogged down the
chills.  Ironically, that's yet another way STIR OF ECHOES is like THE
SIXTH SENSE: it's a moderately clever genre diversion that wants us to
believe it's something more.

Title
Review for Traveller (1997)
(October)
Starring:  Bill Paxton, Julianna Margulies, Mark Wahlberg, James Gammon.
Screenplay:  Jim McGlynn.
Producers:  Bill Paxton, Brian Swardstrom, Mickey Liddell and David
Blocker.
Director:  Jack Green.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw
     Most films about con artists treat the Big Con as the only reason the
story exists; once it's clear who's been had and who's done the having,
it's time to strike the set and call it a wrap.  Not so for TRAVELLER, a
frisky and well-crafted drama which takes the time to develop its
characters and its atmosphere.  Bill Paxton (who also produced) stars as
Bokky, a member of an intensely insular band of small-time grifters
descended from the Travellers of Ireland.  Bokky's simple, solitary life
running short cons through the Carolinas is complicated by two coinciding
events: the arrival of Pat O'Hara (Mark Wahlberg), the son of an outcast
Traveller who wants to return to the fold, and Bokky's romantic interest
in a single mother named Jean (Julianna Margulies) who falls for one of
his scams.  
     Bokky becomes Pat's mentor in the family business, creating plenty of
entertaining opportunities for the audience to watch the development of
their cons.  Screenwriter Jim McGlynn wisely avoids turning those scenes
into the foundation of TRAVELLER, instead allowing them to act as comic
flavoring for a nicely observed character study.  Paxton, Wahlberg,
Margulies and James Gammon (as a veteran con man who tries to pull Bokky
into one of his schemes) all turn in solid performances, with Paxton and
Margulies showing a particular chemistry in their sexy scenes together.
The actors make TRAVELLER consistently interesting to watch while McGlynn
and director Jack Green (the gifted cinematographer of UNFORGIVEN and THE
BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY, making his directing debut) slowly explore
their relationships.
     And there are plenty of relationships to explore.  One of TRAVELLER's
most noticeable short-comings is that it feels crowded with characters and
sub-plots:  the medical problems of Jean's daughter, Pat's flirtation with
the daughter of the Travellers' leader, the appearance of vengeance-minded 
Romany gypsies.  These tangents push the film's most unique element -- the
culture of the Travellers -- into the background; the production notes
provide more sense of who the Travellers are than the film itself.  As the
climax of the film turns into a violent hostage drama, TRAVELLER begins to
feel rather generic, as though its unique spirit has been compromised for
manufactured conflict.  Still, there is plenty to like about TRAVELLER,
from its casually confident pacing to its evocative soundtrack of blues
and country classics.  Thanks to rich characterizations and a strong cast,
this is one story of con men in which the "men" are more important than
the "con."

Title
Review for Slam (1998)
SLAM
(Trimark)
Starring:  Saul Williams, Sonja Sohn, Bonz Malone, Beau Sia.
Screenplay:  Marc Levin, Richard Stratton, Bonz Malone, Saul Williams and
Sonja Sohn.
Producers:  Henri M. Kessler, Richard Stratton, Marc Levin.
Director:  Marc Levin.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SLAM appeals to everything critics want movies to be.  It tells a
story of a side of American life most of us are lucky enough never to see.
It has a unique narrative rhythm, and a gritty, uncompromising style.
It's an idea movie, one that clearly wants its audience to walk out
pondering its weighty themes rather than humming a theme song or grinning
from ear to ear.  It comes with the pedigree of an award-winning
documentary film-maker directing his first feature film, and a Sundance
Film Festival Grand Prize.  SLAM is a great praise-worthy package.
     It is not, however, a great film.  In fact, it's not even a
particularly good one.  Documentarian Marc Levin (HBO's "Bangin' in Little
Rock") brings his verite style to the story of Ray Joshua (Saul Williams),
a street poet and small-time marijuana dealer in Washington D.C.'s inner
city.  Caught in the wrong place at the wrong time during a gang shooting,
Ray ends up convicted of possession with intent.  In prison, Ray finds his
survival may depend on allying himself with prison gang leaders like Hopha
(Bonz Malone), even though Ray claims to be a pacifist.  He also meets
Lauren (Sonja Sohn), a poet offering creative writing classes for inmates.
The two cross paths again upon Ray's release from prison, where their
relationship forces ray to conider his role in the decay of his
environment.
     SLAM virtually bubbles and boils with provocative concepts and
viscerally effective scenes.  Though at first it seems like it may be
little more than a liberal tract on hard lives, inequities in the judicial
system and the like, the film probes a bit deeper, questioning whether Ray
is part of the solution or part of the problem.  It's also hard not to
feel a charge from the scene in which Ray defuses a potential fight in the
prison workout yard by bursting into a poem of paralyzing ferocity.  With
Levin occasionally toning down the strident voice for a few wry
observations (including Malone's smooth turn as the prison entrepreneur
and Marion Barry's cameo as a trial judge waxing ironically indignant
about drug dealing), SLAM at its best does manage to grab hold of you.
     Then, nearly as quickly, it'll let you go again.  SLAM depends almost
entirely on gripping you in the thrall of its intensity, but that doesn't
always happen with a pair of inexperienced lead actors handling the most
challenging material.  Saul Williams doesn't have the chops to handle
Ray's complex character arc, nor can Sonja Sohn always handle Lauren's
didactic role.  That leads to scenes where the two merely shout at each
other with a discouraging lack of subtlety.  As comfortable as they may be
with the rat-a-tat, stream-of-insanity style of their poetry (showcased in
scenes at coffee house poetry "slams"), it often feels like that's the
only note they can bring to their performances.
     Make no mistake, Levin and his cast understand this milieu, and the
sincerity of their conviction is never in doubt.  Their film-making
instincts are another matter entirely.  From moment to moment, Levin
alternates between compelling realism and the pretentious whiff of
conspicuous symbolism -- a gangsta who becomes enlightened after he is
blinded, for instance, or the hollowly open-ended final shot.  SLAM is its
own kind of tone poem, I suppose, its success riding on the strong
accented beats provided by a few individually effective scenes.  Yet
ultimately that's all it is -- a collection of emotional iambs,
alternately engrossing and meandering.  Sincerity can only get you so far,
even when you're telling a story everyone would like to have told.

Title
Review for Hudsucker Proxy, The (1994)
Starring:  Tim Robbins, Jennifer Jason Leigh, Paul Newman.
Screenplay:  Joel Coen, Ethan Coen & Sam Raimi.
Director:  Joel Coen.
     Please complete the following sentence based on your reactions to
the previous films of Joel and Ethan Coen (RAISING ARIZONA, BARTON
FINK).  The Coen brothers are:
     a) a pair of intellectual dilettante/pop cannibals whose films
lack any kind of soul.
     b) a pair of brilliant visual stylists who manipulate genre into
something completely original.
     Your choice will probably tell you all you need to know about how
you would react to THE HUDSUCKER PROXY.  Coen brothers fans will revel
in their delightfully off-center perspective and their twisted sense of
humor; their detractors will grouse over their cold mechanics and
inaccessibility.  And both sides will be correct.  Fortunately, there
is more that dazzles than there is that distracts.
     THE HUDSUCKER PROXY opens on New Year's Eve 1958, as Norville
Barnes (Tim Robbins) prepares to jump from the 44th floor of the
Hudsucker Building.  The story behind how he ends up there flashes back
one month as naive go-getter Norville arrives in New York from Muncie,
Indiana.  He gets a job in the mail room of Hudsucker Industries on the
same day company founder and president Waring Hudsucker (Charles
Durning) chooses to leap to his death from the window of the board
room.  Hudsucker's right hand man Sidney Mussburger (Paul Newman)
decides to install an easily manipulated buffoon as the new president
in an attempt to shake investor confidence, force down the price of the
stock and allow the board to buy a controlling interest.  That buffoon
is Norville Barnes.  When the news goes public, reporter Amy Archer
(Jennifer Jason Leigh) smells a rat, and sets out to expose Norville as
a fraud, much to the delight of Mussburger and the board members.
However, Norville has at least one trick up his sleeve.
     Many of those off-putting elements which have limited the Coens'
appeal are still in place.  Director Joel is given to wild, manic set
pieces and near constant camera movement, which often seem to yell,
"Look at me, I'm a director!"  Fans of vintage cinema note that their
spins on established genres read like film school projects: make a
"film noir," make a gangster film.  THE HUDSUCKER PROXY clearly owes
most of its inspiration to Frank Capra's MEET JOHN DOE, with nods to
Sturges and Hawks along the way.  At a certain point, however, homage
gives way to parody; Jennifer Jason Leigh's clipped Katherine
Hepburn/Barbara Stanwyck delivery is cute for a while but eventually
becomes annoying, while Paul Newman simply seems cartoonish as the
snarling, cigar-chomping wheeler dealer.  But perhaps most
disappointing is the character of Norville, whom the Coens and
co-scripter Sam Raimi didn't seem to have any interest in making
interesting.  There's almost a mockery of Capra's everyman heroes, who
were simple but always imbued with common sense.  Norville is just a
dolt, and Robbins plays him that way.  Consequently, it's hard to care
about anything except what is on the surface.
     Of course, there is plenty more going on on the surface of a Coen
brothers film than any dozen other films put together.  Dennis
Gassner's production design is part Gotham City, part BRAZIL, but
stunningly evocative in its own right, while Carter Burwell provides a
fantastic and diverse score.  However, it is with two magnificent
visual pieces that HUDSUCKER makes its mark.  The first involves
Hudsucker's fall to his demise, a dizzyingly comic blue screen effect.
The other, even better, is a montage beginning with the testing and
marketing of Norville's big idea, the Extruded Plastic Dingus, leading
to a brilliant scene of one boy beginning a fad which will sweep the
nation.  There are dozens of individually memorable moments, lines and
scenes, which makes it all the more frustrating that they aren't
supported by a memorable story.
     With triumphant films like MILLER'S CROSSING and BARTON FINK, the
Coens have established themselves as among the most original filmmakers
of their generation.  Still, it has only been on rare occasions that
they have appeared as concerned with creating characters as they have
with framing shots.  THE HUDSUCKER PROXY is worth seeing for its quirky
invention, but it's hard not to wish that so much talent could come
with a little more heart.

Title
Review for Tango Lesson, The (1997)
     "I've always wanted to be in films," says dancer/choreographer Pablo
Veron at one point in THE TANGO LESSON, to which writer/director Sally
Potter replies "I've always wanted to be a dancer."  Well, both get their
chance in a grating feature-length self-indulgence disguised as a fanciful
romance.  Potter plays a film-maker named Sally, visiting Paris after
difficulties getting financing for her latest project (which is thoroughly
unbelievable, since the project in question involves the pure box office
gold of models dressed in primary colors pursued by a legless fashion
designer).  There she meets Veron, and convinces the dancer to teach her
the tango.  Along the way they sort of fall in love, dance, sort of break
up, dance some more, sort of get back together again, and dance a whole
lot more.
     Somewhere buried in this collection of dance sequences are a few
meditations on one's calling in life, the need to surrender control and
the connections between various art forms.  More power to you if you
manage to exhume them.  THE TANGO LESSON carries no emotional pull, since
both lead performers have the seasoned acting chops of...well, a director
and a dancer.  Some of the dance sequences are impressive, particularly
Veron's solo tap number in a kitchen, but the portentous and pretentious
flow of the narrative robs them of all joy -- imagine Gene Kelly directed
by Fellini, and you'll understand why THE TANGO LESSON is such a bizarre
experience.  Robby Muller's typically impressive black-and-white
cinematography only emphasizes that the film is an empty visual
exercise, a project so personal it can only leave the audience wondering
why in the world it should care.  Potter's spin on Fellini's 8-1/2 is
merely a moderately depressing record of the film-maker's mid-life crisis,
in which she attempts to assure the world that she could too be a
ballerina if she really wanted to.

Title
Review for Murder in the First (1995)
     Honestly, if I never see another courtroom scene in a movie, it
will be too soon.  As soon as I see a witness stand, a couple of
guys in suits, and twelve good persons and true, I know I'm in for
nothing less than a good old-fashioned lecture.  It's Jello drama:
ready instantly, but usually without much texture.  MURDER IN THE
FIRST has an inherently interesting story at its core, but its
makers don't know what to do with it except dress it up in cliches
and impress us with cinematographic gymnastics.  It's not a bad
film; it's just lazy, a classic example of a writer and director
failing to make the most of an idea's potential.
     MURDER IN THE FIRST is loosely based on the true story of Henri
Young (Kevin Bacon) a petty criminal sentenced to the Federal prison
at Alcatraz in the 1930s for stealing $5 from a post office.  After
a failed escape attempt, Henri is placed in solitary confinement for
over three years, routinely beaten and tortured by the prison's
associate warden Milton Glenn (Gary Oldman).  When he is finally
released from solitary, Henri attacks and kills the inmate who blew
the whistle on the escape attempt.  His case is assigned to rookie
public defender James Stamphill (Christian Slater) because everyone
believes that it's an open and shut case that no one could screw up.
But Stamphill decides that Henri does have a defense:  that the
brutality Henri suffered in Alcatraz turned him into a killer that
he wasn't when he entered.
     MURDER IN THE FIRST opens with a risky but effective sequence
which shows Henri's treatment while in the "dungeon."  The sequence
goes on for several minutes, but it is necessary considering how
much Henri's state of mind comes into play.  In fact, director Marc
Rocco doesn't really go far enough.  The torture sequences are too
romanticized, filmed in slow-motion and backlit like an S&M version
of FLASHDANCE, when it would have been more appropriate to play the
scenes straight so that Henri's plight seemed more real.  It is a
lack of restraint typical of Rocco's direction, which looks like he
put cinematographer Fred Murphy in a gyroscope and just set him
spinning.  You get the impression that Rocco thinks this story is
basically about crane shots and funky angles.
     What it should have been about, first and foremost, is the
relationship between Henri and Stamphill, but again Rocco and
screenwriter Dan Gordon don't take advantage of opportunities.  As
the film goes on, we learn about several things the two men have in
common, particularly that both lost their parents at a young age,
but these similarities aren't exploited.  Instead, Rocco just
indulges his camera, doing so to distraction during the first
meeting between Henri and Stamphill where the camear swings around
Henri's cell so noticeably that the actors get lost in the scene.
It's too much a case of the tail wagging the dog, such that by the
end of MURDER IN THE FIRST I didn't feel the friendship between
these two men which should have created its greatest emotional
impact.
     That said, the scenes between Bacon and Slater are the best
thing about MURDER IN THE FIRST.  Though Bacon's performance is
occasionally indulgent, coming off like Renfield with a Midwestern
twang, he is mostly extremely affecting.  It is by far the meatiest
role he has had, and he is effective at maintaining the shred of
humanity behind Henri's glassy stare.  Slater stays right with him
in the less showy role, very much the young go-getter in his early
scenes who only gradually comes to know the person at the heart of
his case.  One scene in particular, in which Slater compares the
punishment he received for stealing five dollars to Henri's, is a
great piece of work because Rocco lets the inherent power of the
moment work.  But then, inevitably, he must return to the courtroom,
and there things become trite and overblown again.  Gary Oldman
turns in another foaming-at-the-mouth performance as the sadistic
(gee, there's a surprise) warden, while R. Lee Ermey as the judge is
so similar to his role as the drill sergeant in FULL METAL JACKET I
thought he was going to call Slater "Private Pyle."  MURDER IN THE
FIRST, which should have been most about a connection between two
very different men, instead becomes a shouting match, and by trying
to make his film Important with a capital "I," Marc Rocco instead
makes it Mediocre with a capital "M."

Title
Review for Cool Runnings (1993)
Starring:  Leon, Doug E. Doug, John Candy, Rawle E. Lewis, Malik Yoba.
Screenplay:  Lynn Siefert, Tommy Swerdlow & Michael Goldberg.
Director:  Jon Turtletaub.
     You'd think Disney could mail it in by now.  "Underdog Makes Good"
comedies have been a staple of the studio's live-action repertoire from
THE ABSENT-MINDED PROFESSOR to GUS to THE MIGHTY DUCKS.  That a
significant portion of their audience wouldn't notice if they *did*
mail it in makes it all the more impressive that they don't.  COOL
RUNNINGS carries on a tradition of formula comedies exuding
good-natured energy, and entertaining more than they have any right
to.
     As advertised, COOL RUNNINGS tells the story (sort of) behind the
first Jamaican Olympic bobsled team.  Derice Brannock (Leon) is a
sprinter with Olympic dreams whose dream is shattered when he and two
other runners stumble during the final qualifying trials.  Unwilling to
give up on the chance to be an Olympian, Derice considers another
sport ... bobsledding.  Along with best friend Sanka Coffie (Doug
E. Doug), Derice looks up Irving Blitzer (John Candy), a two-time
bobsled gold medalist disgraced by a cheating scandal and quietly going
to seed in Jamaica.  Blitzer reluctantly agrees to coach the team made
up of Derice, Sanka and the two other fallen sprinters:  surly,
bald-headed Yul (Malik Yoba) and passive rich kid Junior (Rawle
E. Lewis).  They train and head to Calgary for a chance to qualify for
the 1988 Winter Games.
     Anyone who has ever seen a Disney sports film, or almost any
sports film for that matter, can tell you more or less exactly what to
expect.  The coach will be gruff towards his inept new charges (do you
think he'll eventually warm up to them?).  There will be a montage of
the team in training or playing their sport (do you think they'll keep
improving?).  There will be a hissable, cartoonish villain who
questions our heroes' mettle (do you think he'll get his
comeuppance?).  No one goes to these films to be overwhelmed by the
originality of the story.  It's all about positive feeling, and COOL
RUNNINGS delivers it.  The slapstick training runs are lively, enough
so that the youngsters in my audience were screaming with delight.  The
bobsled footage is superb, and the Olympic village atmosphere is
exciting.  Jamaica is Disney-fied into an idealized, colorful Paradise
replete with grinning waifs and free of most signs of poverty, but it's
brightly filmed and after all, this isn't a film which offers much in
the way of social commentary.
     The performers are responsible for generating most of the charm,
each member of the team handling his stock part with aplomb.  Leon is a
bit stiff but still appealing as the determined team leader.  Malik
Yuba glowers and grumbles effectively as Yul, and Rawle E. Lewis'
Junior is jittery and expressive.  Doug E. Doug gets the comic relief
role as Sanka, and proves to be a winning presence.  The biggest
surprise, however, is John Candy.  In the past, Candy's name in the
credits has been almost as sure a sign of a comedy I'll hate as Mickey
Rourke's has been of a drama I'll hate.  Here Candy plays the straight
man instead of the buffoon, and plays it well.  It doesn't take much
imagination to buy Candy as a has-been *anything*, but he's more than
just serviceable.  He plays Blitzer surprisingly understated, even when
giving the obligatory inspirational speeches, and allows the rest of
the cast to carry most of the comedy.
     I could spend plenty of time nitpicking about what COOL RUNNINGS
didn't do, or should have done.  The real story behind the formation of
the team is far less "Hollywood," and that's not the only historical
fact with which the film plays fast and loose.  The nasty East German
bobsledder and the U.S. official with a grudge are both way over the
top.  But for my money, the most important factor was that I left the
theater smiling and feeling uplifted.  It's a film about success coming
from hard work and determination, and it's a film I would be glad to
take a family to see.  That's a rarity, and it's worth praise on its
own level.

Title
Review for Career Girls (1997)
     Mike Leigh does not create film stories in a traditional way.  His
unique method of constructing scripts out of workshops with his actors has
made it a safe bet that you won't find flat, flimsy characters running
around in his films.  You also won't find many traditional plot-driven
narratives.  Leigh prefers to drop his fully-realized characters into a
situation, allowing them to act and react as naturally as possible.  Where
most film-makers write plots, Mike Leigh writes lives.
     CAREER GIRLS is a traditionally non-traditional Leigh effort which
begins with two solid characters -- 30ish career girls Hannah (Katrin
Cartlidge) and Annie (Lynda Steadman) -- and an intriguing situation.
Hannah and Annie are old college friends and former roommates who haven't
seen each other for six years when Annie comes to visit Hannah in London.
At first, we wonder why she bothered.  The initial interactions between
the two are awkward, the talk exceedingly small.  All evidence suggests
that the two women have so little in common they don't belong in the same
genus, let alone in the same room.
     Then, gradually, we begin to see them rediscover their friendship.
They share a hearty laugh over the ridiculous advances of a would-be
playboy (Andy Serkis); they run into old acquaintances from school; they
inquire after each other's families.  With unerring perception, CAREER
GIRLS reveals that the single most important thing Hannah and Annie _do_
share in common is the four years they spent together.  Leigh understands
the power of shared history to connect people, whether friends or family,
even when personalities are polar opposites.  As Cartlidge and Steadman
hone in on the ways in which these two women connect, spending time with
them becomes a wonderful lesson in how tight some bonds can become.
     So far, so very good, except that the dynamic I've just described
comprises less than half of CAREER GIRLS' 87 minute running time.  The
majority of the film is devoted to flashbacks of the girls' college days,
where another possible reason for their friendship becomes evident:  they
are both so irritating you can't imagine anyone else putting up with them.
Annie, painfully shy as the result of a terrible skin condition, bobs her
head, darts her eyes and whines; Hannah, blunt and aggressive, tosses of
puns and rude remarks in a perpetually affected drone of a voice.  When
the ridiculously twitchy pair is joined by an even twitchier and more
ridiculous pal named Ricky (Mark Benton) -- all facial tics and compulsive
mannerisms -- the flashback segments of CAREER GIRLS become a real chore
to sit through.
     Leigh has put together more than enough fantastic work (HIGH HOPES,
LIFE IS SWEET, NAKED, SECRETS & LIES) to have earned the right to a minor
stumble, but the stumble in CAREER GIRLS points out the potential danger
in Leigh's style.  If you're going to give the audience a character-driven
drama, you'd better not give them characters likely to drive them into the
lobby.  The college-era Hannah and Annie are shrill caricatures of
bombastic and insecure college students; nothing about them or their
friendship rings as true as their modern day attempts to figure out why
they were friends.  After making several wonderful films filled with
believably complex people, Leigh has made half of a wonderful film by
making only half of two wonderful characters.

Title
Review for Disclosure (1994)
Starring:  Michael Douglas, Demi Moore, Donald Sutherland, Roma
Maffia, Caroline Goodall.
Screenplay:  Paul Attanasio.
Director:  Barry Levinson.
     You know that Angry White Male we've all been hearing so much
about since the November election?  Well, I've just figured it out:
he's Michael Douglas.  Ever since FATAL ATTRACTION in 1987, Douglas has
seemed to be there every time a film exploded into an infuriating
zeitgeist phenomenon, and Douglas himself has mastered the role of the
somewhat-less-than-innocent victim.  Team him up with a novel by
cautionary tale king Michael Crichton, and you have DISCLOSURE.  What
you don't have is anything nearly as controversial as it might first
appear to be.  While it is well-paced and generally entertaining, it
tries so hard to be everything for everyone that it misses the chance
to be genuinely incendiary.
     Douglas plays Tom Sanders, an executive in a Seattle computer
company with a wife, two children and--he believes--great career
prospects.  However, on the day that he thinks he is to get a big
promotion, he finds that the position has gone to Meredith Johnson
(Demi Moore), an ambitious young exec who also happens to be a former
lover of Tom's.  He is bothered by the slight, but nowhere near as
bothered as he is when an after-hours meeting with Meredith gets
extremely steamy.  Tom ultimately resists temptation, but Meredith is
not pleased.  The next morning, Tom learns that Meredith has accused
him of sexual harrassment, and that the company president (Donald
Sutherland) wants him to take a transfer quietly.  But Tom will have
none of it, and hires a media-savvy attorney (Roma Maffia) in an
attempt to make the tough case that a man has been sexually harrassed
by a woman.
     Those familiar with other Michael Crichton works (JURASSIC PARK,
RISING SUN) will not be stunned to learn that the characters in
DISCLOSURE are stick figures; I somehow suspect that if Crichton could
figure out a plot that didn't require human beings, he'd jump on it in
a minute.  A Crichton plot is a Plot with a capital "P," and DISCLOSURE
is no exception.  It's dense with twists, turns and intrigue, perhaps
too dense for a screen adaptation ever to cover thoroughly enough.
Discoveries which Tom was able to make in the novel through his own
resourcefulness are reduced to conveniently (and absurdly) overheard
conversations in the film.  Because there is so much ground to cover,
director Barry Levinson keeps the film moving like a rocket, and it
could leave some viewers struggling to keep up.
     Credit screenwriter Paul Attanasio (QUIZ SHOW) with making it work
as well as it does.  While there is very little he can do with
Meredith's character, he does give Tom a slightly shadier personality
so that his experience becomes something of a comeuppance.  He also
creates some marveous dialogue which may be DISCLOSURE's strongest
asset.  Donald Sutherland gets some of the choicest lines, such as
dismissing the notion that Tom would accept a transfer to a division
rumored to be on the chopping block:  "That would be like a duck
accepting a transfer to a l'orange."  Comic Dennis Miller is also sharp
as one of Tom's co-workers, but I suspect that many of his best lines
were his own creations.  Attanasio's work is efficient and clever, and
it makes DISCLOSURE engaging most of the time.
     Unfortunately, Attanasio also appears to have been given orders to
give every possible side of the story equal time, and it is when
DISCLOSURE becomes a high school debate that it becomes tiresome.
Crichton's novel was unapologetic about the role-reversal in the sexual
harrassment story, since to him it was simply a plot device in a
corporate thriller.  The film, on the other hand, both tries to be
*about* sexual harrassment and to avoid appearing as reactionary as
Crichton, and gives everyone a chance to make a speech.  In a story as
tightly constructed as DISCLOSURE, the dueling pontifications are a
real time drain.  DISCLOSURE is a slick, well- photographed film, and
it's nice to see Levinson directing a winner after the twin bombs TOYS
and JIMMY HOLLYWOOD.  Still, it could have been much more effective had
it spent less time chewing its nails over how politically correct it
wanted to be.

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
CELEBRITY
(Miramax)
Starring:  Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Joe Mantegna, Winona Ryder,
Leonardo DiCaprio, Charlize Theron, Melanie Griffith, Famke Janssen.
Screenplay:  Woody Allen.
Producer:  Jean Doumanian.
Director:  Woody Allen.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Woody Allen's detractors have had a laundry list of gripes about his
films for many years now.  His neurotic screen persona had grown
increasingly shrill and annoying, they said; his cinematic world of white
Upper-Manhattanites had grown ever more insular.  As the lines between his
convoluted personal life and his baldly autobiographical films grew
blurrier by the year, the anti-Woody contingent began to consider him a
vaguely pathetic has-been, the film-making equivalent of Frank Sinatra --
more famous in the later stages of his career for who he used to be than
for who he still was.
     It took watching Kenneth Branagh's grating gloss on Allen's
mannerisms in CELEBRITY for me to sympathize with that side of the Great
Woody Debate.  Branagh plays Lee Simon, a writer who has dabbled in
novels, travel pieces and screenplays before hitting his current
assignment as an entertainment writer.  His work brings him into contact
with a number of ostensibly colorful characters, including a sexy film
actress (Melanie Griffith), a supermodel (Charlize Theron) and a volatile
teen heartthrob (Leonardo DiCaprio).  Occasionally it even brings him into
contact with his ex-wife Robin (Judy Davis), who leaves a job as an
English teacher to work for her new significant other (Joe Mantegna) in
television.
     It's easy to see the potential in CELEBRITY for exploring the foibles
of fame and the absurdity of a culture that bestows fame for all the wrong
reasons.  It's also easy to see that Allen intends Lee as a John Q.
Star-Struck American who casts off a 16-year marriage and plunges into
writing screenplays because he's convinced he's missing something the
world of movies can bring him.  Unfortunately, Lee is never a remotely
sympathetic character, primarily because Branagh is too preoccupied with
mimicking the Woodman to find anything true in the character.  Judy Davis
is more effective as the emotionally fragile Robin, but her character arc
is only slightly more compelling.  The film's two central characters are
contrivances; worse, they're often annoying contrivances, twisted knots of
self-doubt and self-loathing whose happiness couldn't matter less to us.
     Without any emotional center, CELEBRITY becomes a series of 
stand-alone vignettes about the strange and self-absorbed things famous
people do.  Allen can still manage to pull out a few one-line zingers
(including self-deprecating takes on "pretentious film-makers who shoot
everything in black-and-white"), but they're few and far between in this
film.  Sequences that should build to a great comic payoff, like Lee's
wild night with DiCaprio's bad boy actor, just seem to drag on until it's
time to start the next scene.  For a film-maker who has spent most of his
career obsessing over beautiful people, he can't seem to come up with
anything particularly clever to say about them.
     The lack of invention in CELEBRITY gives you plenty of time to notice
how stale Allen's act has become.  The constant references to
psychotherapy feel twenty years past their prime; his pokes at Catholic
iconography, Nazis, unstable relationships and sexual timidity have liver
spots on them by now.  For every decent gag (a film producer referring to
his next project, "an all-black version of 'Birth of a Nation'"), there
are half a dozen that turned up in a previous Woody Allen film.  
CELEBRITY, a film which should have been wonderfully timely in the daytime
talk show era, shows little cutting-edge satiric bite.  Allen doesn't even
seem to find it ironic that Robin finds her bliss by abandoning teaching
for fame as a television personality.  Perhaps it's even more ironic that
he's showing himself to be one of those famous people so far removed from
ordinary life that he doesn't know what we might find absurd, or that he
himself may now be one of those people famous for all the wrong reasons.

Title
Review for Metro (1997)
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Eddie Murphy, Michael Wincott, Michael Rappaport, Carmen Ejogo.
Screenplay:  Randy Feldman.
Producer:  Roger Birnbaum.
Director:  Thomas Carter.
MPAA Rating:  R (strong profanity, violence, brief nudity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     A cop with a troubled personal life.  A ruthless villain.  A friend
of the cop.  A _dead_ friend of the cop.  A quest for vengeance.  A new
partner.  A romantic interest.  A chase scene.  A chase scene _in San
Francisco_.  A woman in peril.  A confrontation.  An explosion.  The end.
Yawn.  Yawn.  Yawn.  The preceding has been the plot of approximately
twelve thousand and six action films; this one just happens to be called
METRO.  I have learned to expect little from films like METRO, and
consequently I am bored by them more often than I am genuinely
disappointed.  With Eddie Murphy on board, however, you hope for something
extra, some kind of spark.  When a film makes watching Eddie Murphy a
tedious experience, you know it is doing something terribly wrong.
     Murphy stars as Scott Roper, a hostage negotiator for the San
Francisco police department who is exceedingly good at his job.  With his
personal life, he is considerably less successful, facing an unhappy
ex-girlfriend named Veronica (Carmen Ejogo), a gambling problem and a
mountain of debt.  Then his professional life gets a jolt as well when a
friend and colleague (Art Evans) is murdered while investigating suspected
jewel thief Michael Korda (Michael Wincott).  Finding Korda becomes very
personal to Scott, and he joins with new partner Kevin McCall (Michael
Rappaport) to foil Korda during an attempted heist.  But all is not well
even with Korda in jail, as Scott, Veronica and Kevin all continue to face
life-threatening danger.
     METRO (the title, in case you are wondering, means absolutely
nothing) is so badly put together that even the most casual viewer may
notice the miserable pacing and stray plot threads.  In the first place,
Korda's rage over being discovered before he can make his big score is
rendered completely pointless when he proceeds to hit the target anyway
(and, incidentally, to screw it up).  A reference to payoffs in the police
department, followed by a conspicuous decision to keep Scott off the Korda
case and a couple of pointed glances, is dropped abruptly with no 
resolution after about forty-five minutes; even the relationship between
Scott and new partner Kevin is so perfunctory, with Kevin disappearing
entirely after taking a bullet for Scott, that you may yearn for bickering
buddies.  Worst of all is a plot structure which places the main villain
(the always menacing Michael Wincott) behind bars for far too long,
leaving a lot of time to kill with the tedious reconciliation of Scott and
Veronica.
     You can't blame Murphy for being unable to muster any enthusiasm for
the scenes with his bland leading lady, but he should have known better
than to take this role at all.  Scott Roper exists in an uncomfortable
middle ground between the kind of street-wise fast-talker Murphy has built
a career on and an actual three-dimensional character, and Murphy is never
able to reconcile the two.  The script seems to have been doctored for
him, with a gambling problem turned into a bit of character color and his
supposed inability to form relationships turned into a cause for gags
rather than actual conflict, yet there is still too little comedy for
Murphy to work with.  For much of the film, he walks around with an
intense frown, and it is over 90 minutes into METRO before you hear that
trademark laugh for the first time.  Murphy is stranded with too few solid
punch lines, and nearly all of the ones he does have bounce of Ejogo and
fall to the ground limply.
     I suppose I should give director Thomas Carter credit for taking the
obligatory San Francisco car chase (how much do you want to bet on the
likelihood of seeing a car soar over a hill?) and doing a few interesting
things with it.  As vehicles are sent flying and passengers sent sprawling
by a runaway cable car, it is possible at least for a moment to take some
pleasure in a goofy spin on a familiar situation.  Carter does an even
better job by taking that old suspense stand-by -- the medicine cabinet
mirror which will close to reveal a killer standing behind someone -- and
using it to defuse tension not once, but _twice_.  The fact that Carter
was able to demonstrate even that much recognition of cliches, and a
willingness to subvert them, makes his involvement in the rest of the
disaster that is METRO all the more puzzling.  An action film like this
plods so relentlessly and obviously from point A to point B to point C
that you might find yourself shouting out "point C!" while they're still
getting to point B, or getting up with the rest of the audience after the
big explosion which signals that nothing else of any consequence is going
to happen.

Title
Review for Leggenda del pianista sull'oceano, La (1998)
     If I could be sure what THE LEGEND OF 19900 is supposeed to be about
-- or have any sympathy for what I suspect it's about -- I might actually
have enjoyed it. There are certainly some appealing technical elements in
Giuseppe Tornatore's "fable" about a strange character named Nineteen
Hundred (Tim Roth). Born on an ocean liner called the Virginian in the
year that becomes his name and abandoned in a lemon crate, Nineteen
Hundred is raised by one of the ship's coal stokers (Bill Nunn). He also
never leaves the ship, becoming a pianist for the Virginian's jazz band
when his prodigious musical talents emerge. A trumpet player named Max
(Pruitt Taylor Vince) befriends Nineteen Hundred, and becomes convinced
that the piano virtuoso could become a musical legend out in the world. 
Yet Nineteen Hundred continues to struggle with the idea of leaving the
ship, even when he becomes infatuated with a beautiful passenger (Melanie
Thierry).
     For a while, the gilded romanticism of THE LEGEND OF 1900 makes it
easy on the eyes and ears. Cinematographer Lajos Koltai burnishes every
frame with a mysterious light, filling the film with a sense of epic
nostalgia. The music is frequently captivating as well, with Ennio
Morricone's haunting themes building interest in the eccentric Nineteen
Hundred. Music also anchors the film's best sequence, in which jazz legend
Jelly Roll Morton (Clarence Williams III) comes to the Virginian to
challenge Nineteen Hundred to a piano "duel." It's all quite fanciful,
given an undercurrent of consequence by Pruitt Taylor Vince's performance
of thousand-yard stares, flashing back to the friendship that changed
Max's life.
     In retrospect, Vince deserves immense praise for his work, since he
manages to convey the idea that this story has something profound to say.
It's actually quite a preposterous piece of work, as it turns out, and not
because of its protagonist's unique life. Tornatore just doesn't give us
any sense of who Nineteen Hundred is or what he's all about. At times he's
a dreamer who spins elaborate descriptions of places he's never been; at
times he's a hard-nosed competitor who delights in showing up the famous
Jelly Roll and shouting an epithet after him as he leaves the ship. He
isn't so much a character as he is a deliberate enigma -- not becuase he's
complex, but because Tornatore wants to make him an all-purpose archetype.
Tim Roth gamely tries to give Nineteen Hundred a human face, but in this
"fable" he's not really playing a human. He's just a metaphor for
something or other.
     If forced to guess what he's a metaphor for, I'd have to say it ties
in with early themes in the film about immigrants coming to America. 
Nineteen Hundred's fears of leaving the Virginian may represent those who
stayed behind while others dared to leave for the New World -- the idea of
finding his fortune "out there" isn't as compelling as staying where
things are known and comfortable. THE LEGEND OF 1900 might have worked as
a sympathetic, affectionate acknowledgement of those whose fears held them
back. Unfortunately, Tornatore elevates a phobia to sage philosophy,
having Max nod knowingly as Nineteen Hundred gives a lengthy speech about
the dangers of an "infinite" world. There's something vaguely pathetic
about his paean to boundaries; it's even more pathetic if we're expected
to find him somehow noble in his obsessive fear. The theme also appears
far too late in the story, leaving you to wonder about all the preceding
filler that simply confuses the question of what this character is all
about. Eventually, the film implodes under the weight of the importance
placed on Nineteen Hundred's life. It turns out we've been suckered into
caring about the fate of a vague symbol, and maybe a vague symbol for
something foolish and sad.

Title
Review for Simpatico (1999)
SIMPATICO
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Jeff Bridges, Nick Nolte, Sharon Stone, Albert Finney,
Catherine Keener, Shawn Hatosy, Kimberly Williams, Liam Waite.
Screenplay:  Matthew Warchus and David Nicholls, based on the play by Sam
Shepard.
Producers:  Dan Lupovitz, Timm Oberwelland and Jean-Francois Fonlupt.
Director:  Matthew Warchus.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  106 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Sometimes, a play makes for a good film. Sometimes it doesn't. It's
tough to put a finger on what can make a stage-to-screen translation fall
flat, but I know it when I see it. Sometimes it feels as though a
filmmaker doesn't know how to make a set piece feel like a film; other
times the director seems to be doing little more than turning the film
over to the actors reciting their lines. A play turned into a film can
become AMADEUS, it's true. It can also become OLEANNA.
     SIMPATICO doesn't fail because director Matthew Warchus can't give
Sam Shepard's play a distinctly cinematic life (he does) or that he lets
the actors run roughshod over the production (he does that too, but it's
not the fatal flaw). In this case, the play itself is the thing. Jeff
Bridges stars as a successful horse breeder named Lyle Carter who is
preparing for his latest sale, a Triple Crown-winning stallion named
Simpatico. Unfortunately, Carter has a dark past that's about to come back
to haunt him in the form of old pal Vinnie Webb (Nick Nolte). Vinnie
claims to be in legal trouble in California, trouble that could also make
things uncomfortable for Carter. As the lives of the two men intertwine
again, we learn in flashback of a scheme that gained the young Carter
(Liam Waite), Vinnie (Shawn Hatosy) and Vinnie's girlfriend Rosie
(Kimberly Williams) a huge bankroll. It was also a scheme with plenty of
repercussions into the present, including changing the life of a one-time
racing commissioner named Simms (Albert Finney).
     Structurally, SIMPATICO is about as sound a script as they come. 
Revelations about the characters' pasts appear ever-so-gradually, each one
adding a shade of significance to events that have gone before. As a tale
of guilt and coming to terms with one's mistakes, it's intriguing enough
consistently enough that you'll want to keep paying attention. It even
offers some genuinely cinematic pleasures, from John Toll's eclectic
cinematography to Stewart Copeland's jangly soundtrack. Far from the
too-typical 1990s script of 1-2-3 plot development, SIMPATICO's story
clicks along with unique rhythms.
     Those rhythms just happen to be the rhythms of a play. No matter what
is happening on screen in SIMPATICO, it never for a moment feels like the
story belongs on film. The characters speak to each other in the clipped
tones of a dialogue-dependent medium, full of loaded pauses and oblique
references that should come with big glowing asterisks noting "Pay
attention, this will be important later." Sub-plots and character
developments are so fraught with significance -- Carter and Vinnie
slipping casually into one another's lives; a horse that's not what he
appears to be -- you can see the author nodding to himself at the
cleverness of it all. Even the actors generally look like they're playing
to the rafters, with Nick Nolte all a-growl as the seedy Vinnie and Albert
Finney telegraphing his character's unambiguous ambiguity (only Catherine
Keener, as a vaguely simple-minded woman unwitting involved in the story,
shows a welcome subtlety). By the time Sharon Stone blows into the film
from some community theater Tennessee Williams production to play Carter's
wife, it seems almost impossible that all this is transpiring on a movie
screen instead of live and in person.
     It should go without saying that striving for thematic depth and
complexity is not exclusive to the live theater, nor is a labyrinthine
plot unworkable on screen. There's simply a quality to SIMPATICO that
makes it feel grossly artificial as a film experience. It's easy to watch
the film and understand what would make this story a slick, atmospheric
character study as a play. As a film, however, it's inert, moving along so
deliberately you may begin to feel that you're watching a staged reading
committed to film. I don't know if someone could take Shepard's play and
make it a workable film, but I know this one isn't it. SIMPATICO may make
you want to go out and see it as a stage production ... unless, by the
conclusion, you feel that you already have.

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
     That irritating sound you'll be hearing for the first 20 minutes of
HANGING UP -- more or less non-stop-- is the ringing of phones. They ring
on walls, in cars, in purses and on fax lines. They ring for calls from
business associates and family members. Then they ring again on call
waiting. In the context of the film, you could say the ringing phones
represent the distractions that keep us from focusing on what really
matters. Or maybe they stand for the way we can talk and talk and talk
without ever really communicating. And in the context of the film, either
message would be painfully ironic. HANGING UP is an extruciatingly awkward
piece of film storytelling -- a movie full of distractions from what
really matters, a movie that talks and talks and talks without ever really
communicating.
     From the film's marketing campaign, you'd probably expect HANGING UP
to be the story of the semi-dysfunctional Mozell family: aging and ailing
former Hollywood screenwriter Lou (Walter Matthau) and his daughters
Georgia (Diane Keaton), Evie (Meg Ryan) and Maddy (Lisa Kudrow). In fact,
it's essentially the story of Evie, a woman juggling responsibility for
her business, her own family and the ever-more-dependent Lou. While
Georgia publishes a glossy women's magazine in New York and Maddy works
as a soap opera actress, Evie is left with the growing burden of an
alcoholic father she has cared for since her mother left.
     The bulk of the film finds Evie becoming ever more flustered as she
prepares a women's business conference for her event planning company,
worries that Lou is going to die at any moment, frets over whether her
latest fender-bender can be settled without going through her insurance
and tries to get some support from Maddy and Georgia. It's all about Evie,
and Ryan does her perky, weepy best trying to make Evie's plight matter. 
Too bad HANGING UP is such a muddle of shifting tones and undeveloped
relationships that Ryan's manic performance reeks less of frustration over
her life than desperation over the script. Every scene feels aborted in
mid-thought, leaving little but the spectre of Matthau trying to give some
hammy charm to a character that's alternately eccentric-annoying and
creepy-annoying.
     Eventually, perhaps out of sheer boredom with Evie's story, HANGING
UP turns to the interaction between the three sisters once they're finally
brought together by Lou's most recent turn for the worse. By that time
it's far too late to make that interaction convincing or endearing, since
both Keaton and Kudrow are playing gross caricatures of self-absorption.
Georgia and Maddy exist basically as props for Evie's self-realization,
appearing only when Evie needs to become aware that she's the only one
working at preserving family relationships. It's inevitable, then, that
every moment between the sisters feels false, every grating attempt at
bickering, bittersweet reconciliation or playful kitchen food-fighting
serving as a reminder that you were expecting a movie about the ties that 
bind. What you get instead is a movie about people who all signed up to
be in the same movie.
     There are so many things wrong with HANGING UP -- the stilted script
by Delia and Nora Ephron, the wretched editing, Matthau's depressing
shtick -- that it seems absurd to pick out one moment of epic
miscalculation. Nevertheless, that dubious distinction goes to a flashback
scene between Evie and her estranged mother (Cloris Leachman). Evie tracks
her mother down several years after she has left the family, and finds a
less than enthusiastic welcome. It's a pivotal moment, one that will
explain any number of issues in Evie's life ... and it's dispatched in a
matter of seconds, with Leachman delivering about a half-dozen lines of
dialogue. That sort of incomplete, abrupt storytelling defines HANGING UP,
a film that becomes such a fragmented collection of life moments that it's
virtually impossible for the whole thing not to give you a headache. That
irritating sound you'll be hearing after the phones finally stop ringing
in HANGING UP is the dissonant buzz of movie that never has a point. 

Title
Review for Picture Perfect (1997)
PICTURE PERFECT
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Jennifer Aniston, Jay Mohr, Kevin Bacon, Olympia Dukakis,
Illeana Douglas, Kevin Dunn.
Screenplay:  Arleen Sorkin & Paul Slansky and Glenn Gordon Caron.
Producer:  Erwin Stoff.
Director:  Glenn Gordon Caron.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     [Overheard in the rec room at the Old Chestnuts Rest Home for
Over-Worked Film Premises in Boca Raton, Florida:]
     MISMATCHED BUDDY ACTION COMEDY:  Hey, D. H., I hear we may be getting
a new arrival soon.
     DIE HARD-IN-A-CONFINED-SPACE THRILLER:  I don't know, Buddy, it feels
pretty cramped around here as it is.
     BUDDY:  Well, this one definitely needs a break.  The name is
Romantic Comedy Where a Couple Pretends to Be Together for an Ulterior
Motive, or some such.
     BUDDY:  Yeah, and she's been a busy little thing.  CAN'T BUY ME LOVE,
GREEN CARD, PRETTY WOMAN, HOUSESITTER...why, she even showed up in a cameo
already this summer, in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING.  The latest is called
PICTURE PERFECT, starring that darling little Jennifer Aniston from
"Friends."
     BUDDY:  She plays an unmarried advertising executive named Kate
Mosley who is feeling pressure from every direction to settle down.  Her
mother (Olympia Dukakis) nags her, her boss (Kevin Dunn) suggests that
only "stable" employees will get the choice assignments, and the office
Lothario (Kevin Bacon), who gets Kate all hot and bothered, is only
interested in girls who are unavailable.
     BUDDY:  You guessed it, D. H.  Enter Nick (Jay Mohr), a nice young
fellow with whom Kate had a picture taken at a wedding.  Everyone is led
to believe that Nick is Kate's long-distance fiance, which works out fine
until Nick becomes a minor celebrity and everyone wants to meet him.  So
Kate finds Nick and asks him to play the part.  And predicaments ensue.
     D. H.:  Predicaments...ha!  Running through broken glass in bare feet
from armed terrorists, now _that's_ a predicament.
     BUDDY:  Yes, well...anyway, Miss Aniston is fetching enough in the
lead role, with that kind of frazzled charm Sandra Bullock turned into
stardom.  The script by Arleen Sorkin, Paul Slansky and Glenn Gordon Caron
has a few clever moments, and Caron's direction is well-paced.  What
really makes it worth a look is an engaging, low-key performance by Jay
Mohr as Nick.  It's uncommon to find an actor who can make earnestness
interesting, or who can make an audience root for him by sheer force of
his good nature, despite an under-written role.  And we know that's not
the only angle Mohr can work, since he did a fine job of playing a
completely slime in JERRY MAGUIRE.
     BUDDY:  The problem, as we both know, is that a script has to be
better than that to keep audineces watching when you know exactly how the
story is going to end.  It's only a matter of time before the two phony
lovers figure out they should be real lovers, and someone learns an
Important Lesson along the way.  Actually, everyone in PICTURE PERFECT
learns an Important Lesson along the way, undergoing an 11th hour
conversion so that there isn't a single moderately unlikeable character
remaining by the closing credits.  Only Mohr seems like a genuinely decent
person; everyone else reads the lines of a genuinely decent person because
the formula demands it.
     GRITTY, PROFANE CRIME CAPER (from the corner):  Hey, will you two
shut the *&%$ up before I blow you the *&%$ away?
     BUDDY:  Sorry.  Anyway, it's a cute enough little picture, but it
strains that thin premise to its limits.  She could certainly stand a few
months here.
     BUDDY:  You see, even though we seem completely different, I knew we
had something in common all along.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
ANY GIVEN SUNDAY
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Al Pacino, Cameron Diaz, Jamie Foxx, Dennis Quaid, LL Cool J,
James Woods, Matthew Modine, Lawrence Taylor, Jim Brown, Aaron Eckhart.
Screenplay:  John Logan and Oliver Stone.
Producers:  Lauren Shuler Donner, Clayton Townsend and Dan Halsted.
Director:  Oliver Stone.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, nudity, drug use, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  168 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In ANY GIVEN SUNDAY, Oliver Stone may have found the ideal subject
for his unique brand of cinematic storytelling. Following the ups and
downs of a fictional professional football team (the Miami Sharks) in a
fictional professional football league (the AFFA), Stone dives into the
trenches during the game sequences. Players taunt and strut as they try to
win the game psychologically; an inexperienced quarterback sees the field
only as a blur of colors, and hears only a blur of cacophanous sound.
Coaches send in the X's and O's, but it's the kinetic fury of what goes on
in the huddle and at the line of scrimmage that comes alive. Meet Oliver
Stone, practitioner of smash-mouth film-making.
     If ANY GIVEN SUNDAY had stayed on the field, focused on the intensity
of games, it might have been a classic sports movie. Stone, however, has
bigger issues on his mind -- as he inevitably, agonizingly always seems
to. The film follows several individuals in the Sharks organization as
they cope with the changing nature of the game. Long-time coach Tony
D'Amato (Al Pacino) is hearing the jeers that his conservative approach is
old news. New team owner Christina Pagniacci (Cameron Diaz) is trying to
be taken seriously, and not just as the daughter of the late former
owner. Veteran quarterback "Cap" Rooney (Dennis Quaid) is struggling with
whether his battered body can stand up to more punishment after a back
injury. And Cap's replacement, third-stringer Willie Beamen (Jamie
Foxx) is finding his sudden success intoxicating, as well as poisonous to
his relationships with teammates and his girlfriend (Lela Rochon).
     Stone wants to cover all of this and more, to create as comprehensive
a picture of modern professional football as he can cram into nearly three
hours. He wants to address the rise of sports media as an infotaintment
monster (personified by John C. McGinley as Jack Rose, an abrasive
broadcaster more than faintly similar to Jim Rome). He wants to expose the
yes-men and oh-yes-women who inflate athletes' egos so they can ride the
gravy train. And he wants to juxtapose the fighting spirit of the players
with the owners who use them and throw them away. He wants to do all this
despite the fact that he has too much ground to cover to give any of his
themes more than a superficial gloss. Stone stages confrontations without
context, counting on the shock value of a player's wife belting her 
husband in the fact to make up for its absence of meaning. It's not enough
in 1999 to intone breathlessly that pro sports is corrupted and 
corrupting. You must be prepared to tell a human story that feels human.
     Oliver Stone, however, is all about intoning breathlessly these days. 
He's a director who just can't help underlining everything he puts on
screen so the themes are tattooed on our foreheads. When a character
refers to Vince Lombardi and Johnny Unitas, Stone cuts away to shots of
Vince Lombardi and Johnny Unitas. When someone describes football players
as gladiators, a T.V. will be showing BEN-HUR in the background. When
characters are feuding, there are shots of gathering storm clouds. Any
time ANY GIVEN SUNDAY is focused on the lives of its characters off the
field, you keep hoping for an opportunity to discover something real about
them. Stone, unfortunately, keeps steamrolling forward with split-second
edits and changes in film stock, never offering a viewer the chance to
contemplate what the story is about. Stone's message: It's about exactly
what I'm gonna tell you it's about, and I'm gonna tell you over and over
and over again.
     All this is true, yet there are still those masterful game sequences. 
For Stone, the '90s have been all about experimentations in multimedia
assault. ANY GIVEN SUNDAY takes a game that feels almost languid in its
pacing on television and shows us the cranked-up energy of all the
participants. Coaches make frantic sideline adjustments, and players look
for an opponent's slightest giveaway of his intentions. Stone even does a
brilliant job of splicing in the events in the owner's box, where
oblivious partying and business talk shut the game out almost entirely.
>From the you-are-there field level camera work to the twists on
predictable sports movie heroics, Stone plants you inside the game. And
that's the only time he shows much interest in getting inside anything.
ANY GIVEN SUNDAY is Stone's grandiose attempt to make football a metaphor
for all of human existence, when he could have settled for a perfectly
splendid film about football as a metaphor for football.

Title
Review for Sixth Man, The (1997)
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Marlon Wayans, Kadeem Hardison, David Paymer, Michael Michele.
Screenplay:  Christopher Reed and Cynthia Carle.
Producer:  David Hoberman.
Director:  Randall Miller.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, mild sexual content)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I wasn't sure I would be able to enjoy THE 6TH MAN as a wacky comedy,
given the uncomfortable familiarity of the plot.  In 1990, All-American
forward Hank Gathers of Loyola Marymount University died of a congenital
heart ailment in the middle of one of his team's final regular season
games, a tragedy which took on even more mythic proportions when his
under-manned team went on an improbable run through the NCAA championship
tournament before losing to eventual champion Nevada-Las Vegas.  Gathers'
death affected me as profoundly as any celebrity tragedy ever has, and I
cringed at the idea of that event being turned into a source of
supernatural hijinks.  Perhaps that's why I was so pleasantly surprised to
discover how much heart THE 6TH MAN turned out to have.  Though slapstick
is definitely part of the mix, there is a genuinely affecting human story
at the core of this film which outweighs its occasional clumsiness.
     THE 6TH MAN is the story of two brothers playing for the University
of Washington Huskies basketball team:  Antoine Tyler (Kadeem Hardison),
the team's senior leader and superstar, and Kenny Tyler (Marlon Wayans), a
junior who has lived his life in Antoine's shadow.  The Huskies are having
one of their best seasons in years, contending for the Pac-10
championship, when tragedy strikes.  In the middle of a key game, Antoine
suffers a heart attack and dies, leaving the team heart-broken and
disoriented.  No one is more heart-broken than Kenny, who asks his departed
brother for help when he struggles with the new leadership role asked of
him.  Much to his astonishment, he gets that help:  Antoine appears as a
ghost visible only to Kenny, offering to help the Kenny and the rest of
the team.  Thus begins a surge for the NCAA tournament when strange breaks
seem to be going the Huskies' way, drawing the attention of sports writer
R. C. St. John (Michael Michele).
     THE 6TH MAN is a fantasy of course, but close followers of Pac-10
basketball will appreciate that it's not just the presence of ghostly
activity which makes the film fantastic.  Not only are Washington and
Stanford in this film's Final Four, but dismissed head coaches Todd
Bozeman of California and Jim Harrick of UCLA are still sitting on their
respective teams' benches in game footage; if that doesn't qualify as
fantasy, I'm not sure what does.  THE 6TH MAN is certainly targeted at
college basketball fans given its release during Final Four weekend, but
the on-court action is often awkwardly photographed with too many
close-ups and choppy editing.  For a film about college basketball, THE
6TH MAN generally doesn't try very hard to re-create the fan excitement or
game situations of the sport.
     Of course, THE 6TH MAN isn't a documentary.  It's a comedy, and
occasionally it's a very funny one.  Marlon Wayans turns in an extremely
entertaining and energetic physical performance as Kenny, who has to do a
lot of solo acting as though he is being hassled by his invisible older
brother -- hugs, head-locks, wrestling matches and other practical jokes.
It's fun, if somewhat predictable stuff, mostly because Wayans is able to
sell it with enthusiasm.  He gets a bit of supporting help from Hardison
and from David Paymer (as the Huskies' coach), but with a cast composed
largely of former college basketball players (including Lorenzo Orr and
Travis Ford), Wayans has to carry the most of the humorous moments on his
shoulders.
     Fortunately, THE 6TH MAN is actually more enjoyable when it's not a
comedy.  Some of the character material is unnecessary -- notably the
attempt at a romantic relationship between Kenny and R. C. (yes, Michael
Michele is a woman) -- but the sibling story-line is extremely effective.
A short flashback opening shows Antoine and Kenny as kids on their
father's youth league team, setting up a relationship where Kenny always
depends on the more talented Antoine to hit the winning shot or make the
spectacular play.  When Kenny calls on Antoine for help, he believes he
doesn't have it in him to be a star, and having his ghostly brother around
gives him an excuse not to try.  It is only when Antoine begins to go a
bit too far on the court that Kenny decides to make an identity for
himself apart from being Antoine's brother.  One of the nicer touches in
THE 6TH MAN is that Antoine isn't made into an angel on the hardwood; he's
the same mildly obnoxious ball-hog in death that he was in life, a big
brother who thinks he always knows best.  The interaction between the two
brothers, squabbles and all, is what makes THE 6TH MAN more than the
formulaic Disney silliness you might expect.  In spite of some erratic
pacing and uneven comedy, THE 6TH MAN has the emotional content to give a
tragedy the weight it deserves, as well as the entertainment it needs.

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
TARZAN (1999)
(Disney)
Voices:  Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Rosie O'Donnell, Brian
Blessed, Nigel Hawthorne, Lance Henriksen, Wayne Knight, Alex D. Linz.
Screenplay:  Tab Murphy and Bob Tzudiker & Noni White, based on the novel
_Tarzan of the Apes_ by Edgar Rice Burroughs.
Producer:  Bonnie Arnold.
Directors:  Kevin Lima and Chris Buck.
MPAA Rating:  G (adult themes)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The opening ten minutes of Disney's TARZAN represent as gripping and
mature an example of animated film-making as I've ever seen.  Underscored
by the urgent rhythms of the Phil Collins song "Two Worlds," the sequence
depicts two families in Africa: a human couple and their infant son trying
to rebuild their lives after being shipwrecked, and a pair of gorillas
with their own new baby before a leopard attack takes the young ape's
life.  Shortly thereafter, the grieving gorilla mother Kala discovers the
orphaned human baby -- its parents also slain by the leopard -- alone in
the wreckage of their shelter.  Only after another close call with the
leopard can Kala (voiced by Glenn Close) bring the baby boy into the
gorilla community, much to the dismay of her mate Kerchak (Lance
Henriksen).
     That dark, dazzling prologue works not only on its own dramatic
terms, but also at shifting expectations -- perhaps TARZAN could stand on
its own as more than re-cycled motifs from THE JUNGLE BOOK and THE LION
KING.  The story eventually presents the adult Tarzan (Tony Goldwyn) with
a Simba vs. Mowgli dilemma.  After spending his entire life trying to
convince Kerchak that he belongs with the gorillas, Tarzan encounters
other humans for the first time:  slightly dotty ape researcher Professor
Porter (Nigel Hawthorne); Clayton (Brian Blessed), Porter's jungle guide
with an ulterior motive; and, of course, Porter's feisty daughter Jane
(Minnie Driver).  When romance blooms between Tarzan and Jane, the ape man
faces a choice between returning to the society of humans and staying as
defender of his ape family.
     TARZAN continues Disney's impressive streak in recent years of
incorporating more serious themes into its animated features.  There are
moments when it's easy to forget you're watching a film marketed at kids,
from the effective interpersonal moments (energized by Driver's charming
vocal performance) to the twist on the obligatory musical numbers that
turns most of them into transitional bridges.  The animation itself feels
more grown-up, even when the flashy "Deep Canvas" technology turns a trek
through the trees into a ready-made theme park ride.  Where its animated
features are concerned -- and its live-action kid flicks, notoriously, are
not -- it's clear Disney genuinely cares about creating complete, resonant
stories.
     It's also clear that Disney cares plenty about making sure the cash
cow isn't cut just for the prime rib audience.  There are Kids' Club
burgers to be sold as well, which means comic relief that's a relief only
when it goes away.  Sucking up valuable screen time are two pals for
Tarzan, his spirited cousin Terk (Rosie O'Donnell) and nervous elephant
Tantor (Wayne Knight).  Both characters, plush-toy cute though they may
be, feel like tacked-on creations contributing a slapstick silliness the
story just doesn't need; the pointless show-stopper "Trashin' the Camp" in
particular  seems to belong in another film entierly.  Even the nasty
Clayton is out of place, adding an external conflict only because
tradition has dictated it.  There's nothing wrong with Disney making
purely amusing kiddie fare like HERCULES and ALADDIN.  There's also
nothing wrong with letting the deeper stories be deep.
     The issue isn't whether TARZAN should have been plodding and somber,
because it's clear that the core narrative could provide all the
entertainment a viewer of any age could want.  There's plenty of humor in
the interactions between Tarzan and Jane, and plenty of adventure in
Tarzan's various encounters with jungle beasts.  TARZAN is a solid film,
stronger in its basic filmmaking elements than most wide-release films,
but it might have been a spectacular one instead.  Disney will never go
broke relying on the successful Disney animated formula, and they'll
continue to turn out largely enjoyable family films.  They'll also have
trouble breaking free to make a stirring, utterly unique animated film,
one that fulfills the potential of TARZAN's magnificent first ten minutes.

Title
Review for Angie (1994)
     There is a sub-genre of film drama, only recently identified,
which has come to be known as the "chick movie."  The term has at times
been used to define any film which women tend to like more than men
(SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE comes to mind), but in its strictest sense I
define a "chick film" as one which deals with relationships men could
only attempt to comprehend:  mother-daughter, female friendships, and
birth mother-child.  ANGIE definitely falls within this framework.
It's got mothers, daughters, friends, childbirth and a dose of
heartbreak to guarantee maximum lacrimal viscosity, and all these
things may affect the target audience.  I found myself impressed by
Geena Davis' performance, but bothered by the obvious and excessive
manipulation which never really pays off, and by some unfortunate mixed
messages.
     Davis plays the title character, Bensonhurst, Brooklyn resident
Angie Scacciapensieri.  Approaching thirty, Angie has spent her whole
life in the same neighborhood with the same best friend, Tina (Aida
Turturro), and the same boyfriend, Vinnie (James Gandolfini).  Then one
day, something does change in Angie's life: she's pregnant.  As
everyone assumes she and Vinnie will be getting married, Angie begins
to think about all the experiences she's been missing.  She begins a
relationship with flighty attorney Noel (Stephen Rea), and tries to
expand her horizons.  But as the baby arrives, Angie realizes that
ultimately she must confront the memory of the mother who deserted her
at the age of three to get her life straight.
     Geena Davis' performance as Angie is easily the best thing about
ANGIE, which is fine because it's also the most important thing.  Most
of Davis' roles to date have emphasized her comic talents, but ANGIE
confirms what THELMA & LOUISE suggested:  that Davis is a very gifted
all around actor.  She gets to work with the whole range of emotions,
big and small, bright and dark, and she handles all of them with grace
and sparkle.  Stephen Rea is also extremely slick and charming as Noel,
and the scenes between Davis and Rea provide many of ANGIE's
highlights.  Through its first hour, ANGIE is an interesting and
appealing character drama with real promise.
     The second half of Todd Graff's script suffers from two major
problems.  The first is that it seriously overloads on emotional high
points.  There were at least four separate points at which I thought
that ANGIE had reached its climax, and what made that decision the most
frustrating is that none of them quite provided the catharsis that
ANGIE needed but always just missed.  I got the feeling that Hollywood
Pictures had tested several endings, found that the audiences responded
to each one, and then decided to keep them all.  Consequently, ANGIE
loses its narrative momentum two thirds of the way through and coasts
to the finish on its tear-jerking.
     The second, and perhaps more distracting, problem is a rather
personal distaste for what I perceived as a sell-out in the change in
Angie's perspective which occurs at the end of the film.  ANGIE begins
as a story about a woman who feels trapped by her life trying to change
it for the better through new experiences.  When some of these new
experiences don't turn out well, and Angie's life takes some
disappointing turns, she seems to take all the wrong lessons away from
those experiences.  A speech Angie makes to her baby surprised me by
suggesting that Angie believed her problem was thinking too much about
herself, when I felt she was thinking about herself for the first time
in her life.  The fits and starts in the film's many climaxes left me
wondering what it was that I was supposed to have learned from Angie's
story.
     It is a given that a film like ANGIE pulls emotional strings, and
that in itself is not a failing.  Manipulating our emotions is what
films are supposed to do; the best ones just manage to do it so
skillfully that we don't notice or don't care.  ANGIE doesn't achieve
that deft middle ground.  It crosses its signals, piles on the pathos,
and leaves its star to carry most of its emotional baggage.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Kevin Costner, Robin Wright Penn, Paul Newman, Illeana Douglas.
Screenplay:  Gerald DiPego, based on the novel by Nicholas Sparks.
Producers:  Denise Di Novi, Jim Wilson and Kevin Costner.
Director:  Luis Mandoki.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Twenty-five years ago, Paul Newman would have played Garret Blake,
the grieving, laconic hero of Nicholas Sparks' best-selling novel MESSAGE
IN A BOTTLE.  He would have brought the ideal combination of elements to
the role of a shipbuilder whose sea-borne messages to his dead wife are
found by Chicago newspaper researcher Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright Penn),
compelling her to seek out the author of the sensitive missives.  You can
imagine Newman both as a man's man -- a loner dedicated to his craft --
and a ladies' man -- deeply sensitive when touched by the love of a good
woman.  That's the kind of screen presence you need when you're dealing
with one of these mythically appealing romances like THE BRIDGES OF
MADISON COUNTY or THE HORSE WHISPERER.  You need a Clint Eastwood, or a
Robert Redford...or a Paul Newman.
     In 1998, you get Paul Newman playing Garret's father Dodge, and as
Garret you get...Kevin Costner.  Costner has always been at his best in
roles where her could be easygoing (SILVERADO, BULL DURHAM, TIN CUP), 
while his attempts at playing icons (THE UNTOUCHABLES, WATERWORLD, THE
POSTMAN) could be most charitably described as uneven.  Yet here he is in
MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE, playing the emotionally unavailable but romantically
irresistable Garret.  He's the kind of guy who loves too deeply, whose
gestures of self-sacrifice are the stuff of song and story.  It's Costner
once again as the paradigm, the icon, and I for one didn't believe him for
a second.
     To be fair, Costner isn't the only thing wrong with MESSAGE IN A
BOTTLE.  Director Luis Mandoki's adaptation is a technically glorious
piece of work -- beautifully photographed by Caleb Deschanel, sweepingly
scored by Gabriel Yared -- but it's one heck of a long sit, clocking in at
a soggy two hours and fifteen minutes.  The storyline parallels Theresa's
emergence from emotional isolation after a difficult divorce with Garret's
difficulties letting go of his wife, and does so in fetishistic detail.
There's a subplot involving Garret's conflict with his embittered in-laws,
and the occasional tete-a-tete between Dodge and Garret or between Dodge
and Theresa, all building with a gruelling lack of tension to one big
cathartic payoff.  You may leave the theater with your hanky wet, but it
could be from the drool that collects while you nod off to sleep just as
easily as from tears.
     Lost at sea along the way are extremely effective performances by
Robin Wright Penn and Paul Newman.  Wright Penn is an actress we don't see
very much, which allows her still to be an actress in a role like this
rather than a movie star.  Her conflicted pursuit of Garret -- a man whose
letters should have told her from the start isn't ready to love anyone
else -- is convincing in context; her moments of insecurity and
disappointment are genuinely affecting.  Newman, meanwhile, gets to be
gruff in a way that usually turns actors into hams, but turns this veteran
into a breath of fresh air.  He's so effortlessly charming, it's easy to
forget the Harlequin sensibility at the heart of MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE and
begin enjoying it as human relationship drama.
     Costner, too, can be effortlessly charming, but not here.  His
interpretation of the role is so focused on Garret's internalized mourning
that in the moments when he's supposed to be letting go with Theresa, he
looks like a man trying to act like a grieving man trying to be
effortlessly charming.  If that reads awkwardly, it plays even more
awkwardly, with Costner straining for Meaning and Significance in every
scene while his leading lady acts circles around him.  MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE
undoubtedly will have its sob appeal, just as the novel did.  Unlike the
film adaptations of THE BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY and THE HORSE WHISPERER,
that's the main thing this one has going for it.  It's too bad it couldn't
have been made twenty-five years ago, when Paul Newman hadn't yet handed
over the iconic roles to actors ill-suited to handling them.

Title
Review for Remains of the Day, The (1993)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Emma Thompson, James Fox, Christopher Reeve.
Screenplay:  Ruth Prawer Jhabvala.
Director:  James Ivory.
     I was not among those who considered HOWARDS END one of the top
ten films of 1992.  As beautiful and well-acted as it was, I felt it
offered a fragmented and somewhat unsatisfying treatment of E. M.
Forster's novel.  Therefore I did not approach THE REMAINS OF THE DAY,
the new film from the Merchant/Ivory production stable, as a blessing
dropped directly from heaven.  It appears I should have.  THE REMAINS
OF THE DAY will draw much the same audience as HOWARDS END and THE AGE
OF INNOCENCE, but it corrects nearly every flaw in each of those films,
focusing on one character played to near perfection by Anthony
Hopkins.
     Hopkins stars as Mr. Stevens, the head butler of Darlington Hall,
who reflects in flashback on a few pivotal years in his service to Lord
Darlington (James Fox).  In 1935, Stevens welcomes a new housekeeper,
Miss Kenton (Emma Thompson) as Darlington prepares to welcome some
important guests.  These guests include several English gentlemen,
representatives from Germany and France, and an outspoken American
congressman (Christopher Reeve), all gathered to discuss the rearming
of Germany.  All this, however, is irrelevant to Stevens, whose entire
life is focused on being the best possible servant.  His focus is so
complete that he is unaware of the growing affections of Miss Kenton,
and unable to express his own emotions.  Stevens' relfection,
interspersed through the flashbacks, becomes an attempt to justify his
life as loyal servant to a man of sometimes questionable character.
     THE REMAINS OF THE DAY is an exceptional adaptation of the
award-winning novel by Kazuo Ishiguro.  Rather than inflate the romance
between Stevens and Miss Kenton out of proportion, screenwriter Ruth
Prawer Jhabvala wisely keeps the focus on Stevens' universe as a
butler.  He is a character committed to a fault to his ideals of
servanthood, expressed in one pithy line:  "I don't believe a man can
conisder himself fully content until he has done all he can to be of
service to his employer."  So deeply does Stevens' belief in the innate
superiority of his social betters run that he blinds himself completely
to Lord Darlington's politics and his behavior towards a pair of Jewish
maids.  There is also a crucial relationship between Stevens and his
elderly father, himself a veteran butler whom Stevens respects so
devoutly that he ignores signs that the elder Stevens is losing his
faculties.  It is only because these relationships with Darlington and
his father are so fully developed that the relationship between Stevens
and Miss Kenton can be convincingly poignant.
     It also doesn't hurt that Anthony Hopkins turns in the single best
male performance of the year as Stevens.  His career has experienced an
astonishing surge in the last three years, and REMAINS shows why.  It
is not so much his ability to deliver a line which raises him above the
pack, although he is brilliant there as well; rather, it is his precise
command of shrugs, turns of the head and almost imperceptible eye
movements that is incomparable.  The scenes where he is in command,
such as a lecture to Miss Kenton for referring to his father by his
first name, are fine.  Those where he is uneasy are masterful.  In one
such scene, he attempts to fulfill Lord Darlington's request that he
explain the facts of life to his newly engaged godson.  It's
wonderfully funny because Stevens is trying so desperately to maintain
his dignity in an inherently undignified situation.  This is one of the
finest physical performances in many years, beginning with one of the
first moments he appears on screen, walking with stooped shoulders
through an empty parlor.
     The technical end of THE REMAINS OF THE DAY is, as expected,
glorious as well.  Director James Ivory creates some marvelous shots,
many framed through windows to lend a sense of voyeurism.  The
photography is sharp, capturing the vastness of Darlington Hall
expertly, and a beautiful score by Richard Robbins lends the perfect
air of gentility.  THE REMAINS OF THE DAY is just as visually striking
as HOWARDS END, and the performances are just as solid.  What gives
REMAINS an edge over its much-lauded cousin is a more focused narrative
which is riveting where HOWARDS END wandered.  The world of Stevens the
butler is one well worth visiting for a thoroughly magnificent film
experience.

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Kurt Russell, J. T. Walsh, Kathleen Quinlan, M. C. Gainey.
Screenplay:  Sam Montgomery and Jonathan Mostow.
Producers:  Martha DeLaurentiis and Dino DeLaurentiis.
Director:  Jonathan Mostow.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Jonathan Mostow is a thief.  As it turns out, he also happens to be
a very talented thief.  Hollywood is obsessed with The Idea as the
defining element of a film, with the pitch meeting as the defining moment
in the creative process.  Even critics can fall into the same trap of
equating The Idea with the complete film.  When a film with a familiar
premise appears, you're likely to see dismissive reviews which perpetuate
the notion that the real culprit is lack of originality, rather than lack
of craft.  Of course, by those standards William Shakespeare would be the
most reviled plagiarist of all time -- how dare he steal his plots from
antiquity, from English history, from other writers?.  A great idea works,
but it can work more than once.  It's the mark of a talented artist when
he can take that recognizable idea and make it something original and
exciting.
     Take BREAKDOWN, for instance. The Idea is straight out of THE
VANISHING:  Jeff Taylor (Kurt Russell) and his wife Amy (Kathleen Quinlan)
are driving from Boston to San Diego when their car breaks down in the
middle of the Arizona desert.  An amiable truck driver named Red (J. T.
Walsh) stops to offer help, and Amy goes with him to call for a tow truck
while Jeff stays with the car.  Then Jeff notices that a couple of wires
under the hood are disconnected, and he drives the now-functioning car to
the diner where Amy and Red were supposed to make their call.  No one
there has seen either Amy or Red, however, and Jeff begins to fear foul
play.  A search which begins with fear then becomes compounded with
confusion and frustration as people turn out not to be what they seem, and
as Amy's disappearance begins to look like part of a more sinister
conspiracy.
     Writer/director Jonathan Mostow doesn't restrict his "borrowing" 
to THE VANISHING.  The malevolent trucker and desert landscapes owe a debt
to Steven Spielberg's DUEL, and there is a recognizably Hitchockian
quality to Russell's ordinary guy in extraordinary circumstances.  All of
this might have left me shaking my head, if BREAKDOWN hadn't been so good
at leaving me shaking all over.  BREAKDOWN is as viscerally effective
as any thriller Hollywood has turned out in the last few years, because
Mostow understands what works.  The hero is a slightly paunchy Everyman,
smart and resourceful enough for us to believe he has a chance at 
survival, and Kurt Russell does a nice job keeping the anger and
determination from becoming one-note.  The situation is just plausible and
unnerving enough to get under your skin, with a creeping sense of paranoia
which could affect the audience as much as it affects Jeff.  Mostow also
has a pair of wonderfully sadistic  villains in J. T. Walsh and M. C.
Gainey (clearly men who go by their initials have _something_ to hide).
Walsh in particular has the chilling ability to make a word into a weapon,
and to make a stare as brutal as any of the pistol-whippings which
permeate BREAKDOWN.
     Over and above all that, Mostow demonstrates a keen sense for how to
construct a gripping, efficient thriller.  The opening half hour is a
subtle rumble of mounting dread, which in turn becomes a roller-coaster
series of set pieces, which in turn becomes an all-stops-pulled finale,
all in the course of 95 minutes.  BREAKDOWN is most definitely intended as
a crowd-pleaser, peppered as it is with frequent opportunities for the
audience to cheer Jeff turning the tables on his tormenters.  It is also
a remarkably effective crowd-pleaser, one which doesn't throw common sense
or continuity to the wind for the sake of a punch line.  By the time
BREAKDOWN builds to a climactic four-car chase -- a somewhat excessive
conclusion to an otherwise lean thriller -- Mostow has demonstrated a rare
talent for grabbing an audience and refusing to let go.
     There is another stolen idea in BREAKDOWN which isn't entirely
Mostow's doing.  Advertising for the film ominously warns "It could happen
to you," a nod to thrillers which became pop culture phenomena by
appealing to our collective 20th-century conviction that every stranger is
a serial killer waiting to happen -- call this one the "Good Samaritan
Truck Driver from Hell."  Mostow actually goes a bit farther, playing the
conflict in BREAKDOWN as class warfare, and it is disappointing to watch
such a solid film resort to back-brain prejudices.  If you think about
BREAKDOWN long enough, you'll probably discover some things which bother
you -- why, for instance, Jeff didn't seem at all concerned about his wife
riding with a stranger, or why the villains seem to thwart their own plan
at the outset.  You may even think about the fact that you've seen
something like BREAKDOWN before.  And it may not matter, because the Idea
is only the frame for a vehicle.  Jonathan Mostow has given this one an
engine with a heck of a kick.

Title
Review for Twelfth Night: Or What You Will (1996)
Director:  Trevor Nunn.
Screenplay:  Trevor Nunn, based on the play by William Shakespeare.
Director of Photography:  Clive Tickner.
Producers:  Stephen Evans, David Parfitt.
Starring:  Imogen Stubbs, Helena Bonham Carter, Toby Stephens, Nigel
Hawthorne, Ben Kingsley, Mel Smith, Richard E. Grant, Imelda Staunton,
Stephen Mackintosh.
     There is a sub-category of Shakespeare's comedies referred to by
scholars as the "problem plays," and thought TWELFTH NIGHT is not
technically one of them, it is rather problematic in its own right.
Though primarily a farcical tale of confused romance, mistaken identity
and sexual politics, TWELFTH NIGHT also includes a sub-plot in which a
character is humiliated, imprisoned as a lunatic and released to vow his
revenge on his persecutors.  Trevor Nunn's adaptation of the play retains
that sub-plot, which makes the film quite faithful.  At the same time, it
is only that dark business in an otherwise bright and breezy film which
prevents TWELFTH NIGHT from being as successful at traditional Shakespeare
as WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S ROMEO AND JULIET was successful at the
un-traditional.
     The central plot of TWELFTH NIGHT involves a woman named Viola
(Imogen Stubbs) who survives a shipwreck which apparently claims the life
of her twin brother Sebastian (Stephen Mackintosh).  Stranded in the
unfriendly nation of Illyria, Viola disguises herself as a boy named
Cesario to go into the service of the Duke Orsino (Toby Stephens).  Viola
is then given the task of wooing the beautiful Olivia (Helena Bonham
Carter) on Orsino's behalf, but not only is Olivia unreceptive to Orsino's
suit, she falls in love with the messenger she believes to be a boy.
Viola, meanwhile, has fallen for Orsino, creating a rather unique romantic
triangle.  To complicate matters further, Sebastian turns up alive,
resulting in no end of confusion.
     It is easy to turn TWELFTH NIGHT into a rather trivial farce, if an
entertaining one, but Nunn has opted for a surprisingly sensitive
rendering of the tale.  Imogen Stubbs is an appealing Viola whose
unrequited love is a source of both pain and frustration, and her defense
of the depth of a woman's love is given a confident strength.  Perhaps
most unconventional is Nunn's choice of making the reunion between Viola
and Sebastian the emotional climax of the film rather than the joining of
any pair of lovers, yet it works thanks to a carefully established 
prologue and the restrained work of Stubbs.  Helena Bonham Carter is
simply wonderful as Olivia -- smart, sexy, seductive and _very_ funny --
leaving a somewhat stiff Toby Stephens as the only squeaky wheel in an
otherwise smooth, clockwork romantic comedy.
     The more broadly comic secondary plot involves the machinations of
Olivia's drunken uncle Sir Toby Belch (Mel Smith) and her maid Maria
(Imelda Staunton) against the fussy, dour steward Malvolio (Nigel
Hawthorne of THE MADNESS OF KING GEORGE).  The scheme involves persuading
Malvolio that Olivia loves him, inspiring him to uncharacteristic behavior
which eventually lands him in a madhouse, and the set-up for that scheme
presents Hawthorne with some priceless comic moments.  Hawthorne is an
actor with a remarkable range, which results in the curious case of him
pitching portions of his performance in a way which makes Malvolio too
sympathetic.  A scene in which the fool Feste (a wry, philosophical Ben
Kingsley) impersonates a cleric to further taunt the imprisoned Malvolio
should be simply amusing, but Hawthorne seems so genuinely confused and
tormented that his comeuppance seems dreadfully unfair.  When he
interrupts the revelry of the united lovers to swear his vengeance upon
those who tricked him, it truly spoils the festive mood.  It is an unusual
instance where a less accomplished actor, who might have played the role
quite broadly, might also have maintained a lighter tone.
     TWELFTH NIGHT may be uneven, but is still largely appealing, thanks
to the talented cast and the unique design of the film.  The locations in
Cornwall allow for some marvelous, liberating exteriors, and the late 18th
century settings and costumes allow Nunn to balance TWELFTH NIGHT on the
border between period piece and contemporary romance.  Kingsley and Smith
make particularly inspired choices for their roles, lending humor both
subtle and expansive, and Richard E. Grant is a perfect dim-witted fop as
Sir Andrew Aguecheek.  Trevor Nunn's direction is unexpectedly restrained
in small moments between Viola and Orsino given Nunn's recent history
staging massive stage productions like CATS and LES MISERABLES, but his
over 25 years as director of the Royal Shakespeare Company have not been
forgotten so easily.  TWELFTH NIGHT is a problematic play, but Nunn has
served it well, making it a revel with a dark side that can't eclipse the
bright.

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
     Once upon a time, many years ago when the earth was still young, I
read comic books.  In fact, I read them quite avidly.  I attended comic
book conventions, kept my collection in acid-free boxes and bought the
Overstreet Price Guide every year.  I remember the fervor with which comic
book fans defend their favorite characters, and the excitement generated
by the first film appearance of a character.
     My first encounter with this phenomenon from the other side of the
philosophical fence came when I dared to give only fleeting praise to
1994's THE CROW.  From the reactions of the film's fans, you would think
not only that I had challenged the film's artistic merit, but also that I
had performed an excretory act on Brandon Lee's grave.  The idea for the
story, I felt, was intriguing, the execution merely competent.  And the
wrath it raineth down.
     Now I steel myself once again, because folks, SPAWN ain't even _that_
good.
     Anyone familiar with THE CROW is going to experience a bit of
conceptual deja vu with SPAWN.  The hero, in this case a government agent
named Al Simmons (Michael Jai White), is murdered, in this case by his
megalomaniacal boss Jason Wynn (Martin Sheen).  The hero returns to earth,
compelled by a desire to reunite with his beloved (Theresa Randle), and
finds himself endowed with supernatural powers to assist in the wreaking
of his vengeance, powers in this case provided by the devil in exchange
for Simmons -- now Spawn -- leading the Army of Darkness to the
Apocalypse.  A goading little demon called Clown (John Leguizamo) is
around to make sure Spawn keeps his end of the bargain; a benevolent
eternal warrior named Cagliostro (Nicol Williamson) acts as the little
angel on the other shoulder.
     At its best, SPAWN does provide some genuinely eye-catching visual
effects for its titular character.  Spawn's body armor is perfectly
rendered, sprouting all manner of computer-generated weaponry and a
billowing red cape as necessity demands.  Leguizamo also provides
entertainment value by tossing off crude gags between bouts of flatulence.
At its worst, SPAWN provides the kind of horrid acting often excused in
genre films with the description "campy," with half the cast (White,
Sheen, Leguizamo) doing gutteral line readings (because the Forces of Evil
always talk like Mercedes McCambridge in "The Exorcist") and the other
half (Randle, Williamson, D. B. Sweeney) standing around looking
befuddled.  It also offers a decidedly Sony Play Station vision of hell,
and a script which doesn't bother to give the main character a life before
it gives him an afterlife.
     Most of the time, however, SPAWN is neither at its best nor at its
worst.  It is merely redundant, a now-familiar plot of gloom-soaked
heroism decked out with the expected trappings of perpetually rainy
alleys, Gothic spires and a couple of explosions.  I'm not familiar enough
with the time line of recent comics to know whether "The Crow" pre-dated
"Spawn" in comic book form, but it doesn't really matter.  Viewers of 
SPAWN may find a few new and improved special effects, but everything else
is re-used and recycled; even Leguizamo's performance as Clown seems like
a slightly more scatalogical spin on Nicholson's Joker.
     Comic books may have picked up a certain improbable cachet when they
started referring to themselves as "graphic novels," but that attitude has
merely resulted in a different kind of creative rut.  It's like graphic
grunge rock, where an energetic and invigorating first wave has given way
to endless imitators who can't seem to lighten up and stop whining.  Even
when screenwriter Alan McElroy tries to temper the angst with glib quips,
the result is something strictly for fans of the new and improved special
effects.  Or, perhaps, for die-hard SPAWN fans who may be preparing an
effigy of yours truly even as we speak.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
     Not to be glib, but there are two very simple reasons why so many
romantic comedies are so bad:  1) no romance; 2) no comedy.  The structure
is so simple it could be banged out by monkeys -- find two characters, put
them together, introduce an obstacle, tear them apart, resolve the
obstacle, bring them back together again.  That's where every romantic
comedy script begins, and sadly, that's also where most of them end.  See,
there's the not-so-small matter of creating two likeable characters whose
pairing is as plausible as their separation, as well as entertaining the
audience along the way to the foregone conclusion.  When your audience is
ready and willing to be charmed, a film's inability to generate wit or
warmth is inexcusable.
     NOTTING HILL, penned by FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL scribe Richard
Curtis, does everything a romantic comedy needs to do right.  Hugh Grant
plays William Thacker, a London bookseller living a simple if vaguely
lonely life.  That life is promptly turned upside down when Anna Scott
(Julia Roberts), the world's biggest female movie star, walks into his
shop.  Anna, the hounded subject of perpetual press coverage, is
understandably guarded; William, though a bit dazzled, is understated in
his treatment of the star.  Though Anna finds William's absence of fawning
unexpectedly appealing, plenty of barriers stand in the way of a potential
relationship:  famous boyfriends, paparazzi, geography and the uneasy way
celebrities interact with laypeople.
     The romantic side of NOTTING HILL works most effectively because
Curtis and director Roger Michell (PERSUASION) allow it to develop in
stages.  Initially, Anna and William's attraction to one other is 
abstract.  Anna is intrigued that William treats her with a degree of
normalcy, and longs for the simpler life she sees in William's interaction
with his group of friends; William, previously unlucky in love, is
overwhelmed by the prospect of being desired by one of the world's most
desirable women.  The abstractions give way to a more personal
understanding during a day spent together, which in turn give way to more
concrete realization of the different worlds in which they live.
Crackling with chemistry together, both stars give assured, engaging
performances while still leaving a few rough edges -- Anna's prickly
preoccupation with the perils of her fame, William's addiction to the
"love heroin" of his romance with a star.
     It's convenient that the writer who can put these romantic
developments together is also one of the finest comedy writers working.
Curtis -- a co-creator of both the wonderfully wordy "Blackadder" and the
purely physical "Mr. Bean -- has always had an impressive comic range.
Here he slides from the broad (Rhys Ifans as William's slovenly flatmate
Spike) to the silly (William's fumbling efforts to climb into a fenced
private garden) to the cleverly satirical (a film press junket William
muddles through posing as a reporter from "Horse and Hound Magazine") with
equal dexterity.  The solid supporting cast, including Tim McInnerny, Hugh
Bonneville and Emma Chambers, comes through with appealing work, but it's
Curtis' wicked way with a line or a visual gag that keeps the comic energy
high.
     NOTTING HILL does make the mistake of clocking in at a heavy 125
minutes, dragging out its denouement to an unnecessarily tortuous degree.
In fact, there are several occasions where the editing seems disjointed,
with odd cutaways and dialogue beginning too early.  The technical
glitches are perhaps more notable in a film which spins its romance
unabashedly into a confection that's pure Hollywood, and not just because
one of the characters is a Hollywood star.  This is romantic comedy in an
old-fashioned sense, where the pleasures come more from a zestful staging
than from foolish details like whether the relationship is "realistic."
NOTTING HILL takes you to a slightly heightened reality, a place where
movie magic moves you because it has found both the romance and the comedy
in romantic comedy.

Title
Review for Loser (2000)
     While watching LOSER, it occurred to me that Amy Heckerling's true
genius as a film-maker is casting. In FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH, she
gave us Sean Penn's Jeff Spicoli; in LOOK WHO'S TALKING, she turned Bruce
Willis into a wise-cracking baby and provided John Travolta with is first
career revival; in CLUELESS, she found a star vehicle for the adorableness
that is (or was) Alicia Silverstone. She seems to understand instinctively
how to find performers the audience will like in spite of their flaws. 
Unfortunately, she may also be starting to understand that she 
understands. Giving appealing actors an appealing script creates likeable
movies. Giving appealing actors a script in which their appeal _is_ the
movie makes for unexpectedly awful films like LOSER.
     Naturally, Heckerling makes her protagonist an all-around swell
guy. Paul Tannek (Jason Biggs) is a small-town boy who gets a scholarship
to NYU, then instantly finds himself an island of compassion and diligence
in the cold-hearted big city. Paul is the kind of guy who gives up his
seat on the subway to an elderly woman; his roommates Adam (Zak Orth),
Chris (Tom Sadoski) and Noah (Jimmi Simpson) are the kind of guys who
blast their music and let their waterbeds leak all over Paul. Paul is also
the kind of guy who adores girls from afar, in this case the lovely Dora
Diamond (Mena Suvari). Dora has problems of her own, including a shortage
of funds to pay her tuition and a relationship with a professor, Edward
Alcott (Greg Kinnear), that's more than slightly one-sided. They're two
conscientious kids who love animals and homeless people, so clearly they
belong together, even if Paul is a loser.
     I must confess that, for a while, I was suckered in by Heckerling's
casting. Jason Biggs is an engaging performer whose unconventional looks
make him even easier to embrace; Suvari is a coquette with an undercurrent
of intelligence. They're pleasant enough to watch, and Heckerling gives us
plenty of scenes establishing how nice they are and how nice their
respective antagonists aren't. Then it gradually becomes clear that
there's virtually nothing to LOSER but scenes of that sort. In theory,
LOSER is a romantic comedy, but there is scarcely a laugh to be found in
the entire film (notable exception: a cameo by a scene-stealing comic
actor as a video store clerk). Instead of taking any time to make the
characters' situations funny, Heckerling spends 98 minutes making her
characters' situations pathetic. She shows none of the ear for quirky
dialogue that sparked CLUELESS, nor any of that film's interest in lively
plotting (not surprisingly, since CLUELESS's plot came via Jane Austen's
EMMA). She simply turns the film into a pity party.
     Since LOSER is a film composed almost entirely of establishing
character, you might think that those characters would be interesting, or
at least slightly complicated. Instead, you have people either so perfect
or so unredeemable that there's no reason to watch them. Paul isn't just a
nice guy, he's flawless; consequently, he's a central character who does
absolutely no growing. His roommates aren't just inconsiderate, they're
actively evil-blackmailing Professor Alcott, drugging women with Rohypnol
and generally giving humanity a bad name. And Professor Alcott isn't just
manipulative, he turns Dora into his house slave. Dora's unthinking
devotion to Alcott is the only whiff of basic human frailty to be found in
LOSER, and even that isn't explored in sufficient detail. There's more
ambiguity in the 30-second snippet from Alan Cumming's Broadway 
performance as the Emcee in CABARET then there is in the rest of LOSER 
It's one thing to turn supporting characters into comic exaggerations; 
it's another to flatten your leads into easily digestible mush. And it
would help if those comic exaggerations were somehow ... I don't know
... comic.
     Still, I spent much of the film holding out the ridiculous hope that
Heckerling would somehow salvage LOSER from its tedium and justify my
desire to like Paul and Dora. That hope dissolved the moment Heckerling
underscored a sequence of Paul in the throes of unrequited love to Simon
and Garfunkel's "Scarborough Fair/Canticle." Instead of giving the
sequence a knowing wink-a reference to THE GRADUATE, a hint that Paul is
becoming an overly-sensitive clich-Heckerling plays it deadly straight. 
Even in the scenes that scream for a light comic touch and a bit of a poke
at her protagonist's foibles, she finds it impossible to stray from the
Gospel of Paul as Saint. CLUELESS's Cher had her self-absorption and
manipulative tendencies to balance her cuteness. In LOSER, Amy Heckerling
shows a leaden hand with material that demands friskiness (her one show of
wit involves naming Paul's dorm "Hunt's Hall" after erstwhile Bowery Boy
Huntz Hall). Her gift with casting proved to be her curse. LOSER may be a
crashing bore, but gee, aren't those two kids swell?

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Tom Cruise, Cuba Gooding Jr., Renee Zellweger, Kelly Preston,
Bonnie Hunt, Jonathan Lipnicki.
Screenplay:  Cameron Crowe.
Producers:  James L. Brooks, Richard Sakai, Laurence Mark, Cameron Crowe.
Director:  Cameron Crowe.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
      There is an absolute poetry to the casting of Tom Cruise as JERRY
MAGUIRE which I do not think could have been matched by the casting of any
other actor.  Cruise has spent much of his career playing cocky young
go-getters, and when early scenes show him working a crowd as top-level
sports agent Maguire, pressing the flesh and charming all comers with that
blinding smile, you might think he's about to go on automatic TOP GUN
pilot.  Then Jerry describes his personal dilemma in voice-over, including
a simple phrase -- "I was 35 years old" -- which is like a temporal slap
in the face to anyone who finds it hard to reconcile Cruise's image with
the fact that "the kid" isn't a kid any more.  As the film explores a
man's search for real fulfillment over financial success, you wonder
whether Cruise might have cause to take the role personally.
      He certainly takes it seriously, turning in the funniest and most
confident performance of his career as Jerry Maguire, who finds himself
compelled after a crisis of conscience to draft an idealistic "mission
statement" for his sports management firm.  The firm thanks Jerry by
firing him, then systematically turning all of his former clients against
him except one:  Rod Tidwell (Cuba Gooding Jr.), a good-but-not-great wide
receiver looking for a guaranteed contract extension.  Jerry's only
support comes from Dorothy Boyd (Renee Zellweger), an accountant at the
firm who is inspired by Jerry's idealism and follows him out the door.
Unfortunately, Renee is also a single mother supporting a 6-year-old son
(Jonathan Lipnicki), and her financial dependence on Jerry and his one
client is further complicated by her growing emotional attachment to
Jerry.
     What is most impressive about Cameron Crowe's script is not just that
it is so rich and funny, but that it keeps so many balls in the air
without once feeling crowded or directionless.  There are half a dozen
intriguing relationships in JERRY MAGUIRE, and Crowe does justice to all
of them:  Jerry's complicated relationship with Dorothy; Jerry's
contentious friendship with Rod; Dorothy's relationship with her
protective older sister (the always wonderful Bonnie Hunt); Jerry's easy
rapport with Dorothy's son Ray; even Rod's relationship with his strong,
no-nonsense wife (Regina King).  Only Jerry's relationship with his
fiancee Avery (Kelly Preston) makes a kind of sit-com sense, because Avery
is only a sit-com character, an under-developed and superficial plot
device.  Every other bit of character interaction soars because the
characters are so carefully drawn.
     They also are acted with uniform excellence, beginning with Renee
Zellweger as the wistful Dorothy, who treats Jerry like an icon of a
better life.  The arc of her feelings for him -- from exhilaration to
painful realism -- is rendered beautifully by Zellweger, and the emotion
she can express with her face is sometimes enough to make you want to
burst into tears.  Cuba Gooding Jr. is an electrifying delight as Rod,
whose pride interferes with his chances for stardom.  He has a moment
during an end zone dance which by all rights should be ridiculous;
instead, Gooding makes it a glorious celebration.  There is also the
under-stated perfection of Bonnie Hunt's supporting work, and Jay Mohr in
a marvelously despicable turn has Jerry's conscience-impaired protege.
However, the most memorable cast member may be young Jonathan Lipnicki,
who virtually re-defines scene-stealing.  With his spiky hair, round
glasses and a smile which rivals that of his celebrated co-star, Lipnicki
brings a goofy energy to the screen, yet there is never a moment when he
seems aware of his own adorableness.  He is simply hilarious, and the
affection between him and Cruise makes for some priceless moments.
     Then there is Cruise himself, playing the terribly complicated role
of a man who just wants to improve himself a _little_.  JERRY MAGUIRE is a
film which doesn't appear to end far from where it started, because Jerry
is still a sports agent and still trying to make a good deal.  He is not
trying to turn his life upside-down, though it briefly ends up that way.
He simply wants to find balance, and Cruise takes us along on that
internal journey with skill and humor.  In fact, JERRY MAGUIRE is not just
about one man's journey -- Dorothy and Rod also make subtle changes in
their attitudes which help them discover what is really of value to them.
Cameron Crowe is not interested in some grand condemnation of yuppie
avarice which has his characters throwing off their pin-stripes and pads
for hair shirts and self-flagellation.  Jerry, Dorothy and Rod just want
to take small steps, to do what they do in life a bit better, and to be
proud of they way they conduct their lives.  JERRY MAGUIRE is a simple but
thoroughly uplifting story which is as funny as it is touching, and it
finds Tom Cruise no longer cruising on that famous smile...although he may
have cause to smile at his own efforts to do what he does in life a bit
better.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt
Damon, Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel.
Screenplay:  Robert Rodat.
Producers:  Steven Spielberg, Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon & Gary Levinsohn.
Director:  Steven Spielberg.
MPAA Rating:  R (intense wartime violence and gore, profanity)
Running Time:  170 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The first and last image in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, a war story of
shattering visceral and emotional force, is an American flag waving in the
breeze.  It's a bold choice, one that defines what makes this film so
unique among modern war films.  For over 25 years in the post-Vietnam era,
American war films have reminded us over and over again that war is a
chaotic and futile endeavor characterized by gleeful brutality and
morality of convenience.  Even the most well-received examples -- THE DEER
HUNTER, APOCALYPSE NOW, PLATOON, FULL METAL JACKET -- trafficked in
violence and psychological devastation as though they were the only facets
of the wartime experience worth exploring.  The stories were less about
the people in war than about war itself as an existential disease.  Being
"anti-war" had become about as meaningful as being "anti-cancer."
     SAVING PRIVATE RYAN may be the most mature war film ever made,
because it combines the horrifying realism of contemporary war films with
the sense of purpose conveyed in the patriotic adventures of the 1940s.
The primary action begins with the June 6, 1944 invasion of Normandy,
focusing on a Ranger company under the command of Capt. John Miller (Tom
Hanks).  After making it through the first push at Omaha Beach, Miller and
his company find themselves handed a mission with an angle more political
than tactical.  It seems that three Iowa brothers have all been killed in
action, leaving Pvt. James Ryan (Matt Damon) his mother's only surviving
son.  General George Marshall himself decides that Private Ryan _will_
make it home alive, and assigns Miller and his company the task of risking
their lives to save Private Ryan's.
     The reluctance of Miller's men to take on this mission is
understandable, since it's amazing enought that any of them survived the
initial assault on the beach.  Spielberg stages the 25-minute Omaha Beach
sequence as a savage, gut-churning frenzy of torn limbs and bullet-riddled
bodies.  It's hard to begin describing the film artistry involved:  that
half hour is disturbing, surreal, at times darkly humorous, simultaneously
too intense to watch and impossible _not_ to watch.  Some images come and
go with a shivery subliminal quickness; others linger on undisguised human
suffering.  If it had been Spielberg's intent to play a game of wartime
can-you-top-this with his contemporary peers -- and you never believe for
a second that it was -- the contest wouldn't even be close.  Cinematic
warfare has never been more agonizing.
     Nor, in its way, has it ever been more human.  Screenwriter Robert
Rodat crafts Miller and his team as a collection of distinct individuals,
making every death and every anguished decision personal.  Hanks delivers
his finest performance yet as Miller, whose trembling hand betrays demons
his men can only guess at; Barry Pepper radiates steely-eyed confidence as
sharpshooter Pvt. Jackson; Adam Goldberg is slick but determined as the
Jewish Pvt. Mellish, who makes sure every German he encounters knows he
takes this war personally.  The most harrowing performance, however, comes
from Jeremy Davies as Cpl. Upham, the college-educated translator called
into his first duty with gun in hand.  Cliches like "loss of innocence"
don't do justice to the transformation Upham undergoes in a moment of
paralysis which risks the lives of fellow soldiers.  It's even more
disturbing when a German soldier passes Upham as though he were not even
worth the trouble of killing.  In one brilliantly acted scene, Upham's
psyche vanishes into the rubble.
     But cowardice is only one side of the complex story in SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN.  This being a tale of the "last noble war" in American history, it's
also about heroism, though not in a conventional sense.  Faced with an
assignment everyone considers FUBAR -- an acronym for the saltier version
of "fouled up beyond all recognition" -- Miller and his men are forced to
make it make sense.  This is the sort of heroism SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
examines:  not the heroism of men fighting an obviously evil enemy for an
obviously just cause, but the heroism of men taking responsibility for
doing their duty to the best of their ability.  Honor becomes something
quite distinct from the nation's political or military objectives.  It
becomes the ability to make meaning from the hell war always has been and
always will be.
     Steven Spielberg, who set a new standard for himself with SCHINDLER'S
LIST, actually manages to raise that standard in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN,
which isn't to say that it's a perfect film.  John Williams score may not
be as intrusive as it was in AMISTAD -- but then, how _could_ it be? --
but it still underscores scenes best left silent, and one late scene is a
bit too reminiscent of Schindler's "I could have done more" speech.  Yet
even in that moment Spielberg drives home his unique, provocative vision.
Late in the film, a character tells Ryan, "Earn this," handing him the
responsibility for making his life -- and the lives of those who died for
his sake -- matter.  That waving flag which opens and closes SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN is a challenging sort of patriotism, free from self-righteous
over-simplifications like "good war" vs. "bad war."  With the grace and
power of great cinema, Spielberg makes accountability in the midst of
tragedy absolutely individual.  He forces you to stare inward and ask 
whether you've earned this -- this life, this country, this freedom.

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
(MGM/Rysher)
Grade: B+ / Worth a Ticket
Starring:  Danny Aiello, James Spader, Paul Mazursky, Teri Hatcher, Glenne
Headly, Eric Stoltz, Greg Cruttwell, Charlize Theron, Jeff Daniels.
Screenplay:  John Herzfeld.
Producers:  Jeff Wald, Herb Nanas.
Director:  John Herzfeld.
Running Time:  100 minutes.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, sexual situations, nudity)
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The thing that goes dreadfully wrong with so many twisty-turny
suspense yarns is that they operate under the mis-guided impression that
they need nothing _except_ twists and turns to be engaging, a perfect
example being the recent THE RICH MAN'S WIFE.  It is a variation on the
kind of lazy, cynical film-making which produces action films like
TWISTER, in which the writers and directors hope that they can keep
jerking us around to the point where we don't notice that there aren't any
people in their films.  I expected 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY to be that kind of
film, yet another hipper-than-thou exercise in violence and vacuity.  But
writer-director John Herzfeld has put together a complex plot in which --
get this -- the characters actually matter, and which has more great roles
for actors than a dozen recent Hollywood films put together.
     The valley in question is Southern California's San Fernando Valley,
where several people will find their lives intertwined.  It begins with a
partnership in crime, as washed-out mobster Dosmo Pizo (Danny Aiello) is
hired by a shady character named Lee (James Spader) to help with a hit.
But it turns out that Lee is not to be trusted, and once the job is done,
Dosmo is forced to hide out with Alan (Greg Cruttwell), an obnoxious art
dealer, and his assistant Susan (Glenne Headly).  Meanwhile, an ambitious
vice cop named Wes (Eric Stoltz) discovers the scene of the crime, as well
as the victim's distraught ex-wife Becky (Teri Hatcher); also involved is
Teddy (Paul Mazursky), a once-promising film-maker now contemplating
suicide.
     There are some aspects of 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY which are reminiscent
of other recent stabs at hard-boiled avant garde, and for a while they
concerned me.  Yes, there are characters whose defining quirks seem
contrived for effect, like Lee's penchant for giving his victims a minute
on a stopwatch, or Dosmo's uncooperative hair-piece; yes, there are
characters like Wes's on-the-edge partner Alvin (Jeff Daniels) who don't
pay off.  Yet as John Herzfeld's story unfolded, I began to find myself
drawn into his characterizations, and to realize that this was one of
those rare films where even minor players seemed to have a life of their
own.  One of the most hilarious scenes features Austin Pendleton as a
former actor in one of Teddy's movies who runs into him in a park and
takes vicious glee in detailing Teddy's recent flops.  That one scene
speaks volumes about Teddy, about the embittered actor, and about
Hollywood's loathing of failure, and it is typical of the economy with
which Herzfeld is able to deliver fully-formed characters.
     Mazursky's Teddy is one of the two pivotal characters in 2 DAYS IN
THE VALLEY, and his performance is superb, particularly early in the film.
His relationship with his dog makes for one of the most touching scenes I
have seen this year, as his life is saved quite literally by the love of
his pet, and Mazursky's puffy, defeated demeanor is perfect.  Danny Aiello
is equally sharp as a wiseguy with something to prove, and a bigger heart
than anyone expects.  They are surrounded by winning performances -- even
Spader achieves a surprising level of capricious menace -- but Mazursky
and Aiello are always at the center of a film which gives you the
opportunity to care about the people in it.
     I should make something very clear at this point:  2 DAYS IN THE
VALLEY is smartly plotted, with enough unexpected detours to satisfy the
most die-hard lovers of cinematic guessing games.  It never strays
particularly far from the conventions of gritty pot-boilers, including
plenty of gratuitous sex and violence, and even one heck of a brutal
cat-fight between Hatcher and Charlize Theron as Lee's ice queen
girlfriend..  What is surprising about 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY is that after
every twist has played itself out, it is not the twists which are
memorable.  It is a genuinely human redemption story wrapped in a dark,
violent thriller.  If Herzfeld leaves a few loose ends, I was willing to
forgive him because he trusted an audience with a character-driven film in
a plot-driven genre.  That is a twist I was not expecting.

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)
     I can understand why screenwriter Tina Andrews latched onto the story
behind WHY DO FOOLS FALL IN LOVE for fifteen years.  From a commercial
standpoint, it has a great hook:  the real-life story of three women who
all claimed to be the legal widow of Frankie Lymon, lead singer of the
1950s doo-wop group the Teenagers (whose signature hit serves as the
film's title).  From a writer's standpoint, it offers the intriguing
contradiction of its main character, a troubled soul who was a different
man for each of his three different brides before dying of a drug overdose
in 1968.  It's a story with sex, drugs _and_ rock 'n' roll, as well as
colorful characters a-plenty.  Sure enough, this bio-pic offers loads of
curb appeal.
     Unfortunately, Andrews and director Gregory Nava (SELENA) make a big
mistake in their approach to the material -- they decide to turn it into a
rock 'n' roll RASHOMON.  The framing story opens in 1986, with three women
-- former Platters singer Zola Taylor (Halle Berry), petty thief and
single mom Elizabeth Waters (Vivica A. Fox), and schoolteacher Emira Eagle
(Lela Rochon) -- all making a legal claim to be Mrs. Frankie Lymon, with
rights to his musical royalties.  A hearing commences in which each
claimant tells the story of Frankie (Larenz Tate) as she knew him, from
teen star to has-been, from heroin addict to soldier.  The flashbacks
cover 13 years of Frankie's life, with widely varying perspectives on the
man each of the three women married at some point, but none of them
divorced.
     Somewhere buried in that narrative is an interesting -- if somewhat
trite -- entertainment industry life story, the story of a street kid from
an abusive home who becomes dependent on the love he receives from
audiences and women.  Larenz Tate does a fine job of capturing Frankie's
electrifying stage presence, as well as his sheer joy of performing for a
crowd.  In fact, the high-energy performance scenes are generally the
film's best, with Frankie's unbridled on-stage enthusiasm contrasting
sharply with the conservative choreography of his artistic contemporaries.
Tate also has the thankless job of creating a character out of piecemeal
recollections, yet the character still comes together as someone you want
to know more about.
     If only wanting made it so.  Only occasionally does WHY DO FOOLS FALL
IN LOVE hone in on the question of who Frankie Lymon really was.  Too
often Andrews and Nava take off on dead-end tangents -- a vamping,
self-indulgent cameo by Little Richard as himself; the hit-and-run
accusation that Frankie's manager/producer Morris Levy (Paul Mazursky)
cheated him out of millions; broadly comic female bonding sessions which
turn Zola, Elizabeth and Emira into the First, Second and Third Wives'
Club.  When they finally do get around to Frankie himself, they offer
psychologically convenient devices like a shattered mirror in which
Frankie sees his fragmented visage.  The individual snapshots of his life,
including such potentially provoactive subjects as his naive disregard for
1950s social conventions, never seem designed to develop into a complete
portrait.
     Ultimately no one, not even the three women with whom he shared a
life, seems interested in understanding Frankie.  That's what's most
disappointing about WHY DO FOOLS FALL IN LOVE:  it's not really a
biography of Frankie Lymon.  The film-makers are usually more interested
in getting inside the the heads of the three women -- providing tart
dialogue for the three talented lead actresses while making them
sympathetic, mis-used you-go-girls -- than getting inside Frankie's head.
Sure, they violate point of view when it serves their purpse to show
things none of the narrators could have seen, but mostly they point out
how Frankie's enigmatic behavior hurt others, not how he hurt himself.
It's a cop-out to start telling a character's story, then shrug your
shoulders and claim not to have any idea who that character is.  Tina
Andrews spent fifteen years waiting to tell the story of a potentially
fascinating rock 'n' roll tragedy, but all she could come up with was a
great big "I dunno."

Title
Review for George Washington (2000)
GEORGE WASHINGTON
(Cowboy Booking)
Starring:  Candace Evanofski, Donald Holden, Curtis Cotton III, Damian
Jewan Lee, Rachael Handy, Eddie Rouse, Paul Schneider.
Screenplay:  David Gordon Green.
Producers:  David Gordon Green, Sacha W. Mueller and Lisa Muskat.
Director:  David Gordon Green.
MPAA Rating:  Unrated (could be PG-13 for violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw
     In David Gordon Green's haunting feature debut GEORGE WASHINGTON,
there is no real story to speak of. Set in an unnamed town in the rural
American South, it's a quintessentially episodic film that follows a group
of adolescents and a few token adults over several summer days. The
narrator, Nasia (Candace Evanofski), is a 12-year-old African-American
girl who has just broken up with her 13-year-old boyfriend Buddy (Curtis
Cotton III) because she's looking for someone more mature. That someone
may be Buddy's friend George (Donald Holden), an introverted boy with a
congenitally soft skull that requires him to wear a helmet. In various
permutations, they hang out with their friends Vernon (Damian Jewan Lee)
and Sonya (Rachael Handy), as well as the workers at the local railyard
including Rico (Paul Schneider). They talk. They play. They argue.
     Actually, it's not accurate to say there's no story in GEORGE
WASHINGTON. It's more accurate to say there's no plot, because its story
is one of the year's most compelling, even when it occasionally lapses
into heavy-handedness. It has become something of a national pastime
trying to figure out what's wrong with American teens in the era of
Columbine, and plenty of films from RIVER'S EDGE to KIDS and onward have
tried to capture the aimlessness, amorality and anarchy of contemporary
adolescence. I don't think any one of them has captured the soul of
America's confused youth as effectively -- or with as much compassion --
as GEORGE WASHINGTON. It's the story of kids trying to find a moral
compass in a time when their childhood is becoming shorter and shorter.
     If such subject matter sounds like it could turn into pretentious
filmmaking, fear not. Though Green's early slow-motion shots may raise
fears that he's trying to make a Big Statement, he ultimately depends on
small statements. His cast of young non-professional actors, often
improvising around general story points, finds the truth of these
characters in dialogue so casual that its profundity comes as an
aftershock. A teenage girl comments that she want to get pregnant simply
because "she wants to be someone's mom;" Buddy talks about Nasia with a
precocious, almost ridiculous poetry; Nico converses with Buddy as though
they were peers, despite the boy's need for adult guidance. Even Nasia's
occasionally florid voice-over narration feels just right, the attempts of
a little girl to convey her worldliness. In its rambling,
no-particular-place-to-go rhythm, it's hypnotic viewing.
     It's also the most beautifully photographed film you're likely to see
this year. Tim Ott's cinematography captures the characters mostly
outdoors against the landscape, in both the lushness of local greenery and
the decay of abandoned industrial shells. Virtually every scene seems to
have been shot in some otherworldly twilight, so golden that they almost
hurt the eyes. The rare scenes shot indoors capture the grimness of the
characters' domestic lives, and one dark public restroom becomes the
film's unique vision of hell. When you're not busy wondering at the
naturalistic splendor of the performances, you'll be busy wondering at the
carefully constructed splendor of the visuals.
     GEORGE WASHINGTON's final half hour takes a turn toward other
thematic elements, as George attempts to re-define himself after a tragic
development. The transition isn't particularly smooth, but Green doesn't
appear particularly concerned with making his film a smooth experience.
Indeed, some of his editing and dialogue choices are so off-beat (like the
complete absence of profanity from its teenage characters) you can't help
but just let him carry you wherever he leads. Where he's leading is a
place hinted at in the film's title, a place where children are forced to
look backward for their heroes because there aren't any in their own
lives. Yes, indeed, GEORGE WASHINGTON does tell a story. If only more
films with plots could tell stories like this.

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
[Note:  Some of the content in this review may be considered spoilers]
     Director Carl Franklin (DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS) and screenwriter Karen
Croner take a calculated risk in setting up the story for ONE TRUE THING.
The framing sequence, introduced in the first few minutes, finds Ellen
Gulden (Renee Zellweger) in a district attorney's office, answering
questions about the death of her mother Kate (Meryl Streep).  The
narrative then proceeds through flashback, introducing Ellen as a
career-minded journalist summoned home by her stern academic father George
(William Hurt) to care for Kate after she is diagnosed with cancer.  The
risk, of course, is that knowing the outcome way ahead of time might
somehow reduce its emotional impact.  How effective can a tear-jerker be
if you're waiting for them to be jerked?
     ONE TRUE THING deftly sidesteps that problem -- at least for half its
running time -- by being nothing at all like a conventional tear-jerker.
At its core, it tells a story of one of adulthood's most daunting tasks:
coming to terms with the humanity of one's parents.  It is clear from the
start that Ellen is George's daughter -- she has followed in his footsteps
as a writer, craves his approval, and emulates his disciplined,
intellectual approach to life.  Kate, on the other hand, is a slightly
embarrassing enigma to her.  Ellen sees Kate's delight at being a
life-long mother and home-maker as simple-mindedness; she sees Kate's
sunny optimism as obliviousness.  Spending time with both parents forces
Ellen to recognize George's hidden weaknesses, Kate's hidden strength, and
the value understanding both parents can have for her growth.
     As long as the focus remains on those three characters and their
relationships, ONE TRUE THING is solid film-making.  Meryl Streep delivers
yet another winning performance, finding the warmth and compassion in Kate
without ever turning her into a cartoon.  The small mannerisms in her
attempts to connect with Ellen -- an almost imperceptible rejected touch,
hidden disappointment at her daughter's dismissals of her -- are the stuff
great screen acting is made of.  Zellweger is nearly as good both in awe
of her father and in contempt of her mother, while Hurt makes good use of
the remoteness which has hindered his performances inother films.  The
Guldens are a thoroughly recognizable modern family, their interactions
real enough to evoke emotion and sympathy without resorting to sobs or
recriminations.  There's something particularly wrenching about watching
people who love each other trying to like each other.
     Alas, the plot device which brought Ellen back home soon rears its
head and pulls ONE TRUE THING in the wrong direction.  It's not that the
cancer storyline is mawkish or overly manipulative.  Indeed, Franklin's
direction and Streep's performance avoid most of the traps which can turn
such stories into melodrama.  Kate's battle with cancer simply occupies
too much screen time, time which had been so well-spent on Kate, George
and Ellen battling with each other.  Once the Big C starts taking over the
proceedings, the nuances of character which had made ONE TRUE THING such
compelling viewing begin to lose their force.  Conversations become
confrontations; the words sound progressively more scripted and less
genuine.
     A tighter, leaner screenplay might have been able to keep Ellen's
journey of discover squarely at the center of ONE TRUE THING.
Unfortunately, screenwriter Karen Croner handles sub-plots like Ellen's
unstable relationship with her boyfriend (Nicky Katt) and her pursuit of
an interview with a scandal-ridden Senator (David Byron) with 
find-the-metaphor urgency.  There's only one true thing which makes ONE
TRUE THING glow with realism, and that's the struggle of parents and their
adult children to deal with each other as adults, as equals, as fellow
human beings.  That's the reason it was so wise to remove the live-or-die
suspense from a story that's not about who will live or die.  That's also
the reason it was so disappointing to watch the film linger on a foregone
conclusion.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
ME, MYSELF & IRENE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Jim Carrey, Renee Zellweger, Chris Cooper, Robert Forster,
Richard Jenkins, Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon.
Screenplay:  Peter Farrelly & Mike Cerrone & Bobby Farrelly.
Producers:  Bradley Thomas & Bobby Farrelly & Peter Farrelly.
Directors:  Bobby Farrelly & Peter Farrelly.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The National Alliance for the Mentally Ill went public ten days
before the release of ME, MYSELF & IRENE with a protest of the film's
flippant tone towards multiple personality disorders. They were offended,
which is not an uncommon reaction to a Farrelly Brothers movie. In fact,
it was probably a shrewd move on NAMI's part to beat the rush condemning
ME, MYSELF & IRENE. Operating strictly from memory, here's a list of the
groups that could conceivably find something in the film to be offended
by: African-Americans, little people, African-American little people,
lesbians, law enforcement officers, animal rights activists, albinos,
nursing mothers, users of feminine itch remedies ... and, of course,
advocates for the mentally ill.
     Farrelly Brothers movies -- including KINGPIN and THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY -- are tasteless, crude and, yes, occasionally offensive. 
They're also funny in the sort of I-can't-believe-I-actually-saw-that way
usually associated with vintage Mel Brooks, or the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker
team. There's nothing remotely ennobling about ME, MYSELF & IRENE, the
story of Charlie Baileygates (Jim Carrey), a Rhode Island state trooper
with a little problem. After his wife leaves him for another man, Charlie
is left with three growing boys and a need to avoid confrontations. His
repressed id eventually takes the form of an alter-ego named Hank that
appears whenever Charlie is enraged and unmedicated. That little problem
becomes a big problem when Hank is assigned to escort Irene Waters (Renee
Zellweger) back to New York on an arrest warrant, and soon discovers that
Irene is being targeted by a corrupt cop (Chris Cooper) who thinks she
knows something about his activities. Unfortunately, Charlie has forgotten
his medication, meaning Charlie and Hank both have the opportunity to grow
infatuated with Irene while they're on the run.
     Fans of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY -- and I count myself quite
squarely among them -- may find IRENE a bit disappointing by comparison. 
Carrey and Zellweger aren't nearly the perfect comic odd couple Ben
Stiller and Cameron Diaz were, nor is Carrey the sort of comic performer
whose ordinary guy demeanor works to balance the Farrellys' warped
sensibilities. The story is an unnecessarily convoluted parade of
double-crossing characters involved in a dirty business deal the specific
nature of which I still can't explain. There are a few missed
opportunities, like ignoring genial narrator Rex Allen, Jr. for much of
the film. And like the Farrellys' previous films, it's easily 15 minutes
longer than it needs to be, padded with musical cues that only distract
from the real reason for watching a Farrelly Brothers movie: seeing what
gut-busting affront to good taste they'll come up with next.
     Mere words can't possibly do justice to those affronts. IRENE's
finest moments may not reach the epic heights of MARY's zipper or hair gel
scenes, but they come close. There's a ridiculously funny running gag
involving Charlie's three "sons" from his wife's affair, a trio of immense
black youths with Mensa minds and Richard Pryor mouths. Hank's uninhibited
rampage of vengeance upon his first emergence gets more outrageous by the
moment. Then there's a morning visit to the lavatory that turns into a
battle between Charlie and his own excretory equipment. Sometimes it seems
that it's a long time between laughs in a Farrelly Brothers movie, but
maybe that's a good thing. Often, you still haven't recovered from the
last one five minutes ago by the time the next one rolls around.
     I'm not about to delve into whether or not NAMI was "right" in
criticizing IRENE for its approach to multiple personality disorder,
including repeatedly using "schizo" as a synonym. I do know that ME,
MYSELF & IRENE strikes me as a wildly comic spin on THE INCREDIBLE HULK
more than anything else, with Carrey's contorted transformations a special
effect all by themselves. That's only part of the amazingly adept physical
comedy Carrey pulls off, battling with his own body like Steve Martin in
ALL OF ME ... or, come to think of it, like Carrey himself in LIAR LIAR. 
This time, however, he doesn't have to fight against insipid moralizing. 
ME, MYSELF & IRENE may be uneven and peculiarly violent in its resolution,
but it's pure in its refusal to sentimentalize anything. Everything is
profane and nothing sacred in the Farrelly universe. Maybe that is worth
protesting. Or maybe, when you're laughing so hard that you forget to be
offended, it's worth applauding.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
INSTINCT
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, John Ashton, George Dzundza.
Screenplay:  Gerald DiPego, based on the novel _Ishmael_ by Daniel Quinn.
Producers:  Michael Taylor and Barbara Boyle.
Director:  Jon Turtletaub.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  124 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There was a sense of deja-vu developing long before I actually saw
INSTINCT, inspired by the presentation of the basic premise in the
trailers.  Here was Anthony Hopkins, playing a brilliant scientist turned
hair-trigger madman, turning the tables on a confident young interviewer
trying to get inside his head...I couldn't help but think I'd seen this
somewhere before.  Then I saw the film, and it all became clear.  This
wasn't just a case of Hopkins flexing his Hannibal Lecter muscles again
before taking on the film version of Thomas Harris' recently-published
sequel to THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.  He was simply keeping pace with a
story that slaps together characters, situations and exact shots from
dozens of other films.
     INSTINCT is a sloppy, derivative drama focusing on the interaction
between primatologist Dr. Ethan Powell (Hopkins) and psychiatric resident
Dr. Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.).  Powell, a once-noted expert on
gorillas, is now a mute inmate in a prison psychiatric ward after
murdering two men in the jungle of Rwanda; Caulder, an ambitious
up-and-comer, sees interviewing Powell for a compentency evaluation as his
ticket to professional stardom.  Powell eventually does open up to
Caulder, but only because he has a message to relate.  In flashback we see
Powell becoming ever more connected to the family of gorillas he is
studying until he is accepted as one of them.  His experience leads him to
a realization about the nature of human behavior in the world, a lesson he
intends to impart on his impromptu pupil Caulder.
     You could spend a productive day doing little more than ticking off
the films from which INSTINCT cribs:  ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST,
GORILLAS IN THE MIST, TARZAN, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION and even DEAD POETS
SOCIETY in addition to THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.  Gerald DiPego's script
plods along, dropping its familiar cinematic tropes like bread crumbs
leading the audience to its responses.  There's the psychiatrist who's
really more confused than his patient, the prison guard (John Ashton)
whose casual sadism is treated as a bona fide job requirement, and the
collection of mental patients who become lovable comic relief.  There's
even a scene of confounding idiocy in which we, the knee-jerking audience,
are supposed to cheer for Caulder irresponsibly whipping a room full of
jailed psychotics into a rebellious frenzy.  INSTINCT is so gruellingly
predictable that you may be surprised momentarily when Powell's daughter
(Maura Tierney) doesn't become a love interest for Caulder, until you
realize that this is just a slightly different, more insulting cliche:  a
black man and a white woman are allowed to be "just friends."
     Somehow, in the midst of so much uninspired tripe, Anthony Hopkins
still manages to come through with a performance that's invigorating to
watch.  Sure, it's a spin on Hannibal Lecter, but it's more fiercely
intelligent than anything the rest of the film can deliver.  You can't
help but lean forward when you hear that seductive baritone; you can't
help but shudder when Caulder's neck hinges on the correct answer to a
very tricky question.  Hopkins makes INSTINCT better.  He also makes it
worse, because everything else looks even more workmanlike, notably
Cuba Gooding Jr.'s performance.  Gooding is all facial twitches and
exposition explaining the tremendous change in his life wrought by Powell.
A little economy and subtlety -- skills Hopkins demonstrates even when
playing a wild man -- could have served Gooding well.
     Sadly, subtlety is one thing INSTINCT has in very short supply.  Even
viewers prepared to sympathize with the film's fuzzy embrace of the state
of nature will find this more a philosophical tract (albeit one with
remarkably realistic animatronic apes by Stan Winston) than a compelling
drama.  We all know man bad/animals good, which makes the decision to turn
the humans into cartoonish villains even more perplexing.  If there were a
moment of real insight into a character, the rest of INSTINCT's brainless
cinematic thievery might have been more tolerable.  Instead, it lets
breathing plot devices gab at one another for two hours between
unnervingly familiar situations.  Thank heavens for the entertainment
value of Anthony Hopkins' gloss on film's best-known cannibal.  It's only
fitting in a film that does plenty of cannibalizing of its own.

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
     Jane Horrocks delivers a show-stopping stage performance in LITTLE
VOICE, the kind worthy of the divas she honors.  In this adaptation of Jim
Cartwright's play "The Rise and Fall of Little Voice," Horrocks reprises
her stage role as L. V. (for Little Voice) Hoff, a timid young woman
living in a small seaside town in the north of England.  Still living with
her brash, bawdy mother Mari (Brenda Blethyn), L. V. rarely speaks a word
and even more rarely leaves the house.  But when she sings, tearing into
the classic Judy Garland, Shirley Bassey and Edith Piaf tunes beloved by
her late father, she is transformed, taking on the pipes and the
personality of whichever chanteuse she happens to be channeling at the
moment.
     The most astonishing element of Horrocks' performance is that she
gets no assistance from the original vocalists.  The actress truly can do
frighteningly dead-on recreations of Garland, Dietrich, Holliday, Monroe
and half a dozen others, and its a wonder to behold.  The showcase for
both Horrocks and her character is a performance at a run-down cabaret,
set up by Mari's current flame, small-time talent scout Ray Say (Michael
Caine).  Recognizing L. V. as his ticket to the Big Time, Ray sinks
everything he has into a one-night performance he finally coaxes out of
the reluctant girl.  And once she spots the visage of her dad in the
crowd, encouraging her, away she goes.
     In a live theater setting, you can imagine Horrocks' musical numbers 
being positively electrifying.  Even on-screen her transformation from
Minnie Mouse to mighty mouth is grand theater at its finest, and the
renditions of standards like "Get Happy" and "I Wanna Be Loved By You" are
extremely appealing.  It doesn't take long, however, to realize that
LITTLE VOICE is built entirely around Horrocks' admittedly impressive
party trick.  Once her centerpiece performance ends, the film starts
working desperately to tie up loose ends -- L. V.'s infatuation with her
father's memory, her relationships with her mother and an equally shy
telephone technician (Ewan McGregor), the frustrations of Ray as his one
shot at success seems about to pass him by.  As flawed as Ray and Mari 
are, they deserve better than to vanish after receiving a comeuppance.
It's frustrating watching them reduced to impediments to L. V.'s ability
finally to spread her wings (and it's not as though the bird metaphor
isn't beaten to an ugly death).
     It's all the more disappointing because, for most of its running
time, LITTLE VOICE doesn't seem headed that way at all.  Its eccentric
characters, while stagey, all have their goofy appeal, particularly Jim
Broadbent as the nightclub's cheesy owner/emcee.  Director Mark Herman
develops his small-town atmosphere nicely, and his adapted screenplay
keeps the humor fairly consistent.  It's actually nearly half an hour into
the film before L. V. breaks into song for the first time, allowing ample
time to build the significance of the characters and their relationships.
Then comes L. V.'s big debut, and it starts to seem that everyone else was
just part of the warm-up act.  L. V. emerges from her shell, she sings and
she changes, and about as abruptly as you can imagine, the credits begin
to roll.  LITTLE VOICE is largely diverting in its way, and Horrocks is
truly wonderful, but eventually it's somewhat disappointing.  I didn't
expect to leave the theater feeling that an ensemble story had been turned
into a one-woman show of Judymania.

Title
Review for M. Butterfly (1993)
Starring:  Jeremy Irons, John Lone.
Screenplay:  David Henry Hwang, based on his play.
Director:  David Cronenberg.
     I approached the film version of M. BUTTERFLY with something of a
"show me" attitude.  I'd had the good fortune to see a sensational
production of the play by Northern California's TheatreWorks company,
with an amazing lead performance by Mark Capri as Gallimard, and I felt
that any other version would have to be pretty good to impress me.  I
also questioned the choice of David Cronenberg, whose previous efforts
had all been horror films, as director.  It therefore comes as a
pleasant surprise that Cronenberg's M. BUTTERFLY maintains a real
faithfulness to the basic themes of David Henry Hwang's Tony
Award-winning play, although it loses a great deal from the absence of
the stage version's Brechtian devices.
     M. BUTTERFLY is based on the true story of French diplomat Bernard
Boursicot, here called Rene Gallimard.  Stationed in Beijing in 1964,
Gallimard (Jeremy Irons) is a petty bureaucrat responsible for
reviewing expense reports.  One evening, he attends an embassy function
for a performance of selections from Puccini's opera "Madama
Butterfly."  The featured vocalist is Song Liling, a mysterious figure
who intrigues Gallimard.  That intrigue soon leads to an affair,
despite a small detail of which Gallimard is apparently unaware:  Song
(John Lone) is a man.  Gaining confidence from his new love, Gallimard
is promoted to a position of importance in French intelligence.  He and
Song carry on their relationship for several years, until an
investigation forces him to know all there is to know about the spying
game.
     It's useless to argue that the story is implausible, based as it
is on a real event; M. BUTTERFLY is itself an attempt to explain how it
could have happened.  Hwang's conclusion is that the
Boursicot/Gallimard story is inextricably tied to the perception
Westerners hold of the East, that of a culture of subservience.
Consequently, they think of all Asians as feminized, making Gallimard's
assumption of Song's gender purely cultural.  Hwang and Cronenberg
convey that sense of Western sexual/political arrogance in lines which
draw knowing chuckles, such as Gallimard's assurance to his superior
that the Vietnamese would "submit to any show of strength" by the
Americans.  It's an interesting theme well-explored.
     Where I felt M. BUTTERFLY was less successful was in portraying
the complexities of Gallimard's character.  In the play, he speaks
directly to the audience, a device which allows for some ironic
observations of his state of mind.  The film's more conventional
narrative approach makes Gallimard less pathetic than he should be.
Lost also is the impression that before meeting Song, Gallimard is
timid and sexually inept; it is only after asserting dominance over his
"Butterfly" that he becomes a "real man."  Without this aspect of his
personality evident, his vulnerability to the deception doesn't make as
much sense.  There should be a clear sense that psychologically, he
*needs* Song to be a woman, and it's not quite there.
     Such an emphasis on Gallimard's psychology would also have gone
far toward making John Lone a credible choice as Song.  B. D. Wong, the
head biotechnician in JURASSIC PARK and the originator of Song on
Broadway, was once attached to the film, but was passed over when Lone
became available.  The choice was a mistake.  Lone's voice has an
eerie, detached quality which I liked for its mysterious allure, but
the fact is that he just looks too masculine, and an eight foot high
close-up doesn't exactly promote illusion.  Irons is a much better
choice as Gallimard.  He's great at showing Gallimard's cocky
Eurocentrist side, and I loved his oddly amused expression when he
first sees Song dressed as a man.  Once again, however, it was the
impotent Gallimard who disappeared, particularly in the too-brief look
at his other extra-marital affair, where what should have been disgust
instead becomes mere surprise.
     M. BUTTERFLY is a fascinating story, and its screen telling is
more than fair to the stage spirit.  I only wish Hwang had been allowed
to keep the focus on the internal.  It's a good film that could have
been a very good one.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
MAGNOLIA
(New Line)
Starring:  Tom Cruise, Philip Baker Hall, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Julianne
Moore, Jeremy Blackman, John C. Reilly, Melora Walters, William H. Macy,
Jason Robards, Melinda Dillon.
Screenplay:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
Producers:  Joanne Sellar and Paul Thomas Anderson.
Director:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, sexual situations, nudity, violence,
adult themes).
Running Time:  179 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At one pivotal point in MAGNOLIA -- one of several pivotal points in
Paul Thomas Anderson's epic of human connection and disconnection -- a
woman sits alone in her apartment, singing along to a song. At first it
seems she's singing along to her stereo, until Anderson cuts to another 
character singing the same song. He does this half a dozen more times,
capturing every one of his principal characters accompanying the haunting
original Aimee Mann composition "Wise Up." As the characters struggle
with moments of painful realization, they become individual voices in a
mournful chorus looking for forgiveness, reconciliation and redemption.
     That sequence in MAGNOLIA is one of the year's best pieces of
film-making, and I could name a dozen more moments from the film that will
be sticking in my memory. If Anderson had pulled all those pieces of
film-making together into a stronger whole, MAGNOLIA might have been the
year's best film, instead of just a very good one. It's certainly an
ambitious work, following many characters through one rainy day in the San
Fernando Valley. Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) is dying of cancer,
inspiring his young wife Linda (Julianne Moore) to guilt-ridden thoughts
and inspiring Earl's caretaker Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman) to seek out
Earl's estranged son, self-help guru Frank T. J. Mackey (Tom Cruise). Game
show host Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall) is also dying of cancer and also
has an estranged child, a coke-addicted daughter named Claudia (Melora
Walters) who becomes the object of affection for good-natured cop Jim
Kurring (John C. Reilly). Meanwhile, quiz show whiz kid Stanley (Jeremy
Blackman) tries to get through another show, while has-been whiz kid
Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) tries to get through another day.
     Anderson sets out to connect his stories thematically with a wild
prologue involving three unrelated tales of coincidence and chance. In a
way, the whole thing is little more than an extended attempt to justify
the film's most surreal device (more on which later). It's also undeniably
compelling, charged by Anderson's kitchen sink visual style. And for three
hours, that's what MAGNOLIA does: It delivers thrilling scene after
thrilling scene which, by all rights, should simply feel self-indulgent. 
Tom Cruise is positively electrifying as the motivational speaker who
teaches a course in male sexual conquest called "Search and Destroy" (it's
the best performance of his career until he once again makes the mistake
of crying on screen). Reilly is wonderful, both in his awkward
flirtations with the hopped-up Claudia and in his trite straight-arrow
response to a young would-be rapper. And Macy once again finds the wounded
humanity in a pathetic figure.
     When Anderson nails these characters at their most vulnerable and
conflicted, he creates sensational scenes for actors. MAGNOLIA plays like
a cross between a symphony and a jazz jam, with solo showcases building
toward splendidly edited crescendos. The only thing missing is an anchor,
something that ties Anderson's multiple story lines together in a way that
makes them greater than the sum of their parts. It shouldn't have been
that difficult considering the parallels Anderson sets up (present day
whiz kid and past whiz kid, the two cancer patients and their angry
progeny). And yes, sins of the fathers play a role in most of the
characters' lives. It's obvious Anderson wants us to feel a connection. I
just don't think he pulls it off, giving more attention to the individual
trespasses and recriminations than to the links between them.
     There's sure to be much talk about Anderson's most audacious attempt
to pull his story together, a cloudburst in which something besides rain
falls from the sky in a torrent. I'm not about to guess what Anderson was
thinking by loosing a Biblical plague upon the San Fernando Valley, nor
will I pretend the credulity-stretching trick doesn't feel more like a
grand gag than a dramatic fulcrum. There's also something about it that
just plain works -- maybe just as damn-the-torpedoes film-making, maybe as
acknowledgement of how primal forces can throttle you into re-evaluating
your life. That, in a nutshell, is the wonderful frustration of MAGNOLIA.
Part of you wants to expose Anderson as a philosophical poseur, and the
other half can't stop watching everything he throws at the screen.

Title
Review for Orgazmo (1997)
ORGAZMO
(Rogue)
Starring:  Trey Parker, Dian Bachar, Robyn Lynne Raab, Michael Dean
Jacobs, Matt Stone.
Screenplay:  Trey Parker.
Producers:  Fran Rubel Kuzui, Jason McHugh, Matt Stone.
MPAA Rating:  NC-17 (sexual content, profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's the film so daring that it earned a rare NC-17 rating!  It's the
film so controversial that Universal Pictures, the parent company of
October Films, forced October to create a separate releasing arm to
distance itself from the film!  It's the film so outrageous that only
Trey Parker, the bad-boy co-creator of "South Park," could have brought
it to you!  It's ORGAZMO, a film destined for midnight movie immortality!
     They say there's no such thing as bad publicity...unless you're a
potential film viewer who pays attention to it.  Anyone expecting naughty,
edgy fun from ORGAZMO might find that its most shocking surprise is how
uninspired much of its "outrageousness" is.  Sure, it hits two guaranteed
hot-buttons -- religion and sex -- in this tale of a naive Mormon lad
named Joe Young (played by Parker himself) serving a mission in Los
Angeles.  One day he knocks on the wrong door, and ends up on the set of
porno film director Maxxx Orbison (Michael Dean Jacobs).  Impressed by 
Joe's martial arts skills when he fends off a group of bodyguards, Orbison
offers Joe the lead role of Captain Orgazmo (physical stunts only, no sex
required), along with a huge paycheck which will allow Joe and his fiancee
Lisa (Robyn Lynne Raab) to marry in the Salt Lake City temple and live
well.  Oh, and Joe also becomes a _real_ crime-fighting super-hero who
uses a high-tech weapon to paralyze adversaries with intense sexual
pleasure.
     Occasionally, it looks like Parker is going to take this story on
just the right avenue of absurdity.  The film-within-the-film "Orgazmo"
turns out to be a crossover smash hit, ranking third on the all-time box
office chart and naturally creating demand for a sequel.  Then there's the
odd little aside in which Joe's film sidekick Ben (Dian Bachar) re-lives a
painful childhood memory of giving up "hamster style" martial arts, and a
cameo appearance by a certain heavenly personage.  There are a few amusing
gags sprinkled throughout ORGAZMO, many aimed at the absurdity of adult
film "plot" scenarios when they're not taking broad shots at Utah or the
Latter-Day Saints.
     The problem with Parker's sense of humor is that it can be terribly
lazy.  His favorite set-up involves wacky character incongruities which
actually lost most of their wackiness many iterations ago -- an old woman
swearing like a sailor, an old woman showing sexual arousal, a Japanese
sushi chef who uses hip-hop lingo.  His running gags include brilliant
innovations like a surly porno actor who passes gas in the face of others
("South Park's" Terence and Philip, eat your hearts out), and a lighting
technician (Parker's cohort Matt Stone) who begins every sentence with "I
don't want to seem like a queer or nothin'..." until eventually --
inevitably -- he actually makes a pass at another male character.  You can
see punch lines coming from several theaters away in ORGAZMO.
     Those who might attend just for prurient interest should also be
warned that ORGAZMO is about as tame as an NC-17 film could get.  Though
there's plenty of full-clothed grinding and prominent displays of certain
marital aids, there's nary an exposed female body part to be found (hairy
male buttocks, on the other hand, get a disturbing amount of screen time).
Make no mistake, Trey Parker's brand of offensiveness is far more
sniggering, middle-of-the-road crude than it is truly shocking.  There's
nothing wrong with the production being sloppy and amateurish; after all,
this is among other things a parody of porno films, with a wonderfully
cheesy fake explosion for a conclusion.  It's another thing when the humor
is often sloppy and amateurish...or worse yet, re-cycled.  ORGAZMO
inspires the one reaction a "daring," "controversial," "outrageous" film
can't afford:  a great big "so what?"

Title
Review for Bewegte Mann, Der (1994)
Starring:  Til Schweiger, Joachim Krol, Katja Riemann, Rufus Beck.
Screenplay:  Sonke Wortmann.
Director:  Sonke Wortmann.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Of all the things I might claim to understand about movies, I suspect
that what makes a given film popular with American audiences will never be
one of them.  With that in mind, what makes a film popular with
non-American audiences ranks somewhere with "what is the sound of one hand
clapping" on my personal scale of philosophical inscrutability.  Many is
the film which has come to these shores trumpeted as "one of the most
popular films ever in (fill-in-native-country), and it seems that for
every ONCE WERE WARRIORS (a record-breaker in New Zealand) there is a THE
MYSTERY OF RAMPO (last year's Japanese smash which turned out to be a bit
of psychedelic soft-core porn).  Now comes the German hit MAYBE...MAYBE
NOT ("Die Bewegte Mann" in Europe), a silly and fairly aimless sex farce
which provides a sexy star with very little to do.
     That star is Til Schweiger, who plays a randy waiter-cum-photographer
named Axel Feldheim.  Though he lives with girlfriend Doro (Katja
Riemann), Axel has a tendency to stray, and when Doro catches him in the
act, Axel finds himself out on the street.  His search for a place to stay
brings him to the attention of Waltraud (Rufus Beck), a flamboyant drag
queen who longs to seduce the handsome but hetero Axel.  Axel, however, is
on to Waltraud, and opts to stay with Waltraud's more reserved but just as
gay friend Norbert (Joachim Krol).  As it turns out, Norbert is also just
as interested in Axel, and makes his intentions quite apparent.  Thus
begins a series of misunderstandings in which Axel's attempts to patch up
his relationship with Doro are complicated by her believe that he may not
be cheating on her with women only.
     Writer/director Sonke Wortmann has created an erratic comedy which
swings back and forth from being an airy trifle to half-heartedly
attempting genuine character development.  The opening twenty minutes
promise plenty of broad laughs, from Doro's discovery of Axel and a
lady-friend in a bathroom stall to Waltraud's frantic attempts to look
remove his drag costume so as not to scare off Axel.  Gradually, however,
Wortmann begins trying to generate sympathy for his characters.  Norbert,
whose relationships always seem to be disasters, moons over Axel; Axel
himself experiences the other side of sexual predation in the bathroom of
a gay bar.  It appears as though Wortmann is setting up some lessons for
our two protagonists to learn from each other -- Norbert will learn to
make better romantic choices, and Axel will become a more faithful partner
to Doro.
     Then MAYBE...MAYBE NOT makes a jarring U-turn back to unapologetic,
bawdy slapstick, and throws any pretense at character out the window.
That wouldn't necessarily be a problem, particularly because the character
developments were looking fairly obvious, except that the comic situations
of the last half hour are equally obvious, and not very funny.  In one
scene, Norbert, Waltraud and Norbert's extremely butch lover (Armin Rohde)
are annoyed in a theater by three youths who walk into "A Death in Venice"
believing it's going to be "Rambo;" in another, Axel's tryst with an old
flame (Antonia Lang) becomes another chance for Doro to catch him in an
awkward position.  Wortmann directs it all with a sluggish inevitability,
and takes a final turn back to sentimentality which suggests that he was
just making the whole thing up as he went along.
     The chiseled-cheeked Schweiger has become a superstar in Germany as a
result of this role, and outside of his obvious sex appeal, I can't quite
see why.  He tries to give Axel a boyish charm to counteract his
incomprehensible shifts in personality, but he is the prototype pretty
face with little spark.  Similarly, Joachim Krol's award-winning role
seems remarkably shallow, and shows that America doesn't have a monopoly
on befuddling acting honors.  The problem I had with both roles, and with
MAYBE...MAYBE NOT as a whole, was that there seemed to be no point to any
of it, no growth of character, and some unappealing messages.  Every male
character is perpetually horny, Axel is just as big a jerk when the film
ends as he was when it started, and we are reassured that everything will
be fine because Doro will continue to be a door-mat and forgive Axel's
philandering yet again.  Perhaps it's just a cultural gap I was unable to
cross, but MAYBE...MAYBE NOT struck me as only sporadically amusing, and
sometimes flat-out irritating.  Which is why I will never make my living
deciding what movies get made.

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
(Universal)
Starring:  John Cleese, Jamie Lee Curtis, Kevin Kline, Michael Palin.
Screenplay:  John Cleese and Iain Johnstone.
Producers:  Michael Shamberg and John Cleese.
Directors:  Robert Young and Fred Schepisi.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (strong language, adult themes)
Running Time:  95 mintues.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In case you were unclear on this point, FIERCE CREATURES is _not_
technically a sequel to A FISH CALLED WANDA...though for the life of me I
can't figure out why that was the case.  It isn't as though John Cleese
had a radically different idea in mind for reuniting the four principal
cast members.  Cleese again plays a flustered authority figure; Kevin
Kline again plays a libidinous boor; Jamie Lee Curtis again plays a tough
bombshell who uses Kline and seduces Cleese; Michael Palin again plays an
animal lover with a distinctive speech pattern.  A great deal of effort
went into reminding you why you might have enjoyed A FISH CALLED WANDA,
and then FIERCE CREATURES only delivers halfway.  Though buoyed by a
couple of wildly farcical set pieces, FIERCE CREATURES often feels like a
film in search of an identity.
     FIERCE CREATURES opens in Atlanta, where Octopus Inc., run by
multi-billionaire communications tycoon Rod McCain (Kline), has just 
acquired a company which owns a small British zoo.  Determined to make the
zoo just as profitable as his other subsidiaries, McCain assigns former
police chief Rollo Lee (Cleese) the job of whipping the place into shape.
Rollo's plan is to weed out the tamest of the animals, leaving only the
most vicious beasts to attract customers, a plan which outrages staff
members like zookeeper Bugsy (Palin).  The zoo does begin to make more
money, but a couple of opportunistic Octopus employees hope for even
bigger things.  Marketing whiz Willa Weston (Curtis) hopes to create a zoo
franchise which will make her career, while McCain's ne'er-do-well son
Vince (also played by Kline) hopes to line his pockets with the zoo's
profits while turning it into a giant billboard.
     I don't blame the makers of FIERCE CREATURES for making its main
characters so similar to those in WANDA, because they were simply
following a time-honored tradition for recurring comic teams.  From Abbott
and Costello through Spade and Farley, it has been understood that it is
important for roles to be defined.  Id is id and ego is ego and never the
twain should meet; what would the audience make of it if Curly suddenly
began to browbeat Moe?  The problem with FIERCE CREATURES isn't that its
characters are familiar, it is that they are just familiar enough to be
disappointing.  Cleese does the put-upon bit, but he's not put-upon
_enough_; Kline does the dense bit, but he's not dense _enough_.  The
foursome found a dynamic in A FISH CALLED WANDA which worked to
perfection, and there are at least a few references in FIERCE CREATURES
intended to capitalize on that goodwill.  The script simply leaves you
waiting on several occasions, waiting for it to take an extra comedic step
which doesn't come.
     WANDA also featured the delightful sub-text of the clash between
British and American cultures, and FIERCE CREATURES chooses corporate
avarice and gross commercialism as its satirical targets.  Yet there too
the script by Cleese and Iain Johnstone is disappointingly half-hearted
with its jabs.  The ruthless tycoon played by Kline is clearly modeled
after Ruppert Murdoch, yet he escapes with no more interesting a character
trait than occasional flatulence; the outrageous possibilities of a zoo
with a ton of corporate sponsors yield some amusing results (particularly
the zoo uniforms covered in more labels than a stock car), but there is no
major payoff.  It is surprising primarily because Cleese did a funnier and
more concise job of skewering advertising in the Schwepps spot which
accompanied the American video release of WANDA, a spot recalled by an
advertisement Cleese wears on the back of his suit coat in CREATURES.
     FIERCE CREATURES does have its moments, most of them coming in the
last half hour as the zoo employees (including a soft-hearted Cleese) try
to save the zoo from closure.  There are a pair of winning scenes in the
classic farce tradition of slamming doors and near misses, one in a hotel
room and the other involving the younger McCain's attempt to impersonate
his father, yet that latter scene also reminds you of what is missing in
much of the humor in FIERCE CREATURES.  A FISH CALLED WANDA was infamous
as the film which had the audacity to make fun of dogs being killed in
unusual ways, to use stuttering as a comic device.  Until the finale of
FIERCE CREATURES, which includes a startling bit of black humor, the film
feels terribly tame.  The animals in this film aren't subjected to cruel
fates; they are photographed in all their quirky cuteness for "awww"
moments and used for sometimes amusing slapstick comedy.  Too many things
about FIERCE CREATURES feel just slightly askew, like the conflicted
results of film-makers trying both to remind you of something and to make
something completely different.  Part of that may be the result of two
directors (Robert Young and Fred Schepisi), but ultimately much of the
responsibility comes back to Cleese.  At times, his work sparks memories
not just of WANDA's outrageousness, but of classic Monty Python as well;
at other times, he seems to have softened with age.  He is just one of
several creatures in FIERCE CREATURES which isn't quite fierce enough.

Title
Review for Portrait of a Lady, The (1996)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Nicole Kidman, John Malkovich, Barbara Hershey, Martin Donovan,
Mary-Louise Parker, Richard E. Grant, Valentina Cervi, Viggo Mortensen.
Screenplay:  Laura Jones, based on the novel by Henry James.
Producers:  Monty Montgomery, Steve Golin.
Director:  Jane Campion.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  145 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Directors, both cinematic and theatrical, face their greatest
challenges when dealing with "classic" material, and not just because
audience familiarity with the text makes every step a potentially
treacherous one.  No, the real temptation is to go too far in an attempt
to make the material -- pronounce the following word dripping with sarcasm
-- "relevant."  Never mind that the text most likely achieved its lofty
status because its themes transcend the socio-political flavor of the
month; the director is determined to give it a contemporary spin.  The
irony of Jane Campion's adaptation of Henry James' THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY
is that Campion treats the narrative, a narrative with an intrinsic
emotional force, with meticulous faithfulness, while her heavy hand as a
director inspires plenty of head-shaking.
     THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY is the story of Isabel Archer (Nicole Kidman),
a young American woman living in England with her aunt and uncle, the
Touchetts (Shelley Winters and John Gielgud), and her cousin Ralph (Martin
Donovan) after the death of her own parents.  The independent and
strong-willed Isabel attracts several suitors, including Lord Warburton
(Richard E. Grant) and Caspar Goodwood (Viggo Mortensen), but she rejects
them all out of a desire to experience life before being constrained in
marriage.  Her opportunities for experience are increased when the elder
Mr. Touchett dies and leaves her a sizeable inheritance, allowing her to
interact with European society.  Among her companions is Madame Merle
(Barbara Hershey), who introduces Isabel to a gentleman named Gilbert
Osmond (John Malkovich).  Osmond intrigues Isabel, and the two eventually
marry, but when Osmond reveals his true nature Isabel must struggle to
maintain her sense of self.
     Campion opens THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY with voice-overs of modern women
discussing their thoughts on romantic love, followed by a credits sequence
featuring black-and-white images of women (we assume the same ones we just
heard) just hanging out together in nature.  The images set up a "this is
now/that was then" dichotomy which makes Isabel the object of a kind of
anachronistic pity; "The poor dear," we are told metaphorically, "if only
she had been born 100 years later."  Campion certainly sympathizes with
female characters who seem trapped by societal proscriptions (like the
heroines of AN ANGEL AT MY TABLE and THE PIANO), but nearly every
interpretation of Isabel feels misguided and simplistic.  The central
question of why Isabel marries Osmond is addressed with a pair of fantasy
sequences which make the jarring suggestion that her tragic decision was
the product of good old-fashioned lust.  That notion might have been
easier to stomach if Osmond had been played by anyone other than John
Malkovich.  Malkovich has turned the aloof Lothario into his stock
character, but the portrayal has become more chilly than chilling.  When
Osmond is supposed to be seductive, he seems bored, and Isabel's actions
make no sense.
     If the decision to marry Osmond is given a questionable treatment,
the decision to stay with him is given a merely annoying one.  After
filling THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY with images of bars, gates, slamming doors
and barriers of all kinds, Campion has Isabel stymied by a locked door as
the film ends.  It is a perfectly valid interpretation to suggest that
Isabel had no choice; it may also be the least interesting one.  After
hammering away at us with the restrictive nature of Isabel's 19th century
world for two and a half hours (and at times you can feel every minute of
it), it feels like a cheat for her to rehash the same point when
addressing the most compelling enigma the novel has to offer.
     It is all the more frustrating because there are so many other things
THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY does right.  With the exception of Malkovich, the
casting is superb, including Nicole Kidman as the wide-eyed innocent
abroad with the ERASERHEAD hairdo.  Barbara Hershey and screenwriter Laura
Jones to a particularly fine job with Madame Merle, a complex creature of
uncertain motivations.  She becomes a great tragic figure, as manipulated
as she is manipulating, even if Campion sometimes seems determined to turn
her into DANGEROUS LIAISONS' Mme. de Merteuil to Malkovich's recycled
Valmont.  Martin Donovan is also quite good as the consumptive,
kind-hearted Ralph, and Mary-Louise Parker has a delightful bluntness as
Isabel's American friend Henrietta.  The production offers a variety of
pleasures, notably Stuart Dryburgh's impressive photography, but Campion
flattens the most involving stories in THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY.  James'
clash of American and European sensibilities becomes Campion's clash of
19th century and 20th century sensibilities.  The result is essentially a
cautionary tale which only matters if you plan on doing any time travel,
or a film treatment of a hypothetical prequel:  "Smart Women Who Make
Foolish Choices: The Early Years."

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
     In Costa-Gavras' new drama MAD CITY, reporter Max Brackett (Dustin
Hoffman) stumbles onto the story of a lifetime exactly when his career
needs it most -- and his soul needs it least.  Once a network news star,
Brackett has been serving time in the journalistic gulag of Madeline,
California since insulting anchorman Kevin Hollander (Alan Alda) on the
air.  While doing a puff piece at a local museum, Brackett finds himself
staring at his return ticket to the big time when laid-off security guard
Sam Baily (John Travolta) storms the place with a gun to demand his job
back, then inadvertently shoots another guard and ends up taking a group
of school children hostage.  Sam wants nothing more than to get out alive;
Brackett sees a chance to guide the story by becoming ringmaster of the
ensuing media circus as Sam's mouthpiece and de facto press secretary.
     Twenty years ago, a film like MAD CITY would have been a provocative
and disturbing exploration of how television news can exploit a story to
feed our blood-lust.  In fact, it was...it was called NETWORK.  Paddy
Chayefsky's brilliant script and Peter Finch's mesmerizing final
performance as unraveling anchorman Howard Beale made NETWORK a classic of
dark satire, spotlighting the natural culmination of an obsessive pursuit
of ratings.  It was just outrageous enough to be entertaining, and just
plausible enough to be alarming.
     MAD CITY arrives in a different era.  The notion that televison news
isn't just about the news...well, it just isn't news.  It never manages to
arouse much more than nods of recognition, because the images and
situations are familiar to the point of cliche:  Alda's self-important
anchorman, the selective editing of a story to fit a pre-determined
agenda, the absurdity of a growing media feeding frenzy.  As an ethics
lesson, it's strident but ineffective, preaching to a nation of converts
about a problem they all know exists but have no idea how to correct.
     It's fortunate, then, that MAD CITY does a solid job of giving its
subject a human face.  That face doesn't belong to Dustin Hoffman, though
Brackett is the story's central character.  Watching his developing
crisis of conscience -- and similarly the conversion of Brackett's naive
assistant (Mia Kirshner) into a cutthroat reporter -- becomes a chore as
the script slogs toward the inevitable.  No, it is John Travolta who
creates the most vivid portrait in MAD CITY as a man overwhelmed by
circumstances before he has any idea what they are.  Playing simple
challenges any actor, yet Travolta plays simple with a disarming
effectiveness.  His trust that Brackett will act in his best interest is
wonderfully misguided; his incredulous expressions as Brackett takes over
an interview with Larry King capture the realization that the media's best
interests are always their own.  Sam Baily acts as a stand-in for everyone
who sees the media going berzerk over things they barely comprehend.
     The relationship moments between Baily and Brackett are among the
strongest in MAD CITY, though it also provides a few chuckles as the
public sympathies sway in the breeze.  Like most "message" films, however,
it begins to wilt every time it underlines its message.  MAD CITY's
primary stumbling block is its obviousness -- of the character
developments, of the plot progression, of the scolding tone the film takes
towards its targets.  It reaches an audience which doesn't find
sensationalism disturbing, but it delivers its story as though no one else
had told it before.  That's two places NETWORK was prescient:  telling the
story of media gone mad, and anticipating viewers who would come to find
the madness tolerable.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
     James L. Brooks has a rare gift as a film-maker:  the ability to give
the people what they want while also giving them what _he_ wants.  TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT was a crowd-pleasing tear-jerker buoyed by smart comedy and
rich characterizations; BROADCAST NEWS brought a throwback romantic comedy
sensibility to an upscale study of journalistic ethics with an
unexpectedly down-beat conclusion.  Even the notorious Little Musical That
Wasn't I'LL DO ANYTHING demonstrated Brooks' willingness to cut bait when
he knew the audience had no interest in what he was offering.  His
instincts have proven as irreproachable as they are unconventional.
     AS GOOD AS IT GETS had the potential for a classic written all over
it.  For once, however, Brooks doesn't have a grip on how best to handle
his material.  He casts Jack Nicholson as a bile-spewing satyr, then turns
him into a repentant bile-spewing satyr.  He crafts an appealing
relationship between two troubled and mis-matched characters, then muddles
the mix by throwing in a third troubled character.  He takes 90 minutes of
great material and drags it out over nearly two and a half hours.
     It didn't have to be like that.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS has a wonderful
character at its center, a truly horrible human being named Melvin Udall
(Nicholson).  A reclusive writer diagnosed with obsessive-compulsive
disorder, Melvin has turned his condition into carte blanche to insult and
berate everyone with whom he comes in contact.  That includes Carol
Connelly (Helen Hunt), the waitress who serves him breakfast every
morning, and goes double for his neighbor, gay artist Simon Bishop (Greg
Kinnear).  Then, unexpectedly, Melvin finds himself forced to do something
for someone else, caring for Simon's dog Verdell after Simon is beaten in
a robbery attempt.  That one act seems to launch Melvin on a spate of
selflessness, including helping Carol with her sickly son and driving
Simon to meet with his estranged parents.
     It's an admirable theme for a film, this notion of a man deciding to
change himself when he realizes the effect those changes have on other
people.  But why, of all people, Jack Nicholson?  The pre-conversion
Melvin is an outrageous delight, getting away with hateful rantings few
other characters could without inspiring protests.  His growth as a
character saps him of all his bad-boy energy, leaving in its place a
tricky romance with Hunt which somehow works even with Nicholson
perpetually looking like he's straining at the end of a leash.
     That romance might have been even more effective if Brooks had kept
his attention fixed on how Melvin and Carol are so good and so bad for
each other.  Hunt is superb and heart-breaking as the single mother
struggling to discover how to live her own life again, matching Nicholson
for don't-mess-with-me vigor.  Yet there's always Simon there in the
background, a distracting tangent the lightweight Kinnear can't invest
with sufficient gravity.  His story adds little but the adorably grungy
Verdell, a couple of showboating scenes for Cuba Gooding Jr. as a fuming
art dealer, and a lot of padding to an already over-long film.
     Brooks is too adept with a witty line to turn out a tedious film, and
Nicholson and Hunt too capable to fumble the well-rounded
characterizations.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS simply turns out to be a rare case
of Brooks failing to ride what works for all it's worth.  It's funny but
fitful, because we know this isn't as good as a James L. Brooks film gets.

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
     The two main characters in Neil LaBute's IN THE COMPANY OF MEN -- the
best American film to appear this year, and the best film _likely_ to
appear -- do some of the most vicious things screen characters have ever
done without weapons.  Chad (Aaron Eckhart) and Howard (Matt Malloy), a
pair of mid-level corporate drones on a six-week project assingment in
their company's Midwestern branch office, decide to find a vulnerable
woman they can mutually seduce and abandon as their revenge against all
women.  Howard berates deaf secretary Christine (Stacy Edwards) for having
the audacity to be selective about her romantic partners; Chad forces a
male office intern to drop his pants and prove that he has the gonads for
the business world, physically as well as metaphorically.  You may walk
into IN THE COMPANY OF MEN expecting it to be about the cruelty of men
towards women.  You'll walk out realizing it is about cruelty in every
possible permutation.
     It is a testimony to LaBute's talent as a storyteller that he allows
us to see the damaged humanity beneath the despicable things his
characters do.  Matt Malloy's Howard, who seems to be the kinder of the
two, simply has a more benign pathology.  A desperately insecure man
recently dumped by his fiancee, Howard longs for the ability to exert
power over others yet has no idea how to use it.  Though he has no desire
to hurt Christine, his interest in her is purely selfish.  He merely wants
someone so pathetic and so low-status that she would never leave him.
     Then there is Chad, a startling creation rendered with creepy
nonchalance and savage humor by Aaron Eckhart.  It would be easy to read
Chad as a simple sociopath; it would also be the least interesting
reading.  Bubbling beneath his brutality is a profound fear and paranoia,
making Chad so convinced that everyone is ready to screw him over that it
only makes sense for him to screw everyone else over first.  His every
action is a pre-emptive first strike of rage -- at women, at his
co-workers, at the world -- designed to keep everyone off-balance through
the bald-faced exertion of power.
     LaBute employs notably static composition throughout IN THE COMPANY
OF MEN, the kind which might be written off as the work of a rookie
film-maker who hasn't discovered his visual style.  I can't imagine a more
fitting style for this story.  For all their barely-diluted bile, Chad and
Howard are essentially creations of their world, a corporate culture of
claustrophobic cubicles, water cooler back-stabbing and mundane line-ups
at the copy machine.  LaBute's shots cage his performers, observing their
panicked movements from a distance as though they were zoo animals.  There
is no room for morality IN THE COMPANY OF MEN; the concept is a luxury for
those who still feel human.
     IN THE COMPANY OF MEN is caustic enough that it's not always a
pleasant experience, but it's hardly like taking medicine, either.
LaBute's brilliant script and Eckhart's star-making performance as Chad
create some of the year's most hilarious moments, even if the laughter is
born of disbelief as frequently as delight.  In fact, Chad is so charming
that there is bound to be consternation over his portrayal, concern that
he could be viewed as a cutthroat role model.  How sad if there were even
a glimmer of truth to such perceptions.  Neil LaBute has unveiled the
horror of an environment of gross selfishness turned toxic -- it's
Objectivism rendered as psychosis.  Watching IN THE COMPANY OF MEN is like
watching a car wreck between ethics and primal urges, one from which it's
almost impossible to look away.

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Jack Nicholson, Annette Bening, Pierce Brosnan, Glenn Close,
Danny DeVito, Michael J. Fox.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Gems, based on MARS ATTACKS! by Topps.
Producers:  Tim Burton, Larry Franco.
Director:  Tim Burton.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, brief sexual situations).
Running Time:  105 minutes
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I really wanted MARS ATTACKS! to be the movie INDEPENDENCE DAY
wasn't.  Tim Burton's malevolent alien invasion saga faces such obvious
comparisons to 1996's other malevolent alien invasion saga that it would
have been a pleasure to find that this one was The Little B-Movie Homage
That Could, juxtaposed with The Big B-Movie Re-tread That Couldn't.  I
came ready for delight, and instead I found disappointment.  MARS ATTACKS!
is a more inventive film than INDEPENDENCE DAY, but it is also a sluggish
one, in addition to having a surprising streak of nastiness.  If you
didn't know MARS ATTACKS! and INDEPENDENCE DAY were made at about the
same time, you might swear that Tim Burton had a chip on his shoulder
about having to follow a blockbuster.
     MARS ATTACKS! begins with the discovery that flying saucers from Mars
are headed towards the earth in massive numbers.  President Jimmy Dale
(Jack Nicholson) is concerned and hawkish General Decker (Rod Steiger) is
ready to launch the nukes, but Dr. Donald Kessler (Pierce Brosnan) assures
everyone that such an advanced civilization is almost certain to be
peaceful.  The Martian visitors find the red carpet rolled out for a
diplomatic greeting in the Nevada desert, but the historic close encounter
turns into a bloodbath when the aliens open fire on humans.  The president
and Kessler believe that it was all the result of a cultural
misunderstanding, and try to make peace.  Unfortunately, it seems that the
visitors are only interested in making pieces, as they launch an all-out
attack on the earth.
     Like INDEPENDENCE DAY, MARS ATTACKS! follows groups of characters in
several different locations as they face the threat of extra terrestrial
assault.  In Las Vegas, recovering alcoholic/New Age adherent Barbara
(Annette Bening) joins forces with ex-boxer/casino photo opportunity Byron
(Jim Brown) and singer Tom Jones (himself); in Kansas, donut shop employee
Richie (Lukas Haas) joins forces with his senile grandmother (Sylvia
Sidney).  What is surprising is that these stories are played so straight,
and with nearly as little character development as INDEPENDENCE DAY.  Each
character is given an eccentric moment, after which he or she generally
disappears either entirely for a long time.  No one really gets a chance
to _do_ anything, notably Natalie Portman (re-visiting Winona Ryder's
morose teen from BEETLEJUICE as the First Daughter).  Pierce Brosnan and
Sarah Jessica Parker are entertaining as the unctuous Kessler and a dim
fashion reporter, respectively, but their appearance is most memorable
because they share a tender love scene as severed heads.
     That moment highlights what is both best and worst about MARS
ATTACKS!, which is the perverse visual humor.  Burton tosses out some
truly twisted gems along with just-plain-silliness, and the deliberately
cheesy visual effects are both effective on their own and as a source for
an internal joke involving a Godzilla film.  The problem is that nothing
really builds in MARS ATTACKS!; the jokes are often stand-alone vignettes
un-related to anything which precedes them or anything which follows them,
making for a film which jerks along unsteadily with little momentum.  MARS
ATTACKS! is based on a series of trading cards by Topps, and appropriately
enough that is the way the movie feels:  you flip over one scene, chuckle
at it, then forget it almost before you flip over the next one.
     The one thing Burton and screenwriter Jonathan Gems do much better
than INDEPENDENCE DAY is allow us to get to know the aliens, and what a
bunch of leering interplanetary sociopaths they are.  The scenes on board
the flying saucers show the Martians' delight at duping humanity and
wreaking havoc, and while the malicious Martians provide their share of
laughs, the whole concept is strangely mean-spirited.  The entire invasion
consists of variations on the aliens seducing humans with a friendly word,
a teary eyeball or a pleasing form, then finding new and creative ways of
stabbing them in the back (sometimes literally).  Burton almost seems to
share this smirking disregard for his characters (and an unexplainable
hatred of birds) as he reduces them to scorched skeletons in scenes which
may be too graphic for youngsters.  There is plenty of imagination in MARS
ATTACKS! (the aliens' downfall certainly does not involve a computer
virus), but the ideas prickle rather than tickle.  Something seemed to be
annoying Tim Burton when he made MARS ATTACKS!, and he's probably going
to be more annoyed if audiences decide it isn't the movie INDEPENDENCE DAY
was.

Title
Review for Trois couleurs: Rouge (1994)
Starring:  Irene Jacob, Jean-Louis Trintingnant, Jean-Pierre Lorit.
Screenplay:  Krzysztof Kieslowski and Krzysztof Piesiewicz.
Director:  Krzysztof Kieslowski.
     Welcome to that annual year-end tradition, "Guess Which Foreign
Language Film Gets Jobbed By the Motion Picture Academy Rules."  Every
year the Academy claims it's trying to make the qualification
requirements more fair; every year, it seems they come up with more
restrictions than the Book of Leviticus.  Politics and arbitrary
interpretations continue to rob the category of worthy nominees, and
this year will be no exception: RED, the third installment in
Krzysztof Kieslowski's extraordinary THREE COLORS trilogy, has been
rejected as an entry from Switzerland.  The Academy should rectify that
slight immediately and nominate it as one of the best films of the year
in any language, a beautiful, resonant work that is the best of three
very good films.
     RED stars Irene Jacob as Valentine, a young student and model
living in Geneva.  Her life takes an odd turn one day when she hits a
dog with her car, and attempts to return it to its owner.  But the
owner, Joseph Kern (Jean-Louis Trintingnant), appears less than
concerned about the dog, or much of anything for that matter.  A bitter
retired judge, Joseph spends his days alone in his home listening in on
his neighbors' cellular telephone conversations.  At first Valentine is
disgusted by Joseph, but eventually the two develop a curious
friendship as Valentine learns about the tragedies of Joseph's life.
     As with the previous two installments in Kieslowski's trilogy, RED
represents one of the three principles behind the French tricolor.  Red
is for fraternity, but as was also true of BLUE and WHITE, the
treatment of that theme is far from the obvious.  While on one level
RED is about the friendship between Valentine and Joseph, it is also
about the way all lives interconnect, about a fraternity of all
humanity.  A parallel storyline involves a young lawyer named Auguste
(Jean-Pierre Lorit) who is preparing to become a judge, and his
relationship with his girlfriend (Federique Feder).  Gradually it
becomes clear that this story is meant to mirror events in Joseph's
life decades earlier, and it appears that they will be equally tragic.
However, Kieslowski and his co-screenwriter Krzystof Piesiewicz use
these two stories to show how redemption operates in its own time, and
how chance occurrences connect lives in ways which can't possibly be
expected.
     This brings up the question of whether it is necessary to have
seen BLUE and WHITE to fully appreciate RED.  I feel irresponsible
discouraging seeing this film in even the slightest manner, because it
has so much to offer on its own merits.  The production design is
stunning, and Zbigniew Preisner's score again provides amazing depth.
Irene Jacob, who starred in Kieslowski's THE DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE,
gives an incredibly sensitive performance as Valentine, who finds
herself on an unexpected journey of moral discovery.  She is matched by
Jean-Louis Trintingnant's Joseph, and their scenes together are
something truly special.
     That said, I truly believe that there are layers of RED which are
best understood when viewed through the lens of the complete trilogy.
For example, both BLUE and WHITE feature a scene where an elderly
person struggles to place a bottle in a recycling bin.  The scene
appears in RED as well, but in this case Valentine recognizes the
struggle and helps the old woman.  And in RED's emotional climax, the
lead characters from all three films appear, and an understanding of
what those other characters have been through to end up together makes
the scene infinitely more potent.  That is what makes RED so special:
it has a scope and a heart which, when combined with BLUE and WHITE, is
truly breathtaking.  This is the work of a filmmaker at the height of
his creative powers, which makes Kieslowski's announcement that he is
retiring a genuine tragedy.  RED stands independently as a great film;
the three colors together create a miraculous tapestry, one of the
great film experiences of the decade.
-- Scott Renshaw Stanford University Office of the General Counsel

Title
Review for Demolition Man (1993)
Starring:  Sylvester Stallone, Wesley Snipes, Sandra Bullock.
Screenplay:  Daniel Waters and Robert Reneau & Peter M. Lenkov.
Director:  Marco Brambilla.
     It would seem Sylvester Stallone has learned a lesson: give the
people what they want.  Sly wanted to expand into comedy, but he made
bad choices and audiences stayed away in droves.  So long STOP!  OR MY
MOM WILL SHOOT, hello CLIFFHANGER.  The response--$75 million plus
domestic grosses for CLIFFHANGER--was clear.  Now the second coming of
Sly the Action Hero brings us DEMOLITION MAN, and I expect it will do
similarly big business, despite the fact that it's a bloated
conglomeration of failed story elements and lead balloon punch lines.
     DEMOLITION MAN opens in 1996 in crime-torn Los Angeles.
Unorthodox cop John Spartan (Stallone) brings in psycho drug lord Simon
Phoenix (Wesley Snipes), but not before being held responsible for the
deaths of several hostages.  Both men are sentenced to cryonic
imprisonment, where they are to be "reprogrammed" to mend their ways.
Thirty-six years later, Los Angeles has merged with surrounding areas
to become San Angeles, a blissful metropolis with strict behavioral
regulations, free of virtually all crime.  Phoenix escapes during a
parole hearing, forcing a painfully unprepared police force to free
Spartan.  Teaming with an action-hungry female cop (Sandra Bullock),
Spartan sets out to recapture Phoenix.
     The main problem with DEMOLITION MAN is that I never bought its
underlying premise for a moment.  The screenplay makes virtually no
effort to explain how the authorities of the 21st century were able to
convince its mainstream populace to abandon sex, drinking, smoking and
profanity.  Even the idea that it was a radical response to a city
turned into a warzone cannot explain the single generation transition.
It's just a pax ex machina, and it doesn't work.  If that were not
enough, there is the further problem of a scattered storyline with too
many plot threads.  In addition to the basic adversarial conflict of
Spartan and Phoenix, theres an obligatory love interest, a conspiracy
headed by the respected architect of the peace (Nigel Hawthorne),
Spartan's fish-out-of-water culture clash with his futuristic pacifist
counterparts, and an underground movement (literally) led by comic
Denis Leary.  For an action film, DEMOLITION MAN never really gets up a
head of steam, spending far too much screen time on superfluous
subplots.
     The fact is, at times DEMOLITON MAN seems more intent on being a
satirical comedy than an adventure.  Many of the gags are based on the
requisite anachronisms, most notable a running string of malapropped
20th century cliches by Bullock which are true groaners.  We also get
references to Rambo (get it?) and the Schwarzenegger Presidential
Library which seem like they're expected to be funny just because
they're mentioned.  Denis Leary also gets a ranting bit straight out of
his stand-up routine for no apparent reason other than to give him
something to say.  There are times when the loopy sense of humor works,
such as the rather incongruous skill programmed into Spartan.  However,
for every one clever bit there are five hammered into the ground like
the gratingly repeated penalty buzzer every time a character swears.  I
actually began hoping for things to blow up; at least that was done
well.
     As for the acting, the less said the better.  Snipes has perverse
fun with Phoenix, but he's on screen far too little, and his character
is reduced to cocky one-liners.  Stallone is more personable than he's
been in years, but he too has no character to speak of.  Bullock does
have a character, just no recognizable talent.  Rob Schneider of
"Saturday Night Live" has a funny bit part, but that's about all for
bright spots.
     DEMOLITION MAN is bound to appeal to some on a very basic level;
there are great pyrotechnics, and the production design is impressive.
But I found it wanting even as macho entertainment.  Much of the action
is uninspired, annoyingly photographed or badly edited, and even that
action is too long in coming.  DEMOLITION MAN is like that old joke
about a bad restaurant:  the food is awful...  and such small
portions.

Title
Review for Thinner (1996)
Director:  Tom Holland.
Screenplay:  Tom Holland and Michael McDowell, based on the novel by
Stephen King.
Director of Photography:  Kees Van Oostrum.
Producers:  Richard P. Rubinstein, Mitchell Gallin.
Starring:  Robert John Burke, Joe Mantegna, Lucinda Jenney, Michael
Constantine.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
     In 1984, a novel called THINNER came out, attributed to an author
named Richard Bachman who had four previous horror novels to his credit.
Soon, however, several readers noticed a strong resemblance between the
prose of Mr. Bachman and that of another popular horror novelist.  Sure
enough, Stephen King admitted to the pseudonym, and THINNER quickly
climbed the best-seller lists, proving that the King name was an important
selling point.  Over a decade later, a film version is being sold as
STEPHEN KING'S THINNER, and it might be enough to make the author wish he
had never claimed it.  THINNER is a positively dreadful piece of
supposedly suspenseful dreck, positively obese with miserable decisions
and laughable acting.
     Robert John Burke stars as Billy Halleck, an overweight attorney with
a gift for using the system to his advantage matched only by his gift for
putting on pounds.  One evening, a bit of automotive-erotic activity
between Billy and his wife Heidi (Lucinda Jenney) results in the death of
a gypsy woman, but Billy's friends in the courts see to it that there are
no legal consequences.  That does not guarantee no consequences of any
kind, as the gypsy's father Tadzu Lemke (Michael Constantine) curses Billy
with the single word "thinner."  Soon Billy finds his diet is really
starting to work...a bit too well, as the pounds begin to disappear
uncontrollably.  Wasting away and desperate, Billy calls in a favor with a
mobster named Ginelli (Joe Mantegna) in an attempt to force Lemke to
remove the curse before he vanishes entirely.
     While most of the basic plot elements in STEPHEN KING'S THINNER match
those in the novel, director and co-scripter Tom Holland (who brought the
nearly-as-wretched STEPHEN KING'S THE LANGOLIERS to TV screens last year)
has somehow managed to abandon every thematic thread which made the story
interesting.  King's popularity is based, I think, largely on his
identification with the horror comics of his youth; his stories have been
contemporary morality tales with good triumphing over evil and poetic
justice meted out in spades.  THINNER depends on the understanding that
Billy is a weak, unscrupulous man trying to weasel out of a punishment he
deserves, and that the gypsies are an unjustly persecuted minority.
Holland, on the other hand, apparently doesn't believe that we can handle
a protagonist who is in the wrong, so he turns the gypsies into cackling
villains and Billy into the poor, persecuted hero.
     That portrayal of Billy is turned into a joke by Robert John Burke,
whose performance is simply appalling.  As the fat Billy, he is the worst
kind of stereotype of overweight people, a grinning happy-go-lucky buffoon
who rolls his eyes and mugs at every opportunity; as the thin Billy, he is
a rasping cadaver who never seems to register the full weight (pardon the
expression) of his predicament.  In both cases, there is not an ounce of
intelligence in Burke's performance, and not a trace of humanity.  In
fact, it is so broad that you might be tempted to believe that Holland is
playing the whole thing as a goofy horror-comedy like his CHILD'S PLAY,
with Burke his punch-line-spewing Chucky stand-in.  If so, it is not
nearly outlandish enough to be entertaining, and every scene is directed
with such a plodding obviousness that it STEPHEN KING'S THINNER becomes a
black hole of suspense.  As just one example, imagine every possible way
it might have been presented creatively that Ginelli had poisoned the
gypsies' dogs, then compare your idea to having Mantegna say to the dogs,
"How about a little strychnine?"
     With bad readings of bad lines in badly directed scenes, THINNER
offers little but the opportunity to watch Burke's prosthetic
transformation from 290 pounds to 130 pounds.  The makeup is the creation
of Greg Cannom (MRS. DOUBTFIRE, THE MASK), and it is impressive work.  The
"fat suit" (full-body in one shower scene) is excellent, but it was an
even greater challenge to take 50 pounds off, and superb lighting helps
Cannom achieve that effect.  Still, all the latex in the world can't turn
a cow pie into a chocolate mousse, and STEPHEN KING'S THINNER reeks of
incompetence.  It is going to be hard for King to distance himself from
this one given his cameo as a pharmacist.  Perhaps he just wanted a little
something for the headache it is bound to give him.

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Helen Hunt, Bill Paxton, Cary Elwes, Jami Gertz.
Screenplay:  Michael Crichton, Anne-Marie Martin.
Director:  Jan DeBont.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The makers of big-budget summer movies and those who attend those
movies appear to have come to an understanding, an understanding best
exemplified by an observation I made while watching TWISTER.  Several
times during the film, there would come a point where it would become
clear that the latest sequence showcasing Industrial Light & Magic's
computer-generated tornados was at an end (it usually coincided with the
dialogue once again becoming audible), at which point several members of
the audience would stand up and quickly make their way towards the
restroom.  They were probably rather secure in the knowledge that they
would not miss any crucial plot twists or juicy bits of character
development during these brief expository interludes, and even if they
did, they were not missing what they had come to the film to see.  Not a
penny of the money they had plunked down would be wasted if they missed a
couple of the characters engaged in conversation.
     It is this complicity which produces monotonous displays of
technological prowess like TWISTER, a film with a script that makes
JURASSIC PARK's look positively labyrinthine by comparison.  The shell of
a story involves a pair of daredevil meteorologists named Jo (Helen Hunt)
and Bill (Bill Paxton) who are about to finalize their divorce after years
of chasing storms together.  Bill is engaged to another woman (Jami
Gertz), and comes to collect the divorce papers just as Jo and her team
are about to set off in pursuit of a rare series of tornados.  Naturally,
Bill comes along as they attempt to deploy a device which will provide
valuable data for predicting tornados, just as a corporate-financed (and
hence evil) competitor named Jonas (Cary Elwes) is attempting to do the
same thing.  Also naturally, the device can only work if it is picked up
by a tornado crossing its path, which results in the scientists racing to
catch up with twisters so they can leave one of devices.
     I suppose you have to give the creators of TWISTER credit for coming
up with a premise which involves people trying their damnedest to get close
to tornados rather than trying their damnedest to get very far away; it
could have been even more tedious.  The problem is that it doesn't take
long before TWISTER starts to look like a loop film.  There are only so
many ways you can film a bunch of vehicles driving through fields, over
dirt roads, along highways before it becomes a chore to watch, and while
director Jan DeBont uses every swooping trick at his disposal, there is an
awful lot of nothing going on during TWISTER an awful lot of the time.
There may be more driving in TWISTER than there was in DeBont's debut
feature SPEED.
     Of course, SPEED had Sandra Bullock playing an actual character to
engage the audience; TWISTER has Helen Hunt playing producer and
co-scripter Michael Crichton's generically flinty female scientist
character.  Hunt is probably a better actor than Bullock, and certainly
provides the requisite cuteness factor, but Bullock's heroine was able to
comment on SPEED's improbability throughout the film with her priceless
reactions.  The trite love/hate relationship with which Hunt is saddled is
something no one could tunnel out from under, and neither she nor Paxton
has the big screen charisma to make the scenes without inclement weather
anything but a monumental bore.  Every single character manages the
astonishing non-Euclidean feat of being less than one-dimensional, with
characterization coming in such subtle forms as the fleet of identical
black mini-vans used by Elwes' corporate scientists (as though you
actually needed to see the three 6's behind his ear) or the Van Halen
tunes blasted by one of Hunt's more annoyingly quirky cohorts (Philip
Seymour Hoffman).
     Films like TWISTER are often defended with comparisons to amusement
park rides -- that they make up in thrills what they lack in drama.  I
don't think TWISTER even qualifies as a roller-coaster.  Yes, the visual
effects are impressive, but it is impossible to watch them with anything
but detachment, because as much as DeBont tries, he can't imbue a natural
phenomenon with a personality (he actually tries harder than he does with
his actors).  TWISTER is a surprisingly gloomy and inert experience, with
exactly two flashes of inspiration through its two hour running time.
When they come, they only serve to remind you what the rest of the film is
lacking:  any sense of the fun that summer movies are supposed to provide.  
Whatever one might think of the increasing mindlessness of effects-driven
blockbusters, you'd think they could at least manage to entertain, or to
give you a reason to come back when you get up to go to the restroom.

Title
Review for Cats Don't Dance (1997)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Voices of Scott Bakula, Jasmine Guy, Natalie Cole, Ashley
Peldon, Kathy Najimy, John Rhys-Davies, Matthew Herried, Mark Dindal.
Screenplay:  Roberts Gannaway, Theresa Pettengill, Cliff Ruby and Elana
Lesser.
Producers:  David Kirschner and Paul Gertz.
Director:  Mark Dindal.
MPAA Rating:  G
Running Time:  73 minutes, plus 7 minute Foghorn Leghorn short.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Ten years ago, feature film animation was on the endangered species
list.  Industry leader Disney had all but given up on animation, and no
one else believed that G-rated cartoons could be anything but box-office
poison.  That was before the booming family video sell-through market made
the risk seem less risky, and before a succession of Disney features --
THE LITTLE MERMAID, BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, ALADDIN, THE LION KING -- put
the luster back on animation to the tune of over $2 billion in profits
including merchandise and ancillary sales.  Suddenly everyone wanted a
piece of the action:  chief rival Universal (home of the AMERICAN TAIL and
LAND BEFORE TIME films), Fox (the upcoming ANASTASIA with Meg Ryan) and
now Warner Bros.  I'm not sure the contenders for Disney's throne have
learned a key lesson, though:  story is king.  Cute critters and peppy
tunes, like those in Warner's CATS DON'T DANCE, aren't enough to support a
flimsy script and simplistic animation.
     CATS DON'T DANCE is set in Hollywood circa 1940, where a cat named
Danny (voice of Scott Bakula) has just arrived from Kokomo, Indiana with
dreams of fame and fortune.  Unfortunately, song-and-dance cat Danny is
about to learn a hard truth from animal agent Farley Wink (Frank Welker):
the movies don't want cats who sing and dance, they want cats who go
"meow."  After invoking the wrath of child star Darla Dimple (Ashley
Peldon) by upstaging her in one of her movies, Danny is ready to join the
ranks of disappointed animal performers like Tillie Hippo (Kathy Najimy),
Mammoth Studios mascot Woolie (John Rhys-Davies) and lovely Persian cat
Sawyer (spoken by Jasmine Guy, sung by Natalie Cole).  But Danny is
determined to fulfill his dream, and tries to rally his new friends to put
on the show of their lives.
     That plot is the perfect set-up for an animated film, giving animals
plenty of chances to break into song, and indeed CATS DON'T DANCE is a
fairly lively endeavor.  Unfortunately, there is little focus to all that
energy.  The film barrels along for a tidy 73 minutes, cranking out Randy
Newman musical numbers which seem to peter out after about a dozen bars;
even the show-stopping production number "Big and Loud" is over
practically before you realize it's supposed to be the show-stopping
production number.  The over-riding philosophy of CATS DON'T DANCE seems
to be that if you blast through everything at a breakneck pace, perhaps no
one will have time to notice the lack of attention to detail.
     No such luck.  CATS DON'T DANCE doesn't just feel rushed -- it looks
rushed, like the result of a deadline coming up a bit too fast.  The
background animation is frequently sketchy and drab, a pale imitation of
the vibrant land and cityscapes characteristic of Disney's features, while
the character animation relies on Hirschfeld-style celebrity caricatures
and animals who seem to be recycled from Warner's afternoon "Animaniacs"
series.  Even the most interesting character, the psychotically
egotistical Darla Dimple, is a gloss on "Tiny Toon Adventures"' wee
she-demon Elmyra.  At least Darla, a wicked poke at celebrity petulance,
is entertaining to watch, as is her monstrous bodyguard Max (voiced by
director Mark Dindal).  Most of the other characters are overly familiar
-- Kathy Najimy's jovial hippo is a re-tread of her jovial nun from the
SISTER ACT films, and adorable little penguin Pudge (Matthew Herried) is
THE LITTLE MERMAID's Flounder with wings -- or a waste of the voice
talent.  There's little excuse for lining up Hal Holbrook or the legendary
Betty Lou Gerson (the original Cruella DeVil) and giving them four or five
lines each.
     That probably won't mean very much to kids, who will likely be amused
by the high-spirited goings-on, but that's just not enough after the way
Disney has raised the bar in the last several years.  The House of the
Mouse has been smart enough to hitch its wagon to timeless stories,
resonant themes and memorable characters.  CATS DON'T DANCE is lightweight
stuff, a simple "naive kid makes good" story as much _from_ the 1940s as
_about_ the 1940s, and that's not necessarily a bad thing.  In order to be
more than a diversion, however, a film like CATS DON'T DANCE needs
something more:  a song you'll be humming for the rest of the day, a
visual style which keeps you enthralled, a character you wouldn't mind
seeing turn up in a direct-to-video sequel.  There's not much of a
creative spark to CATS DON'T DANCE, especially after it opens with a
Foghorn Leghorn short which won't make anyone forget Chuck Jones' Warner
Bros. glory days.  It's something to fill a family-friendly spot on the
spring break release schedule, good business but not a very good film.

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
THE INSIDER
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Al Pacino, Russell Crowe, Christopher Plummer, Philip Baker
Hall, Diane Venora.
Screenplay:  Eric Roth and Michael Mann, based on the article "The Man Who
Knew Too Much" by Marie Brenner.
Producers:  Michael Mann and Pieter Jan Brugge.
Director:  Michael Mann.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  155 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As a storyteller, Michael Mann was born at least 200 years too late.
In another place and time, he would have crafted operas -- grand-scale
tales of human conflict blown up several times larger than life,
accompanied by choruses and crescendos. Neither the subject matter nor the
genre alters Mann's sense of the theatrical. The gothic horror of THE
KEEP, the cop/crook conflict of HEAT, the historical drama of THE LAST OF
THE MOHICANS -- all were treated as Very Important Films, sometimes
through sprawling running times, sometimes through lingering slow-motion
images. Mann's brand of operatic cinema has never quite been my cup of
tea, and I was even more skeptical when I knew he had gotten his hands on
material like THE INSIDER. This was, after all, a story about undeniably
important issues: the insidious influence of corporate consolidation;
journalistic ethics; the weighty responsibility of challenging the Powers
That Be. Could Mann resist creating a film that would collapse under the
weight of its self-imposed significance?
     He could, and he did, though THE INSIDER is a much better personal
story than it is a sweeping indictment of journalism-as-big-business.
Russell Crowe stars as Dr. Jeffrey Wigand, who has just been fired from
his job as director of research for the Brown & Williamson tobacco company
when the film opens. Looking for a little extra cash -- and perhaps a
small measure of payback -- Wigand agrees to act as a consultant when "60
Minutes" producer Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino) comes to him with documents
obtained from Phillip Morris. Wigand has no intention of revealing any of
his own secrets until anonymous threats and harassment inspire him to blow
the whistle on tobacco industry manipulation of nicotine. Bergman is ready
to go public with Wigand's story, until the threat of litigation from
Brown & Williamson throws the future of the story into question. As Wigand
attempts to pick up the pieces of his life, Bergman attempts to pick up
the pieces of "60 Minutes'" compromised integrity.
     The details of CBS' ignominious corporate cave-in are already fairly
well-known: Allegedly afraid of how the spectre of litigation would affect
a proposed sale of the network to Westinghouse, network executives ordered
Wigand's on-air interview shelved. The story of how Wigand's life was
forever changed is considerably less well-known. Mann and co-screenwriter
Eric Roth paint Wigand as nobody's idea of a hero, a contentious
occasionally-heavy drinker whose manner does little to challenge Brown &
Williamson's description of him as possessing "poor communication
skills." Russell Crowe transforms himself physically into the pale, doughy
scientist, never shying away from Wigand's darker side. Ironically, that
pig-headed side of Wigand is shown to be the reason he persists even when
Brown & williamson starts playing the hardest hardball. It's also the side
that makes THE INSIDER most compelling -- and most unnerving -- as B&W
begins digging up every possible speck of dirt from Wigand's past to
discredit him. It's a notion only a half-step removed from the tragic
state of our political process -- the discouraging idea no sane man would
open his entire history, warts and all, to public scrutiny.
     As long as THE INSIDER sticks close to Wigand's story and the
ever-mounting repercussions for his actions, it's pretty strong stuff. In
the second half of the film, however, CBS corporate politics begin to take
over the narrative. Bergman confronts Mike Wallace (Christopher Plummer)
and executive producer Don Hewitt (Philip Baker Hall) over their
willingness to accept the dictates of the corporate big-wigs; he works in
the background to expose the cover-up of Wigand's interview. Paper chase
storytelling is tough to pull off, and Mann does a more than serviceable
job of finding drama in ethical debate. It's just that once again he's in
Opera Man mode, giving Pacino a stage for railing with righteous
indignation (a scenario that never does Pacino any favors). The subject is
interesting, but it is not about the deathknell of the free press. Mann
has trouble recognizing when a film isn't about earth-shaking
consequences.
     He also has trouble recognizing when enough is enough. At more than
two and a half hours, THE INSIDER starts to drag, and feels particularly
out-of-control when Mann drags in the Unabomber story near the conclusion. 
Granted, he finds time in those two and a half hours for some dynamic
individual scenes, including Bruce McGill's magnificent tirade as a
Mississippi prosecutor staring down a smirking Brown & Williamson
attorney. Mann does know how to make a moment of truth crackle; he knows
how to create compelling human stories. He doesn't always know when enough
is enough -- when that next shot of someone walking in super slow-mo will
feel overly pretentious, or when that wailing chorus will begin to grate
on the nerves. Eventually, even after plenty of solid filmmaking, you're
just ready for that fat lady to hurry up and sing already.

Title
Review for Alaska (1996)
     ALASKA is about as basic as film-making gets, and that is not
entirely a criticism.  Disney used to make a series of films called "True
Life Adventures," wilderness yarns chock full of great scenery, cute
critters and just enough Darwinian conflict not to be alarming to the
little ones in the audience.  Those films were basic -- a vista, an
animal, a fight, repeat -- but most of the time they were also effective.
That is the vibe ALASKA is looking for, and might actually have matched if
it hadn't had so many darned humans.  There is some lively adventure in
ALASKA, but when most of the real fun comes on four legs, it is difficult
not to lose patience with the two-legged cast members.
     ALASKA stars Thora Birch and Vincent Kartheiser as Jessie and Sean
Barnes, teen-aged siblings recently re-located from Chicago to the small
Alaskan fishing village of Quincy after the death of their mother.  Their
father Jake (Dirk Benedict), a former commercial airline pilot, now runs
an air taxi service, and it is on one of his runs that he encounters a
fierce storm and crashes.  Search and rescue teams are unable to locate
him, but Sean and Jessie refuse to give up on their father, and set out
themselves determined to find him.  What they find first is a wilderness
full of dangers, including treacherous climbs, white waters and a nasty
wildlife poacher named Perry (Charlton Heston).  They also find a friend
in an orphaned polar bear cub who joins them on their journey and becomes
a sort of spirit guide.
     I won't waste too much time on the trite and silly elements of
ALASKA, because fortunately scripters Andy Burg and Scott Myers do us the
same favor.  The film's set-up is a riff on FREE WILLY, with a troubled
youth (Sean is annoyed about his new home), a bond with a lovable animal
and even a dash of Native American mysticism; it also provides the
well-worn trope of the lost parent.  Vincent Kartheiser does the surly bit
with a bit more obnoxiousness than one might hope for, and Thora Birch
(the young Melanie Griffith in NOW AND THEN) makes a generic smarter
younger sister, but they are on a par with the rest of the acting in
ALASKA.  It even has the best bad actor in screen history as its villain
(who, coincidentally enough, happens to be the director's father).  And
yes, it does perplex me how Sean made it through three days of rock
climbing, wading in icy rivers and plodding through the frozen tundra in
his Adidas high-tops.
     No, the problem with ALASKA isn't that the people are one-dimensional
characters or mediocre actors.  The problem is that they are people.  The
reactions of the children (and parents) all around me told me exactly what
they wanted to see every time Cubby the polar bear was on the screen.
Even after Coke has turned computer-generated frolicking polar bears into
a corporate logo, the real thing is still adorable; I dare anyone not to
smile ad a cuddly cub doing a belly slide down a snowy embankment.  That
bear is sympathetic and entertaining in a way his human co-stars can never
hope to be, and he is the real star of ALASKA.  He just doesn't have any
supporting players.
     That points up a significant drawback in a film which is supposed to
be a wilderness adventure, namely that there is not enough wilderness,
especially in the first half.  There is plenty of photography of majestic
locations (of a strangely flat variety by cinematographer Tony Westman),
but Fraser C. Heston doesn't quite know what to do with it.  It is fine
for a family adventure like ALASKA to turn in only a rudimentary plot
provided it delivers the thrills, and they finally start coming with about
half an hour left.  That last half hour is very exciting, though, with a
white water sequence as impressive as anything in THE RIVER WILD and a
literal cliff-hanger of a climax.  By then, over 70 minutes into ALASKA,
young viewers could be getting might restless.
     The last shots in ALASKA find our polar bear hero trotting off with
two other bears to form a happy adoptive family.  _That's_ a story I
really would have enjoyed, and I couldn't help wondering why ALASKA hadn't
tripled its polar bear content much earlier.

Title
Review for Out of the Past (1998)
     People will probably misinterpret the documentary OUT OF THE PAST as
much as the controversial event which is at its center, which is irony
enough.  It would be even more ironic if they misinterpret it in exactly
the same way:  without any direct knowledge, because they are already
convinced they know what it's about.  Such tends to be the case when you
are dealing with the perpetually volatile subject of homosexuality.  It
happens even more frequently when the suggestion is proferred that gays
and lesbians are human beings with much to contribute to the world.
     That, and that alone, is the fierce conviction behind OUT OF THE
PAST.  The story which serves as its jumping-off point is the tale of
Kelli Peterson, an "out" lesbian who attempted during her 1995-96 senior
year at Salt Lake City's East High School to start a student club called
the Gay-Straight alliance.  Its purpose, according to Peterson, was
understanding -- understanding between gay students that they were not
going through the difficult experience alone, understanding between gay
and straight students that gays were not aliens to be feared or hated.
Local school board members, legislators and parents in conservative Utah,
however, believed the club was an unwholesome influence promoting the
lifestyle of homosexuality, and wanted the club eliminated.  Faced with
the federally-mandated choice between permitting all extra-curricular
clubs -- including the Gay-Straight Alliance -- and banning all clubs, the
school board opted for the latter.
     That story alone would be compelling enough to make for a solid piece
of documentary film-making.  Peterson emerges as a determined, remarkably
mature young woman with a surprisingly wry sense of humor about the uproar
she never meant to cause.  It's fascinating and entertaining simply
watching her calm determination in the face of parents who announce their
concerns in board meetings that exposure to homosexuality will be a
dangerous influence on impressionable teenagers.  The issue for the forces
in opposition to the Gay-Straight Alliance isn't just their undoubtedly
sincere belief in the immorality of homosexuality.  They desire nothing
less than the invisibility of homosexuals, believing perhaps that if no
one talks about them, they will simply go away.
     That widely-held societal belief drives even more fascinating
secondary story in OUT OF THE PAST -- a series of biographical vignettes
intertwined with Kelli Peterson's struggle.  The vignettes describe
individuals I was embarrassed and angry to discover that I had never heard
of, gay Americans who contributed to the arts, political thought and
social justice.  The most intriguing of these is Bayard Rustin, a member
of Martin Luther King Jr.'s inner circle of advisors who was the architect
of non-violent civil resistance and the primary organizer of the march on
Washington.  Rustin became a lighting rod for opposition, both from
segregationists like Strom Thurmond and from other black political
leaders.  Like many others, he has been excised from history books because
of his sexual orientation, contributing to the continued invisibility of
gay Americans as role models.
     Like many "talking head" documentaries, OUT OF THE PAST does have its
slow patches, and not all the biographical sketches are uniformly
enlightening.  Ultimately, however, the film does what it sets out to do:
it places Kelli Peterson in a historical context, validating the legacy
which she had been denied.  It was the societal denial of that legacy
which made a Gay-Straight Alliance necessary in the first place; it was
the search for heroes that turned Kelli Peterson into one.

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
     It's okay for a horror film to be a metaphor; in fact, they can work
best on an underlying psychological level.  The original THE THING and
INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS served as analogs to Cold War-era
anti-Communist paranoia, while any number of takes on the vampire legend
have delved into drug addiction effectively.  A scary film can be more
than just scary, but it shouldn't work so hard at it that the whole thing
becomes a pretentious, preposterous mess.  RAVENOUS is just such a
convoluted concoction, throwing mountains of sub-text at its tale of
cannibalism in the vain hope that something might stick, instead of merely
"ick."
     The setting for RAVENOUS is a remote U.S. Army outpost called Fort
Spencer, a way-station hidden in the Sierra Nevadas of California circa
1847.  Fort Spencer is the new assignment of Capt. John Boyd (Guy Pearce),
a soldier bearing a tainted medal of honor after his cowardice led to an
inadvertent triumph during the Spanish-American War.  Boyd discovers that
Fort Spencer is populated by an odd crew of outcasts -- introspective Col.
Hart (Jeffrey Jones), peyote-fueled cook Cleaves (David Arquette), drunken
doctor Knox (Stephen Spinella) -- but the strangest case is yet another
new arrival.  His name is Colqhoun (Robert Carlyle), a man discovered
half-dead in the snow with quite a tale to tell.  It's the a tale of a
stranded westward party that turned into a cannibalistic feast, a tale of
how the consumption of human flesh created a strange sort of monster.
     Every once in a while, when RAVENOUS settles down for some good
old-fashioned terror tension, you can almost enjoy it.  There are a few
nicely staged confrontations and creepy moments in Antonia Bird's
direction (or perhaps that of Milcho Manchevski, the director replaced two
weeks into production), including a sequence involving a sneak attack that
builds far longer than you might think possible.  Writer Ted Griffin slips
a few darkly comic lines into the dialogue, and Robert Carlyle's manic
performance helps support that tone whenever he's on screen.
     How much more tolerable RAVENOUS might have been if Griffin and Bird
had been content to let the black comedy guide them.  Instead, it becomes
a potpourri of narrative notions and random themes:  the dehumanizing
destruction of battle (i.e., war itself as cannibalism), the mad drive for
the American frontier (i.e., the Manifest Destiny as cultural/ecological
cannibalism), the equally mad drive for the gold in them thar hills (i.e.,
the Gold Rush as economic cannibalism), plus yet another gloss on
addiction, and on and on to a dizzying degree, with the Native American
myth of the Weendigo thrown in for good measure.  Boyd's tortured quandary
over whether to join this particular Diners' Club is played as such grand
opera, infused with such socio-political baggage, that Guy Pearce looks
like he's carrying the entire weight of Western Civilization on his
shoulders in every scene.
     No one's saying that the jaunty gruesomeness of EATING RAOUL is the
only possible approach for a successful foray into same-species snacking.
It may, however, be the best approach.  When Jeffrey Jones is cracking
wise while supping on a human stew, RAVENOUS begins to emerge from its
coma of self-importance; when he pleads to be relieved of the misery of
his hunger, you wonder when he suddenly developed a character of any
significance.  At a certain point, RAVENOUS becomes so consumed with
putting a heady spin on its subject matter that it consumes itself.  A
horror film with something to say between shocks is fine.  It's rare --
and annoying -- to find one that just won't shut up.

Title
Review for Romeo Is Bleeding (1993)
     Sometimes you can learn a lot about a film from its ad campaign.
The television spots for ROMEO IS BLEEDING featured a high energy,
rapid-edit montage which made the film look like an all-out action
thriller; the print ads, on the other hand, featured stylized
renderings of the stars in a scene out of a 50's crime comic, with
critical blurbs in word balloons.  And that about sums up what's wrong
with ROMEO IS BLEEDING.  There's a fair amount of style and
black-humored mayhem, but underneath it is a film that really doesn't
seem to know whether it wants to be a noir thriller or a parody of a
noir thriller, and a script that is an absolute mess.
     Gary Oldman stars as Sgt. Jack Grimaldi, a New York cop with a
wife (Annabella Sciorra), a mistress (Juliette Lewis) and ethics that
are always for rent.  Although primarily assigned to watch over
organized crime figures preparing to testify against their bosses, his
big money comes from one of those bosses, a kingpin named Falcone (Roy
Scheider) who pays Jack to reveal where the stool pigeons are
roosting.  Falcone's latest target is Mona Demarkov (Lena Olin), a
psychotic "hit person."  Mona offers Jack $350,000 *not* to reveal her
whereabouts, and to help her stage her death.  Jack soon realizes he
can't have it both ways, as Falcone and Mona begin closing in from
opposite sides.
     Stylistically, ROMEO IS BLEEDING seems to be on the right track.
Director Peter Medak has two great films about British crime figures to
his credit (THE KRAYS and LET HIM HAVE IT), and shows he's studied his
American gangster classics.  The lighting is evocative, the air is
usually thick with cigarette smoke, and trumpets and saxophones wail
plaintively in the background.  A running voice-over narrative by Jack,
told in retrospect and in the third person, achieves the right Raymond
Chandler-esque tone of impending doom.  The stage is set to have some
fun with film noir conventions--the dumb blonde girlfriend, the
urbane mob boss--but that's not what happens.
     What does happen is that Medak and screenwriter Hilary Henkin
decide to serve up a freaked-out combination of 1940s and 1990s crime
film sensibilities, sort of a "what if Quentin Tarantino and Abel
Ferrara collaborated on a Phillip Marlowe adaptation." Consequently,
the tone of ROMEO IS BLEEDING is radically uneven, with moody
conversations slamming into blood-spattered confrontations, and
characterizations which don't make a shred of sense.  The most glaring
and gruesome example of this confusion is Lena Olin's Mona, who is part
femme fatale and part Terminator.  There is no consistency to her
actions, as she goes to a macabre extreme to make her feigned death
appear real, then kidnaps the man she was supposedly trying to fool,
has his henchmen work for her, and then turns herself in to the
police.  The only logic in ROMEO IS BLEEDING is the logic of excess, as
the filmmakers abandon all pretense of telling a story in the name of
the outrageous.
     Structurally, the script for ROMEO IS BLEEDING is a disaster.  One
of the key points to the story is that Jack sends his wife away for
safety, so that he can meet up with her later.  This conversion comes
out of nowhere; to that point we had only seen a vague tolerance
between them (in a single scene), and nothing to indicate that Jack
sincerely loved her.  Jack is developed in a careless, haphazzard
manner that left me without any concern for what happened to him.
Finally, ROMEO IS BLEEDING commits perhaps its most unpardonable sin
with a final showdown between Jack and Mona which was so anti-climactic
that I groaned out loud.  At times, the film seems to have been
improvised, as though in the middle of shooting someone would
periodically say, "Hey, wouldn't it be cool to do this?"  ROMEO IS
BLEEDING looks good, occasionally very good, and Olin's performance is
entertaining, but the film also appears to have been edited with a
knife and fork, and amounts to little more than a series of loosely
connected scenes with shock value.

Title
Review for Replacements, The (2000)
THE REPLACEMENTS
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Keanu Reeves, Gene Hackman, Orlando Jones, Jon Favreau, Brooke
Langton, Rhys Ifans, Brett Cullen, Jack Warden, Ace Yonamine.
Screenplay:  Vince McKewin.
Producer:  Dylan Sellers.
Director:  Howard Deutch.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If the theme of THE REPLACEMENTS -- and I use the word "theme" so
loosely that it may fall off at any moment -- is that certain overpaid
entertainers have grown complacent and lazy and that audiences prefer
seeing genuine effort, there's more than a teensy bit of irony in it. BAD
NEWS BEARS-style comedies have been the preferred brand of sports film
since ... well, since THE BAD NEWS BEARS. A lovable loser/band of lovable
losers eventually rallies around his/her/its underdog status and surmounts
impossible odds to emerge victorious -- what tale could be more
fundamentally American?
     Of course, the "work ethic" is supposed to be fundamentally American,
too, but you'd never know it from the sort of sleepwalking screenwriting
in THE REPLACEMENTS. Inspired by the 1987 NFL players' strike and the
teams' subsequent hiring of replacement players, the story is set in a
fictional professional football league about to experience its own work
stoppage. The owners, including Washington Sentinels owner Ed O'Neil (Jack
Warden), have decided to play with replacements, and O'Neil hands the job
of putting together his makeshift team to ex-coach Jimmy McGinty (Gene
Hackman). McGinty has plenty of players in mind, but the key to his team
is Shane Falco (Keanu Reeves), a former college All-American quarterback
now scraping barnacles off of fishing boats. Reluctantly, Falco joins the
Sentinels, and tries to rally his rag-tag bunch to a playoff spot.
     Three guesses whether they make it, and the first two don't count,
but never mind that. Never mind too that THE REPLACEMENTS doesn't exactly
treat the labor dispute with any complexity (owners and striking players
bad, cheerleaders and replacement players good). And never mind even that
the music supervisor appears to have been stuck in a time warp in which
nothing recorded after 1985 exists. Movies like THE REPLACEMENTS have
always been about the hijinks of the players, both on and off the field; 
the predictability of the formula has been part of its appeal. There are a
some fun characterizations -- Jon Favreau as an unhinged SWAT
cop-turned-middle linebacker, Rhys Ifans as chain-smoking Welsh soccer
player-turned-placekicker Nigel -- and some amusing confrontations with
the striking players. The losers get better, the bad guys get their
comeuppance, there are some decent chuckles along the way, everyone
applauds. No muss, no fuss.
    And no common sense. For a fairly simple comedy, THE REPLACEMENTS is
full of baffling plot points. What undefined cheerleader sympathy strike
required head cheerleader-and-Keanu-romantic-interest-in-waiting Annabelle
(Brooke Langton) to put together a new group made up of exotic dancers? 
Why was it necessary to bring in the vaguely blackballed McGinty to lead
the replacement team? Why do people keep referring to players on opposing
teams as All-Pros when the regular players are supposed to be on strike?
Why does a team that has been practicing together for less than a week
appear to be running complicated passing plays on every down? Even
ignoring the most obvious question of all -- why cast Keanu Reeves as the
lead in a comedy -- THE REPLACEMENTS appears to have been constructed with
no thought but getting to the big ending, when everyone can applaud for
the triumphant underdog.
     What it comes down to, really, is laziness. Veteran hack comedy
director Howard Deutch (GRUMPIER OLD MEN, THE ODD COUPLE II) is a
button-pusher, knowing how to get the most obvious laughs out of the most
obvious situations at the most obvious times. Mining the potential from
their premise appears way beyond the capacity of Deutch and screenwriter
Vince McKewin. For a "legendary" coach, McGinty sure ignores every
possible creative use of his team's unique abilities. How about a running
play behind sumo tackle Jumbo (Ace Yonamine)? Handing a kickoff return to
speedster receiver Clifford Franklin (Orlando Jones)? Quick-kicking with
the thunder-footed Nigel to get good field position? It doesn't take a
tactical gridiron genius to realize that the makers of THE REPLACEMENTS
just don't care. The concept is pre-sold, the fans are in the seats, and
the overpaid entertainers couldn't care less about giving their all for 
the people ultimately paying their salaries. Is anyone interested in
making a movie about replacement film-makers?

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
PAY IT FORWARD
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James
Caviezel, Jon Bon Jovi, Angie Dickinson.
Screenplay:  Leslie Dixon, based on the novel by Catherine Ryan Hyde.
Producers:  Peter Abrams, Robert Levy and Steven Reuther.
Director:  Mimi Leder.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, drug use, violence)
Running Time:  122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When I finished reading Catherine Ryan Hyde's novel PAY IT FORWARD,
one simple thought occurred to me: "Someone's going to have to screw up
big time to keep this from being a real crowd-pleaser." It was far from
clear that PAY IT FORWARD would make for a great film; there were a lot of
plot threads to condense, and a definite danger of Pollyanna overkill. But
there was something primally satisfying about the whole idea of it, and a
kicker of a finale that was a true tear-jerker on the page. Great, not
necessarily; hanky-wringing and applause-inducing, most definitely.
     Maybe a fable like PAY IT FORWARD could only have worked on the
page. More likely, maybe it only could have worked with a director who
knew how to tell an inherently emotional story with some degree of
subtlety. Mimi Leder utterly botches this tale of a middle school student
named Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment) inspired by his social studies
teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) to develop a unique plan of 
altruism. Trevor devises a sort of human chain letter of good deeds: He
will help three people with something big, then request that his
beneficiaries in turn "pay it forward" to three more people each. His
classmates scoff at his optimism, but Eugene is intrigued by Trevor's
idea. He also finds himself a part of the plan when he becomes one of
Trevor's good deeds, as Trevor attempts to fix him up with his alcoholic
mother Arlene (Helen Hunt).
     Much has been made of the fact that the Kevin Spacey character was
African-American in the novel, but PAY IT FORWARD isn't ineffective
because it's not faithful enough. Indeed, screenwriter Leslie Dixon comes
up with an effective alternative back story for the scars Eugene bears,
and she creatively weaves the sub-plot involving a reporter (Jay Mohr) 
chasing down the origin of the Pay It Forward "movement" into the main
plot. There are quite a few things to like about the film, from Helen 
Hunt's willingness to look positively ghastly, to the use of the Las Vegas
setting. And of course there's Kevin Spacey, who can always be counted on
to dazzle even when the material is less than stellar. He's a fascinating
screen performer, and here he gets at the hope buried in a bitter man.
     That's what Spacey can do even when a director seems to be working
against him. Leder excelled as a small screen director for "E.R.," but in
PAY IT FORWARD, as in DEEP IMPACT, she once again misses every opportunity
to make the film about more than its concept. Granted, Dixon's script is
better with individual moments than it is at building a narrative, but
Leder makes a flawed script even worse. Every shot involving a human face
involves a close-up so intense you can count pores; supporting characters
-- notably Jon Bon Jovi as Trevor's absentee dad -- aren't given a chance
to develop beyond a single note. Her biggest blunders are saved for one of
PAY IT FORWARD's most intense scenes, in which Eugene bares his soul to
Arlene regarding his own past. Leder's editing choices rob the moment of
all its power, including pointless cutaway's to Hunt's reaction shots. 
Every time a scene calls for finding a core of emotional honesty, Leder
opts instead to convey sincerity by blowing up Haley Joel Osment's
head to the size of a dirigible and letting the tears roll down his
pouting face.
     Plenty of opponents of PAY IT FORWARD will probably fixate on the
film's final shot, which borrows blatantly from another feel-good film
that shall remain nameless. Once again, the problem isn't that it differs
from the novel's climax; it isn't even that it's familiar from another
film. The problem is that it's simply a movie moment, one that ignores
that the payoff in PAY IT FORWARD should be the success or failure of
Trevor's idea. It's manipulative and overwrought, but the real issue is
that it's not organic to the story. Leder spends two hours grasping for
how to tell this story visually, and almost never comes up with the
appropriate choice. PAY IT FORWARD is still bound to leave some viewers
thinking they've seen a good film, just because it leaves them a little
teary-eyed. I doubt many of them will feel any resonance from those tears
24 hours later. Congratulations, Mimi Leder, with assistance from Leslie
Dixon. You managed to screw it up big time.

Title
Review for Inventing the Abbotts (1997)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Liv Tyler, Joaquin Phoenix, Billy Crudup, Jennifer Connelly,
Joanna Going, Will Patton, Kathy Baker.
Screenplay:  Ken Hixon, based on the short story by Sue Miller.
Producers:  Ron Howard, Brian Grazer, Janet Myers.
Director:  Pat O'Connor.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Picture, if you will, the final moments of THE GODFATHER:  Michael
Corleone is greeted as the new Godfather by his underlings, and his wife
Kay, played by Diane Keaton, stands outside the door of his study.  As the
door closes on Kay and on the film, a voice-over by Keaton intones, "At
that moment I realized that there was a part of Michael's life I would be
shut out of forever."  Voice-over narration is a common cinematic device,
particularly in nostalgic period films, yet I can think of few narrated
films in the last thirty years which wouldn't have been better without it.
Narration tends to be a crutch, an attempt by a film-maker to be more 
"literary" which instead suggests that he lacks the patience to reveal
the characters' psychology without short-cuts.  INVENTING THE ABBOTTS is a
pleasant period drama for a while, until the episodic story grinds to a
halt as the actors sit around waiting for the narrator to tell us how they
feel.
     INVENTING THE ABBOTTS opens in 1957 in the fictional Illinois town of
Haley, and focuses on two families from different social circles.  Doug
Holt (Joaquin Phoenix) and his older brother Jacey (Billy Crudup) are
working class teenagers living with their widowed mother (Kathy Baker);
the Abbott sisters -- Alice (Joanna Going), Eleanor (Jennifer Connelly)
and Pamela (Liv Tyler) -- are the daughters of office furniture
entrepreneur Lloyd Abbott (Will Patton).  Though class divides the Holts
and Abbotts, family history connects them -- Doug and Jacey's father was
Lloyd's business partner, and Jacey believes that Lloyd cheated the Holts
out of their rightful share of the business.  Jacey's bitterness leads him
to a fling with the rebellious Eleanor, but Doug is also fascinated with
the "bad girl."  Further complications develop when Pamela confesses to
feelings for Doug, and when Jacey's obsession with the Abbotts leads him
into conflict with the protective Lloyd, as well as with his own brother.
     The opening half-hour of INVENTING THE ABBOTTS is by far its best,
energized by the awkwardness and buzzing hormones of its teen-aged
principal characters.  Doug is established as a good-hearted square,
showing up at a fancy Abbott party with a greased pompadour and India-ink
sideburns in honor of Elvis, while brother Jacey flirts confidently with
Eleanor.  It is Jennifer Connelly's funny, sexy and sly performance 
as Eleanor which provides the real spark to the first act of ABBOTTS, her
every scene punctuated by a wicked smile, a glimpse of underwear (her own)
or a grab of the crotch (not her own).  She is even a presence when she's
not on screen, her photograph acting as Doug's true objet d'amour while he
makes a clumsy pass at Pamela on her living room couch.
     Then, thirty minutes into the film, Connelly is banished from the
narrative, and the whole production goes into a stupor trying to figure
out what its about.  There are really two separate plot-lines in INVENTING
THE ABBOTTS -- Jacey's attempts to live vicariously through the Abbotts
and Doug's off-and-on romance with Pamela -- but once Connelly is out of
the picture, the episodic story is sluggish and rarely involving.  The
single predominant reason for that lack of involvement is the narration,
provided by an uncredited Michael Keaton to underline the action whenever
and wherever possible.  It becomes ever more obtrusive as the film moves
along, first providing merely background information but eventually
announcing the motivations of every character.  It is the narrator who
tells us how Jacey _really_ feels about Alice, not Billy Crudup's
performance; it is the narrator who make sure we understand how wonderful
Mrs. Holt is, not the interactions between the characters.  And, as though
aware that they are under no obligation to convey their emotions through
anything as mundane as acting, the actors simply don't bother.  Joaquin
Phoenix and Liv Tyler -- who needs to learn a different emotional shade
before she's too old to play "the virgin" -- make a perfectly nice couple,
but neither delivers a personality.  Both are pleasant to look at, and
they might as well be modeling for still photographs.
     Given the way Fox has marketed INVENTING THE ABBOTTS to focus on its
"hot young stars," it's not unreasonable to think of them as models in a
story.  It's not that they can't act; they're simply not given much of a
chance to do more than look as warm and inviting as the 1950s suburban
middle-America director Pat O'Connor (CIRCLE OF FRIENDS) creates.  The
audience isn't given much of a chance either, which ultimately may explain
more of my dissatisfaction with INVENTING THE ABBOTTS.  As artfully made
and sensitively plotted as it might be, INVENTING THE ABBOTTS ends up
insulting the audience with its over-reliance on narration.  TV's "The
Wonder Years" became a parody of itself when Daniel Stern piped up every
forty seconds or so to clarify significant details which required
absolutely no clarification, and that's the way INVENTING THE ABBOTTS
feels after 108 minutes.  AMERICAN GRAFFITI didn't need Richard Dreyfuss
in voice-over to explain his wonderful days of innocence; STAND BY ME got
that honor.  When narration makes a film feel more lazy than literary, as
happens in INVENTING THE ABBOTTS, it's time to shut up and follow the old
writer's rule:  show, don't tell.

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
     In Hollywood, the place where paradigms reign and conceptual
blockbusting goes to die, among the most hallowed of paradigms is the 90
minute running time.  You may be able to get away with 85, and five or ten
fewer for an animated feature, but anything less would appear to risk
rending the very fabric of space-time.  Never mind that a popular
45-minute film, with its potential for nine or ten cut-rate showings a day
plus concession sales from twice as many intermissions, would be an
exhibitor's fantasy.  The 90-Minute Mandate exists for one fairly obvious,
and fairly depressing, reason:  it's less complicated for studios to keep
throwing money at bloated, mediocre films than it is for them to figure
out how to make and market shorter, better ones.
     NOTHING TO LOSE could have been a hilarious 30 or 40 minutes of comic
film-making.  Instead, it's an over-stuffed 97 minutes, not because it
should have been but because it _had_ to be.  The premise is solid enough:
upper-crust L. A. ad executive Nick Beam (Tim Robbins) comes home from
work one day to find his wife (Kelly Preston) in bed with is boss.
Devastated, Nick begins driving aimlessly through the city, until he is
accosted at a stop light by rookie car-jacker T. Paul (Martin Lawrence).
Much to T. Paul's chagrin, however, Nick does not go gentle.  Instead, he
kidnaps the would-be assailant, beginning a road trip of armed robbery,
mistaken identity and buddy bonding which will take the pair from L. A. to
Arizona and back again before they launch a plot for revenge against
Nick's arrogant boss.
     Along the way, writer-director Steve Oedekerk places Nick and T. Paul
into some bizarre and truly inventive situations.  One scene finds a
terrified hardware store clerk asked to compare the respective hold-up
stylings of Nick and T-Paul; another lets Oedekerk himself kick up his
heels as a security guard who uses an empty office building to practice
his dance moves.  At odd moments, NOTHING TO LOSE will catch you off guard
with a memorable supporting performance or an unpredictable punch line.
     Since Oedekerk is a veteran of stand-up comedy and sketch writing for
"In Living Color," it should be surprising that hit-and-run gags play to
his strengths.  Nor should it be surprising that the length of a feature
film does not.  He fills the spaces between clever comic moments with
sub-plots which probably were meant to provide "depth," but instead merely
provide "length."  T-Paul, it seems, is no criminal, merely a computer
whiz who can't catch a break; Nick, in turn, is actually an oblivious
white-collar in need of racial enlightenment.  This lame attempt at social
commentary robs both characters of the edge which would have made a
shorter, sharper NOTHING TO LOSE crackle with creativity.  Tim Robbins as
just another uptight liberal-in-training is a bore.  Martin Lawrence as a
sympathetic family man is a strain on credulity like a tractor-trailer is
a strain on a Vespa.
    NOTHING TO LOSE really disintegrates when Oedekerk spends valuable
minutes on a feud between our protagonists and a pair of tough guy outlaws
(John C. McGinley and Giancarlo Esposito).  Every scene between them drags
the film to a crawl, making you long for a version of NOTHING TO LOSE in
which Oedekerk simply let Nick and T-Paul go off on their own unlikely
crime spree, free of sentimentality.  Ninety-seven minutes gives him too
much time to search for a happy ending, one which would have been much
happier for all involved if it had come an hour earlier.

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
     For approximately five minutes, the computer-animated DINOSAUR is
undeniably spectacular. The story creeps up without dialogue, following
the fate of one little dinosaur egg from its trampled, abandoned nest
across an astonishing primeval landscape. Creatures of the water nudge the
leathery ovum along in lakes teeming with life; creatures of the air carry
it over plateaus and through verdant valleys. Seven years removed from the
revolutionary screen creations of JURASSIC PARK, I didn't think it would
be possible for the mere sight of digital dinosaurs to seize the
imagination, but it happens in DINOSAUR nonetheless. With its entirely
visual storytelling, DINOSAUR's prologue offers a giddiness-inducing
prospect: an introduction to a lost world as quietly, primally engrossing
as Kubrick's "dawn of man" prologue to 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.
     I knew going into DINOSAUR that it was a Disney film aimed at kids,
so I can't say I was expecting anything more profound than the story it
ultimately provided. That didn't make its presence any less disappointing. 
That story follows an Iguanodon named Aladar (voiced by D. B. Sweeney),
orphaned in true Disney protagonist fashion after hatching from the
aforementioned egg to a family of primitive Lemurs. He lives happily with
his adopted mother Plio (Alfre Woodard), grandfather Yar (Ossie Davis) and
brother Zini (Max Casella) until a meteor shower wreaks havoc on the
lemur's habitat. Aladar and his family find themselves back in the realm
of the dinosaurs, joined with a herd migrating across a decimated
landscape in hopes of finding their nesting ground spared from the
meteors' destruction.
     Along the way, of course, conflicts develop. The Aladar clan
befriends and helps a pair of geriatric dinos -- Brachiosaur Baylene (Joan
Plowright) and Styrachosaur Eema (Della Reese) -- much to the
consternation of the herd's proto-Darwinian Iguanodon leader Kron (Samuel
E. Wright, erstwhile Sebastian from THE LITTLE MERMAID). Aladar,
previously isolated from any others of his kind, swoons over Kron's
sweet-natured sister Neera (Julianna Margulies), further provoking Kron's
wrath. There are confrontations with a pack of hungry Velociraptors and
with a pair of equally hungry Carnotaurs (think T. rex, only with even
worse dispositions and devilish horns). There are close calls, narrow
escapes and grand battles.
     Yaaaaaaawwn. Disney's animated features have generally been pretty
formulaic, so it's no shock to discover that DINOSAUR features a
by-the-numbers script. This variation, however, is so relentlessly somber
and dreary that there's nothing left but formula. The personalities of the
principal characters are so bland and the vocal performances so uninspired
that the characters threaten to disappear into the backgrounds -- no small
feat considering the overwhelming brown-ness of the desolate
post-apocalyptic scenery. Even the minor characters like Zini and Eema --
those theoretically present to provide a little comic relief -- can't
inject any life into the film. In recent Disney films, the musical numbers
have come off as purely obligatory, but I found myself pleading for a
snappy tune to breathe some life into the film. It's hard to imagine what
young viewers would find to embrace in this grim production, and even
harder to imagine what would keep an adult awake. 
     There's no denying that the technology involved in the creation of
DINOSAUR is extraordinary, mixing the computerized cast with some
real-world settings so seamlessly that it's virtually impossible to tell
where reality and hard drive overlap. Apparently, however, co-director
Ralph Zondag has become no more adept at dinosaur-driven storytelling than
he was for the limp 1993 animated feature WE'RE BACK! That film seemed
rushed into theaters to capitalize on that summer's Jurassic juggernaut. 
This one misses its opportunity to step out of the Spielbergian shadow,
gradually devolving into a series of all-too-familiar set pieces. That's a
sad end to a film that begins with so much promise. Of course no one would
risk millions on DINOSAUR without anthropomorphized animals. Better to
recycle Disney's orphan fetish without a whiff of personality or humor,
its early grandeur slowly but steadily fading into extinction.

Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
     Promotional posters for SHE'S SO LOVELY describe it as "a film by
Nick Cassavetes from a fable by John Cassavetes," a tag-line which
prompted a visit to my American Heritage Dictionary:
     "fable [fa' b(e)l] n.  1) a concise narrative making an edifying or
cautionary point, often employing as characters animals which speak and
act like human beings."
     I suppose you could say that SHE'S SO LOVELY fits that definition, in
the sense that it makes a cautionary point.  Unfortunately, the point is
made at Nick Cassavetes' expense:  don't go messing around with a legend
just because you happen to be related.  When Nick tries to remain true to
his father's spirit in the film's first half, the result is strained and
dated.  When he tries to forge his own path in the film's second half, the
result is an incomprehensible mess.
     As for animals acting like people, you won't find any in SHE'S SO
LOVELY.  People acting like animals...well, that's another story.  Eddie
Quinn (Sean Penn) is a short-tempered, vaguely unstable sort with an
indeterminate employment history; his pregnant wife Maureen (Robin Wright
Penn) sits around chain-smoking and drinking herself stupid while waiting
for Eddie to return from one of his regular multi-day disappearing acts.
One such bender puts Maureen in a dangerous position with a burly neighbor
(James Gandolfini), who slaps her around when she refuses his advances.
Maureen doesn't tell Eddie the real cause of her injuries, afraid that
anger will push Eddie over the edge.  Instead, Eddie's conviction that
Maureen is lying to him pushes him over the edge, landing him in a mental
institution for a decade.
     There is at least a convincingly seamy aura to the portion of SHE'S
SO LOVELY devoted to Eddie and Maureen's kinetic romance.  Vintage
Cassavetes ambiance drips from the depressingly silent flop houses and
dive bars, and from the characters wandering around in a directionless,
drunken daze.  Yet even in its best moments, SHE'S SO LOVELY feels not 
quite right.  It's like the steak transported through the telepods in
David Cronenberg's version of THE FLY, a story from another era which has
been rendered synthetic in its transport to 1997.  Despite the strong
performances and affectingly crazy exploits of Penn and Penn, there's the
feel of an homage to the first half of SHE'S SO LOVELY.  It has no unique
identity.
     To show you how far looking for a unique identity gets you, witness
the second half of SHE'S SO LOVELY.  It's set ten years after the first
half, with Eddie just about to be released from the institution and
Maureen remarried to construction company boss Joey Giamanni (John
Travolta).  Maureen is still in love with Eddie, though, which
understandably irritates the man to whom she's presently married and with
whom she has had two other daughters.  
     There is a vein of tension which could have yielded dramatic gold in
the scenes between ex-husband and ex-wife, between father and the daughter
he's never seen, and between one husband and the first husband who claims
his wife's deepest affections.  But young Cassavetes treats the whole
episode as the wacky premise for a profane situation comedy, as though
Papa had banged out a very special episode of "My Two Dads" twenty years
ago.  The whimsical score by Joseph Vitarelli consistently undermines the
seriousness of the matters at hand; situations like Eddie's appointment
with an effeminate hairdresser are treated as atmospheric goofiness.
Meanwhile John Cassavetes' prose, removed from the barfly milieu which
gives his dialogue a sad poetry, ends up in the mouth of Travolta's
blustering middle-class husband and becomes purple enough to warrant a
place in the Incredible Hulk's wardrobe ("You're a glorified piece of blue
sky," he snorts at his step-daughter).  Instead of wondering whom Maureen
will end up with, your mind wanders to why Nick didn't go all the way and
use a laugh track.
     Ultimately, it's hard to figure out what Nick Cassavetes was thinking
when he decided to resurrect SHE'S SO LOVELY.  For that matter, it's not
clear what John was thinking when he wrote it, with its half-realized
characters, awkwardly constructed narrative and weightless romantic
triangle.  There's a lesson to be learned here, something like "it's best
to let sleeping scripts lie."

Title
Review for Maverick (1994)
Starring:  Mel Gibson, Jodie Foster, James Garner, Alfred Molina, Graham 
Greene, James Coburn.
Screenplay:  William Goldman.
Director:  Richard Donner.
     William Goldman may be as famous in the film industry for one
quote as he is for his screenplays (BUTCH CASSIDY & THE SUNDANCE KID, THE 
PRINCESS BRIDE, MISERY).  "Nobody in Hollywood knows anything," he wrote, 
and that pithy line became the mantra for anyone who was every frustrated 
by the movie-making machinery. However, Goldman overlooked the one thing 
Hollywood does know:  it knows how to package.  Witness the above-the-
line talent assembled for MAVERICK:  Mel Gibson, Jodie Foster, director 
Richard Donner, composer Randy Newman, and yes, even Goldman himself.  
One might expect from that list that MAVERICK is a good-looking, good-
sounding, good-natured production, and it is.  And little more. MAVERICK 
is pleasant, but it never really takes off, opting to replace a solid 
narrative with a series of sketches of widely varying quality.
     Gibson plays Bret Maverick, a roguish gambler much better at
playing cards than he is at playing hero.  He wants to get into a 
riverboat game with a $500,000 pot, but he finds himself $3,000 short of 
the required $25,000 buy-in.  Complicating his quest for cash is 
Annabelle Bransford (Foster), a faux-Southern con artist who covets 
Maverick's hefty wallet, and straight arrow lawman Zane Cooper (James 
Garner).  Maverick also must content with a gambler (Alfred Molina) with 
a particular axe to grind.  Along the way to the big game, Maverick meets 
up with a succession of "friends" who owe him money, resulting in a 
string of double- and triple-crosses through to the final scene.
     The "plot" of MAVERICK is really just a tool to get him into a
number of situations involving money and duplicity:  Maverick in a saloon 
poker game; Maverick trying to collect from a friend at a bank; Maverick, 
Annabelle and Cooper trying to recover money stolen from a group of 
missionaries.  Some of these moments are quite entertaining, particularly 
an encounter with a group of Indians with whom Maverick enjoys a special 
rapport.  Gibson and Foster are also quite good together, generating a 
lot of smiles simply from the spark of their interaction.  Gibson in 
particular is perfectly cast as Maverick, a sly but ultimately big-
hearted fellow with a gift for avoiding danger.  There is enough charm 
and energy in his performance to carry MAVERICK over many of its rough 
spots.
     It's a shame that MAVERICK misfires nearly as often as it hits.
It's a peculiar mixture of missed opportunities, overkill and necessary 
but unfortunate editing decisions (which whittled this once two and a 
half hour film to a still over-long 2:05).  Early in the film, Maverick 
shows up a young gunfighter, but the expected showdown never comes; 
instead, the gunfighter stands and politely excuses himself.  Later, 
Maverick runs into a group of tough guys to whom he owes $20.  When he 
produces a $100 bill and asks for change, you expect a slick con, but 
again MAVERICK doesn't quite follow through.  On the opposite end of the 
spectrum is a sequence where Maverick is in a bank during a robbery 
committed by a familiar actor in a cameo role.  Once the actor is 
unmasked, the joke should be over, but it's milked for more than it's 
worth in a way that made me think, "All right, I get the joke."  MAVERICK 
is full of these fits and starts, making it hard for me to like it as 
much as I wanted to.
     MAVERICK concludes with a number of plot turns reminiscent of
THE STING, and didn't necessarily find them predictable, I didn't really 
find them all that interesting, either.  By the time it hits the final 
fifteen minutes, MAVERICK finds itself in serious danger of overstaying 
its welcome, ending with far less energy than it begins.  Still, MAVERICK 
is what summer movies are generally meant to be:  big, light 
entertainment.  As frequently as it pulled its comedic punches, MAVERICK 
still had enough dopey fun to be worth a matinee look.  But if the 
inevitable sequel rolls around, I hope Gibson, Donner and company learn 
their lesson and start with a script from which they don't need to cut so 
much.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman, Ian
McDiarmid, Ray Park, Anthony Daniels, Kenny Baker, Frank Oz, Ahmet Best.
Screenplay:  George Lucas.
Producer:  Rick McCallum.
Director:  George Lucas.
MPAA Rating:  PG (violence)
Running Time:  131 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Contrary to conventional wisdom, The Force is not a mystical,
all-encompassing power; it's what George Lucas must be feeling in the
middle of his chest as he revives the STAR WARS saga after a 16-year
hiatus.  In one sense, of course, EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE is the
ultimate can't-lose proposition.  It's also the ultimate can't-win
proposition, a monolith nearly impossible to separate from the ridiculous
expectations.  Curiously, critics face a similar predicament.  A rave
could be interpreted as succumbing to the hype, while a jeer could be
viewed as anti-hype backlash.  How do you talk about a film that virtually
demands the creation of a new set of rules -- for the film-maker, for the
media, for the audience?
     I can only explain my reaction to THE PHANTOM MENACE this way:  when
John Williams' now-iconic fanfare burst forth over the sound system, I was
9 years old again, shivering with anticipation at being transported by
Lucas' singular mythology.  And transported I was...into a hard drive.
There's no other way to explain the chilly experience of THE PHANTOM
MENACE, which opens with Jedi Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his
apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) on a diplomatic mission to
resolve a dispute between the Trade Federation and the planet Naboo.  When
it becomes clear that the Federation's trade blockade is part of a more
sinister plan, the Jedis flee Naboo with the planet's Queen Amidala 
(Natalie Portman) and amphibian Gungan Jar-Jar Binks (Ahmet Best).  A
repair stop on the planet Tatooine introduces us to young Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), a slave boy whom Qui-Gon believes is the Chosen One destined
to bring balance to the Force.
     There are plenty of other plot fragments floating around in THE
PHANTOM MENACE -- most of them involving political machinations -- but the
ho-hum plotting may actually be the least of its flaws.  Quite simply,
this is a film devoid of personality, filled with characters who never
inspire affection or close identification.  STAR WARS, for all its dazzle,
had three fundamentally solid characters at its core:  conflicted
hero-on-a-quest Luke; tough, no-nonsense Leia; and lovable rogue Han.  THE
PHANTOM MENACE counters with the stoic Qui-Gon, the slightly-less-stoic
Obi-Wan, and the stoic-in-a-slightly-different-way Amidala.  Meanwhile,
young Jake Lloyd brings little gravity to the character which will become
the crux of this universe, and Jar-Jar's brand of comic relief is
intensely grating.  It's almost funny to hear Qui-Gon described as 
rebellious, since he seems about as capable of a rash act as he is of
cracking a smile.  There may be heroes in THE PHANTOM MENACE, but there's
really no one to like.
     And, for that matter, there's really no one to hate.  Darth Sidious,
the Sith who will be Emperor, is the primary villain of the piece, yet he
only appears in the form of a jittery transmission, hardly the stuff of
genuine menace.  Darth Maul, meanwhile -- he of the marketing-friendly
Day-Glo visage -- is effective considering his limited screen time, yet
he's really a glorified henchman for all his double-bladed lightsaber
tricks.  THE PHANTOM MENACE is missing that unifying, ultimately hissable
bad guy that makes for great archetypal conflict.
     What we do have is a triumph of art direction and technology which
creates alien worlds like no film ever has before.  The streets of a
Tatooine town bustle with creatures both familiar and unfamiliar; the
megalopolis of Coruscant, capital of the Republic, features eye-popping
architecture and the kind of traffic flow of which civil engineering
legends are made.  Though the pacing of the opening hour is on the pokey
side -- which places it in good company with the first STAR WARS -- Lucas
eventually produces a few dynamic set pieces like the desert pod race.
When THE PHANTOM MENACE goes for pure visual satisfaction, it usually
delivers.
     Ultimately, though, there's a more basic satisfaction the film lacks.
Its structure and imagery are reminiscent both of STAR WARS and RETURN OF
THE JEDI -- particularly the latter in its three-ring climax -- but it
doesn't even achieve JEDI's level of old-fashioned fantasy fulfillment.
When Gungans and battle droids clash on the fields of Naboo, every last
figure a digital concoction, you begin to sense the absence of a primally
appealing human story in this blockbuster.  It may be true that it will
feel more complete a few years hence when its backstory has turned into
relationships between Obi-Wan and Anakin, between Anakin and Amidala.  For
now, all that remains is spectacle without resonance, without magic, 
without even all that much fun if you happen to be over the age of 10.  In
this era of computer wizardry, Lucas has sapped his story of the thing
that made it a phenomenon in the first place.  The result is an adventure
that feels...well, Forced.

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
GALAXY QUEST
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Tim Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Alan Rickman, Tony Shalhoub, Daryl
Mitchell, Sam Rockwell, Enrico Colantoni, Robin Sachs.
Screenplay:  David Howard and Robert Gordon.
Producer:  Mark Johnson.
Director:  Dean Parisot.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I can say without reservation that GALAXY QUEST boasts the best
mainstream "high concept" of 1999. I started chuckling the moment I heard
about a film in which the cast members of a beloved television
science-fiction series -- a decade removed from any career except 
appearing at conventions and ribbon-cuttings -- were mistaken by an alien
race for real fighters for interplanetary justice. I saw it as a wonderful
opportunity both to needle the phenomenon of "Star Trek" fandom and to
embrace its fundamental optimism. If handled properly, it could be a fun
and funny adventure into the way our popular entertainments can help
define our world, and define the performers who create them.
     I was so engaged by the concept of GALAXY QUEST that, even as the
film was unfolding, I kept cutting it slack. I nodded in amusement at the
personalities of the show's "crew": Jason Nesmith (Tim Allen), bombastic
prima donna who portrayed Capt. Peter Quincy Taggart; Gwen DeMarco
(Sigourney Weaver), still bitter that her Lt. Tawny Madison was viewed as
a pair of breasts that repeated what the computer said; Alexander Dane
(Alan Rickman), a Shakespearean-trained thespian who dreads every time he
has to don the prosthetic headpiece of the alien Dr. Lazarus. I smiled at
the idea of a troubled alien race, the Thermians, so captivated by the
positive message of the "historical documents" they intercept that they
model their entire society after the world of "Galaxy Quest." And I was
ready to ride along as the has-beens get a chance to be real heroes,
helping the Thermians battle for freedom from the domination of the
would-be dictator Sarris (Robin Sachs).
     GALAXY QUEST turned out to be a pleasant diversion. It's also
something of a missed opportunity (or, more specifically, a series of
missed opportunities). Screenwriters David Howard and Robert Gordon drop
in plenty of goodies for those in the "Star Trek" know, yet they're often
more content to rely on insider gags than to flesh those gags out. The
characters are broadly sketched, with their various crises and need for
respect providing a vague foundation for the story (Tony Shalhoub is far
more vividly goofy as the "chief engineer" too oblivious to realize his
situation is genuinely dangerous). A story with the potential to focus on
how the actors come to terms with their legacy ultimately becomes just
another comic adventure, less about the people than about the premise.
     Oh, but that premise does make for some entertaining viewing. Most of
the best jokes showcase an internal logic that should be the envy of every
science-fiction film: Because the Thermians designed the real ship after
the television ship, it follows all of the show's rules. Wonderful moments
find Nesmith and DeMarco navigating a series of crushing obstacles that
serve no logical purpose ("I'm going to kill whoever wrote that
episode," quips DeMarco), and the ship's former child star helmsman (Daryl
Mitchell) scraping the "Protector" out of space dock. Though the humor
does tend towards the "insider," at least it's insider in a generally
clever way, finding amusement even in the captain's tendency to lose his
shirt during every fight scene.
     GALAXY QUEST is far too lively and good-natured to deserve harsh
criticism; in a season full of prestige-hungry Oscar wannabes, it's nice
to see a film interested primarily in putting a smile on your face. The
smiles, unfortunately, don't turn into full-fledged laughs often enough. 
The situations beg to have the absurdity level turned up just a notch; the
characters beg to be given more personality. "High concept" is most often
used by critics as a derogatory term, but that didn't have to be the case
for GALAXY QUEST. Though it may send you out of the theater chuckling, it
could have taken its concept even higher.

Title
Review for 'Til There Was You (1997)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Jeanne Tripplehorn, Dylan McDermott, Sarah Jessica Parker,
Craig Bierko, Nina Foch, Jennifer Aniston.
Screenplay:  Winnie Holzman.
Producers:  Penney Finkelman Cox, Tom Rosenberg, Alan Poul.
Director:  Scott Winant.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As the opening minutes of 'TIL THERE WAS YOU unfolded, I was fully
prepared to despise it for continuing the SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE-ization of
the romantic comedy genre.  The success of Nora Ephron's 1993 paean to
celestially-destined love may be the worst thing ever to happen to film
romance -- what incentive is there to create a plot or characters which
make sense if you can explain everything away as "fate?"  Then it became
clear that 'TIL THERE WAS YOU wasn't falling into the SLEEPLESS trap.  In
fact, it was consciously subverting it.  And suddenly I was even more
depressed that the film I was watching was so painfully tedious.  Here was
the love story I had been waiting for, and it turned out to be an
uninvolving, maudlin and incoherent mess.
     'TIL THERE WAS YOU follows the parallel lives of two Los Angeles
residents whose lives paths first cross when they are children, and whose
lives continue to affect each other's through the years though they never
actually have met.  Gwen Moss (Jeanne Tripplehorn) is a professional ghost
writer raised on romanticized notions of meeting your soul-mate; Nick
Dawkan (Dylan McDermott) is an architect whose unstable childhood has led
him to a series of ill-fated affairs.  Their lives become truly
intertwined when Gwen signs on to ghost-write the biography of Francesca
Lansfield (Sarah Jessica Paker), a former child star who subsequently
begins a romantic relationship with Nick.  Nick's firm is also involved in
the planned demolition of Gwen's apartment building, and Gwen's
impassioned opposition begins a process which could eventually bring them
together.
     I'm sure that director Scott Winant and writer Winnie Holzman thought
they were on to something fairly clever when they came up to the concept
for 'TIL THERE WAS YOU, and in theory they were right.  The story of Gwen
and Nick isn't a story about people destined to be together, though the
structure toys with that notion as they repeatedly just miss meeting each
other.  This is the story of two people who still have a lot of growing up
to do when we first meet them -- Gwen is a passive idealist in search of
her own voice, and Nick is incapable of investing himself in anything for
the long haul.  What we watch over the course of twenty years of their
lives are the events which shape them into people who could live happily
ever after.  It's a wonderfully practical kind of romanticism 'TIL THERE
WAS YOU offers:  the idea that true love is the product of two people who
meet at a moment when they are both _ready_ for true love.
     That's the sturdy skeleton of the story, however, not the dead body
of a film which was made with it.  Winant and Holzman are both alums of
"thirtysomething" and "My So-Called Life," shows as beloved for their
detailed characterizations as they were loathed for self-involved
emotionalism.  'TIL THERE WAS YOU is all the things the detractors of
those shows most detested, without nearly enough of the balancing wit and
attention to detail which gave the shows such a devoted following.
Holzman gets some comic mileage out of Gwen's losing battle with the
eccentric design of a trendy restaurant (created by Nick, of course), but
that's one of the few effective comic situations in the film.  The two
hours of 'TIL THERE WAS YOU could inspire a lot of watch-checking as it
becomes a rambling parade of over-wrought situations and annoying
characters, with Gwen's picturesque apartment complex -- a cross between
Melrose Place and the Garden District where it is perpetually raining rose
petals -- becoming more of a recurring joke than a location.
     The fatal flaw comes with the casting of the romantic leads, and for
once the problem isn't that they don't belong together.  You're just not
likely to care one way or the other.  Jeanne Tripplehorn demonstrates a
nice flair for light comedy, but the pleasant-if-kooky character she plays
isn't nearly interesting enough to support the story.  That goes double
for Dylan McDermott's Nick, who is as difficult to watch as he is to be
involved with.  Nick is a complete blank for most of the film, and his
sudden conversion from sullen architectural Dadaist to lover of all things
poetic and ornate makes virtually no sense.  Thank heaven Sarah Jessica
Parker is on hand as the endearingly narcissistic Francesca, providing a
burst of energy whenever she's in a scene.  'TIL THERE WAS YOU needs much
more of that energy to match its good intentions, instead of 110 minutes
of nearly oppressive sincerity.  The struggles of real-life relationships
don't have to be this dreary, but when they are, the appeal of starry-eyed
hokum like SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE suddenly makes a lot more sense.

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
     Steven Soderbergh's THE LIMEY is sort of an action crime-drama --
only there's not all that much action, and relatively little crime. It's
sort of a character study -- only there's not a whole lot of the main
character to study. It's sort of an avant garde experiment by Soderbergh
-- only Soderbergh has been plenty more avant garde in the past. THE
LIMEY keeps nudging you for artistic respect, and you keep thinking you
might give it more if only it would stop nudging. Intriguing films don't
often feel as minimally satisfying as THE LIMEY.
     On the surface, it seems like it has plenty going for it (though
surface is one of the main things it does have going for it). The
minimalist plot is something straight out of pulp crime fiction:  tough
British ex-con Wilson (Terence Stamp) learns that his daughter Jenny 
recently died in a car accident, and travels to Los Angeles to find out
the whole story. In the process he hooks up with a couple of Jenny's 
friends, Eduardo (Luis Guzman) and Elaine (Lesley Ann Warren), and learns
of Jenny's relationship with one-time 60s record-industry guru Terry
Valentine (Peter Fonda). Eventually he also discovers that Valentine may
have been involved in some criminal activities, and that Jenny's death may
have been connected to finding out more than she was supposed to know.
     Before you can say "They killed his daughter, now he's going to make
them pay," Wilson is making his determined, laconic way through L. A.,
shooting, head-butting or rear-ending anyone who stands between him and
the truth. I suspect THE LIMEY would have felt like a 25-year-too-late
episode of "Mannix" if Soderbergh hadn't jolted the film's visual 
style. In effect, he turns most of the film into an extension on his
Clooney/Lopez seduction sequence in OUT OF SIGHT -- flashing forward,
flashing back, laying dialogue from one scene over images from another. 
It might have come off as simple gimmickry, if it weren't such an
effective method of getting inside Wilson's head. An ex-con in unfamiliar
territory and coping with unresolved grief, he's living the jagged,
stream-of-consciousness life Soderbergh shows us on the screen.
     That's a wonderful start for an exploration of how a criminal comes
to terms with the choices he has made and the effect of those choices on
those in his life. And that's about as far as it goes. For all its
moodiness and somber tones, THE LIMEY really isn't terribly interested in
the complexities of its characters. Terence Stamp does a nice job as
Wilson, mixing a bit of introspection into the standard issue tough guy,
but the introspection isn't as deep as all the mournful close-ups of Stamp
would suggest -- he's just, as they say in the self-help biz, looking for
closure. Guzman and Warren are flat-out wasted as supporting players who
barely have a chance to register, while Fonda gets one or two decent
moments as the fading tycoon. When Nicky Katt appears mid-way through the
film as a hired killer, igniting the screen with his seething disdain for
absolutely everything, it's startling. And you have to credit Katt,
because screenwriter Lem Dobbs doesn't seem otherwise keen on vivid
personalities.
     It's not that THE LIMEY isn't an enjoyable piece of work. Soderbergh
is one of those directors who can give a mundane scene an electrifying
twist, as in the unconventional way he films Wilson's rampage at a
downtown warehouse. The reason THE LIMEY never feels like a gritty
vengeance caper, despite its car chases and shootouts, is that Soderbergh
is always yanking things 90 degrees from the expected direction. It would
have made for an even better film, however, if it never felt like a gritty
vengeance caper because it actually _wasn't_ a gritty vengeance caper. 
Give Soderbergh credity for the convincing illusion that this genre film
is something else. Stylistic flourishes aside, THE LIMEY is just a pretty
darned good straight-ahead action crime-drama -- provided you like them
with relatively little action, and not all that much crime.

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
     Even by the standards of independent cinema, DREAM WITH THE FISHES is 
a tough film to categorize.  At times, writer/director Finn Taylor's debut
feature is edgy and tough-talking; at other times, it's a surreal odyssey;
at still other times, it's a sensitive drama of male bonding.  It's a
genuinely bizarre experience, something akin to watching BRIAN'S SONG as
it might be re-made by Abel Ferrara and Gus Van Sant.
     Genuinely bizarre film experiences are rare enough that DREAM WITH
THE FISHES should have been commendable on that count alone.  For the
first half hour or so, it is actually quite compelling, telling the story
of a depressive San Francisco executive named Terry (David Arquette) who
spends his evenings spying on the building across the street through his
rear window.  One night Terry prepares to end his life by jumping off the
Bay Bridge, but he is interrupted by Nick Ambrusio (Brad Hunt), a
small-time crook and scam artist.  When Terry's resolve to finishi himself
off falters, Nick offers him a strange bargain.  Nick, it turns out, has
only a few weeks to live, and wants to live out some of his life-long
fantasies.  If Terry will bankroll those fantasies, Nick will provide a
service:  he'll kill Terry himself at a time of Terry's choosing.
     Those introductory scenes between Nick and Terry are the best DREAM
WITH THE FISHES has to offer, maintaining a sense of mystery and a
dangerous tension between the characters.  Nick, the hustler (a sharp,
eye-catching performance by Hunt), seems to be working some kind of long
con; Terry, the miserable voyeur, could be unstable enough to be far more
trouble than Nick expects from a guy in a tie.  Along with Nick's
girlfriend Liz (Kathryn Erbe), they form a unsteady triangle which keeps
you watching and guessing.
     Then, of all the posible things he could do with the characters next,
Taylor does perhaps the least interesting:  he turns them into mis-matched
buddies.  Over their shared misery they begin a series of adventures
which, in no necessary order, include an acid trip at Fisherman's Wharf, a
round of naked bowling, a difficult reunion between Nick and his father
(J. E. Freeman), Terry winning the California lottery, and a naked bank
heist.  Nick the Hustler turns into Nick the Misunderstood Sensitive Guy
Who Had a Bad Childhood, while Terry the Miserable Voyeur turns into just
another Vaguely Unhappy Guy Who Needs Only to Loosen Up under the
tutelage of a Doomed Free Spirit.  All sense of invention, the life-blood
of independent film-making, dissolves into inevitable pathos.  
     Taylor could have taken the characters in DREAM WITH THE FISHES and
sent them off on a hyper-violent crime spree, or had them sit around for
ninety minutes comparing notes on generational angst.  It's a pleasant
surprise that he does neither, but his resolution to this story is neither
particularly pleasant nor particularly surprising.  If there's one way I
never expected DREAM WITH THE FISHES to end, it was with a life-affirming
scattering of ashes.  It's the ending to a made-for-Lifetime movie with a
testosterone twist.  

Title
Review for Fatal Instinct (1993)
Starring:  Armand Assante, Sean Young, Sherilynn Fenn, Kate Nelligan,
           Christopher McDonald, James Remar.
Screenplay:  David O'Malley.
Director:  Carl Reiner.
     Never underestimate the power of expectations.  In the wake of HOT
SHOTS! PART DEUX, LOADED WEAPON 1 and ROBIN HOOD: MEN IN TIGHTS, I
viewed yet another genre parody as cruel and inhuman punishment, and
awaited FATAL INSTINCT with utter dread.  Then, much to my
astonishment, it didn't stink.  Oh, make no mistake:  FATAL INSTINCT
isn't particularly good.  I simply laughed much more than I expected
to.  How's that for damning with faint praise?
     The "plot" of FATAL INSTINCT is a pastiche of elements from
contemporary sexual thrillers and classic film noir.  Ned Rivera
(Armand Assante) is an L.A. police detective who moonlights as a
defense attorney, or perhaps vice-versa.  He is oblivious to the
attentions of his loyal secretary Laura (Sherilynn Fenn), but finds
himself tempted by the sexy and seductive Lola Cain (Sean Young).
After a one night stand, Ned breaks off with Lola out of marital
guilt.  What Ned doesn't know is that his wife Laura (Kate Nelligan) is
having an affair of her own, and planning with her lover Frank
(Christopher McDonald) to murder Ned in a very specific manner to cash
in on a triple indemnity insurance policy.  Meanwhile, a vindictive
ex-con Ned unsuccessfully defended (James Remar) is paroled, and plots
to kill Ned as well.  Once the jilted Lola is added to the mix, it
seems everyone in L.A. wants Ned Rivera dead.
     The best of the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker parodies (AIRPLANE!, THE
NAKED GUN) demonstrated sucessful application of a fundamental rule for
the form:  keep the gags coming so fast that you don't have time to
notice the lousy ones.  FATAL INSTINCT owes its successes, small as
they may be, to adherence to this principal.  There are plenty of duds
in FATAL INSTINCT, but the pacing is lively enough that they don't sit
there waiting for an audience reaction that's never going to come.
Director Carl Reiner hasn't shown a consistent talent for comic pacing
in his feature film career; for every WHERE'S POPPA? or ALL OF ME,
there has been a SUMMER SCHOOL or SIBLING RIVALRY.  Fortunately, the
Carl Reiner who helped Steve Martin's early parodies click is at work
here.  He keeps everything moving, avoiding the error that sank MEN IN
TIGHTS.
     Those ZAZ classics had one other important thing going for them,
namely well-known dramatic actors like Leslie Nielsen and Lloyd Bridges
playing a brilliant deadpan mockery of their own B-movie roles.  Armand
Assante is a better dramatic actor than Nielsen or Bridges, but he too
turns in a fine spoof of one of the lowlights on his resume, the dopey
Mike Hammer tale I, THE JURY.  He seems to have a great deal of fun
mocking the image of the sullen detective, and pulls off some
surprisingly deft physical comedy.  It's also a hoot watching Sean
Young play to her reputation as a jealous psycho.  Perhaps half my
enjoyment of FATAL INSTINCT came from appreciating the career subtext
of these two performances.
     Before it seems as though I have nothing but kind words for FATAL
INSTINCT, there is one major thing lacking:  originality.  Its primary
satirical targets are BASIC INSTINCT, FATAL ATTRACTION and CAPE FEAR,
each of which has been done in other recent films or TV's "The
Simpsons."  Granted, the scripts were in production simultaneously, but
much of the freshness is still lost.  There are also some tedious
"lotsies," those sequences of progressively sillier events a la O. J.
Simpson's ill-fated boat investigation at the beginning of THE NAKED
GUN.  They have to be completely over the top to work, and FATAL
INSTINCT's script repeatedly shows a resistance to giving in to
complete anarchy.  There was a moment near the climax when I was
waiting for an almost too-obvious gag which *still* would have been
funny, but screenwriter David O'Malley missed his opportunity.
     In retrospect, I almost feel guilty about some of the places I
laughed.  It's hard to explain how a line like, "I'll try to help you,
Miss Cain, if I'm able," can seem funny, but it did.  Plenty of people
will leave FATAL INSTINCT shaking their heads.  I don't know; maybe
they were expecting too much.

Title
Review for What's Eating Gilbert Grape (1993)
Starring:  Johnny Depp, Leonardo DiCaprio, Juliette Lewis, Darlene
Cates, Mary Steenburgen.
Screenplay:  Peter Hedges.
Director:  Lasse Hallstrom.
     Tone alone cannot sustain a film, but it can go a long way.  If I
can find myself lost in the time and place of a story, it scores
immediate style points.  When that tone is backed up by an outstanding
story and great acting, the effect can be described best by an
adjective I do not use lightly:  "literary."  WHAT'S EATING GILBERT
GRAPE? is such a film.  It's a rich, memorable and stunningly acted
story of desire colliding with responsibility, staged in a manner which
many viewers might find too prosaic, but which insinuated itself into
my imagination with its confidence.
     Gilbert Grape (Johnny Depp) is a young man living in rural Endora,
Iowa, facing incredible responsibilities.  As the man of the house
since his father's suicide, Gilbert must support the family by working
at the local grocery store.  He also must watch over his mentally
handicapped brother Arnie (Leonardo DiCaprio) and help care for his
extremely overweight mother (Darlene Cates).  Gilbert seems destined to
spend the rest of his life in the small town until the arrival in
Endora of Becky (Juliette Lewis), a free spirit passing through with
her grandmother when their truck breaks down.  As he spends time with
Becky, Gilbert begins to think about all the things he is missing.
Slowly his resentment builds, until he realizes that he can no longer
live his entire life for other people.
     Director Lasse Hallstrom (MY LIFE AS A DOG) and legendary
cinematographer Sven Nykvist create a magnificent visual backdrop for
Peter Hedges' screenplay, based on his own novel.  Endora is a town on
the edge of the world represented by the giant FoodMart, a tiny insular
community where everyone knows everyone else.  The midwestern sunsets
and sprawling fields are beautifully photographed, and the atmosphere
of the town is intensely real.  Minor characters, like Crispin Glover
as the town's mortician, are vividly realized, and there are echoes of
THE LAST PICTURE SHOW in Mary Steenburgen's desperately unhappy
housewife.  One of the most perfectly realized scenes focuses on the
grand opening of a burger franchise, attended by the entire town and
accompanied by the off-key high school band.  Not a single note in the
depiction of Endora rang false.
     The same can be said of the character of Gilbert.  It's testimony
to the precision involved in his creation that he came together
completely with one perfectly placed line, when Becky responds to
Gilbert's description of his father with, "I knew someone like that
once."  Gilbert is a man harboring an ever-growing bitterness about
where he finds himself in life, a bitterness which reveals itself in
moments of surprising cruelty.  In one scene, he allows local children
to look at his mother through their window, displaying her like a side
show attraction.  His entire life seems to be mocked by Arnie's
repeated chants of, "We're not going anywhere," but instead of
expressing his dissatisfaction he lets his anger simmer, and it becomes
clear that he is following in his father's footsteps in this regard.
Johnny Depp expertly demonstrates the tension central to Gilbert by
playing everything below the surface, but he never gives in to
one-dimensional blankness or simply regurgitates his naif roles in
BENNY & JOON and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS.
     Depp's performance is overshadowed, however, by Leonardo
DiCaprio's astonishing Oscar-nominated supporting work as Arnie.  He
puts to shame such big name actors as John Malkovich and Dustin
Hoffman, whose mentally challenged characters never seemed completely
real.  DiCaprio is perfect to the last twitch and squeal, and anyone
who has ever spent time with mentally challenged kids will be
hard-pressed to spot a flaw.  Darlene Cates, a first-time actor, brings
real pain to her scenes as Gilbert's tortured mother, and Laura
Harrington and Mary Kate Schellhardt are solid as Gilbert's sisters.
Only Juliette Lewis doesn't quite click, playing a critical role with
her now familiar dopey drone and too little genuine spark.  GILBERT
GRAPE does seem to drift into its conclusion, but it never lost me.
Thanks to a lovingly created setting and a marvelous cast, this 1993
release proves well worth the wait.

Title
Review for Wrestling Ernest Hemingway (1993)
Starring:  Robert Duvall, Richard Harris, Sandra Bullock, Piper
Laurie, Shirley MacLaine.
Screenplay:  Steve Conrad.
Director:  Randa Haines.
     Hollywood films focusing on the elderly have generally fallen into
two broad categories: comedies making them lovable codgers whose most
mundane physical activity is turned into slapstick, and melodramas
about loneliness and facing death.  We've already had one from Column A
this winter--GRUMPY OLD MEN--which makes it somewhat surprising to see
WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY so soon, even though it falls under Column
B; studios are notoriously fastidious in avoiding conflict with target
demographics.  WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY is melodramatic, and its
pacing is rather slow, but it is also filled with fine acting and
quirky but believable relationships, and ultimately proves quite
satisfying.
     WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY is the story of two older men who
develop an unlikely friendship.  Frank (Richard Harris) is a randy and
boisterous ex-sailor fond of telling the story of the time he wrestled
Ernest Hemingway in Puerto Rico; Walter (Robert Duvall) is a Cuban
barber, both retired and retiring.  The two seem to share little in
common except their loneliness:  Frank's son backs out on a visit for
his 75th birthday, while Walter practices dancing alone, admiring from
afar the friendly waitress (Sandra Bullock) at his favorite diner.  As
they spend time together, they gradually begin to have an effect on one
another, Walter realizing he's lived safely for too long, and Frank
realizing he still has growing up to do.
     The only time that HEMINGWAY really missteps is in its forced
plot.  It's obvious as soon as the two men meet that the two opposites
will attract and change each other, and that somewhere along the line
(plot point #2 for you aspiring screenwriters) they will have a falling
out.  Director Randa Haines (CHILDREN OF A LESSER GOD) plays up scenes
like a shared skinny-dip and a certain male bonding ritual on the 4th
of July, which come off as more than a little silly, and the score by
Michael Convertino is enough to make one's teeth ache.  Parts of
WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY script themselves, and writer Steve Conrad
tries to get away with that laziness in his plotting.
     It is to his credit that when he lets his characters talk to each
other, things get much more interesting.  Harris and Duvall are
marvelous together, sharing a couple of poignant scenes where each man,
clearly thrilled simply to have someone to talk to, carries on a
practically independent conversation.  Yet this central relationship is
only one of several which truly shine.  Sandra Bullock (Stallone's
partner in DEMOLITION MAN) is thoroughly charming as Elaine, the
waitress for whom Walter carries a torch.  She demonstrates a genuine
affection for him, one which never comes off as patronizing; their
connection is sweet and very affirming.  Frank, meanwhile, spars with
his no-nonsense landlady, played perfectly by Shirley MacLaine.  Her
tough-love attempts to help Frank through his troubles and to lend a
friendly ear are spare and well-played.  However, perhaps my favorite
interaction involved Frank's attempt to romance a proper older woman
named Georgia, played by Piper Laurie.  In a small role, Laurie is
fantastic, showing Georgia's enjoyment of Frank's flirtations coupled
with her insistence on a decorum which Frank finds difficult.  From top
to bottom, the cast creates a rich and real collection of characters
whose interplay is exceptionally touching.
     It would be unfair to complete a review of WRESTLING ERNEST
HEMINGWAY without giving the two central performances their due.
Harris, as usual, is bigger than life, but the role of Frank calls for
such a reading, and it is testemony to his craft that Frank never seems
pathetic.  Robert Duvall, meanwhile, disappears into Walter.  A lesser
actor would have turned in a much more mannered performance, overdoing
Walter's habit of inspecting his beloved bacon sandwiches before eating
them.  Their screenwriter and director force them to jump through some
unnecessary hoops, but when they're left to do their own thing,
WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY becomes an appealing drama about the need
for contact.

Title
Review for Breaking the Waves (1996)
     Early in Lars von Trier's shattering new drama BREAKING THE WAVES,
there is a scene in which Bess MacNeill (Emily Watson), an innocent young
woman living in a coastal Scottish town, is deflowered by her husband Jan
(Stellan Skarsgaard) in a bathroom at their wedding reception.  It is the
kind of situation you might have seen before played for laughs in low-brow
comedies, usually because one of the parties in the bathroom is not the
bride or the groom.  In one astonishing moment, however, von Trier shows
that he is not going to take you anywhere you have been before, allowing
his hand-held camera to linger on the face of a woman whose reaction is
nothing as simple as lust or anxiety.  It is nothing less than awe at the
overpowering emotions of making love for the first time which plays out
before us, and introduces us to one of the most utterly fascinating film
characters I have ever seen, played by an actor of unbelievable range.
     Ladies and gentlemen, please meet Emily Watson, and do yourselves the
favor of remembering that name.  It is true that she has been given the
kind of role which most actors (particularly women) would commit several
felonies for -- a fragile, unstable woman who risks the censure of her
strict Calvinist community in pursuing her love for lusty outsider Jan --
but Watson brings to it the kind of performance which doesn't so much
impress you as transport you.  When we first see Bess kneel in prayer to
God, only to hear her play both roles in a dialogue, it is startling and
disturbing, and makes her somewhat pitiable; later, when Bess finds
herself unable to summon God's voice, it is somehow just as terrible.
Watson is as gloriously innocent touching male genitalia for the first
time as she is anguished when Jan leaves to return to the offshore oil rig
on which he works.  There is not an emotion she does not touch, or which
does not leave you fumbling for superlatives.
     Watson is so good that her performance might overwhelm a lesser story
made by a lesser film-maker, but BREAKING THE WAVES is no simple love
story.  Much of the action takes place after an accident on the oil rig
renders Jan paralyzed, a tragedy to which he responds by asking Bess to
have sex with other men and describe the encounters to him.  That
storyline alone would make BREAKING THE WAVES a risky venture, but von
Trier takes it to another level of audacity by making it an exploration of
love and religious faith at its most extreme.  As Bess gradually descends
into a world of degraded sexuality she can't possibly understand, von
Trier begins to build up imagery which suggests Bess as a Christ figure.
She experiences her own agony in the garden as she pleads to have her
burden taken away; she is condemned by the religious elders of her
community; she is first betrayed, then shunned, by those closest to her;
she even undergoes her own Way of the Cross, pelted with stones by a group
of kids.  It is powerful, resonant, and not a little bit sacrilegious.
     And BREAKING THE WAVES is nearly as likely to offend those of a
liberal sensibility as those more conservatively inclined.  It would be
easy to recoil against the idea of a woman with a history of mental
illness subjected to violence and indignity by her own husband and,
perhaps, even God.  Those whose knees would jerk at the mere notion of a
woman who would sacrifice anything for her man are going to have major
problems with BREAKING THE WAVES, yet the film's indescribable final shot
may address outrage on both sides with wordless daring:  our earthly
notions of good and evil, of right and wrong, may be burdens that only a
simple mind motivated only by love can overcome in order to know the will
of God.
     BREAKING THE WAVES, at once intellectually challenging and
emotionally draining, is presented by Lars von Trier in a visual style he
also used in THE KINGDOM, a film-to-video-to-film trick which renders
everything a dirty brown.  The day-to-day world is a bleak thing in
BREAKING THE WAVES, but between the chapters in the film are hypnotic
motion-postcards (computer manipulated by artist Per Kirkeby) which
provide surges of hope.  That structure, along with the jittery
photography, are as much a key to the title of BREAKING THE WAVES as
anything which occurs in the film.  Lars von Trier takes his audience for
a ride on a sea of emotions which cannot leave it unmoved.  Love it or
loathe it, you will not be able to ignore BREAKING THE WAVES, or the work
of Emily Watson as a woman who proves that love is a mighty power.

Title
Review for Oscar and Lucinda (1997)
OSCAR AND LUCINDA
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Ralph Fiennes, Cate Blanchett, Ciaran Hinds, Tom Wilkinson,
Clive Russell.
Screenplay:  Laura Jones, based on the novel by Peter Carey.
Producers:  Robin Dalton and Timothy White.
Director:  Gillian Armstrong.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  132 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I suppose you could call OSCAR AND LUCINDA perfectly successful to
this extent:  I was genuinely fascinated by these two characters, and
invested in seeing them happy together.  Based on the novel by Peter
Carey, it tells the story of two souls whose destinies collide in
Victorian-era Australia.  Oscar Hopkins (Ralph Finnes) is a reclusive,
penniless divinity student; Lucinda Leplastrier (Cate Blanchett) is a
high-spirited heiress who invests in a glassworks factory.  Though their
backgrounds are in some ways completely opposite, they share one important
hobby in common:  both are compulsive gamblers.  Each finds that wagering
provides a daring sense of release which nothing else in their proscribed
lives can provide, leading to an instant connection when they meet on
board a ship to Australia.
     The respective performances of Fiennes and Blanchett are certainly
impressive -- Fiennes the timid holy man with toussled hair and stammering
speech, Blanchett the "proud square peg" in a world of round holes.  When
the come together, however, the chemistry is nothing short of
intoxicating.  The scenes in which they meet to share furtive games of
cards take on the feel of illicit sexual encounters, eyes wild with a
sense of abandon and discovery.  No screen pairing of the year offered
more promise for fascinating interaction.
     What an absolute pity that the narrative divides Oscar and Lucinda
almost as soon as they are united.  Convinced that Lucinda carries a torch
for a missionary minister (Ciaran Hinds), Oscar sets off on a fool's
errand to prove his devotion to Lucinda, leading an overground party to
bring a pre-fabricated glass church to a remote location in the Outback.
His increasingly feverish quest provides opportunities for some
spectacular shots by cinematographer Geoffrey Simpson, including lingering
views of the glass church floating down a river on a barge.  It's just
terribly frustrating knowing that these two characters are hanging around
in the same movie, but not in the same scenes.  An interest in the fate of
their relationship may keep you watching, but it will also keep you
fidgeting.  On the page, I can see this story being an engrossing,
heart-breaking page-turner.  On the screen, with two great performances
giving a spark to the rare moments these characters are together, OSCAR
AND LUCINDA becomes a beautifully filmed and splendidly acted tease.

Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
ANYWHERE BUT HERE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Susan Sarandon, Natalie Portman, Shawn Hatosy, Bonnie Bedelia,
Hart Bochner, Eileen Ryan, Ray Baker, Corbin Allred, Caroline Aaron.
Screenplay:  Alvin Sargent, based on the novel by Mona Simpson.
Producer:  Laurence Mark.
Director:  Wayne Wang.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For a long time during ANYWHERE BUT HERE, my attention was fixed
somewhere I didn't quite expect. Relationship dramas like this tend to be
all about character and performance -- every scene is an actor's scene,
every moment is an actor's moment. But to my surprise, I became fascinated
with the way the film looked. In this tale of a free-spirited single mom
named Adele August (Susan Sarandon) who moves herself and her reluctant
14-year-old daughter Ann (Natalie Portman) from Wisconsin to Beverly
Hills, cinematographer Roger Deakins does something cinematographers
rarely do in film: he makes Los Angeles look thoroughly unattractive. The
grainy film stock renders everything slightly fuzzy; the bleached colors
suck the golden glow out of Tinseltown. In a film about a woman who
expects her dreams to come true when she moves to a city of dreams, it
becomes compelling to watch it through Ann's eyes as a dreary and very
ordinary place.
    I mean no disrespect to Mr. Deakins or to the craft of cinematography
when I say that, even at the time, I knew ANYWHERE BUT HERE couldn't have
been working the way it was supposed to if I was paying attention to the
choice of film stock. This is, after all, a relationship story and a
character study, an exploration of those complex, contentious years when
mothers and daughters alternately hate each other and are each other's
best friends. It's been done before, of course -- even the kooky mother
and more stable daughter has been done before, in films like MERMAIDS --
but solid writing and strong performances can often counteract 
familiarity. 
     ANYWHERE BUT HERE does come through with the strong performances.
Sarandon finds just the right balance between effervescence and
irresponsibility, her yearning for a better life always winding up just
this side of real life. Portman continues to show strong chops for a young
actress, navigating a similarly complicated path between devotion to her
mother and intense resentment. Their scenes together effectively capture
the perpetual tension between Ann and Adele, and do a particularly nice
job of showing Ann's frustration at being the real grown-up of the two
while never turning her into a wise-ass. There's never a moment when the
nuances of their relationship aren't front and center.
     And that may be why ANYWHERE BUT HERE feels so claustrophobic and
artificial. Director Wayne Wang (THE JOY LUCK CLUB) and screenwriter Alvin
Sargent are so intensely focused on Ann and Adele that there's virtually
no context for their lives. We see Ann walking uncomfortably through
Beverly Hills High on her first day of school, but there's no sense of her
struggle before she's giggling away with girlfriends; a few scattered
scenes of Adele in her job as a speech pathologist/therapist provides no
sense for why this flighty woman ever got into a field that demands so
much patience. Most disappointing, there's far too little background on
their lives in Wisconsin for us to understand why Adele wants to leave and
Ann wants to stay, and far too little development of the potentially
intriguing relationship between Ann and her almost-kissing-cousin Benny
(Shawn Hatosy). There's really not a single strong supporting character
ANYWHERE BUT HERE can bounce off of. It's no wonder these two drive each
other crazy -- they've been hermetically sealed away from the rest of the
world.
     One could argue that such an isolated, in-each-other's-face
relationship is precisely the point of ANYWHERE BUT HERE -- that Ann and
Adele have nothing in the world but each other, crazy-making as they may
be to each other. That doesn't make it any easier to spend two hours with
them -- and only them -- and their conflicts, well-acted though they may
be. I found myself straining for something or someone else to think about
every once in a while: the kindly cop (Michael Milhoan) who offers words
of wisdom for both Ann and Adele; Paul Guilfoyle's few seconds as one of
Adele's eager to please teaching colleagues; Corbin Allred as a nervous
suitor for Ann's affections. And of course there was the cinematography,
which -- while thematically appropriate -- also reminded me what ANYWHERE
BUT HERE was missing. This is a drama too lacking in background color.

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
THE WAY OF THE GUN
(Artisan)
Starring:  Ryan Phillippe, Benicio Del Toro, Juliette Lewis, Taye Diggs,
Nicky Katt, Scott Wilson, James Caan, Dylan Kussman, Kristin Lehman.
Screenplay:  Christopher McQuarrie.
Producer:  Kenneth Kokin.
Director:  Christopher McQuarrie.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     THE WAY OF THE GUN -- the directing debut by Oscar-winning
screenwriter Christopher McQuarrie (THE USUAL SUSPECTS) -- opens the way
you always hope a film will open: with so much energy and potential that
the whole theater seems electrified. In that opening, a pair of career
criminals identified simply as "Parker" (Ryan Phillippe) and "Longbaugh" 
(Benicio Del Toro) perch on the hood of a car in a nightclub parking lot,
drawing the ire of the car's owner and his loud-mouthed female companion. 
The scene is violent, profane, surprising and hilarious. As a tone-setter,
it's marvelous; as a stand-alone piece of writing and directing, it's
hella-fun.
     Filled with individual moments of loopy creativity, genuinely
unsettling violence and wicked dialogue, THE WAY OF THE GUN should have
been one of the best films of the year (though in a painfully lackluster
2000, it still has a shot at that dubious honor). The only reason it's not
is a fundamental narrative miscalculation on McQuarrie's part: There's no
good reason for Parker and Longbaugh to be the film's ostensible
protagonists. The story follows the pair as they launch their latest
scheme, which involves kidnapping a nine-month-pregnant surrogate mother
named Robin (Juliette Lewis). They know the baby's biological parents are
paying Robin $1 million for the child, so they know there's money to be
had. What they don't know is that the father, Hale Chidduck (Scott 
Wilson), launders money for organized crime. They also don't know that
Chidduck can call on associates like Joe Sarno (James Caan), who has a
knack for dealing with problems like Parker and Longbaugh.
     For at least the first half-hour, THE WAY OF THE GUN is so skillfully
rendered that it seems destined for glory. From Parker and Longbaugh's
torment of a clerk at a sperm bank, to the unconventional staging of the
kidnapping itself, to the splendid slow-speed chase that follows,
McQuarrie twists the crime caper genre 90 degrees at virtually every
opportunity. Even playing the Tarantino comparison card doesn't entirely
do justice to McQuarrie's ability to throw a wrench into expectations. The
connections between the characters become evident only after a bit of
reflection; there's no guarantee that bad-asses still won't get their bad
asses kicked, or that those who appear likely to take the most punishment
might not end up dishing it out. It's almost never exactly what you expect
it to be.
     And, in at least one case, that's not exactly a compliment. As THE
WAY OF THE GUN unfolds, it gradually becomes evident that the true
protagonist of the story is not Parker and Longbaugh. That distinction
goes to Caan's Sarno, a veteran tough guy with his own priorities in the
whole kidnapping episode. While a flurry of sub-plots spin through the
film -- attempts by Chidduck's two chief bodyguards (Taye Diggs and Nicky
Katt) to double-cross their boss; the manipulations of Chidduck's young
wife (Kristin Lehman); the obstetrician (Dylan Kussman) with a tragic past
-- it's ultimately Sarno's story. McQuarrie, however, never seems aware of
that fact. He lingers on Parker and Longbaugh as though they were the
modern-day Butch and Sundance suggested by their names, despite the fact
that we're almost never allowed inside the criminals' heads. Telling the
story largely from their perspective isn't a celebration of the
anti-hero; it's a narrative blunder.
     Is that blunder enough to throw THE WAY OF THE GUN entirely off
course? Fortunately not. The climax at a Mexican brothel showcases both a
nerve-wracking episode of impromptu surgery and a good old-fashioned
shoot-out (with a couple of new-fashioned variations). McQuarrie's
compositions are unusually rich for a writer-turned-director -- watch for
Mrs. Chidduck appearing in the background and at the edge of the frame --
yet he still ends on a kicker of a line of dialogue. The only thing
missing from THE WAY OF THE GUN is soul, the soul that would have been
provided by Sarno as its center. It's a good film that's a 90 degree twist
away from greatness -- the one 90 degree twist McQuarrie didn't take.

Title
Review for Idle Hands (1999)
IDLE HANDS
(Columbia)
Starring:  Devon Sawa, Seth Green, Elden Henson, Jessica Alba, Jack
Noseworthy, Vivica A. Fox.
Screenplay:  Terri Hughes & Ron Milbauer.
Producers:  Andrew Licht & Jeffrey A. Mueller and Suzanne Todd & Jennifer
Todd.
Director:  Rodman Flender.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, drug use, nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I don't think there's a time IDLE HANDS could have been released that
would have made it a good film, but its unfortunate release at this 
particular time makes it seem even more rancid.  In the wake of the April
21st shootings at Littleton, Colorado's Columbine High School, pundits and
politicians have been holding forth on the desensitizing effects of 
violence in our popular culture, particularly that which is aimed at
teenagers.  The hard-core First Amendment advocate in me has approached
most of this talk as conservative rabble rousing, but there's no defending
something as brutally wrong-headed as IDLE HANDS.  If this is what
contemporary adolescents want to see in the movies, we really are in
trouble.
     The plot, such as it is, centers on a 17-year-old named Anton Tobias
(Devon Sawa), whose life's goal is to lay around watching T. V. and
getting stoned with his buddies Mick (Seth Green) and Pnub (Elden Henson).
Unfortunately for Anton, the devil will find work for idle hands to do, as
a malevolent spirit takes possession of his right hand and forces him to
kill his parents, Mick and Pnub.  Then Mick and Pnub return from the dead
to provide wacky comic relief, convincing a freaked-out Anton that extreme
measures are required.  That involves removing the offending appendage,
leaving five demonic digits free to wreak havoc at Anton's high school
Halloween dance.
     Even on its most basic level, IDLE HANDS is either idiotic or
pandering, when it isn't both.  Vivica A. Fox appears as a druid priestess
following the hand-possessing spirit's trail of mayhem, perhaps as some
sort of misguided spoof of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer."  The nubile lead
actress (Jessica Alba) falls instantly for the slackerly Anton, naturally
even finding his wayward hand kinky.  Naked breasts appear because, well,
that's what naked breasts do in teen-oriented films.  The problem-solving
powers of marijuana are lauded to the heavens.  Mick and Pnub are the only
two victims of Anton's to return from the grave -- even the internal logic
of the film's supernatural universe is fuzzy -- only to invite comparisons
to another horror comedy, John Landis' AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON.
And the gore, it raineth down like waters from the heavens.  Only Seth
Green, with his wry delivery, offers a moment's entertainment amidst the
stupidity.
     I'll head off the rebuttals of the "dude, relax, it's just a movie"
contingent at the proverbial pass:  yes, it's supposed to be a horror
comedy, with its absurd excesses probably intentional to a certain extent.
The problem is that the horror and the comedy are not combined with a
knowing wink, but sequenced in a disconcerting fashion.  First, someone is
killed in a horrific manner; then, someone makes a joke about the murder.
The numbing nonchalance of the commentary lends credence to the harshest
condemnations of media violence -- in this film, the ridicule isn't
directed at the conventions of horror films, but at the deaths of
teenagers.  When characters in the film gather at a makeshift memorial to
two of Anton's victims, it's hard to suppress a shudder when images of
Columbine High School are still so fresh in our minds.
     Of course it's a freakish coincidence that IDLE HANDS appears as it
does in the wake of that tragedy, and that any of the film's images bring
it to mind.  It's harder to ignore turning straightforward carnage into
comedy.  I'm not sure whether IDLE HANDS could have redeemed itself if it
actually had made a statement about the potential destructiveness of its
protagonists' lives of sloth instead of celebrating same, but at least
that would have been a nod to something beyond its audience's most
anti-social tendencies.  This film is a bad idea at an even worse time,
little more than fuel for the fires of righteous indignation which,
unfortunately, are seeming a bit more righteous all the time.

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
(New Line)
Starring:  Geena Davis, Samuel L. Jackson, Patrick Malahide, Craig Bierko,
Brian Cox, David Morse.
Screenplay:  Shane Black.
Producers:  Renny Harlin, Stephanie Austin, Shane Black.
Director:  Renny Harlin.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  119 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It is easy for me to understand the reasoning which pegged Shane
Black's script for THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT as worth $4 million, because it
includes all the elements which tend to make studio executives soil
themselves in anticipation.  A high concept premise, plenty of gratuitous
violence, a little T&A, buddies exchanging profane one-liners, really big
explosions...these are the stuff of blockbusters, my friends.  They are
also the stuff of inane, incoherent garbage, unlikely to gain any style
points with inane, incoherent garbagemeister Renny Harlin (CUTTHROAT
ISLAND) at the helm.  The thing is that THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT is a
difficult film to dismiss, because it is just as often entertaining as it
is actively infuriating.  As inane, incoherent garbage goes, it's really
not that bad.
     Geena Davis stars as Samantha Caine, a small town Pennsylvania
schoolteacher with a large hole in her life.  Eight years earlier she woke
up on a beach pregnant and with no recollection of her previous life, and
has since become a simple working mother while detectives failed to
provide any clues to her identity.  But Mitch Henessey (Samuel L. Jackson)
manages to succeed where others did not, and finds names which may help
fill in the blanks.  It turns out that Samantha might not like what she
finds, as she learns that she was a government-trained assassin named
Charley Baltimore, and that she has plenty of enemies who are not at all
pleased to find her alive.  She also has friends, but the trick is
figuring out who they are before someone erases her memory for good.
     Harlin tried to turn wife Geena Davis into an action heroine in
CUTTHROAT ISLAND, and the result was the biggest financial disaster in the
history of the cinema.  Apparently that was not enough to shake his
conviction that Davis had the right stuff, and THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT
sort of proves him right.  There is something strangely satisfying about
watching Davis turn into a killing machine, while partner Jackson (as the
down-on-his-luck gumshoe who usually does the ass-kicking in such films)
generally looks on ineffectually.  It's primitive role-reversal stuff, but
it works; it's a great bit of business when hausfrau Samantha takes a pie
she has just baked in a Pyrex dish and uses it to beat in the head of an
assailant.  Jackson also gets a handful of simplistic but very funny gag
lines, and even a line in which he makes fun of making up gag lines.  It
would be over-estimating the subtlety of THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT to refer
to it as a satire, but its bending of conventions often works quite well.
     At other times, it is about as conventional as action film-making
gets, and distressingly brutal.  There is a sequence early in the film
involving a deer hit by a car which will raise plenty of hackles, and it
provides an appropriate prelude to numerous scenes of torture, disturbing
fantasy/dream sequences and plenty of good old-fashioned shootings and
stabbings.  Harlin and Black also play unfair with the tired device of a
child in distress, and manage to play plenty of bodily functions for gags
along the way.  Into the middle of this rather crude mess they then drop
half-hearted attempts at character development, with Davis' discovery
resulting in a split personality and Jackson trying to redeem himself for
something or other.  For four million bucks, I suppose Shane Black figured
he might as well throw in the kitchen sink.
     Yet I can't deny that THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT made me laugh, and that
there was never a time when I was bored.  Yes, villains appear and
disappear with scarcely a thought to explaining who they are or why they
matter.  Yes, it is overloaded and overblown in a way which can make
anyone who cares about good movies cringe.  Yes, it is sometimes becomes
so violent as to be off-putting.  THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT is an
exploitation film, but it is an exploitation film with a sense of its own
absurdity.  You may not care at all about Mitch Henessey as a person, but
you will probably find yourself enjoying his exasperated delivery of
Black's crude humor; you may not really believe Charley Baltimore _is_ a
person, but you might still find her exploits a guilty pleasure.  THE LONG
KISS GOODNIGHT is an easy film to like, and equally easy to hate.  What
else can you say when you walk away from an inane, incoherent piece of
garbage with a smile on your face?

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
WHAT DREAMS MAY COME
(Polygram)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Cuba Gooding Jr., Annabella Sciorra, Max Von
Sydow, Jessica Brooks Grant, Josh Paddock.
Screenplay:  Ron Bass, based on the novel by Richard Matheson.
Producers:  Stephen Simon and Barnet Bain.
Director:  Vincent Ward.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  109 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     WHAT DREAMS MAY COME, a sort of post-mortem romantic fantasy-drama,
shows us a world which is unlike any we've seen before on screen.  Oh
sure, plenty of films have ventured into the realms of the afterlife, from
the sublime (DEFENDING YOUR LIFE) to the ridiculous (JACOB'S LADDER).
This, however, is a heaven of a different, considerably gaudier color.
It's the heaven created by Chris Nielsen (Robin Williams), a pediatrician
who dies in an auto accident.  Torn from his wife and soul-mate Annie
(Annabella Sciorra), Chris finds the transition easier when his personal
Paradise, complete with the family dog, resembles one of Annie's oil
paintings -- bright, shimmering and fairly sticky, since it is actually
composed of oil paint.
     Those scenes in Chris's heaven-of-his-own-making highlight WHAT
DREAMS MAY COME at its finest, creating spectacularly imaginative visions
of the Next World.  Production designer Eugenio Zanetti (Academy Award
winner for RESTORATION), in conjunction with the special effects team,
conjures up impressionist landscapes, a golden city on a hill, and visions
of eternal torment which are genuinely transporting.  Unfortunately, those
same scenes also highlight the film's most glaring weakness.  As Chris
explores the new world of his afterlife, he is instructed first by his
one-time medical mentor Albert (Cuba Gooding Jr.) then by a mysterious
Tracker (Max Von Sydow) in various rules and regulations.  They explain
what Chris can do, and why, what he can't do, and why, how he might want
to proceed on his journey of discovery, and why.  And WHAT DREAMS MAY COME
grinds...to...a...halt.
     It's an inevitable part of metaphysical fantasies like this that
someone has to bring the audience up to speed on exactly what they're
seeing and why.  That doesn't make it any less tedious, especially when
WHAT DREAMS MAY COME isn't supposed to be about what makes particular
cosmic gears turn the way they do.  Based on a novel by science
fiction/fantasy legend Richard Matheson, it's a story of intense human
emotions, and the desire of one soul to make right in death what went
wrong in life.  The scenes of Chris's earthly life with his family, strewn
throughout the film in a near-subliminal series of flashbacks, form a
potent back-story of a life which isn't as suburban-ideal as it first
appears.  There's something compelling about the suggetion that love
doesn't have to be perfect to be powerful.
     Those emotions should have carried WHAT DREAMS MAY COME to a
transcendent level, if not for those nagging distractions.  It's not just
the constant exposition which causes the problems, either.  An even bigger
distraction is Robin Williams, whose performance can't quite capture the
aching love he's supposed to be feeling.  Williams is certainly a fine
performer, but there are times when he's giving a "serious" performance
that he looks like he's trying way too hard.  The furrows in his brow, the
perpetually fidgeting lip and the over-dramatized line readings turn too
many interpersonal moments into exercises in How Not to Act on the Big
Screen.  Annabella Sciorra's convincing anguish could have grounded the
story in heart-breaking reality if Williams hadn't kept pulling it into
melodrama.
     Eventually, reality gives way entirely to a re-telling of the Orpheus
myth, with Chris searching for Annie's doomed soul on a journey through
the Other Place.  Again, the marvelous look of the film draws you in, as
Annie's shattered mindscape takes the form of the Nielsens' home turned a
desolate grey.  And again, a viewer is pulled away from the look of the
film by tortuous exposition and emotional confrontations which only feel
genuine on one side.  WHAT DREAMS MAY COME will likely wring tears from
those entranced by the GHOST-like prospect of romance beyond the pale.
For others, it will seem like a missed opportunity.  If a tale of primal
fears and primal emotions can't grab you without a nattering narrator,
something's very wrong.

Title
Review for Jakob the Liar (1999)
JAKOB THE LIAR
(Columbia)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Liev Schreiber, Bob Balaban, Alan Arkin, Armin
Mueller-Stahl, Hannah Taylor Gordon.
Screenplay:  Peter Kassovitz and Didier Decoin, based on the novel _Jakob
Der Lugner_ by Jurek Becker.
Producers:  Marsha Garces Williams and Steven Haft.
Director:  Peter Kassovitz.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is a scene early in JAKOB THE LIAR that hints at how much
better it could have been.  The scene is set in a Jewish ghetto in Poland
circa 1944, where a one-time cafe proprietor named Jakob Heym is walking
resolutely through the streets, fists stuffed into coat pockets.  To one
side of him, residents scavenge for food in the street; to the other side,
German troops beat a group of Jews.  Jakob, however, never stops moving. 
It's an efficient, effective set-up for the character, who is clearly
nobody's idea of a hero at the outset.  He is a man who has responded to
the horror of his surroundings by withdrawing from them, excising his
moral peripheral vision.
     The set-up is critical because fate will turn Jakob into a reluctant
savior.  After a visit to a German commandant's office and a moment alone
with a turned-on radio, Jakob learns that Russian troops are quite near.
When he brings this first news of the war in years to his fellow Jews,
they become convinced that he must have a radio, which is a punishable
offense in the ghetto.  The good news brings hope to the ghetto; the
everyday specter of suicide vanishes.  A private man of limited creativity
finds himself burdened with creating stories of Russian military progress
just to keep his neighbors alive.
     This promising story of an ordinary person doing the extraordinary is
burdened from the outset by casting:  the "ordinary person" in question,
Jakob Heym, is played by Robin Williams.  I am of the depressing opinion
that Williams is growing less assured as an actor in his "serious" roles 
with every passing year.  Compare his dramatic scenes in THE WORLD
ACCORDING TO GARP and MOSCOW ON THE HUDSON with WHAT DREAMS MAY COME or
PATCH ADAMS, and see how much more mannered he has become (or, at the very
least, how much less sensible at choosing material). JAKOB THE LIAR
depends on the notion that Jakob has to struggle to craft his fictions,
but Williams always looks like he's struggling _not_ to craft them.  When
he improvises a radio address by Winston Churchill for ailing 10-year-old
orphan Lina (Hannah Taylor Gordon), he seems relieved that he can finally
get wacky.
     Oh yes, and then there's that little girl.  Some viewers will
undoubtedly consider the hero's fanciful stories for a young charge too
reminiscent of LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, but those scenes aren't problematic
because they're familiar.  They're problematic because they're jarring and
distracting, introducing a cutesy relationship into a film that shouldn't
have been about cutesy relationships.  Jakob's character arc may be about
his willingness to act for the benefit of others, but there are plenty of
others without poor little Lina.  Every scene with her feels contrived,
pulling JAKOB THE LIAR away from its central story of hope coming to a
previously hopeless people.
     It is a pleasant surprise to find that JAKOB THE LIAR is a much
grittier production than you might expect from a Hollywood-ized Holocaust,
combining the weighty subject matter with dark humor in some effective
ways.  Director Peter Kassovitz, working from Jurek Becker's novel, crafts
some nice scenes between Jakob and the other townspeople, and draws solid
performances from Armin Mueller-Stahl (as a once-revered doctor) and Bob
Balaban (as a barber drifting into depression).  There are just too many
things going on that prove distracting, whether it's the sketchy romanctic
angle involving Liev Schreiber as an earnest former prizefighter, or
Williams' incongrous presence, or a sweet but utterly irrelevant little
girl.  JAKOB THE LIAR deals with too delicate a subject for such fumbling,
and has too compelling a central character to waste.  And after one
wonderful early scene, you can see the film wasted and fumbled away.

Title
Review for Hav Plenty (1997)
HAV PLENTY
(Miramax)
Starring:  Christopher Scott Cherot, Chenoa Maxwell, Tammi Katherine
Jones, Robinne Lee, Reginald James, Hill Harper.
Screenplay:  Christopher Scott Cherot.
Producers:  Christopher Scott Cherot and Robyn M. Greene.
Director:  Christopher Scott Cherot.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  92 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     HAV PLENTY comes from that school of independent film-making that
enchants some and aggravates others.  Like other recent indy success
stories including THE BROTHERS McMULLEN and CLERKS, HAV PLENTY will win
admirers for its comic charms and low-budget, can-do enthusiasm, even as
detractors line up to fire pot-shots at its gross amateurishness and
complete lack of visual style.  Think of it as Puppy Cinema:  it's so easy
to be won over by their cute, slobbery energy that you may overlook how
much they need discipline to avoid making a mess time and time again.
     Christopher Scott Cherot, the multi-hyphenate creator of HAV PLENTY,
definitely has the puppy thing down cold.  Cherot stars as Lee Plenty, a
struggling would-be screenwriter living out of his car while he waits for
his Big Break.  The maybe-girl-of-his-unrequited-dreams is Havilland "Hav"
Savage (Chenoa Maxwell), a well-to-do New Yorker with whom Lee shares a
love/hate friendship.  During one New Year's weekend at Hav's mother's
home in Washington D.C., with Hav taking time out from her philandering
fiance (Hill Harper), Lee becomes an object of interest for Hav's
high-maintenance friend Caroline (Tammi Katherine Jones), Hav's sister
Leigh (Robinne Lee) and Hav's old prep school chum Bobby (Kim Simmons) --
everyone, it seems, except the one person whose interest he most wants.
     Not everyone could get away with a premise that sounds like a
film-maker's ego-stroking fantasy.  Cherot, however, is so unassuming and
self-effacing -- and so doncha-just-love-him puppy-cute -- that all the
unsolicited romantic advances actually seem like they make him
uncomfortable.  Though far from a polished performer, Cherot has a natural
screen presence, an eye for wry commentary and the rare ability in the 90s
to sell a pratfall.  Simply put, it's easy to like him, even when the
film's narrative gets a little rough around the edges.
     Make that a _lot_ rough around the edges.  Cherot has a solid enough
sense for how to put together a comic scene, but he hasn't got a clue yet
how to unite them.  HAV PLENTY amounts to little more than a series of
vignettes, ideas for character encounters lined up in a row until they add
up to 90 minutes.  The characters are little more than one-dimensional,
occasionally even grotesque caricatures for the deadpan Cherot to react
to.  There are even takes included where the actors clearly fumble their
lines.  In such a makeshift effort, the sly, slick performance of Hill
Harper stands out as a hilarious delight.  Playing Hav's fiance Michael, a
criminally insincere R&B star whose song titles involve such romantic
analogies as comparing a woman to malt liquor in "Love Forty," Harper
creates one genuinely brilliant scene and one great comic character.
     That scene and Cherot's low-key appeal are enough to push HAV PLENTY
over the edge as an entertaining diversion.  Mostly, however, Cherot will
earn plaudits for his good intentions -- for making the film nearly as a
one-man show, for creating a romantic comedy with smart, upscale
African-American characters, etc.  HAV PLENTY ends with Lee finding
success as the "true story" of his relationship with Havilland becomes his
first film.  If Cherot wants to find success beyond HAV PLENTY, he'll need
to mature as an effective story-teller rather than just an effective
joke-teller.  A messy puppy may be cute, but all grown up he's just a
mess.

Title
Review for Hideaway (1995)
Starring:  Jeff Goldblum, Christine Lahti, Jeremy Sisto, Alicia
Silverstone, Alfred Molina.
Screenplay:  Andrew Kevin Walker and Neal Jimenez
Director:  Brett Leonard.
     Thriller-cum-horror films tend to come in two basic flavors.
On one end you've got your high-school audience slasher film, one of
those infinitely sequeled flicks based on a charismatic killer named
Freddy or Chuckie or Pinhead; on the other end is your moody,
upscale thriller, something that genuinely tries to be creepy and
doesn't depend entirely on bursts of music or a cat leaping out at
someone.  There are about ten times as many of the former as the
latter, and as a result I limit the films in the genre that I choose
to see to those I have some moderate hope for.  HIDEAWAY could have
been one of the rare quality efforts, but instead of being
ambitious, it's mostly just pretentious and gimmicky, and pretty
dull besides.
     HIDEAWAY stars Jeff Goldblum as Hatch Harrison, a man returning
from a vacation with his wife Lindsey (Christine Lahti) and daughter
Regina (Alicia Silverstone) when the family car is hit by a truck
and sent over an embankment.  Lindsey and Regina survive, but Hatch
seems lost, until a doctor (Alfred Molina) uses an experimental
technique to bring him back from clinical death.  Naturally, there
are a few side effects:  headaches, trouble sleeping and an
unsettling tendency to see visions of murders.  Soon Hatch begins to
believe that he has become psychically connected to a young killer
who calls himself Vassago (Jeremy Sisto), and who appears to want to
make Regina his next victim.
     Based on the novel by Dean Koontz, HIDEAWAY has some fairly
promising psychological material at its core.  We learn that the
Harrisons recently lost another daughter in a hit-and-run accident,
an accident for which Hatch feels he is partly to blame, leading
Lindsey to conclude that Hatch's "visions" of Regina in danger are a
manifestation of is need to redeem himself by saving his other
daughter.  There are also some potentially intriguing sexual
dynamics involved in Hatch's psychic voyeurism of his daughter being
seduced by Vassago.  These issues could have been utilized to make
HIDEAWAY something more than standard issue supernatural horror
fare, but director Brett Leonard refuses to let character matter.
While not nearly as techno-happy as he was in his previous film THE
LAWNMOWER MAN, Leonard still makes HIDEAWAY too much about filtered
shots (used to simulate Hatch's visions) and some absurd computer-
generated visions of the afterlife.
     At least the computer tricks are moderately interesting to look
at.  HIDEAWAY is mostly a big fat bore, full of performances which
could politely be called somnabulistic.  Jeff Goldblum takes his
halting, shifty-eyed, big-hand-gesture delivery and transforms
himself into...Jeff Goldblum.  It often appears as though in between
takes he was watching his own performance in THE FLY and wondering,
"How did I do that?"  Christine Lahti is solid as his wife, limited
mostly to looks of fear and worry, but she is convincing at both;
Alicia Silverstone, on the other hand, is just another nymphet in a
mini-skirt.  It is Jeremy Sisto who really deserves our pity,
though.  His teen psycho could have been fascinating and even
sympathetic, but he is turned into a tiresome heavy-metal-listenin',
sunglasses-at-night-wearin', virgin-sacrificin',
black-candle-lightin', devil-worshippin' plot device.  Satanists
everywhere should protest that this guy is ruining their image.
     HIDEAWAY completely implodes with a preposterous climax which
reduces the eternal battle between good and evil to a cool
psychedelic light show, with a life-affirming vision from beyond
thrown in for good measure.  It is, however, merely the logical
culmination of an incompetent directing job which can't even seem to
do cliches right.  HIDEAWAY is a good idea for a thriller; if only
it had been scary.  Or different.  Or *something*.

Title
Review for War, The (1994)
Starring:  Elijah Wood, Kevin Costner, Mare Winningham, Lexi Randall.
Screenplay:  Kathy McWorter.
Director:  Jon Avnet.
     If they gave out Academy Awards for earnestness, THE WAR would
have to be one of the front-runners.  War, it solemnly intones, is bad;
so are racism and sexism.  And so they are.  But THE WAR unfolds as
though it had discovered those concepts, never letting an opportunity
for an applause-generating speech go by the wayside.  As a result, some
very impressive performances are wasted on a script that just tries far
too hard to deliver a very simplistic moral.
     THE WAR is the story of the Simmons family, living in Juliette,
Mississippi circa 1970.  Father Stephen (Kevin Costner) is recently
returned from Vietnam, suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder
and unable to hold down a job, leaving it to mom Lois (Mare Winningham)
to keep the family afloat.  Their two children, meanwhile, face battles
of their own.  Stu (Elijah Wood) and his friends find themselves in
perpetual conflict with a surly group of siblings called the Lipnickis;
Lidia (Lexi Randall) finds out about racism through the mistreatment of
her black best friends in school.  But the siblings share a love of
their treehouse fort, and learn their own lessons about war when the
Lipnickis try to take it from them.
     Screenwriter Kathy McWorter clearly has her heart in the right
place.  The problem is that it's in too many places.  If all she had
wanted to do was to create an allegorical tale about war, it might have
worked; instead she adds scenes like the one in a summer school
classroom where a racist teacher (Christine Baranski) unfairly accuses
Lidia's friend Elvadine (LaToya Chisholm) of disrupting the class.
It's not even enough that Elvadine gets to tell off the teacher in a
completely over-the-top speech; Lidia has to get her two cents in as
well.  McWorter appears convinced that wherever one speech is good, two
must be even better.  Actually, no speeches would have been preferable
most of the time, particularly in a scene where poor Elijah Wood
practically has to deliver a sermon while trying to save someone's
life.  The script is overloaded with homilies, and needed a good
re-write at least fifteen minutes shorter.
     One of the goals of that re-write should have been removing the
characters of Lidia and her friends entirely.  The relationship between
the Simmons siblings is given only a cursory treatment, and the
narration Lidia provides could just as easily have been provided by
Stu, or not at all.  The girls seem to exist primarily to create a
battle of the sexes with Stu's friends (which the girls win, naturally)
and for the classroom sub-plot which is really superfluous.  THE WAR is
first and foremost about the relationship between Stu and Stephen, and
there are too many tangents which ignore that relationship.
     When Costner and Wood are the focus of attention, THE WAR is
actually quite compelling.  Costner gives an intelligent, understated
performance which shows Stephen's desperate attempts to find purpose in
the post-Vietnam world where he needs to feel he's making a difference,
and to impress upon his children the futility of fighting, while Wood
gives Stu an undercurrent of anger towards Stephen even as he tries to
support him.  There is tremendous conflict in their relationship, and
both actors do a fine job of bringing it out.  Sadly, McWorter and
director Jon Avnet are more interested in heavy-handedness than they
are in character study, so that by the time the climactic battle for
the treehouse rolls around, the point has been made and made and made
again.  Then, just in case you missed it the first ten times, "Peace
Train" plays over the closing credits.

Title
Review for Bronx Tale, A (1993)
Starring:  Robert DeNiro, Chazz Palminteri, Lillo Brancato,
           Francis Capra, Taral Hicks.
Screenplay:  Chazz Palminteri, based on his play.
Director:  Robert DeNiro.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Give this to Robert DeNiro--he's been paying attention.  After
working with some of the finest directors of his time, DeNiro proves
he's learned what goes into directing a good film with his first
helming effort, A BRONX TALE.  While his style frequently bears more
than a passing resemblance to frequent collaborator Martin Scorsese,
he's adept enough to get away with it, and adds enough of his own
vision to make him credible.  Hang all of this on a strong story about
a young man learning about life from two mentors and you have a solid,
entertaining two hours at the movies.
     A BRONX TALE is set during two years in the Bronx.  In 1960,
impressionable 9-year-old Calogero (Francis Capra) is fascinated by
Sonny (Chazz Palminteri), the neighborhood crime boss.  His father
Lorenzo (Robert DeNiro), a bus driver, tries to steer Calogero away
from Sonny's hangouts, but with little success.  Eight years later, a
now 17-year-old Calogero (Lillo Brancato) is still associating with
Sonny, as well as a group of young toughs nurturing a hatred for the
blacks beginning to appear in their neighborhood.  He continues to
weigh the advice coming from Lorenzo and Sonny, including advice
concerning his attraction to Jane (Taral Hicks), a young black girl,
and concerning the best path towards success.
     A BRONX TALE has been adapted from a one-man play by Palminteri,
and it has made an exceptional transition to the screen.  It doesn't
feel stagy like last year's adaptation of A FEW GOOD MEN, and has an
easy flow, even between the 1960 and 1968 segments.  Palminteri's
script is full of colorful characters and evocative period atmosphere,
and the first half in particular is also quite funny.  However, I was
far less engaged when the tone took a turn towards the overly serious
and focused on racial tensions.  The romance between Calogero and Jane
felt forced, and ultimately I didn't think the climactic racial
confrontation worked.  The film had established such a unique and
interesting central triangle of Calogero, Sonny and Lorenzo that I was
disappointed when that conflict took a back seat.
     The appeal of that conflict is part character, part performance.
The two father figures are complicated characters portrayed by two fine
actors.  DeNiro has the less showy role of Lorenzo, a hard-working man
trying to teach his son respect for that hard work.  Yet he is not a
faultless blue-collar angel.  At times, DeNiro plays Lorenzo as just as
concerned with his son's opinion of him as he is about Calogero's
well-being.  He also discourages his son's interracial romance, saying
people should "stick to their own."  Palminteri handles Sonny just as
deftly.  While a brutal figure capable of laying out a group of Hell's
Angels, he also lectures Calogero on the importance of staying in
school and staying away from his trouble-making buddies.  Calogero's
moral uncertainty is real because the good guy and bad guy in A BRONX
TALE frequently exchange hats.  Francis Capra is very good as the
mischievous young Calogero, but I was less impressed by Lillo
Brancato.  He's a bit too blank, and adopts too many DeNiro mannerisms
(Brancato won the part by doing an impression of DeNiro).  Jane is
written basically as a "type," and Taral Hicks looks painfully
uncomfortable a great deal of the time.  The combination of these two
weaker performances only added to my antipathy toward the romantic
subplot.
     Robert DeNiro's direction, as I've noted, owes much to Martin
Scorsese; indeed, an early scene introducing the nicknamed regulars at
Sonny's bar is lifted straight out of GOODFELLAS.  DeNiro also displays
Scorsese's gift for pacing and crisp images.  But this is more than a
knock-off job.  DeNiro's tone is lighter, more affirming and
optimistic.  In that respect, A BRONX TALE perhaps bears more
resemblance to the current KING OF THE HILL than it does to
GOODFELLAS.  It's a flawed film, but does considerably more right than
it does wrong.  A BRONX TALE is a coming-of-age fable in which Robert
DeNiro shows he has come of age as a filmmaker.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
YOU'VE GOT MAIL
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan, Greg Kinnear, Parker Posey, Dave
Chappelle, Jean Stapleton, Steve Zahn, Dabney Coleman.
Screenplay:  Nora Ephron and Delia Ephron.
Producers:  Lauren Shuler Donner and Nora Ephron.
Director:  Nora Ephron.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes).
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Notwithstanding its tres-90s-hip cyber-era premise -- two email chat
pals fall in love online, little realizing they already know and dislike
each other in the real world -- YOU'VE GOT MAIL is a very old-fashioned
sort of romantic comedy.  It's not just that the film is a spin on the
1940 Ernst Lubitsch comedy THE SHOP AROUND THE CORNER.  Actually, it's
more about the lead actors.  You see, co-writer/director Nora Ephron seems
to understand at last what the studio bosses of old understood, what she
didn't understand in SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE.  Sometimes a romance isn't 
about a concept, or a romance between characters.  Sometimes it's about a
romance between stars.  YOU'VE GOT MAIL is about a romance between Tom
Hanks and Meg Ryan.
     Mind you, they do play characters in the film.  Hanks is Joe Fox,
whose family company is a chain discount bookstore; Ryan is Kathleen
Kelley, whose family business is a neighborhood children's bookstore on
Manhattan's Upper West Side just down the block from a brand new Fox
Books.  By day they're quarreling competitors, each with a fizzling
relationship -- Joe with a caffeine-fueled editor (Parker Posey), Kathleen
with a provocateur journalist (Greg Kinnear).  By night they're lonely
hearts correspondents, sharing deep thoughts on big issues.  
     YOU'VE GOT MAIL does manage to do an effective job of poking into the
appeal and the problems of online interactions.  It's easy for Kathleen
(as "Shopgirl") and Joe (as "NY152") to connect while connected, revealing
themselves more fully and more quickly in an environment where fear of
rejection is mitigated by anonymity.  At the same time, Ephron and sister
Delia use variations on the idea that "it's not personal" to show how easy
it is disconnect real people from the way we encounter them, whether in
the flesh or after a cursor.  Trust this writer -- who met his wife
online, and knows whereof he speaks -- that the Ephrons get their subject
right, right down to the embarrassment of people involved in The Love That
Dare Not Type Its Username.
     Yet even this thematic material is little more than a pleasant fringe
benefit, because YOU'VE GOT MAIL is first and foremost a chance to watch
two incredibly engaging performers together.  It only takes a few moments
watching Hanks and Ryan together to realize what SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, for
all its storybook charms, was missing:  Hanks and Ryan together.  Here
they bicker and banter, bond warily, and generally offer delights for all
who watch.  YOU'VE GOT MAIL's final half hour is an improvement over THE
SHOP AROUND THE CORNER in that it sets a stronger foundation for the
rapproachment to come, but it also means plenty of time to enjoy the
chemistry between the two stars.  Hanks is playing Hanks (smart, funny and
too-nice-for-words), Ryan is playing Ryan (smart, funny and
too-cute-for-words), and it doesn't even matter that they're not trying
very hard to create distinctive characters.  Ephron just gives them clever
things to say, and gets out of the way.
     It's nice to see Ephron show some comic instinct again after the
ineptitude of MICHAEL and MIXED NUTS, but even here there's a fair amount
of flab in her film-making.  The peeks into Joe's dysfunctional family,
where all the men keep nabbing trophy wives, only makes the nice guy
normalcy of Hanks-as-Hanks harder to accept, while the supporting cast
(Posey, Kinnear, Dave Chappelle, Steve Zahn) is ominpresent without having
much to do.  Much of the first hour of YOU'VE GOT MAIL feels very
inefficient, but fortunately Ephron saves the best for last.  Even as the
film creeps up on the two hour mark, it's unlikely to lose viewer
interest, because that's when Hanks and Ryan shine brightest.  YOU'VE GOT
MAIL is a celebrity-powered wish-fulfillment, and that's okay.  Sometimes
it's enjoyable just watching nice things happen to nice people, even if
the nice people involved happen to be movie stars.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
SCREAM 3
(Dimension)
Starring:  Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox Arquette, David Arquette, Patrick
Dempsey, Parker Posey, Lance Henriksen, Scott Foley, Liev Schreiber.
Screenplay:  Ehren Kruger, based on characters created by Kevin
Williamson.
Producers:  Kevin Williamson, Cathy Konrad and Marianne Maddalena.
Director:  Wes Craven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the production notes for SCREAM 3, there is a heading titled
"Rules of a Trilogy" which reads: "Chapter One sets the rules. Chapter Two
bends the rules. But in the finale, forget the rules." That's as succinct
a summation as any for why, as this particular trilogy draws to a close,
it feels one chapter too long. SCREAM revived the moribund slasher movie
genre by mining both laughs and scares from horror film conventions. 
SCREAM 2 kept the pace by turning the satire towards horror sequels, and
even the first SCREAM. SCREAM 3, it turns out, does forget the rules. It
forgets that a film based on scary parody of scary movie cliches had
better be scary or funny, but not cliched.
     A few more years have passed since the events in SCREAM 2 as we are
re-introduced to our gang of survivors. Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) is
living in seclusion, working from home as a counselor on a crisis hotline. 
Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox Arquette) anchors an "Entertainment
Tonight"-type program after flopping on "60 Minutes II." Cotton Weary
(Liev Schreiber) has become a popular T.V. talk show host and cameo actor
in STAB 3, the latest film based on the Woodsboro murders, on which Dewey
Riley (David Arquette) is working as a consultant. When cast members of
STAB 3 begin turning up dead, accompanied by photos of Sidney's mother as
a young woman, Sidney is drawn out of hiding to find out why. It seems
someone connected to the film is creating his/her own murderous rewrites
on the fly. Or perhaps it's someone investigating the murders. Or perhaps
Sidney's mother herself has returned from beyond the grave.
     The tortuous path to unmasking the killer(s) has, of course, become
one of the series' trademarks -- and, for my money, the most annoying. 
There are suspects a-plenty -- homicide Det. Kincaide (Patrick Dempsey); 
STAB 3 cast members including Jennifer (Parker Posey) and Angelina (Emily
Mortimer); none-too-subtly-named producer John Milton (Lance Henriksen);
director Roman Bridger (Scott Foley) -- in a non-stop parade of hints,
motives and opportunities. Director Wes Craven and screenwriter Ehren
Kruger (stepping in for creator Kevin Williamson) get so focused on
whodunnit, in fact, that they rarely give any juice to what the person
whodunnit is doing. There are a couple of tense moments, including
effective use of a one-way mirror and the surprising perils of a movie
set, but there's nothing to match the nerve-wracking Drew Barrymore
sequence in SCREAM or the crawl across the killer in SCREAM 2. As a
chiller, it's fairly uninspired chase-n-shriek stuff.
     The humor doesn't fare much better, drifting away from commentary on
movies to linger on commentary on movie-making. Kruger tosses off some
solid gags, but they tend to be of the industry-jokey variety (including a
few cute but unnecessary cameos). He even misses some obvious 
opportunities, letting characters split up in a big spooky house with nary
an ironic observation and making everyone too stupid to draw connections
when the killer uses an electronic device to mimic voices. It becomes too
easy to see SCREAM 3 as a step towards exactly the kind of formulaic
horror film the series originally skewered. Even when the humor works, it
feels too easy -- and too played -- to take shots at the people who make
the movies than to take shots at the movies themselves. Kruger opts to
chuckle at career-obsessed directors, bimbo starlets who don't know
VERTIGO from PSYCHO and genre film actors getting absurdly Method about
creating their "characters."
     The height of irony is that you can see that kind of deadly earnest
acting going on in SCREAM 3. The primary offender is Campbell, who looks
as though she could only be dragged back to the set after being promised
Sidney would grow as a character. She does her damndest to make sure we
all understand how haunted she is, as though anyone could possibly care
about the deep psychological underpinnings of Sidney Prescott. It's one
thing for a character to make a reference to the developments in the
GODFATHER trilogy; it's another for Campbell to pretend she's playing
Michael Corleone. SCREAM 3 is a purely functional shocker, but it takes
all the wrong things seriously and plays all the wrong things for laughs.
Craven and company have forgotten the rules, all right. They've even
forgotten why the series was worth a third installment in the first place.

Title
Review for Lion King, The (1994)
Voices:  Matthew Broderick, Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Jeremy Irons,
         Nathan Lane, Ernie Sabella, Rowan Atkinson, James Earl Jones.
Screenplay:  Irene Mecchi, Jonathan Roberts and Linda Woolverton.
Directors:  Roger Allers and Rob Minkoff.
     There is a yin to every yang, and if there is a down side to the
remarkable success of Disney's recent animated features, it's that the
Mouse keeps upping the ante for every subsequent feature.  1989's THE
LITTLE MERMAID became the highest grossing animated release ever, as
did 1991's BEAUTY AND THE BEAST and 1992's ALADDIN.  Is THE LION KING
ready to follow in those massive footsteps?  Most likely.  While not as
emotional as BEAUTY or as fast-paced as ALADDIN, THE LION KING is
genuinely entertaining, with moments of truly stunning visual
creativity.  Only weakness in the music and a fractured tone hamper the
proceedings.
     THE LION KING is the tale of Simba (voice of Jonathan Taylor
Thomas), the son of Lion King Mufasa (James Earl Jones).  The birth of
the new heir displaces the king's brother Scar (Jeremy Irons), leading
the envious Scar to plot the death of Mufasa and Simba.  When Mufasa is
killed while trying to save Simba, Scar convinces Simba he must go into
exile.  There Simba is befriended by meerkat Timon (Nathan Lane) and
warthog Pumbaa (Ernie Sabella), and grows to adulthood (adult voice of
Matthew Broderick) blissfully free of responsibilities.  However, when
childhood friend Nala (Moira Kelly) informs Simba that Scar is
destroying the prideland, Simba must decide whether to keep his
distance or to confront his demons ... and Scar.
     Like the last three big Disney hits, THE LION KING is a musical,
but it probably shouldn't have been.  Elton John and ALADDIN lyricist
Tim Rice have provided five new songs, but nothing has the sparkle of
the Menken/Ashman compositions, and for the most part the production
numbers seem more obligatory than inspired.  "I Just Can't Wait to Be
King" is a silly, gaudy bit, and "Hakuna Matata" is a recycled "Bare
Necessities."  The one exception is Scar's song, "Be Prepared," which
Irons delivers with zest.  It also features a chilling sequence with
goose-stepping hyenas parading past Scar against a subtle background
with images of swastikas.  Hans Zimmer's Afro-tinged arrangements and
incidental score make the most of the music, but THE LION KING is much
more effective when the story is spoken rather than sung.
     The story is a somber one, an animated "Hamlet" of sorts, and
frequently the animation matches that tone.  The elephant graveyard,
populated by Scar's hyena cohorts (voices by Whoopi Goldberg and Cheech
Marin), is a spooky wonder, while the later appearance of Pride Rock is
simply bleak.  These sequences might be less than entrancing to the
very young, but they are offset by lively, funny sequences featuring
Timon and Pumbaa.  Nathan Lane gives Timon a Bugs Bunny cockiness which
is charming, and Ernie Sabella is equally endearing as the affably
flatulent warthog.  Nala's pursuit of Pumbaa is the film's comic
highlight, but the action in THE LION KING tends to be more serious.
Parents should exercise some judgment regarding taking children under
six.
     None of this is to suggest that THE LION KING plods along
humorlessly.  Timon and Pumbaa get the most to work with, but they are
ably assisted by the other supporting characters.  Scar, while
sinister, gets of some dark one-liners; Robert Guillaume has a small
but goofy bit as a Yoda-like baboon.  The most entertaining vocal
performance, however, comes from Rowan Atkinson (the malapropping
minister from FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL).  As Zasu, a hornbill who
serves as Mufasa's chancellor and Simba's chaperone, he gets a fussy
part that's a cross between THE LITTLE MERMAID's Sebastian and BEAUTY
AND THE BEAST's Cogsworth, but Atkinson's droll delivery makes it his
own (and provides the single biggest laugh with a shot at one of
Disney's most annoying songs).  THE LION KING is not a masterpiece; it
is too slow at times, and has perhaps too many characters to juggle.
Still, it is witty and beautifully drawn, and is sure to continue
Disney's amazing animated winning streak.

Title
Review for Extreme Measures (1996)
     Whenever I hear an actor talk about needing to "stretch," I generally
feel the need to stretch my legs very far in the opposite direction.  I do
not mean to suggest that actors are not artists who seek out new
challenges.  It is simply that those who usually make the biggest noise
about moving beyond one type of role in which they have been successful
are also those who have lingered in that one role for a very good reason.
Hugh Grant had become so familiar as a stammering, self-effacing light
comedian that one would be forgiven for suspecting that was all he had in
him.  As evidence to the contrary, witness EXTREME MEASURES, a solid
Hollywood thriller in which Grant takes to the role of suspense hero like
a producer to a sequel.
     Grant plays Dr. Guy Luthan, an emergency room surgeon in a New York
public hospital who has grown accustomed to the chaos and life-or-death
judgments which come with the job.  He thinks he has seen everything,
until a homeless man is brought in one night experiencing unexplainable
symptoms.  The man's sudden death piques Guy's curiosity, but when he
begins looking for autopsy records, he finds that the body has
disappeared; further, the man's records seem to have been purged from the
hospital's computer files.  Guy smells a conspiracy, but before he can
investigate further he is framed for drug possession and fired from his
job.  His life in a shambles, Guy does the only thing he can do:  throw
all his energy into finding out who is behind the frame-up, and how it is
connected to the research of Dr. Lawrence Myrick (Gene Hackman).
     As a rule, the Hollywood suspense thrillers of recent years have been
a rather sorry lot, and I believe that one of the reasons has been that
constant attempts to shock are being substituted for the creation of
mounting tension.  Director Michael Apted has made some of the more
intriguing character-based suspense yarns of recent years (THUNDERHEART,
BLINK), and EXTREME MEASURES has a way of getting under your skin.  It is
an exceptionally well-paced film, with Guy's dilemma growing
incrementally; its effect is based on watching Guy get deeper and deeper
in trouble, rather than watching him hurtle from one life-threatening
confrontation to the next.  There is also at least one completely
unexpected turn which seems to put Guy in an impossible situation, and a
fight in an elevator which might truly bring you to the edge of your seat. 
     Anchoring it all is Hugh Grant, who appears determined to go all the
way in becoming "the next Cary Grant" by playing a Hitchcockian man who
knew too much.  Grant is exceptionally convincing as an ER surgeon,
approaching every crisis with a matter-of-fact professionalism and
confidence.  It is tempting to play such characters as arrogant, and in
the case of EXTREME MEASURES it would be even more tempting so that the
story could be based around a lesson about playing God.  But Guy is simply
a scientist whose basic curiosity gets him into a completely unexpected
mess, and there is such a consistency to Grant's performance that his
comic and dramatic moments merge seamlessly.  It is an eye-opening piece
of acting, and all the more challenging because Grant has to carry nearly
every scene.
     If there is one major frustration in EXTREME MEASURES, it is that
Apted and screenwriter Tony Gilroy don't handle the conspiracy at its
center very well.  It is obvious what is going on far too early,
particularly if you have seen any of the trailers which essentially give
everything away.  That detracts from the process of discovery, and might
make you impatient as you simply wait for Guy to figure out what you have
known for over an hour.  The conclusion tries to shove far too much into
far too little time -- a physical showdown; the outlining of a moral
dilemma; the attempt to flesh out Hackman's role, which is really a
glorified cameo -- resulting in a thriller which sags exactly when it
should be peaking.  It is fortunate that the preceding ninety minutes is
so energetic and involving.  It is even more fortunate that Hugh Grant is
so well-suited to his role, and that it proves not to be such a stretch to
think of him in a lab coat rather than just a morning coat.

Title
Review for Tommy Boy (1995)
Starring:  Chris Farley, David Spade, Bo Derek, Julie Warner,
           Brian Dennehy, Dan Aykroyd.
Screenplay:  Terry Turner & Bonnie Turner.
Director:  Peter Segal.
     If there is a development in recent popular culture more
depressing than the degeneration of "Saturday Night Live" into a
weekly televised car wreck, it is the proliferation of equally
pungent big screen projects featuring current and alumni SNL cast
members.  These films have primarily been wrong-headed attempts to
turn a five minute sketch into a ninety-minute movie (IT'S PAT,
CONEHEADS) or self-indulgent star vehicles for annoying stars
(OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS, BILLY MADISON).  That is why it comes as such a
complete shock that TOMMY BOY is funny, and not just sporadically.
It is an ideal vehicle for Chris Farley and David Spade that falls
flat only when it mistakenly tries to be warm and fuzzy.
     Farley plays Thomas "Tommy" Callahan III, a big good-natured
doofus who has finally graduated from college after seven years.
Fortunately, his dad Big Tom Callahan (Brian Dennehy) owns an auto
parts company, and plans to have Tommy Boy follow him in running the
family business.  That opportunity comes sooner than expected when
Big Tom dies on the day of his wedding to Beverly (Bo Derek),
leaving behind a business in financial trouble.  In an attempt to
save Callahan Auto Parts, Tommy goes on the road with Richard Hayden
(David Spade), his dad's sarcastic right hand man, to sell
Callahan's new state-of-the-art brake pad to retailers.  If Tommy
Boy can't learn to be a great salesman, Callahan will be sold to a
competitor (Dan Aykroyd)--which would suit Beverly and her "son"
Paul (an uncredited Rob Lowe) just fine.
     What separates TOMMY BOY from other SNL cast projects is that
it looks like someone actually sat down and tried to figure out how
Chris Farley and David Spade could best be used.  It turns out that
they are a nearly ideal pairing as a comic team.  An hour and a half
of nothing but Farley's pratfalls and manic outbursts would have
been intolerable; ditto for Spade's snottier-than-thou put-downs.
Indeed, both of their comic personae are very individual tastes, and
those who are irritated by either or both of them might not find
much to like in TOMMY BOY.  But for some reason, Farley and Spade
complement each other very well:  Farley does something really
stupid, and Spade makes an acerbic comment.  That's the basic
formula, repeated with variations on the content and context.  And
most of the time, it's good for a solid laugh.
     That is largely because screenwriters Terry and Bonnie Turner
(THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE) come up with some inspired situations within
the routine plot.  There are a few hilarious scenes of Farley and
Spade bonding over cheesy songs on the radio, including The
Carpenters' "Superstar" and the Spanish language ballad "Eres Tu."
Another highlight has the portly Farley trying to change clothes in
an airplane restroom, cleverly directed by Peter Segal (NAKED GUN
33-1/3).  Sure there are more than a few clunkers, as well as a
completely unnecessary and un-funny scene centered around
masturbation, but far more of the jokes are dead on.
     TOMMY BOY's biggest lapses come when silly plot contrivances
draw the focus away from the two stars.  There is an obligatory
romantic interest for Farley in the woefully under-used Julie Warner
as a spunky employee at Callahan's, but it is about as tacked-on as
a sub-plot could be.  Farley's villainous step-family is also pretty
boring for the most part, although it is a kick to see Bo Derek
again after over a decade, and Rob Lowe may have discovered a new
career as a camp villain after this film and the first WAYNE'S
WORLD.  The attempts to play up the close relationship between Tommy
Boy and his father are also well-intentioned but distracting.
Basically, any time the makers of TOMMY BOY try too hard to be
anything but funny, it doesn't work.  When they try to be funny, it
does.  The current writing crew of "Saturday Night Live" might
consider giving TOMMY BOY a good look.  They could stand to learn a
thing or two.

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
Starring:  Liam Neeson, Ben Kingsley, Ralph Fiennes, Embeth Davidtz.
Screenplay:  Steven Zaillian.
Director:  Steven Spielberg.
     Back in August, I wrote the following:  "If SCHINDLER'S LIST is
even halfway decent, Steven Spielberg will be nominated for Best
Director, and probably win."  That statement was based on the
assumption that such an award would basically be a lifetime achievement
recognition, like Al Pacino's Best Actor win last year, as well as an
industry-wide "thank you" for the coattails business provided by
JURASSIC PARK.  I didn't expect that if he did win, he would actually
deserve it.  But with SCHINDLER'S LIST, Spielberg has crafted a nearly
perfect film, a gripping and brilliantly acted epic which is not only
the best film of 1993, but probably the best film of the decade thus
far.
     SCHINDLER'S LIST is the true story of Oskar Schindler (Liam
Neeson), a German businessman and Nazi sympathizer who decides to turn
the 1939 invasion of Poland into a personal windfall.  Cashing in on
carefully established Party contacts, Schindler sets up an enamelware
factory in Krakow to make pots and pans for the German army.  His
startup capital is provided by wealthy Jews with few other options,
among them accountant Itzhak Stern (Ben Kingsley).  Schindler makes a
fortune utilizing Jewish slave labor, until his business and the lives
of hundreds of thousands of Jews collide with the March 1943
liquidation of the Krakow ghetto, and the subsequent relocation of Jews
to Plaszow labor camp.  There Schindler establishes a friendship with
Commandant Amon Goeth (Ralph Fiennes), and attempts to use his money
and influence to save the lives of his workers.
     Longtime viewers of Spielberg films will scarcely recognize his
hand in SCHINDLER'S LIST.  Gone are the swooping crane shots; gone are
the zoom-ins on awestruck faces.  With the exception of a risky
epilogue, gone too is the cloying manipulation of emotion.  This is a
mature, restrained Spielberg, and his narrative decisions are right on
the money.  He casts a glossy sheen on early scenes showing Schindler
wining and dining highly placed SS officers, playing up the "panache"
which Schindler later describes as his strong suit.  Another sequence
juxtaposes a wealthy Jewish family leaving their home for the ghetto
with a smug Schindler moving into the very same house.  One scene after
another is expertly staged, too many individual moments to mention but
each and every one liable to leave an indelible mark on your memory.
     What allows SCHINDLER'S LIST to work both as fine drama and vivid
historical document is screenwriter Steven Zaillian's (SEARCHING FOR
BOBBY FISCHER) decision to make the characters as memorable as the
images.  Oskar Schindler is a marvelously intricate study, a slimy and
self-serving profiteer who finds himself becoming an unlikely savior
before he even realizes what he's doing.  Liam Neeson manages both
sides of Schindler skillfully, making the transition seamlessly.  Ben
Kingsley turns in a typically understated performance as Stern, the
"good angel" who must walk a delicate line while encouraging
Schindler's magnanimity.  The finest performance is also the most
disturbing, Ralph Fiennes' perfectly amoral Amon Goeth.  As a creature
of pure random destruction, it would have been easy for Goeth to become
another stereotypical Nazi, but Fiennes gives him surprising depth and
complexity, particularly in a tense scene with his Jewish housekeeper
(Embeth Davidtz).  All three performances are among the finest of the
year, and they give SCHINDLER'S LIST a personal quality that transcends
the subject matter.
     There will be some discussion about Spielberg's use of color in
the depiction of a young girl in a red coat who catches Schindler's
eye.  My feeling is that this is part of a larger attempt to make the
Holocaust a tragedy of individuals rather than of a faceless mass.
Spielberg includes several scenes of SS troops and the Jews themselves
announcing their names as they are registered, given work assignments,
or separated into "essential" and "non-essential."  In this way, he
assaults the viewer both with staggering numbers and with individual
lives.  There are many disturbing images of arbitrary murder, of death
without pattern or meaning, and in the midst of such arbitrariness one
act of mercy could mean everything.  "The list is life," Stern tells
Schindler when their work is complete, and SCHINDLER'S LIST is a
testimony to the individuals whose lives were changed forever by the
Holocaust.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
URBAN LEGEND
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Jared Leto, Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Joshua Jackson,
Robert Englund, John Neville, Loretta Devine.
Screenplay:  Silvio Horta.
Producers:  Neal H. Moritz, Gina Matthews and Michael McDonnell.
Director:  Jamie Blanks.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, sexual situations, profanity)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Hey, did you ever hear the one about the really good post-SCREAM teen
horror film?  It seems that some film-makers, realizing there was a new
market to be tapped after the success of SCREAM and its sequel, decided to
make an even better variation on the theme.  The script was intelligent,
the obligatory pop culture asides felt more than obligatory, and the
suspense was genuinely scary.  It was both fresh _and_ frightening.  No,
really, it actually happened.  A friend of my cousin's sister-in-law
actually saw it.
     Sorry, friends, but the preceding is a myth -- an URBAN LEGEND if you
will, exactly the kind which forms the basis of the film of the same name.
You see, the story on the Northeastern U.S. campus of Pendleton College
goes that a psycho professor murdered a dorm full of students 25 years
ago, but the administration hushed it up.  Now, as the silver anniversary
approaches, more nastiness is going on.  A young woman is decapitated by a
figure in the back seat of her car; another is killed in a darkened room
while her rommate lies blissfully sleeping.  All of it is somehow
connected to Natalie Simon (Alicia Witt), a student with a dark secret in
her past, but who is murdering students based on urban legends?  Hot shot
school reporter Paul (Jared Leto)?  Frat boy prankster Damon (Joshua
Jackson)?  Folklore professor Wexler (erstwhile Freddy Krueger Robert
Englund)?  Or some other disgruntled soul?
     If you actually care about the answer to that question by the end of
URBAN LEGEND, it will only be to see how convoluted the explanation could
be.  Like too many recent horror films, this one obliges you to play Name
That Killer, without giving you enough information to permit anything but
a random guess.  And if you think abut the revelation for long enough
afterwards, you'll realize it just doesn't matter.  Memo to horror
film-makers:  we don't need to be guessing who's behind Michael Myers'
mask in order for him to be threatening.  Stop wasting our time; this is a
slasher film, not Agatha Christie.
     Frankly, it's about time slasher films started acting like slasher
films in plenty of ways.  Ever since SCREAM (or even Wes Craven's earlier
NEW NIGHTMARE, if you wanna be picky), horror films have gone all
post-modern on us, eschewing grind-it-out gore in favor of winking
recognition of genre conventions.  URBAN LEGEND's pop culture nuggets
range from the acceptably smirky (a snippet of the "Dawson's Creek" theme
played when "Dawson's Creek" cast member Jackson turns on his car radio)
to the who-cares ridiculous (naming one character after one of the film's
producers), and those are only a couple of examples of the strained
reaches for gags in Silvio Horta's script.  There's just not enough humor
or creativity to compensate for the raw terror lost in forced attempts to
be cute.  Aside from the effective prologue sequence, URBAN LEGEND misses
the boat on providing gut-level scares.
     Ironically enough, it also misses the point that most of the late
70s/early 80s slasher films these arched-eyebrow cousins goof on were
actually moralizing cautionary tales, just like the ones described by
Englund's folklore professor.  When he asks his class if they know the one
about the babysitter who gets a call from inside the house, many movie
fans will say yes...it was called WHEN A STRANGER CALLS.  URBAN LEGEND
nicks from the cine-literate horror of SCREAM without even realizing it,
because movies _are_ our urban legends.  The film might have been on to
something with a killer copycatting other movie murders, rather than
trying to pass off the ever-popular "impaled on the parking lot tire
spikes" tale as part of the collective unconscious, or giving us the
Nanook of the North terror of a killer hidden behind a zipped-up parka.
Pity the talented Alicia Witt (late of TV's "Cybill") for getting caught
up in a horror film that's not clever enough or scary enough to succeed as
anything but a clutch-your-date Friday night special.  URBAN LEGEND is a
tale too often told.  And as one character in the film says, "If you're
going to tell the story, at least get it right."

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
COOKIE'S FORTUNE
(October)
Starring:  Glenn Close, Julianne Moore, Liv Tyler, Chris O'Donnell,
Charles S. Dutton, Patricia Neal, Ned Beatty, Courtney B. Vance.
Screenplay:  Anne Rapp.
Producers:  Robert Altman and Etchie Stroh.
Director:  Robert Altman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  117 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In his last film, 1998's little-seen THE GINGERBREAD MAN, Robert
Altman took his unique perspective to the finer points of the legal
system's workings in the American South.  Apparently he decided he hadn't
yet explored it in all possible depth, because he's back in Dixie for
COOKIE'S FORTUNE.  The region's easy rhythms and idiosyncracies seem to
suit the film-maker well, and he seems to be having a heck of a good time
with his visits there.  COOKIE'S FORTUNE finds Altman laying down a blues
jam of intertwining characters spiced with a deft, dry comic touch into a
surprising, off-beat entertainment.
     The Cookie of the title is eccentric matriarch Jewel Mae "Cookie"
Orcutt (Patricia Neal), strong-willed inabitant of a Holly Springs,
Mississippi manor with her black houseman Willis (Charles S. Dutton).
Cookie is estranged from her only family in town, nieces Camille Dixon
(Glenn Close) and Cora Duvall (Julianne Moore), but that doesn't stop the
overbearing Camille from considering everything connected to her family
her business.  That's especially true when Camille visits Cookie's home,
only to discover a scene which could potentially bring embarrassment to
the family, and contrives a story to cover it up.  Her story sets in
motion a strange chain of events which finds innocent people jailed,
secrets revealed, and plenty of Wild Turkey consumed.
     COOKIE'S FORTUNE is probably most easily summarized as a Southern
spin on FARGO's tale of polite, common-sense police investigation, but
that doesn't entirely capture the film's quirky rhythms.  On the surface
it's the story of Camille's manipulations -- of simple-minded Cora, of
Cora's wild-child expatriate daughter Emma (Liv Tyler), of everyone
involved in the investigation at Cookie's estate -- providing Glenn Close
with a grand showcase for a woman who turns her own life into a Tennessee
Williams play.  Yet even as Camille's plans begin to unravel, COOKIE'S
FORTUNE is less about the suspense and tension of guilt exposed than it is
about the pleasures of watching it meander to its inevitable conclusion.
As it is in many Altman films, the plot -- well-constructed as it is by
Anne Rapp -- works best as a place for a handful of appealing performances
to unfold.
    And there are certainly plenty of appealing performances, of which
Close's is only the most gaudy.  Charles S. Dutton wraps himself around
Willis's good-natured roguery, giving the character a well-worn charm; Ned
Beatty similarly entertains as the police chief little concerned with
by-the-book procedure among friends; Matt Malloy has a funny minor role
as an overzealous investigator.  Even Chris O'Donnell, so often an
attractive blank hole as an actor, acquits himself well in the ideal role
of a puppydog-eager-to-please deputy.  The only stumble comes from
Julianne Moore, who doesn't know quite what to do with Cora, whether to
make her a simple naif or an even sadder case of a woman with a genuine
developmental disability.  Fortunately she's a rare false note in Altman's
smooth orchestration.
     COOKIE'S FORTUNE is the kind of unconventional narrative of lingering
takes that may leave some viewers shifting in their seats waiting for the
point of it all.  For Altman, in this particular case, taking the time to
get to the point is actually part of the point.  It's a comedy of details
dropped in almost off-handedly, and others -- a hand literally caught in
the cookie jar, for instance -- underlined at just the right moment.  It
doesn't add up to all that much either as character study or as crime
drama, nor does it take the straightest path between any two points.  It's
merely a lazy, crazy, consistently amusing diversion about a place where
you only know the true measure of a man (or a woman) after you've gone
fishing together.  It's a place Altman might consider visiting more often.

Title
Review for Preacher's Wife, The (1996)
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Denzel Washington, Whitney Houston, Courtney B. Vance, Gregory
Hines.
Screenplay:  Nat Mauldin and Allan Scott, based on THE BISHOP'S WIFE
screenplay by Robert B. Sherwood and Leonardo Bercovici.
Producer:  Samuel Goldwyn Jr.
Director:  Penny Marshall.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity)
Running Time:  121 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It won't be difficult for many viewers to accept Denzel Washington as
a character sent straight from heaven...particularly female viewers.
Washington has been a regular on "sexiest man" lists, dazzling audiences
with his confident smile while building an impressive body of work in
roles characterized by intensity, integrity and -- frequently --
inscrutability.  Yet for all his obvious talent and good looks, he has
often seemed unapproachable on screen, so cool that he fails to be warm.
THE PREACHER'S WIFE comes as a welcome addition to Washington's resume, a
somewhat predictable holiday confection buoyed by Washington's engaging
lead performance.
     THE PREACHER'S WIFE is set in an inner city New York neighborhood,
where local Baptist minister Henry Biggs (Courtney B. Vance) is facing a
personal crisis.  Confronted by financial problems in the church and
social problems in the community which seem beyond his ability to change,
Henry drives himself relentlessly, to the point of neglecting his wife
Julia (Whitney Houston) and son Jeremiah (Justin Pierre Edmond).  Finally
Henry asks for help from above, and he gets it in the form of Dudley
(Washington), a rookie angel thrilled to be back on earth.  Henry
naturally has difficulty believing this insistent fellow is divine,
especially when Dudley begins spending quality time with Julia and
Jeremiah, forcing Henry to consider his priorities more carefully.
     A remake of the 1947 Cary Grant-Loretta Young-David Niven vehicle THE
BISHOP'S WIFE is a natural notion for a spiritually renewed era when
angels are appearing on television ("Touched by an Angel") and in the
movies (the upcoming MICHAEL) faster than they can dance on the head of a
pin.  It is equally natural to expect a certain amount of holy-rolling in
such an effort, but THE PREACHER'S WIFE does a fairly good job of walking
the fine line between sincere and sanctimonious.  Penny Marshall (BIG,
AWAKENINGS) has shown herself to be that rare contemporary director who
can make a "feel-good" film which doesn't leave you feeling insulted, and
she generally avoids saccharine overload.  There is a bright good humor to
most of THE PREACHER'S WIFE which makes it possible to overlook such
manipulations as the fate of an adorable orphan and a conflict with a
nasty real estate developer (Gregory Hines, discovering a new career as a
heavy after this film and Marshall's 1994 RENAISSANCE MAN).
     The major problem with THE PREACHER'S WIFE is the same problem which
has characterized most of Marshall's films:  it's just too long.  Her
movies have a tendency to run out of gas with a lot of film left to run,
and THE PREACHER'S WIFE could have benefited from plenty of additional
editing.  Much of it could have come from Whitney Houston's performance,
which consists largely of finding reasons to break into song like Elvis
Presley in one of his carefully crafted vehicles.  Houston certainly has a
spectacular voice, and it is nice to hear her using it for gospel
standards rather than dreary ballads, but half a dozen musical numbers
simply pushes the limit and pads the running time.  Little Justin Pierre
Edmond should have been another strong candidate for the editor's knife;
the button-cute rascal is one of the worst child actors I have seen on
screen in years.
     Thankfully, Denzel Washington is on hand to provide a jolt whenever
THE PREACHER'S WIFE needs it most.  His first appearance may be a shock to
those who know him best as serious, determined characters in films like
MALCOLM X, CRIMSON TIDE and COURAGE UNDER FIRE:  dropped from the sky into
the snow, looking decidedly dapper in a grey suit, hat and topcoat,
Washington's Dudley proceeds to celebrate his return to corporeal form by
spinning around on the ground like one of the Three Stooges.  It is a
giddy and completely unexpected moment, and one of many where Washington
shows the mischievous edge to this angel seduced by flesh.  His innocence
and earnestness are thoroughly charming, and his scenes with Courtney B.
Vance (effective as the real principal character of the story) have a
particular appeal.  If there isn't much chemistry between Washington and
Houston, well, that's not really the point of THE PREACHER'S WIFE.
Besides, Denzel Washington is a chemical reaction all by himself, and it
is a pleasure to see that he can sparkle as well as he smolders.

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
AFFLICTION
(Lions Gate)
Starring:  Nick Nolte, James Coburn, Sissy Spacek, Tim True, Willem Dafoe.
Screenplay:  Paul Schrader, based on the novel by Russell Banks.
Producer:  Linda Reisman.
Director:  Paul Schrader.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I don't blame Paul Schrader for thinking he could get away with
voice-over narration where so many others had failed.  After all, he did
set the standard for ideal use of the device when he let us into the mind
of Travis Bickle in TAXI DRIVER.  Every once in a while, a talented writer
will figure out just when he can get away with the narration crutch, and
for what purpose.  Schrader forgot those things while adapting Russell
Banks' AFFLICTION.  Working with all the elements for a raw dramatic
masterwork, he appears unclear how to tell the story through to its
conclusion.  And in a fit of panic, he turns the final minutes of the film
into a mess of ham-fisted plot summary and perplexing epilogue.
     It's a crying shame, because the set-up for AFFLICTION is so utterly
compelling.  Nick Nolte stars as Wade Whitehouse, a lifetime resident of a
small New Hampshire town.  Recently divorced, Wade spends his days as a
civil servant -- running the snowplow and serving as crossing guard --
while also acting as the town's lone part-time cop.  He's trying to put
his life back together, even beginning a new relationship with a long-time
friend named Marge (Sissy Spacek), but his life has been permanently
scarred by his abusive, alcoholic Pop (James Coburn).  The death of his
mother brings Wade back into his father's house, rekindling long-buried
emotions just when his suspicions of foul play in a recent hunting
accident have him on edge.
     The heart, soul and twisted guts of AFFLICTION lie in Nick Nolte's
performance as Wade, as beaten-down a human being as the screen has ever
seen without turning him into a "lovable loser."  Whipped into a
psychological submission by his Pop, Wade crawls through life on his belly
-- working menial jobs at the whim of a town Selectman (Holmes Osborne),
feared and abandoned by his ex-wife and daughter because he has abandoned
them emotionally, taunted by a wealthy man to whom he tries to serve a
traffic ticket.  Afraid of turning out anything like his father, Wade
absorbs every bit of pain for fear that releasing it will cause him to
lose control.  He's tragic and pathetic and doomed, and Nolte nails him.
     Schrader, on the other hand, doesn't seem convinced that he has
nailed Wade.  The film opens with narration by Wade's younger brother
Rolfe (Willem Dafoe), narration which appears at irregular intervals.
Initially, the narration is simply florid and unnecessary; later, it
begins to repeat entire scenes just completed, as though afraid we might
have just walked in from the lobby and missed something.  Finally, the
narration becomes absolutely insufferable, summing up every theme from the
previous two hours in a few tidy sentences that makes you wonder why you
spent your time with Wade instead of his self-appointed shrink.  That
narration is part of an attrocious conclusion that nearly ruins the film,
tagging on explanations of much that has gone before and some that comes
after.  Either Schrader ran out of money to show us all this significant
material, or he ran out of ideas regarding how to do it.  
     Perhaps such a gaping hole in the resolution of the protagonist's
story should have ruined the film, but there's too much else that works in
AFFLICTION.  Cinematographer Paul Sarossy, who captured Russell Banks'
winter mindscapes previously in THE SWEET HEREAFTER, captures a sense of
chilly isolation, and the supporting cast -- notably Coburn's casually
emasculating turn as Pop -- is solid top to bottom.  There's an ache at
the core of AFFLICTION as painful as the rotting tooth that, in a
Shakespearean display of psychic corruption manifested through physical
corruption, torments Wade through much of the film.  There will also be an
ache in the head of many viewers, as Schrader spends the film's critical
final minutes beating them with a Moral to the Story that anyone able to
add single-digit numbers should comprehend unassisted.  It may have worked
for Travis Bickle, but here Schrader's use of narration nearly trumps
Nolte's triumph.  It's enough to make an edgy critic ask, "Are you _still_
talkin' to me?"

Title
Review for Home Alone 3 (1997)
     The obvious question associated with the creation of HOME ALONE 3 is
"why," though not for the obvious reasons.  You'd certainly expect a third
installment from a series where the first two racked up a collective $457
million, even if the star of those two films has been spending more time
lately in court than on screen.  It's just that HOME ALONE guru John
Hughes has been doing a perfectly serviceable job of re-cycling that
successful formula without using the HOME ALONE name.  BABY'S DAY OUT, 101
DALMATIANS and FLUBBER have managed to turn pratfalls, scatology and groin
injuries into cash without conjuring up the yelping visage of Macaulay
Culkin.  Why start now?
     Why indeed, especially if you're going to fumble the formula the way
HOME ALONE 3 does.  The required elements appear to be in place -- a
youngster (Alex D. Linz as Alex Pruitt), absentee parents, a snow-covered
Midwestern suburb, nefarious intruders, several severe bodily injuries
and property damage in the six-figure range -- but everything feels just
slightly askew.  The little boy, rather than being a mischievous imp, is a
minor scientific genius and all-around upstanding citizen.  Goofy
antagonists Joe Pesci and Daniel Stern have been replaced by Olek Krupa,
Rya Kihlstedt, Lenny Von Dohlen and David Thornton as international
criminals looking for a stolen missile guidance chip in Alex's possession,
characters a bit too chilly and sinister to be fun.  And the direction by
Raja Gosnell, taking over for Chris Columbus, drags the pace so badly
during the first hour that kids may be snoring long before they chuckle
for the first time.
     Now, no one has ever accused me of championing John Hughes' modus
operandi in the 90s, when he lost all interest in films for viewers over
the age of 10.  In fact, I'm pretty sure it's one of the Biblical signs of
the end-times.  But let's face it -- the formula works.  Hughes has made
the live-action Warner Bros. cartoon his personal dominion; HOME ALONE is
basically a Road Runner/Coyote adventure where the Road Runner has finally
gotten his hands on the Acme catalog.  HOME ALONE 3 includes all of
Hughes' most annoying habits -- cloying sentimentality, utter disdain for
adults, crotch-level comedy -- with little of the mitigating
frivolousness.  The Road Runner turns into a Rhodes scholar, Wile E.
Coyote into a James Bond villain, and the trip-hammer pacing something
more suited to Merchant Ivory than Chuck Jones.
     Of course, I can't recall a Merchant Ivory film which included so
many different things dropped on people's heads.  The villains in HOME
ALONE 3 are brained from above with books, barbells, decorative flower
pots, a lawn mower, lumber and human excrement, among other things, which
Nick Glennie-Smith's relentlessly whimsical score reminds us is jolly good
fun.  Certainly all the mayhem will keep the kids giggling, assuming you
rouse them from their naps, but there are so many different ways to see
exactly the same material with more energy and at significantly less cost.
John Hughes has done himself in by turning out a HOME ALONE 3 which can't
keep up with HOME ALONE, HOME ALONE 2, or the dozen other de facto sequels
which didn't happen to bear the HOME ALONE name.

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
Starring:  Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Billy Dee Williams;
voices of Frank Oz, James Earl Jones and Anthony Daniels.
Screenplay:  Leigh Brackett and Lawrence Kasdan.
Producer:  Gary Kurtz.
Director:  Irvin Kirshner.
MPAA Rating:  PG (violence)
Running Time:  125 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If pressed, I think most aficionados of the STAR WARS trilogy would
agree that THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK is the best of the three -- the best
written, the best acted and the most skillfully constructed.  However, it
is not nearly as beloved as the original STAR WARS, and though the newly
released THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK: SPECIAL EDITION is certain to be a
success, it is unlikely to come close to inspiring the mania the return of
STAR WARS did on January 31st.  So why will the same person who tells you
to your face that EMPIRE is the better film only see it once this time
around after seeing STAR WARS two or three times?  The answers to that
question -- and there are several -- are in some ways specific to this
film.  In other ways, they explain a lot about what people go to the
movies to see, what they go to see _again_, and why.
     The story in the second installment begins an unspecified number of
months after STAR WARS ends, with an Imperial attack on the new rebel base
on the ice world of Hoth, then splits into two largely parallel story
lines.  In one, Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) parts with the rebels to
study with a gnome-like Jedi master named Yoda (performed by Frank Oz) on
a swampy planet in the distant Dagobah system; the other follows Han Solo
(Harrison Ford), Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew)
and C-3PO (Anthony Daniels) as they attempt to elude the Imperial ships
pursuing them.  The climax finds Luke dueling Darth Vader, Han facing
capture by bounty hunters, and the entire cast grappling with unresolved
issues as the credits roll.
     What makes EMPIRE so extraordinary in retrospect is how many chances
George Lucas and his new crew -- director Irvin Kirshner and screenwriters
Lawrence Kasdan and Leigh Brackett -- took when they had everything to
lose by doing so.  No image in STAR WARS is as dark and creepy as Luke's
dream vision of his own face behind Vader's mask, and Obi-Wan's vague
homilies about the Force in the original become Yoda's extended lessons in
an almost Zen philosophy in EMPIRE.  Following a film which was the very
definition of a crowd-pleaser, EMPIRE concluded with the good guys in
disarray, one of them captured and another one crippled (emotionally, if
not ultimately physically).  Here was a blockbuster which had the audacity
to mess with the most successful film formula anyone had yet discovered, a
feature film which ended the way feature films just weren't supposed to
end:  with a cliff-hanger worthy of the old radio serials.
     Those twists made THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK exciting and challenging in
a way STAR WARS wasn't, but they also made it a less satisfying
movie-going experience.  STAR WARS ended with a victory for the heroes, a
fanfare and a rousing ovation, allowing the audience to leave both
entertained and with a basic sense of resolution.  EMPIRE was not so
generous.  It took the simple good-vs.-evil universe of STAR WARS and
introduced uncertainty; suddenly, our hero Luke was shown to have the
capacity for becoming a villain, and evil was allowed to win victories
over good, if only temporary ones.  The audience for a story set in that
kind of world is smaller than the audience for a story set in STAR WARS'
morally bi-polar universe, and it's hard to imagine THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK would have been a success if it had been the first film to feature
these same characters instead of STAR WARS.  The pure throw-back adventure
of STAR WARS was undemanding, but you were almost certain to leave the
theater smiling, and ready to hop back on the ride again for yet another
chance to come out smiling.  Meanwhile, the very complexity which made THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK a richer film also made it a film less likely to
inspire multiple visits to the theater.  After all, how many times did
viewers want to be reminded that it was going to be another three years
before they found out if Darth Vader was really...you know?  
     Fortunately, the SPECIAL EDITION will inspire those who know STAR
WARS line for line to take a closer look at THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, and
it's not just what was there in 1980 which may impress them.  There are
fewer new touches than there were in the STAR WARS: SPECIAL EDITION, and
those which are there -- a longer, more tense scene in which Luke escapes
a Wampa on Hoth; enhanced footage of the arrival on Cloud City -- are both
less obtrusive and more useful.  It is the sound, however, which is most
spectacular in this new incarnation, an awesome demonstration of the kind
of experience even a "home theater" can never possibly duplicate.  THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK deserves its second theatrical life every bit as much
as STAR WARS, if not more, yet there were notably fewer people applauding
at the end of EMPIRE.  I'm not convinced that means the audience enjoyed
it less; I do think it means they will see it less.  The amazing thing is
that, in a cinematic economy where an unhappy ending is the kiss of death,
George Lucas dared to lure the STAR WARS audience into a darker world at
all.

Title
Review for Lost Souls (2000)
     LOST SOULS has been on the shelf at New Line for over a year since
its originally scheduled release date last fall. The official story was
that it was pushed back to avoid the slew of similarly-themed films slated
for the pseudo-end of the millennium (END OF DAYS, STIGMATA). In order to
avoid comparisons and find an open market for a film about demonic
possession and exorcism, they waited and waited until October 13, 2000 --
the day the successful re-release of THE EXORCIST went nationwide. So much
for avoiding comparisons.
     LOST SOULS isn't just bad because it's not as good as THE EXORCIST. 
It's bad because it's yet another exercise in moody production values
supporting an utterly weightless story. Winona Ryder stars as Maya Larkin,
a young woman working on the Catholic Church's equivalent of the X-Files. 
Once upon a time she was saved from a demonic possession by Father Ledeaux
(John Hurt); now she works with him and his associates on other exorcisms. 
But the granddaddy of all possessions is on the horizon: Maya has
discovered the identity of the man who will become the Antichrist, a
best-selling non-fiction writer named Peter Kelson (Ben Chaplin). Kelson
himself has no idea that he may be part of a dark plan, but Maya is
determined to clue him in, even if it means going toe-to-toe with Evil
With a Capital "E."
     Gifted cinematographer Janusz Kaminski (who worked with Steven
Spielberg on SCHINDLER'S LIST and SAVING PRIVATE RYAN) makes his directing
debut with LOST SOULS, and he trots out plenty of visual goodies to tart
up the proceedings. Unfortunately, they're the sort of visual goodies that
just make you chuckle at their obviousness. There are ominous slow-motion
shots of Maya and her associates heading towards an exorcism like an
ecclesiastical crew of reservoir dogs. There are jagged edits and
low-angle shots intended to evoke evil through obscurity. And there are
plenty of shots of slowly-dripping water, which apparently has become the
standard-issue portent of Satanic antics. On exactly one occasion,
Kaminski's freaky imagery evokes a shiver. For the other 94 minutes of
LOST SOULS, it evokes a sense of desperation.
     And it's no wonder he's desperate, considering the script he's
working with. It's one thing for a film about the Prince of Darkness to be
melodramatic, or overwrought, or even silly. It's quite another for it to
be an outright bore. LOST SOULS is an incredibly monotonous experience,
never once working up a really good scare or a palpable sense of unease. 
It doesn't develop anything resembling momentum towards a satisfyingly
harrowing conclusion, which makes it all-too-easy to dwell on the
sluggishly paced expository scenes. Ryder spends the film looking vaguely
tormented, while Chaplin spends the film looking puzzled and _then_
vaguely tormented, and there's no reason whatsoever to care about either
one of them. It sometimes seems that every part of LOST SOULS that could
have inspired a genuinely visceral reaction has been edited out, leaving
an indistinct morass of gloomy cinematography in its stead.
     Occasionally LOST SOULS shakes itself from its coma-inducing torpor
just long enough to be aggressively dumb. The hilarious climax comes as
Peter's car radio clock ticks down to his "transformation," suggesting not
only that the Apocalypse will be filmed like a scene from SPEED, but that
Peter conscientiously synchronized his clock that morning to Hell Mean
Time. At the very least, such foolishness provides a distraction the rest
of LOST SOULS can't be bothered with. There's no excuse for a movie about
the primal forces of evil to make Satan's influence seem so banal. 
Twenty-five years have passed since THE EXORCIST was first released, and
it's still a jolt to the system. LOST SOULS could have remained on New
Line's shelf for another twenty-five years, and no one would have missed
it. 

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
(Paramount/Rysher)
Starring:  Val Kilmer, Elisabeth Shue, Rabe Serbedzija, Valery Nikolaev.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Hensleigh, Wesley Strick.
Producers:  David Brown, Robert Evans, William J. MacDonald, Mace Neufeld.
Director:  Phillip Noyce.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  117 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I figure it happened something like this:  in the wake of MISSION:
IMPOSSIBLE's impressive box office performance, the development executives
at Paramount were tossing around plot ideas for the sequel.  After coming
up with a couple of promising possibilities, they decided it would be a
shame to let one of them go to waste.  "So what other properties do we
own?" asks Executive #1.  "Um, I think we have 'The Saint'," answers
Executive #2.  So they took the script, recovered Ethan Hunt's
miracle-working PowerBook from the prop room, and lo and behold, when Val
Kilmer opted not to climb back inside Batman's latex, another potential
franchise was born.  That was the idea, anyway, but things tend not to run
smoothly when Kilmer is involved.  Left to his own devices in a story that
was fragmented to begin with, Kilmer turns THE SAINT into two hour
narcissistic orgy.
     Kilmer stars as Simon Templar, an internationally infamous
thief-for-hire and master of disguise who travels the world under the
names of Catholic saints.  On an assignment in Moscow, Simon encounters
Ivan Tretiak (Rabe Serbedzija), a billionaire oil tycoon intent on ruling
a now-unstable Russia.  Tretiak hires Simon to steal a top-secret formula
for cold fusion developed by American scientist Dr. Emma Russell
(Elisabeth Shue), and The Saint begins one of his characteristic
seductions in pursuit of the big payoff which will allow him to retire.
What he does not expect is that he will develop genuine feelings for Emma,
complicating his mission considerably.  When Simon tries to have it both
ways, both he and Emma end up on the Russian most wanted list, running for
their lives through the streets and sewers of Moscow.
     Jonathan Hensleigh's back-story for THE SAINT completely abandons the
character as created by Leslie Charteris, re-creating Simon Templar as a
nameless orphan subjected to guilt and cruelty in a Catholic orphanage.
It is a nice set-up for a story about an enigmatic loner.  Unfortunately,
it has nothing to do with the character as played by Val Kilmer.  There
isn't much haunted, complex history in his characterization; Kilmer spends
most of the film looking tremendously self-satisfied, posing behind each
disguise and purring every accent.  Sure it's fun watching Kilmer play a
variety of eccentric characters, and you can bet that he knows it.  When
the film takes a sudden shift in tone near the conclusion, turning into a
light-hearted caper for the final ten minutes, it actually seems as though
director Phillip Noyce (CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER) threw up his hands and
decided to let THE SAINT become the film Kilmer had been acting in for the
previous 100 minutes.
     Actually, it's never clear what THE SAINT is supposed to be.  For an
action film, it certainly treats the ostensibly primary plot and its
associated action as an afterthought.  It is interesting to see new faces
like Serbedzija and Valery Nikolaev (as Tretiak's son) in the villain
roles, but the roles themselves aren't interesting at all.  The resolution 
of their plotting comes as an anti-climax, with the bad guys apparently
willing to accept their fate with a shrug; in fact, Tretiak seems more
interested in The Saint's exploits than in his own plans, making him
Kilmer's chief rival as Kilmer's #1 fan.
     There are a couple of sharp sequences when THE SAINT actually does
provide some action -- Emma's dash for the American embassy and Simon's
unnerving underwater stay in an icy river are particularly notable -- but
too many other moments fall flat.  Some of the action appears to have been
salvaged from MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE's cutting room floor, with editing that
butchers punch lines, introduces and discards supporting characters, and
leaves plenty of threads dangling and questions unanswered.  If anyone can
explain to me the importance of the microchip The Saint steals from
Tretiak, or why Tretiak never makes an effort to retrieve it, I'd sure
like to know.
     I suppose it might seem hypocritical of me to knock THE SAINT for
spending so much time developing the romance between Simon and Emma after
I have criticized plenty of other action films for spending no time at all
on such matters.  The real problem is that the romantic sub-plot is never
integrated into the story; it runs parallel and runs longer, including an
extended coda involving their reunion which could have (and should have)
ended three or four times before it actually does.  Shue struggles to make
some sense out of a character who has to deliver a lot of exposition and
whose weak heart is magically strengthened by love, but it's hard to play a
romantic scene with someone who seems to love himself even more than you
love him.  THE SAINT was unlikely to be a great film even without Kilmer's
preening, but it would have been a less grating one.  Perhaps the _real_
sequel to MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE should involve someone trying to tame 
Kilmer's ego.

Title
Review for Ripe (1996)
     The most depressing thing about RIPE is that you can spot the core of
emotional honesty buried beneath the layers of lurid melodrama and clunky
symbolism.  While male coming-of-age stories litter the film landscape
like LOST WORLD ticket stubs on a multiplex floor, film-makers appear far
more uncomfortable with tackling the sexual awakening of girls.  That was
reason alone to hope for the best from Mo Ogrodnik's tale of 14-year-old
fraternal twins Rosie (Daisy Eagan) and Violet (Monica Keena), who survive
a car crash which claims the lives of their parents then set off alone on
a road of discovery.  That road finds them stowing on the truck of
groundskeeper-cum-handyman Pete (Gordon Currie) into a military base, 
where they hope to hide out until their faces are no longer on every
newspaper.  The two girls find themselves confronted there with unfamiliar
feelings, to which each responds in a different but equally destructive
way.
     Writer/director Ogrodinik opted to frame RIPE as a sort of surreal
cautionary tale, a KIDS-like warning on the perils of unsupervised youth.
The girls' parents appear in flashback just long enough to make it clear
that Rosie and Violet had a dysfunctional childhood (Daddy was fond of a
little game involving a shotgun and hiding out in the closet), while the
army base leadership looks about as effectual as something out of McHALE'S
NAVY.  There is an absurdity to the things the girls get away with, from 
shoplifting to wandering through an ammunition shed, but that absurdity is
probably part of Ogrodnik's point.  It is the foundation for a compelling
tale of adolescent traumas, as a pair of troubled teenagers face the
changes in their lives and their bodies without the benefit of adult
counsel.  If anything, RIPE may be a feature length public service
message on the importance of sex education.
     It is here that the surrealism and metaphorical heavy-handedness
squash RIPE like a rotting pomegranate.  Rosie and Violet (named as
flowers-about-to-bloom with kick-your-butt-through-your-brainpan
subtlety) represent widely divergent reactions to the first flush of
sexual awareness, but that is all they ever become:  representations.
Real-life 14-year-olds Eagan and Keena (when was the last time you saw a 
high school student playing a high school student?) do impressive work
with extremely difficult material, but it is not enough to create
characters which are written as types.  Nothing in RIPE feels authentic;
it is a parade of numbingly obvious fore-shadowing and ridiculous
situations which shift the emphasis from sensitive observation to
spectacle.  This shift lends an unnecessary sleaziness to scenes of
masturbation and loss of virginity which might have been effective if the
situations felt natural.  
     The shock value and controversy of RIPE may be good for box office,
but they're bad for narrative truth.  A less self-consciously
"provocative" RIPE could have been the kind of honest drama which a mother
and daughter could share and learn from together.  Instead, this RIPE will
likely become more popular at the corner video store with middle-aged men
in trenchcoats.

Title
Review for Love! Valour! Compassion! (1997)
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Jason Alexander, Randy Becker, Stephen Bogardus, John Glover,
John Benjamin Hickey, Justin Kirk, Stephen Spinella.
Screenplay:  Terrence McNally, based on his stage play.
Producers:  Doug Chapin and Barry Krost.
Director:  Joe Mantello.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In one sense, the premise for LOVE! VALOUR! COMPASSION! is sheer
brilliance.  Terrence McNally's screenplay (based on his Tony
Award-winning 1994 play) deals with eight friends -- all gay men -- who
gather for three long weekends one summer at a country house owned by
Gregory (Stephen Bogardus).  Arthur (John Benjamin Hickey) and Perry
(Stephen Spinella) are a couple celebrating 14 years together; John (John
Glover) is a misanthropic composer who has brought along his latest flame,
a dancer named Ramon (Randy Becker); Buzz (Jason Alexander) is a
flamboyant lover of show tunes.  The real inspiration comes not with the
characters, however, but with the setting.  By placing these characters in
a world of their own, without a single heterosexual character around to
define them by their "otherness," McNally allows us to focus on the
problems of these people as human beings.  In this place, they're just
ordinary folks.
     The thing about ordinary folks is that they're not always
particularly interesting.  As sensitively written and well-acted as it may
be, LOVE! VALOUR! COMPASSION! is terribly short on conflict.  Whenever
McNally does try to insert some conflict, it feels forced and
inconsequential.  Gregory's partner Bobby (Justin Kirk) cheats on him, but
we never really understand why; there is a quarrel at the dinner table
which is resolved quickly and neatly with a round of apologies.  Some of
LOVE! VALOUR! COMPASSION! is spiced up by the presence of most bare male
flesh ever seen in a movie not starring Harvey Keitel.  The rest of the
time, the characters sit around talking and supporting each other, waxing
philosophical about love, romance, social politics and mortality until the
film starts to feel very much like a gay BIG CHILL.  Whether that
comparison intrigues you or makes you cringe may go a long way toward
predicting your response to this film.
     The most affecting moments in LOVE! VALOUR! COMPASSION! involve the
developing relationship between Buzz and John's twin brother James (also
played by John Glover), the two characters with AIDS.  Both actors give
solid, multi-faceted performances, bringing humor and delight to the
connection between two people who have assumed that it's too late for them
to experience love.  All of the emotion in the film feels genuine,
developed with care by a group of actors who, with the exception of
Alexander, originated the roles on Broadway.  It is a warm and appealing
piece of film-making by first-time feature director Joe Mantello (also an
alum of the stage production), but that warmth is not enough to make it
exceptional.  It's not really a narrative so much as it is an idyll, a
chance to watch normal people living normal lives in a pastoral setting.
Normalcy, however, is a better social goal than a dramatic device.

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
THE CREW
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Richard Dreyfuss, Burt Reynolds, Dan Hedaya, Seymour Cassel,
Carrie-Anne Moss, Jennifer Tilly, Lainie Kazan, Jeremy Piven.
Screenplay:  Barry Fanaro.
Producers:  Barry Sonnenfeld and Barry Josephson.
Director:  Michael Dinner.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, profanity, sexual situations, brief nudity)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some concepts are funny on paper, even if there's no way they could
ever be classic comedies in reality. THE CREW has such a concept. Is it
funny envisioning a quartet of aging mob tough guys trying to regain their
swagger in their sunset years? Sure it is. There have been other comedies
about seniors turning to a life of crime rather than going gentle into
that good night, like the 1979 George Burns/Art Carney/Lee Strassburg
vehicle GOING IN STYLE, but a wiseguy twist sounds promising. It may not
be chock-a-block with rapier-sharp witticisms, and there may be a prostate
gag or two to wade through, but there should be a few laughs, right? 
There's only so much you can do to screw up a solid concept. Right?
     In fact, THE CREW screws up its solid concept so badly, and in so
many provocative variations, that it's practically a road map for
misbegotten film-making. The four aging Mafiosi -- Bobby Bartellemeo
(Richard Dreyfuss), Joey "Bats" Pistella (Burt Reynolds), Mike "The
Brick" Donatelli (Dan Hedaya) and Tony "Mouth" Donato (Seymour Cassel) --
are residents of a Miami retirement hotel that's about to become the
latest victim of South Beach gentrification. Faced with the prospect of a
skyrocketing rent for their newly-chic digs, the boys decide to make their
home a less appealing place to live by setting it up to look like a
gangland murder has taken place there (though the body they use is already
dead). The fake hit has the desired effect of scaring off prospective
tenants, but there's an unfortunate side effect: The dead body whose head
they blew off was the father of a drug lord (Miguel Sandoval), who's
determined to wreak vengeance on the responsible parties.
     Ah, the wacky complications that are possible with the inclusion of a
pissed-off drug lord. And imagine how many more wacky complications are
possible when you include a sub-plot involving a Miami detective
(Carrie-Anne Moss) trying to fend off the advances of her colleague and
philandering ex-boyfriend (Jeremy Piven). And still yet even how many more
wacky complications are possible when a stripper (Jennifer Tilly, who's
beginning to resemble Divine above the neck) learns of the boys'
involvement in the fake killing, and blackmails them into killing her
delicatessen heiress stepmother (Lainie Kazan in full "oy gevalt" mode),
but the boys only kidnap her and fake her death instead, only in so doing
they manage to piss off the drug lord even further? Can you feel your
sides splitting at the crazy goofy hilarity? And can you feel a tear
trickling down your cheek because Bobby is really a sensitive guy,
searching high and low for the daughter he hasn't seen in 30 years?
     The reason THE CREW stinks -- or at least the main reason -- is that
it's not about what it's about. A movie about geriatric mobsters could be
funny. You could have them interact with their modern counterparts to show
them how it's done old school, like a Scorsese version of SPACE COWBOYS,
or focus on what kind of rackets they could run in their senior-heavy 
milieu. There's good character stuff there, too -- what happens when
you're left to fossilize after once being part of a culture of macho
action? 
     But THE CREW isn't about any of that. It isn't about anything,
really, because there's so much garbage thrown into 88 minutes of script
that it never develops anything remotely resembling comic momentum. The
personalities of the four principles are inanely simplistic, leaving the
actors to overact madly in compensation (Reynolds in particular is
wretched beyond all description). Director Michael Dinner, meanwhile,
over-directs madly in compensation, operating under the delusion that you
can somehow make a terrible script funny by filming everyone in fish-eye
close-up. Even the editing chops gags into such minute shreds that set-ups
are separated from their punch lines. Something this fundamentally
incompetent should carry a government warning sticker.
     There are exactly two moments in THE CREW when the experience of
watching it is remotely tolerable. One involves a silly homage to
GOODFELLAS, with our protagonists strutting through the kitchen of a
buffet restaurant after paying off a busboy. The other involves Sandoval's
drug lord growing frustrated at dealing with his incompetent underlings. 
For the other 84 minutes, THE CREW isn't simply unfunny; it's a test of an
audience's good will, practically an exercise in making every wrong
narrative, performance or technical choice possible. It's a good pitch
turned into a terrible script turned into a godawful film. Actual humor
from a solid concept? Fuggeddaboutit.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, David Schwimmer, Jacqueline
Obradors, Temuera Morrison.
Screenplay:  Michael Browning.
Producers:  Ivan Reitman, Wallis Nicita, Roger Birnbaum.
Director:  Ivan Reitman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     All right, let's get this out of the way:  Anne Heche is a lesbian.
Coverage of SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS has focused so heavily on this point --
and on the corollary question of whether Heche would be "credible" as a
heterosexual romantic interest -- that you might suspect the title had
been changed officially to SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS WITH LESBIAN ANNE HECHE
PLAYING A HETEROSEXUAL.  Never mind that audiences didn't seem to have
a problem finding heterosexual actor Tom Hanks "credible" as a gay man in
PHILADELPHIA.  Never mind that presumably no one would have a problem
finding a different 28-year-old woman "credible" as the romantic interest
of 55-year-old Harrison Ford.  And never mind that most Hollywood scripts
consider a "credible" romance to be any pairing of actors of the opposite
sex, character development be hanged.
     SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS is an unsatisfying Hollywood trifle, not
because Heche doesn't date men, but because the script is a disaster.
Heche plays Robin Monroe, a New York magazine editor whisked away to a
week-long tropical vacation by her long-time boyfriend Frank (David
Schwimmer) so he can pop the question.  Unfortunately, work intrudes on
paradise, forcing Robin to hop a cargo plane to a photo shoot in Tahiti
with rough-around-the-edges pilot Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford).  En route
the plane is caught in a violent storm, forcing Quinn to make a crash
landing which strands the pair on a deserted island.
     Naturally, Quinn and Robin are polar opposites who share an almost
instant antagonism.  Naturally, they grow closer as they struggle 
together.  It's one of filmdom's most enduring set-ups, but there's one
rather important thing missing from this version:  the faintest
understanding of Robin's motivation for getting involved with Quinn.
Screenwriter Michael Browning presents Robin and Frank's relationship as
nearly-ideal during their screen time together, with Frank practically a
fantasy figure out of the women's magazine Robin works for -- he's
romantic, spontaneous and willing to commit.  That leaves Robin's reasons
for leaping into Quinn's arms fairly suspect; though Quinn assures her
late in the film that their connection isn't just "something that happens
when two people are alone on an island together," that's really the only
explanation which doesn't make Robin's behavior extremely off-putting.
Even the token attempt to make Frank part of the problem is ill-conceived,
tossing him into a drunken, grief-stricken tryst with a voluptuous dancer
(Jacqueline Obradors) after he believed Robin to be dead.  It's not
chemistry that's missing in the relationship between Robin and Quinn --
it's sympathy.
     In a valiant attempt to distract the audience from focusing on the
characters' deficiencies, Browning and director Ivan Reitman amp up the
action quotient by pitting our protagonists against pirates.  Yes, that's
right, pirates.  It's the kind of sub-plot which sends the mind reeling
into hypothetical meetings where studio executives offer "helpful"
suggestions:  "You know, it's great that they're stuck on this island
together so they can fall in love, but we're not sure about the whole
lesbian thing, so how about if pirates chased them, and shot at them, and
then at the end there was a big explosion?"  For a film desperately in
need of more character development, SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS wastes valuable
minutes on a ridiculous forced conflict which contributes nothing to the
story but one gag from Heche:  "You mean 'arrrghh' pirates?"
     SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS actually contains a few amusing gags, with
both Heche and Ford -- long under-appreciated for his comic timing --
scoring some comic hits.  They just have almost nothing to work with,
squirming around with absurd situations and stick-figure characters.  The
film's few simple pleasures, including the lovely Kauai scenery, are lost
in the search for some reason to root for these people ending up together.
The fact that there's nothing "credible" about the pairing of Robin and
Quinn has nothing to do with Anne Heche's choice of real-life romantic
partners.  It has everything to do with her choice of scripts.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Ralph Fiennes, Juliette Binoche, William Dafoe, Kristin Scott
Thomas, Naveen Andrews, Colin Firth.
Screenplay:  Anthony Minghella.
Producer:  Saul Zaentz.
Director:  Anthony Minghella.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  160 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Michael Ondaatje's Booker Prize-winning novel _The English Patient_
looked to be a remarkably difficult work to translate to the screen.  A
tale of intertwined lives which weaves its way through several time
periods with a lyrical, dream-like prose style, it is the kind of
narrative which could turn into a catastrophic failure as much in the
hands of a too-reverential film-maker as a completely oblivious one.  So
Anthony Minghella decided to build his own narrative around what he saw as
the crux of _The English Patient_, and in so doing he has created a
magnificent love story which gives "old-fashioned" a good name.  Though
miles removed from Ondaatje's psychological drama, Minghella's THE ENGLISH
PATIENT stands on its own as a powerful sweeping romance..
     THE ENGLISH PATIENT opens near the end of World War II, with a
Canadian nurse named Hana (Juliette Binoche) who has grown weary of losing
friends and lovers.  When her medical unit is moving through  Italy, Hana
decides to stay behind in an abandoned monastery with one patient, a badly
burned man who can't remember his name and is known only as "the English
patient (Ralph Fiennes).  His identity is of interest, however, to David
Caravaggio (Willem Dafoe), a maimed former Allied agent who believes the
English patient was the Axis spy who gave him up.  Meanwhile, in flashback
we see the patient's memories of himself as the Hungarian count Laszlo de
Almasy, a cartographer exploring the North African desert who meets
Katherine Clifton (Kristin Scott Thomas), the wife of one of his
colleagues.  The two begin an affair which brings Almasy to life, but is
destined to leave him in that makeshift Italian hospital bed.
     Anthony Minghella's resume has thus far consisted of supernatural
romance (TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY) and blue collar romance (MR. WONDERFUL),
but THE ENGLISH PATIENT is a romance with the kind of sweep you associate
with films made, and not merely set, in the 1940s.  Ralph Fiennes turns in
a wonderfully economical performance as Almasy, a reserved man who begins
with the minimalist philosophy that "a thing is a thing" but becomes
utterly intoxicated by the first real passion in his life.  Fiennes is
exceptional behind layers of prosthetics (created by Jim Henson's Creature
Shop), and makes Almasy's later witty resignation entirely consistent with
the man he becomes in the scenes set years earlier.  Kristin Scott Thomas
matches his work with a radiant sensuality, turning the smart, perceptive
Katherine a deserving object of any man's fixation.  Thomas and Fiennes
share the kind of beautiful but intense chemistry movies seem reluctant
to show us in 1996, perhaps afraid that a cynical modern audience will not
be able to take such deeply felt emotions seriously.  It is not every
writer who would risk dialogue like "Every night I cut out my heart, but
in the morning it was full again;" it is not every director who would
stage the defining moment in a relationship -- a scene in which Almasy and
Katherine share a dance to, appropriately enough, "Where or When" -- with
virtually no dialogue, the attraction conveyed through a soul-piercing
gaze by Fiennes.
     Those familiar with the novel may have noticed the conspicuous
absence of Kip Singh, a Sikh bomb defuser who shares an odd affair with
Hana.  Both the character (portrayed by Naveen Andrews) and the
relationship appear in THE ENGLISH PATIENT, but their role is greatly
reduced in Minghella's account, as is that of Caravaggio.  Minghella tries
to link the two love stories in his film, but that may be the one place he
is less than successful -- he has focused his story so decidedly on Almasy
and Katherine that the peripheral characters are sometimes more
distracting than complementary.  It is to Minghella's credit, however,
that he has clarified a number of points in his streamlined narrative,
creating a uniquely powerful story, less intricate and internalized than
Ondaatje's novel but just as involving.
     The quality which may make THE ENGLISH PATIENT so singularly
effective is its refusal to fit into neatly-defined categories of romantic
film-making.  It is emotional, yet it is suspenseful and full of action;
it is intensely personal, yet played against a historical and geographical
backdrop filmed with bronzed grandeur by John Seale; it has moments of
utter seriousness, then subverts a tender moment with an throwaway bit of
comedy where Katherine bangs her head on a girder.  As risky as it might
be to throw around comparisons with classics, THE ENGLISH PATIENT is the
kind of combination of humor, detailed characterization, passion and
politics which recalls CASABLANCA.  Almasy and Katherine may share an
on-screen consummation which cinema could not attempt 50 years ago, but in
most other ways the central love story of THE ENGLISH PATIENT warrants
consideration among the great tragic pairings.  Minghella's risky
adaptation has paid off gloriously, proving they _can_ make 'em like they
used to.

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
     MAFIA!, like its predecessors AIRPLANE!, THE NAKED GUN and HOT
SHOTS!, is a scorecard comedy.  Their goal has always been to throw as
many puns, sight gags, movie parodies and bodily function gags onto the
screen as 90 minutes could hold, operating on the premise that you gotta
keep swinging if you wanna get hits.  At the end of the film, a viewer's
reaction is likely to be a subconscious evaluation of the jokes' batting
average.  If hits exceed whiffs, everybody wins; if whiffs exceed hits,
not so much.
     At the risk of strangling the life out of this particular metaphor,
Jim Abrahams' MAFIA! has two strikes against it before it even shows up at
the ballpark, the first and most obvious being its satiric target.  MAFIA!
is a parody of gangster films, particularly the GODFATHER films, with Jay
Mohr starring in the Michael Corleone-esque role of Anthony Cortino, a war
hero who returns home to join up with the crime family headed by his
father Vincenzo (Lloyd Bridges).  Most of the situations and characters
are pure GODFATHER -- Anthony's hot-headed older brother Joey (Billy
Burke), his WASP girlfriend Diane (Christina Applegate), flashbacks to the
Cortinos' arrival and rise to power in America -- which seems like a ripe
enough source for parody until you realize that the films in question came
out when the average 1998 movie-goer was just a pair of gametes and a
dream.  Entrenched though the films and their situations may be in the
cinematic canon, MAFIA! just feels stale, as topical as a Joey Buttafuoco
joke or a reference to Bella Abzug's hats.
     At least the GODFATHER films will be well-known to most average
viewers, though.  The other major reference points are Martin Scorsese's
mob-themed films GOODFELLAS and CASINO.  The number of gags baed on the
latter film, including the opening credits sequence and the character of
Pepper (Pamela Gidley, a dead ringer for Sharon Stone), is utterly
baffling given CASINO's less-than-spectacular box office performance.
References to more recent, more familiar films like FORREST GUMP and THE
ENGLISH PATIENT draw big chuckles, while the CASINO references draw mostly
blank stares. Touchstone was obviously concerned about being too obscure
when they changed the title from JANE AUSTEN'S MAFIA! (though curiously
that title still appears on-screen), but no one gave nearly as much
thought to the actual content of the film.
     The second strike is the "trailer factor," which is always a danger
with a broad comedy like MAFIA!  Since virtually none of the jokes are
contextual, and 90% of them can be conveyed in a matter of moments, the
people who put together theatrical trailers and television spots are free
to plunder the film for all the best laughs.  It's easy to pull 120 
seconds worth of "A" material from MAFIA!, sight gags like a shattering
poodle and an overweight ersatz River-dancer, but you're sadly mistaken if
you think that's a representative sample.  If you've seen that theatrical
trailer for MAFIA!, with its two-minute barrage of great bits, you've
probably laughed about as hard as you're going to laugh at the whole 85
minues of the film.
     Comedies like MAFIA! are usually entertaining just for forcing you to
pay attention.  Dozens of decent laughs hover around the perimeter of the
frame, while several of the best moments come during the closing credits,
including a great riff on the standard "no animals were harmed during the
making of this film" disclaimer.  It's the jokes Abrahams places front and
center which drop with a thud just a bit too often.  As just one example
of the lackluster writing, the "Guess What Number I'm Thinking Of" table
in one casino scene is a joke swiped from VEGAS VACATION...and VEGAS
VACATION did it better.  Abrahams offers plenty of moments worth a snicker
or a grin, but ultimately that laugh scorecard just doesn't come out in
his favor.  He came to the plate with a 25-year-old bat, and showed all
his best swings in batting practice.  For those of you scoring at home,
that doesn't add up to winning offense.

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
KISS THE GIRLS
(Paramount)
Starring:  Morgan Freeman, Ashley Judd, Cary Elwes, Jay O. Sanders, Tony
Goldwyn, Bill Nunn.
Screenplay:  David Klass, based on the novel by James Patterson.
Director:  Gary Fleder.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm thinking of putting together a self-help book which would assist
talented performers trying to come to terms with making a terrible film.
I'd call it something like "Smart Actors, Foolish Choices," or maybe "Why
Bad Movies Happen to Good People."  Within its pages would be testemonials
and guidance, reminding the readers that they're not alone in making the
isolated career blunder.  Tom Hanks had his BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES,
Anthony Hopkins had his ROAD TO WELLVILLE, Michael Caine had...okay, bad
example.  For an actor wallowing in "What was I thinking?", the healing
could begin.
     Of course, my motives wouldn't be entirely altruistic.  My research
might also help me understand how films like KISS THE GIRLS come to pass.
Morgan Freeman, the most talented American actor in films, stars as Alex
Cross, a Washington, D.C. forensic psychologist investigatig the abduction
of his neice in North Carolina by a serial kidnapper calling himself
Casanova.  Ashley Judd, the most promising dramatic actress of her
generation, plays medical intern Kate McTiernan, who escapes from Casanova
and helps Cross with the investigation.  Somewhere in this trite,
uninspired psycho-thriller, two gifted actors found something worth
exploring.  I wish I could figure out what that thing was.
     It's not just that KISS THE GIRLS trots out the over-used serial
predator as its villain, or that it relies on a "surprising" revelation of
the villain's identity; both devices can be used effectively, and have
been in recent years.  KISS THE GIRLS doesn't work because there's no
reason to care about who Casanova is, what he does, or what he's going to
do.  Director Gary Fleder never generates any tension or simmering menace,
assuming that murky cinematography will do his work for him.  Perhaps he
spends so little time on the tone because he has a hard enough time
keeping the viewers focused on the basic facts of the plot.  Some of his
narrative leaps are utterly baffling, sending audience members into a
frenzy of muttered "Who's he's" and "Where are they now's."
     To be fair to Fleder, his directionless direction matches the
directionless script with which he's working.  The characters in KISS THE
GIRLS are so thinly defined that it never seems to be about anything but
plodding along until it's time to unmask Casanova, yet even that major
plot point is ineptly handled.  Screenwriter David Klass doesn't bother to
drop the faintest clue about who Casanova might be, to the extent that he
could have been picking a name out of a hat when Casanova finally shows
his face.  Worse still, Klass doesn't bother to explore the villain's
motives.  After all, there's something unique about a serial criminal
whose primary goal isn't murder.  Shouldn't we care _why_?
     The only bright spots in KISS THE GIRLS, not surprisingly, are the
performances by Freeman and Judd.  Freeman brings the weight of years to
every role he plays, radiating the wisdom of a man who has seen a lot and
learned from every bit of it.  Where there is only a body in a suit,
Freeman creates a character.  Judd has a bit more to work with as a strong
woman recovering from the trauma of abduction, and she injects plenty of
fear and determination into her scenes.  Even then, the script doesn't
pull us into Kate's emotions.  It's hard to believe there was anything on
the page which made these characters -- or this by-the-numbers story --
seem appealing, but Freeman and Judd took them on anyway.  Maybe these
parts were the best they could find.  Maybe they suffered severe brain
cramps at critical moments.  In either case, they need our support.  I
feel their pain...I had to _watch_ KISS THE GIRLS.

Title
Review for Real McCoy, The (1993)
Starring:  Kim Basinger, Val Kilmer, Terence Stamp.
Screenplay:  William Davies & William Osborne.
Director:  Russell Mulcahy.
     Some movies require you to turn off your brain in order to watch.
Then there are movies that require you to accept that everyone *in* the
movie has turned off *their* brains.  THE REAL MCCOY is both.  It's
charmless, molasses-slow and so full of genuinely stupid people that
the film commission of Atlanta, where THE REAL MCCOY is set, might well
consider some sort of ritual suicide for their complicity in this
humiliation.
     THE REAL MCCOY opens with bank robber Karen McCoy (Kim Basinger)
being arrested in the middle of a job.  Six years later, Karen is out
on parole and looking to stay straight.  She soon bumps into
J. T. Barker (Val Kilmer), a hapless would-be thief who idolizes Karen.
J. T. also has ties to Jack Schmidt (Terence Stamp), the man who blew
the whistle on Karen six years earlier for refusing to work with him.
Schmidt, who is in cahoots with Karen's sleazy parole officer (Gailard
Sartain), again wants Karen to help him stage a robbery.  This time he
has some leverage:  Karen's kidnapped son.  Just when she thought she
was out, they keep pulling her back *in.*
     Contrivances and sloppy plotting fly off the screen so fast and
furiously you have to duck to avoid being hit by them.  Leading the
list is the Jack Schmidt character, who through unexplained but
presumably foul mains is already extremely wealthy when our story
begins.  There is no reason given why he should need or want to get
involved in another crime, let alone why he would actually participate
in the break-in.  Karen's initial encounter with J. T. during a botched
convenience store hold-up also strains the limits of credibility.  It
would have been simple enough to have them somehow entangled at that
point, but instead they run into each other the next day because
they're leaving their parole officers at exactly the same moment.
Small world, eh?  Then there's the convenient car trouble during an
attempted escape, and pet tigers which, through the power of the Laws
of Bad Cinema, must inevitably confront someone who has blundered into
their cage.  However, the buffoon prize goes to the Atlanta police, who
come off like the Keystone Kops on a bad day.
     But the fun doesn't end there in the shambles of a script by
William Davies and William Osborne.  There is also the absence of a
single, solitary interesting character.  Karen is earnest and
single-minded in her motherly devotion, but lacking any kind of edge
which would make her a convincing criminal, and Basinger is not a
thespian adept at fleshing out flimsy material.  Schmidt is a flaccid
villain, the parole officer is a complete blank, and Karen's son and
ex-husband might as well be furniture.  Only Kilmer's J. T. is remotely
appealing, but his one potentially intriguing quality, his ineptitude,
is never developed.  In fact, Kilmer disappears during the middle of
the film, just when his admiration for Karen could have made for an
interesting sub-plot.
     I might have been more forgiving if the pacing had been more
appropriate to a caper comedy, but THE REAL MCCOY goes nowhere fast.
Various scenes of sneaking and skulking seem to take forever, and some
end with no reason evident why they didn't end up on the cutting room
floor.  Even the reasonably clever climactic break-in falls victim to
this syndrome, including a scene of one of the thieves drilling open a
vault which lasts (I kid you not) four minutes.  There is no tension in
the scene, just tedium.  Russell Mulcahy (HIGHLANDER) is a director
with some style, and indeed THE REAL MCCOY looks reasonably good, but
he completely stumbles in the editing room.
     There are so many big problems with THE REAL MCCOY that I'm
tempted to overlook the little ones.  Like Karen disarming one of
Schmidt's henchmen and throwing his gun into the middle of a park where
her son is playing.  Like a fountain crushed when a van runs into it
reappearing in one piece a few moments later.
     Tempted.  But I'm pretty good at resisting temptation.

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
MUSIC OF THE HEART
(Miramax)
Starring:  Meryl Streep, Aidan Quinn, Angela Bassett, Jane Leeves, Gloria
Estefan, Jay O. Sanders.
Screenplay:  Pamela Gray, inspired by the documentary SMALL WONDERS.
Producers:  Walter Scheuer, Allan Miller, Susan Kaplan, Marianne
Maddalena.
Director:  Wes Craven.
MPAA Rating:  PG (mild profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Before the screening of MUSIC OF THE HEART I attended, there was a
short clip in which Mery Streep and Gloria Estefan appealed to viewers to
support arts and music education. It was a heartfelt appeal, and I was
surprised to find the film evoking a heartfelt response. I was touched by
the perseverance of Roberta Guaspari (Streep), the real-life East Harlem
music instructor on whose life the film was based. I responded
passionately to the narrow-minded administrative mandates that, in times
of budgetary constraint, describe the arts and music in public schools as
"extra," or not part of a "core curriculum." And my heart was lightened at
the sights and sounds of children making beautiful music. I'll willingly
make the following admission, Gentle Readers: I found myself getting
misty-eyed during MUSIC OF THE HEART. 
     I follow this admission with one of a different sort, the sort that
makes viewers everywhere want to throttle critics within an inch of their
thumb-turning, star-distributing lives: MUSIC OF THE HEART, moving though
it may be, just isn't a particularly good film. It begins with former Navy
wife and mother of two Guaspari coping -- badly -- with her husband
leaving her, trying to figure out what will come next in her life. In need
of work and a sense of purpose, the one-time musician and occasional
teacher proposes to East Harlem elementary school principal Janet Williams
(Angela Bassett) a violin program for students. Though the program
initially faces major obstacles from parents and other teachers, it
eventually becomes a phenomenal success, providing discipline and a sense
of accomplishment for kids unfamiliar with those concepts. Then those
nasty budget cuts begin rearing their ugly head, forcing Roberta to find
creative funding solutions.
     There's no denying the fundamental emotional appeal of a story like
this one. Hollywood has always loved "inspirational teacher" films, and 
there have been plenty of them: THE MIRACLE WORKER; TO SIR, WITH LOVE;
CONRACK; DEAD POETS SOCIETY; STAND AND DELIVER; LEAN ON ME; MR. HOLLAND'S
OPUS; DANGEROUS MINDS; etc. In recent years they have become even more
prevalent -- perhaps indicative of how much more complicated teaching has
become -- as well as more rigidly formulaic. The unconventional teacher
meets with resistance from students; some intransigent teachers (here the
amusingly monotonal Josh Pais) view the newcomer as a threat to their
slothful cynicism; eventually there is proof that the teacher has made a
difference. 
     The ultimate disappointment of MUSIC OF THE HEART has little to do
with its predictability; on the contrary, like many films of its kind it
hits its emotional high notes even though you know exactly where they're
going to come. No, the disappointment in MUSIC OF THE HEART comes from a
strangely fragmented narrative that never quite commits to a central
story. The film occasionally explores the juxtaposition of Guaspari's
background and that of her students, but the intrusions of social problems
in the kids' lives are lurching and token pieces of "reality" -- a child
of separated parents here, a victim of a drive-by shooting there, an
instance of domestic abuse thrown in for good measure. Pamela Gray's
script also toys with Guaspari's own search for confidence as she instills
it in her students, but that story is resolved long before the final
fade-out, leaving a blurry character for Streep to develop. When the story
starts winding its way into Guaspari's experiment with blind dating, you
have to wonder if director Wes Craven has any sense for its focus.
     The real kicker comes during the final 45 minutes, when the story
suddenly leaps forward 10 years to the violin program's financial
crisis. There's no question it was a pivotal moment in the history of
Guaspari's program, nor is there any question the Carnegie Hall benefit 
concert -- featuring big name performers like Isaac Stern, Itzhak Perlman
and Arnold Steinhardt -- makes for a rousing finish. It just doesn't feel
like part of the same film. STAND AND DELIVER reached its natural 
conclusion with the first successful AP exam; MUSIC OF THE HEART tags on a
45-minute coda after Guaspari's first successful concert. Of course there
are several touching moments in that final 45 minutes, and throughout the
film. Unfortunately, however, it's the ideas alone that are touching, not
the way the film presents them. It's easy to be moved by the sentiments 
expressed in Streep and Estefan's introductory clip.  It's harder to be
moved by a story that lets the mere concept of an "inspirational teacher"
film do all the work.

Title
Review for Holy Smoke (1999)
HOLY SMOKE!
(Miramax)
Starring:  Kate Winslet, Harvey Keitel, Julie Hamilton, Sophie Lee.
Screenplay:  Anna Campion and Jane Campion.
Producer:  Jan Chapman.
Director:  Jane Campion.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, sexual situations, drug use, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Late in HOLY SMOKE!, Jane Campion's latest attempt at gender
provocateurship, the principal male character refers to the principal
female character as a "man-hater." The principal female character then
responds that he calls her a man-hater "just because I criticize you." I
would never be so crude as to suggest that Campion is a man-hater, but
it's hard to not to wonder what testosterone-soaked demons haunt her. It's
one thing to ask pointed questions about gender-based power dynamics; it's
quite another to ask those questions using such weighty symbolism that
it's hard not to laugh out loud at the raving significance-mongering of
it all. 
     Campion's painfully strident stylings get a workout in HOLY SMOKE!, a
film that gets sillier and less insightful the longer I think about it. 
Kate Winslet stars as Ruth, a young woman from Sydney who begins following
a charismatic guru while travelling in India with a friend. Concerned that
Ruth has been taken in by a "cult," Ruth's family hires one of the world's
most successful "exit counselors," P. J. Walters (Harvey Keitel) to bring
her around again. After luring Ruth back to Australia under false
pretenses, the family leaves her in an isolated cabin with Walters for
three days, where he expects to break her down and build her up again. But
things don't work out quite so simply, leaving both parties searching for
their roles in their strange relationship.
     For a little while, it almost seems that Campion is on to something.
The opening montage, in which Campion sets up Ruth's introduction to
"Baba's" teachings, is an energetic sequence set to Neil Diamond's "Holly
Holy." Better still are the scenes of Ruth's mother (Julie Hamilton) 
visiting Ruth in India, her anxieties betraying the fact that she may be
most concerned about her daughter falling in with dark-skinned people. By
mixing in the racist element with the sexist elements of her story,
Campion promises a film that could have been a fairly complex examination
of exerting power and manifesting fear of "otherness." 
     Don't expect anything quite so measured. From that provocative
beginning, HOLY SMOKE! quickly disintegrates into a sluggish, rib-kicking
polemic. Walters is introduced, with little room for misinterpretation, as
a preening and self-important sort who slicks back his dyed hair, receives
oral gratification from Ruth's ditzy sister-in-law (Sophie Lee) and
prepares for his meetings with Ruth with breath spray. Ruth, meanwhile, is
a free spirit whose earth mother dance to "You Oughtta Know" provides all
the ur-femme credentials you could want. Campion seems little concerned
with exploring the side of Ruth that quickly transfers her devotion from
Baba to Walters. She's far more fascinated with the sociological
implications of a woman trying to escape into the wilderness by strapping
books to her feet, or of Ruth and Walters playing a role-reversal game in
which Walters is dressed up in lipstick and a skimpy red dress. For those
of you who think one of cinema's most unnecessary images was Keitel's free
willy in Campion's THE PIANO, please consider Keitel in lipstick and a
skimpy red dress.
     I suppose some viewers could find themselves intrigued enough by the
shifting nature of Ruth and Walters' relationship to give its freakish
elements a pass. I found it far too hard to take HOLY SMOKE! seriously as
anything other than an opportunity for Campion to rattle our collective
cage, whether the image is a nude Ruth urinating in front of Walters or
Walters hallucinating Ruth as a many-armed Indian goddess. It's not so
much shallow as it is garish and over-wrought, an Important Message Movie
without a solid base of characterization to ground it. It has begun to
appear that Campion is more concerned with filming themes than with
filming stories, struggling against oppression without making that
oppression recognizable in human terms. There's no need to use terms like
"man-hating" for that kind of film-making. "Clumsy" just about says it
all.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
THE BEACH
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Leonardo DiCaprio, Tilda Swinton, Virginie Ledoyen, Guillaume
Canet, Robert Carlyle, Paterson Joseph.
Screenplay:  John Hodge, based on the novel by Alex Garland.
Producer:  Andrew MacDonald.
Director:  Danny Boyle.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, violence, nudity, graphic gore,
profanity, drug use)
Running Time:  116 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When we are introduced to Richard (Leonardo DiCaprio), the young
American protagonist of THE BEACH, he says, "My name is Richard. What else
do you need to know about me?" He tries to convince us that he's a blank
slate, a walking receptor for experiences using his backpacking trip
through Thailand as a way to shake up his life. It's an intriguing start,
except for one small problem: There's a lot more we need to know about
Richard. In fact, there's a lot more we need to know about virtually
everyone and everything in THE BEACH. Director Danny Boyle's
travelogue-cum-human nature treatise proves to be a tremendously
frustrating experience -- it's a lazy film that thinks it's being
profound.
     The titular beach is a hidden cove on a remote island off the Thai
coast, a place that has become a sort of myth among tourists in Thailand. 
Richard learns the truth when Daffy (Robert Carlyle), a crazed former
resident of the island, hands over a map to its location. Accompanied by a
young French couple named Francoise (Virginie Ledoyen) and Etienne
(Guillaume Canet), Richard makes the difficult journey to the island,
where they find a community of self-imposed outcasts from civilization. It
all seems to be a paradise on earth, except for the presence of a
pseudo-benevolent pseudo-dictator named Sal (Tilda Swinton) whose paranoia
over keeping the island secret is rivaled only by her libido, and the
unsettling willingness of the residents to leave their dying in the middle
of the jungle. Soon Richard begins suspecting that the threats to the
community from without -- edgy marijuana farmers, more Americans -- may be
less troubling than the threats from within.
     During its first hour, THE BEACH does an effective job of setting
tone, largely through the efforts of superb technical craftsmen. Darius
Khondji works his now-typical magic with darkness, adding a shadow of
creepiness to Richard's cynical vision of tourism in "exotic" lands. The
island locations are spectacular, and Donald McAlpine's production design
of the islanders' camp is a tidy marvel. THE BEACH wants to set up an
initial dichotomy -- the pasteurized pleasures of most tourist
destinations compared to the raw glory of the island -- that eventually
proves to be false. On a visual level, it's hard not to argue that Boyle
and company succeed.
     Unfortunately for Boyle and company -- and for you, John or Jane 
Q. Potential Audience Member -- the characters eventually have to play a
role in the film. When they do, it becomes quite clear that nobody
understands why anybody is doing anything. Richard's vague motivations and
frustrations over sanitized tourist experiences seem provocative as the
film begins, but soon the script begins dropping in details about his past
-- e.g. he's a video game junkie -- without bothering to explain why that
matters except as an excuse for Boyle to include an admittedly creative
fantasy sequence. That complete apathy over exploring motivation spills
over into every other character, as screenwriter John Hodge never bothers
with the tiny matter of what the islanders want their paradise to
represent, or why Sal above all others treats the place as a holy secret. 
The characters -- including DiCaprio, whose performance is about as good
as you can expect in a role so under-written -- generally appear to be
occupying space and serving plot functions, to the ridiculous extreme that
the head marijuana farmer gives a knowing nod after his solution to the
film's climactic problem proves him a worthy successor to Solomon in the
despotic wisdom department.
     Of course, letting the complexities of the characters come to the
surface would have required some actual effort, as opposed to offering up 
the premise as it stands. THE BEACH comes to the staggering conclusion
that a perfect society is not possible when imperfect human beings are
involved (particularly when some of those imperfect human beings happen to
be surly neighboring marijuana farmers). It's ridiculously obvious
thematic material, yet the makers of THE BEACH seem convinced that
presenting that theme is enough to earn them philosophical style points. 
Ultimately, style points are all they earn, though they earn those style
points in impressive quantities. There are several instances when THE
BEACH has the power to grab you viscerally -- the squeamish might want to
turn away after the consequences of a shark attack -- but the concept
clearly wants to grab you intellectually as well. And THE BEACH just can't
do that, not when its creators decide the characters' names are all you
need to know about them.

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE
(Miramax)
Starring:  Shawn Hatosy, Amy Smart, Alec Baldwin
Screenplay:  Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly and Michael Corrente, based on
the novel by Peter Farrelly.
Producers:  Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly, Michael Corrente and Randy
Finch.
Director:  Michael Corrente.
MPAA Rating: R (profanity, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  99 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Miramax bows to no one when it comes to marketing films, but with
OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE, they've crossed the line.  They're touting the film as
"the new comedy from the guys who made THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY,"
which is deceptive for two reasons.  First, though Peter and Bobby
Farrelly contributed to the script (based on Peter's semi-autobiographical
novel), OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE was directed by Michael Corrente (FEDERAL
HILL).  Second, OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE is about as much like THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY as THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is like THE BIG CHILL.  A
raucous, outrageous Farrelly brothers comedy it is not, despite the
three-legged dog prominently displayed in all the ad copy.
     To cut Miramax some slack, I'm not sure what they should have done to
market this film.  It starts with a decent high-concept comic premise:
Circa 1974, Pawtucket, Rhode Island working class 17-year-old Tim "Dunph"
Dunphy (Shawn Hatosy) has a stoned encounter with a parked police car.
Dunph's concerned single father (Alec Baldwin) calls in a favor and sends
him away from his dead-end buddies to Cornwall Academy, a tony Connecticut
prep school.  There Dunph finds he fits in surprisingly well, finding a
different set of stoner pals and continuing to waste his high school years
away.  Then he meets Jane Watson (Amy Smart), an academically ambitious
girl whose influence begins to turn Dunph around.
     Every so often, OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE shows flashes of the twisted
sensibility the Farrelly brothers have come to represent.  Many of those
moments involve Dunph's wheelchair-bound brother (Tommy Bone), who slams
around the bed of a pickup truck and feigns a developmental handicap to
get into a pro football game.  There's also a funny scene in which
Cornwall's elderly dean (George Martin) reads a profane stream-of-addled-
consciousness letter from Dunph's best friend Drugs (John Abrahams), and a
stupid human trick with a strand of spaghetti better seen than described.
Such moments are rare, however, generally taking a back seat to romantic
montages, gruff family bonding, and more dope-filled scenes than we've
seen since the glory days of Cheech & Chong.
     It's not the fault of Corrente or the Farrellys that Miramax is
promising something OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE isn't.  It is their fault that it's
hard to enjoy what OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE is.  This episodic coming-of-age
tale has no focus, no rhythm, and no strong sense of its characters.
Dunph's interchangeable Pawtucket pals simply occupy space, never even
coming to life when they interact with Dunph's upper-crust schoolmates.
Most of the scenes at Cornwall are strangely inert, rarely exploiting the
fish-out-of-water concept of a blue collar amidst starched collars except
for a single lame prank.  By the time OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE staggers through
a few more out-of-nowhere sub-plots -- including revelations about Dunph's
late mother and a betrayal by a Cornwall crony (Gabriel Mann, Young James
Spader Lookalike Contest finalist) -- Dunph's gradual acceptance of
responsibility is lost.  The filmmakers' wandering attention span suggests
they were catching plenty of second-hand smoke from their cast.
     OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE does have a certain gritty appeal as an off-beat
family dramedy.  Hatosy's performance is solid, as is Baldwin's atypical
work as an unconventional father.  Corrente knows the streets of
Providence, and he creates that world effectively with cinematographer
Richard Crudo.  It's just a film that's always casting around for its
center, offering sporadic entertainment that doesn't stick to you.  It's
not quite funny enough for a comedy, not quite insightful enough for a
story of adolescent awakening, and not quite emotional enough for a story 
of family ties.  That's a hard sell for any marketing department, enough
to send you fishing for comparisons to a movie that exists in an entirely
different universe.

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
     Quick, match the psychotic Robert DeNiro character to the film in
which he appears:  1) Travis Bickle...all right, that was a gimme.  How
about Max Cady?  Or Rupert Pupkin?  It seems that DeNiro has played an
inordinate number of nut cases, but each one has been a distinct creation.
It also seems less than coincidental that all of the aforementioned roles
-- in TAXI DRIVER, CAPE FEAR and THE KING OF COMEDY, respectively -- were
directed by Martin Scorsese.  Scorsese knows DeNiro well enough, and has
enough talent, to refuse to let him lapse into self-parody.  Tony Scott,
on both counts, does not.  THE FAN is an piece of hack work in which
everyone involved flounders in a pointless story made even more
intolerable by Scott's oppressive atmospheric theatrics.
     DeNiro plays Gil Renard, a divorced hunting supplies salesman and
life-long San Francisco Giants fan.  Gil is particularly excited about the
upcoming season, because the Giants have signed reigning league MVP Bobby
Rayburn (Wesley Snipes) as a free agent to join established team star Juan
Primo (Benicio Del Toro).  Unfortunately, Gil is a bit _too_ devoted to
baseball; in fact, he is an unhinged obsessive, and when he loses both his
job and visitation rights with his son, he buries himself even deeper in
the game.  When Rayburn goes into a prolonged slump, Gil begins to feel
that there is a connection between them, and decides to take action to
help him.  That action does end up connecting the two men, a connection
which doesn't make Rayburn too thrilled about getting up close and
personal with his fans.
     It saddens me to announce the return of the Tony Scott responsible
for DAYS OF THUNDER and BEVERLY HILLS COP II after a brief hiatus during
which he channeled brother Ridley to produce the tense and claustrophobic
CRIMSON TIDE.  This is the Tony Scott who has ingested the
Simpson/Bruckheimer visual motif to such an extent that he seems medically
dependent on the kind of lighting which makes everyone in the film look
like George Hamilton; this is the Tony Scott whom one suspects might never
have been able to set up a shot he liked if blinds had not been invented.
Scott is a director who generally takes a script, actors and solid
production values and grinds them into hamburger to be smothered in slow
motion and a spirit-crushing soundtrack.  Whatever substance their might
have been in the story of THE FAN is rendered toxic by contact with
Scott's "vision."  This is an ugly, ugly film.
     There is no great challenge involved in figuring out what the
psychological underpinnings of this story were supposed to be, and that
they might actually have made a decent film in some alternate reality.  We
are meant to see Gil as a beaten-down Everyman whose desire for a life
where he is noticed drives him to an ultimately violent fascination with
the celebrity he idolizes, sort of a hybrid of Willie Lohman and Charles
Manson.  But the sympathetic side of Gil never comes through -- he is
frightening and crazy when we meet him, and it is obvious that he has been
frightening and crazy for some time from the reactions of his boss and
ex-wife.  Bobby Rayburn is sane, but screenwriter Phoef Sutton fumbles any
development in his character.  The arrogant but superstitious superstar
has a life which parallels Gil's in ways so obvious that you can feel the
elbow in your ribs -- a divorce, a young son, a perfectionist streak
driven by their fathers, etc. -- but beyond those bits of trivia there is
nothing to him.  Wesley Snipes looks leaden most of the time, trying to
find some kind of emotional core which just isn't there, and Scott's
direction steadfastly refuses to allow him the faintest hope of doing so.
     Snipes is in trouble from the start with a character who makes no
sense, but at least you might hope for some creative lunacy from DeNiro.
Sadly, what emerges instead is a performance which slaps together pieces
of his superior work for Scorsese.  Like Travis Bickle, he is a loner
lacking social skills living a kind of double life; like Rupert Pupkin,
he uses his idol to get his shot at fame; like Max Cady, he is violent and
uses the child of his nemesis to get even.  In the twenty years since TAXI
DRIVER, everyone who fancies himself an impressionist has done a lazy
DeNiro impression by squinting and rasping, "You talkin' to _me_?"  It's
depressing to see DeNiro doing his own impression of himself.
     THE FAN is the kind of film which makes me angry enough to point out
idiotic inconsistencies like overhead shots of Candlestick (now 3-Com)
Park which obviously were taken at 49er games, but the fact is that I
don't need to.  It is a film lacking a single character with whom to
identify, without a single shot which doesn't remind you that its director
cares more about the filter he has chosen than he does about his
characters.  That's right, Tony Scott...I'm talkin' to _you_.

Title
Review for Spitfire Grill, The (1996)
Starring:  Alison Elliott, Ellen Burstyn, Marcia Gay Harden, Will Patton,
Kieran Mulroney.
Screenplay:  Lee David Zlotoff.
Director:  Lee David Zlotoff.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The notoriously sap-averse Hollywood insiders at this year's Sundance
Film Festival went absolutely nuts over THE SPITFIRE GRILL, resulting in a
bidding war which found Castle Rock paying a head-spinning $10 million to
distribute an independent film.  Maybe they smelled a female-appeal hit
like FRIED GREEN TOMATOES; maybe they liked the idea of countering the
Hollywood filth-monger mentality by supporting a film produced by clergy;
maybe, just maybe, they were genuinely touched by the story.  Whatever the
reason, they have themselves a film which doesn't just jerk tears -- it
slaps, kicks, pinches and pleads for them.  THE SPITFIRE GRILL may be
positive and uplifting, but it is so aggressive in the pursuit of your
sympathy that it becomes exhausting.
     THE SPITFIRE GRILL stars Alison Elliott as Percy Talbott, a young
woman just released after five years in a Maine prison and looking for a
fresh start in life.  That search brings her to the small town of Gilead,
where she goes to work at The Spitfire Grill for Hannah Ferguson (Ellen
Burstyn), a feisty widow recovering from a hip injury.  Hannah has been
trying -- unsuccessfully -- to sell the grill for many years, which leads
Percy to suggest an essay/raffle contest to give it away.  Most of the
townspeople are suspicious of Percy's motives, including Hannah's nephew
Nahum (Will Patton), but Percy still manages to make some unlikely
friends, including Nahum's timid wife Shelby (Marcia Gay Harden) and a
mysterious figure who lives in the woods.  Still, it is difficult for
Percy to escape a past which she is reluctant to discuss but which Nahum
is intent on discovering.
     On its most basic level, THE SPITFIRE GRILL is yet another in a long
line of films about benevolent strangers who teach intransigent folks a
lesson in tolerance, and again the lead character is perhaps the most
troubled, but not really the character who grows and changes.  Alison
Elliott is the best thing about THE SPITFIRE GRILL, a talented young
actress who turns in strong and emotional work as Percy, a woman who is
just as unable to forgive herself as others are to forgive her.  She is
the sympathetic core of the film, and we grow to care about whether she
will be able to find redemption.  Unfortunately, we never get to see her
experience that redemption, and it is something of a cheat.  It is never
nearly as important to us that Hannah makes peace with her demons, or that
Nahum learns to be accepting, or that any particular person ends up with
the grill, but those are the only scraps we are tossed to give THE
SPITFIRE GRILL any sense of consequence.
     In place of consequence, writer/director Lee David Zlotoff provides a
film which often feels like a string of feel-good cliches, scored by James
Horner, the master of feel-good cliche music.  Zlotoff never misses the
opportunity to send out scenes like tear-seeking missiles, scenes which
might have been effective individually but en masse serve only to batter
you insensible.  For the record, THE SPITFIRE GRILL includes an abusive
husband to boo, a story about an abusive stepfather to feel outraged over,
a story about a troubled Vietnam veteran to feel sorry for, three
different stories about lost children to sob over, three different
wrenching tales from the essay contest to sob over some more, one
mother-and-child reunion to sob over still more, a wedding proposal to
feel warm and fuzzy over, a funeral oration for moral uplift and a scene
of a once near-catatonic man emerging into the sunlight to provoke
unintentional snickers.  If my description seems cruelly cynical, it is
only because THE SPITFIRE GRILL numbs you with its pathos.  In its own
way, it is just as shallow as an action film which is just one explosion
after another.
     The story goes that THE SPITFIRE GRILL was "commissioned" by a
collective of Catholic priests who wanted to back a film with "positive
human values," and I suppose you could say that they got what they
ordered.  Everyone in Gilead eventually Does the Right Thing, and it is
the kind of film which will probably end up on Bob Dole's Hit Parade.  But
in the course of injecting those human values, Lee David Zlotoff didn't
bother to inject many human beings -- Gilead, Maine and nearly everyone in
it (particularly the terminally irrascible Hannah) seems plucked from a
Pepperidge Farm commercial.  Alison Elliott's performance is strong enough
that, for a while, you might think THE SPITFIRE GRILL is about something,
but it isn't about people whose troubles make you emotional.  It's more of
an endurance contest between you and your supply of facial tissues.

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
     You have to know what you can expect from writer David E. Kelley --
and what you _can't_ expect -- to have a chance of enjoying the
determinedly quirky LAKE PLACID.  Determined quirkiness has been the
defining characteristic of Kelley's better-known television work, from
"L.A. Law" through "Picket Fences" and "Ally McBeal."  He delights in
creating eccentric characters, giving them outrageous things to say, and
hoping that our amusement and affection for those characters will carry us
through stories where his main goal is Making a Social Statement.  This
isn't a master of plotting we're talking about here.  If you can swing
with Kelley's off-beat sense of humor, you're in good shape; if not,
you're in for a long night of eye-rolling and teeth-grinding.
     For LAKE PLACID, his first thriller, Kelley abandons the social
commentary entirely to give his goofy characters plenty of room to work,
in a genre where plotting isn't particularly vital.  The result is an
occasionally hilarious insult comedy only occasionally interrupted by a
monster movie.  The setting is Black Lake, Maine, where the recent
separation of a Fish and Game investigator from the lower half of his body
has local sheriff Hank Keough (Brendan Gleeson) looking for answers.  Help
arrives from Fish and Game investigator Jack Wells (Bill Pullman), as well
as New York paleontologist Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda).  When crackpot
millionaire mythology professor Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt) joins the search
team, tensions mount, then escalate when it becomes clear that the killer
they're looking for is a 30-foot crocodile.
     The combination of tightly-wound urbanites and laconic locals
provides most of the comic fodder in LAKE PLACID.  Hector heckles Keough's
weight and backwoods roots; Keough mocks Kelly's aversion to the outdoors.
Even Betty White gets in on the act as a foul-mouthed lake-dweller, firing
decidedly non-"Golden Girl" salvos of epithets.  When it works, it works
wonderfully, particularly when Platt and Gleeson square off.  Platt always
shines when given the role of the big-mouth, making him an ideal actor for
Kelley's tart zingers.  Gleeson, meanwhile, lends Keough a restraint and
dignity you wouldn't expect from a character who's a skeet for put-downs.
Movie-goers who can enjoy a film simply by revelling in quotable lines,
including a sly shot at Woody Allen's infamous "the heart wants what the
heart wants" comment, are in for a real treat
     Those expecting something akin to an actual thriller, on the other
hand, are in for a disappointment.  The first hour of LAKE PLACID includes
a couple of graphic dismemberments and a few animal carcases, but not much
else in the way of scares.  In fact, the entire premise generally seems
like an excuse to put these four characters in the same place and let them
snipe at each other.  Two of those characters, Pullman's and Fonda's,
don't even contribute much to the kookiness quotient (Fonda in particular
plays Kelly with too much Ally McBeal stridency).  And as clever as
Kelley's writing can be, it's distracting when he calls attention to his
own cleverness (a notion to which any number of "Ally McBeal" detractors
can attest), or grows infatuated with the lack of restrictions on an
R-rated film's dialogue.  LAKE PLACID is basically a one-type-of-joke
film.  How quickly one tires of that one type of joke will go a long way
towards determining one's enjoyment.
     Fortunately, Kelley and director Steve Miner don't give that joke
much chance to grow tired, wrapping up the proceedings in a tidy 80
minutes.  That includes a corker of a conclusion, with more tension and
narrow escapes in five minutes than in the rest of the film combined.  The
climax is almost enough to fool you into thinking LAKE PLACID was actually
a thriller, instead of a farcical comedy with expensive mechanical
reptiles.  Kelley has already proven himself a writer for very specific
tastes, and LAKE PLACID isn't a tremendous stretch in his oeuvre.  It is,
however, very funny when it's supposed to be.  You just have to be
prepared for something unconventionally effective when the creator of
"Ally McBeal" does JAWS.

Title
Review for Beverly Hillbillies, The (1993)
Starring:  Jim Varney, Erika Eleniak, Lily Tomlin, Cloris Leachman,
           Lea Thompson, Diedrich Bader, Dabney Coleman.
Screenplay:  Lawrence Konner & Mark Rosenthal and Jim Fisher & Jim Stahl.
Director:  Penelope Spheeris.
     I knew I was in trouble in THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES when Joke #1
involved stomping a bear in the groin.  Joke #2 covered the expulsion
of bodily gasses.  The portion of the audience that was 8-12 years old,
either chronologically or intellectually, howled with delight.  I
merely sat in astonished silence and prepared for a very long ninety
minutes.
     The film version of THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES doesn't stray far from
the premise of the 1962-1971 television series.  Jed Clampett (Jim
Varney) stumbles upon a billion dollar reservoir of crude oil while
hunting in Arkansas, then decides to move to California with spunky
daughter Elly May (Erika Eleniak), irrascible Granny (Cloris Leachman)
and lunkhead nephew Jethro (Diedrich Bader).  The reason for the move:
widower Jed wants to find a new wife and educate tomboyish Elly May in
the ways of a refined woman.  In Beverly Hills, Jed entrusts his
fortune to bank president Milburn Drysdale (Dabney Coleman) and his
unctuous assistant Miss Jane Hathaway (Lily Tomlin).  Meanwhile, bank
toady Tyler (Rob Schneider) and his gold-digging girlfriend Laura (Lea
Thompson) hatch a plan to have Laura pose as a French governess for
Elly May, insinuating herself into the Clampetts' good graces as well
as their checkbook.
     The real star of THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES is casting director Glenn
Daniels, who has put together about as perfect a physical match for the
cast of the series as I could imagine.  Simply admiring Cloris
Leachman's remarkable resemblance to the late Irene Ryan was enough to
inspire me to grant HILLBILLIES about ten minutes of good will.
Unfortunately, that turned out to be nine minutes too much.  As eager
as the performers seem to be to throw themselves into their roles,
they're just not given anything remotely interesting to do.
     Congratulate Lawrence Konner and Mark Rosenthal, who receive story
and co-screenwriting credit, for pulling off a challenging task:
coming up with a script even more pedestrian than their work in FOR
LOVE OR MONEY.  They aim their jokes so far below the belt that they
usually end up somewhere around the ankles.  The ADDAMS FAMILY approach
is clearly in evidence here, namely to come up with a gauze-thin story,
then turn the characters loose to ham it up in comic strip fashion.
THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES maintains a fairly consistent pattern of
setup-setup-gag, setup-setup-gag, where you can see, hear and smell
every one coming from several miles away.  The series ran for ten
years; there's just not much new ground to cover in the "rednecks among
the ritzy" department.  It's therefore not much of a surprise that the
few really fresh and funny moments don't involve the Hillbillies at
all; watch instead (if watch you must) for some sharp jabs at Beverly
Hills high school students.  These laughs are so rare, I won't spoil
them by name.
     As in her hit WAYNE'S WORLD, director Penelope Spheeris seems to
wallow in intertextuality.  We get references to "Jeopardy," "People's
Court," "Barnaby Jones," and DELIVERANCE, just to name a few, and none
of them are funny.  Spheeris seems to be making the mistaken assumption
that referentiality is funny in its own right, regardless of context,
forgetting that WAYNE'S WORLD worked because it was *about* the pop
culture awareness of the twentysomethings.  There's none of that goofy
self-awareness in THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES, just a plodding, almost smug
conviction that it will be a hit no matter what kind of garbage they
throw at the audience.  It would be nice to see them proved wrong.
     Sadly, THE BEVERLY HILLBILLIES seems destined to attract the same
audience that made THE ADDAMS FAMILY a hit, a combination of nostalgic
parents and easily-amused kids.  For nostalgia, watch the series in
syndicated reruns for free; for the kids, just give them a good book.
They'll thank you for it later.

Title
Review for Edge of Seventeen (1998)
     Perhaps it's an indication of how far we have come, but gay
coming-of-age films are becoming as formula-bound and potentially trite as
straight coming-of-age films.  Confused younger protagonist, experienced
older object of desire, confrontations with friends and/or family who just
don't understand...we have been there, and we have done that.  To
paraphrase my colleague Mike D'Angelo, we have to ask ourselves whether we
would care about the people or the situation if the central romantic
entaglements were heterosexual, and often the answer is no.  Gay or
straight, "I was never the same after that summer" films often go nowhere
new or interesting.
     EDGE OF SEVENTEEN does try to take us somewhere new, exploring an
angle most gay-themed films only view as an afterthought:  how friends and
family respond to a startling coming-out.  Writer Todd Stephens'
semi-autobiographical story centers on Eric Hunter (Chris Stafford),
approaching his senior year of high school in Sandusky, Ohio circa 1984
with only the typical 17-year-old concerns:  working a summer job (here at
a lakeside amusement park), figuring out college plans, deciding which
skinny tie goes with his dyed hair, and hanging out with his best female
friend Maggie (Tina Holmes).  Then an amusement park co-worker named Rod
(Andersen Gabrych) catches Eric's eye in an unexpected way, turning his
simple Middle American life upside-down.  
     In some ways, EDGE OF SEVENTEEN is quite a conventional independent
film examining gay subject matter.  The narrative eventually spends a lot 
of time in Sandusky's only gay bar as Eric begins hanging out with the
friends of his lesbian amusement park supervisor (comic Lea DeLaria), with
the predictable exchanges of catty barbs ensuing.  Fortunately, even those
scenes are sparked by the unaffected, appealing work of Stafford in the
lead role.  His goofy innocence and teen-Jim Carrey grin generate
surprising sympathy in Eric's predicament as he begins exploring his
sexuality in secret.  The technical credits may be predictably shaky and
the supporting performances uneven (Gabrych is somewhat wooden as Eric's
first love), but EDGE OF SEVENTEEN manages to hold some interest in its
story even when it's not revolutionary...and it is amusing to hear the
Bronski Beat again.
     The really good news in EDGE OF SEVENTEEN also turns out, ultimately,
to be the bad news.  The film's best two best performances emerge when
Stafford and director David Moreton begin to address the confusion of
those who don't know how to react when a loved one announces that he's
gay.  Stephanie McVay has one marvelous scene as Eric's mother, trying to
reconcile her feelings about "gay people" with the notion that her son is
one.  Even better is Tina Holmes as Maggie, whose tries to support Eric
even as she deals with her own unrequited crush on him.  As sensitively as
the filmmakers handle Eric's various experimentations, none of them bear
quite the emotional impact of the responses of these two women to Eric's
sexual orientation.  
     In general, EDGE OF SEVENTEEN feels neither revelatory nor redundant,
merely unfolding with a simple honesty that makes it feel blandly
familiar.  The strength of two young performers -- particularly Holmes, an
actress to watch for -- elevates the film a bit above its like-themed kin,
but not as much as a different focus might have done.  Perhaps Stephens
was too close to the experience of his own coming-out to recognize that
the strength of his story was on the periphery.  If he had run with that
unique angle, he might have been on to a really good film instead of a
slightly-above-average story of how someone was never the same after that
summer.

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
BOYS DON'T CRY
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Hilary Swank, Chloe Sevigny, Peter Sarsgaard, Brendan Sexton
III, Alison Folland, Alicia Goranson.
Screenplay:  Kimberly Peirce and Andy Bienen.
Producers:  Jeffrey Sharp, John Hart, Eva Kolodner and Christine Vachon.
Director:  Kimberly Peirce.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, nudity, drug use, adult
themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It took five months for BOYS DON'T CRY finally to make its way to
Utah. Five months of bumped release dates (at least partially due to an
attitude, voiced by an unnamed Fox Searchlight representative, that "gay
films don't play there"). Five months of growing hype over the remarkable
transformation in the performance of Hilary Swank, who became a Best
Actress nominee as expected. Five months of building expectations for one
of the best-received independent films of the year, based on a compelling
true story. And after five months, plenty of opportunity for the film
itself to fall dangerously short of everything I wanted it to be.
     BOYS DON'T CRY is not a great piece of film craftsmanship. It's a
performance showcase, and a very effective one. The surprise, however, is
that the real showcase performance isn't the most talked-about one. Swank
stars as Teena Brandon, a native of Lincoln, Nebraska whose sexual
identity has always been a source of trouble for her. After numerous
run-ins with the law and fellow residents outraged by her behavior, Teena
flees Lincoln for the small town of Falls City. There she re-invents
herself as Brandon Teena, a young man travelling through town who falls in
with a group of aimless young people, including ex-cons John Lotter (Peter
Sarsgaard) and Tom Nissen (Brendan Sexton III) and John's 
sort-of-girlfriend Lana Tisdel (Chloe Sevigny). Brandon instantly becomes
attracted to Lana, and finds her receptive to his interest. But secrets
have a way of coming out, and when they do, Brandon faces dangerous
repercussions.
     At the center of the story, of course, is the mystery of
Brandon/Teena -- who he was, how so many people were fooled, what
Brandon's transformation represented as both threat and promise to the
other people involved in the story. Swank's physical performance is
superb, made even more effective by co-writer/director Kimberly Peirce's
decision to introduce Brandon already in male guise so the switch doesn't
become a showy trick. But it's hard not to be more impressed with the
physical performance than with what's going underneath it. There are
moments when you see the awkwardness of a girl trying to be one of the
guys, and moments in the harrowing final half hour when you see her
peering in terror through the cracks in her reality. More often, Brandon
is an enigmatic catalyst. It seems as though Peirce is more interested in
what Brandon stands for than in the person that was Brandon Teena.
     The upside to that perspective is that one of those people is Lana,
played with unnerving effectiveness by Chloe Sevigny. Lana is in her way a
more fascinating character than Brandon -- she engages in just as much
self-delusion, but her motivations are more complex. Sevigny plays the
small town girl with a dissolute resignation that gradually becomes faint
hope for a better life. It's the sort of role most actresses would play
initially with hard-edged bluster before unveiling the heart of gold
beneath; Sevigny shows a slightly different perspective of Lana every time
she turns around.
     Sevigny is part of a superb supporting cast, with Sarsgaard and
Sexton similarly refusing to play their parts for easy interpretation. 
The entire milieu of the Falls City youth has a heartbreaking genuineness
to it -- particularly noteworthy is how Lana's mother becomes "Mom" to
everyone in their desperation for any family relationship -- and Peirce
does a fine job of using Brandon to explore the effect of a nonconformist
on a place where reality is assumed to be static. It's the idea that
Peirce uses Brandon at all that dampens the power of BOYS DON'T CRY,
however. The chilling resolution and wonderful supporting performances
make it easy to recommend BOYS DON'T CRY. I only wish that five months of
focus on Hilary Swank hadn't led me to expect it would be the story of
Brandon Teena.

Title
Review for Woman Chaser, The (1999)
THE WOMAN CHASER
(Inwood Films)
Starring:  Patrick Warburton, Leo Malevitz, Emily Newman, Lynette Bennett
Screenplay:  Robinson Devor, based on the novel by Charles Willeford.
Producer:  Soly Haim.
Director:  Robinson Devor.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  90 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Pulp-noir is tough to pull off in this era of self-referential
hipness. Strangely enough, pulp-noir satire may be even tougher to pull
off, since the entire genre itself fairly reeks of self-parody every time
a hard-boiled guy, a hard-boiled situation and hard-boiled voice-over
dialogue combine on screen. Now take that pulp-noir satire and base it on
a real pulp novel, and you've got the potential for a smug disaster. THE
WOMAN CHASER shouldn't work. It _couldn't_ work.
     Writer/director Robinson Devor had the recipe for yet another inert
genre parody in his hands, but somehow he turned it into something so
wonderfully warped it's almost impossible to resist. Based on the novel of
the same name by Charles Willeford, THE WOMAN CHASER stars Patrick
Warburton (erstwhile "Seinfeld" David Puddy) as Richard Hudson, a used car
dealer recently returned to his hometown of Los Angeles circa 1960. 
Richard unexpectedly finds himself experiencing an existential crisis,
overwhelmed by the need to abandon sales and create something of lasting
value. He therefore sets out to write and direct his own film, a gritty
drama about an alienated trucker. With the help of his stepfather Leo
(Paul Malevitz), a washed-up former filmmaker, Richard gives the sales 
pitch of his life and finds his project picked up by Mammoth Studios. But
he could be in for hard lessons about "The Biz."
     If the above summary sets you to puzzling over the film's title, fear
not. In the 1950s and 1960s, Willeford wrote within a genre where
publishers couldn't care less what was inside the cover, so long as a
broad in a tight sweater and a provocative title were on the cover. The
author took advantage of that freedom to write unconventional stories like
the one that inspired the 1990 Alec Baldwin vehicle MIAMI BLUES, as well
as THE WOMAN CHASER (originally titled THE DIRECTOR). Robinson Devor uses
Willeford's own off-beat sensibility as a launching pad, then turns THE
WOMAN CHASER into such a twisted combination of subversion and homage that
you can only ride along where it takes you. Devor nails the genre
atmosphere, helped greatly by Kramer Morgenthau's marvelous 
black-and-white a la KISS ME DEADLY cinematography and Warburton's
note-perfect narration. Parody only seems to work when it's inspired by
genuine affection, and Devor clearly loves film noir, mannered conventions
and all.
     He also figures out that his story is a way to give a fresh twist to
the trite independent film premise of making an independent film. From
Richard's intense pitch of his film's concept, to his unconventional
methods of eliciting performances, to his obsession with the perfect
edited length of his film, THE WOMAN CHASER finds a kick for every
predictable situation. Devor even scripts the most trenchant line I've
ever heard on the phenomenon of people assuming they can write a film
(Richard, during his quest for an artistic outlet: "Sculpture and
architecture require years of training and practice ... but a _screenplay_
..."). Taking the concept out of the present day film-making world gives
it the perfect touch of the surreal, without even the faintest hint of the
superior outsider attitude that too often hinders movies about making
movies.
     Not all the quirkiness in THE WOMAN CHASER works, of course. There
are ebbs in Devor's pacing, and a narrative that doesn't always hang
together except as a showcase for Warburton's tremendously entertaining
performance. Yet even then there's entertainment value in virtually every
aborted narrative thread. And you've got to love a film that launches the
bearish Warburton on a bare-chested ballet, or lands him in bed with a
50-something Salvation Army volunteer. It's too easy to praise a film
simply for being different, but THE WOMAN CHASER is different in all the
right ways. It's energetic and imaginative where other parodies are too
often limp and witless. It skewers the ego of film-makers, but never loses
its love for film-making. It even pokes fun at film noir without resorting
to predictable gags. THE WOMAN CHASER is a surprise in every positive
sense of the word, because really, it shouldn't work.

Title
Review for Turbulence (1997)
(MGM)
Starring:  Ray Liotta, Lauren Holly, Hector Elizondo, Rachel Ticotin.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Brett.
Producers:  Martin Ransohoff, David Valdes.
Director:  Robert Butler.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, strong profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     TURBULENCE is an interesting case of the kind of baby steps Hollywood
takes when it comes to making women equal players in the movie business.
Ten years ago, Sigourney Weaver proved in ALIENS that a woman could carry
a large-scale action film; since then, things have gone from bad to worse
for women in action films.  With TURBULENCE we finally get an entry in the
well-worn "terror in a confined space" genre which features a woman as the
central protagonist -- not just as a ready-for-kidnapping love interest --
and she can't even get first billing ahead of Ray Liotta.  Of course
Lauren Holly is hardly a familiar face or name, which begs the question of
why she received such a plum role.  That is only one of the places
TURBULENCE, a thriller with unique and sometimes compelling rhythms,
misses its chance to be something special.
     Holly stars as Teri Halloran, an airline flight attendant working a
New York-to-Los Angeles Christmas eve flight with only a handful of
passengers.  Ordinarily that would mean a quiet and uneventful flight,
except that two of the passengers are prisoners in federal custody,
including convicted serial killer Ryan Weaver (Liotta).  A charmer who
protests that he was framed by an over-zealous cop (Hector Elizondo),
Weaver begins to win Teri's trust, and appears to save the day when the
other prisoners escapes and kills the federal marshals and the flight
crew.  With no one left to fly the plane to safety, and a massive storm
ahead, Teri seems to be the only chance the surviving passengers have of
getting to Los Angeles alive.  That chance becomes a lot slimmer when
Weaver shows his true colors, and decides that going down in flaming
wreckage is more appealing that a long wait on death row.
     The opening minutes of TURBULENCE make it clear that scripter
Jonathan Brett and director Robert Butler are in full "cut to the chase"
mode.  Our knowledge of Teri as a character consists of the fact that her
fiancee just dumped her, which in turn is infinitely more than we know
about any other character on the plane.  The five civilian passengers each
get ten seconds of exposition before they are trundled off to a closet for
the rest of the film, but it is just as well they were out of the way.
TURBULENCE works best as a physical and psychological mano-a-mano between
Teri and Weaver, with the 747 turning into a careening Winchester Mystery
House of mysterious passageways.  Butler gives much of the first half of
TURBULENCE an effective tension; the atmosphere is surprisingly creepy,
with lightning and Christmas tree lights turning the central confrontation
between Teri and Weaver into something more unsettling than the pedestrian
script could muster on its own.
     Ray Liotta is an interesting villain through that scene, insisting on
his innocence as he works at getting inside Teri's head.  It is a casually
seductive portrayal by Liotta, and sets up a scenario where the hero will
have to outsmart the intelligent antagonist, since as a woman it is less
likely that she will be able to overpower him physically.  Unfortunately,
we already know from the idiotically revelatory ad campaign not only that
Weaver is in fact guilty as charged, but also that he is going to turn
into a bug-eyed, tongue-waggling loon.  Liotta tramples the mid-air
scenery swigging champagne from the bottle, swinging an axe around,
tossing off glib quips and generally doing his best audition for the role
of the Joker if the BATMAN series decides to revive him and Nicholson is
unavailable.  So much for a battle of the minds.
     It is a strange decision for many reasons, but primarily because the
film spends so much time establishing how bright Teri is.  Lauren Holly's
performance doesn't contribute all that much to that perception; she's
feisty enough, but she seems to be going through the motions when the
script gives her a shot at Weaver, and it is hard not to be reminded of
Julie Haggerty's thin-voiced flight attendant from AIRPLANE! when Holly
has to struggle with the auto-pilot.  No, Teri's smarts are revealed in a
series of scenes in which a British pilot (Ben Cross) talks her through
the landing  process.  Those scenes, far longer and more technical than
you might expect, could have anxious action fans fidgeting in their seats,
but the simple competence of Cross's tones give them a steady, gripping
tempo.  Rachel Ticotin is similarly strong in the similarly miniscule role
of an air traffic controller, radiating the kind of intelligence the role
of Teri really needs.  In fact, if TURBULENCE was going to give us a
female hero, it could have gone the extra step and given us one as strong
as Ticotin.  Go one step still further and make Cross the sly, seductive
villain, and you really could have had something.  TURBULENCE may be a
better than average adrenaline shot, but it's still basically business as
usual, even with no Arnold or Sly or Jean-Claude.

Title
Review for Snapper, The (1993) (TV)
Starring:  Colm Meaney, Tina Kellegher, Ruth McCabe, Pat Laffan.
Screenplay:  Roddy Doyle.
Director:  Stephen Frears.
     Television has given the term "situation comedy" a bad name, but
that might be the most appropriate epithet for THE SNAPPER.  This
bright and earthy comedy from Roddy Doyle (THE COMMITMENTS) deals with
an average Irish family coping with one of life's many little
difficulties.  There's no high concept, no men in drag or mistaken
identities.  THE SNAPPER is just remarkably adept at making the mundane
comic, at making us laugh at real life.  Thanks largely to Colm
Meaney's charming lead performance, it's just one of the most purely
enjoyable comedies of 1993.
     THE SNAPPER is Irish slang for a baby, which is exactly what
Barrytown, Dublin resident Sharon Curley (Tina Kellegher) is
expecting.  The one small complication:  twenty-year-old Sharon is
unmarried.  Her parents Dessie (Colm Meaney) and Kay (Ruth McCabe) are
more than understanding, but they don't understand why Sharon won't
reveal the father's name.  Her reluctance becomes clearer when George
Burgess (Pat Laffan), a paunchy, married neighbor and the father of one
of Sharon's friends, drunkenly announces that Sharon was "a good
ride."  Sharon denies that George is the father, insisting instead on a
one-night stand with a Spanish sailor, but soon all of Barrytown is
abuzz with the gossip, causing great consternation in the Curley
household.
     With such a simple premise, execution becomes paramount, and THE
SNAPPER is very well-executed.  Director Stephen Frears (DANGEROUS
LIAISONS, HERO) keeps the comedy human by concentrating on faces and
reactions, a technique used most effectively during pub scenes where
extreme close-ups of drunken individuals emphasizes distorted
perceptions.  These are loud and boisterous characters (a bit
excessively so in the case of Sharon's cackling clique), and Frears
allows this liveliness to permeate the film.  Without resorting to
location cityscapes, Frears creates a rich atmosphere peopled with
sparkling characters.
     The standout among those characters is Colm Meaney's Dessie.
Dessie is a unique creation, a loving father and husband who avoids the
slew of cliches typical of Irish characters and father characters in
general.  Yes, he enjoys his pint at the pub with the boys, but he's
also attuned to modern sensibilities.  "Times have changed," he tells
Sharon in one scene.  "When Craig was born, I was at work; when you
were born, I was at work; when Lisa was born, I don't know where I
was."  Meaney is perfect, playing a more nuanced version of the same
character he played in THE COMMITMENTS.  His moments with Sharon are
wonderfully warm, even through his frustration at the embarrassment her
condition has caused him; particularly good is a brief, low-key scene
as Dessie shares with Sharon his amazement at the contents of a book on
sexuality.  He's also a man who genuinely loves his wife, and you never
doubt for a moment that Dessie and Kay have been married for
twenty-five years.  It's a performance unlikely to garner much
attention for award nominations, but its as deserving of honors as any
work out there.
     The rest of the cast is a bit more uneven.  Ruth McCabe is equal
to Meaney as the acerbic mother Kay, playing good cop to Dessie's bad
cop.  Tina Kellegher is fine when she's toned down, but when she gets
fiery she gets annoying.  Even more so is Fionnuala Murphy as Sharon's
best friend Jackie.  Pat Laffan's George Burgess is a small role, but
he does quite a lot with it, making George a rather pathetic figure.
Generally, THE SNAPPER is better when it's not in the pub, and the
volume knob on the characters is turned down.
     Some viewers may be made uncomfortable by the circumstances
surrounding Sharon's sexual encounter, but I found the story depended
on those circumstances, and that Sharon's response to her situation
defined her character.  THE SNAPPER doesn't moralize, it just sets up a
scenario and lets characters react.  I found those reactions extremely
funny, although I needed to break out my Irish- to-American profanity
dictionary on more than one occasion.  You'll need to play close
attention to pick up all the dialogue in THE SNAPPER, but it will be
well worth the effort.

Title
Review for Dumb & Dumber (1994)
Starring:  Jim Carrey, Jeff Daniels, Lauren Holly.
Screenplay:  Peter Farrelly, Bennett Yulin and Bobby Farrelly.
Director:  Peter Farrelly.
     1994 at the movies had many stories, but none may be as unlikely
as the emergence of Jim Carrey as one of the biggest box office draws
in the country.  The critically savaged ACE VENTURA:  PET DETECTIVE
made over $70 million, and THE MASK topped $100 million.  I enjoyed
both films on their own merits because they were made by directors who
had the good sense to get out of the way and let Carrey do what he does
best:  be a walking cartoon.  DUMB AND DUMBER is the kind of movie for
which "sophomoric" would be a compliment, but it could have worked with
Carrey's unique gifts at center stage.  Instead, it's just plain
stupid, and about as badly put together a movie as I saw all year.
     Carrey plays Lloyd Christmas, an idiotic limo driver who becomes
infatuated with a woman named Mary (Lauren Holly) he takes to the
airport one day.  When he sees Mary leave a briefcase at the terminal,
Lloyd decides that he must return it to her personally, even if it
means driving from Providence, Rhode Island to Aspen, Colorado to do
it.  He enlists the aid of best friend Harry Dunn (Jeff Daniels), a dog
groomer nearly as stupid as Lloyd, and together they head west in
Harry's customized sheepdog van.  What neither one knows is that the
briefcase contains a ransom drop, and that the kidnappers are tailing
them to get the money back.
     We've all seen comedies where every funny moment was already in
the previews, but DUMB AND DUMBER falls into an entirely new category.
Not only is the preview funnier than the movie, but it contains
different takes of the same scene than ended up in the final product,
and in every case the take that was used in the preview was funnier.
Among these are a scene where Carrey flips out an open jetway onto the
tarmac, and one where Carrey and Daniels try to recall Mary's last name
by checking the briefcase.  In another scene, where Carrey rear-ends
another car with his limo and ends up struggling with the air bag, the
shot is chopped short before the air bag is even fully inflated.  It
looks like director Peter Farrelly turned all his raw footage over to a
trailer production company, then promptly proved that he should have
given them the final cut on his movie.  Farrelly, quite simply put,
does not appear to have the slightest clue about comic timing.
     Jim Carrey knows plenty about comic timing, but he is really
adrift here, particularly in the first hour.  I have this feeling that
somewhere on a cutting room floor is a very funny performance, but it's
not on the screen in DUMB AND DUMBER.  There are a few moments when
Carrey gets to show off his talents, particularly an extended fantasy
sequence which includes an exaggerated kung fu battle in a restaurant,
but director Farrelly (working from a script co-written with brother
Bobby and Bennett Yellin) appears determined not to let DUMB AND DUMBER
become a Jim Carrey showcase.  He wants a buddy picture, and it doesn't
work because the buddy is played by Jeff Daniels.  And while Daniels is
a solid if unspectacular dramatic actor, he is way out of is element
here.  You've got to respect him for trying a part so far from his
image, but only for brief flashes is he a convincing moron.
     Once the twosome gets to Aspen, there are more laughs by far.  The
spectacle of Carrey and Daniels in gloriously hideous tuxedos, bright
orange and powder blue respectively, is enough to prompt a laugh, and a
hilariously gross scene finds Daniels suffering the effects of a
massive dose of laxative.  But for the majority of its running time,
DUMB AND DUMBER cranks out gags so predictable I was minutes ahead of
the punch lines.  To be fair, I don't think I'm in the target audience
for DUMB AND DUMBER; the fifty or so middle-schoolers at my showing
laughed loud and often.  At that age, a cop drinking a beer bottle full
of urine is about as hilarious as it gets.

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
(Universal)
Starring:  Michael J. Fox, Trini Alvarado, Peter Dobson, John Astin, Dee
Wallace Stone, Jeffrey Combs, Jake Busey, Chi McBride, Jim Fyfe.
Screenplay:  Fran Walsh, Peter Jackson.
Producers:  Jamie Selkirk, Peter Jackson.
Director:  Peter Jackson.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     All those who worried that Peter Jackson's first big studio film
would be a sell-out, please step forward to receive your slaps on the
wrist.  Yes, it is true that many independent and international directors
have found that their first steps into Hollywood left something foul on
the bottom of their shoes (see Kevin Smith's MALLRATS, Lee Tamahori's
MULHOLLAND FALLS or John Dahl's UNFORGETTABLE for just the most recent
examples).  But none of them was as intensely and perversely original as
Jackson, the twisted mind behind HEAVENLY CREATURES and DEAD ALIVE.
Jackson's direction is still in top form in THE FRIGHTENERS, a
comedy-thriller which, amazingly, works as both.  Unfortunately, his story
and casting choices are not quite up to the task.
     THE FRIGHTENERS stars Michael J. Fox as Frank Bannister, a
psychically gifted resident of the seaside community of Fairwater with a
unique scam.  Frank shares his residence with spectral cohorts Cyrus (Chi
McBride), Stuart (Jim Fyfe) and The Judge (John Astin), who help Frank out
by getting houses good and haunted so that Frank can step in and
"exorcise" them for a considerable fee.  It's a cozy little arrangement,
but it soon becomes clear that there are other supernatural goings on in
Fairwater.  Apparently healthy people are dying of mysterious heart
attacks, including the husband of new doctor Lucy Lynskey (Trini
Alvarado), and FBI paranormal expert Milton Dammers (Jeffrey Combs) begins
to suspect that Frank might be involved.  Frank, however, can see the real
culprit:  Death itself, sickle and all, has come to Fairwater.
     Robert Zemeckis acted as executive producer of THE FRIGHTENERS, and
if you remember his DEATH BECOMES HER, you will have a good idea of what
to expect.  The visual effects are wild and entertaining, and sometimes
decidedly creepy, like an ectoplasmic face which slowly drips down a
tombstone.  Jackson fills the film with great comic characters, including
Combs as the only special agent in the FBI who makes "Twin Peaks'" Dale
Cooper seem normal, and a hilarious cameo by R. Lee Ermey, playing his
Sgt. Hartman character from FULL METAL JACKET as a ghost running a very
tight graveyard.  The first half of THE FRIGHTENERS is a feast for those
with a warped sense of humor, particularly those who have no problem with
the idea of the decomposing Judge enjoying...ummm...relations with a mummy
in an Egyptian museum exhibit.
     The main problem with the second half, quite surprisingly, turns out
_not_ to be the shift from comedy to horror; in fact, it's not so much a
shift as a gradual build-up.  Bizarre comedy is a part of THE FRIGHTENERS
throughout, but the suspense elements become ever more significant, until
the conclusion becomes a sometimes rather bloody confrontation between
Frank and a pair of killers including a wonderfully unhinged Dee Wallace
Stone.  Jackson knows how to make an audience giggle and shiver at the
same time, and it all blends into one creepy funhouse ride.
     No, the problem, quite simply is Michael J. Fox, or rather the
decision to include a sub-plot for which Fox is really unsuited.  In THE
FRIGHTENERS, we learn that Frank was once a happily married, happily
un-psychic architect who gained his powers and lost his wife in the same
car accident five years earlier.  Other characters keep telling Frank --
and us -- that he is haunted by that event, but Fox never manages to make
Frank seem like anything more than a happily sleazy con man.  His attempts
at showing emotional turmoil are sadly superficial; I don't think I've
ever seen someone look as thoroughly unconvincing while a glycerine tear
rolled down his cheek.
     The back story for Frank is just one of many bits and pieces which
Jackson and co-writer Fran Walsh pile onto THE FRIGHTENERS, making it feel
like just that -- bits and pieces.  With serial killers, gun-toting
ghosts, lunatic G-Men, snooping reporters and love interests all running
around, THE FRIGHTENERS sometimes gets far too busy for its own good.  By
the time we get to a finale which includes visions of the afterlife (both
the good and bad version), it actually seems just plain silly.  Peter
Jackson has a welcome quality in a director, which is that he always wants
to keep his audience on its toes, never quite knowing what to expect, and
he is ready to entertain them any way he knows how.  THE FRIGHTENERS is
ultimately a satisfying ride which shows that Hollywood hasn't shaken the
life out of Jackson; now Jackson needs to shake some of the loose ends out
of his scripts.

Title
Review for Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993)
Starring:  Diane Keaton, Woody Allen, Alan Alda, Anjelica Huston.
Screenplay:  Woody Allen and Marshall Brickman.
Director:  Woody Allen.
     Reviewing a Woody Allen film is a lot like reviewing a sushi
restaurant.  You have to keep in mind that a significant portion of
your audience is going to tune out because sushi just isn't their
taste.  Whether it's good sushi or bad sushi becomes irrelevant; the
fact that it's sushi is all that matters.
     At the risk of hammering this particular metaphor into the ground,
MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY is good sushi.  Not great, but good.  While it
lacks the emotional scope that made HANNAH AND HER SISTERS and
MANHATTAN such great films, MANATTAN MURDER MYSTERY is by any standard
a thoroughly enjoyable entertainment.  It's easily Allen's funniest
film since HANNAH, and perhaps since ANNIE HALL.
     Larry (Woody Allen) and his wife Carol (Diane Keaton) are a
married couple who, after twenty plus years, have settled into a rather
mundane routine.  She reluctantly goes to hockey games with him, he in
turn grudgingly joins her at the opera.  It's always business as usual
with little spark, until an elderly neighbor in their apartment
building is found dead of an apparent heart attack.  Carol becomes
suspicious when the woman's husband (Jerry Adler) acts a bit too
nonchalant, and begins to uncover clues which she believes point to
foul play.  Larry is convince Carol is imagining things, causing her to
turn to a recently divorced friend, Ted (Alan Alda), for comfort.
Larry, meanwhile, is flattered by the attentions of a writer (Anjelica
Huston), and frustrated by Carol's insistence that she crack the case.
     MURDER MYSTERY sets up a parallel between Carol's investigation
and the search for some remaining zing in her marriage.  Larry is a man
who wants little more than a good night's sleep; Carol wants something
more before it's too late.  When Ted, who has had a longtime crush on
Carol, shares her enthusiasm for the chase, she begins to think about
what could be.  These moments, when MURDER MYSTERY focuses on
relationships, seem to be the weak points.  This is a surprise given
Allen's talent for examining relationships, but his heart here seems
more squarely in the comedy.
     Those who remember the classic physical comedy of SLEEPER and
EVERYTHING YOU ALWAYS WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX will be thrilled by
Allen's return to his roots.  Certainly, the moments are more sublime
than those early films, but it's the same old Woody with the flare for
choreographed ineptitude.  He has some great moments bumbling through
the suspected neighbor's apartment, and a priceless sequence when he
loses complete control of a cassette tape.  Nearly as deft is Diane
Keaton, reteamed with Allen for the first time in nearly fifteen
years.  Keaton, for now infamous reasons, replaced Mia Farrow in the
role, and it's hard to visualize Farrow as Carol.  Over the years
Farrow had become more and more like some parody of a female Woody
Allen, and her manner of perpetually whining would have been completely
inappropriate for the confident and focused Carol.  Keaton is an
engaging and intelligent screen presence, too often relegated in recent
years to window dressing roles like Steve Martin's wife in the recent
remake of FATHER OF THE BRIDE.  It's a pleasure to see her in a
well-written role, and investing it with real energy.
     Technical credits, typical for an Allen film, are first rate.  The
cinematography by Carol DiPalma is handsome as usual; the jittery
verite camera style, which was used to stomach-churning excess in
HUSBANDS AND WIVES, is thankfully toned-down.  And as usual, there is
the score of jazz classics, most notable "Sing Sing Sing" used to
highlight the chase scenes.
     The scenes which highlight Allen and Keaton together crackle with
the comic intensity that characterized their 70's pairing; in fact,
those scenes are so funny and so lively that the moments when they're
not on screen together suffer by comparison.  There are a few dead
spots in MURDER MYSTERY, mostly those featuring an excessively deadpan
Alda, but they are far outnumbered by the laughs.  MANHATTAN MURDER
MYSTERY is diverting, intelligent comedy that kept a smile on my face
for nearly two hours.

Title
Review for Wonderland (2000) (TV)
WONDERLAND
(USA Films)
Starring:  Shirley Henderson, Gina McKee, Molly Parker, Ian Hart, John
Simm, Stuart Townsend, Kika Markham, Jack Shepherd.
Screenplay:  Laurence Coriat.
Producers:  Michele Camarda and Andrew Eaton.
Director:  Michael Winterbottom.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  108 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Director Michael Winterbottom (JUDE, WELCOME TO SARAJEVO) goes the
Ken Loach route in this rough-edged, naturalistic dysfunctional family
drama. The story deals witht he members of a London clan coping with
various interpersonal dilemmas. Nadia (Gina McKee) searches for love in 
personal ads, finding men she's more likely to run from than run to; her
sister Debbie (Shirley Henderson) copes with single motherhood and an
irresponsible ex-husband (Ian Hart); sister Molly (Molly Parker) faces
impending motherhood not realizing her husband Eddie (John Simm) is having
a personal crisis. Meanwhile, their parents (Jack Shepard and Kika 
Markham) deal with an ever-more acrimonious marriage of their own.
     Episodic stories like this one almost invariably depend on the
strength of the acting and the consistency of the stories. On the first
count, WONDERLAND is spot on, featuring great ensemble work. The stories,
however, are much more hit and miss. In fact, not one of the sisters'
lives proves particularly gripping compared to the peripheral episodes: 
Debbie's son Jack (Peter Marfleet) wandering alone through an amusement
park;  father Bill enjoying an isolated moment of joy dancing with a
neighbor;  Eddie rehearsing how he'll tell Molly he's quit his job. It's
also frustrating how Michael Nyman's blasting score occasionally drowns
out the low-key intensity of the narrative. Jack Shepard's work as the
sadsack father could be enough to recommend it, but this slice of South
London life is pretty sporadic in its moments of emotional force.

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
CRUEL INTENTIONS
(Columbia)
Starring:  Ryan Phillippe, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Reese Witherspoon, Selma
Blair, Joshua Jackson, Sean Patrick Thomas, Christine Baranski.
Screenplay:  Roger Kumble, suggested by "Les Liaisons Dangereuses" by
Choderlos De Laclos.
Producer:  Neal H. Moritz.
Director:  Roger Kumble.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, brief nudity, adult themes,
drug use)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Hollywood has always been obsessed with youth, but that obsession
finally appears to be spinning out of control.  In these halcyon days of
'N Sync, "Dawson's Creek" and the like, it now seems that you can sell any
pitch in Hollywood by naming a piece of source material and tagging on the
phrase "...but with teenagers."  The most recent wave may have started
with CLUELESS ("Jane Austen's _Emma_, but with teenagers"), and has since
generated such classics as THE FACULTY ("THE THING, but with teenagers")
and SHE'S ALL THAT ("PYGMALION, but with teenagers").  So why not CRUEL
INTENTIONS?  Why not "DANGEROUS LIAISONS, but with teenagers?"
     Because it's a really lousy idea, that's why, made even worse by
appalling execution.  The principle players are Sebastian Valmont (Ryan
Phillippe) and Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah Michelle Gellar), Manhattan
step-siblings who are birds of a poisonous feather.  Sebastian delights in
deflowering innocents and building his reputation as a cad; Kathryn seeks
vengeance on a sweet young thing named Cecile (Selma Blair) who
unwittingly stole away her boyfriend.  United in their disdain for all
other feeling human beings, Sebastian and Kathryn strike a wager.  It
involves Annette Hargrove (Reese Witherspoon), a teen who has published a
national magazine article trumpeting her virginity.  Sebastian's mission
is to seize that virtue or risk losing his classic car.  If he wins, his
next conquest will be his own step-sister.
     If that all sounds considerably sleazier than the original DANGEROUS
LIAISONS, that's only because it is.  Writer/director Roger Kumble plays
most of the film as though it's soft-core porn for teenyboppers, teasing
with pseudo-incestuous fondling and money-shot close-ups of Gellar and
Blair tongue kissing.  To make matters even more unpleasant, Kumble even
plays an interracial relationship for titillation value, and goes for
cheap laughs by introducing a pointless subplot in which a stud athlete
(Eric Mabius) is a closet homosexual, complete with gratuitous slurs.  In
a depressing case of lowest common denominator film-making, Kumble has
appealed to his teen audience by reducing the themes of "Les Liaisons
Dangereuses" to "everyone has sex with everyone else."
     In an even more depressing development, Kumble may actually have the
_best_ grasp of the source material.  Ryan Phillippe, in a valiant but
grossly misguided effort to do some acting, spends virtually the entire
film aping John Malkovich's performance in Stephen Frears' 1988 DANGEROUS
LIAISONS.  Every inflectionless line reading, every arched eybrow, every
lascivious double-entendre is familiar, with no apparent adjustment for
the fact that Sebastian is a contemporary teenager instead of an 18th
century nobleman.  Gellar is only a bit better in the lip-curling Glenn
Close role, while Selma Blair plays Cecile not as simple and innocent, but
with a fumbling idiocy that makes her every moment on screen unbearable.
Only Reese Witherspoon brings a shred of dignity to the proceedings,
continuing to show a wonderful presence for a young actress and an
interest in finding something human in her character.
     Unfortunately, that's an interest her director doesn't share.  I
suppose it shouldn't be surprising that CRUEL INTENTIONS is just another
in a long line of glossy high school audience flicks, another film with a
mind-numbingly incessant underscore of shuffle-beats and pop songs,
another vehicle for pretty girls and even prettier boys to pose for their
fans.  It is sad, however, that these filmmakers have to keep picking
promising source material for their libretti, then demonstrating no
concern for that material whatsoever.  DANGEROUS LIAISONS was a tale of
corruption beneath a courtly veneer; CRUEL INTENTIONS makes the shocking
suggestion that adolescents can be petty, manipulative and obsessed with
sex.  It's a stupid and pandering film which will probably appeal to its
audience perfectly, leaving the rest of us to sit back and wait for the
inevitable "MOBY DICK, but with teenagers."

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, Alice Krige, Alfre Woodard,
James Cromwell.
Screenplay:  Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga.
Producer:  Rick Berman.  
Director:  Jonathan Frakes.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Paramount's "Star Trek" franchise needs the current crew much more
than the crew needs the franchise, and that is something of a shift in the
balance of power from the original crew.  With the surviving "Trek"
television series -- "Deep Space Nine" and "Voyager" -- in ratings free
fall and the original cast finally retired, the film projects with the
"Next Generation" cast are the last, best hope for the survival of Gene
Roddenberry's beloved vision.  To be even more specific, the franchise
needs Patrick Stewart.  Far and away the best actor ever to don a
Starfleet uniform, Stewart is the standard bearer for a series which has
the opportunity to thrive as long as stories can be built around Captain
Jean-Luc Picard, a character with unlimited potential in the hands of such
a talented performer.
     STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT is built around Stewart's Picard, which is
the first of many things the eighth TREK feature does right.  Picard is
leading the newly commissioned Enterprise E when the alien Borg -- a race
of cybernetic beings whose only purpose is the conquest and assimilation
of other races -- attack the Federation.  The Enterprise, however, is
asked to stay out of the fray, since the admirals don't quite trust Picard
to remain objective about a race which once captured and assimilated him.
Their concerns are validated when Picard joins the battle anyway, and ends
up following a Borg ship into the past, where they intend to conquer the
earth the easy way.  In the mid 21st century, the Borg plan to prevent the
maiden warp-drive flight of Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell), which brings
earth into contact with benevolent alien races for the first time.  It is
up to the Enterprise crew to make sure that flight takes place, despite a
Borg takeover of the Enterprise itself and the surprising reluctance of
Cochrane.
     The STAR TREK films have often walked a fine line between being
love-ins for the die-hard fans of the television series and accessible
adventures for a general audience, and FIRST CONTACT walks an even finer
line than most.  Though brief flashbacks and bits of exposition explain
the nature of Picard's previous encounter with the Borg, familiarity with
the episodes of the series in which it took place makes his trauma much
more clear, and his obsession more compelling.  There are obligatory
cameos as well (including one "Voyager" cast member) which will likely
blow right over the heads of the uninitiated, and at least one moment
which will be a Trekker delight:  the generally serene Counselor Troi
(Marina Sirtis) drunk on tequila shots.  Still, the surprisingly effective
work of first-time feature film director Jonathan Frakes (who also
portrays Commander William Riker) makes FIRST CONTACT a solid, suspenseful
action film for any fan of the genre, particularly in a tense encounter
between Borg and crew members which takes place on the hull of the
Enterprise.
     If there is likely to be a disappointment for Trek fans, it is a
change in the nature of the Borg which works to mixed effect.  The
anonymous and group-conscious Borg are given a much more individualized
queen (Alice Krige) who acts as their mouthpiece in their interaction with
crew members, notably the captured Commander Data (Brent Spiner).  Krige
is creepy and seductive in the role, and the design of her character is
sensational, but something is lost in giving the Borg a de facto leader.
Writers Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga attempt to explain it away in
classic Trek fashion -- it is one of those mysteries, the queen rasps,
which limited minds simply can't understand -- but they are unable to
explain away a Borg which seems concerned about its own individual
survival.  Somehow, they become less frightening as an army than as a
single entity.
     Krige is nasty enough, however, to make such matters insignificant
while you're watching FIRST CONTACT, and she is part of a phenomenon which
makes this TREK somewhat unique:  the acting is good enough from top to
bottom to drive the film.  James Cromwell (BABE) gets the entertaining
role of Cochrane, a self-interested sot who finds himself terribly
uncomfortable with the notion that he will be considered a hero by
history; it is a comic performance which is not simply comic relief.  The
always-reliable Alfre Woodard is also on hand as Cochrane's colleague
Lily, and Spiner (whose Data persona has been the best cushion against his
tendency to over-act) has some choice moments with Krige.  But it is
Stewart who commands both literally and figuratively, making his personal
mission to destroy the Borg a solid sub-text to a conventional action
film.  It takes conviction to sell science fiction, and Stewart is an
actor simply unwilling to play a flat character.  Frakes keeps the story
flowing while switching between the various plot threads, and his steady
hand helps make FIRST CONTACT the best TREK since 1986's STAR TREK IV:
THE VOYAGE HOME, and shows that it is far too early to begin the eulogy
for this franchise.  This is a smart and snappy adventure in which Patrick
Stewart doesn't just say "Make it so" -- he does it.

Title
Review for Curdled (1996)
     Accompanying the press materials for CURDLED were a few newspaper and
magazine articles about actual services which clean up violent crime
scenes, services like the one which is a key part of the film's premise.
If you want a sure sign of an insecure rookie film-maker, that would be
it.  I suppose the idea is to impress upon us the real-world foundation of
the story, but I simply don't care; an adept film-maker can sell me his
premise over the course of his film.  What the articles really tell me is
that director and co-writer Reb Braddock found the concept for CURDLED in
real life, and what the rest of the film tells me is that he didn't quite
know what to do with it.
     CURDLED is the story of Gabriela (Angela Jones), a Colombian
immigrant living in Miami who is singularly fascinated by violent crimes.
The scrapbook full of newspaper articles she collects about murders is not
enough to satisfy her curiosity, particularly concerning a serial killer
known as the Blue Blood Murderer.  Then Gabriela discovers her dream job
-- a company called Post Mortem Cleaning Services which tidies up after
blood has been spilled.  Gabriela loves her new job -- a bit too much for
the liking of her co-worker Elena (Mel Gorham) -- and when one of the Blue
Blood murder scenes comes up for assignment she leaps at the chance.  What
she doesn't know is that the victim left evidence identifying the killer
as bartender Paul Guell (William Baldwin), and that he is coming back to
do some cleaning up of his own.
     For a while, CURDLED is perversely interesting simply because
Gabriela is such a unique character.  Angela Jones plays her almost as an
innocent, like a child for whom death is still a question to be answered
rather than something to be feared.  She understands enough to know that
other people will not consider her obsession normal, but her enthusiasm
makes it difficult for her to contain herself, making for some
uncomfortable moments with a potential romantic interest (Bruce Ramsay)
and with her co-workers.  The black humor in the script by Braddock and
John Maass comes from watching Jones' off-beat performance as a woman who
shows a wide-eyed glee at being right where dark deeds were done.
     At least that is true at the beginning, when CURDLED appears to be a
black comedy.  At various points, it also tries to be a fairly
conventional suspense thriller (with Baldwin hiding to avoid being found
by Gabriela), a satire of media coverage of serial killings (including a
faux tabloid-style TV program which makes reference to executive producer
Quentin Tarantino's character in FROM DUSK TILL DAWN) and an intense
psychodrama.  The latter plays itself out in a confrontation between
Gabriela and Paul in which he forces her to describe in detail the death
of his last victim, and at that point it appears that Braddock is headed
towards teaching Gabriela a lesson:  the crimes she approaches with such
abstract interest involve the real, painful deaths of real people.
However, even that bit of character development is subverted for a cheap,
easy gag.  CURDLED seems to bounce from realism to surrealism with a
capricious indifference.
     Ultimately, this confusion points to a director who does not seem to
be in control of his material or his characters.  There is a lot going on
at various points in CURDLED, but none of it leads anywhere:  the central
character doesn't grow, there is no real sub-text about human nature, and
there is not even a consistent tone to allow it to work as a cathartic
genre picture.  It is evident that Braddock grabbed on to a basic
situation with potential, and that he was able to create an intriguing
central character to place in that situation, but that he just didn't know
where to go from there.  CURDLED sports a few neat stylistic flourishes,
including an eye-catching opening title sequence and a great scene where
Gabriela does a sensuous dance around a murder scene, but for the most
part it is just one big, long, sick joke with a punch line that is not
particularly worth the effort.  Someone should have thought about telling
a story, instead of just mailing one.

Title
Review for Inkwell, The (1994)
Starring:  Larenz Tate, Joe Morton, Glynn Turman, Jada Pinkett. 
Screenplay:  Tom Ricostronza and Paris Qualles.
Director:  Matty Rich.
     Despite the credit, no one named Tom Ricostronza worked on the
script for THE INKWELL.  Novelist Trey Ellis, who developed the 
original screenplay, made a rancorous departure from the production 
over philosophical differences with Matty Rich, and substituted a 
pseudonym which is a loose Italian translation for "full of 
excrement."  Whatever the specific points of disagreement might have 
been, it would appear that Ellis knew something that Rich did not. It 
is clear that THE INKWELL could have been a gentle look at a rarely-
seen side of the black American experience; instead, it's a sloppy and 
ham-fisted collection of caricatures which seems to trip over an 
occasional truth rather than aiming for any.
     It's the summer of 1976, and 16-year-old upstate New York
resident Drew Tate (Larenz Tate) is preparing to take a two week 
family vacation with his parents (Joe Morton, Suzzanne Douglas). The 
destination:  the home of his conspicuously middle-class Uncle
Spencer (Glynn Turman) and his family on Martha's Vineyard.  Tension 
is present from the outset, as Drew's parents worry about his strange 
behavior, and Drew's father Kenny, a former Black Panther, clashes 
with his bourgeois brother-in-law.  As Drew explores the town and the 
local beach frequented primarily by the island's black residents 
(nicknamed The Inkwell), he finds a few things which attract his 
attention.  One is a kindly therapist (Phyllis Yvonne Stickney) who 
seems to be the only person who understands him; another is an 
inaccessible young resident (Jada Pinkett) who steals his heart.
     At times, I thought I might end up liking THE INKWELL.  There
was a relaxed, nostalgic tone to some of the scenes featuring Drew, 
and Larenz Tate brought a geeky, confused charm to Drew's fumblings 
through adolescence.  But for every scene which endeared, there were 
two which annoyed.  Matty Rich ricochets between the sublime and the 
ridiculous with reckless abandon, treating us to foolishness like Drew 
and his island cronies bumbling around an unappealing nude beach, and 
Kenny taking on Uncle Spencer in a tennis match reminiscent of the 
over-the-top Richard Pryor/Bill Cosby contest from CALIFORNIA SUITE.  
THE INKWELL tempts you with sweetness, then smacks you over the head 
every time you try to embrace it.
     It's also exceedingly hard to take THE INKWELL at all seriously
with so many characters so miserably realized.  Glynn Turman huffs and 
puffs as the unashamedly Republican Uncle Spencer, delivering one of 
those horrible drunken diatribes that only movie drunks deliver.  Jada 
Pinkett is genuinely annoying as the haughty island princess, all 
hooded eyes, arched eyebrows and faux-Valley Girl vocal stylings.  
Morris Chestnut preens and postures as the town cad, and Phyllis 
Yvonne Stickney speaks deep truths in a Jamaican accent.  Two talented 
actors (Joe Morton as Kenny and Mary Alice as Drew's grandmother) rise 
above the level of the material, but for the most part Drew Tate seems 
to be living in a world of people whose sole purpose for existing is 
moving him towards losing his virginity.
     And that's really the fundamental problem with THE INKWELL.
Since I knew exactly where it was going, its only chance to work for 
me was in how it took me there.  I wanted to be interested in Drew's 
story, but I was repeatedly drawn away by the seemingly pointless 
class struggle between Kenny and Spencer; I wanted to lose myself in 
the characters, and they repeatedly reminded me they were phony. Time 
and again, I found myself convinced that Matty Rich had no real sense 
of what he wanted to do with this story, so he did a little bit of 
everything.  And somewhere, Trey Ellis must be having the last laugh.

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
SCARY MOVIE
(Dimension)
Starring:  Anna Faris, Regina Hall, Shawn Wayans, Marlon Wayans, Jon
Abrahams, Lochlyn Munro, Shannon Elizabeth, Cheri Oteri, Dave Sheridan.
Screenplay:  Marlon Wayans & Shawn Wayans and Phil Beauman & Buddy Johnson
and Jason Friedberg & Aaron Seltzer.
Producers:  Eric L. Gold and Lee R. Mayes.
Director:  Keenen Ivory Wayans.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, adult themes, drug use, profanity,
brief nudity, violence)
Running Time:  85 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SCARY MOVIE's least obvious joke -- and this is a film that never met
an obvious joke it wasn't willing to beat to a slow, bloody death -- is
its title. SCREAM, one of the 1990s horror films that inspired this genre
parody, went into production with the working title of ... SCARY MOVIE. 
SCARY MOVIE, on the other hand, went into production with the working
title SCREAM IF YOU KNOW WHAT I DID LAST HALLOWEEN. That title may have
rolled off the tongue slightly easier than that of Shawn and Marlon
Wayans' previous genre parody, DON'T BE A MENACE TO SOUTH CENTRAL WHILE
DRINKING YOUR JUICE IN THE HOOD, but that ain't saying much. These
particular members of the Wayans clan seem singularly fond of spelling out
not just the general type of film they're sending up, but each and every
individual film they're going to acknowledge within that send-up.
     I'm not sure whether the entire concept of scattershot genre parody
is beyond my appreciation at this point, or whether SCARY MOVIE simply
made me feel like that was the case. I do know that it ended up making me
cringe more often than it made me laugh. The set-up involves a group of
high school students reacting to the murder of one of their classmates
(Carmen Electra). Virginal heroine Cindy Campbell (Anna Faris) wonders
whether the killing may be related to an accident the previous year, in
which Cindy and several friends hit a pedestrian in their car and disposed
of the body. Her friends pooh-pooh the idea, but one by one they begin
dying terrible deaths with very familiar m.o.'s. Who will be next? Cindy's
sexually frustrated boyfriend Bobby (Jon Abrahams)? Her best friends
Brenda (Regina Hall) and Buffy (Shannon Elizabeth), and their boyfriends
Ray (Shawn Wayans) and Greg (Lochlyn Munro)? Or maybe Buffy's "slow" 
brother and honorary deputy Doofy (Dave Sheridan).
     As much as SCARY MOVIE owes to the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker team in its
basic structure, it may owe even more to the Farrelly brothers. Simply
put, this is as breathtakingly crude and tasteless a film as you'll see
without going into the curtained-off area of your local video store. It's
not that some of the crude sight gags aren't funny; a few of them are 
worth big embarrassed chuckles. Unfortunately, far more are either lazy or
get really old really fast. SCARY MOVIE boasts not one, not two, but three
flatulence jokes, in addition to not one, not two, not three, etc. but at
least half a dozen oral sex jokes. And that's saying nothing of the entire
GLAAD protest's worth of cheap sexual orientation gags. I suspect the
Wayans Brothers know their audience well enough to know that nothing will
get the guffaws going better than an effeminate football player, or a
butch girls' gym teacher, or a forest of overgrown pubic hair. I also know
I've rarely felt as pandered to for so little playful pay-off.
     When the Wayans' finally do turn their attention to gags with
specific reference points -- the SCREAM trilogy, I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST
SUMMER, even an improbable nod to THE USUAL SUSPECTS -- their batting
average doesn't improve much. Inevitably at least a few gags are going to
hit, most of which involve the pre-title attack on Electra. Others are
seemingly obligatory swipes at already-tired targets like THE SIXTH
SENSE's "I see dead people" line, TITANIC's "king of the world" line, 
Heather's confession in THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT and the ubiquitous
"Wassup" guys from the Budweiser ads. There's rarely any confusion over
the source of any referential gag, because director Keenen Ivory Wayans
will usually let a scene run on for two or three minutes of set-up before
ever getting to the punch line. A film like this has to jab and move,
letting its gags stand or fall without someone pointing to them and
shouting, "Hey, isn't _that_ funny?"
     Before SCARY MOVIE's release, several critics wondered aloud how it
could satirize a film that was itself a satire of other films. The
premise wasn't entirely accurate, since SCREAM was always a horror film
itself, albeit a deconstruction of horror films within the genre. SCARY
MOVIE's problem isn't that it tries to do things SCREAM already did
better, but that it's not funny enough often enough. Perhaps if more of
the humor had hovered around the margins (like the labels on a restroom
condom machine) instead of over-staying its welcome (like the fate of a
talkative movie theater patron), SCARY MOVIE could have felt less like a
marketing hook in search of some actual comedy. It doesn't take much
creativity or wit to nudge an audience with pop culture references. It
just takes naming your film something obvious like SCREAM IF YOU KNOW WHAT
I DID LAST HALLOWEEN.

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
UNBREAKABLE
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, Robin Wright Penn, Spencer
Treat Clark, Charlayne Woodard.
Screenplay:  M. Night Shyamalan.
Producers:  Barry Mendel and Sam Mercer and M. Night Shyamalan.
Director:  M. Night Shyamalan.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
[WARNING: The following review contains elements that may be considered
plot spoilers. Those who wish to see the film without any knowledge of
plot developments beyond those contained in its trailers should not read
this review.]
     M. Night Shyamalan's UNBREAKABLE easily qualifies as the strangest,
most subdued and most unconventional super-hero movie ever made. It will
probably be considered something of a plot spoiler simply to make such a
declaration, since Shyamalan and Touchstone Pictures have made such a
concerted effort to build a mystery around what exactly UNBREAKABLE is
about. But there you have it: It's a super-hero movie. A moody,
character-driven super-hero movie. With no costumes or action figures. No
explosions. And no crash-cut editing. It's a super-hero movie as directed
by M. Night Shyamalan, the anti-Joel Shumacher.
     This much you probably already know from trailers and commercials:
Bruce Willis plays David Dunn, a Philadelphia security guard who is the
only survivor of a catastrophic train wreck. Not only is he the only
survivor, he emerges from the crash without a single scratch or broken
bone. Ah, but there's more: Soon David is contacted by Elijah Price
(Samuel L. Jackson), an art dealer with a fascination for comic books and
a congenital disease resulting in extremely fragile bones. Elijah believes
that David may be something more than extremely lucky to have survived the
train crash. David may be impervious to physical harm; he may be destined
to use his physical gifts to protect others. In short, he may be a
super-hero. David, of course, thinks Elijah is crazy ... until evidence
begins building that he's not.
     In many ways, UNBREAKABLE's story is the quintessential modern
super-hero story. David is an Everyman Superman, reluctant to believe in
his destiny; Elijah is the mentor who tries to convince him to harness his
abilities. What Shyamalan does is wrap the archetypal mythology in
psychology and family drama. We quickly discover that David is unhappily
married to his wife Audrey (Robin Wright Penn), and has difficulty
connecting with his son Joseph (Spencer Treat Clark). He harbors
long-suppressed unhappiness over the life he may have given up for his
family, unhappiness Willis generally conveys through the raspy whisper he
uses in his Serious Dramatic Actor mode. Willis, Jackson, Penn and Clark
all play fully-developed characters, which makes UNBREAKABLE a rare enough
film in that it's genuinely concerned not just with situations, but with
people responding to situations.
     And yet it's still indisputably, undeniably a super-hero movie,
though unlike any super-hero movie you've ever seen before. Shyamalan's
style is unusal for a director in any genre, one that favors long,
unbroken takes over quick cuts and reversals. That style contributed
greatly to the powerful aura of mystery in Shyamalan's THE SIXTH SENSE,
and it contributes here to a sense of greater consequence than you'd
expect from a tale of a super-powered man learning how to fight evil. The
moment in which David and Joseph jointly discover David's unusual strength
is played with a light sense of humor and a truly under-stated sense of
awe; David's climactic encounter with a villain is shot in a way that
makes heroic triumph surprisingly ugly. As visually gifted as Shyamalan is
as a filmmaker -- perhaps even showy in his way -- UNBREAKABLE never lets
a special effect or a camera trick take over this narrative.
     UNBREAKABLE takes a couple of unfortunate wrong turns during its
third act. One involves David's initial adversary, a fairly garden-variety
nameless psycho. The other involves a late plot development that's not
nearly as organic to the story as THE SIXTH SENSE's already-legendary
twist. It feels almost obligatory, as though Shyamalan were under the
impression that it's what the audience expects from him now. That seems an
unlikely prospect, though, considering how blithely he goes about blowing
up every expectation you've ever had about a super-hero movie. UNBREAKABLE
is a compelling, fundamentally sound story that feels more and more daring
until its late stumbles. It's too bad that the final moments are so weak,
because it might leave viewers doubting its other impressive
accomplishments. This is a film that emerges from its own internal
conflicts ultimately triumphant -- just like a strange, subdued,
unconventional super-hero movie should.

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
     Here's the faint praise with which I ultimately damn THE GOVERNESS:
while I was consistently interested in the film, I'm not sure I could tell
you what the point of it all was.  Certainly I could outline the plot,
which centers around a young Sephardic Jewish woman named Rosina Da Silva
(Minnie Driver) in 1840s London.  When her father dies suddenly, leaving a
mountain of debt, Rosina is obliged either to marry or find employment of
her own.  The high-spirited girl opts for the latter course, posing as a
Gentile named Mary Blackchurch in order to work as a governess for a
Christian family called Cavendish on Scotland's Isle of Skye.  There she
finds herself drawn to patriarch Charles (Tom Wilkinson), a reclusive
scientist, even as his son Henry (Jonathan Rhys-Meyers) becomes fascinated
with Rosina/Mary.
     From there, however, things start to get a little murky.  We know
that Rosina is a stranger in a strange land; will the central conflict be
a clash of cultures?  We know her young charge Clementina (Florence Hoath)
is a trouble-maker; will the story follow their growing mutual affection?
We know that Rosina has dreams of performing on the stage; will we find
her getting lost in the real-life performance she is forced to undertake?
We know that Mrs. Cavendish (Harriet Walter) feels suffocated by her
isolated country life; will she and Rosina act as counterpoints in a study
of acceptable female roles, or bond over their shared pining for the city?
     The answer to these questions and more is a resounding "sort of."
The bulk of the narrative is devoted to the developing relationship
between Charles and Rosina, a relationship hinged on a provocative irony:
though Rosina loves Charles for his ability to appreciate her mind (when
he invites her to assist in his research), he only knows her as the
fiction she has created.  Yet all the rich background provided by
writer/director Sandra Goldbacher teases without adding up to enough.  In
the long run, it's virtually irrelevant that Rosina is Jewish; all she
really needs is some sort of dark secret to hide from the Cavendish
family.  The Rosina-as-actress angle disappears after the first act,
shortly followed by the conflict between Rosina and Clementina (dismissed
in one threatening tug of the pigtails).
     Most disappointing of all is the lack of interest Goldbacher shows in
developing her secondary characters.  Mrs. Cavendish, a potentially
touching portrait of repressed longing, instead becomes comic relief
described as though "she had a lemon stuck up her bottom."  Even more
mysterious is young Henry, whose obsession with Rosina may be an act of
rebellion, or perhaps a fleeting adolescent crush, or perhaps some mixture
of the two.  In any case, it certainly doesn't mean enough for a lingering
scene of Henry writhing naked in the surf to provide anything more than
the film's _second_ gratuitous penis shot.  Driver's strong, sensual
performance as Rosina and Wilkinson's turn as the conflicted Charles do
fill in plenty of gaps, but it's tough to get caught up in a romantic
square composed of one real woman, half an identifiable man, a pale and
petulant enigma, and a stick figure wrapped in a shawl.
     All the time that might have been spent sorting out their motivations
is spent instead on a metaphor so massively obvious you might trip over it
on your way out into the lobby.  Charles' major scientific investigation
involves photography, particularly how to hold the transient images which
fade over several hours.  Leaving aside Rosina's Forrest Gump-like
discovery of the darkroom and the concept of saline solution developing,
the entire photography angle feels like one long attempt to distinguish
between our two principal characters -- she wants to capture human faces
(i.e. she's vibrant and alive), he is interested only in inanimate
objects (i.e., he's cold and reserved).  What we don't see is what this
has to do with any of the other cultural or sociological tidbits 
Goldbacher drops along the way.  Driver's Rosina is a compelling enough
presence that you'll want to put the pieces together, but you'll find far
more ambition than resolution.  THE GOVERNESS fairly drowns in context
desperately seeking some content.

Title
Review for Trzy kolory: Bialy (1994)
Starring:  Zbigniew Zamachowski, Julie Delpy, Janusz Gajos.
Screenplay:  Krzysztof Kieslowski and Krzysztof Piesiewicz.
Director:  Krzysztof Kieslowski.
     Give this to Krzysztof Kieslowski: he's been busy and he hasn't
been repeating himself.  It is understandable that he announced his
retirement from filmmaking at this year's Cannes Film Festival where
RED, the third segment of his THREE COLORS trilogy, premiered; three
films in two years is enough to burn anyone out.  Still, it is a shame
to see such a versatile director leave the scene.  Last year's BLUE was
a marvelous psychological drama; WHITE is an acidic little comedy.
WHITE is also somewhat less satisfying than BLUE, well-acted and
directed but suffering from basic deficiencies in motivation and
characterization.
     WHITE tells the story of Karol Karol (Zbigniew Zamachowski), a
meek Polish hairdresser living in Paris with his beautiful new wife
Dominique (Julie Delpy).  As the film opens, Dominique is suing Karol
for divorce, on the grounds that he has been unable to consummate their
marriage.  His bank accounts frozen and thrown out on the street, Karol
finds himself reduced to panhandling on the Metro.  There he meets
Mikolaj (Janusz Gajos), a kindly but depressive bridge player who helps
Karol return to Poland.  Once back in his homeland, Karol sets out to
change his life.  Through complicated wheeling and dealing, Karol puts
himself in a position of power, from which he will be able to even the
score with Dominique.
     Kieslowski does a superb job from the outset of establishing that
Karol is a man who is, both literally and figuratively, on the
receiving end of life's excrement.  Humiliated, broke and cuckolded
(over the phone, no less, in a scene both hysterical and sad), Karol is
a perfect stand-in for anyone who has felt positively overwhelmed by
life.  Zbigniew Zamachowski gives a delightful physical performance as
the rumpled but sympathetic Karol, appearing perpetually bewildered and
on the verge of tears.  However, he is less successful at conveying
Karol's transformation into a slick go-getter.  Like many events in
WHITE, the change occurs too quickly, and it seems to be presented as
an article of faith that this is something that was always within
Karol, just requiring the right setting--at least I didn't see it on
the screen.
     Even more perplexing is Dominique, whose feelings for Karol are
believably convoluted but who turns into a bizarre creation by the
film's conclusion.  There is a surreal quality to the events of WHITE's
last fifteen minutes, a quality which sabotages any sense of
character.  The sequence which theoretically explains this change
(featuring an effective use of an all-white screen as an accent)
doesn't, at least not as believably as it should.  Julie Delpy, like
Zamachowski, nails her character in the beginning of the film, but
drifts into something unrecognizable by the final scene.
     It's unfortunate that the characters are so unfocused, because
Kieslowski's exploration of equality is intriguingly multi-faceted.
Most obviously, there is Karol's attempt to "get even" with Dominique,
an attempt with unexpectedly successful results.  However, there is
also an examination of post-Communist economics in Poland, and how
Karol builds from his luck two-franc piece into a wealthy
entrepreneur.  As Karol's brother notes, "This is Europe now," as Karol
finds he can indeed buy anything.  Money serves both as a tool of
equality and inequality, allowing Kieslowski to question the benefits
of the new world order.  WHITE is full of interesting ideas, more than
ten average films put together, but they're just not executed all that
smoothly.  Moments of brilliance shine out in WHITE; others are dulled
by chaotic characterizations.

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Starring:  Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell, Judd
Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid, Robert Loggia, Vivica A. Fox.
Screenplay:  Roland Emmerich, Dean Devlin.
Director:  Roland Emmerich.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In case you are just emerging from Biosphere 2, or have been
otherwise hermetically sealed away from all media for the last twelve
months, INDEPENDENCE DAY is about an alien invasion of the earth.  20th
Century Fox began running teasers for its major summer entry sometime
around the mid-1980s; they flew planes over the cities targeted in the
film, warning of impending doom; they sent out massive theater lobby cards
which required a light rail system to get from one end to the other.
Whatever the production budget was for INDEPENDENCE DAY, the marketing
budget probably came close to matching it, and it appears to have worked.
People are a-buzz over INDEPENDENCE DAY, and theater owners successfully
lobbied to have the opening moved up to July 2nd.  All that money
spent...and by all evidence, not a dime of it went to a good script
doctor.
     By now, I am fully aware that the call for better scripts in summer
blockbusters is a cry in the wilderness; the success of TWISTER has proved
beyond a shadow of a doubt that little else matters if impressive visual
effects are on the bill of fare.  What makes INDEPENDENCE DAY so
frustrating is that its complete failure as a story does not appear to be
the result of laziness.  Director Roland Emmerich and producer Dean
Devlin, who co-wrote the screenplay, were trying to create an epic
tale-of-three-cities, beginning with the appearance over Los Angeles, New
York and Washington D.C. of giant spacecraft on July 2nd, their subsequent
attack and humanity's attempt to resist on July 4th, and several
characters are followed through those three days.  There is David Levinson
(Jeff Goldblum), a satellite engineer whose ex-wife Connie (Margaret
Colin) is the Chief-of-Staff for President Thomas Whitmore (Bill Pullman),
and Capt. Steven Hiller (Will Smith), a Marines pilot separated from his
girlfriend Jasmine (Vivica A. Fox), a single mother who is one of the few
survivors in Los Angeles, along with the First Lady (Mary McDonnell).
     The half-dozen or so sub-plots which wind through INDEPENDENCE DAY
suggest that Emmerich and Devlin really wanted to make human drama matter.
Instead, they created a story full of one-dimensional characters, absurd
coincidences and laughably uninteresting interpersonal conflicts.  A
couple of performances manage to rise above the nonsense -- Will Smith,
who has far more charisma than this film deserves and is almost always
entertaining when he is on-screen, which is not nearly often enough; and
Brent Spiner, who has fun as the eccentric scientist in charge of
examining the remains of the infamous Roswell, New Mexico spacecraft from
the 1950s -- but mostly there are forced emotions and nascent cliches like
the bickering-estranged-spouses-who-still-love-each-other.
     But let's get down to the real business:  at times, INDEPENDENCE DAY
looks great, a real apocalypse wow.  The dog-fight sequences are complex
and exciting, particularly a one-on-one battle between Smith's Capt.
Hiller and an alien fighter which whizzes through canyons at break-neck
speed.  At other times, believe it or not, it looks cheap.  Some of the
digital effects are too soft around the edges, and INDEPENDENCE DAY skimps
on a face-to-face showdown with the aliens.  That is a big mistake,
because the only time in INDEPENDENCE DAY when there is any genuine
tension is when scientists get hold of -- and have to deal with -- an
alien survivor.  There is something cold about an Ultimate Battle which
comes down to a showdown between ships.
     Then again, a swarming alien ground invasion might have given
Emmerich and Devlin just one more better film to crib from.  INDEPENDENCE
DAY feels like a hodge-podge of quotes from science fiction classics like
STAR WARS (the "mother ship cruising overhead" opening shot, as well as
the trench run finale), RETURN OF THE JEDI (the multi-craft dog-fight) and
ALIEN (the design of the aliens).  Even the film's self-promoted nickname,
"ID4," evokes TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY's "T2" campaign from a few years
ago.  To top things off, the president gives what is intended to be a
rousing address to his hopelessly outnumbered troops; it was supposed to
be his "St. Crispin's Day" speech, but it's so lame it makes you wondered
how this guy was ever elected _class_ president.  INDEPENDENCE DAY appears
to be the meticulously constructed result of one of those screenwriting
programs which are supposed to give you all the elements for a complete
story...and of course, all those elements come from other films.  You
can't buy inspiration, and INDEPENDENCE DAY is woefully short on anything
that rouses the imagination.  It's a kick-ass trailer that's wagging a
dog.

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
    Some articles about U.S. MARSHALS have been referring to it as a
"sequel" to 1993's THE FUGITIVE; others have employed the more generous
term "follow-up."  But let's cut to the chase here...U.S. MARSHALS is a
spin-off.  In THE FUGITIVE, U.S. Marshal Sam Gerard (Tommy Lee Jones) was
a supporting character in his businesslike pursuit of innocent afoot Dr.
Richard Kimble (Harrison Ford), providing counterpoint to the central
story of Kimble's efforts to find his wife's killer and clear his name.
Five years and a Supporting Actor Oscar later, Jones' Gerard has been
deemed worthy of his own showcase while pursuing another accused murderer
who maintains his innocence, former government agent Mark Sheridan (Wesley
Snipes).  Accompanied by his loyal team of fellow marshals and a
mysterious tag-along Fed named Royce (Robert Downey Jr.), Gerard begins a
man-hunt from the Midwest to Manhattan.
     Before the word "spin-off" and its accompanying visions of "The
Ropers" and "Joanie Loves Chachi" sends you into screaming early-80s
flashbacks, it should be clear that there are far worse supporting
characters around whom to build a story, and far worse actors.  Jones
slips back into Gerard's no-excuses professionalism without missing a
beat, barking orders or wearing a big chicken costume with equal levels of
commitment if that's what it takes to get the job done.  It's not that
Gerard doesn't work at all as a lead character; it's just that he worked
so much better as a supporting character.  Placing Gerard onboard during
the plane crash where Sheridan escapes feels like a forced attempt to turn
him into a super-cop, while motivating him with vengeance late in the film
diminishes a character who's plenty motivated by pride in his work.
Fiddling and fussing with Gerard ignores what was most interesting about
him in THE FUGITIVE:  his simple, uncomplicated, un-tormented intelligence
and resolve as a law enforcement agent.
     Still, he holds up his end of the chase far better than his
adversary.  THE FUGITIVE won over audiences by creating a rooting interest
in Kimble, an Everyman trying to get his life back.  Well, Sheridan is no
Everyman -- he's "former Special Forces, former Black Ops" (and these
days, what action film character worth his salt isn't?).  That should make
him a more challenging assignment for Gerard, except Sheridan never seems
to be thinking hard enough or working hard enough to clear his name.
Every time he turns up in U.S. MARSHALS, it's like the camera has just
stumbled upon him, even as he hopes to just stumble upon whoever set him
up.  With energy diverted to making Gerard a more "well-rounded"
character, Wesley Snipes is left to wander around the film like a
half-forgotten plot device.
     Director Stuart Baird, who created a solid but unspectacular action
effort in EXECUTIVE DECISION, has done a similar job crafting the action
in U.S. MARSHALS.  With the exception of the big spectacular plane crash
to match THE FUGITIVE's big spectacular train crash, he rarely goes out of
his way to top his predecessor; the action simply moves along competently
despite a few sluggish editing choices.  Overall, however, U.S. MARSHALS
just isn't a very smart film.  Grainy flashbacks assume no one in the
audience can remember back half an hour, characters are careless when it's
convenient for them to be and a convoluted tangle of international
espionage keeps distracting the audience from the mano-a-mano which should
drive the story.  Actually, THE FUGITIVE had a few similar problems, but
it got you so involved in the characters that those problems were easy to
overlook.  U.S. MARSHALS is a generic vehicle patterned after a successful
parent, one which doesn't use the characters the way they could be used
best.  That, my friends, is a spin-off.  And one less like "Frasier" than
it is like "AfterM*A*S*H."

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Amy Brenneman, Aaron Eckhart, Catherine Keener, Nastassja
Kinski, Jason Patric, Ben Stiller.
Screenplay:  Neil LaBute.
Producers:  Jason Patric and Steve Golin
Director:  Neil LaBute.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In an era when too many films bludgeon you with exposition,
desperately afraid of leaving anyone behind, Neil LaBute says as much with
what he refuses to tell you as he does with his words.  His blistering
1997 debut IN THE COMPANY OF MEN explored corporate and interpersonal
power games without ever naming the company, its product, or the city in
which it was located.  In so doing, he gave the story an uncomfortable
sense of generic familiarity.  Now comes YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS, a tale
of the complicated social and sexual dynamics between six urbanites:
college drama teacher Jerry (Ben Stiller); his live-in girlfriend Terri
(Catherine Keener); he best friend Barry (Aaron Eckhart); Barry's wife
Mary (Amy Brenneman); their womanizing pal Cary (Jason Patric); and
artist's assistant Cheri (Nastassja Kinski).
     Chuckle at the rhyming name conceit if you will, but that would only
be your most immediate reaction if you saw them in the closing credits.
You'd spend a bit more time puzzling over the realization that not a
single one of those names was ever spoken during the film.  For all the
memorable conversations LaBute gives to his characters, YOUR FRIENDS &
NEIGHBORS is really about failure in communication, a failure at achieving
any semblance of intimacy.  Cary prepares for his sexual encounters by
rehearsing his pillow talk into a tape recorder; Terri berates Jerry for
"breaking [her] concentration" by talking during sex; Barry and Mary find
themselves unable to talk about their sexual dysfunction problems, leading
to Mary seeking comfort from another man.  Despite the friendship or love
which ostensibly is between them, these six people treat each other like
strangers, as though they don't even know each other's names.
     It's a premise just as provocative as that of IN THE COMPANY OF MEN,
but it's not executed with quite the same skill.  IN THE COMPANY OF MEN
was an example of clockwork plotting, leading a viewer to a powerful
conclusion in which everything that preceded it suddenly took on greater
resonance.  YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS is more pure character study, less
concerned with where the characters are going than with where they are.
The few bits of unique composition LaBute includes, specifically a
recurring scene in an art gallery where only the characters change, are
more self-consciously clever than revelatory.  As intriguing and often
darkly comic as YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS may be, it doesn't entirely
satisfy as a narrative.  It's more like a slice of domestic life sliced
off with the razor of LaBute's caustic words -- Altman's SHORT CUTS as
written by David Mamet.
     That still makes YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS a cut above the
competition, particularly as a showcase for its cast.  Jason Patric sinks
his teeth into the showiest role, the baldly self-absorbed Cary,
delivering one monologue about participating in a sexual assault with a
frightening tenderness.  Aaron Eckhart, the callow Chad from IN THE
COMPANY OF MEN, is almost unrecognizable as the paunchy cuckold who
believes that he has been his own most satisfying sexual partner.  The
women fare less well, with Amy Brenneman a puzzlement as the unhappy Mary,
but every one of the six principal performers has at least one gripping
moment.  YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS isn't the icy triumph IN THE COMPANY OF
MEN was, but it continues Neil LaBute's unflinching, unnerving examination
of language as assault, of every human interaction as a power struggle.
He says all the things we're generally unwilling to admit we say...and,
sometimes, the things we don't say.

Title
Review for Circle of Friends (1995)
Starring:  Chris O'Donnell, Minnie Driver, Geraldine O'Rawe,
           Saffron Burrows, Alan Cumming, Colin Firth.
Screenplay:  Andrew Davies.
Director:  Pat O'Connor.
     Maybe it's just a matter of perception, but movies seem to come
out in thematic waves.  1994 was widely noted as the year of the
simpleton, with both dramas (NELL, FORREST GUMP) and comedies
(AIRHEADS, DUMB AND DUMBER) focusing on those with social or
intellectual handicaps.  1995 may well turn out to be the year of
the Celt, with John Sayles' THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH already in
theaters and the highland adventures BRAVEHEART and ROB ROY due this
summer.  Between them comes a small Irish coming-of-age tale called
CIRCLE OF FRIENDS.  Though it occasionally loses sight of its
strongest elements, CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is mostly a warm, charming and
insightful little romance, buoyed by a delightful performance from
fresh face Minnie Driver.
     CIRCLE OF FRIENDS takes place in 1957 Ireland, where lifelong pals
Bernadette "Benny" Hogan (Minnie Driver) and Eve Malone (Geraldine
O'Rawe) are preparing to leave their small home town of Knockglen to
attend the University of Dublin.  There they re-connect with Nan Mahan
(Saffron Burrows), an old schoolmate who had moved years earlier.
Their lessons come both inside the lecture halls--where their
traditional Catholic upbringing and morals are challenged--and
outside.  All three friends seek to reconcile their religious beliefs
with their newfound romances, particularly the repressed Benny, who
falls hard for Jack Foley (Chris O'Donnell), the school's handsome
rugby star.  Nan, meanwhile, has designs on marrying into the wealthy
family of Englishman Simon Westward (Colin Firth).
     Based on a novel by Maeve Binchy, CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is mostly
about the struggle between holiness and hormones, about three young
women whose growing curiosity about sexuality collides with the
Catholic Church's pillars of "guilt and shame ... and fear" as defined
by their anthropology professor.  When Benny is the focal point of
this exploration, CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is an unqualified joy.  She is
the most introverted of the three when the story begins, an
over-protected only child required by her parents to commute to the
university while living at home, and targeted for a business-based
arranged marriage with her father's slimy employee Sean (Alan
Cumming).  However, as her relationship with Jack blossoms, so does
Benny.  Minnie Driver is enchanting as Benny, a shining if
unconventional beauty with a sharp mind and a keen sense of herself.
Her growth is thoroughly convincing because she neither begins nor
ends as an extreme; hers is a slow but noticeable growth from girl
into woman.
     CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is also interesting because the romance
between Benny and Jack develops in an unconventional way.  This is
not some John Hughes-like story where the wallflower suddenly wins
over the socialite at the end, because Jack in his own way is as
confused as Benny is, making their friendship and affection for each
other completely natural.  Chris O'Donnell's Irish accent slips here
and there, but mostly his is a very relaxed and confident
performance as a pretty boy lacking in confidence.  The scenes
between Driver and O'Donnell are the film's highlights, particularly
an uncomfortable little exchange in which they ask each other about
their previous sexual experiences.
     The primary problem with CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is that when the
story isn't focusing on Benny, it is more melodramatic and far less
enjoyable.  Too much time is spent on Nan's carefully planned
attempts to land a rich husband, and the rather melodramatic plot
developments which accompany those attempts work against the simple
believability of Benny's story.  Saffron Burrows is also rather dull
as the beautiful Nan, and for as much time as we spend with her
character, her motivations are never really clear.  Similarly
distracting is the sub-plot concerning Sean (played to low-life
perfection, however, by Alan Cumming) and his wheelings and dealings
with Benny's family.  The conflict between the three friends'
Catholic morality and their earthly desires is much more interesting
than the somewhat contrived external conflicts, and generally more
amusing besides.  CIRCLE OF FRIENDS takes some unfortunate and
unnecessary detours, but Minnie Driver and Chris O'Donnell take the
film's central story and turn it into a real winner.

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Albert Brooks, Debbie Reynolds, Rob Morrow, Lisa Kudrow.
Screenplay:  Albert Brooks and Monica Johnson.
Producers:  Scott Rudin and Herb Nanas.
Director:  Albert Brooks.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  104 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Albert Brooks is a rather odd case as a film-maker.  On the one hand,
he goes years between projects, has loyal and generally intelligent fans
and never has had a really big commercial success.  On the other hand, his
concepts have "pitch-meeting" written all over them.  REAL LIFE was a
parody of verite' documentaries like "An American Family;" LOST IN AMERICA
had yuppies going back to their free-wheeling roots; DEFENDING YOUR LIFE
turned heaven into "The People's Court."  Brooks is like a hybrid of Woody
Allen and Ivan Reitman, a writer/director too smart and eccentric to get
maximum mileage out of his marketing-friendly plots.  MOTHER is a perfect
example of Brooks' nose for high-concept, but for once he doesn't work any
particular magic with it.  Riding on the familiarity of his situations and
a wicked performance by Debbie Reynolds, Brooks turns out an amusing but
uneven domestic comedy.
     Brooks stars as John Henderson, a Los Angeles-based science-fiction
novelist going through his second divorce.  John determines that all of
his failed relationships have had certain elements in common, and that
those elements might be traceable to his upbringing.  In an attempt to
understand what goes wrong in his dealings with women, John heads up to
Northern California to move back in with the first woman in his life:  his
mother, Beatrice (Debbie Reynolds).  John's "experiment" perplexes both
Beatrice and John's successful brother Jeff (Rob Morrow), but John
perseveres anyway, and begins to examine his interactions with Beatrice in
the hope of learning some profound truths before she drives him crazy.
     Much of the appeal of MOTHER -- most of the appeal, to be frank --
comes from the character of Beatrice Henderson, less as created by Brooks
than as realized by Reynolds.  Mother is a sly creature given to subtle
disapproval and passive aggression, and there are moments of grand
humiliation which will inspire winces of recognition.  One running gag has
Mother constantly explaining John's marital woes to complete strangers;
another finds her making off-hand digs at John's vegetarianism.  There are
moments when Brooks verges on condescension towards his older female
characters -- an encounter with neighbors in a grocery store is both funny
and rather embarrassing -- but Debbie Reynolds salvages every one by
giving her line readings an intelligent twist.  Even when Beatrice is
fumbling with technology or circling a parking lot past the one available
space, she never comes off as dim or pathetic.  With a professionalism
showing no signs of rust after a long layoff from screen acting, Reynolds
wrestles a laundry list of motherly quirks into a wonderful character.
     This achievement comes almost in spite of Brooks' script, which has
plenty of funny lines but too little narrative direction.  The goodwill
generated by the main premise carries MOTHER a surprisingly long way, but
Brooks doesn't do all that much with it.  The film is full of situations
with great comic potential, most of which inspire a chuckle and little
more because Brooks prefers wry observation to outrageousness.  One such
opportunity involves John and Beatrice in a Victoria's Secret store after
Beatrice has succeeded yet again in embarrassing John.  It is a scene
which primes you for a huge laugh -- a man, his mother, lingerie...can you
feel the giddy tension rising? -- then dissolves after yet another
good-natured chuckle.  MOTHER is full of moments, like a scene where John
channel-surfs through a succession of info-mercials, where Brooks seems to
be waiting for a punch line to formulate itself instead of attacking the
set-up to provide a payoff.
     MOTHER is almost always an entertaining film, but it is not nearly as
subversive as it could have been, or as FLIRTING WITH DISASTER was
covering similar ground of warped familial relations.  Perhaps the problem
is that the script does not launch itself from full, rich
characterizations.  In fact, as the story unfolds, it seems that Brooks
has constructed his story around psychological case studies rather than
people.  Every time Mother does something exasperating, John deconstructs
it in search of its deeper significance.  The result is frustrating, as
though Brooks were telling jokes then stopping after each one to explain
why it was just as sad as it was funny.  It is one of the characteristics
which makes Brooks unique as a film-maker that he builds his climax around
a moment of insight rather than a wacky car chase, but there has to be a
middle ground.  Debbie Reynolds takes MOTHER's high-concept and gives it
high energy, making it a film anyone who has had a mother could like, but
perhaps only a mother could love.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
     In Richard Donner's CONSPIRACY THEORY, Mel Gibson finds himself with
a classic action-comedy premise on his hands.  Gibson stars as Jerry
Fletcher, a Manhattan cab driver whose hobbies include stalking an
attractive Justice Department prosecutor named Alice Sutton (Julia
Roberts), harboring paranoid delusions about anything and everything, and
committing the aforementioned paranoid delusions to a monthly newsletter
called "Conspiracy Theory."  He's just another crackpot in a city full of
crackpots, until a mysterious doctor (Patrick Stewart) kidnaps him and
wants to know "who else knows what you know."  He manages to escape,
realizing that one of his half-baked theories may actually be true...only
he has no idea which one it might be.
     Given a classic action-comedy premise, Gibson makes what would seem
to be a rational acting choice:  he gives a classic action-comedy
performance.  He informs his captive fares of the menaces of fluoridated
water and the new 100 dollar bill.  He wanders around in a wool cap
muttering paranoid non-sequiturs like Popeye after an "X-Files" bender.
He knocks a Fed over the head, then asks the prone G-Man, "Are you
faking?"  For about half the film, Gibson is an oddball delight.
     What a waste.  By all evidence, no one besides Gibson involved in
CONSPIRACY THEORY realized that it was an action-comedy.  For some
inexplicable reason, Donner and screenwriter Brian Helgeland decide that
CONSPIRACY THEORY is a psychological thriller.  Exit slick, simple plot,
enter a muddle of dark experiments and indecipherable connections between
characters who never even appear in the film.  Exit Alice Sutton the sane
foil to nutty Jerry, enter Alice Sutton the haunted woman with a wounded
psyche of her own in need of nursing back to health.  And exit Jerry the
entertaining crackpot, enter Jerry the tragic basket case who clings to
copies of "The Catcher in the Rye" as though they were life preservers.
     The latter choice is ill-advised bordering on inexcusable.  Like the
professional that he is, Gibson sobs dutifully through the scenes of Jerry
at the end of his tether, spewing forth exposition between squints and
grimaces, but it's clear he'd much rather be goofy than grandiose.  It's
easy to laugh at Jerry when Gibson is playing him for laughs, because
there's no sense that he's genuinely mentally ill; he's just a man who
thinks he knows something who becomes a man who knew too much.  When the
script yanks him into the realm of the deeply disturbed, it yanks the
viewers' feet right out from under them.  Every bit of fun Jerry provides
suddenly becomes vaguely tainted.  You start to feel as though you really
should be feeling sorry for him instead of laughing at him.
     That fun is desperately missed through much of CONSPIRACY THEORY,
because it turns into a very long sit.  As the conspiracies pile up and
the chases become a blur over two hours and fifteen minutes, Gibson's
sharp line readings act like electrical paddles to the film's heart.
After four previous films together, you'd think that Gibson and Donner
could find themselves on the same page.  No such luck.  CONSPIRACY THEORY
is the big action-comedy that wasn't, buoyed by the common sense of a star
who realizes when to ignore the director and give the people what they
want.

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
Starring:  Leonardo DiCaprio, Mark Wahlberg, James Madio, Bruno Kirby,
           Lorraine Bracco, Ernie Hudson, Patrick McGaw.
Screenplay:  Bryan Goluboff.
Director:  Scott Kalvert.
     All feature film directors who cut their teeth on music videos,
please raise your hands.  Thank you for identifying yourselves; now
would you all please go away.  Your influence has to rank as one of
the most annoying trends in filmmaking in the last decade, and it
shows no sign of abating any time soon.  It isn't just the strobe
light quality of your twenty-cuts-per-minute editing, or the numbing
over-use of popular music artists on the soundtracks which makes me
suspicious of any film advertised "featuring the music of..."  No,
it is a kind of cynicism you have perfected, banking on the idea
that no one will care about the lack of a story if you include
enough bells and whistles.  Welcome to the club, Scott Kalvert.
Your adaptation of THE BASKETBALL DIARIES is loud and
one-dimensional, serving only as the vehicle for a performance by
Leonardo DiCaprio that is better in pieces than it is as a whole.
     DiCaprio stars as Jim Carroll, the New York poet/songwriter/
performer on whose autobiographical writings the film is based.  As
the film opens, Jim is a budding high school basketball star given
to petty thievery and getting drunk with buddies Mickey (Mark
Wahlberg), Pedro (James Madio) and Neutron (Patrick McGaw).  One
night, Jim graduates from inhalants to cocaine, and shortly
thereafter to heroin.  Jim's addiction to the drug starts him on a
downhill spiral, as he is kicked off the basketball team by his
coach (Bruno Kirby), kicked out of his home by his mother (Lorraine
Bracco), and drops out of school.  Along with Mickey and Pedro, Jim
becomes a victim of the street, living from fix to fix and sinking
lower and lower.
     THE BASKETBALL DIARIES has been bouncing around as a project
for years, but the sticking point has always been that Jim Carroll
as a character was too unsympathetic and too much a loner.
Screenwriter Bryan Goluboff created the three characters who act as
Carroll's posse, resulting in a Jim Carroll who is just as
unsympathetic, but now with equally unsympathetic friends.  As a
film, THE BASKETBALL DIARIES may be intended primarily as a
cautionary tale, a 100 minute long "Just Say No" public service
announcement, but as drama it is monumentally ineffective because it
is impossible to care much about anyone in the movie.  Jim is sort
of a jerk even before he becomes a junkie, but I suppose that his
pseudo-sensitive poetry and his devotion to his terminally ill
friend are intended to balance that out.  Perhaps we are expected to
see Jim as one of those "good kids who falls in with the wrong
crowd" that every parent believes his or her troubled child to be; I
saw him simply as part of the bad crowd.
     Without a character who changes in any appreciable way, THE
BASKETBALL DIARIES rapidly degenerates into a collection of crimes
committed by Jim and his strung-out cohorts, all choreographed to an
oppressively loud soundtrack.  Director Scott Kalvert doesn't have
many scenes with intrinsic dramatic impact with which to work, so he
substitutes silly slow-motion photography, self-consciously funky
camera angles and choppy editing.  On only one occasion, when a
steady pan around a room where Jim is trying to detox makes it
appear that the walls are closing in, are any of the gimmicks
effective.  Mostly, they just draw attention to how hollow the story
is.
     They also don't allow Leonardo DiCaprio's performance to be as
strong as it could have been.  For every impressive moment, like his
desperate attempt to get his mother to give him money, there is a
scene where Kalvert pulls too much of the focus to his own camera
theatrics.  DiCaprio is most effective when he is playing off other
actors, particularly a fine sequence featuring Ernie Hudson as an
ex-junkie who tries to help Jim straighten out, but Kalvert won't
let character interaction define this story.  He wants to turn
DiCaprio into a rock star, shooting him in dramatic fashion but
denying him the opportunity to do much acting.  At isolate moments,
THE BASKETBALL DIARIES is a fine showcase for DiCaprio's talents.
Far more frequently, it looks like Kalvert is trying to imagine what
a long form Velvet Underground video might have looked like.

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
     If I were writing a film project for myself, I can't say I wouldn't
include a scene where I got to kiss Sophie Marceau.  That's the thing
about a commercial art form like film -- sometimes it's difficult to
separate your emotions from your better judgment.  David Spade has proven
himself extremely funny as a certain kind of character in a certain kind
of context, and he's extremely funny again in LOST & FOUND when he decides
to be that character in those contexts.  Then he starts trying to stretch
in a dozen different directions at once, and the whole thing collapses
into a tries-too-hard comedy without a distinct identity.
     LOST & FOUND casts Spade as Dylan Ramsey, struggling Los Angeles
restaurateur and serial monogamist.  His latest infatuation is his new
neighbor, a French cellist named Lila Dubois (Sophie Marceau) recently
relocated to L. A. to make it as a professional musician.  Lila's only
infatuation, however, appears to be her cairn terrier Jack, a dog with a
propensity for running away.  Dylan, spotting a chance to spend some
quality time with Lila, decides to kidnap Jack himself so he can help Lila
find the missing dog.  Complications ensue when Jack is responsible for
losing a diamond anniversary ring Dylan is holding for his business
partner (Mitchell Whitfield), making it impossible to return the dog.
Further complications ensue when Lila's womanizing ex-fiance (Patrick
Bruel) arrives to challenge Dylan for Lila's affections.
     Leaving aside for a moment the improbable pairing of the elfin Spade
and the porcelain Marceau, LOST & FOUND actually has a number of solid
comic moments, assuming you're in tune with Spade's routine.  He's from
the cynical and sarcastic school, an acid-tongued character who takes
simple lines and twists them into something better with his delivery.
He's also not shy about throwing in sly pop culture references without
providing moutains of context, like asking his frighteningly devoted
personal assistant (Artie Lange) if he ever worked for Selena (the singer
was shot and killed by her former fan club president).  Spade is at his
best when he's smarter than everyone else around him and knows it; even
his killer karaoke rendition of Neil Diamond's "Brother Love's Travelin'
Salvation Show" shows him in winking command of kitsch.
     Much of LOST & FOUND, however, suggests that he either doesn't know
his own strengths or doesn't trust them to carry a film.  In fact, Spade
and his co-writers often seem desperate to make viewers like the film by
association with other films.  The traumas to which Dylan inadvertently
subjects the dog evoke thoughts of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, as does
the musical closing credits sequence.  The presence of corpulent "MadTV"
alum Artie Lange, meanwhile, suggests an attempt to revisit Spade's
successful pairings with the late Chris Farley.  Spade never seems
comfortable with dumbed-down material, but he's present for such comic
delights as a foraging expedition through a mountain of dog droppings and
a poker game with a quartet of elderly women who -- hilariously enough --
have dirty minds, dirty mouths and flatulence problems.  When LOST & FOUND
fumbles to connect with viewers through idiocy rather than Spade's
intelligence, it flounders.
     It also flounders when trying to make Spade a romantic comedy
protagonist.  Director Jeff Pollack tries hard to convince us that Dylan
can be a sensitive guy, but the attempts fall dreadfully flat.  You just
know that every time Dylan has to make nice-nice with Lila he'd rather be
cutting loose with another put-down, which makes Marceau's performance all
the more impressive for making it seem remotely plausible that Lila would
fall for this guy.  LOST & FOUND has its moments when David Spade does
what he does best, or when he brings on Jon Lovitz for a cameo as a "dog
whisperer."  He just wants to be all things to all people, and the writer
in him indulges the performer in him who wants to be the funny sidekick
_and_ the guy who gets the girl.

Title
Review for This Is My Father (1998/I)
     THIS IS MY FATHER is a family affair, and not just because its
subject matter involves family ties.  The writer/director is Paul Quinn,
brother of star Aidan Quinn, both of whom are also brothers to
cinematographer Declan Quinn, with all three acting as executive
producers.  It must have seemed a warm and wonderful thing for the
brothers Quinn to collaborate on a tale of their homeland, a paean to the
importance of finding one's roots combined with the rich atmosphere of
1930s Ireland.  So warm and wonderful was the experience, evidently, that
no one bothered to pay much attention to telling an interesting, coherent
story.  
     THIS IS MY FATHER is a sprawling mess of a film that tries to tell
several stories, each one more irritating than the last.  The narrative
opens in the present day, where Chicago high school teacher Kieran Johnson
(James Caan) is experiencing some sort of existential crisis.  When he
finds a photo and note from a man named Kieran among his invalid mother's
possessions, he connects that malaise to never knowing his father.  With
his vaguely sullen nephew Jack (Jacob Tierney) in tow, Kieran travels to
his mother's Irish hometown, where an elderly resident (Moira Deady) spins
him a tale circa 1939.  In that tale, Kieran's mother Fiona Flynn (Moya
Farrelly) is a high-spirited 17-year-old who catches the eye of shy farmer
Kieran O'Day (Aidan Quinn).  The pairing causes trouble in the town, of
course, as religion and family objections come between Fiona and Kieran
the elder.
     The trouble begins in THIS IS MY FATHER with a present-day prologue
that does a miserable job of setting up the premise.  In fact, the entire
framing story feels like little more than a series of ridiculous
contrivances.  Caan's monotonously shellshocked performance offers little
indication as to what his problem is, how long it's been going on, or how
it's connected to his equally shellshocked sister and ill mother.  The
addition of fatherless young Jack to the travelling party seems intended
to provide a contemporary parallel as his own youthful romance blossoms.
Unfortunately, that romance is so ridiculously apocryphal that it's not
clear until the last ten minutes which of two girls is supposed to be his
own lovely lass.  Every moment set in the present is a wearying bore,
leading this viewer to a stone-faced demand that the flashback sequences
better be worth it.
     They're not.  They're an improvement, to be certain, but there's so
much extraneous business going on that the central romance gets lost.
Strewn throughout the tale are a couple of curses, the omnipresent
institutional frown of the Catholic Church (including a nicely creepy
role for Stephen Rea as a fire-and-brimstone priest), a bit of class
warfare, and a cameo appearance by John Cusack as an American photographer
who lands his plane to play American football with Kieran and Fiona on a
beach, take the picture which will end up in Kieran the younger's hands,
and go away.  The romance itself ultimately makes no sense from Fiona's
side, with nary an attempt to explain why the spunky girl would be charmed
by the socially inept Kieran.  Aidan Quinn fares better as a man-child
unsure how to handle a romantic relationship, but the story places too
much tragic weight on his shoulders.  THIS IS MY FATHER wanders all over
the Emerald Isle in search of a compelling theme or relationship, and
never finds one.
     I suppose the Quinns may have been pointing out the generational
consequences of fatherlessness through Kieran O'Day (orphaned), Fiona
(child of a widow), Kieran Johnson and Jack (both with absentee fathers).
They may have been most interested in re-creating the sights and sounds of
1939 Ireland.  They may have wanted to make their own TITANIC-lite
romantic weeper, complete with Celtic music.  The problem is that you
really can't tell what they wanted to do with any degree of certainty.
THIS IS MY FATHER never pulls its two storylines together in any
believable way, nor manages to make either one gripping on its own terms.
The filming may have served as a pleasant, roots-exploring Quinn family
vacation, but we the viewers are left with the tedium of watching their
home movies.

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tom
Sizemore, Tommy Lee Jones.
Screenplay:  David Veloz, Richard Rutowski and Oliver Stone.
Director:  Oliver Stone.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Few filmmakers in the last twenty years have so consistently had
so little to say as loudly as Oliver Stone.  By pairing up his
single-note self-righteousness with cinematic histrionics, Stone has
managed to create a controversial body of work which dazzles with its
visual inventiveness even as it clubs you insensible with its strident
moralizing.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS is the natural culmination of this
style/message schism, a gutsy and gaudy assault on the senses that
forgets to bring along a single original or insightful thought.  Even
the dynamic performances of Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis can't
salvage this busy mess.
     Harrelson and Lewis star as Mickey and Mallory Knox, a pair of
happy-go-lucky lovebirds who happen to be in the middle of a massive
killing spree when first we meet them.  Both are the result of deeply
dysfunctional families, and with little moral awareness they cut a path
of death through the Southwest.  Eventually they are captured, and
become the objects of a media frenzy and a cult of personality.  Most
eager to cash in on this fame is Wayne Gale (Robert Downey Jr.) the
hose of a tabloid television program called "American Maniacs."  He
sets up a live interview with Mickey on Super Bowl Sunday, destined to
be a ratings bonanza.  The one hitch in the plan is a riot at the
prison, which turns into a nationally televised bloodbath.
     The first hour of NATURAL BORN KILLERS is made watchable only by
the intensity of the two stars.  Woody Harrelson stretches himself as
never before, his simpleton charm connecting to a genuine amorality,
while Juliette Lewis takes her wounded white-trash act from KALIFORNIA
and runs with it, exploding at arbitrary moments into astonishing
ferocity.  But for all their sound and fury, Mickey and Mallory aren't
really characters.  They're ciphers, stick-figure representations of a
societal ill, and ciphers just aren't all that interesting.  The
technical flotsam and jetsam surrounding them can't disguise that fact,
and only the positively inspired segment casting Mallory's home life as
a twisted 1950s sitcom goes anywhere beneath the surface.  As it nears
its mid-point, Mickey and Mallory's road show becomes extremely
tedious.
     The prison-based second half of NATURAL BORN KILLERS is something
of an improvement, if only for the inclusion of some delightfully
bug-eyed acting by Tommy Lee Jones as the prison warden and Tom
Sizemore as the brutal cop who arrested Mickey and Mallory.  As
over-the-top as they are, they seem at least remotely grounded in
humanity, unlike our surreal chauffeurs through the netherworld.
Again, however, Stone falls victim to the One Obvious Idea syndrome.
"Look at what the media has done to us," he says with genuine shock
and, of course, superiority.  "Any of us could become like Mickey and
Mallory."  The problem is that it's the same idea that drove MAN BITES
DOG.  And KALIFORNIA.  And SERIAL MOM, for that matter.  And every one
of those films told the same story better, without pumping steroids
into the production.  There is no satire to the excesses of NATURAL
BORN KILLERS, because Oliver Stone has no idea how to achieve that
level of subtlety.  It's simply a freak show, and Stone comes off
looking like a colossal hypocrite attempting to cash in on exactly what
he spends two hours clucking his tongue at.
     If NATURAL BORN KILLERS had been made by any other director, I
might have given it grudging support simply for having the courage to
run to the limit in its audacious originality.  Unfortunately, I have
lost all patience with Stone's pedantry-as-art approach to filmmaking.
Compare the first hour of NATURAL BORN KILLERS with David Lynch's WILD
AT HEART, which leavened its shock value with a warped sense of humor
and simmering menace, and you'll see that what Stone attempted to
accomplish could have been done right.  Instead, NATURAL BORN KILLERS
is like getting a lecture from your parents during a particularly bad
acid trip.  You just want it to stop.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Billy Dee Williams,
Ian McDiarmid, voices of Anthony Daniels, James Earl Jones, Frank Oz.
Screenplay:  Lawrence Kasdan and George Lucas.
Producer:  Howard Kazanjian.
Director:  Richard Marquand.
MPAA Rating:  PG (violence)
Running Time:  130 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw
     I'll admit that I was surprised when I heard of plans for the Special
Edition of STAR WARS, and not because I thought of the original film as
inviolate.  I just wasn't sure why George Lucas would feel the need to
make STAR WARS "the way (he) really wanted to make it," since it seemed as
though he had already done it.  It was called RETURN OF THE JEDI.  Yes, I
know Lucas didn't direct JEDI -- the way Steven Spielberg didn't direct
POLTERGEIST -- but it was clearly an amped-up version of the original
film, with all the things Lucas couldn't do the first time around.  The
climactic dog-fight was more complex, the destruction of the Death Star
more spectacular...even Jabba the Hutt finally made it on-screen.  After
the moody second act of THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, RETURN OF THE JEDI was a
return to the playful adventure of STAR WARS, only with six years' worth
of ancillary revenue burning a hole in Lucas' pocket.
     Unfortunately, RETURN OF THE JEDI turned out to be an example of what
happened when film-makers became conscious of what ancillary revenue could
be.  The introduction of the cuddly, teddy-bear primitives called the
Ewoks has long been reviled by STAR WARS aficionados as an obvious bow to
commercial interests, but they were only the most obvious example.  Entire
sets in JEDI seemed to have been designed around features for an action
play-set -- Jabba's palace with trap door and Rancor cage!  Endor forest
with catapult launcher! -- and many moments of comic relief were so
utterly goofy that it was had to imagine they weren't designed for an
audience under 12.  In my comments on the STAR WARS: SPECIAL EDITION, I
noted that the original film never could have worked if Lucas had been
aware of the merchandising potential, because its innocence would have
been compromised.  RETURN OF THE JEDI, I think, is proof of that.  STAR
WARS was made for the kid in all of us; JEDI was made for kids.
     That doesn't make JEDI a bad film; it would take a concerted effort
for one mediocre film to spoil the goodwill of two great ones.  JEDI 
provides a necessary sense of resolution with the rescue of Han Solo from
Jabba the Hutt, as well as answers to questions about the Skywalker family
tree.  Lawrence Kasdan and George Lucas' script does take advantage of our
familiarity with the characters, playing with C-3PO's sense of dignity and
propriety when Luke levitates him in a show of "god-like" power to
intimidate the Ewoks, and making Chewbacca's reunion with the thawed-out
Han Solo a reunion between a boy and his loyal puppy.  The speeder bike
chase on Endor is tremendously impressive, a dizzying piece of action
film-making which still out-classes most of the attempts at chases scenes
you'll see in contemporary films.  There are plenty of satisfying moments
in RETURN OF THE JEDI, even if most of them come from the pleasure of
visiting once again with old friends.
     If there is anything the SPECIAL EDITION emphasizes, however, it is
that JEDI is much longer than it needs to be.  Among the new scenes are a
re-tooled version of the musical number performed by Sy Snootles in
Jabba's lair -- the once-puppeteered Snootles is now a computer-generated
Snootles -- is a ridiculous piece of technical flash which looks like it
belongs in a 3-D feature at Disneyland.  Worse still, it slows down a film
which got repetitive even in its original incarnation.  The simultaneous
battles on the surface of Endor's moon and in the sky above go on for an
awfully long time, all the while inter-cut with the taunting of the
Emperor (Ian McDiarmid) as he tries to woo Luke to the Dark Side of the
Force.  It is those scenes on the Death Star which grow particularly
insufferable; if I were Luke, and I knew all it took was going over to the
Dark Side to get the Emperor to shut up his incessant yammering...well,
just call me Darth Vader Jr.  By the time Vader has his moment of
redemption, revealing himself to be something resembling Ray Milland in
pancake makeup, the effect is undercut by a desire just to see the whole
thing wrapped up already.
     There is one very effective addition to this SPECIAL EDITION, an
extension of the epilogue which shows celebration on several different
worlds after the defeat of the Empire in addition to the celebration in
the Ewok village.  When one of those scenes shows a massive statue being
toppled, it's hard not to think of Lucas turning the STAR WARS trilogy
into a grand metaphor for the defeat of Communism, with the galaxy made
safe once again for private enterprise.  The film industry was certainly
made safe for private enterprise after the massive success of the STAR
WARS films.  RETURN OF THE JEDI might have been the first glimpse at the
down-side of that victory.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
FREQUENCY
(New Line)
Starring:  Dennis Quaid, Jim Caviezel, Shawn Doyle, Elizabeth Mitchell,
Andre Braugher, Noah Emmerich.
Screenplay:  Toby Emmerich.
Producers:  Bill Carraro & Toby Emmerich and Hawk Koch & Gregory Hoblit.
Director:  Gregory Hoblit.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Just when I thought I'd seen every possible spin on the serial killer
thriller, here comes FREQUENCY to show that there is something new under
the sun. The serial killer story in this case is wrapped up in a fantasy
story about a troubled cop named John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel), whose
entire life has been affected by the death of his firefighter dad Frank
(Dennis Quaid) 30 years earlier. But strange atmospheric phenomena are
afoot, and when John pulls out his dad's old ham radio, he manages to pull
in none other than dad himself, chatting from 30 years in the past. John
sees this as an opportunity not just to get to know Frank, but to save his
life with his foreknowledge as well. Unfortunately, one piece of changed
history has a domino effect on other events, including the death of John's
mother Julia (Elizabeth Mitchell) at the hands of -- that's right -- a
serial killer.
     Time-travel tales are inevitably head-scratching affairs if you
ponder them for too long, and FREQUENCY is no exception. It posits a
strange side effect of the father-son communication -- when John
successfully prevents Frank from dying as he had in _his_ past, he is left
the only one who remembers a world in which Frank died in 1969, though he
also finds himself newly-flooded with memories of 30 years of life with
dad. It's an utterly preposterous conceit, of course, but it actually
works. Caviezel never once smirks at the material, resulting in a
performance full of convincingly pent-up emotion. Director Gregory
Hoblit's staging of John's new montage of memory is surprisingly
affecting; Caviezel's work as a man re-discovering his father is better
than you have any reason to expect in a genre film.
     Now, did I mention that this all turns into a serial killer thriller
at some point? Yes, it is soon discovered that saving Frank's life has set
in motion events that will cost Julia hers. Father and son team up across
time to send Frank on a search for the rogue cop (Shawn Doyle) responsible
for a series of murders. Hoblit and screenwriter Toby Emmerich might have
chosen to explore the ramifications of continuing to mess with history,
but that would be a bit too philosophically deep. They're content to set
up a series of neat sequences that show the instantaneous impact of one
decision 30 years earlier on the world of the present. FREQUENCY is a
genuinely snappy piece of film-making, far and away the liveliest work
from Hoblit (who got bogged down in the grim subject matter of PRIMAL FEAR
and FALLEN), even when you're inspired to a round of "yeah, right."
     There's no question that much of FREQUENCY is smart and entertaining,
but it's also a fragmented piece of work. For the first half of the film,
it's a fantasy with a strong human side, anchored by an unconventional but
convincing father-son relationship. In the second hour, it shifts
dramatically to a creep-show, with the sinister killer popping up at
terribly inconvenient times. That makes for some crowd-pleasing chases and
struggles, but a terribly rote plot progression. Though there are still
some well-crafted scenes -- Andre Braugher gets a particularly good one as
a cop friend of Frank's watching a World Series prediction come true --
character ceases to matter for all practical purposes. 
     It suddenly matters again in FREQUENCY's achingly sentimental
denouement, which gets all FIELD OF DREAMS on us by tying father-son
connections to baseball. The strange thing is that it probably wouldn't
have felt nearly as overwrought if FREQUENCY had stuck with the tone of
its first half. The shift from character piece to thriller is jarring
enough; the attempt to shift back to character piece feels like an 
unearned piece of manipulation. It's easy to recommend FREQUENCY for the
things it does right in each of its incarnations, but the recommendation
can't be too enthusiastic when those incarnations are so incongruous. I
think there's a reason we've never seen this sort of serial killer
thriller before: It's awfully hard to make a serial killer thriller a
tear-jerker as well.

Title
Review for Boys on the Side (1995)
Starring:  Whoopi Goldberg, Mary-Louise Parker, Drew Barrymore.
Screenplay:  Don Roos.
Director:  Herbert Ross.
     I have nothing against that ever-growing sub-genre of American
filmmaking known as the "chick flick;" however, I do have a problem
with the idea that women will flock to any slapdash attempt at a sob
story, any muddled mess which happens to include female friends,
mothers and daughters and truckloads of tragedy.  Hollywood knows a
lot about how to market films to women, but it has done a pretty
miserable job of making them.  Fortunately, BOYS ON THE SIDE is that
rare creation, an emotional film that actually takes the time to
develop characters, although it goes a bit overboard in its third
act.
     BOYS ON THE SIDE begins in New York, where night club singer
Jane DeLuca (Whoopi Goldberg) is experiencing something of a career
downturn.  She decides to try her luck in Los Angeles, and looks for
someone to share a ride.  She finds Robin Nickerson (Mary-Louise
Parker), a prim real estate agent looking for a change of scenery,
and the very odd couple begins their cross-country trek.  Along the
way they are joined by Jane's friend Holly (Drew Barrymore), who is
fleeing from an abusive relationship, and the three women take to
the road.  But circumstances force them to stop before L.A., and the
relationships between the three friends are complicated by love,
illness, pregnancy and a murder trial.
     The first half of BOYS ON THE SIDE is surprisingly funny and
effective, thanks largely to three winning performances by Goldberg,
Parker and Barrymore.  Goldberg has coasted quite a bit lately,
playing the same hipper-than-thou character with a perpetual furrow
in her brow as she deals with dopey white folks, but she is quite
good here.  Her Jane is more layered, a lesbian with an unfortunate
habit of falling for straight women, and Goldberg is solid in a more
emotional role than any she has tackled since THE COLOR PURPLE.
Parker is a more subtle actress, and she has to be in a role that
easily could have become a fussy stereotype; instead, Robin is an
extremely sympathetic and appealing character.  But it is Drew
Barrymore who steals every scene she is in as the hopelessly
flirtatious Holly.  There is a positively infectious energy in her
performance, and the scene in which the three women subdue her drug
dealing boyfriend includes several hilarious highlights.
     BOYS ON THE SIDE is very funny, but there is more to it than
that.  Director Herbert Ross (who previously covered similar ground
in STEEL MAGNOLIAS) makes some interesting choices which add real
depth to the characters and play against expectations.  In one early
scene, Robin sprays disinfectant on Jane's headphones before using
them, and Goldberg gives us a "you've got to be kidding" reaction
shot.  But that moment takes on a different resonance when it is
revealed that Robin has AIDS, and might be taking basic precautions.
Similarly, it is a surprise when Jane refuses to hold Robin's hand
after learning of her illness, since we expect a nearly divine level
of understanding from gay characters, but that moment is complicated
by the realization that Jane might be falling for Robin, and that
pulling away is just a way of expressing her fear of those emotions.
     There are numerous surprises like that, both funny and
touching, throughout the first half of BOYS ON THE SIDE, but the
second half is much more uneven.  Once the women stop in Tuscon,
much of the film's energy stops with them, and humor inevitably
gives way to bathos.  The relationship between Holly and an earnest
young cop (Matthew McConaughey) is fairly silly, and the
relationship between Robin and a bartender (James Remar) is hampered
by his complete blandness as a character.  Most frustrating is a
murder sub-plot, which is largely unnecessary and symptomatic of
screenwriter Don Roos' tendency to pile far too much into far too
little time.  This is a film about the friendships between these
three women, and it seriously falters when those friendships are not
the focus of the story.  When they are the focus, BOYS ON THE SIDE
does exactly what it sets out to do:  it makes you laugh, it makes
you sad, and it makes you care.

Title
Review for Matilda (1996)
Starring:  Mara Wilson, Danny DeVito, Rhea Perlman, Embeth Davidtz, Pam
Ferris.
Screenplay:  Nicholas Kazan, Robin Swicord.
Director:  Danny DeVito.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Every once in a while, when an exceptional family film comes along, I
will attempt to champion it by challenging parents to put their money 
where their mouths have been; with all the hubbub over the lack of films
suitable for children, it is remarkable how many non-Disney films
disappear in a couple of weeks.  Now I see that in so doing, I have
unfairly ghettoized these films.  So I am issuing my challenge not just to
parents, but to anyone who wants to support smart, funny, energetic
film-making:  see MATILDA.  See it in a theater, rather than shrugging and
waiting for it on video.  See the best film I have seen in 1996.  Not the
best children's film...the best film.  Period.
     Based on a story by Roald Dahl, it tells of young Matilda Wormwood
(Mara Wilson), an extraordinarily bright girl whose great misfortune it is
to have a pair of deeply stupid parents:  Harry (Danny DeVito), a crooked
used car salesman; and Zinnia (Rhea Perlman), a simple-minded bingo
addict.  The Wormwoods barely notice Matilda exists, and when they do, it
is only to scold her for spending too much time reading books.  When they
finally do send her to school, it is to Crunchem Hall, a bleak place run
by cruel, child-hating Miss Agatha Trunchbull (Pam Ferris).  But things
begin to look up for Matilda when she discovers a sympathetic teacher,
Miss Honey (Embeth Davidtz), who nurtures her natural inquisitiveness.
Matilda also discovers another special talent -- the ability to move
things with her mind -- which allows her to help herself and Miss Honey to
overcome Miss Trunchbull's cruelty.
     It was this spring's JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH which inspired me to
note that the best and most lasting tales for children tended to have more
than a hint of darkness to them, and you can bet that the Roald Dahl
responsible for the gleeful ghoulishness of JAMES and WILLY WONKA AND THE
CHOCOLATE FACTORY has more of the same in store with MATILDA.  And just as
JAMES benefited from the dark sensibilities of Henry Selick and Tim
Burton, MATILDA soars on the cock-eyed direction of Danny DeVito.  DeVito
made black humor a key element in THROW MOMMA FROM THE TRAIN and THE WAR
OF THE ROSES, and he contributes some memorable images.  In one scene, an
unfortunate girl is made an example of by Miss Trunchbull when she is
picked up by her pig-tails and flung through the air like a throwing
hammer; later, an overweight boy is forced to eat an entire massive cake
after he is caught stealing a dessert.  MATILDA is just twisted enough to
be a perfect fairy tale.
     It is also characteristic of the best children's tales that they
manage to teach lessons in such a way that children almost don't realize
that they are learning them.  There is a hilarious moment when Matilda's
television-addicted father snatches away the book she is reading (in a
wicked joke, he thinks _Moby Dick_ is pornographic) and forces her to
watch an inane game show (hosted by Jon Lovitz) in which contestants are
smeared with adhesive and placed in a booth filled with cash blowing
around.  MATILDA is a story which promotes the value of intellectual
curiosity over passive entertainment, and it does so while poking holes in
that most frustrating of notions for a child -- that because "I'm big and
you're little, I'm right and you're wrong."  More specifically, it has as
its heroine an intelligent, self-confident girl who struggles successfully
against other people's notions of how she should behave.  It is no
coincidence that MATILDA was co-written by Robin Swicord, who contributed
the superb recent adaptation of LITTLE WOMEN.
     Finally, MATILDA has that quality I find rarest and most treasured in
family entertainment:  it is family entertainment in the truest sense of
the word.  DeVito knows enough to make MATILDA fast-paced and appealing to
children, taking a deliciously nasty performance by Pam Ferris as Miss
Trunchbull and making it the focal point of some priceless physical
comedy, including a great chase through her dark house.  The child actors
are winning but never obnoxiously adorable, with Mara Wilson making
Matilda a clever and extremely likeable character.  But there are also
many, many delights for adults, including my favorite scene in which
Matilda uses her powers to frighten Miss Trunchbull by having chalk write
on a chalkboard by itself while Matilda's classmates recite in sing-song
fashion; there is also a deadpan cameo by Paul Reubens as an FBI agent
staking out Matilda's father.  I can't imagine anyone of any age leaving
Matilda feeling as though his or her intelligence had been insulted.
     MATILDA is a film which left me glowing with good feeling.  I will
see it again, and years from now I will watch it with my children.  And
now I will stop, because somewhere near you MATILDA is about to begin, and
there is a seat in that theater you should be in, if you have a child or
ever were a child.

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
Starring:  Toni Collette, Bill Hunter, Rachel Griffiths,
           Daniel LaPaine, Jeanie Drynan, Sophie Lee.
Screenplay/Director:  P. J. Hogan.
     MURIEL'S WEDDING presents me with a critical poser:  what do
you do with a movie when there was only one thing about a movie that
you liked, but you liked that one thing a *lot*?  I mean, *really*
liked it a lot.  MURIEL'S WEDDING is a truly disjointed effort,
bouncing from slapstick comedy to depressing domestic drama, but its
lead character is a marvelous creation, played with love and
sensitivity by Toni Collette.  I was always interested in what might
happen to her, but I was frequently disappointed by what happened
around her.  Does that one great piece outweigh all the other less
effective pieces?  In a word, yes...but just barely.
     Toni Collette plays Muriel Heslop, a homely, unemployed
22-year-old living in the seaside Australian community of Porpoise
Spit.  Muriel is obsessed with the idea of being married, convinced
that it will separate her from her layabout family and mean that she
has become a success.  She sees an opportunity in a blank check, and
steals several thousand dollars from her father (Bill Hunter), a
pompous local politician, to take a luxurious island holiday.  There
Muriel runs into Rhonda (Rachel Griffiths), an old schoolmate with a
zest for life.  The two become fast friends, and move to Sydney
together, but marriage is still foremost in Muriel's mind.  When an
opportunity does present itself, it forces Muriel to consider her
priorities carefully.
     Here is what is right with MURIEL'S WEDDING:  Toni Collette,
who walks the fine line between making Muriel sympathetic and
making her pathetic.  Collette gained over 40 pounds to play the
dumpy Muriel, but to her eternal credit she plays against Muriel's
physical appearance, letting the audience see the swan behind the
ugly duckling.  She does the most with her expressive mouth, as her
bouts of giddiness cause her to burst into a huge toothy smile,
frequently with her tongue stuck out through them.  Her performance
is by turns hilarious (her hysterical reaction to a date attempting
to remove her clothes) and touching (her wistful sing-alongs to
ABBA's "Dancing Queen").  It is a marvelous piece of work, made all
the more impressive because she never tries to inject any irony into
Muriel's decidedly un-liberated dreams.
     Here is what is wrong with MURIEL'S WEDDING:  Muriel is stuck
in an episodic story which doesn't add up to all that much.  The
sequences at the Hibiscus Island resort are pure raucous comedy,
highlighted by Collette and Rachel Griffiths (a dead ringer for
Juliette Lewis as Rhonda) doing a lip-synch performance of ABBA's
"Waterloo."  Then the switch to Sydney brings a tragic turn which
seems really inappropriate, followed by a bride-for-hire section
again focused on comedy.  Finally, there is yet another tragedy, and
a decision by Muriel for which the justification doesn't seem quite
right.  It is often difficult to get caught up in Muriel's story,
because it takes so many detours.
     She is also surrounded by characters who are mostly paper-thin by
comparison.  Griffiths has some nice moments as the brassy Rhonda, and
Jeanie Dryden has a couple of heart-breaking scenes as Muriel's
beaten-down-by-life mother.  But Bill Hunter is merely loud and
slightly oily as Muriel's father, and Sophie Lee leads a group of
stereotypically catty Barbie dolls who snub Muriel.  There is also a
strange bit by Matt Day as the young man who pines for Muriel then
disappears from the story.  I can understand the attraction--Muriel is
a splendidly crafted character, acted with a grace that made me care
about her life.  She deserved something more cohesive than this jittery
wedding.

Title
Review for Public Access (1993)
Starring:  Ron Marquette, Dina Brooks, Charles Kavanaugh.
Screenplay:  Chris McQuarrie, Bryan Singer and Michael Feit Dougan.
Director:  Bryan Singer.
     Life in the middle-American town of Brewster will never be the
same after the arrival of drifter Whiley Pritcher (Ron Marquette) in
PUBLIC ACCESS, the Grand Jury Prize Winner at this year's Sundance
Film Festival.  Whiley is a charming, affable fellow who immediately
makes (air)waves when he begins a call-in program on the local public
access cable station.  His one and only question:  what's wrong with
Brewster?  The citizens at first seem unwilling or unable to find any
flaws in their town, but eventually callers begin expressing their
anger at neighbors, teenagers and even Brewster's popular mayor Tom
Breyer (Charles Kavanaugh).  Whiley also attracts the interest of
Rachel (Dina Brooks), a shy young librarian.  As tensions rise in the
town, Whiley begins working towards fulfilling his ultimate purpose in
Brewster.
     PUBLIC ACCESS is an ambitious, stylish film that manages to find
itself both inches from brilliance and inches from complete
impenitrability.  It's a dark tale of family values gone awry, and
manages to establish an effective tone of simmering menace.  The
problems really begin when that simmer should be turning into a boil.
The first half of PUBLIC ACCESS is thoroughly intriguing, introducing
Whiley in a manner that makes it clear that something about him is not
quite right, but keeps you guessing as to what exactly it is.  Ron
Marquette, a dead ringer for Harry Connick Jr., plays Whiley as a
telegenic Mr. Rogers, a smiling snake oil salesman with a comforting
tone who has discovered the perfect medium for getting what he wants.
As long as Whiley remains a mystery, PUBLIC ACCESS is a gripping
drama.  However, the resolution leaves mutliple threads hanging and
inspires a great deal of head scratching.  What were Whiley's
motivations, or do they even matter?  Has he succeeded or failed in
what he set out to do in Brewster?  A climactic confrontation between
Whiley and a vocal critic was disappointingly short on tension, and the
pivotal montage which brings the film to a close seems so deliberately
opaque that it's just off-putting.
     Viewers of PUBLIC ACCESS will likely find immediate similarities
to David Lynch's BLUE VELVET.  Director and co-writer Bryan Singer
seems not at all shy about paying homage to influences like Lynch, Alan
Parker and the Coen brothers.  Unfortunately, he never quite combines
all these elements into a style all his own.  The interjection of a
couple of eccentric public access programs is jarring, and leads the
viewer to believe that PUBLIC ACCESS is going to be *about* cable
television, which it absolutely is not.  Nothing in Singer's direction
really stands out except lingering shots of a ceiling fan and a glass
of water which scream "meaningful."  The technical credits are superb,
particularly the evocative score and taut editing, both by San Jose
native John Ottman.  Singer just doesn't deliver when he really needs
to.
     I do wish to single out Ron Marquette's performance as a creepy
triumph.  He provides a solid counterpoint to the naturalistic
performances of the townspeople, and his rendering of Whiley Pritcher
almost sells PUBLIC ACCESS singlehandedly.  When it comes right down to
it, though, ACCESS isn't accessible enough, and it doesn't sprint to
the finish.

Title
Review for Greedy (1994)
Starring:  Michael J. Fox, Kirk Douglas, Nancy Travis, Olivia D'Abo,
Phil Hartman, Ed Begley Jr., Jere Burns.
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel.
Director:  Jonathan Lynn.
     I prefer my comedy with an edge.  THE WAR OF THE ROSES, RUTHLESS
PEOPLE, and TV's "The Simpsons" show that sometimes nothing is funnier
than human nature at its nastiest.  It is also the case that few comedy
conventions irritate me more than starting with an edge and
progressively dulling it with warm-fuzziness.  So here comes GREEDY, a
promising enough comedy about avaricious relatives, but that fact that
it was written by the popular team of Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel
(SPLASH, PARENTHOOD, CITY SLICKERS) should have clued me in that it
wouldn't go for the jugular.  There are fewer big laughs than in any of
those films, as a largely uninteresting cast tries gamely to support a
limp story.
     GREEDY describes most members of the McTeague family, who want to
get their hands on the millions of scrap metal king Joe McTeague (Kirk
Douglas).  Nephews Frank (Phil Hartman), Carl (Ed Begley Jr.) and Glen
(Jere Burns) and their families are among those who make weekly trips
to Uncle Joe's mansion, kissing up to the sickly old man and tearing
each other down in an attempt to become his sole heir.  There is a new
obstacle on their latest visit:  Molly (Olivia D'Abo), a nubile young
pizza delivery girl who has become Uncle Joe's live-in "nurse."
Desperate to avoid being aced out, the family locates favorite nephew
Danny (Michael J. Fox), an earnest professional bowler who avoids the
family and its in-fighting.  They promise Danny a cut of the
inheritance of he can get rid of Molly, a deal which initially disgusts
Danny.  However, he gradually gets sucked in to the greedy McTeague
world, much to the consternation of girlfriend Robin (Nancy Travis).
     When it did work, GREEDY let its nasty characters be their
nastiest.  The opening fifteen minutes, focusing on one of the McTeague
family's Saturday gatherings, offered a lot of laughs as they took
turns revealing embarrassing secrets about each other to Uncle Joe.
Unfortunately, none of the laughs are as big as they could have been,
and that's primarily because Ganz and Mandel don't provide their
characters with distinct personalities, except for Siobhan Fallon's
horrendously overboard drunk as Hartman's wife.  They're all sort of
interchangeably grasping, and Hartman, Begley and Burns don't have
enough manic energy on their own.  While several of the lines are
funny, none of the characters is funny enough to give them a big push.
     After that early scene, GREEDY loses almost all of the bite it
might have had.  Michael J. Fox does a fine job of setting up the
insecurity which will make Danny vulnerable to the influence of his
family, but he isn't given the chance to sink his teeth into his own
greed.  Either director Jonathan Lynn or Fox himself wouldn't
completely allow Danny to get nasty.  The result is that nothing he
does seems particularly deserving of rebuke; when he tells his
distraught girlfriend that he's just acting in Uncle Joe's best
interest, I was willing to give him the benefit of the doubt.
Similarly, Olivia D'Abo is supposed to play a corrupted innocent, but
it's hard to recognize where she changes because her character is never
defined from the outset.  Apparently changing from a bikini to a
macrame body suit is supposed to signal moral degredation.  GREEDY
wimps out when it should be emphasizing lust for money is damaging its
characters.
     A simpler and more relevant criticism of GREEDY is that it really
doesn't do anything new.  Greedy relatives and fights for an
inheritance are film staples, and most previous attempts have handled
the subject better.  By its conclusion, GREEDY had become sort of a
recycled WILLY WONKA AND THE CHOCOLATE FACTORY, as Michael J. Fox has
to decide what to do with his particular Everlasting Gobstopper.
GREEDY does offer a few giggles, but they get buried under a fairly
self-evident message and a slow, unoriginal story.  GREEDY is like a
bottle of acid diluted in far too much water:  it's just not corrosive
enough.

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
EVENT HORIZON
(Paramount)
Starring:  Laurence Fishburne, Sam Neill, Kathleen Quinlan, Joely
Richardson, Richard T. Jones.
Screenplay:  Philip Eisner.
Producers:  Jeremy Bolt, Lawrence Gordon and Lloyd Levin.
Director:  Paul Anderson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, gore, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  95 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Give this to the makers of EVENT HORIZON:  as wholesale rip-offs of
ALIEN go, this one is remarkably thorough.  With the assistance of copious
captions, we learn that it involves a small space ship crew, headed by
laconic Captain Joe Miller (Laurence Fishburne), which is sent on a
somewhat mysterious search-and-rescue operation.  When one advance team
member returns to the ship in a catatonic state, the rest of the crew
begins worrying...and, shortly thereafter, begins dying.  To make matters
worse, one member of the crew may be working for the other side.  The only
chance for the surviving member(s) of the crew is to blow up one part of
the ship while using the rest as an escape pod, going into hyper-sleep and
waiting for a rescue.  Only a computer named Mother and a cat named Jonesy
are missing to complete the picture
     The original twist to that familiar scenario -- and where EVENT
HORIZON is concerned, "original" is used advisedly -- is that the object
of the search and rescue operation is the Event Horizon, a prototype
spacecraft created by Dr. William Weir (Sam Neill) with the ability to
bend space-time for the purpose of deep-space travel.  Unfortunately,
instead of travelling to another galaxy, the Event Horizon appears to have
travelled to another dimension, one inhabited by a chaotic life force
which drives people mad with intense, hallucinatory visions.  In that
sense, the malevolent entity a bit more efficient than the predatory
stowaway of ALIEN -- instead of tearing out your organs, it makes you want
to tear them out yourself, or tear out those of your fellow crew members.
     EVENT HORIZON, on the other hand, is not nearly so efficient.  ALIEN
grabbed its viewers with one graphic, horrific moment and a whole lot of
creepy atmosphers; EVENT HORIZON counters with a little creepy atmosphere
and a whole lot of graphic, horrific moments.  Not a single violent image
is left to the imagination, not when special effects can render a
character coughing up blood in zero gravity, or a body ripped open and
hung like a side of beef.  There are certainly a few scares in EVENT
HORIZON, but director Paul Anderson (MORTAL KOMBAT) rarely earns them.
Give me a roll of film, a dark room, a scary mask and a burst of dissonant
strings, and even I could get an audience to jump every time.  EVENT
HORIZON doesn't build a sense of dread, because it's easier to settle for
shock and disgust.
     The truly disappointing thing about Philip Eisner's script is that,
for a while, it looks like it's headed somewhere interesting.  The idea of
characters defeated by their own demons is infinitely more compelling than
characters defeated by real demons, which gives EVENT HROIZON a creepy
tension while there's still some mystery about what's going on.  But
Eisner doesn't follow through on enough of his characters' dark secrets;
whenever someone doesn't have a closeted skeleton to rattle, he just
throws a bucket of blood at them.  Even when he does follow up on a
character's motivations, they end up making very little sense.  Weir's
motivations in particular -- which initially seem perfectly logical --
disintegrate near the film's climax, right about the time EVENT HORIZON
becomes a parade of explosions, slow-motion and lovingly photographed
corpses.
     EVENT HORIZON boasts some genuinely impressive technical credits,
including imaginative production design by Joseph Bennett, but that
doesn't explain what a cast this talented saw in this project.  ALIEN was
the kind of memorable film which launched careers.  EVENT HORIZON is the
kind of re-cycled nonsense which can end careers.  Remember, in space, no
one can hear you scream, but in a movie theater, you can hear everyone
groan.

Title
Review for Proof of Life (2000)
PROOF OF LIFE
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Meg Ryan, Russell Crowe, David Morse, Pamela Reed, David
Caruso, Gottfried John.
Screenplay:  Tony Gilroy, inspired by the Vanity Fair article "Adventures
in the Ransom Trade" by William Prochnau and by the book _Long March to
Freedom_ by Thomas Hargrove.
Producers:  Taylor Hackford and Charles Mulvehill.
Director:  Taylor Hackford.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  134 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Be prepared to be sorely disappointed if you go to PROOF OF LIFE
expecting to see the "Sparks A-Flyin' Between Meg and Russell Show." As
has been well-reported by entertainment news outlets, co-stars Meg Ryan
and Russell Crowe got a little thing going while filming PROOF OF LIFE.
It's the kind of story that provides publicity a studio just can't buy,
with voyeuristic viewers potentially taking the opportunity to watch a
filmed record of two attractive stars developing a major league case of
the hots for one another.
     As it happens, the relationship between Ryan and Crowe's characters
is the worst reason to see PROOF OF LIFE. In fact, the filmmakers seem to
do everything possible to make that relationship utterly inconsequential.
Ryan plays Alice Bowman, a woman whose husband (David Morse) is working on
a dam project for an American oil company in the fictional South American
country of Tecala. One day, Peter is kidnapped by a band of drug-producing
Marxist rebels, with the expectation that the oil company will pay a hefty
ransom. Enter Terry Thorne (Crowe), a kidnap and ransom consultant for the
oil company's insurer. He's ready to step in and run the negotiations
until the oil company confesses that financial woes and an imminent merger
deal will keep Terry off the case. But Terry ultimately decides to go
freelance, working closely with Alice to free Peter while Peter himself
faces daily challenges to body and mind.
     The reason Terry decides to go freelance has something to do with his
own major league case of the hots, only there's not much substance to that
particular sub-plot. There are two major co-conspirators in the failure of
PROOF OF LIFE's romantic angle: the timidity of director Taylor Hackford,
and the casting of Meg Ryan. The script by Tony Gilroy does a fine job of
setting up cracks in the Bowman's marriage, the kind that could easily
lead to some straying during a pressure-packed situation. But PROOF OF
LIFE only flirts with the bond forged between Alice and Terry, and
chickens out of throwing them into a full-blown affair (a sex scene shot
for the film was cut from the final version, apparently out of concern
that it would be caught up in the real-life story). Ryan, meanwhile, never
develops into a complete character, with a back story that's made up of
script assertions rather than performance. In a role like this, opposite a
dynamic screen actor like Crowe, it becomes obvious that Meg Ryan is a
Movie Star in a role that demands an actor.
     While PROOF OF LIFE's major selling point sits there limply in the
center of the film, there's plenty of great stuff going on around the
perimeter. Morse, a superb character actor who seems only to be getting
better with age, gets some wonderful scenes as he tries to cope with his
situation. His battles of will with one edgy rebel provide the film's most
tension-packed moments, and his strange friendship with a slightly mad
fellow hostage (Gottfried John) gives depth to his fear of what might
happen to him. There's more great material surrounding the details of
Terry's profession, including his friendship with a colleague played by
David Caruso (in a performance so vivid it just makes you want to cry over
his career choices). And there's Crowe himself, whose charisma boosts the
intensity of every scene he's in. As a film about the psychological
pressures of being a hostage, PROOF OF LIFE scores. As a film about the
psychological pressures of retrieving a hostage, PROOF OF LIFE scores.
     And as a film about the psychological pressures of being a hostage's
wife considering a little hanky-panky with the guy who's trying to
retrieve your husband, it whiffs. It may seem unfair to drag the actors'
personal lives into an evaluation of a film, but it's obvious from what's
not on the screen that the film itself was ultimately compromised by those
personal lives. PROOF OF LIFE had to give the on-screen relationship heat
in order to give meaning to the Bowmans' marital strife and to the quiet
heart-to-hearts between Alice and Terry. It doesn't. The genuine shame is
that it's such a strong piece of work in virtually every other respect
that it's still worth watching. PROOF OF LIFE will be a more enjoyable
experience for you if you go in expecting a thriller rather than an
incendiary screen romance -- especially when the filmmakers keep trying to
blow out the flames.

Title
Review for Daytrippers, The (1996)
(Cinepix)
Starring:  Hope Davis, Anne Meara, Parker Posey, Liev Schreiber, Pat
McNamara, Stanley Tucci, Campbell Scott.
Screenplay:  Greg Mottola.
Producers:  Nancy Tenenbaum and Steven Soderbergh.
Director:  Greg Mottola.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  88 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There is a quality to certain independent films which I have referred
to in the past as an "oppressive quirkiness."  As frustrating as it can be
to watch a Hollywood release which is a non-stop monotone of plot or
action, it is similarly frustrating when a film-maker's infatuation with
colorful characters at the expense of narrative results in all those
colors blurring into a dull brown.  Actors understandably love playing
those characters, but independent writer-directors -- frequently rookie
auteurs -- can't always tame their creations into a solid story.  Greg
Mottola's THE DAYTRIPPERS is characterized by a quirkiness more pervasive
than oppressive, and some of it is quite entertaining.  By the time it's
all over, however, you may find yourself wondering what the point of it
all was.
     Hope Davis stars as Eliza D'Amico, a Long Island schoolteacher with a
happy marriage to husband Louis (Stanley Tucci), a publishing house
editor.  At least she thinks it's a happy marriage, until she finds a love
letter which appears to be to Louis from someone named Sandy.  Unsure what
to do, Eliza brings her concerns to her family, gathered in town for
Thanksgiving:  mother Rita (Anne Meara), father Jim (Pat McNamara),
younger sister Jo (Parker Posey) and Jo's boyfriend Carl (Liev Schreiber).
They suggest that Eliza needs to investigate her suspicions, and accompany
her into New York City for a Friday-after-Thanksgiving day of sleuthing.
As it turns out, they may find out more about each other than about
Louis's fidelity.
     For well over half of THE DAYTRIPPERS, the character riffs provide a
lot of laughs without becoming repetitive or abrasive.  Liev Schreiber has
the most subtly amusing role, an intellectual would-be author who bashes
middle class obliviousness even as he sucks up to the obliviously middle
class Rita.  His rather pompous diatribes are played straight and in a low
key, making his later humbling at the hands of a rival author (Campbell
Scott) as sad as it is funny.  Anne Meara and Pat McNamara play the
bickering parents with interesting shadings on stereotypical
characterizations, and Parker Posey again shows off her indie-queen charm.
Mottola puts them in a variety of bizarre situations, including what Posey
aptly describes as "the shortest car chase in history," and peppers the
film with memorable minor roles like Marcia Gay Harden's turn as a drunken
party-goer trying to deal with the presence of an ex-boyfriend at the
party.  At the sane center sits Hope Davis's Eliza, a woman trying to
maintain her dignity under stressful conditions -- if worrying about your
husband having a mistress were not bad enough, _you_ try to deal with it
while trapped in a car with your parents.
     As the story plays out, Eliza's positioning in that sane center
proves to be one of THE DAYTRIPPERS' most glaring problems.  Ultimately,
this story is about how Eliza comes to be in the situation of chasing
around her possibly-philandering husband, but mostly we watch Eliza
reacting to the people around her.  It may be part of Mottola's vision for
Eliza that she is too passive, yet the result is that we don't understand
enough about who Eliza is or how she feels about her life.  We see that
Rita has manipulated her daughters' relationships in a thinly disguised
disdain for their value as individuals, and that should guide us to an
awakening in Eliza.  Instead, we get an abrupt emotional response and an
even more abrupt conclusion to the film, hard on the heels of a revelation
which feels more self-consciously clever than appropriate for the rest of
the film.
     On an even more fundamental level, THE DAYTRIPPERS loses its audience
because it loses its sense of humor.  After sixty minutes worth of
appealing wit, Mottola perhaps falls victim to a concern that his film
will be considered too frivolous.  Thus follows a series of shouting
matches, confrontations and Big Dramatic Moments which ends up melding two
acts of George Bernard Shaw to one act of Tennessee Williams.  THE
DAYTRIPPERS has a lot of good-natured humor to recommend it, but I'm not
sure Greg Mottola really knew what he wanted to do with the lively
characters he had created.  He may have learned one lesson of independent
film-making the hard way:  it's a good start to put a bunch of interesting
characters together in a vehicle and set them on their way, but sooner or
later that vehicle has to come to a destination.  THE DAYTRIPPERS is an
entertaining ride while that vehicle is in motion.  Mottola just needs to
learn how to park as smoothly as he drives.

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
IN DREAMS
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Annette Bening, Aidan Quinn, Stephen Rea, Robert Downey Jr.
Screenplay:  Bruce Robinson and Neil Jordan, based on the novel "Doll's
Eyes" by Bari Wood.
Producer:  Stephen Woolley.
Director:  Neil Jordan.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Somehow, there's something even more icky about an exploitative and
routine horror film that tarts up its exploitation and routineness with
plenty of style.  Such is the case with Neil Jordan's IN DREAMS, a
psychological thriller which lets its atmospheric creepiness disintegrate
into a trite chase-n-terrorize puree.  Annette Bening stars as Claire
Cooper, a Massachusetts-based children's book illustrator with a
picture-book life: lovely rural New England home, loving husband Paul
(Aidan Quinn), beautiful young daughter Rebecca (Katie Sagora) and loyal
dog Dobie.  She also posesses a spark of psychic ability which she has had
all her life, one which seems to be getting stronger as she has visions
connected to the disappearance of a local schoolgirl.  Then Rebecca is
abducted, and Claire comes to believe that she is psychically connected to
a serial killer -- and that the killer is similarly connected to her.
     For a while, it looks like IN DREAMS is going to be a thriller of a
different stripe, something as dramatically and visually compelling as it
is viscerally shocking.  Darius Khondji, the gifted cinematographer behind
SEVEN, gives IN DREAMS the same menacing silver tint and twisted light,
including an eerie opening underwater sequence in a submerged town.  The
story takes Claire on a descent into genuine madness, the kind that makes
a character truly unpredictable and interesting to watch.  Bening is a
superb actress, and she makes the most of Claire fumbling for answers with
the last shreds of her sanity.  The script also presents the idea that the
killer is a tormented soul who wants Claire to catch him, setting up a
potentially complex relationship when they finally do meet.
     Gradually, however, IN DREAMS starts to lose its way.  Partly it
seems rushed, with scenes slammed together too quickly to develop the
necessary foreboding.  Partly it seems sloppy, increasingly depending on
ridiculous contrivances (Claire being confined in exactly the same room
once occupied by the killer, for instance) and the blandly
counter-productive analysis of Claire's psychiatrist (Jordan regular
Stephen Rea, sporting a distracting accent).  And partly it seems
mean-spirited, using graphic murders for shock value or imperiled children
for sympathy value, rather than building interest in the characters.  Over
its final 45 minutes, IN DREAMS begins a slow but steady descent from
potent psychological thriller to careless mess.
     And then, when Robert Downey Jr. finally appears as the killer
Vivian, it careens out of control entirely.  Decked out in flowing red
tresses and whispering in an effeminate drawl, Downey exercises every
ghastly overacting muscle in his body simultaneously.  To be fair to
Downey, the role is a serial killer cliche -- he's a Norman Bates momma's
boy with _serious_ gender role issues -- without a remotely sympathetic
quality, dashing hopes of a mind-game showdown into the rocks.  Instead
it's all guns and sharp objects, running and screaming, until a bleak,
unsatisfying and confounding resolution.  It's a huge disappointment
coming from Neil Jordan, a film-maker who has consistently made films that
defied expectations -- THE COMPANY OF WOLVES, THE CRYING GAME, THE BUTCHER
BOY.  In a sad way, that's exactly what he does here.  Just when you
expect IN DREAMS might turn out to be a memorably disturbing horror film,
it turns out to be a gutless, nihilistic tease.

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
RANDOM HEARTS
(Columbia)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Charles S. Dutton, Bonnie
Hunt, Dennis Haysbert, Sydney Pollack.
Screenplay:  Kurt Luedtke, from Darryl Ponsican's adaptation of the novel
by Warren Adler.
Producers:  Sydney Pollack and Marykay Powell.
Director:  Sydney Pollack.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, profanity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  131 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For a romantic drama, RANDOM HEARTS sure doesn't begin the way you
would expect.  The film eases us into the worlds of its two principal
characters, Washington D.C. internal affairs cop William "Dutch" Van Den
Broeck (Harrison Ford) and New Hampshire Congresswoman Kay Chandler
(Kristin Scott Thomas).  Their lives run parallel for nearly an hour of
screen time, with Dutch investigating a pair of crooked cops and Kay
preparing for a tough re-election campaign.  Drifting through the
background is the event that will bring them together: an airline crash
that claims the lives of Dutch's wife Peyton (Susanna Thompson) and Kay's
husband Cullen (Peter Coyote).  With a languid silkiness, director Sydney
Pollack lets the characters develop independently before Dutch's suspicion
that Peyton and Cullen were having an affair sets Dutch and Kay on a
collision course.  The pacing may be slow, but the set-up is engrossing
and effective.
     Then, something horrible happens:  Dutch and Kay actually get
together.
     To understand what's so dreadful about the romantic story in RANDOM
HEARTS, you have to understand the laughter.  After a day together in
Miami exploring the possible scene of their spouses' infidelity, Dutch and
Kay return home exchanging portentous glances throughout their plane trip.
Finally, in Kay's car at the airport, they surrender to an angry, clumsy
clinch ... and the audience starts howling.  You could argue that they
were responding to the awkwardness of the moment, but I'm not sure I'd buy
it.  In a matter of seconds, it was obvious that people weren't buying
that relationship.  In a matter of seconds, RANDOM HEARTS had plummeted to
earth faster than the downed jet that brought Dutch and Kay together.
     Doomed romanced between wounded, grieving souls are nothing new in
dramatic cinema -- case in point: LAST TANGO IN PARIS -- but such films
generally focus on the essential emptiness at the center of the
relationship.  RANDOM HEARTS has too old-time-Hollywood a sensibility to
delve into that kind of psychological pain.  Scenes between Dutch and Kay
keep suggesting the potential for genuine affection between them,
something besides the mutual despair and betrayal that connected them in
the first place.  As a result, RANDOM HEARTS feels consistently and
resolutely false as soon as they start to go at it in the front seat of
Kay's car.  Pollack and company keep trying to transplant the heart of a
1940's weeper into the body of a European art film.
     It doesn't help that the story doesn't even make the best case for
the base emotions that first link Dutch and Kay.  On Dutch's side, it
makes more sense, as the top trained to look for corruption feels like a
fool when he discovers infidelity he never suspected for a moment.  The
transference of his anger at Kay's husband to sleeping with Kay works
thematically; Kay is another matter entirely.  She is almost unsurprised
to learn of Cullen's philandering, her absence of shock and rage
diminishing her motivation.  Scott Thomas tries to wring some plausibility
from Kay's actions, but it's hard to accept them as anything but plot
machinations.  When Harrison Ford -- looking a bit silly in his stud
earring -- says to her, "I was thinking about your mouth," you have to
believe Kay would have laughed in his face.
     Of course people in Hollywood love stories are always saying
ridiculously purple things to one another, and audiences roll with it all
the time.  It can only work, however, if the story is builty on one of
those sweeping archetypal premises in which soulmates are inspired to
rhapsodic poetry.  RANDOM HEARTS shouldn't have had the faintest whiff of
soulmates to it, not when the hook is the visceral response of two people
to an affair between their spouses.  Pollack is too polished and
professional a film-maker to produce an unwatchable product; he's also too
polished and professional a film-maker to delve into those dark places
where the film needed to live.  For nearly an hour, he has it all working,
using the character development to build a case for incompatibility.  By
the time the smiling, optimistic denouement rolls around, you know the
audience was right when their gut response to this relationship was to
laugh out loud.

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
(Paramount)
Starring:  Penelope Ann Miller, Tom Sizemore, Linda Hunt, James Whitmore.
Screenplay:  Amy Jones & Jon Raffa and Rick Jones & Amanda Silver.
Producers:  Gale Anne Hurd, Sam Mercer.
Director:  Peter Hyams.
MPAA Rating:  R (graphic violence, profanity)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Don't be misled by advertising which suggests that THE RELIC is some
sort of sublimely spooky thriller, because it is nothing of the kind.  If
you sit through the film long enough (and several people at the screening
I attended threw in the towel somewhere before the end of the third reel),
you many begin to wonder if you have stumbled through a time warp back to
the early 1980s, when horror films were an excuse to play "can you top
this" with graphic depictions of murders.  For all its ostensibly classy
trappings, THE RELIC is simply a mad slasher film with a monster instead
of a maniac, as relentlessly violent and unpleasant as any film in recent
memory.
     In THE RELIC, Tom Sizemore plays Chicago homicide detective Vincent
D'Agosta, who investigates a Brazilian cargo ship which drifts into Lake
Michigan with the entire crew brutally murdered and decapitated.  When a
similar murder occurs at the Museum of Natural History, D'Agosta tries to
determine the connection between the two incidents.  One possibility may
be a shipment which arrives at the museum from a field anthropologist, a
crate containing mysterious leaves.  When evolutionary biologist Margo
Green (Penelope Ann Miller) examines the leaves, she discovers that the
plant may have the contain hormones which cause extreme mutations in
whatever consumes it.  This discovery may come too late, however, as the
museum prepares to hold a gala benefit which may end with several guests
lacking much above their black ties.
     If you saw Wes Craven's current horror homage/satire SCREAM, you are
acquainted with the "rules" of horror films; if you didn't see SCREAM, you
can learn most of them from THE RELIC.  The likelihood of any given
character to die is proportional to his or her demonstrated vices, so you
can bank on the fact that a security guard who lights up a joint is not
long for this world, nor is a notable nasty like the obnoxious scientist
(Chi Moui Lo) who threatens to steal away Dr. Green's research grant.
Splitting up a group is also a sure sign of carnage to come, especially if
one person alone is carrying a flashlight or investigating any sort of
strange noise.  You can also count on at least one startled animal to
provide a gratuitous shock to the system, to be followed closely by
something genuinely horrifying.
     These elements are familiar for some bad reasons -- usually laziness
-- but also for the good reason that, when put to good use, they can be
part of a truly tense film.  The original ALIEN was a classic bug hunt
crafted with such style by Ridley Scott that everything old seemed new
again.  Peter Hyams pretends to be interested in that kind of primal
chiller, but he has neither the patience nor the skill for it.  The
multi-attributed script tosses personality quirks at its character hoping
something might stick, but only Audra Lindley as an acerbic coroner seems
remotely human.  More often the script resorts to exposition enhancers
like the two kids who turn up to ask what Miller's character does for a
living (there's nothing like turning a screenplay into a catechism to make
sure no one is confused).  Hyams, who has always acted as his own
cinematographer, shoots everything with as little light as possible,
clearly under the impression that atmosphere can be manipulated with a
dimmer switch; meanwhile, the last half of THE RELIC is edited with a
gross disregard for anything resembling building tension.  THE RELIC just
gets louder, darker and more hectic with each passing minute, as Hyams
repeatedly confuses murky with moody.
     There is also something terribly dishonest about the way THE RELIC is
shot, because there is virtually nothing creepy about it.  The old slasher
films of the 80s had no pretensions about what they were there to show the
audience; when someone was going to die a horrible death, they turned up
all the lights and showed you a horrible death.  There are easily a dozen
severed heads which roll through the 110 minutes of THE RELIC, and people
are torn apart with such regularity during the last 50 minutes that it no
longer matters how quickly the light shines on the corpse or how rapid the
edit is.  Hyams finally shows his hand in a sequence where a S.W.A.T. team
enters the museum in an attempt to rescue trapped patrons.  The first man
drops in on a rope and is promptly drawn and quartered; a second man drops
in after him and is separated from his head quite graphically; #3 is
snipped in half below the waist.  At that point, THE RELIC becomes a
turkey shoot where so many anonymous individuals are killed that the
survival of the two main protagonists doesn't matter.  THE RELIC is an
ugly and stupid film, which is bad enough.  It also proves to be a
terribly dehumanizing one.  Special effects wizard Stan Winston might have
created a nifty creature to trot out for the climax, but for all it
mattered to the story, Hyams might as well have saved the budget and used
a guy in a hockey mask.

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
     I recall being only mildly impressed with David Mamet's HOUSE OF
GAMES when I first saw it a decade ago, despite general critical acclaim.
Sure, it was a meticulously crafted intellectual puzzle, and, even more
impressive, it was a puzzle which didn't fall apart completely as you were
thinking about it on the way home.  With Lindsey Crouse serving serving as
its remote heroine, however, all its unpredictable twists felt like they
were taking place in a vacuum, leaving little reason to care about anyone
in the story.  Crafty, yes, but soulless.
     Five years of wading through cinema at its most mind-numbing has
given me a new appreciation for meticulously crafted intellectual puzzles,
even if they are of the soulless variety.  Mamet's new psychological
mystery THE SPANISH PRISONER, a thoroughly intriguing cinematic engine, 
definitely falls into that category.  Campbell Scott stars as a young
corporate underling named Joe who has created a potential cash cow called
The Process for his company.  Unfortunately for Joe, little of that milk
looks likely to end up in his cup.  Enter Jimmy Dell (Steve Martin), a
smooth operator who promises Joe a windfall if he'll turn over The
Process.
     It's best to cut off any plot summary at this point, lest certain
turns of narrative be inadvertently revealed.  Suffice it to say that THE
SPANISH PRISONER tackles familiar Mamet subjects like breakdowns in trust
and deceptive appearances, accompanied by the familiar-bordering-on-cliche
staccato rhythms of Mamet's dialogue.  It also features crisp pacing
courtesy of editor Barbara Tulliver, and yet another insinuating score
from the gifted Carter Burwell.  Most significantly, it features a story
which manipulates in all the best senses of the word.  In an era where
most films leave you suspecting the re-writes had been commissioned from a
room full of chimps, THE SPANISH PRISONER treats an audience with respect
-- no cheap tricks, no flip-a-coin-to-pick-the-killer endings, just a
smart and surprising entertainment.
     There's a lot to admire about the construction of THE SPANISH
PRISONER, but it shouldn't be so difficult to find a sympathetic human
protagonist to guide a story like this.  Campbell Scott is a versatile,
capable performer with the requisite look of naivete to play Hitchcockian
dupe; he also reads virtually every line of Mamet's script with a
deadening flatness.  That goes ditto and double for Rebecca Pidgeon, whose
turn as Joe's affectionate confidante falls apart with every forced line.
While Steve Martin does marvelously cagey work as the mysterious Jimmy --
he's one of the few cast members who seems to have a grip on Mamet's style
-- Scott feels as though he's being pulled grudgingly through the story
because _somebody's_ got to be the hero.
     Even with its lack of a vibrant hero, I can't be too hard on  THE
SPANISH PRISONER.  In fact, that absence only really started to bother me
on the way home, which is usually where the plots of such films start to
bother me.  I do wish that Mamet, who clearly has mastered the art of
plotting, could make his films as emotionally compelling as they are
intellectually satisfying.  Giving his houses of games hearts to match
their brains would make him one of our finest film-makers.

Title
Review for Guinevere (1999)
     Audrey Wells, the screenwriter behind THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS AND DOGS,
returns to some familiar thematic ground for her directing debut
GUINEVERE.  Like CATS AND DOGS, GUINEVERE is a tale of a young woman's
self-realization through photography; also like CATS AND DOGS, and much to
its advantage, it's a story elevated by a radiant lead performance.
It's almost too easy to use the film's title for emphasis, but it's also
true: in a film that runs out of gas before it runs out of time, Sarah
Polley shines like cinema royalty, making it far easier to overlook
GUINEVERE's tactical errors.
     Polley stars as Harper Sloane, a 20-year-old recent college graduate
plagued by feelings of inadequacy in her over-achieving upper class
family.  Enter Connie Fitzpatrick (Stephen Rea), the 40-something 
photographer at Harper's sister's wedding.  Connie appeals to Harper with
the suggestion that she has the potential for artistic self-expression,
and offers himself as both lover and mentor.  The relationship becomes
complicated not just by their age difference, but by Harper's growing
concern that she's not the first young woman to experience Connie's
tutelage.
     There's no question that Polley -- who dazzled in THE SWEET HEREAFTER
and stole the multi-character GO -- is turning into one of the most gifted
actresses of her generation.  Like Janeane Garofolo in THE TRUTH ABOUT
CATS AND DOGS, she makes insecurity genuinely affecting instead of merely
affected, doing things with her mouth and her eyes that make your heart
want to break.  There is a scene involving Connie's first sexual advances
that has been played in any number of films with a soft-focus earnestness;
Polley giggles and shifts with nervous energy, finding the awkwardness at
the heart of initial intimacies.  She is ably complemented by Rea -- who
takes an alcoholic lecher and manages to make him as sympathetic as he is
slimy -- and Jean Smart -- a caustic delight as Harper's mother.
     Something about GUINEVERE, however, begins to feel forced.  The tone
grows unnecessarily "heavy," turning a frisky coming-of-age piece into one
of those "I was never the same after that summer stories."  Wells also
plays her ace too early, making a revelation about the nature of Harper
and Connie's relationship that turns much of the film into a waiting game.
While it's bitterly funny watching Mrs. Sloane dissect Connie's motives,
it provides too simple an explanation for the complex dynamics of a
potentially interesting relationship, and ultimately shifts the balance of
the film away from Harper and towards Connie.  Though Wells' GUINEVERE has
a lot going for it in the way of sharp dialogue and finely crafted
character moments, the film-maker stumbles when she doesn't realize that
the best thing she's got going is Polley.  In this bright young actress's
capable hands, this story of lessons in love earns solid marks.

Title
Review for Road to Glory (2000)
     I mean no disrespect to the burgeoning Bhutanese film industry when I
suggest that being selected as the Bhutanese representative for the Best
Foreign Language Film Oscar doesn't automatically qualify as an impressive
achievement. In fact, THE CUP is the first ever film selected as an
Academy Award candidate from Bhutan, made by a revered Buddhist teacher
making his first film. It's understandable that THE CUP would warrant some
unique attention on this basis. The question is whether anyone would be
paying much attention to THE CUP if it didn't happen to offer a unique
cultural perspective.
     It's always tough to say, but I'm guessing not. There are certainly
some charms in this fact-based bit of whimsy, set in 1998 at a Tibetan
Buddhist monastery-in-exile. The monastery's leaders are awaiting two new
arrivals as the film begins, brothers attempting to make the escape from
occupied Tibet. When they finally do arrive, Palden (Kunsang Nyima) and
Nyima (Pema Tshundup) find the young monks-in-training are currying a
passion for something more than Buddhist teachings: the ongoing World Cup
soccer tournament. The young monk Orgyen (Jamyang Lodro) has taken to
sneaking into town after dark to watch BBC satellite broadcasts, but when
he and some fellow monks are caught by chief disciplinarian Geko (Orgyen
Tobgyal), it looks like no one will be seeing the final match -- unless 
the abbot (Lama Chonjor) grants their request to rent a television to
watch the match in the monastery.
     There's no denying that THE CUP may be worth seeing simply for its
sociology lesson. The monastery is depicted not as a relentlessly somber
place, but as a sort of boarding school with boys who will be boys no
matter their national origin (passing notes during prayers, sewing
another boy's robe to a mat, scribbling nationalist graffiti on the
monastery walls). American films with Tibetan Buddhist themes -- SEVEN
YEARS IN TIBET and KUNDUN -- have often seemed to be so concerned with
telling the story of an important political issue that the personal side
has been lost. It is certainly refreshing to see a story in which Tibetan
people are seen as people, and not merely as martyrs.
     And then one moves past that humanizing appeal, and doesn't find a
whole lot more. Writer/director Khyentse Norbu understands his people, but
he has a lot to learn about structuring a narrative. Even at only 93
minutes, THE CUP drags along towards the monks' eventual efforts to gather
enough money to rent the television and satellite dish, then try to get
the whole apparatus working. It's worth a few chuckles to see the monks
trying to navigate the technology; it's considerably less entertaining
watching the film meander, dabbling in the crowd-pleasing qualities of
shadow puppets and a sort of "Gift of the Magi" sub-plot involving Orgyen
and a younger monk's beloved keepsake.
     The pacing of THE CUP may be perfectly representative of the culture
from which it originates, just as the story itself may be perfectly
representative. I find myself leaning towards a recommendation simply
because it showed me something I didn't know before, which is one of the
reasons I love film in the first place. There's just not much substance to
THE CUP worth getting enthusiastic over, unless the mere notion of Tibetan
monks playing pranks and watching soccer is enough of a hilarious
incongruity to carry your viewing experience. The amateur cast and rookie
director can't make the film soar on its own terms. Khytentse Norbu might
have been better served making a documentary about life among young
Tibetan monks ... or about making Bhutan's first Oscar contender.

Title
Review for Committed (2000)
     Heather Graham is a lovely woman. Now that we have dispensed with the
obvious, can we ponder for a moment the mystery of why she continues to
pull down roles in films with edge and attitude, since she appears to have
little of either? TWO GIRLS AND A GUY, BOOGIE NIGHTS, BOWFINGER -- in each
she was competent, but primarily served the function of being a lovely
woman. And in AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME, even competence
eluded her. I can only guess that Graham gives killer auditions. On
screen, she melts into the art direction whenever she's not serving the
function of  well, you get the picture.
     Lisa Krueger's COMMITTED is a goofy, quirky sort-of romantic comedy
that offers some pleasant character-based amusement. The fact that it's
not more is only partly Graham's fault. She plays Joline, a New York
nightclub booking agent who has decided that her word will always be her
bond in life. That goes double for her marriage to Carl (Luke Wilson),
which she values above everything else (to the point that she has had a
wedding band tattooed to her finger). She is understandably distraught,
therefore, when Carl decides he needs some space, and flees for parts
unknown. But Joline takes nothing so seriously as "till death do you
part," and so sets out on a road trip to find Carl. Eventually she tracks
him down in El Paso, where he may not be terribly pleased about being
tracked down.
     For a little while, I thought Krueger was on her way to making
COMMITTED a sly commentary on children of divorce coping with their own
commitment issues. We learn that Joline's own parents split, perhaps
inspiring Joline to the equivalent of a child of an alcoholic's
proselytizing teetotaling (as it may have inspired her brother Jay, played
by Casey Affleck, to a somewhat creepy attachment to Joline). Krueger may
even have intended the film as a commentary on the way society looks at
people with passionate commitments. There's something intriguing about the
way it is assumed someone who will fight to the end for a marriage must be
a bit nuts, just as it is assumed fervent believers in anything must be a
bit nuts.
     Actually, COMMITTED only teases with subtext, since it's not much of
a commentary on anything. That doesn't mean it's not entertaining in a
sporadic, out-of-left-field sort of way. Whenever COMMITTED seems to have
been lurching along far too long in search of a good scene, it finds one
that delivers unexpected laughs (Patricia Velasquez as an utterly
indifferent restaurant waitress; Alfonso Arau in a too-rare screen
appearance as a kindly Mexican medicine man). It even delivers unexpected
romantic heat on occasion, in moments between Graham and Goran Visnjic as
Carl's El Paso neighbor Neil. Neil's full-aura massage of Joline is one of
the sexiest screen scenes ever in which no one lays a body part on anyone
else.
     I wish it all felt like it added up to more, but there's a huge hole
at the center of COMMITTED. To be fair, Graham does some nice things with
the ever-earnest Joline that prevent her from turning into a joke. 
Unfortunately, she appears to spend all her acting energy on the work of
yanking Joline from the jaws of caricature. COMMITTED is one of those
films in which the things going on around the main character end up far
more interesting than anything happening to the main character herself. 
Perhaps that's the way Krueger wrote it, retreating to the same
isn't-this-all-terribly-indie mannerisms that shackled Krueger's previous
effort MANNY & LO. Or perhaps everything around Joline just seems more
interesting because Graham doesn't have the presence to command the
narrative's focus. I kept wanting to see more edge in Joline's connubial
stalking, and realizing there was no way I'd ever get it. In a
sporadically funny film, Heather Graham tries to turn from lovely woman
into a leading lady, only to fade into the art direction once again.

Title
Review for Body Snatchers (1993)
Starring:  Gabrielle Anwar, Terry Kenney, Billy Wirth, Meg Tilly.
Screenplay:  Stuart Gordon, Dennis Paoli & Nicholas St. John.
Director:  Abel Ferrara.
     Abel Ferrara's BODY SNATCHERS marks the third screen adaptation of
Jack Finney's novel THE BODY SNATCHERS, and you'd think that there
wouldn't be all that much new to say about pod people by now.  Don
Siegel's 1956 INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS captured small-town
menace; Phillip Kaufman's 1978 version transferred the story to San
Francisco for a metaphor for big city alienation.  The scene for this
latest adaptation is an army base, and the metaphor has changed as
well.  Somewhere in BODY SNATCHERS is a poke at the military mindset,
but it's buried beneath layers of atmosphere, atmosphere which works
but doesn't make that extra leap to real terror.
     BODY SNATCHERS opens as the Malone family makes its way towards
Fort Daly, Alabama.  Dad Steve (Terry Kenney) is an Environmental
Protection Agency investigator sent to check out toxic waste storage at
the base, and he brings along daughter Marti (Gabrielle Anwar), new
wife Carol (Meg Tilly) and Carol's six-year-old son Andy (Reilly
Murphy).  It's not long after they arrive before it becomes clear that
things aren't quite right at Fort Daly.  The base physician (Forest
Whitaker) notes a preponderance of paranoid episodes among soldiers and
family members, and everyone seems just a bit too serene.  Eventually,
the full extent of the invasion is obvious to the Malones, and a young
pilot (Billy Wirth) becomes the only person they can trust to help them
escape.
     Director Ferrara (BAD LIEUTENANT) has crafted a stylish and spooky
look for the film, filtered in dark ambers and deep blues, full of
shadows and twisted angles.  The issue of identity is always present,
as actors frequently appear only as silhouettes against the light, or
veiled by other shadows.  Some early scenes highlighting the pod
people's uniformity, particularly a frighteningly comic scene where
young Andy realizes the other kids in day care lack a certain artistic
creativity, are extremely well-handled.  Ferrara also manages the
tricky task of directing his actors so that the transformed characters
appear clearly to have changed without playing the stock blank-faced
automoton.  Technically, BODY SNATCHERS hits just about all of its
marks, particularly with its rather graphic image of what happens to
the remains of a human body after the transformation has taken place.
     Yet while BODY SNATCHERS held my attention, it didn't do anything
particularly interesting which seemed to warrand a re-telling of this
already twice-told tale.  The idea behind setting the invasion on a
military base is sound; if everyone in the Army starts acting like
drones with a singular purpose, who's going to notice?  The
screenwriters throw in one speech by the base commander (FULL METAL
JACKET's R. Lee Ermey) which seems designed to emphasize this point,
but Ferrara doesn't do much with it.  Familial alienation seems to be a
more prevalent theme, as Marti deals with her step-family, and her new
friend Jenn (Christine Elise) copes with an alcoholic mother.  No
single theme really drives this BODY SNATCHERS, nor are any of the
characters interesting enough to pull it along with them.
     Structurally, BODY SNATCHERS suffers from a climax which seems far
too drawn out.  Once the Malones start running, the tension should
continue to build, but too many of the scenes involving confrontations
between "real" humans and the 'Snatchers lack punch.  There is one
wickedly chilling moment of revelation, but it is isolated.  BODY
SNATCHERS does a fantastic job of establishing its tone, and it does
offer a few decent scares.  The problem with Ferrara's pacing is that
it's like the Body Snatchers themselves:  too cool when the adrenaline
should be flowing.

Title
Review for Doug's 1st Movie (1999)
DOUG'S 1st MOVIE
(Disney)
Voices:  Thomas McHugh, Fred Newman, Chris Phillips, Constance Shulman,
Frank Welker, Doug Preis, Guy Hadley, Alice Playten.
Screenplay:  Ken Scarborough, based on characters created by Jim Jinkins.
Producer:  Jim Jinkins, David Campbell, Melanie Grisanti, Jack Spillum.
Director:  Maurice Joyce.
MPAA Rating:  G.
Running Time:  77 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are two basic kinds of "family films" that come to your local
multiplex.  In one category are those that genuinely deserve the name
"family film," the kind that can actually keep an adult entertained while
remaining appropriate for kids.  In the other category are the generally
inspid, generally TV-based tales made exclusively for non-discriminating
sub-teens.  With no experience of the television series on which it was
based, I went into DOUG'S 1st MOVIE expecting the latter.  Instead, I
found something halfway between the two:  a good-natured, good-humored
kids' film that actually treated young viewers as though they had
intelligence.
     The plot for DOUG'S 1st MOVIE returns to some recurring threads from
the "Doug" show which originated on Nickelodeon before moving to ABC
Saturday mornings.  Doug (voiced by Thomas McHugh), a 12-year-old student
at Bluffington Middle School, is still trying to catch the eye of Patti
Mayonnaise (Constance Shulman), the long-time object of his affection;
Doug's best friend Skeeter (Fred Newman) is still seeking the monster of
Lucky Duck Lake.  In the film, however, Skeeter actually finds the
creature, a friendly amphibious beast he dubs Herman Melville (Frank
Welker).  Herman is also proof that local big-wig Mr. Bluff (Doug Preis)
is polluting the lake, which presents Doug with a moral dilemma.  Should
he risk derision by helping Herman and taking on Mr. Bluff, or focus on
staying in Patti's good graces?
     In fact, it's not really much of a dilemma at all.  Doug is the
nicest of nice guys, an easy guy for his peers to relate to.  He has
superhero fantasies, he mopes when Patti spends time with cocky 
upperclassman Guy Graham (Guy Hadley), and he trusts his faithful dog
Porkchop.  Like most adolescents, he's a little insecure, but he always
tries hard to do the right thing.  That's the basic, simple appeal of
DOUG'S 1st MOVIE:  it's a message movie for kids in which the message is
"be decent," and where the message isn't obscured by special effects or
infantilism.  Sure, it moves at a fairly pokey cartoon pace, but that's a
welcome respite from animated films that behave as though kids will only
sit still for frantic action.
     Parents may even be sitting still for some of the funny asides in
DOUG'S 1st MOVIE.  Though Ken Scarborough's script is hardly heavy on
adult references, it does feel slightly smarter than most cartoon scripts.
I don't think a single line in the film would be over the head of a
12-year-old, yet somehow I still felt in on the joke despite the fact that
most of the humor centered on schoolkid types (the whiz-kid nerds, the
stuck-up rich girl, the minor-league bully and his cronies).  The best
point of comparison for DOUG'S 1st MOVIE is probably the "Peanuts"
television specials and features of the late 60s and 1970s -- they were
both sincere and engaging, and easy for families to share.  DOUG may not
stand "Peanuts'" test of time, but it's a solid choice for parents who
like the idea of a film that doesn't condescend to their kids.

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
RED PLANET
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Val Kilmer, Carrie-Anne Moss, Tom Sizemore, Benjamin Bratt,
Simon Baker, Terence Stamp.
Screenplay:  Chuck Pfarrer and Jonathan Lemkin.
Producers:  Mark Canton, Bruce Berman and Jorge Saralegui.
Director:  Antony Hoffman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes, brief nudity, profanity)
Running Time:  106 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Some genre films tease you with the prospect that they can be
something more substantial before degenerating into stupidity and cliche. 
RED PLANET at least does viewers the courtesy of not wasting their time
with such futile hopes. In the opening minutes, Mars Mission Commander
Bowman (Carrie-Anne Moss) provides a voice-over neatly summarizing the
premise before launching into capsule characterizations of her crewmates. 
That co-pilot Santen (Benjamin Bratt), he sure is a hot-head, which
undoubtedly will play a significant role in his ultimate fate. And that
scientist Burchenal (Tom Sizemore), he sure has an ego, which undoubtedly
will create some sort of character tension down the road.
     Dim-wittedness in Hollywood action films is only to be expected at
this point in cinema history. Vaguely pretentious dim-wittedness is pretty
inexcusable. RED PLANET sends a six-person crew to Mars in 2057 to find
out what has happened to oxygen-producing algae sent by earth scientists
as part of a colonization plan. You see, earth has become nearly
uninhabitable due to environmental degradation, and our only hope of
survival is creating a survivable atmosphere elsewhere, but something has
gone screwy because oxygen readings have suddenly dropped. The mission
team is ready to investigate when a freak radiation burst damages their
vessel, forcing an emergency evacuation of all personnel but Bowman. The
landing vehicle is damaged on impact, leaving the surviving crew members
-- including dashing chief engineer Gallagher (Val Kilmer) -- to figure
out a way to get back home.
     At certain points in RED PLANET, you can't help but wonder why anyone
wasted time on a back story at all. Though the very survival of the human
race is theoretically at stake, the film seems interested in that point
only to the extent that it can be included in press notes, in absurd
declarations like, "It's a smart movie that posits the question, what if
man fails to do the things necessary to live on earth?" In fact, RED
PLANET resolutely refuses to deal with anything beyond the basic goals of
its characters to find a way back to earth. Why does no one in the
stranded party refer to being thirsty or hungry after going without food
and water for more than a day? How would the people on earth be responding
to the apparent failure of this crucial mission? What exactly was the
reason that no one could detect any oxygen, when it turns out there's a
whole lot of it around? And why flirt with the notion that there's some
intelligence bent on thwarting the terraforming effort, only to make the
real villain of the piece the crew's resident malfunctioning evil robot?
     Silly questions, of course, since RED PLANET is kind enough to alert
you so quickly to its minimalist intentions. The characters spout dialogue
that alternates between inane exposition and pointless 
self-characterization. "I'm a scientist, but I'm really interested in
philosophy," says philosophically-interested scientist Chantilas (Terence
Stamp), though not in so many words. "We're sexually attracted to one
another, so I hope neither one of us dies," say Bowman and Gallagher,
though not in so many words. "I sure wish it didn't take 40 minutes for
you to answer," says Bowman after sending a radio message to earth,
actually in so many words, just to let us know the writers knew at least
one science fact. It's a wonderful irony in RED PLANET that it places so
much weight on the fate of these six characters, only to make them utterly
weightless as actual characters.
     At odd intervals, something happens to slap the film out of its
oxygen-deprived stupor. Most of them involve Moss, whose strong presence
occasionally tricks you into thinking the film is better than it is. One
involves a great shot of the Mars lander taking a tumble for which it
certainly wasn't designed. And, sadly, many others involve the pleasure of
watching one or another of the annoying characters meet an untimely
demise. As directed by rookie feature director Antony Hoffman, this is a
lame special effects-driven action film that can't even be bothered to
provide a handful of visceral thrills. Lacking big-time action excitement,
competent story-telling or any desire to prevent you from walking out
scratching deep trenches into your head, RED PLANET is simply a
planet-sized waste of time. But at least it only wastes a few minutes of
your time before making that obvious.

Title
Review for Just Cause (1995)
Starring:  Sean Connery, Laurence Fishburne, Blair Underwood,
           Kate Capshaw, Ed Harris.
Screenplay:  Jeb Stuart & Peter Stone.
Director:  Arne Glimcher.
     You could probably count on one hand the number of male stars
over 60 who can still carry a film:  Paul Newman, certainly; Clint
Eastwood; and of course, Sean Connery.  And what is astonishing
about all three of these examples is that for the longest time, few
people really thought of any of them as good actors.  They were
pretty boys, action heroes destined for obscurity once the youthful
good looks faded, but all three have developed unexpected range over
the years.  Sean Connery might have had the farthest to go, moving
from James Bond to Academy Award winner to veteran star.  He is an
impressive presence in JUST CAUSE, but he is wasted.  JUST CAUSE is
a sorry excuse for a thriller, with both narrative and character
handled with remarkable ineptitude.
     Connery plays Paul Armstrong, a Harvard law professor renowned
for his opposition to capital punishment.  He is approached at a
debate one night by a woman (Ruby Dee) who needs his help.  Her
grandson, Bobby Earl Ferguson (Blair Underwood), is on death row in
Florida, the result of what he claims was a forced confession.
Armstrong is reluctant to take the case at first, but at the
insistence of his wife Laurie (Kate Capshaw), he heads down to
Florida to investigate.  There he finds a very antagonistic local
police force led by detective Tanny Brown (Laurence Fishburne), some
questionable evidence, and a possible alternative suspect in the
person of convicted serial killer Blair Sullivan (Ed Harris).
     The cast of JUST CAUSE is loaded with talent, and that alone
offered a great deal of promise.  However, with the exception of
Laurence Fishburne, who is impressive as the hard-case small town
cop, they are given almost nothing to work with or fumble what they
do have.  The usually reliable Ed Harris bugs his eyes and bares his
teeth as the religious fanatic/psycho Sullivan, looking for all the
world like he is auditioning for the next Hannibal Lecter in case
Anthony Hopkins asks for too much money.  He does everything but say
"fava beans."  Kate Capshaw takes a step up from her
blink-and-you'll-miss-it role in LOVE AFFAIR, but she isn't really
subtle enough an actor to make the stock threatened wife role
anything interesting.  Blair Underwood has a few nice moments early,
but he too is saddled with a shallow character with some really
unpleasant undertones.
     Then there is Connery, who can do wonders with a wry smile but
is trapped in a character that looks like it was abandoned by
writers Jeb Stuart and Peter Stone two-thirds of the way through and
completed by computer.  There is some suggestion early in the film
that there is a reason Armstrong hasn't practiced law in 25 years, a
reason which will play a role in Ferguson's case.  Later, when
Armstrong is talking to Sullivan, Sullivan says that he sees in
Armstrong's eyes that he is a killer.  Again there is the suggestion
that there is a dark, guilty secret in Armstrong's past, but there
is never another mention of the issue.  Connery is left stranded
without any real motivation, and as the plot develops that absence
proves crucial, leaving his feelings about criminal justice
completely unexplored.
     Actually, describing the plot as "developing" is something of
an overstatement.  JUST CAUSE is a completely predictable thriller,
with deus ex machina clues popping up for Armstrong to discover and
a plot twist which was nearly inevitable.  Director Arne Glimcher
doesn't appear to have a single original idea for how to construct a
film like this, so he puts together ideas from a hundred other
mundane thrillers:  a car chase here, a woman in distress there, a
serial killer, a mano-a-mano in the Everglades and some moody
lighting.  But there's just no point to any of it.  JUST CAUSE fails
to generate an ounce of tension because tension depends on
unpredictability and characters we genuinely want to see survive the
danger.  I was actually kind of hoping that everyone would end up as
gator bait.  The biggest mystery in JUST CAUSE ends up being why in
the world Sean Connery decided to do it.

Title
Review for Turbo: A Power Rangers Movie (1997)
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Jason David Frank, Adam Yong Bosch, Catherine Sutherland, Nakia
Burrise, Blake Foster, Hilary Shepard Turner, Amy Jo Johnson, Austin St.
John, Jon Simanton.
Screenplay:  Shuki Levy and Shell Danielson.
Producer:  Jonathan Tzachor.
Directors:  David Winning and Shuki Levy.
MPAA Rating:  PG (violence, mild profanity)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You've got to hand it to Saban Entertainment, keepers of the Power
Rangers franchise.  In the notoriously fickle business of children's
entertainment and merchandising, the Rangers have survived by changing
just enough to keep their young fans interested.  Costumes have been
updated; new iterations of action figures have filled the shelves.  Even
characters have been replaced in rejuvenating line-up changes, making the
Rangers akin to a super-powered Menudo.  Yet the most misguided changes to
date have been those in 1995's lifeless MIGHTY MORPHIN POWER RANGERS: THE
MOVIE, which substituted high-tech hardware for low-tech charm.  TURBO: A
POWER RANGERS MOVIE is still dopey kiddie fare, but it's an improvement
over MMPR:TM by orders of magnitude, with a couple more changes still up
its sleeve.
     The Power Rangers are, of course, a team of teen do-gooders from
Angel Grove, currently consisting of Tommy (Jason David Frank), Adam
(Johnny Yong Bosch), Catherine (Catherine Sutherland), Tanya (Nakia
Burrise) and Rocky (Steve Cardenas).  The film begins with a karate
practice during which Rocky is injured, leaving the Rangers short-handed
at a particularly inopportune time.  it seems that evil galactic pirate
Divatox (Hilary Shepard Turner) has a plan to unleash a demon and gain
untold riches, a plan requiring the magic of a benevolent gnome-like
wizard named Lerigot (Jon Simanton).  When Lerigot flees to earth,
Divatox pursues, and the Rangers take on the task of protecting Lerigot
and foiling Divatox's nefarious scheme.
    It can be a monumental effort for anyone over 12 to make it through
Power Rangers material, simply because it is so steadfastly simplistic.
The Rangers themselves are distinguishable from one another strictly by
their color-coded clothing, making the line-up changes as significant
Curly Joe replacing Joe in the Three Stooges.  Low-brow comic relief is
provided by the dim-witted Bulk and Skulk (Jason Narvy and Paul Schrier)
and the incessantly "Ay-yi-yi!"-ing robot side-kick Alpha, and the plots
are elemental fantasy tales with an "Afterschool Special" moral usually
tacked on somewhere.  TURBO adds to the mix a lovable little character
who can heal with a touch and can't survive long on earth...no, not E.T.,
but an incredible simulation in the Muppet-faced Lerigot.
     The formula is so unshakeable in its blandness that, within the
context of the Rangers universe, the twists TURBO serves up can only be
described as ingenious.  The smartest is the inclusion of 10-year-old
Justin (Blake Foster) filling the Blue Ranger costume of the incapacitated
Rocky.  When he morphs, Justin instantly becomes a buffed, battling
teenager who gets to drive a souped-up truck; it's such an obvious child's
fantasy that it's astonishing nobody thought of it sooner.  It's also nice
to have someone repeating the Rangers' morphing mantra of "Awesome!" who
doesn't sound like an immature nit-wit while doing it.  Another nice idea
brings back Ranger alumni Kimberly (Amy Jo Johnson) and Jason (Austin St.
James), who become prisoners of Divatox and eventually transform into evil
dopplegangers who battle their former teammates.  The appearance is good
for a gasp of recognition from long-time Ranger watchers, but it also
gives the characters a dose of personality they never had as heroes.
     Kimberly and Jason actually spend most of their screen time trying to
break out of the cargo hold of Divatox's ship, and those scenes are
surprisingly well-crafted and tense.  For an action film designed for
children, TURBO is actually rather restrained, with more emphasis on
suspenseful escapes than special effects-laden free-for-alls.  There are
only a couple of lengthy fight scenes, and the Rangers in their full
costumed glory are saved for the climactic battle.  Directors David
Winning and Shuki Levy are working with some pretty limp material, but
they make the most of it.  They also correct the fatal flaw of the first
POWER RANGERS feature by dumping the computer-generated Zords and making
the final Megazord-vs.-megademon battle what it always should be:  a
battle of two guys in big rubber suits.  TURBO is unquestionably more fun
for kids than for adults, but it is put together with some care, and it's
a step in the right direction.  Who knows...some day the ever-evolving
Rangers might morph into a movie franchise worth watching.

Title
Review for Blink (1994)
Starring:  Madeleine Stowe, Aidan Quinn, Peter Friedman, James
Remar, Laurie Metcalf.
Screenplay:  Dana Stevens.
Director:  Michael Apted.
     Good thrillers are hard to find, and I am inordinately fond of
good thrillers.  In combination, these two factors lead me to do things
like give an "8" rating to MALICE (which I still defend, incidently).
The catharsis that a suspenseful tale provides seems to me to be the
essence of what movies are for many viewers: a visual rollercoaster.
However, far more common than good thrillers are slapdash would-be
scarefests stitched together from other better films like some
celluloid Frankenstein's monster.  Witness BLINK: one part REAR
WINDOW, two parts JENNIFER 8, and one part from just about every
suspense film cliche you could come up with if given a week to think
about it.
     BLINK tells the story of Emma Brody (Madeleine Stowe), a fiddle
player in a Celtic band who has been blind for twenty years.  One day
she receives a call from her doctor (Peter Friedman) that a cornea
transplant donor is at last available.  After the operation, Emma
experiences an odd side effect, a perceptual delay which causes things
seen initially only as blurs to jump into focus in the mind hours or
even days later.  This perceptual delay occurs when she spots a serial
killer leaving the scene of the crime in the apartment above her.  She
takes her information to Det. John Hallstrom (Aidan Quinn), but her
reliability as a witness is justifiably in question.  However, as
Hallstrom follows his only lead, he also gets involved with her.  Soon
it becomes clear that the killer knows there has been a witness, and
Emma finds herself next on his list.
     There are some things that BLINK tries to do differently that show
some early promise.  As played by Madeleine Stowe, Emma spends her
first few days with sight coming to terms with appearances, as it
matters to her for the first time whether she is considered pretty.
It's a nice bit of psychology for which I had high hopes.  Emma's
distorted vision is captured by some nifty computer effects and Dante
Spinotti's eerie photography, allowing us into her head quite
effectively.  It's too bad that potential is wasted on such a
positively bland story.  For a thriller, BLINK is almost completely
lacking in tension, its one good scare coming with Emma's first
recognition of the killer's face.  There's no opportunity to guess the
killer's identity, either, as clues yeield a "so what" result.  BLINK
just trudges along, focusing on a relationship between Hallstrom and
Emma which makes no sense.
     What is most distressing about that relationship is that it cops
out on its character development where it would have been most
interesting.  Stowe shows the blind Emma as confident and independent,
but without the omnipresent bitterness which characterizes so many
blind screen characters; then, in a bit of irony which might have made
O. Henry smile, she becomes dependent on others only when she can
finally see.  That internal conflict should have been the driving force
behind her relationship with Hallstrom:  while she needs the
reassurance he gives her that she's desirable, she hates that she needs
that reassurance.  But screenwriter Dana Stevens seems incapable of
that level of subtlety, and there seems to be no rhyme or reason to
their eventual (and inevitable) coupling, and subsequent conflict.  It
doesn't help that Hallstrom is basically a blank, and that Quinn does
nothing to make him particularly worth her time.
     If only that were the only fault in the script.  We start with the
now-ubiquitous serial killer, which if movies were to be believed are
virtually on every street corner, and head from there into
CinemaThrillerLand.  Here, dogs warn of impending danger, but are
heeded to late.  Here, cops always fall for the women they are assigned
to protect, and vice-versa.  Here, blind people always manage to have
their final confrontations with the killer in the dark.  Here, cops
exchange dialogue like:
     BLINK could have been a contender.  The elements were there.  It
was just too slow to make any of them count, and too timid to go to the
soul of the characters.

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
(Columbia/Castle Rock)
Starring:  Clint Eastwood, Gene Hackman, Ed Harris, Laura Linney, Scott
Glenn, Judy Davis, Dennis Haysbert, E. G. Marshall.
Screenplay:  William Goldman, based on the novel by David Baldacci.
Producers:  Clint Eastwood, Karen Spiegel.
Director:  Clint Eastwood.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, sexual situations)
Running Time:  120 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When we first encounter Luther Whitney (Clint Eastwood) in ABSOLUTE
POWER, he is sitting in an art gallery sketching hands and eyes from
paintings in one of those slow, silent moments characteristic of an
Eastwood-directed film.  Whitney, it turns out, is a professional thief,
and when he breaks into a massive house with walls covered in art, we
expect him to begin snaring the paintings.  Instead, he finds a walk-in
vault where he begins clearing out jewels, coins and cash.  At that
moment, you may be tempted to break into a slight smile, impressed that
Eastwood has merely fleshed out his character under the guise of plot
development.  Perhaps, you think, this won't be just another plot-driven
conspiracy thriller.  Perhaps three-dimensional characters are going to
make it something special.
     Just wait sixty seconds.  The events in ABSOLUTE POWER revolve around
what happens while Luther is in that vault, staring through one-way glass
at the two people who show up in the middle of the robbery.  One of them
is Christy Sullivan (Melora Hardin), wife of Washington power broker
Walter Sullivan (E. G. Marshall); the other is Alan Richmond, who happens
to be rather powerful in his own right -- he is the President of the
United States.  Both Christy and Richmond are drunk, their sex play gets
rough, and just as she is about to stab the President with a letter opener
Christy is blown away by two Secret Service men (Scott Glenn and Dennis
Haysbert).  Luther manages to escape, but the President's people know
there was a witness.  As they try to find Luther, the design a cover-up of
the murder as the result of a botched robbery, making Luther a prime
suspect.  And thus begins the plotboiler.
     Almost any other director would have taken this material and made it
a big, dumb Hollywood thriller -- and frankly, that probably would have
been the best thing for it.  Eastwood is a director with a precise control
over the details of his films, but in ABSOLUTE POWER he spends so much
time fussing over those details that he fails to notice that the story is
completely absurd.  Luther is able to take perfect photos of his estranged
daughter Kate (Laura Linney) without being noticed, but he does a complete
sketch of the Sullivan estate before robbing it; the President's tough
Chief-of-Staff (Judy Davis) turns into a giggling schoolgirl when she
thinks the President has given her a diamond necklace, then has a
conversation with him about the cover-up while they are dancing in front
of hundreds of people at a state dinner.  While Eastwood is able to
construct clockwork sequences like an ambush at a coffee shop, he doesn't
seem to care that, like much of what goes on in ABSOLUTE POWER, it is
resolved through pure coincidence.
     Even the casting manages to get in the way, specifically the casting
of Hackman as Richmond.  The press notes for ABSOLUTE POWER boast of
Hackman's career that "there is no such thing as a 'Gene Hackman role,'"
but that simply isn't true.  Hackman has gotten stuck in a rut as the
arrogant authority figure, and there is nothing to discover in his
performance.  It is also hard to figure out how the pathetic, libidinous
drunkard of that opening scene becomes the take-charge whip-cracker, or
why his press conference in support of his grieving friend Sullivan
demonstrates such a lousy poker face you wonder what kind of politician
this guy could possibly be.  The script, by the legendary William Goldman,
does offer a few nice touches and typically snappy dialogue, and Ed Harris
plays the detective investigating the murder as a courtly and respectful
spin on the usual foul-mouthed cop.  When a central character seems to be
a different person from scene to scene, however, those little details lose
a lot of their charm.
     That brings us to Eastwood's Luther Whitney, as baffling a screen
character as I can recall.  Eastwood's acting has grown more interesting
with the passing years, more relaxed and subtle, but he has devoted nearly
every ounce of energy in the creation of ABSOLUTE POWER to making his own
character sympathetic.  A pivotal moment in ABSOLUTE POWER finds Luther
catching the President's hypocritical press conference on television just
as he is preparing to flee the country, and deciding at that moment to
stay and fight the power.  Never mind that before that scene we had no
indication that Whitney even knew the man in the Sullivan house was the
President; in fact, the scene plays funnier and more interesting if
Whitney is such a recluse that he doesn't even know what the President
looks like.  But everything is subjugated to giving Luther the moral high
ground, making him a doting father and a good citizen with a handful of
quirky traits.  I'm willing to grant the conceit that Whitney is a
master of disguise even though it doesn't seem particularly necessary for
a sneak thief -- maybe he needed a hobby when he tired of sketching the
Old Masters in the Smithsonian -- but ABSOLUTE POWER lost me when it
became clear that this man who could disarm any security system in the
world couldn't program a VCR for his alibi.  Eastwood has turned out a
film which doesn't make a shred of sense, but at least we understand that
Luther was just an ordinary Joe Six-Pack who was stealing a million
dollars in jewels when he witnessed the President commit a sexy murder.

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
     There may not be a critic alive who harbors as much affection for
shlock monster movies as I do.  I delighted in the sneaky-smart
entertainment of Ron Underwood's big-underground-worm yarn TREMORS; I even
giggled at last year's critically-savaged big-underwater-snake yarn
ANACONDA.  Something about these films causes me to lower my inhibitions
and return to the Saturday afternoons of my youth, spent in the company of
Ghidrah, the Creature from the Black Lagoon and The Blob.
     DEEP RISING, a big-undersea-serpent yarn, doesn't quite pass the
test.  Sure enough, all the modern monster movie ingredients are in place:
a conspicuously multi-ethnic/multi-national collection of bait...excuse
me, characters; an isolated location, here a derelict cruise ship in the
South China Sea; some comic relief; a few CGI-enhanced gross-outs; and at
least one big explosion.  There are too-cheesy-to-be-accidental elements,
like a sleazy shipping magnate (Anthony Heald) who also appears to have a
doctorate in marine biology, or a slinky international jewel thief (Famke
Janssen) whose white cotton tank top hides a heart of gold.  As it
happens, DEEP RISING is noteworthy primarily for the mechanical manner in
which it spits out all those ingredients.  A terrorist crew, led by
squinty-eyed mercenary Hanover (Wes Studi) and piloted by squinty-eyed
boat captain Finnegan (Treat Williams), shows up to loot the cruise ship;
the sea monsters show up to eat the mercenary crew; a few survivors make
it to the closing credits.  And up go the lights.
     It's hard to work up much enthusiasm for this sort of joyless
film-making, especially when a monster moview should make you laugh every
time it makes you scream.  Here, the laughs are provided almost entirely
by Kevin J. O'Connor, generally amusing as the crew's fraidy-cat mechanic.
Writer/director Stephen Sommers seems most concerned with creating a tone
of action-horror menace -- something over-populated with gore-drenched
skeletons, something where the gunfire and special effects are taken a bit
too seriously.  DEEP RISING is missing that one unmistakable cue that
we're expected to have a ridiculous good time, not hide our eyes.
     Case it point, comparing DEEP RISING to its recent cousin ANACONDA.
In DEEP RISING, one of the creature's victims is regurgitated back into
view, partially digested and still alive.  He shrieks in horror at his
freakish appearance and pain, in a moment a bit too disturbing to be
laughable.  In ANACONDA, we also see a regurgitated victim, partially
digested and still alive.  He looks at another character...and winks.
Make no mistake, DEEP RISING has ANACONDA beat all to heck when it comes
to technical proficiency and pacing.  It's also gloomy, uninspired and not
nearly enough fun.  I don't ask much of my monster movies, but I do ask
that they act like monster movies.  You don't have to show me a
fantastically impressive, massive beast with tentacles a-flailing.  Just
show me the massive beast burping, and I'll figure you get the point.

Title
Review for Piano, The (1993)
Starring:  Holly Hunter, Harvey Keitel, Sam Neill, Anna Paquin.
Screenplay/Director:  Jane Campion.
     A couple of months ago, I finally saw Jane Campion's 1991 film AN
ANGEL AT MY TABLE.  I mention this only because I experienced a very
similar reaction to THE PIANO as I did to that film.  While I was not
instantly caught up in the story, its impact grew slowly, and in fact
it was not until a couple of days later that I realized what a powerful
work I had experienced.  THE PIANO is a bit less consistent than AN
ANGEL AT MY TABLE, but it is nevertheless an astonishingly literate
work, and a further step in the development of a major filmmaker.
     Set in 19th Century New Zealand, THE PIANO tells the story of Ada,
a Scotswoman who hasn't spoken since she was six years old.  At the
insistence of her father, Ada becomes a mail-order bride for Stewart, a
stolid settler among New Zealand's native Maori.  Ada brings with her a
young daughter, Flora (Anna Paquin), and her most prized possession, a
piano.  However, when Stewart arrives at the beach where Ada and her
belongings have been deposited, he orders the piano left behind.  It
comes into the possession of George Baines (Harvey Keitel), a rough and
illiterate laborer.  He offers Ada the chance to win back her piano in
exchange for some very specialized lessons, lessons which will lead to
a strange and dangerous romantic triangle.
     THE PIANO is so rich and multi-layered that it virtually defies
immediate reaction.  At its heart is a story of socially repressed
desires which calls to mind THE AGE OF INNOCENCE and THE REMAINS OF THE
DAY, but this film strengthens that theme by thrusting its characters
into an untamed setting.  In Ada, we are presented with a character
whose muteness represents the restrictions placed on her expression as
a woman, and who can only truly speak through her music.  It is only
when she finds herself in the less constrained world of the New Zealand
wilderness, and encounters a man who identifies with the more
naturalistic beliefs of the Maori, that she is able to rediscover some
semblance of her own voice.  THE PIANO is filled with images of culture
in conflict: Stewart perplexed by his inability to purchase sacred
Maori land for what he considers a fair price; a comical
misunderstanding during a melodramatic play; Stewart's outrage at Flora
joining Maori children in sexually suggestive behavior.  This conflict
lends added texture to Stewart's attempt to lock Ada into their house,
and the perplexed reaction of his housemaids.  Stewart is not trying to
keep the Maori out, but trying to prevent Ada from embracing their
world.
     As intricate as the script is, it is the intensity of the lead
performances which gives THE PIANO most of its power.  Holly Hunter has
been trumpeted since Cannes as an Oscar front-runner, and it's easy to
see why.  It's impossible to describe how expressive she manages to be,
in her face and with her body.  The literally breath-taking effect of
THE PIANO's climactic scene is exponentially multiplied by Hunter's
slow, lingering reaction.  Baines' role is less fully explained, a bit
too typological, but Keitel shows a surprising gentleness.  I may have
been most impressed by Sam Neill, freed from the straitjacket of
JURASSIC PARK to do some splendid acting.  His tormented personality is
riveting, and the scenes where he is driven to action ripple with
sublimated and misdirected passion.
     THE PIANO's only real stumble is the decision to begin and end the
film with a voiceover narration of Ada's thoughts.  Hunter's attempt at
a Scotch accent is shaky, and it detracts somehow from the experience
to be allowed inside Ada's head.  Otherwise, Campion crafts a stunning
film.  Stuart Dryburgh's dynamic cinematography helps capture the power
of coastline and forest, and Campion's voyeuristic camera placement is
thrilling.  It's no longer sufficient or appropriate to refer to Jane
Campion as one of the best woman director's working; she is simply one
of the best directors, and THE PIANO is one of the most haunting films
of the year.

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
THE STRAIGHT STORY
(Disney)
Starring:  Richard Farnsworth, Sissy Spacek, Everett McGill, John Farley,
Jennifer Edwards-Hughes, Harry Dean Stanton.
Screenplay:  John Roach and Mary Sweeney.
Producers:  Mary Sweeney and Neil Edelstein.
Director:  David Lynch.
MPAA Rating:  G (mild profanity)
Running Time:  111 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In most exceptional films, there is a moment early on when you can
just tell you're tapped into something special. That moment in THE
STRAIGHT STORY comes as Alvin Straight (Richard Farnsworth), a 73-year-old
widower with failing eyesight and failing hips, begins the true-story trek
at the center of the film. Having recently learned that his estranged
brother Lyle has had a stroke, Alvin decides it's time to make amends. He
sets out from his home in Laurens, Iowa to Lyle's home in Mt. Zion,
Wisconsin on the only transportation at his disposal: a riding lawnmower.
As Alvin hits the two-lane highway, director David Lynch slowly pans up
from Alvin to the cloud-filled sky above the Iowa fields. He holds that
shot for what seems like a full minute, then slowly pans back down...  
where we see Alvin's puttering rig about 100 yards from where we last saw
it.
     I think that shot might have been one of the best of the year even if
its only purpose had been as a shaggy dog joke. But it's more than that;
it's a remarkably efficient tone-setter. Instantly, you know this is going
to be a rather unique travelogue. You can begin to appreciate the truly
inspired combination of Freddie Francis's cinematography and Angelo
Badalamenti's fiddle-and-guitar road music that makes THE STRAIGHT STORY
so evocative in its heartland sincerity. And you understand that slow,
methodical persistence is central to this story's success -- not just in
Alvin's journey, but in Lynch's willingness to ask his audience for some
patience as the film unfolds.
     If you're busy rubbing your eyes incredulously, wondering if we could
possibly be talking about the same David Lynch who made "Twin Peaks," BLUE
VELVET and LOST HIGHWAY, let me assure you that we are. We're also talking
about the same David Lynch who made THE ELEPHANT MAN, another fact-based
story overflowing with compassion and humanity. There may be something
about working from real life that keeps Lynch anchored, and it's a style
that suits him well. As provocative as his more surreal films have been,
they can make it difficult to appreciate what a talented director he is
between the cringes and the head-scratching. In THE STRAIGHT STORY, he is
more in command of his simple visual storytelling than he has ever been,
which is not necessarily saying that THE STRAIGHT STORY is his best film.
It's simply obvious, with none of the grotesquerie characteristic of other
Lynch films, that he knows exactly what works for any given story.
     He also knows that THE STRAIGHT STORY is more than a bunch of pretty
pictures of the American midwest. Richard Farnsworth's performance is so
low-key and naturalistic that it may not seem there's a lot going on, but
Alvin Straight is a superbly crafted character. Senior citizens rarely get
the kind of showcase THE STRAIGHT STORY provides, and Farnsworth does
beautiful things with Alvin. It's always clear that he's a stubborn man,
but it becomes clear that he's also a man trying to make the wisdom of his
years mean something. His journey to reconcile with Lyle becomes a chance
to show he's learned what matters, and that difficult moments in life can
be overcome by one selfless act. If you're unmoved by Lyle's (Harry Dean
Stanton) silent realization of what Alvin has done for him, then movies
may hold no power to move you.
     It's true that Alvin's homespun homilies -- to a teenage runaway he 
encounters; to young cyclists; to the feuding twins who fix his lawnmower
-- do drag THE STRAIGHT STORY down a bit. Farnsworth does a fine job of
pulling all possible sanctimony out of those scenes, but the film is still
stronger when it's quiet and observant, soaring on the skills of Francis
and Badalamenti. There's also a sly sense of humor to THE STRAIGHT STORY,
including Lynch's ability to poke fun at himself. In a very early scene,
he trains his camera on a front yard, where a heavy-set woman lies tanning
herself. It's exactly the kind of scene where Lynch might have dipped into
the creatures beneath the green lawn, or found some other bit of suburban
horror. In THE STRIAGHT STORY, he just tells a straight story, finding
poetry in the simple reliability of a lawnmower's slow, steady journey.

Title
Review for Clear and Present Danger (1994)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Willem Dafoe, Joaquim de Almeida, Henry
Czerny, Donald Moffatt, Anne Archer.
Screenplay:  Donald Stewart, Steven Zaillian and John Milius.
Director:  Phillip Noyce.
     Pyrotechnicians have had quite a showcase summer at the movies.
It seems as though something has been blowing up around every corner--a
freight jet in SPEED, the Seven Mile Bridge in TRUE LIES, half of
Boston in BLOWN AWAY.  There are also explosions in CLEAR AND PRESENT
DANGER, the latest adaptation of Tom Clancy's best-selling novels, but
don't let them fool you into thinking that's all there is to it.  CLEAR
AND PRESENT DANGER is the summer's sharpest thriller, less break-neck
than SPEED but just as consistently tense, and is a quantum improvement
over the disappointing PATRIOT GAMES.
     Harrison Ford takes his second turn as Jack Ryan, an upright CIA
man who finds himself in the middle of a huge government conspiracy.
When an old friend of the President (Donald Moffatt) is murdered over
double-dealings with a Columbian drug cartel, the Chief Executive makes
it clear that a military response is in order.  CIA Director of
Operations Robert Ritter (Henry Czerny) hires ex- Company man Clark
(Willem Dafoe) to lead commando missions to shut down the drug lords,
prompting a counter-response from one of drug lord Escobedo (Miguel
Sandoval) and his chief lietenant Cortez (Joaquim de Almeida).  When
Ryan takes over for his ailing boss (James Earl Jones), he begins to
realize that something is rotten in the U.S. government, and sets out
both to find the paper trail that leads to the top and to save the
American soldiers stranded by another executive order.
     I wasn't terribly optimistic about CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER after
director Phillip Noyce's sluggish work on PATRIOT GAMES and the
appalling SLIVER, but his work here positively crackles.  He turns a
showdown in a single barricaded street into a chase as exciting as 90%
of cinematic car chases covering miles of ground, a chaotic and dynamic
set piece.  The level of tension is nearly perfect in scenes that
ordinarily would be hum-drum, like a walk through an airport where Ryan
is being shadowed by Clark, but we're often unsure where Clark is.  And
in one of DANGER's snappiest sequences, Ryan races to download evidence
from Ritter's computer files before they are deleted.  There are a few
moments where Noyce goes overboard, like an inexplicable slow-motion
shot of Escobedo in a batting cage, and a sequence at a funeral that
plays far too much like the baptism sequence from THE GODFATHER.  These
are minor quibbles, however, in a film that comes off as one of the
best espionage thrillers in a decade.
     It might have been even better if Harrison Ford had managed to
break out of his recent habit of playing every part in a slight daze.
To his credit, he seems to have re-discovered Jack Ryan the desk
jockey, looking comically uncomfortable traipsing through the jungle
and providing a very reluctant heroism.  But ever since PRESUMED
INNOCENT in 1990, Ford has been doing variations on his overwhelmed
Everyman, and as a result is beginning to look even older than his
years.  CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER asks very little from its cast as a
whole, though, so Ford's lower-than-low-key Ryan doesn't seriously
detract from the proceedings.  Only James Earl Jones, spending most of
his scenes in a hospital gown, truly energizes his role, though Willem
Dafoe does out-charisma Ford in the supporting role of Clark.
     But let's be real here: no one expected James Bond to be
multi-faceted and tormented.  CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is thoroughly
plot-driven from minute one, and its oddball screenwriting team of John
(RED DAWN) Milius and Steven (SCHINDLER'S LIST) Zaillian (along with
Donald Stewart) do an impressive job with a challenging adaptation.  If
political moralizing isn't your cup of tea, be forewarned: CLEAR AND
PRESENT DANGER has more than its share.  It also has as much action as
the bloated TRUE LIES, and nearly as many honest laughs.  What THE
FUGITIVE was to 1993, CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is to 1994, a
pulse-pounding late summer surprise with smarts.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
     There's bad buzz, and then there's the the bad buzz which surrounded
THE AVENGERS, the kind that sounds like a swarm of Africanized bees after
a particularly vigorous hive-shaking.  Disastrous test screenings, it was
said, had led to a furious round of damage control, including multiple
re-shoots of the ending, a release date bumped to the dog days of August,
and forty minutes axed from the original running time.  A gratuitous
"f-word" had even been added to bump the rating from a PG to PG-13.  Then,
all the worst fears seemed to be confirmed when Warner Bros. announced
that no advance screenings would be held for the media.  How fulsome a
stink bomb could they be hiding?
     You may think you're ready for the possibility that a film could be
bad, but little can prepare you for something as pointless, smug and
misguided as THE AVENGERS.  Like the 1960s British television series of
the same name, it concerns a dapper secret agent named John Steed (Ralph
Fiennes) partnered by his employers at the Ministry with slinky but
dangerous Mrs. Emma Peel (Uma Thurman) to protect the world from evil.
Evil in this case takes the form of Sir August DeWynter (Sean Connery), a
disgruntled former government worker who now can control the world's
weather.  Thus is is up to Steed and Peel to save the world from
meteorological extortion, whenever they have time between rounds of
calculated badinage.
     It is the latter which proves most instantly and consistently grating
in THE AVENGERS.  Ralph Fiennes and Uma Thurman spend most of their scenes
together engaging in a smirk throwing contest, each one trying to look the
most amused with him or herself, eyebrows so prominently arched you're
afraid someone might sprain something.  This despite the fact that Don
Macpherson's dialogue is a study in witlessness, tossing out embarrassing
puns as though they were saucy enough to turn Oscar Wilde green with envy.
Though they generally appear content to let their wardrobe do most of the
acting for them, Fiennes and Thurman should be commended for one
impressive demonstration of dramatic skill:  they're able to treat the
most mundane comments as though they were nuggets of pure comic gold
bestowed upon the world.
     That kind of quip-heavy self-awareness was certainly true of the
namesake television series as well, so what's so wrong with this variation
on the theme?  In short, both the personnel and the context.  Patrick
Macnee and Diana Rigg, the most celebrated of the series' pairings, shared
a genuine chemistry which made the romantic tension fun to watch.  Fiennes
and Thurman appear far too enamored of their own charm and cleverness to
bother connecting with one another.  They're also dropped into a summer
blockbuster milieu entirely inappropriate for light-hearted capering.
Imagine an episode of the old "Batman" series with a $70 million budget,
and you'll understand what's so wrong with THE AVENGERS.  It's hard to
endear yourself to an audience with low-tech campiness at the same time
you're blowing something up every 10 minutes, or sending huge mechanical
insects after our heroes like something out of the speeder bike chase from
RETURN OF THE JEDI.
     We're long past the point of pretending that plot or character has
anything to do with 1990s-model Hollywood summer fare, so I won't even
bother slapping THE AVENGERS around for exhibiting symptoms of that
particular contagious disease.  But such a film has to give you something
to latch on to:  engaging performers, effective pacing, a decent villain
to hiss.  Not even Sean Connery, blustering about without the faintest
idea why his character does anything, can pump up the charisma quotient of
this tedious car wreck of a film.  The closest recent analog to THE
AVENGERS is BATMAN AND ROBIN, but at least BATMAN AND ROBIN had its sheer
momenteum and comic-book gaudiness to salvage it.  THE AVENGERS is just
action sequences in search of a movie, actors in search of a reason to
keep smirking.  Crimes against film audiences must be avenged; the buzz of
surly patrons coming out of the theater may be even more frightening than
the buzz on the film.

Title
Review for Secret of Roan Inish, The (1994)
Starring:  Mick Lally, Eileen Colgan, Jeni Courtney, Richard
Sheridan, John Lynch.
Screenplay/Director:  John Sayles.
     That John Sayles continues to make films is something of a
testimony to his dedication, and that his films continue to be
released is a testimony to an audience somewhere out there with
taste and intelligence.  Sayles has been relentlessly his own animal
as a writer-director, making movies like THE BROTHER FROM ANOTHER
PLANET, MATEWAN and PASSION FISH which have been marketing
nightmares because they were unique tales that a single tag line
couldn't capture.  As those examples also show, Sayles doesn't help
his cause any with catchy titles.  THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH is
another of Sayles' unconventional efforts, and yet another work of
art, a beautifully filmed tale of myth, magic and the power of oral
history.
     THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH opens in 1946, with 10-year-old Irish
girl Fiona Coneelly (Jeni Courtney) being sent away to live with her
grandparents on the isle's Western coast after the death of her
mother.  Grandfather Hugh (Mick Lally) is a fisherman who tells
Fiona tales of the family history, and brings her out to the
family's abandoned lands on the island of Roan Inish.  It was during
the family's mass departure from the island five years earlier that
Fiona's infant brother Jamie was washed out to sea in his cradle, an
event which still troubles Grandmother Tess (Eileen Colgan).  But
Tadhg (John Lynch), a Coneelly cousin, tells Fiona of a legend
connecting the Coneelly family to the seals of Roan Inish, a legend
which strengthens Fiona's belief that Jamie is still alive and
living on Roan Inish.
     I have made no secret in the past of my inordinate fondness for
tales of mythical Ireland (most recently 1993's INTO THE WEST), and
it is true that THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH plays to all of my
weaknesses.  Gifted cinematographer Haskell Wexler captures stunning
land- and seascapes with clarity even through layers of mist, and
his interiors are close but inviting.  Mason Daring's arrangements
of traditional folk melodies provide the perfect complement to
Wexler's images, full of soaring tin whistle and plaintive violin.
Most effective is Sayles' unsentimental directing style, which
presents ROAN INISH's more mythical elements so matter-of-factly
that they take on even more of an aura of wonder.  The Ireland of
THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH is full of magic, and Sayles presents magic
as an understood part of the tapestry of Irish life.
     What keeps the magic alive, however, is the oral tradition, and
this is what Sayles is truly celebrating in THE SECRET OF ROAN
INISH.  Several key events in the film unfold in flashback, but
always accompanied by the voice of a tale-teller (usually Hugh, on
one occasion Tadhg).  Even though we are also seeing the events
described, it is the words which are truly memorable, spoken with
passion and conviction, a direct link through time between
individuals and their history.  The story eventually becomes very
much about the consequences of abandoning one's history, and Sayles
makes his case strongly for the importance of maintaining those
connections, as well as the sheer joy to be derived from the
sharing of family legends.  At a time when tradition is a somewhat
unfashionable concept, Sayles has crafted a love poem to tradition.
     There is probably not a single name or face in the cast of ROAN
INISH which is familiar to American audiences, but the performances
are mostly charming and understated.  Mick Lally is delightful as
the seafaring grandfather, and John Lynch is dark and mysterious in
a small but significant role.  Newcomers Jeni Courtney (Fiona) and
Richard Sheridan (Fiona's cousin and co-conspirator Eamon) have
their weak moments, but are basically solid.  THE SECRET OF ROAN
INISH is lyrical, low-key and evocative, which could translate to
"slow and boring" for some audiences.  Those with a taste for
something crafted with grace, confidence and a feel for the power of
a well-told tale will find this one SECRET worth sharing.

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Robin Williams, Billy Crystal, Julia Louis-Dreyfuss, Charlie
Hofheimer, Nastassja Kinski, Bruce Greenwood.
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, based on LES COMPERES by
Francis Veber.
Producers:  Ivan Reitman and Joel Silver.
Director:  Ivan Reitman.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I don't even need to have seen the infotainment show interviews of
Billy Crystal and Robin Williams to know the substance of them.  "Well,"
Billy/Robin would say, "Robin/Billy and I have been looking for a long
time for a project where we could work together, and FATHERS' DAY seemed
like the perfect opportunity."  "Yeah," Robin/Billy would then chime in,
"we had a great time making it."  Whereupon would ensue much good-natured
riffing between the two, guaranteed to have the hosts chuckling merrily as
we returned to the studio.  For those uninitiated in promo-speak, allow me
to provide a translation.  The real plot of FATHERS' DAY has nothing to
do with two men -- attorney Jack Lawrence (Crystal) and struggling
writer/performer Dale Putley (Williams) -- who are both told by the same
ex-lover (Nastassja Kinski) that one of them is the father of her runaway
17-year-old son Scott (Charlie Hofheimer).  The real plot of FATHERS' DAY
is Robin Williams and Billy Crystal running around being Robin Williams
and Billy Crystal.
    That plot shouldn't have been too hard to pull off.  Crystal and
Williams are funny, talented men, and the screenwriting team of Lowell
Ganz and Babaloo Mandel has produced charmers like SPLASH, PARENTHOOD and
CITY SLICKERS.  FATHERS' DAY, however, isn't merely disappointing.  It is
one of the laziest and most ineptly constructed comedies of the decade.  I
spent 101 minutes staring at a screen in blank-faced astonishment, waiting
for this group of talented people to show me something remotely
entertaining.  I wanted someone, anyone, to explain to me what in God's
name they were thinking when they set this beast in motion.
     Of course, I knew the answer to that question.  They were thinking
that they had Robin Williams and Billy Crystal, and that everything else
would just sort itself out.  FATHERS' DAY is filled with scenes where it
looked like the script consisted of the phrase "Robin does something crazy
here."  You can see it when Williams tries out different ways to greet his
new-found son; you can see it when Williams pretends to be a German record
producer for the express purpose of rattling off a string of car names in
a funny accent.  It is the rare film which has made good use of Williams'
improvisational skills -- GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM comes to mind.  More
frequently, a careless creative team like this one will use Williams as a
comedic "In-a-Gadda-Da-Vida" drum solo, filling time between "Fade In" and
"Fade Out."  Without a structure to contain him, Robin Williams becomes a
train just looking for a place to jump the tracks.
     Crystal isn't even _that_ lucky, consigned with the rest of the cast
to picking up whatever scraps Williams leaves behind.  He plays the Felix
Unger in this odd couple road show, maintaining the same vaguely perturbed
expression for roughly the entire film.  You might think FATHERS' DAY
would be built around the conflict between the opposing personalities of
the two leads -- Crystal as the uptight lawyer and Williams as the
unhinged creative type -- but you'd be wrong.  Williams and Crystal hardly
raise their voices to one another, perhaps fearing that the audience only
wants to see them as funny chums.  The film is so desperate for some kind
of conflict that it drags in a couple of drug dealers, as well as Scott's
_other_ father (Bruce Greenwood).  Respectively, they provide the
opportunity to watch a mosh pit full of head-butting and a Port-a-Potty
sliding down a hillside.  Thanks for coming.
     Most critics tend to reserve their greatest outrage for films
featuring Pauly Shore, Chris Farley or even Jim Carrey, perhaps believing
that moronic physical comedy is what's wrong with modern film-making.  I
consider FATHERS' DAY more contemptible by far.  Whatever else one might
think about Farley or Carrey, they give everything they've got to a role.
No one involved in FATHERS' DAY even seems to be trying.  The performances
are lifeless, the plot incorporates that over-used trope of the workaholic
who gets religion about family life, and the dialogue is so devoid of
creativity that it re-cycles a gag about the odds of Lou Gehrig dying of
Lou Gehrig's Disease (comparative stories about how long ago you first
heard that one mailed to this address, please).  I'm sure the stars had a
wonderful time making FATHERS' DAY, just like Burt Reynolds, Dom DeLuise
and company had a wonderful time making those CANNONBALL RUN movies.  As
the credits started to role, I began to hope that FATHERS' DAY would
include out-takes, something to justify my time.  They also would have
provided a fitting post-card coda for a film which amounts to a working
vacation for Robin Williams and Billy Crystal at our expense:  "Having a
good time -- glad you were there."

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
THE SIEGE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Denzel Washington, Annette Bening, Bruce Willis, Tony Shalhoub,
Sami Bouajila.
Screenplay:  Lawrence Wright and Menno Meyjes & Edward Zwick.
Producers:  Lynda Obst and Edward Zwick.
Director:  Edward Zwick.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The makers of THE SIEGE probably are throwing up their hands,
baffled by the protests voiced by Arab-American groups.  The basic set-up,
understandably, could hit a nerve:  Arab terrorists, incensed over U.S.
involvement in the disappearance of an Islamic religious/political leader,
begin a massive bombing campaign in New York City.  Initially, a joint
task force led by F.B.I. special agent Anthony Hubbard (Denzel Washington)
is on the case, but tensions and animosities rise as they are unable to
end the bombings.  Eventually, the President imposes martial law in New
York, charging U.S. Army General William Devereaux (Bruce Willis) with
driving the perpetrators from hiding in Brooklyn's Arab-American community
into the open -- even if it means imprisoning every young male of Arabic
descent to find them.
     You can feel co-writer/director Edward Zwick straining for every
possible opportunity to make it clear that THE SIEGE is _not_ about
Arab-bashing.  Hubbard's partner Frank Haddad (Tony Shalhoub) is a
Lebanese-born naturalized citizen; representatives from Arab-American
anti-defamation groups stand up in meetings to voice their patriotism and
to denounce terrorism; ominous music accompanies every shot of
Arab-Americans trapped behind barbed wire fences; even the motivations of
the terrorists are traced more to duplicitous U.S. foreign policy
decisions than to fanatacism.  As THE SIEGE builds to a series of speeches
condemning the idea that extremism in the defense of security is no vice,
you know that Zwick wants audiences to feel him championing the notion
that Islam does not equal violent zealotry -- that Arab-Americans are
people too.
     There's one very important thing missing from THE SIEGE, however:  a
genuine connection to the people who are suffering.  The film doesn't
spend a second of personal time with a character actually interned in a
detention camp, nor with individuals tortured by the military for
information, nor with anyone victimized by anti-Arab hate crimes.  They
appear in forlorn masses, in news footage, or hidden behind doors.  Yes,
Shalhoub does get dialogue expressing outrage when his teenage son is
taken prisoner, but the sentiment feels second-hand and token.  During its
final hour, THE SIEGE becomes a thoroughly generic thriller of chases and
speeches -- more interested in being provocative than being empathetic,
and more interested in the _idea_ of trampled rights than those whose
rights are being trampled.
     In fact, it's a shame THE SIEGE had to go there at all, because its
first hour works so well as a crackling police procedure drama.
Washington shares some exceptional scenes with Annette Bening as a
secretive C.I.A. operative whose agenda may be very personal; their
clashing tactics -- the rule of law vs. the rule of expediency -- make for
first rate and surprisingly platitude-free sparring.  Zwick directs the
early action sequences with energy and economy, anchored by the
always-satisfying images of determined people going about a difficult job
with hard-nosed efficiency.
     That exceptional first hour deteriorates into bloated nonsense as
soon as Willis's General Devereaux starts marching his troops across the
Brooklyn Bridge.  Willis himself is a huge part of the problem, taking a
potentially complex character and quickly turning him into a sneering
caricature of military sadism.  Even the fundamental honor and decency
Washington brings to every role starts to seem like sanctimony, because
the script isn't serious about getting into the gray areas of individual
rights vs. societal needs.  The concept deserves more than heroes and
villains pointing guns at each other.  Arab-Americans may be troubled by
the idea that some Arab characters are portrayed as terrorists in THE
SIEGE.  They should be more troubled by the idea that, in a film with such
an incendiary premise, Arab characters in general are more symbolic than
substantial.

Title
Review for All the Pretty Horses (2000)
ALL THE PRETTY HORSES
(Miramax)
Starring:  Matt Damon, Henry Thomas, Lucas Black, Penelope Cruz, Ruben
Blades, Julio Oscar Mechoso, Miriam Colon.
Screenplay:  Ted Tally, based on the novel by Cormac McCarthy.
Producers:  Robert Salerno and Billy Bob Thornton.
Director:  Billy Bob Thornton.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  117 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In Billy Bob Thornton's adaptation of the award-winning novel ALL THE
PRETTY HORSES, two young Texans hit the trail for Mexico in 1949. And they
meet up with another young Texan. And they get into some trouble with the
law. And they go to work on a Mexican ranch. And one of them has some
trouble with a woman. And they have some more trouble with the law. And
then the same one of them has more trouble with the same woman. And then
there's more trouble with the law. And then the movie ends.
     Thornton and Miramax feuded for a year over the length of the film,
with the director originally turning in a two-and-a-half hour cut before
finally paring it down to under two hours. The resulting film is the best
evidence that Thornton was right. ALL THE PRETTY HORSES is a film that
wants to achieve an epic scope, but where plot points keep rolling by so
quickly that there's no time for anything to resonate. It's a picturesque
travelogue made for Short Attention Span Theatre.
     The tale does begin in 1949, where a young man named John Grady Cole
(Matt Damon) is at a crossroads. His mother is preparing to sell the
family ranch, leaving John Grady adrift. He decides to look for work as a
ranch hand in Mexico, joined on the journey by his best friend Lacey
Rawlins (Henry Thomas). Along the way they hook up with a young runaway
named Jimmy Blevins (Lucas Black), but separate again after one of the
aforementioned run-ins with the law. Eventually, John Grady and Lacey land
at the ranch of the wealthy Senor Rocha (Ruben Blades), where John Grady
becomes fascinated with Rocha's daughter Alejandra (Penelope Cruz). And
the complications progress from there.
     Boy, do they ever. One of the most impressive elements of Cormac
McCarthy's novel was how he was able to take such a plot-heavy story and
make it feel rich and profound. Ted Tally's script retains the laconic
cowboy dialogue, but the structure is a mess. The set-up concerning John
Grady's fragmented family is dispatched in a few snippets of film and some
voice-over, providing little foundation for the journey that is to come.
In some earlier incarnation, Tally may have provided more fleshing out for
the individual story elements, more gradual build-up for the drama. In the
two hours ALL THE PRETTY HORSES now takes on screen, there's a sense in
virtually every scene that someone was standing over the editor's
shoulder, tapping his watch and muttering, "Come on, we gotta get to the
skinny-dipping  come on, we gotta get to the knife fight."
     The really unfortunate part is that you can see a quality film
screaming to get loose. Damon continues to impress as an actor, finding
the search for stability and integrity in John Grady. Thomas is also
solid, and Lucas Black grabs the screen in his smaller role as the
high-strung Blevins. The film is strongest before the main characters
arrive at the Rocha ranch, lingering on the relationships between the
three travelers as they leave their familiar country. It's easy to
understand what the film-makers are reaching for in their exploration of a
changing country and the disappearance of a slower, simpler way of life.
It's far more difficult to get caught up in those themes while trying to
keep up with the latest dramatic development in John Grady's life.
     Ordinarily, it might be worth commending ALL THE PRETTY HORSES for
not arbitrarily turning the romantic sub-plot into the entire focus of the
film (though it's still the entire focus of the ad campaign). This isn't
really a story about John Grady doin' the hoochie-coochie with his little
senorita, and while Penelope Cruz is quite scrumptious to look at, she
doesn't exactly create a complex character. It's a bit of a surprise when
the film moves along for another twenty minutes or so of loose-end-tying
after the love story has been resolved, but in this case, it doesn't feel
like a daring or unconventional choice. It simply feels like another
example of a film that's almost never in the moment, so desperate to dash
off that you suspect the whole crew was renting its equipment by the
minute. So much for a celebration of a slower, simpler way of life.

Title
Review for Secrets & Lies (1996)
     If the ancient Greeks hadn't already defined drama as character in
action, Mike Leigh would have had to do it.  Leigh, along with Ken Loach,
Eric Rohmer and John Sayles, is in that exclusive company of film-makers
who understand that an effective story is not simply what happens to the
people on the screen -- it _is_ the people on the screen.  A Mike Leigh
film is the ultimate in low concept, the actors burying themselves so
deeply in their characters that they are able to tear out their hearts and
lay them bare.  SECRETS & LIES is about human beings, and that is what
makes it a rarity; what makes it great is how compelling the interaction
between those human beings turns out to be.
     SECRETS & LIES begins with a funeral for the adoptive mother of
Hortense Cumberbatch (Marianne Jean-Baptiste), a young black optometrist
in London.  Hortense decides that it is time to seek out her birth mother
at last, and the woman she finds is Cynthia Purley (Brenda Blethyn), a
factory worker with another illegitimate daughter, 20-year-old Roxanne
(Claire Rushbrook).  Initially in deep denial over their relationship,
Cynthia eventually warms to Hortense, and the two begin to form a
friendship.  But there is the question of how to introduce Hortense to the
rest of the family, a question complicated by the fact that tensions
already run deep and unspoken within the Purley family.
     There are so many brilliantly shaded characterizations in SECRETS &
LIES that the Oscars could find contenders in every major category if the
voters were inclined to notice.  Timothy Spall does a wondrous thing by
giving an urgency to a fundamentally decent man, a professional
photographer whose professional life is an attempt to capture moments of
serenity he is unable to find at home; Phyllis Logan invests Monica with a
reservoir of bitterness over her inability to have children, a bitterness
which spills over into contempt for Cynthia.  Marianne Jean-Baptiste's
Hortense is a quiet, centered woman who sees the life she might have led
in her half-sister Roxanne, played with a perpetual sneer by Claire
Rushbrook.  Even minor roles -- the social worker (Lesley Manville) who
gives Hortense the information she seeks; Maurice's one-time mentor (Ron
Cook), now a shattered alcoholic -- are so complete that SECRETS & LIES
grips you with its refusal to permit the intrusion of one-dimensional
characters.
     With so many superb characterizations in SECRETS & LIES, it is all
the more extraordinary that Brenda Blethyn's work leaps out at you.
Cynthia Purley is a woman whose entire life has been a desperate search
for someone to show her affection, a search which has resulted mostly in
pain, and Blethyn makes her one of the most heartbreaking characters I
have ever seen committed to film.  The scene in which Cynthia and Hortense
meet for the first time is staged by Leigh in one mesmerizing seven minute
take, with Blethyn taking us through a dizzying array of emotions:
regret, fear, anxiety, embarrassment, pride, relief.  Every word out of
Blethyn's mouth comes from the soul of a real person who wants nothing
more than happiness for herself and her family, and finds herself on the
verge of falling apart every time she is disappointed.  It is an utterly
remarkable piece of acting.
     As fascinating as all these individuals are, however, it is the way
in which they are joined to tell a story of a family in crisis which
elevates SECRETS & LIES.  The final act of the film takes place at a
birthday party for Roxanne, with Hortense attending as Cynthia's "friend,"
her true identity unknown to anyone else.  Scene after scene explores the
dynamics of familial interaction, with resentments bubbling just beneath
the surface at every moment, and shows how the things we hide from the
people who are supposed to be closest to us in our lives create mountains
of unresolved issues.  Leigh is so skillful for so long that it is a
genuine shame that the final fifteen minutes are devoted largely to an
over-wrought airing of emotional dirty laundry, with tears, speeches and
accusations flying across the living room.  He didn't need manufactured
drama of that sort, because the characters in SECRETS & LIES live lives of
everyday drama.  They, and Mike Leigh's film, are beautiful simply because
they are human.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
WHAT PLANET ARE YOU FROM?
(Columbia)
Starring:  Garry Shandling, Annette Bening, John Goodman, Greg Kinnear,
Ben Kingsley, Linda Fiorentino, Judy Greer, Richard Jenkins.
Screenplay:  Michael Leeson & Garry Shandling and Peter Tolan.
Producers:  Mike Nichols, Garry Shandling and Neil Machlis.
Director:  Mike Nichols.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, nudity)
Running Time:  103 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I started to get a sense for how good WHAT PLANET ARE YOU FROM? could
be at around the fifth or sixth iteration of The Gag. It's the running gag
that comes from the unique identity of its main character, an alien known
on his home planet as H1449-6 (Garry Shandling) but tagged Harold Anderson
for his mission on earth. Part of an emotionless all-male race that
reproduces via cloning and has conquest of other worlds always on its
mind, Harold is sent to our world to impregnate an earth woman, thus 
preparing the way for an invasion through alien progeny. Unfortunately,
the men of this world have evolved without genitalia for lack of need, so
Harold is equipped with an artificial organ -- one that hums when he is
aroused.
     As a gimmick, it's positively inspired, providing an auditory cue
for every time Harold starts feeling a bit randy. It's also a gimmick that
could have grown really old really fast, turning WHAT PLANET ARE YOU 
FROM? into a one-joke movie without much to laugh at. I'm guessing that
there are probably three dozen humming penis gags in WHAT PLANET ARE
YOU FROM? And I'll be damned if I didn't laugh at every one of them.
     The reason the joke works for so long and with so many variations is
that Shandling (who also co-wrote) and company realize that you can still
write a smart comic script that happens to include some lowbrow subjects
(he proved that point for several years on "The Larry Sanders Show." Part
high-concept comedy, part broad farce and part exploration of male-female
dynamics, it's actually a clever spin on relationship tomes like "Men Are
from Mars, Women Are from Venus" and "You Just Don't Understand." Plenty
of sharp self-help comedy comes from Shandling's relationship with
recovering alcoholic Susan (Annette Bening), and novice lover Harold's
difficulties understanding his new compaion. Meanwhile, the supporting
cast offers plenty of support:  Greg Kinnear as Harold's sexually and
professionally predatory co-worker; Ben Kingsley as the dead-serious
leader of Harold's planet; and the ever-reliable John Goodman as an FAA
investigator who may be on to Harold's identity.
     I suppose you could say WHAT PLANET ARE YOU FROM? is sort of an
unruly film. Actually, it's a _very_ unruly film, often leaping through
sub-plots and minor characters too quickly to do them justice. Goodman's
troubles with his wife, which might have made a marvelous counterpoint to
the alien's relationship troubles, instead serve as the source for a
couple of throwaway gags. Linda Fiorentino is woefully underused as
Kinnear's femme fatale-ish wife, and there's a rushed feeling to all the
scenes on Harold's home world (as though the budget wasn't quite there for
a more thorough peek at their culture). For a film from Mike Nichols -- a
director whose films almost always click with comic precision -- WHAT
PLANET is a bit ragged and scattershot.
     And it's also very, very funny. Films with laugh-out-loud moments are
embarassingly rare, which makes it all the more wonderful that WHAT PLANET
hits on so many levels of humor. The dialogue is full of the kind of  
razor-sharp punch lines that recall vintage Woody Allen. Subtle bits of
physical acting add kick to the simplest scenes (watch for Shandling's
priceless change of expression during his first date with Susan). 
Predictable sight gags are given unpredictable twists. A weird shift to a
hard-boiled exchange between Shandling and Goodman adds an effectivley
bizarre late change of pace. Even the warmer moments of gentle character
humor work. But most of all, there's The Gag -- not necessarily because it
inspires the biggest laughs, but because it inspires the most. WHAT
PLANET ARE YOU FROM? may be messy, but it sure is plenty entertaining. 
Shandling and his cohorts prove that exquisite execution can take even the
silliest concepts and make them ... well, hum. 

Title
Review for While You Were Sleeping (1995)
Starring:  Sandra Bullock, Bill Pullman, Peter Gallagher,
           Jack Warden, Peter Boyle.
Screenplay:  Daniel G. Sullivan and Fredric Lebow.
Director:  Jon Turtletaub.
     When--and for that matter, why--did SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE
become the sine qua non for any critical blurb for a romantic
comedy?  "This year's SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE!" they rave, or
"SLEEPLESS IN (insert name of city in which film is set here)."
Actually, the "why" part is easy; SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE was a huge
box office success and an easy point of reference for an idealized
modern romance.  WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING is already drawing
comparisons to the 1993 hit with some basis, but not because Bill
Pullman is in the cast or the word "sleep" is in the title.  Both
funnier and more genuinely romantic than SLEEPLESS, WHILE YOU WERE
SLEEPING seems destined to be for Sandra Bullock what SLEEPLESS was
for Meg Ryan:  the vehicle that stamps her as one of the few
genuinely bankable female stars in Hollywood.
     Bullock stars as Lucy, a token collector for the Chicago
Transit Authority.  Mostly alone since the recent death of her
father, Lucy fantasizes about a handsome businessman (Peter
Gallagher) who takes the train every day.  Their lives cross in an
unexpected way when Lucy saves the man's life after he falls onto
the train tracks and ends up in a coma.  At the hospital, Lucy
learns that the man's name is Peter Callaghan, that he has a large
and loving family, and that through a series of misunderstandings,
the family believes that Lucy is Peter's fiancee.  Delighted at
being welcomed into the family, Lucy plays along, until Peter's
brother Jack (Bill Pullman) arrives.  Although Jack is initially
suspicious of Lucy, a friendship grows between the two, a potential
romance complicated only by Peter's recovery.
     In many ways, the recent film of which WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING
reminded me most was not SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, but GROUNDHOG DAY.
It has a paper-thin, high-concept premise which at any moment could
have collapsed under the weight of its contrivances.  But it never
quite happens; just when you expect the script to go in a
predictable direction, it doesn't.  Writers Daniel G. Sullivan and
Fredric Lebow don't load the story with awkward little situations
that Lucy gets out of by sheer coincidence (although naturally there
are a few), nor do they resort to farce or slapstick.  Indeed, they
provide a surprisingly touching story about mutual need and
affection, with Lucy finding herself drawn to the family she lacks,
and the family viewing Lucy as a connection to their injured son.
In one particularly engaging scene around a boisterous dinner table,
WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING becomes more than its easily-summarized plot
point.
     It also boasts a winning performance by Sandra Bullock and an
impressive chemistry between Bullock and Bill Pullman.  With her
wholesome beauty and radiant smile, Bullock is perfectly cast as
Lucy.  It is not a particularly complex character, but Bullock has
real grace as a comic performer, an under-appreciated skill evident
in far too few current screen stars.  She has a solid and relaxed
partner in Pullman, who previously had seemed in danger of making a
career out of never getting the girl.  He does not have conventional
leading man looks, but there is an appealing self-deprecation in his
manner which could make him a natural romantic lead.  Their scenes
together are well-developed and steadily directed by Jon Turtletaub,
and they receive fine supporting help from Glynis Johns as the
Callaghans' quirky grandmother and the always-reliable Jack Warden
as a family friend who acts as Lucy's confidante.
     WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING loses a lot of its momentum once Peter
wakes up, however.  There are suggestions throughout the film that
he's going to turn out to be a truly narcissistic jerk, but we never
get a chance to see that character.  Peter Gallagher ends up playing
Peter as mostly befuddled, and not very interesting.  There is also
a throwaway sub-plot involving Peter's hell-on-wheels _real_
fiancee, who is not given a chance to do much of anything.  The
final twenty minutes of the film become mostly a waiting game until
Lucy and Jack end up together, and one that drags on a bit too long.
But it's what goes on while Peter is sleeping--a bright, charming
romance--that makes WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING a pleasant dream.

Title
Review for Serial Mom (1994)
Starring:  Kathleen Turner, Sam Waterston, Ricki Lake, Matthew Lillard,
           Mary Jo Catlett.
Screenplay/Director:  John Waters.
     Let's compare the cinematic Bards of Baltimore for a moment.  In
one corner, we have Barry Levinson, who painted the city in nostalgic
sienna tones with DINER, TIN MEN and AVALON.  In the other is John
Waters, with POLYESTER, HAIRSPRAY and now SERIAL MOM.  If I'm guessing,
I'd say that the Chamber of Commerce might lean towards Levinson.
However, when putting their latest films head to head, I think my
choice is obvious.  Levinson's JIMMY HOLLYWOOD was a slapdash attempt
at social commentary; SERIAL MOM is a sly bullseye, hitting every
target in sight with a return to the gloriously grotesque John Waters
of PINK FLAMINGOS fame/infamy.
     Kathleen Turner stars as Beverly Sutphin, a suburban housewife
with everything:  loving husband Eugene (Sam Waterston); feisty son
Chip (Matthew Lillard); sweet daughter Misty (Ricki Lake).  She also
has a little secret:  she kills people.  A lot of people.  Anyone who
crosses her, really, from the teacher who insults her son to the boy
who jilts her daughter.  With the growing body count, Beverly
increasingly becomes the object of suspicion, especially when Eugene
finds correspondence between Beverly and Ted Bundy.  Eventually,
Beverly is brought to trial, a trial which becomes a huge media event
and a potential TV movie starring Suzanne Somers (herself).
     Waters manages to comment on so many different aspects of
contemporary society that it's hard to believe he intended them all.
At the top of his hit list is our fascination with tabloid
sensationalism, and the cult of personality which develops around
anti-social behavior.  Beverly reads _Helter Skelter_ and collects
clippings of mass murder stories; Chip is delighted by the fame Mom's
trial brings.  Even the neighborhood busybodies who are quickest to
condemn Beverly get together to watch talk shows about girlfriends of
serial killers.  Without hand-wringing, Waters points out our
complicity in such crimes through our fascination with them.  But he
doesn't stop there.  Also under his scrutiny are the latent vigilantism
borne of feelings of powerlessness, and the foibles of both
conservatives (Beverly's rigid sense of propriety) and liberals (one
witness against Beverly is discredited because she doesn't recycle).
His one stumble into heavy-handedness comes when Chip's girlfriend
reacts to the difference between real blood and movie blood, but
basically Waters keeps the tone light with his cartoonish style.  This
is "Twin Peaks" as performed by The Three Stooges.
     Social commentary aside, SERIAL MOM is just plain funny.  Waters
goes for the gross-out from the get-go, as his name in the credits
appears under a crushed fly; this leads to Beverly skewering her
daughter's would-be beau, inadvertently removing some viscera, and to a
messy sneeze which leads to anarchy in a church.  There is a gleeful
scene as Beverly clubs a woman to death with a leg of lamb while
singing along to "Tomorrow" from ANNIE, and another at a concert where
Beverly is led away in cuffs to a chant of "Serial Mom!  Serial Mom!"
The highlight, however, is definitely the trial, where Beverly defends
herself in some very creative ways, while her family hawks "Serial Mom"
T-shirts outside the courthouse.  The opening is a bit slow, but SERIAL
MOM finishes with high energy.
     Waters sprinkles SERIAL MOM liberally with kitschy cameos like
Somers, Patricia Hearst (as a juror who becomes the object of Beverly's
ire) and riot girl band L7, but it is Kathleen Turner's performance as
Beverly which sparkles.  Turner has suffered through so many bad films
in recent years that it is a pleasure to see her with something she can
sink her teeth into.  Her smiling amalgam of Donna Reed and Hannibal
Lecter is frequently campy, but always appealing, creating another
level of identification which implicates the audience.  It's true that
the characters in SERIAL MOM are one-dimensional, but that's almost
appropriate given the film's framework as a "true-crime" re-enactment
of the real events.  SERIAL MOM is fun with an edge, and it killed me.

Title
Review for Gridlock'd (1997)
(Gramercy)
Starring:  Tim Roth, Tupac Shakur, Thandie Newton.
Screenplay:  Vondie Curtis Hall.
Producers:  Damian Jones, Paul Webster, Erica Higgins.
Director:  Vondie Curtis Hall.
MPAA Rating:  R (drug use, violence, profanity, nudity)
Running Time:  91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Call 911 for the Cliche Police if you must, but the eyes are the
window to the soul.  The finest actors working in films are those who can
command the screen with a gaze:  Paul Newman, Ralph Fiennes, Anthony
Hopkins, Morgan Freeman.  You look at these men on screen and you can tell
without them saying a word that there is something going on in their
minds, that the characters they play are real human beings.  We will never
have a chance to discover if Tupac Shakur could have been a great actor,
but he had that unique quality in his eyes.  In GRIDLOCK'd, an oddly
effective combination of gritty drama and social satire, Shakur and his
co-star Tim Roth take sketchy characters and make them exciting to watch
through the pure energy of their talent and chemistry.
     Shakur and Roth play Ezekiel "Spoon" Whitmore and Alexander "Stretch"
Rome, two Detroit buddies who share a spoken word/jazz trio, an apartment
and a drug addiction with Cookie (Thandie Newton).  When a New Year's Eve
party ends with Cookie comatose after a drug overdose, Spoon and Stretch
begin to wonder if they are living on borrowed time.  They soon make a New
Year's resolution to get into rehab, but that proves to be easier said
than done.  As though the temptation to fix were not hindrance enough,
Spoon and Stretch also find their attempts to get clean hitting a road
block of bureaucracy, confusion and red tape.  The government might be the
least of their obstacles, however, as they find themselves suspects in the
murder of a drug dealer, and on the run from a nasty thug (Vondie Curtis
Hall).
     In order for you to buy into GRIDLOCK'd at all, you have to accept it
as a surreal odyssey rather than as urban realism; unless Spoon and
Stretch sleep through an entire day at the hospital after bringing in
Cookie, they are going to government offices on New Year's day, in which
case they should be thankful they get any help at all.  GRIDLOCK'd may
actually be a response to the fatuous social commentary of another urban
odyssey, 1991's FALLING DOWN, which found a besieged middle class white
male venting his righteous anger against the system during a trek through 
inner city Los Angeles.  In FALLING DOWN, Michael Douglas' D-FENS (the
character's personalized license plate, echoed in GRIDLOCK'd by the drug
lord D-REPER's plates) whips out a gun because he can't get breakfast at
McDonald's; in GRIDLOCK'd, Spoon and Stretch are unarmed against the
demands placed on them before they can get into a rehab center.  And where
the unhinged D-FENS became a heroic surrogate for audiences,
writer/director Vondie Curtis Hall refuses to let Spoon and Stretch off
the hook for their own part in the situation.  One bureaucrat responds to
a tirade from Stretch with the question, "Do you expect the world to
stop...just because you picked _today_ to clean up?"  The world in
GRIDLOCK'd is just as frustrating as the world in FALLING DOWN, but the
cathartic moments yield no easy answers this time.
     Hall has some interesting things to say about what we expect from The
System, but perhaps not enough of them.  A significant chunk of GRIDLOCK'd
is devoted to Spoon and Stretch's flight from D-REPER and from the police,
and those sub-plots serve up some thoroughly predictable moments.  In one
scene, Stretch scares off D-REPER by getting chummy with a police officer;
another presents that old chestnut of the two mistakenly-suspected heroes
in a public place watching a television news report of the crime which
shows their pictures.  The entire sequence of events seems designed merely
as an excuse to get Spoon and Stretch running, while the other primary
plot has them standing in line or sitting down much of the time.  Hall
also plays with gratuitous inserts of drug paraphernalia and flashbacks to
the day before the film's main events, perhaps making a particular effort
to point out the talent the characters are wasting through
self-destructive behavior.
     Oh, the irony of it.  Tupac Shakur made a career in music and movies
playing the hard case, and living the life to back it up.  In GRIDLOCK'd,
Shakur gets the chance to play someone who has seen enough of the way his
life could go to know that it scares him.  Spoon is an idea for a
character at best as written by Hall, but Shakur displays an intelligence
and survival instinct which struggle with his addiction.  Mostly it comes
through those eyes, eyes with none of the hardness you might expect from
the infamous gangsta.  It is Spoon who plays conscience to Stretch's pure
appetite, and Roth plays Stretch with a gleeful self-destructiveness (he
reveals that he is HIV positive even as he is preparing to shoot up again)
which is as much an obstacle to Spoon's goal as any agency or enemy.
GRIDLOCK'd's most cruelly comic scene finds Stretch "helping" Spoon get
into an emergency room by repeatedly stabbing him with a tiny pocket
knife, and it becomes an appropriate symbol for how the company he keeps
has slowly drained the life out of him.  With friends like that, Spoon
doesn't need enemies, and Shakur looks at Stretch with the tired eyes of a
man who has seen too much.  The tragedy now is that we won't get more
chances to see those eyes again.

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
(Hollywood)
Starring:  John Cusack, Minnie Driver, Alan Arkin, Dan Aykroyd, Joan
Cusack, Jeremy Piven.
Screenplay:  Tom Jankewicz and D. V. DeVincentis & Steve Pink and John
Cusack.
Producers:  Susan Arnold, Donna Arkoff Roth and Roger Birnbaum.
Director:  George Armitage.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence, drug use)
Running Time:  107 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     GROSSE POINTE BLANK has been bumped from Hollywood Pictures' release
schedule a couple of times, but for once it appears that the delays had
nothing to do with production over-runs or shabby quality.  My guess is
that the marketing people just kept asking for more time to figure out how
in the world to sell this thing.  When John Cusack is your biggest star,
the director's previous film (MIAMI BLUES) was seen by next to no one 
seven years ago and the tone defies even its cute high-concept premise,
you'd probably be stumped too.  And no matter how they try to sell GROSSE
POINTE BLANK, they won't do it justice.  GROSSE POINTE BLANK is wildly
unpredictable, wonderfully detailed and unapologetically intelligent, a
comedy which takes the time to do the little things right and gets big
laughs in the process.
     Cusack plays Martin Blank, a killer-for-hire facing an existential
crisis.  Troubled by old regrets and doubts about his chosen profession,
Martin decides to confront issues from his past by attending his 10-year
high school reunion in the Detroit suburb of Grosse Pointe, Michigan, a
trip which conveniently matches up with an "assignment" in the area. One
piece of unfinished business involves Debi Newberry (Minnie Driver), the
high school sweetheart Martin stood up on prom night ten years earlier and
who still occupies his dreams, but the road to redemption and true love
won't be an easy one.  Two NSA agents (Hank Azaria and K. Todd Freeman) 
have been tipped off to Martin's presence in town, a rival assassin (Benny
Urquidez) has been hired to kill Martin himself, and yet another rival,
called Grocer (Dan Aykroyd) is taking Martin's refusal to join a proposed
hit man's union _very_ personally.
     John Cusack is one of four credited writers for a script which boasts
one of the characteristics of the best screen comedies:  every minor 
character is a fully-realized comic creation.  The supporting cast features
gifted performers like Alan Arkin (as the therapist whose fear of Martin
renders him incapable of offering the slightest help) and Cusack's sister
Joan (as Martin's intense but effective office manager/personal assistant)
doing hilarious work, but their excellence isn't surprising.  It is when
you get big laughs out of bit parts like an oblivious convenience store
clerk (Duffy Taylor) or an edgy but dim-witted neighborhood security cop
(Michael Cudlitz) that you know you're dealing with writers who aren't
content to get lazy once they get past the two or three lead characters.
The exchanges between these characters are sharp and clever, rich with
sometimes overlapping dialogue which actually requires the audience to pay
attention.  The punch lines never come quite when or how you expect them,  
taking deadly satirical aim at targets like organized labor, suburbia,
assassin etiquette and that strange American ritual called the high school
reunion.
     At the relatively calm center of this colorful comic hurricane is
John Cusack, who adds GROSSE POINTE BLANK to an impressive resume of smart
projects like SAY ANYTHING, THE GRIFTERS, and BULLETS OVER BROADWAY.  His
self-deprecating wit and baby-faced, sad-eyed attractiveness make him an
instantly sympathetic screen presence, and Cusack has to fight against his
persona a bit to give Martin the killer instinct he requires.  The script
gradually reveals bits of Martin's history which explain how he became who
he is, without sacrificing the comedy for an unnecessarily serious
character study.  It's a deft piece of acting by Cusack, who has an easy
chemistry with Minnie Driver (in perhaps the least well-developed role)
which convincingly evokes a sense of history and familiarity.  As absurd
as the situations get in GROSSE POINTE BLANK, the film never becomes a
farce because Cusack plays Martin's quest for enlightenment as honest and
honorable...even if he has to stab someone in the throat with a ball point
pen along the way.
     Oh, yes...GROSSE POINTE BLANK could catch you off guard if you are
unfamiliar with the aforementioned MIAMI BLUES, director George Armitage's
under-appreciated 1990 thriller which wasn't timid about mixing comedy,
quirky characters and occasionally graphic violence.  GROSSE POINT BLANK
is a much better, much funnier film, but it does include moments of
violence which are sometimes jarring in an otherwise playful film; Martin
is a killer, and we see him at work as well as at play.  Hollywood
Pictures isn't doing much to warn the squeamish about those elements,
preferring instead to emphasize the comedy and a Gen-X-nostalgic 
soundtrack heavy on 1980s punk and new wave tunes by The Jam, The Clash
and others.  A bit deceptive, perhaps, but for once I'm willing to forgive
the marketing folks their trespasses if they get people into theaters to
see GROSSE POINTE BLANK.  Something this disarmingly unique needs all the
creative salesmanship it can get.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
WHERE THE MONEY IS
(USA Films)
Starring:  Paul Newman, Linda Fiorentino, Dermot Mulroney.
Screenplay:  E. Max Frye and Topper Lillien & Carroll Cartwright.
Producers:  Ridley Scott, Charles Weinstock, Chris Zarpas and Christopher
Dorr.
Director:  Marek Kanievska.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  89 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At the age of 75, Paul Newman is still one of the sneakiest, most
thoroughly professional actors in films. His manner is so relaxed and his
charisma so undeniable that it's easy to forget how good he is at what he
does; if Newman has ever mailed in a performance, I'd like to know what it
was. I find it hard not to get enthused about a caper film like WHERE THE
MONEY IS when I know that Newman is in the lead role. After all, no actor
has ever done a better job than Newman of bringing life and charm to
criminals (BUTCH CASSIDY & THE SUNDANCE KID, COOL HAND LUKE), broken-down
has-beens (SLAP SHOT, THE VERDICT) and slick hustlers (THE STING, THE
COLOR OF MONEY). World-weary intelligence fits him like Spandex.
     It's my sad duty to report that there's more weary than world-weary
to WHERE THE MONEY IS, though you can hardly blame Newman for its 
failings. He plays Henry Manning, a veteran bank robber who finds himself
transferred from jail to a nursing home after he suffers a severe stroke. 
Assigned to his care is Carol Ann McKay (Linda Fiorentino), a nurse and
former prom queen whose life and marriage to former prom king Wayne
(Dermot Mulroney) never turned out like she hoped. Then Carol begins to
suspect that Henry has faked his stroke symptoms to get out of prison, and
eventually she forces Henry to show his true colors. Though Henry thinks
at first that Carol plans to turn him in or blackmail him, she actually
has other plans in mind -- specifically, she hopes Henry will teach her
the tricks of the thieving trade.
     WHERE THE MONEY IS gets off to a kicky start with a flashback
prologue of Carol and Wayne racing recklessly away from their prom, set to
The Cars' infectious 1983 hit "You Might Think." The script (co-scripted
by E. Max Frye from his original story) sets up Carol as a live wire
shorted out by routine, and Fiorentino does a more than capable job of
giving her a spark (she's one of the few actresses who approaches Newman
in the world-weary intelligence department). As the film peeks into
Carol's marriage to Wayne, it begins to set up a character study of a
woman driven to ridiculous lengths by the desire to add some excitement to
her mundane life.
     And it's a very, very stupid idea. WHERE THE MONEY IS, it should be
reiterated, has a caper at its core -- an armored car heist executed by
Henry, Carol and Wayne. It's an effective enough centerpiece, but it has
virtually nothing to do with the rest of the movie. In fact, while the
heist sequence is far from breathtaking in its execution -- director Marek
Kanievska appears to have a philosophical objection to making the film
interesting to watch on a minute-to-minute basis -- it only makes the
central issue of Carol's mid-life crisis seem utterly inconsequential. 
There's nothing wrong with adding some character to a plot-driven caper
structure, but that's not what WHERE THE MONEY IS does. It actually adds
more plot -- in the form of Wayne's jealous streak, Carol's attempts to
help free Henry, etc. The film pretends it's character-based just long
enough to distract from the main story, then ties up everything so quickly
you wonder if there were people involved at all.
     The horrible consequence of this approach is that Newman is almost
completely wasted. It's not so much that his character spends the first
twenty minutes with his face frozen into a rictus, but that no one seems
to know what to do with him once Henry does come to life. He still snaps
off his dialogue with a seen-it-all rasp, and he lets those famous blue
eyes dart and speak when no other part of his body is capable. WHERE THE
MONEY IS builds a charge of potential energy from his mere presence. It
rarely, however, finds an effective way to release that energy. Here he
talks his way out of an encounter with a pair of cops; there he pulls a
fast one on a slimy orderly. For the rest of the film he just waits for a
reason to be there. It's hard to figure what he saw in the script, since
WHERE THE MONEY IS theoretically is more about Carol than it is about
Henry. Newman has earned better in his 50 year career than being left to
support an ineffectual caper, just because that's where the money is.
